restaurant,review,review_count,url
1927 Lobby Lounge at Rosewood Hotel Georgia,"My wife and I dropped in here today, around 1:00 pm, and were seated immediately. Cheryl, our server, was there right away to take initial orders and bring water (still or sparkling!). I had their ""Hotel Georgia"" cocktail, while my wife went with a glass...More
A perfectly designed step back in time to a genteel British colony. Perfect ambience to begin an evening. Quiet, calm, comfortable. Friendly attentive service. And the martinis were perfectly mixed, too.
Terrible service at this lounge and disgruntled staff. They need to work on their customer service and slow on bringing starters and drinks. No wonder this lounge is never busy.
We had a wonderful dinner with tasty cocktails. The atmosphere is great, and the staff were so helpful and friendly. Vanessa and Margrae are fantastic ambassadors for the hotel, they made our visit very enjoyable.
Our first stop in Vancouver on this trip back after several years. Not only is Vancouver a unique and wonderful city, maybe the best of all worlds in North America, but the Lobby Lounge in the Georgian Hotel (The Old Name) is quintessential Vancouver. Elegant,...More
Dear enofile1, Thank you for your review and comments regarding our Hotel. We are glad that you enjoyed the property and most importantly our bartender Joe. We will certainly your comments with him We look forward to welcoming you back soon. Paul Li Director of...More
Poor service and bland food menu- would i visit there with husband again ? Definitely not. The staff have a unfriendly attitude ;they look like they are more suited for McDonald's.More
Dear Taylorn59, Thank you for review and comments. I would like to learn more about your visit as it is certainly not the level of service that we aim to provide. I look forward to hearing from you, and learning from what may be an...More
I recall the old hotel in this area and the refreshed 1927 Lobby Lounge is superior. Great service and a wonderful “vintage” drinks menu.
Dear Whereintheworld4, Thank you for your review and comments about enjoying Martini at 4pm. We look forward to welcoming you back. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
Came here by fluke after leaving Reflections at the same hotel. Was surprised it was still open and was happy to have a night cap in such a beautiful calm environment.More
Dear nicolesawyer1990, Thank you for your review of 1927 Lobby Lounge. We are glad that you stumbled our little hidden Lobby Lounge. We think that it is one of Vancouver's best secrets; but not any more. We look forward to seeing you again soon. Paul...More
Great atmosphere, attentive staff, great drinks and food. I would definitely drink here regularly if I lived in Vancouver.
Dear EndofNinth, Thank you for your review of and comments regarding the atmosphere, our attentive associates, and great food and beverage menu. We hope to see you again soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
I stayed at the hotel and decided one afternoon to relax for a quick drink. The staff were very good as were the drinks.
Dear Inter-nat-nal, Thank you for your review and short visit. We have improved since your last visit and hope to see you again soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
Stopped by for an afternoon bite to eat and found this bar overlooking the elegant lobby of Hotel Georgia. We had a salad (very nicely prepared and presented with quality greens) and an avocado sandwich (just the right size). This is a nice quiet spot...More
Dear EA_CDP, Thank you for review and short visit to 1927 Lobby Lounge. We have improved our food and beverage menus since your visit, and hope that you will stop by again. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
Came for dinner on a weeknight. Many of the tables were full which surprised me because I consider this a quiet, obscure little hotel lounge that really doesn't have anything special to offer. Their food menu is super small - something you only realize when...More
Dear SamC, Thank you for your review and it appears we may not have met your expectations on your visit. We have improved since then, and hope that you will give us another opportunity to serve you. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
great meu selection, delicous generous portions make this a great choice for a lunch in downtown vancouver
Dear TerryP, Thank for your review. We have since changed our menu and improved on our services and hope to see you again soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
The cocktails are to die for! So thoughtfully prepared and delicious. I love this lounge! It feels intimate and classic while still making you feel like your in the action of the hotel lobby. If you are eating lunch, staying at the hotel or just...More
Dear Anita C, Thank you for your review and comments. We love our little lounge as well and look forward to seeing you again soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
Last night we stopped into 1927 for a cocktail. It started out rough but ended fantastic. When we were initially seated at the bar the young male server with glasses tossed, yes tossed the menu onto the bar top at my husband. At this point...More
Dear 281vickyr, Thank you for your review and comments about the recovery from Joe, our bartender. We are glad that he was able to turn around the experience. We look forward to serving you again soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing",26,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7100350-Reviews-1927_Lobby_Lounge_at_Rosewood_Hotel_Georgia-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
1931 Gallery Bistro,"You used to get a nice lunch up above the art gallery, but I wouldn’t recommend the new bistro for a meal. Nice ambiance, nice patio, but breakfast items are served with sides of tatter-tots and Caesar salad, that kind of gives you a feel...More
We went for lunch while we observed some exhibits at the Vancouver Art Gallery. I had the Tuna Poke Bowl that was tasty and good. My wife had Banh Mi Croissant that was not that good. Service was good.
The four stars includes the fact that you can visit the Vancouver Gallery before or after your meal. The patio is very nice. Service from our Chilean waiter was good. He made sure to listen and address my food allergies. The food itself was average....More
We decided to have lunch after visiting the art gallery. my wife had avocado on toast and I selected the smoked salmon benedict. Both were very good. the service was efficient and the staff welcoming. recommended
Described by my sister as being one of her “happy places” we greatly enjoyed our lunch with her especially as the clouds evaporated away and the sun shone. The service on the terrace was friendly and the menu had lots of choices. Most of our...More
We were in Vancouver for 5 days and went there 3 times, hows that for a review. very nice,fresh food, no Breakfast fry ups here.
Visited the new 1931 Gallery Bistro yesterday and the food was quite good, but so disappointing to see the patio make over. It was the for years the best outdoor patio in Vancouver, now it looks like a cheap suburban wedding. Gone are the flowers,...More
Located in Vancouver Art Gallery down town by Robson Square , I hear so many mixed reviews about this place , happened one of the over sea business partner stay at Hyatt , so what a better way to catch up the good old days...More
Being on a life long quest to find the ultimate eggs bene - I found it. Served with smoke salmon lox, fresh dill and a hint of lemon - the freshness and flavour were off the charts!
Have ordered from 1931 on a number of occasions and am always impressed by the quality of the dishes and fresh ingredients. The Chocolate Ganache cake is a favourite, and the great dinner/appetizer dishes (Beef Short Rib, Salmon). They've re-done their menu recently and prices...More
Met a good friend here for lunch to celebrate vaccinations and the almost end of the pandemic. They have a lovely deck with lots of umbrellas for shade from the noon day sun and a great view over Robson Square. Food is good. I especially...More
I went here for my bday because from photos it looked really nice! Unfortunately I didnt get to sit on the couches. The view was of robson square which was nice but kinda covered by tree plants. Service was great, nothing to complain about. The...More
I used to be a full-time employee here, until the fallout of COVID-19 earlier this year. I decided to support my former restaurant team on NYE because I knew I could count on them, especially during these tumultuous times, to deliver a consistent and sanitary...More
With the gorgeous architecture of the Vancouver art gallery as the backdrop, and the thoughtfully spaced tables, this is by far the best eat-out experience I've had during this stressful time. I went with my girlfriends for happy hour and I also went back for...More
So lovely I went twice in one week. First for happy hour with girlfriends and then again with family for another happy hour that extended to dinner--both experience being just as enjoyable. The was great, beautiful and delicious from appetizers to dessert. Service was exceptional,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d19635694-Reviews-1931_Gallery_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
33 Acres Brewing,"Fourth stop on our Mt Pleasant self-guided brewery tour. 33 Acres seems more about creating a fashion statement than a friendly welcoming environment. Having said that, the beer is very good.
Almost NO vegan options on the menu, the only mushroom sandwich they have sucks. It comes with the cheapest chips from a box you can find. Total rip off for $15 plus tax plus tip. Service is whatever yet they squeeze 18% service onto your...More
We had terrible food and terrible service. The staff is so incredibly rude. We do not recommend this place. Avoid!
What can I say... this place is the place for Brunch. Sad that it is so small so you need to either be patient or get there really early. A bunch of us went so we ordered different dishes and shared a taste. Everything was...More
Visiting on a busy Friday afternoon we were surprised and pleased at the great service and delicious blackcurrant ale which we returned for once again the next day! It was fun to watch the brewing process through huge glass doors from our seats and a...More
There are 2 pubs side by side and -a food truck outside making pizzas (looked great) and heard they were good. Good atmosphere for visiting-feels like a bistro more than a brewery. Reasonable price. $9 for a sampler. Beers good.
The brunch is affordable and the beer is great! A place most visitors will miss and that I recommended they check it out!
33 acres is on multiple “best” lists of breweries and brewpubs to visit in Vancouver, so we made it one of our first stops. The food truck leaves a bit earlier than I would have expected, so we ate supper elsewhere, but the beers were...More
I came here with friends on a Saturday night. We ordered drinks quickly and were able to get a seat. Really impressed with the ciders that we ordered- they were really unique and had an interesting taste.
Before visiting tasting room I only tried liquor store-bought bottled 33 Acres of Nirvana IPA, and I should say I wasn't blown away by it. Don't get me wrong, it is a solid IPA, but I know at least two more very similar IPAs at...More
This was our first stop when we arrived in Vancouver for brunch and the food was amazing! It was a good vibe in there although very loud because it’s a small space.
Beautiful small brewery, brewing great beers and IPA. Fun concept. Beer, coffee and Pizza. Outside they have a food truck preparing great woodstone oven baked pizza by a real specialist. Also they serve small plates with assorted cheeses.
I love this place. They do great beers and the brunch is delicious. I highly recommend the eggs Benedict on biscuit with arugula salad. The coffee here is also pretty good. Be prepared to wait if you visit at the weekend, and you'll need to...More
I’m a design conscious person and this bar and brewery is beautiful but the large range of taps -22- is great and the fluffy cloud ipa is sublime. Take a taxi out of town , only about $10 and this is craft beer heaven. Two...More
I always describe 33 acres to friends as overrated but in Sort of a pleasant way. The beers are tasty, the breakfast is good, the clientele is unapologetically alternative. Basically everything you want from a Main Street area brewery.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7939730-Reviews-33_Acres_Brewing-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
4 Stones Vegetarian Cuisine,"I was traveling a lot and had a layover so I took the opportunity to go to 4 Stones. They were busy. It was suggested that I leave. I did!!!!
All the food is vegetarian with lots of vegan options. Extensive menu. Not a lot of room to sit at the moment as they focus on take-out.
There is immune compromised person working there, that means that person is sick, mask won't save from any virus, it's all going to the food. I used to like this place but the fact that they don't respect clients with medical conditions , you lost...More
I had a wonderful take out dinner with my nieces and nephew from the 4stones restaurant , it is a Taiwanese family run ( hole in the wall ) , due to the current pandemic , take out only and I am not a vegan...More
I'm not a vegetarian but everything I tasted was so delicious and like meat!!! The BBQ buns are the best I ever hade and gyozas and dumplings are better than meaty ones. The stew and the other ""fish or meat dish"" was as well very...More
Came here after just finishing my self-isolation and I was craving a good vegan feast. Unfortunately with corona there is still no sit-down dining, but it was a wonderful surprise to stumble upon this Taiwanese place and get takeout. I ordered 客家小炒 Hakka stir-fry, it...More
Thank you so much for your feedback. Next time you can try our Vegan Szechuan Boiled Fish (水煮魚)~Plant based authentic Szechuan flavour. See you soon😀
This is a vegetarian restaurant that also caters to vegans. We had their Japanese pan fried Gyoza (5 pieces). It was ok but we've had better. It's made to order. Allow 20-25 minutes for dim sum orders. Their other menu items also looked appealing.
I have been going to 4 Stones for many years now. The food is consistently good. There is a wide choice on the menu and it always well prepared. Recently it has changed from service at the table to ordering and prepaying at the counter...More
Originally found 4 Stones on some delivery service. Had no idea if was in Richmond. Tucked away across from the mall. But the flavours & quality of vegan & vegetarian food are amazing. Sweet & Sour Treasure, Deep-Fried Oyster Mushrooms, MUST have the Lettuce Wraps....More
Loved, loved, loved it! For a unique experience and delicious food you have to try this place out. We ordered a variety of dishes, they were all amazing! Highly recommend this for foodies!
Went there with friends, one of whom is a regular because she's a vegetarian. It's in a strip mall, not the most charming of locations - but this little place does an excellent job of serving up flavors and variety. This is a small operation...More
We are not Vegans so when we were invited for lunch with a Vegan couple we didn't know if we would be enjoying this lunch, and had a chance to enjoy dishes that looked like meat! The selection was very large and I must admit...More
I would give this place a 0 for service if I could. I ordered a vegetable stir-fry noodle dish over the phone and the lady told me it was busy and I'd have to wait 30 minutes, which I said was absolutely fine. When I...More
They advertise this place as a Chinese Vegetarian restaurant and went there with high hopes reading some good reviews. Firstly the parking is a pain as there is very limited spots reserved for 4Stones. The when we went in the place was packed so we...More
This family run restaurant has been around for more than a decade and I have been coming here since it opened. It is very popular and sometimes that means waiting. A very extensive Chinese vegetarian menu. The dishes are predominantly but not exclusively Taiwanese. Very...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4880056-Reviews-4_Stones_Vegetarian_Cuisine-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
75 West Coast Grill,"I’d been curious about 75 West Coast Grill for some time. Originally known as “American Grille” until 2019, this eatery, which is housed in the Vancouver Airport Marriott Hotel, has consistently been in TripAdvisor’s “top 5” restaurants for Richmond. As such, one would naturally assume...More
We've been many times and have never been disappointed. We had the Rack of Lamb and Striploin steak. Both were cooked to perfection. Remi, our server, was as always excellent. He has a way of making you feel welcome but is never intrusive and provides...More
Staff always friendly and make you feel at home. Tetania and Rémi special shout out. Breakfast staff excellent as well.
My recent visit to 75 West Coast Grill left me deeply dissatisfied and regretting my decision to dine there. From the exorbitant prices to the lackluster food quality, this restaurant failed to meet even the most basic expectations. First and foremost, the prices at 75...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your feedback regarding your visit to 75 West Coast Grill. We are concerned and sincerely apologize for the experience that you have described as this is not in line with our high guest service standards. We pride ourselves on providing...More
Dry ribs starter was very very good. The steak and halibut selections were excellent. Service was great and friendly. Really enjoyed our evening. Only disappointment they were out of apple strudel. The cheese cake we had instead was very good.
Efficient and very friendly service. I was told I could sit in any open seat for breakfast. I had a wonderful omelet they made quickly. There is also a hot buffet with eggs, bacon (American style), sausages, cereals, fruit, bagels, muffins, yogurt, and individual bottles...More
An excellent place for friends to gather and watch the hockey games. The food is fantastic & prices are very reasonable. Patrick/Moon & Omad know how to look after their customers. Well done!
Dinner was fine. I do not wish to be negative; therefore, I'll wait to write my review!! You tell us how many words we must have in the review. It is just like your establishment telling us not to write negative reviews.
Dear guest, Thank you for taking the time to write a review about your dining experience. Please contact me at franck.hohnadel@vancouver-marriott.com or at 604-232-2821 to discuss your experience. Kind regards, Franck Hohnadel Director of Food and Beverage
Had to overnight in Vancouver due to flight delay and ended up here. The meal was fantastic, the price reasonable but service provided by Remi took it over the top! Thank you!
Choices in the menu is limited. Taste wise is alright. Filipino server has an attitude. Discriminates and is only friendly to certain races. Staff Lisa is not approachable as well. Another female staff is nice and welcoming.More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your feedback regarding your visit at 75 West Coast Grill. We are concerned and sincerely apologize for the experience that you have described as this is not in line with our high guest service standards. We pride ourselves on providing...More
We ate here for breakfast and then later in our stay had dessert to go. We had the vegetarian omelet and all Canadian breakfast. They seemed a little understaffed. One lady was a lot nicer than the other. There were no extras for customer service...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your feedback regarding your dining experience at 75 West Coast Grill. We apologize for the inconstancy in the service and food quality and hope that you choose to dine at 75 West Coast Grill in the near future. If you...More
This has been my third time I have been in this restaurant..their service is the worst we have ever received in our entire life. we have been with different kind of people, Chinese, Mexican company family-friendly and three Mexican. A couple was rejected before we...More
Service was very good, the server was very polite and efficient. Food was really good, all of it, we tried all of the appetizers, we had turkey sandwich, clam chowder soup. It all taste so good.
5/5. Excellent food and staff. Seafood was delicious. Great selection of local craft beer. Ample parking, with very friendly service. Very comfortable and modern.
I was welcomed by Lisa and served a glass of white wine in the lounge. When I was ready to have my meal I was seated in the dinning room and Chloe was my server. She was excellent. I had made some adjustment to my...More",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1370963-Reviews-75_West_Coast_Grill-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
A La Mode Pie Café,"I don't normally leave reviews, but the chicken pot pie and coconut cream pies were so disappointing that I had to leave a review. The chicken pot pie had the consistency of and tasted like Campbell's cream of mushroom soup with a few extra chunks...More
If you find yourself at Granville Island around lunchtime (I highly recommend this) you've got a lot of options. Many times I'd seen the lines for A La Mode and thought ""man, that must be some good pie."" And I bet it is. But! Most...More
After arriving early on Granville Island to sightsee, I decided to seek out some breakfast. After seeing that this eatery was open, I bought a scrambled egg and cheese croissant that was very good. Next time I visit Granville Island I would be happy to...More
My kids delivered dinner to me as I am sick at home. Out of the bag came a beautiful looking chicken pot pie with the yummy crust Where's the chicken- I poked around the cup full of very good tasting sauce only to find 7...More
I am a foodie from Vancouver and I think A La mode pie is one of the best in town. The owner, chefs, and staff are amazing. I love all their recipes but from my top list, I recommended to try Their pecan pie, mix...More
If you go to Granville Island you must check out A La Mode Pie. I’ve been coming here ever since I was young and their clam chowder pot pie is a classic. The puff pastry over the soup is a treat, you will want to...More
Waited in line for 10 mins, the rude unfriendly waitress tried to serve the person waiting in line after me until I butted in. Cafe lattes were $5.50 Each and mine was so horrible I couldn’t drink it, milky water!!!
We enjoyed our meal very much. My husband tried the chicken pot pie and I had the French onion pot pie. Both were delicious.
This place was busy and for good reason. Be prepared for a long queue. Be aware that what pies they have in the front display is what is left and since they couldn't tell me how long the pie I wanted was going to take,...More
A La Mode is an awesome counter service restaurant in the Granville Island public market. I just can't convey how good this meal was! The chicken pot pie was luscious and then we topped it all off with an a la mode serving of some...More
Our first view of the market in A La Mode...and all the beautiful pot pies...even a Clam Chowder one. We made our mind up right then to return at lunch and it did not disappoint. Boy was the crust flaky! Delicious...I would have loved a...More
A la Mode Pie Café is a very popular eatery that had a very long line when we visited. It sells a variety of savory and sweet pies. We ordered the clam chowder (around $10). The clam chowder was served in an attractive tureen dramatically...More
A La Mode is one of the nicest places to dine in the Public Market. The grub arrives piping hot and always so very tasty. It's nice to enjoy your repast in real dishes instead of the flimsy containers you frequently receive for ""take out""....More
This place has a clam chowder pot pie style that's better than clam chowder in a bread bowl. It's pretty much the same breading covering the cup similar to the French onion soup. This combination works very well... get there early to beat the line...More
Their chicken pot pie is scrumptious. The pastry is perfect and the flavour of the sauce underneath is to die for. Have a baguette to soak up the sauce when youre done.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971187-Reviews-A_La_Mode_Pie_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
A Taste Of India Restaurant,"My sons and I each had different dishes, with spices ranging from mild for me to super hot for one of my sons. All food was very good! Service was timely, food arrived hot with good portions. Would go here again.
Amazing tastes, great and delicate service. Big portions. The restaurant is clean, elegant, romantic but simple at the same time. Great experience!
Lovely meal in a family run Indian restaurant. Very tasty food, good choices for meat and vegetarian and reasonably priced
Excellent Indian culinary and friendly fast service . We enjoyed a great deal . A festival of delicious flavours . A restaurant to be visited again
This was near our hotel so opted to have dinner here. First impressions… not the greatest of decor nor comfort, however extensive menu with lots of choice at good prices . Food was delicious and huge portions . We both had different versions of chicken...More
The best restaurant ever! The dishes were delicious and the portion size are perfect. Would always come back to enjoy a meal! The prices are very fair.
We stopped for lunch while actually tryiing to find a thai that would do a vegan meal. No worries here in teh Indian restaurant. WE started with poppadums - one small one each - but it was tasty enough. Then I had chicken vindaloo, which...More
My husband and me had a vacation in Vancouver and were looking were to dine in the center area. I am a picky vegetarian eater and is not always easy to find were to eat. Taste of India is a modest restaurant with excellent food...More
I am new to this area and a massive Indian fan. I tried a lamb rogan josh from this restaurant approx 2 weeks ago. The curry was very average with a strong taste. The naan and dips were OK and the portions I would say...More
I just had the lamb roganghosh from the take-away menu. Loved it. I’d ordered in person for pick up a little later after I’d walked around Vancouver. Ready as promised, perfect sized portion, medium heat and it was spiced just right. Friendly service. Sharp price....More
We came in with 7 people on a busy thursday evening. The food we ordered (a whole array of stuff) was amazing and they even custom accomodated one of our group who wanted special this n' that (every group has one lol) . Bottom line,...More
Having the hungries after a long plane trip I spotted this place and thought Indian cuisine would be perfect. I am not certain how to word this but it was perhaps the blandest Indian cuisine I've ever tried. I got a lamb vindaloo and while...More
The food is delicious. The butter chiken is a MUST HAVE. Everything was perfect. We really enjoyed every plate we ordered.
Our “go-to” for comfort food and our favourite Indian in Vancouver! We’ve been going for years - always warmly welcomed by the Chef and his family. If I could only have one Indian (or maybe any!) dish ever again, it would be the Lamb Roganghosh...More
Ordered for a vegetable and Dal with Roti and iam 200% sure they served me leftovers . Absolutely shocking",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d681629-Reviews-A_Taste_Of_India_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
AJ's Brooklyn Pizza Joint,"Good pizza is amazing. And the pizza here is most often very tasty. But you know what? When you let a staff person host their buddies and take over the whole place with their very drunk and EXTREMELY loud behavior (on a Sunday evening), you...More
Pizza is joy, and this place remembers that! Fantastic service--bubbly, happy, supportive, proactive--and a cool place. You can order a full pie or get your slices. Wifi free in the building, too.
Awesome local craft beer!. It’s a good place for drinks and an amazing pizza with New York style. The restaurant is small but the service is fast.
Won’t beat the pies at this place. Best in Canada. All ZAs are good but stick with the New York style. Have the thick Sicilian or Detroit and you’ll be rolling around Kits beach like a wounded seagull that can’t take flight. I’d try em...More
Have eaten *lots* of pizza over the years but this next level. The Detroit Maui Wowie and Brooklyn style Jim’s semi-spicy were both amazing!
My wife and I decided to spend a few days in beautiful Vancouver. We love pizza and someone recommended AJ’s. Wow. We knew when we arrived we were at a special place. The place was rocking on a Monday night. We got a table near...More
We had such amazing pizza from AJ's Brooklyn Pizza Joint. It was such a big pizza and it was delicious. Service was super fast too, definitely recommend checking this out and will be back soon!
AJ’s is a popular pizza joint on Broadway known for their thin Brooklyn-style pizzas (although they also have thick crust Detroit-style pizzas as well). I’ve been meaning to try this place for a while and finally managed to visit in late October. I decided to...More
I am aware of the gravity of this statement and I say it wholeheartedly: some of the best pizza I have ever had. Like in the world.
I would give this pizza/bar joint 3.5 stars out of 5. Went there with friends and it was super busy so that is a good sign. Lots of beer choices and they have wine. Good lively vibe. Long counter where there is seating and then...More
Been to AJ's three times, and will never go back to sit down and eat. Will only do take-out, but it's too bad because their pizza is best served fresh out of the oven and not placed into a box, as the crust retains the...More
Went there for a nice pizza pie. Found out they DON'T have ONIONS- what pizza joint doesn't have onions- or Red Peppers (they had sun dried red peppers-yuck!). Anyways, the cheese was put on was way too little- for the price. And the guy who...More
This place has a pub like feel , very loud and noisy in there. Feels like you are in Brooklyn tho!But can still take a small family to eat if your are into pizza. The crust is crispy, so if you are into soft dough...More
We have tried the eat in. Their thin pizza is very good. The place is small but their service is friendly and the price is reasonable. The thick one is not that great. Take the thin one.
Awesome pizza, small but good selection of local beer on tap, fantastic service! What more could you ask for?",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13967859-Reviews-AJ_s_Brooklyn_Pizza_Joint-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
ARC Restaurant and Bar,"After a couple years I went back to Arc for a business lunch. The ""Caprese"" interpretation was somewhat ""interesting."" Burrata with heirloom tomatoes (Italy) on top of avocado (Mexico), blended with Leche de Tigre (Peru) and topped with toasted rice (Asia) is a mixture that...More
This restaurant is an 11 out of a ten! The food and service from our server Jennifer was more than outstanding! We enjoyed delicious sour dough bread awesome Caviar, dungeness crab over avocado, lobster tail, and the most delectable Halibut we have ever tasted! Enjoy...More
We went there for breakfast buffet. Excellent service. Thanks BABA!! The quality of food was excellent (freshness and taste). We also like the restaurant with high ceiling which provides better air circulation. Today is our second time eating at this restaurant. We were there a...More
We use to love the ARC but things have changed. The omlet was horrible for both of us. Maybe powered eggs or diluted to much. The next morning eggs Benedict like warm and you get 1 egg not 2 as usual. Dinner fish and crab...More
Had another amazing dining experience at Arc last weekend. The food and the service was fantastic, as always. Thank you very much to Emilee and Team. Arc remains our favourite restaurant in Vancouver.
The food at ARC was very good and affordable however the receptionist was rude and had poor service. We were the first to check in and 4 ohters without reservations went before us, when asked why she said she just over looked us and then...More
Karla has been AMAZING! We got here Saturday morning and she served us the most amazing beverages and food which was the perfect start to our trip in Vancouver. This is our first time staying at the Fairmont Waterfront and the service from ARC has...More
I was in Vancouver attending the Vancouver Fan Expo (Comic convention) and stayed at the Fairmont Waterfront hotel. After a long day, my brother and I did not want to hunt for a restaurant so we went to the restaurant in the Lobby of the...More
My husband enjoyed the meal on our last day in Vancouver. The hostess was very pleasant. I found the chicken wing a bit too spicy for me and she was gracious enough to take out of the bills. Food was plentiful and tasty. Good moktails...More
I recently went to the Arc restaurant before Christmas with my husband. The food was delicious. All of the staff were very professional but I want to especially compliment Kristina on her amazing service. Kristina went above and beyond to ensure our needs were met....More
For any New Years Eve Gala dinner or just dinner and dance for me , it is long gone retired teenage like me , eat out all the time , I am a fusspot person ! love go out enjoyed a relax quality meal ,...More
Great service by Katie in the restaurant; food is between average and good, nothing special...Nice ambiance and the staff is great!
We ordered short rib entree, and mushroom rigatoni, both were superb. Beautifully presented, enjoyable.
From previous visits (a couple of years ago), I was surprised at the limited menu, sort of average quality and yet still a high price. Only one type of fish on the menu. Four dessert options that were all pretentious.
My wife and I had the pleasure of an evening at ARC last night. The food was amazing, as always as was the service. Many thanks to Emilee and all of the Team who took such great care of us. We greatly appreciate that they...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6510624-Reviews-ARC_Restaurant_and_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Abode,"I highly recommend Abode! I walked up from my hotel by the Harbor, and enjoyed a delicious vegan breakfast: the falafel waffle 😋. My sister ended up joining me, and she got a kept friendly breakfast. We were both happy as could be, with the...More
Good for breakfast and last night drink , especially if staying at Blue Horizon, we ate breakfast there several times.
This is a very nice cafe lovely staff good food but beware kitchen closes at 8.30 and apparently the staff want to leave by 9pm we were told! but lunch and breakfast is really good.
What a great find, delicious food cooked with love and excellent friendly service. Was recommended Forage by our hotel but comparing the menus found Abode had a better selection. Benny of the day was amazing, eggs cooked to perfection ( you could choose soft, medium...More
Used this place for Breakfast whilst staying in the hotel great service & food, outside seating was great for coctails
We enjoyed 2 breakfasts here. The restaurant is attached to the Blue Horizon Hotel. First morning I had avacado toast and my husband had an omelet. Next morning we shared a spinach, tomato mushroom omelet. The best potatoes ever came with it!
What a nice surprise this place turned out to be. We stayed nearby and found this place by accident. The four of us had breakfast here two days in a row it was so good. The food is delicious and plentiful. The service was spot...More
Food selection was top notch and for being downtown i found the prices reasonable. I will be back on my next visit.
We had breakfast here. Each dish was done very well and much enjoyed. The service was quick and attentive. If you are staying at the hotel you can call down and they can prepare your meal if you are in a hurry or have it...More
The service was good and there was a good selection on the menu. The food arrived and the portions were large!
Stayed at the Blue Horizon and after a lovely morning walk had breakfast at Adobe. Had no idea it would be sooo good!!!
We stayed in the Blue Horizon Hotel which this restaurant is attached too and had breakfast in Adobe every morning. Their breakfast choice is good and the food is of a high standard, delivered fresh and hot by very friendly staff. We ate dinner twice...More
This restaurant is attached to the Blue Horizon Hotel making it ideal for a meal when you are tired from travel or to grab breakfast before heading out. The food like most of Canada is average and quite expensive.
Great food, served up promptly by pleasant and effecient staff who were very helpful throughout. Had breakfast there for four mornings and dinner on two occasions
Great food, friendly and knowledgable waitstaff, reasonable pricing, and excellent location. What more could you want? Located in the Blue Horizon Hotel, Adobe Restaurant has it all. While the menu offering is small, the flavors are large! My husband and I had breakfast here every...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14966070-Reviews-Abode-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Abode Restaurant,"I don't think it's a restaurant. They heat up pre heated items. They got our delivery on an empty restaurant wrong 2 times. not fresh
Whilst visiting Vancouver had a few breakfasts at ABODE. Good food and service. Premises closes around lunchtime. Particular mention to staff member Marianne.
An average breakfast experience. Poached eggs weren’t runny, toast came with a scraping of butter, ‘large’ fruit bowl was definitely not large. Fruit juice was from concentrate.
We stayed in the Horizon hotel on Robson Street & ate breakfast here 3 times. Service was friendly & all the meals we chose were very good, especially the eggs benny.
After an overnight stay downtown (local tourist) we wandered and found breakfast at the Abode Restaurant in the front lobby area of the Blue Horizon Hotel. Our server was really friendly and made great suggestions for breakfast. Our food ordered came out hot and perfectly...More
I went to Abode on Robson St. for breakfast with my Mom. We were seated by a server named Melody. After we were seated, we were completely ignored for at least 20 minutes. I tried to make eye contact with either Melody or one of...More
I had two eggs with bacon, fried potatoes and toast; my companions each had the omelette. The coffee is pretty good, as was my meal. Nothing outstanding but certainly very good.
We were disappointed when, after over 30 minutes of waiting, our waitress came to tell us our order was lost and had not even been started. We ended up waiting about an hour to eat our breakfast. I ordered my eggs benedict with a side...More
After checking in at Blue Horizon we decided to have breakfast at Abode. We did not have to wait too long to be seated and then be served. Our waitress was Abigail and she was friendly and did not rush us to order our meal...More
I ordered the Cheese platter. My husband’s sandwich was already half consumed and mine had not been served. Long story short the lady who took the order thought I did not want anything. She put in my order only after we inquired where my meal...More
Great place to eat after packing and getting ready to head home. Moderate prices and excellent food.
We were walking down Robson, on our way to somewhere else for breakfast, when the awning over Abode caught our eye. Ended up having breakfast there every day of our stay in Vancouver. Every experience was great - highly recommended.
We ate several meals there when we stayed at the Blue Horizon Hotel. The food choices were plentiful and the service was wonderful and the prices were reasonable for the portion size.
Had both dinner and breakfast here and both were delicious. The service was excellent - friendly and efficient. Highly recommend.
Visited Abode for breakfast after an early start (jet lagged). Warmly welcomed, and seated and quickly served coffee (bottomless). As I was hungry I ordered the “Marylyn’s” omelette, a must try. I was hungry and only just finished it! My wife had avocado on toast...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5294008-Reviews-Abode_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Absinthe Bistro,"will always be a special place a lovely experience great meals fantastic wine list perfect for any special occasion.
Absinthe is becoming one of our favourites, despite some difficulty finding parking in the area. We both ordered mussels to start, the duck confit and shared a lava cake dessert. We started with cocktails (martini and pastis) and ordered a bottle of Pinot Noir, which...More
With faabulous food, excellent wine, wonderful service, a quiet atmosphere and unhurried service you cannot find fault here. A gem indeed on Commercial Drive. Consistently sets the gold standard. We will be back.
We celebrated a birthday this evening and it was absolutely lovely. The service and the food were excellent and we didn't have to shout to hear each other. With a prix fix menue,, it is always an adventure to eat at this restaurant.
We hadn’t been to Absinthe Bistro for a few years (thanks, COVID!) so this was our first visit since they moved to a slightly larger space a few blocks down the Drive. More room than before but they still create a warm ambiance for couples...More
L'Absinthe Bistro is an excellent French restaurant and I am familiar with excellent French and Swiss restaurants having visited France a number of times. I'm surprised this Commercial Drive restaurant is not on the 10 Best list. It is a small restaurant so reservations are...More
So delicious! The steak was incredible as was the gazpacho. The desserts are outstanding. Prepare to spend a bit of time enjoying your meal as the portions are large and there is quite bit of time between each service as you meant to relax and...More
Returning to restaurants after Covid, I have largely been underwhelmed, but not so at Absinthe. It is even better than it used to be. Everything cooked with love and imagination and exquisite attention to detail. This is certainly one of my two or three favourite...More
We had a group of 6 to celebrate a trip to Paris. The evening was fantastic. The service and the food was outstanding. What a delight to be treated like you were the only customers they cared about. Between the 6 of us we tried...More
I took my mom there for her birthday. We had a wonderful evening; one 3 course meal, one 2 course. The foi gras was delish, as were the steak and duck confit. The scallops were juicy; the only false note was the lava cake, which...More
Simply FANTASTIC. A Must restaurant to try for French flare. Our server was a very friendly individual who was also very knowledgeable with her choices. We took the set menu for $57 which included Appy, Starter and Dessert. I guess with these tough times we...More
something Vancouver needs! Great food. The Absinthe drip was a cool thing to experience with friends. Something novel. Owner/cook/server/bartender delightful Corey working his butt off , was informative and attentive to all tables.. Overall an outstanding experience. great value too!!
The food and ambiance were fantastic. Our waiter turned out to be the owner of the restaurant and he was entertaining as well as being an excellent waiter. The food was supreme…everything good to perfection.
What an awesome set menu! Reasonably priced and with a great wine recommendation. From the bread with apricot butter to the double espresso and the three courses in between. Everything was so tasty and just . . . Well, it brought back such great memories...More
The owner gave an excellent service and the way they serve the absinthe was unique and the food was amazing. We've been treated very well. I would definitely recommend this place!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3476538-Reviews-Absinthe_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Adonia Tea House,"Quaint afternoon tea house with options for full Afternoon Tea, a mini Afternoon Tea, and a lunch menu. The vanilla bean scone was delicious, warm, crunchy on the outside and fluffy on the inside. We loved the Cream Earl Grey and White Cherry Blossom tea...More
ce and cute. The tea was delicious and you can have as much as you like. People are friendly and attentive. The only issue is that the place was very cold and we had to sit with our hats and our scarfs on. With winter...More
To preface, I have never been into afternoon tea; it's just not my thing. We ordered multiple take out tea sets for a party, it was great. The food is very convenient, it comes in individually wrapped boxes, very nice packaging, very aesthetically appealing. For...More
As I mentioned earlier, this past year has seen an influx of shops which offer online sales. To be honest, it has made things more convenient… especially with the whole pandemic still going on. I like it because it gives us the chance to try...More
Everything you could want from a tea house, including gluten free options! Eclectic decor and hosts happy to take your pictures :)
This is a nice little place for afternoon tea sets, and also offers other foods like soups and sandwiches. The range of teas available is very impressive. There are not many tables, so it's better to make reservations. As with other afternoon tea places the...More
Lovely tea house. Lovely decor and atmosphere. Small but with enough tables to have a good number of people at any one time. Great selectuons of tea. The rose one is very tasty. The high tea was delightful. Scones were very tasty. There is an...More
A crowded little place. Friendly staff. Nice treats. $25 gives you a mini tea, which is quite sufficient. Nice quality tea. High tea tends to be an over priced affair anywhere, so the $25 gives you a nice experience for the price.
The teahouse has a nice charm to it, and it has the nice touches of a fancy english parlour. The China is also of good quality. There was a wide selection of excellent teams to choose from. I would recommend the vanilla kipfurl. The food...More
While the ambience and tea selection are authentic, the food was nothing short of amateurish. Toasted sandwiches were uninspired, over-toasted and contained rock-hard bacon. The bland-looking smoked salmon sandwich looked like it had been created by a child and the soup didn’t even match what...More
Afternoon tea here was such a treat. It is a family run place and it shows in the care taken during our time here. Highly recommend making a reservation because it is a small room. The service was a little slow, but we didn’t have...More
Quarterly, I meet a friend there for lunch. Great selection on menu. On a weekday, it is quiet and we are not rushed out. For the first time, we did not do afternoon tea and we were both very pleased with the scones. We wish...More
After trouble getting in at another spot, we were delighted when a table was available for two at Adonia Tea House. We each chose to have the mini afternoon tea: three sandwiches, three sweets and a scone. Our cranberry scones were straight out of the...More
Not all restaurants are places where you can have a leisurely conversation with a friend in a pleasant setting, enjoying excellent food. Adonia Tea House is just such a place. There are larger and noisier restaurants in the Kerrisdale area. But after yesterday's lunch, this...More
Spent quite a bit of time looking for a tea house that didn’t have a dress code. Found this one in the unexpectedly cute town of Kerrisdale on the outskirts of Vancouver. There were approximately 10 tables and there was a 30 minute wait. Nice...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2196213-Reviews-Adonia_Tea_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Afghan Horsemen Restaurant,"Loved the food, setting and service. We were a group of 12 friends. We ordered the different platters and some sides for our table. Very delicate spices and flavors. The service was good and they checked back with us for drinks or requests. There was...More
Well . I’m so excited to write this review. From the entrance to dessert a fabulous experience. It is a museum, dinning and experience dining. You eyes will guide into the ceilings , windows, beautiful private booth seatings . The decoration and ambiance makes you...More
Had amazing lamb chops and hummus here. The food is delicious and the service was great. Definitely recommend checking this place out! I can't wait to come back again.
Food was good, generous portion size. Highlight was the lamb kebab meat. Service was friendly and swift. Choice of table seating or floor seating for a more traditional experience. Would go again.
The food is very rich and tasty. I highly recommend this Resturant to anyone looking for home made like food from Middle East The quality of food is high. Clean well served place Enjoy 😉
We both ordered the Lam Shoulder and the eggplant dip. The food was very good. The customer service was good. Food was nice and hot.
I had never tried Afghan food and didn't know what to expect. I was blown away. We had the Horsemens Platter and it was excellent. Great flavors, smell, and texture. Our server was great. We ate our fill and had enough left over for another...More
We stopped in for an impromptu dinner while near the Granville area. The outside of the restaurant makes it seem like a hole in the wall but once inside the ambiance was warm and inviting. We were seated quickly and decided on the vegetarian platter....More
I love the food! I love the decor! I love the staff! The menu is full of everything you would want to try.
This was my first experience in an afghan restaurant.I probably won't be back, not that there was anything wrong with the food, it just was not something Id ever eat
I made arrangements to take my wife for her Birthday 2 weeks prior and were looking to spend a full evening there. When I called to make the reservations I was told that they had availability at 8pm and we knew they were famous for...More
My husband planned a nice dinner for two. He called ahead and made a reservation for the seated tables. We were seated in the main restaurant and thought we'd just make the best of it. The owner came by and our server was polite, quiet...More
Dinner for 4. Superb from start to finish. Rice and potatoes alone are worth testing and tasting. I had beef Kabob-exquisite.
I took a group of 15 people here for a work dinner and every single one of them loved it. Options for a variety of tastes and dietary needs. Generous portions....you will NOT leave here hungry. Location looks sketchy, but don't be deterred, the inside...More
If you are looking for a real traditional afghan food, with a fair price, this is the place. We took 2 large horse plates with half litre of Malbec wine and two cokes, with 2 deserts and tea, and paid 176$, It worth any dollar,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d762941-Reviews-Afghan_Horsemen_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Agra Tandoori Restaurant,"We've been coming here for years for takeout. The food is very tasty (especially the Gobi Pakhora and the Lamb Bhuna Gosht). It's well prepared, and the price is okay because the portions are big. My only complaint is they have little consideration for the...More
Before the pandemic , Agra is one of my flavour place for their Indian Buffet , happened in the area with my brother and decided to have lunch at Agra , parking no problem , good size dinning room , spacious and clean , surprised...More
Great food, nice service. Fish pakora, Keenan naan were really good. Maintained good social distancing protocols.
first time i was in there always wanted to go fanatastic food good spices plenty of food very impressed great service i will definitely go back.
This was recommended by a friend. I was a bit surprised that it wasn't a larger buffet but everything was so tasty and good that it didn't matter. I went with a friend and he enjoyed it also. Definitely a place i will return to...More
I have been going to this place for a long time - the service and the food are excellent! A smaller venue worth a try!
Great East Indian food. Good price, quality and quantity. Service is fast for taking order and preparing food but a bit slow after food is served.
My family and I went for dinner at Agra Tandori and we were not disappointed. It's been a while since we visted and we were plesantly surprised that the food quality has not changed. The portion sizes were also good. I recommend the pistachio desert...More
This is our 3rd visit to Agra and we continue to be impressed with the food, service and value. Check out the special meal deals that are usually found displayed on your table. They allow you literally complete choice from the entire menu and include...More
I hesitate to write this review because I personally don't want it to be busier than it already is...I have gone to the lunch buffet here at least 30 times....( lost count)...the buffet starts at 11 am....(weekdays and Sundays) and we go early as it...More
We thought it was another restaurant with a similar name. By the time we realized our mistake, it was too late to leave.Service was slow as they were short staffed. Food was tasty but a tad bit over-priced. We ordered the Vegetable Thali, Chicken Biryani,...More
We were lucky to get a table -- even early in the evening this place is packed, which is a pretty good indicator. The service was great, the food was excellent and three of us stuffed ourselves with the best of everything for $81.59 including...More
We came here on a Wednesday night and the restaurant was almost full for dinner. It seemed family run so lesser experienced servers but the food was really good. The lunch buffet I hear is very well priced. We shared the garlic naan, fish pakora,...More
I should have known, this establishment specializes in Tandoori dished. I ordered Byriani chicken and this dish was ok. I love this dish When it is well prepared like the North Indian restaurant in Kempville, Ontario. Anyhow I will give this restaurant another try in...More
So Agra Tandoori Restaurant is nicely air conditioned and on these hot days that is definitely a must have. The food quality, quantity, selections and reasonable pricing are great. The staff and service also very good. The tables are clean and maintained and this restaurant...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d1890569-Reviews-Agra_Tandoori_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Ajisai Sushi Bar,"After visiting my aunt and stopped at London Drug for her medicines , noticed the restaurant not busy at all , it is a while since my last visit , so I stopped by for a later lunch and there is so many good Japanese...More
We sought out this place by reviewing its google rating as we had an event in the area later that evening . A 21 piece nigiri combo was $60 , two salads , and 2 miso and we had an $88 bill. The fish was...More
Lovely staff person helped me and my octogenarian friend with our vaccine cards and getting seated. Really sweet.
My partner and I have eaten here several times because it is close to her parents house. The restaurant is quite tiny but has nice ambience. The service is good, as is the quality of the sushi. It seems very authentic. The rice is always...More
Not so easy to locate, but they have two hour free parking underground very nearby. You cannot make reservations so be prepared to stand in line. They will take your cell # and text you when a table is ready. It is worth the effort...More
When you enter the shop, it is clean and odorless which tells you that the fish is fresh and how good is the quality and safety of the food. The sushi are meticulously created. Try ‘omakase‘(‘chef’s choice’), so you can have the best ingredients of...More
Sashimi were pretty fresh and tasty. But dish a little bit less....and the customer service is so so maybe they are busy ~~ anyway they didn’t given me back the changes and my friend was asking me to go 😒
Attempted to dine at Ajisai Sushi a number of times only to arrive to a minimum of a one hour wait departing without sampling the establishment: this time around, we arrived early and were seated at a lovely table with a short ten minute wait....More
When going into this place, I noticed a sign saying there was a limited number of seats. It seems it's because of some license or something. I ordered a couple sashimi salads to go, paid, and sat down to wait for them to be ready....More
Decent sushi. Nothing to write home about. Service was lovely. Rice was seasoned a little sweet for my liking. Fish selection was ok. I guess in truth I couldn’t get past the overly sweet rice. I chose the restaurant due to the reviews and the...More
This is a well established Sushi Bar in the Kerrisdale neighbourhood, having been in operation since 2001, the restaurant is still going strong; as we approach a line is seen outside of the restaurant waiting for the doors to be opened! Lunch Items we ordered:...More
Ajisai is so popular that they don‘t accept reservations....and on a saturday night we had to wait an hour for a table. We didn‘t regret it....! The look and the smell of this place reminded me right away of old style Japanese places. We sat...More
This restaurant makes me and my family very happy. Whenever we visit there, the food is amazingly fresh and the staffs are very friend. We order various food. I love the Sushi and Sashimi the best but the side dishes are very good, too. Those...More
Whenever I visit this restaurant with my family or friends, the food and the staffs make me smiles and very happy. Sashimi and Sushi are amazingly fresh and delicious. The other side dishes are so similar to what I get home or good restaurant like...More
Went there for lunch Excellent green tea I know it a little thing but it made a difference We had a mix of sushi hot pot etc Some unique items All were excellent good tasting Good setting excellent service. Atmosphere Definitely returning It’s 25 km...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d809147-Reviews-Ajisai_Sushi_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Akbar's Own Dining Lounge,"We were over from the UK visiting our son who lives in Vancouver. We met with him and his wife and their two friends for a meal here. I can't fault a thing. The food was delicious and the service was very attentive and friendly.
Great spot for lunch: good value, warm and affable service. I had the vegetarian thali for under $14 which included crunchy, fresh vegetable pakoras, creamy spinach with paneer, dal (lentils), basmatic rice and four fresh slices of naan, plus salad. A satisfying meal. Highly recommended!
An authentic Indian restaurant with super friendly staff and fast service. The food was good and reasonably priced.
The staff are knowledgeable about what is gluten-free and what isn’t. Like most Indian curries, Akbar’s are gluten-free. However, their pakoras which are made with chickpea flour were unfortunately cooked in the same oil as some of their gluten items, so not Celiac safe. But...More
My first visit to Akbar's on Broadway and what a surprise! Excellent food, great service and not crowded - we timed it right. The naan bread was outstanding - light, hot, so fresh it folds over your fingers. The boys had butter chicken - their...More
We've been on the road for two months traveling through the United States and often good ethnic food is hard to find. Landing in Vancouver we vowed to seek it out and Akbar's was our choice. We were not disappointed. We had the combo appetizer...More
So exceedingly delicious you will actually use all your naan to wipe those amazing sauces! One of those restaurants where you wish you had a big stomach to just keep on eating. Vegetarian or meat eater, satisfaction is guaranteed. Everything is so delicious you do...More
As someone who's lived in India for a decade, as well as sample's Vancouver's Indian Fare, I was very surprised by Akbar's Own. I had just missed the lunch special so I ordered an Entree - Vegetable Jal Frazie and made it a meal. Meaning,...More
Had gone for lunch with my son .. It appears that the restaurant has regular customers.. we ordered Tandoori chicken , Paneer Makhni and Naans. Tandoori chicken was served in a sizzler with onions .. huge portion .. Paneer Makhni was awesome.. Overall very satisfying...More
I ordered a lamb dish and a chicken dish. GET THE $7 naan combo bread. It is top shelf food and I was blown away by the flavours and quality. Worth every penny. Street food prices, 5 star quality. If you like Indian food, this...More
I used to frequent this restaurant a lot. Unfortunately, they don’t always deliver- if they are busy. Don’t waste your time on the website
We have been to this restaurant several times. It is always delicious. Tonight, we tried the coconut curry chicken and the mixed vegetable dish along with the generous portion of rice and generous portion of nan bread. We ordered the special garlic nan for an...More
We live near the restaurant and typically order-in one or twice every month. Quality is always good and their butter chicken, chicken vindaloo, and naan bread are particularly exceptional. Prior to finding this restaurant we tried about 10 different Indian restaurants around the city and...More
We live near Akbar's Own and have gone there several times. Three times we've taken out-of-province guests. Usually our experience has been good - both food and service. However recently we had a very poor experience when we took someone from Toronto. We all asked...More
Came here for dinner on a Saturday night. Service was friendly. We ordered the dinner special which was three curries, rice, naan, pakoras, two samosas and mango ice cream for under $50. Everything was delicious, the palak paneer was creamy, the ice cream tasted like...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d762943-Reviews-Akbar_s_Own_Dining_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Al Basha,"So delicious! And such friendly staff. My first time in so welcoming and definitely the best falafel I’ve had.
Between Walnut & Cypress on Cornwall in Kits there is a diversity of cuisines. Al Basha offers Middle Eastern on this diverse strip. Moltan, is two doors away, serving great Japanese food at good prices, always fresh, and one away is Panne Rizo offering good...More
What a great little hole in the wall restaurant! We had a beef donair (good) and the al bash plate with chicken and rice and humus (delicious!), both dishes were spicy in a good way and had lots of meat. Very reasonable prices and quickly...More
Very friendly staff, great food, excellent value. I've eaten here about 10x: sometimes chicken and sometimes veg. It's always very good.
If you are in Kitsilano, you have to pop into this joint. The falafel is amazing! Nice portions and clean simple joint
This was legit. The happy staff was fantastic. The food was amazing and extremely enjoyed by our family who came from many corners of the continent. Definitely a place to come again.
We had falafels and chicken shawarma wraps and they were delicious!! Particularly the falafels were so full of flavour, with spices that distinguished them from other places we've had such food in Vancouver. Very reasonable prices too!
Love this place. Honestly, best falafel I have ever had and they do it every time. Really good value. I will return again. Service is always good, lovely people serving at the counter, very much into the food. All homemade. I highly recommend this place.
Was so expensive, the lentil soup was so runny , the grape leaves stuffing were so cold and from the can not Handmade. Gave me the run . Don't recommend it !!
It's hard to find a goood shawarma place in Vancouver. This is our 3rd try, not bad at all. But they don't beat Montréal or Ottawa places!
Perfect snack on the way to a game. I had chicken schwarma which was generous in volume, balanced seasoning and fresh. My son did platter which was similar in ingredients and filled up a hungry 13 year old, which is no small feat. Back in...More
We stopped here during a short trip to the area. The menu is basic, with shawarma, falafel, and a few other items. My wife and I both had the chicken shawarma wrap, which we both really liked. The chicken was tasty and moist, and not...More
The wrap was OK but not outstanding, my husband's beef wrap was a bit dry. It suited us because we wanted a quick inexpensive lunch
After a disappointing experience at another Lebanese/Mediterranean at Broadway and Alma, I was reluctant to try this restaurant. But it was a totally different experience. The falafel for the wrap I ordered was freshly cooked, not re-heated in the microwave. Flavorful sauces were generously applied...More
I've only been to this particular location a couple of times, but have been to the one in Kitsilano more than I can remember (especially since it's right next to a bar...). They offer really fantastic, filling middle eastern shawarma at a great price. The...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6210126-Reviews-Al_Basha-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Al Porto Ristorante,"Not cheap, but nowhere is near the Waterfront, however the food was excellent. I had the Catch of the Day - Arctic Char - and it was outstanding served with an excellent risotto. Service was perfect in every way.
We had a reasonably nice meal here but the views are not quite like the website. Unfortunately, the Gastown area is becoming very run-down and this is impacting on all of the facilities in the area. Food was good, but not spectacular, which was disappointing...More
Great little Italian spot downtown near the cruise terminal. The food was good and the prices very reasonable.
We visited Al Porto 7 years ago, and were glad to find it again in 2023 during a short stay in Vancouver... just as we remembered it! Two blocks into Gastown, so the location is excellent and walkable almost anywhere from downtown. Great menu, great...More
I had a great time checking out Al Porto for some great pasta. The service was super friendly. Definitely would recommend checking out this spot.
Tasty menu prepared to perfection Great staff and charming atmosphere and located just inside historic Gastown
Al Porto is a fantastic Italian restaurant located in a busy and nice area of Vancouver. Even the entrance down a cobble stone street makes you feel like you're travelling in Italy. Food was excellent. Service was beyond expectations, Our server was a gentleman named...More
My wife and I visited this restaurant last night, after seeing the king tut display. I had remembered this place and we thought we would return. It was 5pm so they had just opened. We were seated at table 49, our waiter was excellent, except...More
Walking in my 5 year old son fell, and our waitor Sixto turned his frown upside down with a Shirley Temple. He provided excellent service from the moment we sat down, until we walked out the door. The food was incredible. We will be back,...More
The Restaurant was quiet when we arrived, but we sat in a section near the window with most of the tables full, so there was a pleasant buzz of dining conversation around us. Service was prompt and helpful. We shared a pizza, which was well...More
We had a nice dinner here and really enjoyed the view. The service was very good and everyone was quite friendly
The view was outstanding and the food was very solid. The service was great. I would return and try some other food options.
Great Italian dinner out - fresh food and excellent service. Sixto Ramos was our server - and he was the best! He made great suggestions and made us feel very welcome. We would go back again to see him and enjoy more pizzas and pastas....More
Just been in this place expecting a nice wood fired pizza . The first pizza arrived with char burnt edges totally inedible. They arranged for a replacement which arrived 15 minutes later at which point my wife had almost finished her meal . Guess what...More
Good atmosphere, looked promising. Staff friendly. Wood Burning Pizza oven does not exist. Harbour view is containers. Mussels were gritty. No linen napkins availability. Had to ask for Parmesan.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d762961-Reviews-Al_Porto_Ristorante-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Alberello Pizzeria,"I wrote a review about the excellent pizza and service back in June. Today we went back and realized the door was locked. It was at 1150am. They were supposed to be open at 1130. We were just about to turn away and a lady...More
We had the Verde Noce pizza and added prosciutto. It was perfect!! There was tons of prosciutto for us to share! The service was excellent as well. We definitely will go back!!
Great pizza; we really liked it. Crisp crust, flavourful sauce. The Caesar salad was also very good.
As other reviews have mentioned, it’s a small place: three booths and a larger table. There may be outside seating when it gets warmer. Wide variety of pizza options, pizza can easily serve 2 people. Nice crust and was not greasy at all!
the place is ok, the pizza is very good. I recommend it for the type of flour it uses, a really good and noteworthy pizza.
This is one of the smallest restaurant I ever eat in. Quaint, charming and nice ambiance. Our waiter was excellent. We never felt rushed, he attended to all aspects in an impeccable manner. We ordered the meat Lasagna, the portion was very generous…I was convinced...More
Me and my boyfriend used to order from this pizzeria all the time and a couple months we realized the tasty and quality aren’t the same. Yesterday was the worse experience we had and I have no plans to order from them anymore. The pizza...More
The food is good but they flat out refused to give a refund when they missed items from a delivery order - why would you do that? There are a lot of pizza joints out there, no need to get ripped off.
Alberello's pasta and pizzas are amazing. I've never had a bad meal there or even a mediocre one.Highly recommend.
this was my first time out to a restaurant since the pandemic started. My Friends and I were looking for a restaurant for dinner and jsut happened to see this place located just off Lonsdale. It was not busy, waitresses where all in covid masks....More
Our first time here and the pizza was Excellent. Service was great, and loved the family atmosphere !!!!
Great pizza with the family! Delicious! Everyone enjoyed it, good prices, nice atmosphere, definitely recommend.
In town in N.Vancouver for vacation and in the mood for Italian. Decided to give Alberellos and shot and super glad we did. One of the best meals we’ve had. Wife and I split a pasta Bolognese and a pollo pizza. Right amount of food....More
Best food and great staff. Comfortable place if dining alone or with a group. Family owned and authentic Italian food. Comfortable seats too.
The food is so good .staff are friendly . Price is ok . salad dressing for is house made and very delicious. pesto souse is the best ever .ambiance is cozy and warm .",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d8153434-Reviews-Alberello_Pizzeria-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Aleph Middle Eastern Eatery,"Well flavored, good variety, good meal sizes. All vegan. We shared four entrees, and three desserts. The turmeric cauliflower and yams were favorites. But the hummus and chimmichurri flat breads were greatly enjoyed too. All desserts were good.
Excellent use of spices in a warm, cozy small restaurant that was very clean. We ordered the appetizer sampler, and it was a delicious blend of tastes. Very good!
They are doing takeout and delivery, and we ordered the crispy falafel box for pick up. The falafel is delicious. Really, very tasty. I think that Aleph takeout will be a weekly thing for us now. Ordering online was easy, and the food was ready...More
Very tasty dishes! Portions not nearly adequate with takeout. They need improve to be competitive! Best!!
Came here with a friend for my birthday dinner and did not disappoint, my goodness it is so good here! It is very small and so my only complaint is that the tables are quite small and we had a hard time fitting all the...More
I had read the reviews and thought ""hmmm, I've had the real thing. I wonder if it's really that good?"" It was BETTER! The Silk Road offered the most wonderful journey through their menu... flavourful, creamy, just the right amount of spice! But it was...More
Wow, I went this place with friends tonight and was blown away. The food, the service (thanks so much Shea), the special cocktails and the ambiance were all 10/10. Man, this has to be one of the quietest restaurants in Vancouver. So nice to hear...More
It’s been a few months since my wife mentioned about Aleph but we never had the chance to go. Yesterday we decide to make a try and I could say that it was by far the best middle eastern restaurant that I have ever been...More
I haven’t even had a chance to eat in a This restaurant. I could spend the rest of my days ordering their food. It’s clean, authentic, bursting with flavour. Every time I order, I call the restaurant just to tell them I love their food....More
Friendly and efficient staff were a bonus and accompanied great food. The crispy potatoes and the turmeric roasted cauliflower dish must be tried to appreciate their food. Everything came quickly, was served piping hot and hugely enjoyed. The saj with zataar was as good as...More
My daughter and I ate dinner at Aleph. Absolutely loved it. Highly recommend the Silk Road platter. Excellent vegetarian food, designed to share. And the service was really good.
I have been wanting to visit Aleph forever and finally went tonight with a party of 6 . Perhaps it was an off night for them but the food was disappointing as was the service . We got no recommendations from our server so perhaps...More
My daughter took my wife and I for a nice dinner soon after we arrived in Vancouver for a summer holiday. The place doesn't take reservations so we had to queue up, but not too long for a Saturday night. The restaurant is fairly small,...More
A pleasant atmosphere with great service and friendly patient staff who can explain the menu items to those unfamiliar with middle eastern foods. It’s best to order a variety of the more traditional dishes and share, as they are fairly small but hearty and delicious....More
Went for dinner with six business friends to discuss a project. We ate family style based on the recommendations of the team. It was fantastic! Everyone had a great time, we had more than enough food and the discussion kept returning to the flavors of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13831150-Reviews-Aleph_Middle_Eastern_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Alibi Room,"we went becoz of the recommendations, were shown to a table, and waited to be noticed.. and waited..and waited, finally flagged down a server and placed an order..and waited, and waited... after the drinks were served, and we eventually finished them, and our food had...More
Extensive selection of artisan craft beers. Limited selection of starters, mains and desserts but more than enough to satisfy most people. I had the warm salad which was excellent and my wife had the crispy belly pork sandwich also excellent. There is limited open seating...More
I never go to Van (I'm from Nelson) without stopping in. I'm not exaggerating when I say this is my top pick for best beer bar in BC. I stopped in last week and had the special which was the Pork Cheek. Holy crap it...More
Excellent beer and food establishment with friendly and well informed staff. Looking forward to returning...
My wife and I visited on our honeymoon and this successfully showed her that beer isnt as terrible as she thought, Our server was great, she managed to find a selection of beers suited to each of us based on our individual tastes and neither...More
Excellent service, wide selection of beers (especially IPA if you like hoops) and within three safe blocks of the Imperial Theater. This is important because some areas near the theater are not that great. Definitely I’ll return.
This is the place the local recommended a place and they recommended a place then they recommended a place and I , a craft beer enthusiast, found myself at 11:30 pm at night trying the range. Hard to find and worth the search. Taxi to...More
There were too many beers on the menu that i wanted to try. Must go-to place for the beer enthusiast (not the Coors light guy though). I wasn’t sure what to expect from the food but it was great! Im definitely going back the next...More
Tons of great local craft beers from the BC area in a cozy atmosphere. Loud when full, but lots of fun and great service.
Our son and daughter in law took us here yesterday after a culture crawl of arts in Vancouver's Eastside. We arrived around 2pm and when the menu was presented and I saw only breakfast items my first thought was I had breakfast at 6:30am on...More
I went here for dinner with a couple of new friends, and we all ordered beers and burgers. The beer selection and beer was good! The fries I though were made from scratch and the burger was good. I wouldn’t say it’s the best I...More
Stopped by this place on a recomendation and was not disappointed. If you are looking to sample some craft beers with good value food, this place is excellent. 15min walk to Gastown from the main tourist convention/hotel areas, its worth it especially for an early...More
We stopped for dinner as our option for a dinner and night out in Gastown. It is pretty low key pub type of place, but had a ton of beer options and a good looking menu. We shared a salad and burger and also found...More
Situated in a somewhat fringe area near Historic Gastown this delightful restaurant is definitely worth a visit. A variety of scrumptious food items await you and may be accompanied by a flight of refreshing brews of your choice. The meatballs and stir fried broccoli and...More
A very popular place a little bit out of the way -but walkable from downtown past Gastown - with great beer selection, OK wine list and good food.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d762951-Reviews-Alibi_Room-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Alimentaria Mexicana Foods,"Great Mexican on granville island. Food really yummy and the service was great. Compact food menu but honestly i prefer that as it can takes ages to decide. We had a couple of starters and one main which was plenty.
Ohhhhhh my! The best authentic Mexican food. Guacamole starter, Carne Asada tacos and Churros for dessert. Excellent food and service.
Everyone loved the food. I had the mushroom hurache with the feta on the side. It was so tasty that I didn’t add the feta. No worries my friend was happy to have extra. The lime margaritas were really good too. My friend had the...More
We were warmly greeted by kitchen staff when we entered. Service was fast and attentive. Food was fresh, delicious and not run of the mill Mexican fare. We were there early in the evening and got in quickly. When we left there was a line...More
We ordered the beef birria. Without the hot sauce that was brought to the table, it was tasteless. The tortillas weren’t that great either. I guess we’ve eaten at the homes of too many of our Mexican friends and they have set the bar high....More
Visitors to Vancouver always make their way to Granville Island, a tiny spot with a public market and dozens of artisan specialty shops. In the middle of it all, you'll find Alimentaria Mexicana restaurant. We went, expecting the food to be tourist/standard Mexican: the basics,...More
A group of 8 friends ended up here to have drinks and snacks. The restaurant didn't disappoint! We enjoyed drink and appies and the they were delicious! The waitress serving us was wonderful! The location is fun and exciting!
This was a fantastic Mexican restaurant on Granville Island which we thoroughly enjoyed on a couple of occasions and when we found it wondered why we had been missing out all this time. Great food and service. Dut did this change hands? After boasting about...More
We went with our friends and got seat on the patio. My wife had a cider and a Non alcohol Ricky. We shared a Halloumi and Cactus that was full of flavor and super textures with corn tortillas. My wife had Carne Tacos that were...More
We had a great time here checking out Alimentaria Mexicana. We were here for happy hour and had such a great time. We have someone with a cilantro allergy and they took it so seriously and the food was so good. Definitely will be back...More
The food was exceptionally good; fresh; flavourful. Really quite authentic as far as Mexican food goes. It is also great to see a restaurant serving fantastic food in what is essentially a tourist area. They could probably ""get away"" with lower quality, knowing many people...More
We did not make reservations, figured we would just walk in somewhere. Big mistake, G. I. was packed . We were lucky to get a table at Alimentaria. Service was good. Food was good. No complaints. We would go back anytime. The Lamb Shank was...More
Superb Mexican food - some of the best I have ever had - freshly cooked tortillas were great, and the chorizo, burnt cabbage and refried bean tostadas were a revelation, with a little creamy feta on top. Definitely worth a visit amongst the many eateries...More
Wow! What an unexpected surprise! On busy and hip Granville Island we ended up at this nice restaurant! Great food, great flavours! Good beer and nice Tequilas! We had both Cevices, Avocado dip, and another great dish i cant remember the name! So good we...More
We’ve been here half a dozen times now, each one excellent. The food is always delicious, the wait staff friendly and efficient, the decor interesting enough. Like any place, you need to pick and choose. The carne asada with cheese taco was superb, as was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23683009-Reviews-Alimentaria_Mexicana_Foods-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Alouette Bistro,"OMG--the food was amazing! If you are in the area, don't miss this incredible gem of a restaurant. The Chef came out and chatted with us foodies and gave us a wonderful dessert after an amazing meal. Guillaume was our waiter and he was delightful...More
Hello Mary! Thank you so much for leaving a five star review! I am very happy to hear that our chef Albert and Guillaume made an incredible night thanks to our food and service! Here at Alouette Bistro we strive to create memories and experiences...More
My wife and I had the pleasure of dining at Alouette last Thursday, and the experience was excellent. We were given a nice cozy table close to the open kitchen, which we love as we like to watch whatever takes place there. The restaurant is...More
Hi Carlo, Thank you so much for such a wonderful review. We are looking forward to seeing you soon.
We celebrated my friend's birthday here and couldn't have picked a better spot. It was a rainy summer day in Vancouver and this French bistro was the perfect pairing. Wine bottles at Happy Hour are 50% off (!!) and we ordered the baked Brie twice....More
Sean, Thank you for celebrating such a special event with us at Alouette. We were honored to celebrate Linda's birthday with you! It was such a pleasure to serve you all and we can't wait to welcome you all back very soon. Merci! Claire
This was one of the best breakfasts I have ever had in my life! The restaurant is situated in a gorgeous building with French inspired decor, tall ceilings and has a lovely atmosphere. The eggs Benedict were made with a croissant - absolutely mouthwatering. The...More
Hello Mark! Thank you so much for taking the time to write a review! I am very happy to hear that you had a incredible start of the day thanks to Samira and our kitchen team that did the most delicious French toast and Eggs...More
Excellent French bistro who nailed the classic fare: especially the côte de boeuf and bouillabaisse. Food: 5 Service: 4 Atmosphere: 4.5 Cost to worth it rating: 3 Opentableable: no, but Seven Rooms Return worthiness: yes Eve award: best côte de boeuf and bouillabaisse Highlights: -...More
Hello! Thank you so much for this wonderful review! Here at Alouette Bistro we strive to create wonderful experiences and memories for each guest! I am very glad and happy to hear that you loved the food, service, atmosphere! Hope to see you soon in...More
Amazing happy hour ! Mussels with the most amazing pastis and fennel broth❣️Duck confit poutine❣️Escargot❣️ Best birthday ever❣️ Thank you Wanita❣️❣️❣️
Hello! Thank you so much for leaving a 5 star review! I am very glad to hear that you had such a wonderful time here at Alouette Bistro thanks to Wanita and our Mussels, Escargot and Duck Poutine! Hope to see you soon! Jose
Alouette has an amazing selection of French dishes and wines. The ratatouille was delicious and Duck Caselot outstanding. The atmosphere and service was excellent. I’d definitely be back to try other dishes.More
Hello! Thanks for taking the time to leave a review! Here at Alouette Bistro we strive to provide excellent service, food and wine to each of our guests! I am very glad that you loved the Casoullet and the atmosphere! Cannot wait to see you...More
This spot has amazing food and service was excellent! Great atmosphere as well, along with being central downtown.
Hello Kevin! Thank you so much for the 5 star review! I am very glad to hear that you had such an amazing time here at Alouette Bistro! Hope to see you soon! Jose
A truly great meal, steak tartare and Bouillabaisse. Outstanding service and our dishes were impeccable. Truly a delight. Highly recommend.
Hello! Thank you so much for leaving a five star review! Here at Alouette Bistro we strive to create great memories and make sure that your experience is 5 star from start (beef tartare) to finish (Bouillabaisse)! Hope to see you soon! Jose
Amazing food, and ambience. We got the bone marrow, escargot and the Duck. Food was delicious. And Server Wanita was an amazing server :)
Hello! Thank you so much for the five star review, I am very glad to hear that you had such an amazing time thanks to Wanita and that you loved our bone marrow, escargot and duck poutine! Hope to see you soon! Jose
My wife and I had great meals at this restaurant. I had Coq au vin and she had the Vol au vent and both were delicious. Highly recommend.
Hello Stephen! Thank you so much for leaving a review! I am very happy to hear that you had such an amazing time thanks to our team and that the Vol au Vent and Coq au Vin were great! Hope to see you soon, Jose
I had an unforgettable dining experience at Alouette bistro, thanks to the exceptional service provided by Guillaume. His genuine warmth made my visit truly memorable. Highly recommended for an authentic taste of France with outstanding service!More
Hello! Thank you so much for leaving a 5 star review! I am very happy to hear that you had a great time in Alouette Bistro and that you had an authentic taste of France thanks to our menu and also that Guillaume was very...More
My wife’s birthday dinner. Our first time at the restaurant. Wonderful experience from start to finish. Parisian cafe ambience. We loved the interior. Our server Wanita was excellent, attentive yet not intrusive. Comprehensive wine menu, something for every taste and budget. We had a beautiful...More
Hello! Thank you so much for taking the time to do this beautiful review! Here at Alouette Bistro we strive to create those beautiful memories for each guest thanks to our team in this case Wanita and our Kitchen team! I am thrilled to hear...More
Outstanding service, consistently high food quality and great ambience. A bit of Paris in Vancouver with range of prices to suit all.
Hello! Thank you so much for the review! I am really happy to hear that you had a wonderful time here at Alouette Bistro and that you felt in Paris in our lovely restautant! Hope to see you soon Jose
Excellent food and even better service. We had the steak tartare, bouillabaisse, and the côte de bœuf. The portions were very generous, but there were enough leftovers for a party of 12. Our server was named Jonathan and was extremely attentive and friendly. The GM...More
Hello! Thank you so much for the 5 star review! I am very happy to hear that you had such an amazing time here at Alouette Bistro thanks to Krista, Jonathan, our BOH team and me! Also that you tried all our signature dishes and...More",30,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23602211-Reviews-Alouette_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Altitudes Bistro,"Our lunch at Altitudes was the highlight of our visit to Grouse Mountain. It was perfect. We sat on the patio and enjoyed the views, the sunshine, and the friendly atmosphere created by our server. The food and beverages were delicious and the service was...More
We all know there are limited food options on the mountain, and perhaps they hope everyone will focus on the view. The patio is not bad, however the inside of the restaurant is dark, old and needs updating (except for the bar which is okay)....More
Views overlooking Vancouver and the water. We only had a bowl of soup but it was very good. The Winter Wonderland drink was a defintie winner for the group. Great service. Would definitely go again if we make it up the sky ride.
Thanks for the great review, hope to see you back up again soon.
Firstly, I'm a regular at Altitudes, an oasis for me, as a hiker & snow shoe enthusiast. I have to say the service is consistently friendly & courteous - and several servers remember you when you return. All of the food is very tasty. I...More
Hi Gary - glad to hear that you enjoy Altitudes and find the team so friendly. Santa's Breakfast is so fun, and I love it that the rest of your family enjoyed it too. Hope to see you again soon.
Went to Altitudes Bistro on October 8, 2021. Restaurant was not busy and the only occupied tables were the ones by the window with the view of the mountain. We told the hostess we were willing to wait for one of the tables by the...More
Hi Liz - I'm really sorry to hear that you had such a poor expereince, and that our team didn't take the time to provide the level of service they should have. I would like the opportunity to talk with you and make this right...More
Worst service EVER!! I would like to tell you about the food but we didn't even have chance to get our drinks. I totally understand with covid you have less servers but you don't have one server for 12 tables and keep filling the patio....More
Hi Abril- so sorry to hear that your visit with us wasn't what we should have provided for you. Your comments have been passed along to our teams so that we can make some quick improvements for future visitors. If you would like to provide...More
Great spot for a light meal while at Grouse mountain. The meals are good and not expensive and they’re licensed if you choose to have a drink. It’s always a nice stop for a beer and snack after playing on the mountain.
Hi Jimmy, Thank you for your review! We are glad to hear that you had such a great time
Very pleasant bistro that offers you great views whilst eating. The food is fine and my wife and I both enjoyed. She had a crispy chicken salad and I had a open turkey sandwich with cheese and fries. Our wine and beer good as well....More
Thanks, Ian! We're so glad you enjoyed your time at our Bistro!
We took the gondola up Grouse Mountain and ate at the Altitudes Bistro. The view is amazing. We had the salt and pepper wings and lettuce wraps. The food was very good. The service was OK
Thanks for the 4 star review, Richard. We're glad you enjoyed your time with us!
Enjoyed our meal here in the beautiful setting. Great draft beer selection and prices. Tofu pad thai was nicely presented and quite tasty, though they need to add a little more flavour to the actual tofu. The club sandwich was a miss though, dominated by...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us this review. We will certainly pass on your comments to management.
Great service and nice location.at the end of a gondola ride up the mountain. The menu has a lot of choices but we wanted a light lunch so we split an arugula salad and a club sandwich. The presentations on the plates were eye appealing...More
Thanks for this review, John. We're so glad you had a wonderful dining experience despite the cloud getting in the way!
It has been many years since we have been up to Grouse Mountain and to say the last it has changed. We spent a few hrs tacking in the sights and shows then settled into the Altitudes Bistro. Had a couple Mojito's while waiting for...More
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a 4 star review! We're glad you enjoyed your experience with us and we hope you'll visit again soon!
Went to Altitudes Bistro on July 28, 2019 and were able to get a seat without waiting. Our party was 4 people, 2 had something off of the brunch menu and 2 had burgers. The brunch orders came really fast and then we waited for...More
Hi Dean, We are sorry for your experience at Altitudes Bistro. Glad the supervisor was able to wave the fee of the meal for you. Let us know if there is anything else we can do the correct the situation.
We ended up in the Bistro because they made a mess of our reservation in the Observatory. The food was good we had wings and burgers and cocktails, with a view, that they could not offer us in the Observatory.
Thank you for taking the time to review Altitudes. We're so glad you had a wonderful experience! We hope to see you again soon!
The view was spectacular and the food was unbelievable. I got the yellow curry seafood GF and was the best I ever had. My wife had the Rad Thai and it was a vegan pad Thai and the best she ever had. The pad Thai...More
Thank you for sharing your experience visiting the restaurant! We are so glad you enjoyed your visit, and hope you will be back again soon. Have a great day!",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d701457-Reviews-Altitudes_Bistro-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Amay's House,"We shared the Myanmar Tea Leaf Salad which was good, but not great. It was quite tea flavor. I had the Laksa with Chicken only and vermicelli and yellow wheat noodles, it was spicy and tasty. My wife had the Kebat with Chicken, it was...More
Foods are so far so good. Would like the Fish Noodle Soup with more stronger taste. The chicken in Coconut Milk Noodle Soup were very tasty but seems the soup not getting into the noodles. Besides, Myanmar Tea Leaf Salad was a bit salty.
I think this is the only place in Vancouver that serves Burmese food, although most of the menu items are SE Asian generic. I liked the tofu salad which used tofu strips colored with turmeric. The interplay of textures was good. Kind of a cheap...More
I first discovered Amay's house while looking for a new place to eat that served more unique and authentic food. The first dish I tried was their Laksa. Since then, I have tried several dishes from Amay's, including: - Fish Noodle Soup (Mohinga) - Coconut...More
Food portion is good and everything is delicious! I took 3 of my friends who never tried Burmese food before. We ordered about 6 - 7 dishes and they absolutely loved everything they tried. Friendly staff and very good price.
One of the problems with eating out so often is that I’m always interested in trying out new restaurants but there’s just so many different cuisines that you find in Vancouver. Take, for example, Burmese food… I think the last time I had Burmese food...More
4 adults & 2 kids: we went on a Monday afternoon for lunch. It was a lovely lunch, we enjoyed the fermented tea salad, samosa & fish cakes for starters. We had the Pad Thai, laksa noodle soup, paratha with chicken curry & briyani rice....More
Great little spot that serves fantastic tasting Burmese food. Family run that takes pride in their great dishes. Love their appetizers as well
This is a Myanmarese Restaurant located in Victoria Drive. I like the Myanmar style curry noodle. I hear that the owner has sold the property and have not checked out the food since.
My favorite here is the Samosa, Prata bread with yellow pea dip, Chicken Buryani and the vegetable salad which has the Tom Yum flavored Broccoli cauliflowers and mixed vegetables. Ginger Salad and Prata as shown. Delish
Burmese style Samosas (5 for $5) are very good, so is Mohinga (fish noodle soup) and Tofu Thoke (Tofu salad) and Ohn Noe Kauk Swe (coconut milk noodle ) very very authentic and good Burmese food
This clean small restaurant has great food we had Myanmar Tea leaf Salad lots of nuts and lentil's, Enjoyed beef and lamb curries w/o coconut milk so typical of Asian curries. more like traditional Indian curries.. Reasonable fast no beer or wine but BYO discreetly...More
Yesterday I went with some friends for dinner at “Amay’s House”. This small restaurant offered Burmese Cuisine, and we were curios how that would taste like. The interior was quite simple but pleasant. When we arrived (early in the evening) just few tables were taken....More
I ordered the tea leaf salad, and I was not disappointed! It was tangy and had a distinct taste. The laksa was decent, and so was the beef curry
Burmese food, It's hard to describe, it's not Thai food but it's not Indian food either. But an amazing cuisine all its own. I ate way too many of the Burmese samosas. It's like a regular samosa, but with a spring roll wrapper. So good!...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5313202-Reviews-Amay_s_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
American Cheese Steak,"I ate 2 time in this place ,is really yummy like to be little bit les salty don't forget to tell the chef to control the salt for you ,but price and quality and quantity all has perfect balance .
I come here once a year, usually if the work day wraps up early and I know I can afford the post-lunch fatigue. It’s a heavy meal but it really hits the spot when you want a nice cheesesteak. Didn’t realize until after visiting that...More
Tiny little place with a few chairs. Cute, charming and cozy. I had the Philly cheese steak. Super delicious. Great size. It was freshly made, I was happy to wait for it. I will go back and try some of their other ones they have...More
We loved their take on the traditional Philly cheese steak! We tried the one with the korean twist, and the viet sub one. Both amazing. The prices are alright, the service good and the place cozy. Will definitely come back.
Looked delicious on the TV show you gotta eat here so I went to Vancouver from Vancouver island and I was this place was on Vancouver island because I would eat here every day if I could. The beefsteak and fries was the best I...More
This place is very good. outside of Philly, and in Canada, it is the best I have found. The gourmet choices are incredible and delicious. Good value as you get a big sandwich on really nice bread.
We had a 'Philly' with a side of 'ACC Fries', and it was delicious! The Cheese Steak was full of meat, and had a very good cheese element though I felt maybe the onions could have been cooked longer to avoid the raw onion taste....More
My lunches were becoming boring so I decided to wander down to the American Cheese Steak Company for a New Yorker and onion rings for lunch. A great lunch it was but unless you're famished it might be too much (I should have omitted the...More
Come upon this spot with no prior knowledge and so happy we did! They offer a wide variety of Cheese steak sandwich options, some very unique but also the traditional classic which is what I had. It is a fast casual concept but they do...More
Visited the American Cheesesteak Co. this past week while in Vancouver and have the say it was the best cheesesteak I have had. I've been to Philly, NYC, and LA but the best is in Vancouver. If your a foodie I highly recommend you go...More
Today was much too hot for a traditional lunch so I headed down to the American Cheese Steak for a New Yorker................for $12 it was a good deal. This cafe is more than Subway but I think the difference in price is more than worth...More
Tried for the first time today with my three kids because of the good reviews and wasn't disappointed. We had the New York cheesesteak which was simply delicious! Will definitely go again if we ever visit Vancouver again!!!
classic philly cheesesteak is awesome. nice soft bun. tasty beef. Fries are usually awesome. this time, a bit underdone. another 60 seconds in the deep fryer would have been good. great custard.
We wanted something quick and tasty . It wasn't very good although it looked good on the plate. The meat they used was so bad we had to pull it out of the bun. All chewy and horrible fried fat! My son had the garlic...More
Kind of pricey, not as good as it used to be (new management, new owners?) definitely wouldn't go out of my way for it. It's gone downhill for sure.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2375115-Reviews-American_Cheese_Steak-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Amorosa Pasta House,"If you love pasta, this is the place for you. Pasta comes in two sizes, we always get the large so that we have enough for leftovers. You have the option to pick your pasta and the sauce, or pick one of their own dishes....More
A restaurant with an ""Italian, Mediterranean, Greek"" menu that covers a generous part of Europe...What's even more impressive the kitchen staff manages to pull it off. At least based on the throng of folks who chose Amorosa on a recent Saturday night. There certainly didn't...More
This was the first restaurant we ate at on our first trip to Canada... we should have looked harder for another place to eat. First I should say the the employees and the service were great. They were very polite and attentive. They are the...More
Amorosa Pasta House is a long-standing fixture in the Edmond’s area of Burnaby. I believe they used to previously operate an adjoining Greek restaurant called Santali House next door (currently occupied by Sushi Modo) but have since rolled up their Greek menu items into their...More
We celebrated my husband’s birthday at Amorosa with the whole family, party of 20++ people, reservation was made a few days before the actual date and they have provided us with sort of like private area because we’re a big group. Our server was prompt...More
I love the food here—I like that I can have Greek food and Italian food. The pasta is always good, as are the lemon potatoes. Great for family meals. I really like how you can customize your pasta dish by choosing your pasta and sauce,...More
Had a dinner date with family. The chicken parmigiana with my own choice of pasta was delicious and generous! The cannolis were huge and filled with a delicious beef and cottage cheese. The order was also huge and provided ample sampling by family members. For...More
MOST EXCELLENT. The service was sterling, the food was amazing from lamb to gnocchi fantastic. My second time here and better the second time round but the first time was really good too. Even my grumpy hubby, who complained about going across the bridge said...More
The three of us all enjoyed the lamb chop dinner special. We asked for it to be cooked medium vs. Medium well. Plenty of rice, half a potato and a couple of veggies. The pita and taziki were really good. The service was average waited...More
A well-known classic destination restaurant that is easy to return to time and again. The food is generously sized and there's a wide variety to choose! The service is pleasant, and the walls completes the experience as you can imagine an almost-forgotten trip to the...More
Groupon did it again with their offer of 2 salads and 2 pastas for $23 (what a deal). We both opted for 2 Caesars and 2 vongole in a cream sauce. Dessert was a cheese cake and a tiramiso. A nice dinner indeed.
Good souvlaki ever combined with their house salad and veggies that family will enjoy. For pasta lovers, give it a try!
I decided to come here for a late dinner on a Friday night. I have driven by many times and noticed this place but it was the first time I actually went in. It was still quite busy when I got there but no problems...More
Always love their red sauce and still they have so many options I like to give other menu items a try...this time I tried their seafood cannelloni...not as good as the meat, not much seafood mostly just sauce and noodles. Next time it's the meat...More
One day I and my friend wanted to go out for dinner. My friend suggested to go to an assumingly Greek restaurant (mentioning “Santali” in the sign outside the restaurant indicated that to us) which is situated close to the corner 6th Street and Edmonds...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d760227-Reviews-Amorosa_Pasta_House-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Anatoli Souvlaki,"My wife and I decided to each have a martini to start our evening. Unfortunately we couldn't taste the alcohol in the drinks. We then ordered a second martini and again we couldn't taste the alcohol. I wonder if they water down their booze.
Had dinner here one night while staying in the area. There are plenty of tables both inside and out. It’s a little pricy but the portions were generous. I had the roast chicken which was good but I have had better. The potatoes were soggy...More
We tried multiple items from the menu as we were a large group, including different kinds of souvlaki, and they were all great! I had salmon and tenderloin, and others got chicken, pork, tiger prawn, and they were also great by their accounts! Their keftedes...More
i was so impressed with the happy hour drinks and greek appys. spery is a great waiter.check this place out for sure in north vancouver and a great atmosphere
My reservation was for 7: 15. At 7:20 I received the text telling me my table is ready. At 7: 21 I received the phone call from the restaurant asked me where I was I told her I was parking the car. This is very...More
The prawn and lamb skewers over rice was great. The gyro was also great. The flavors are true to form and pair well with greek white wine. We’ll be back
We have been going to Anatoli's for years and have never been disappointed. The food, the atmosphere and the service have always been outstanding. There is not another restaurant in Vancouver that we would consider going to for Greek food. Reading some of the previous...More
Went there today for my birthday and had a great time. The roasted chicken was tender and very tasty. The octopothi was my favourite as it was very tasty, tender and grilled to perfection. Overall very happy with the food and service. Our server was...More
I live in North Vancouver and would often find myself, friends and family at Anatoli Souvlaki. They have a great location with a fair priced happy hour. Although expensive during regular hours, the sangria is my favourite and I love getting a few appetizers to...More
Visited this place last night. They are not using the app to check vaccine cards. I might as well had shown them the a fake photo of a random person's vaccine card to get in! I did not feel comfortable eating there!
Have always loved this restaurant and the food and have supported them well during COVID closures to help keep them in business. Sad to say that they are not following COVID protocol, not asking for passports and are now losing many many long time supporters....More
Manager told us that the owner (currently in the US) has instructed staff to ignore COVID mandate and not ever require proof of vaccination from cusstomers. This made us very uncomfortable and we left. Were told that the staff are also unhappy not following the...More
Our group went to Anatolia last night, and after being politely shown to our table we realized we hadn’t been asked for our vaccine passport. We asked the server why, and were told that it was on the owner’s instructions. We asked to speak to...More
We were walk ins last Friday night. Not asked for vaccination passport at the door so assumed the server would when we got seated at the table. He did not but it was busy so we figured an oversight. After the meal I asked the...More
We were greeted by a friendly shy young server who told us they were not checking for vaccine cards. We questioned her as to why and said it was the law for restaurants to ensure all guests were vaccinated. She shrugged and said she didn’t...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d701495-Reviews-Anatoli_Souvlaki-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Anatolia's Gate,"We ordered lahmacun and it came burnt and no flavor and hardly any meat we told the guy but he did not care and said nothing and took it and threw it out we paid $40 for 2 bites of food no offer to adjust...More
The guy making the food convinced me to get the special for 3 Turkish style pizzas. I’ve had them before at another Turkish restaurant in the east coast, so I was expecting not to be disappointed. After $33 I received my order. The meat lover,...More
The food is delicious, the wonderful bred is made to order, amazing, and the staff is very friendly.
We went there today we ordered Lahmacun, and mixed kebap. The kebap and the kofte were disgusting, and so smelly. When we told the waiter he offered one piece lamb chops instead. It means we paid $25 for 2 pieces of lamb chops. This restaurant...More
The food is just pure amazing. Kudos to the wonderful chefs. If I were to eat nothing else. I would have just had the hummus and lavash bread and been happy with it.
Almost every time I'm in town I end up at this place for at least one meal. It is in a good location and has some flair with the big oven visible as you walk in. Setting is usually quiet so a great place to...More
Passed by this restaurant so many times and finally decided to place takeout order. Can’t say much about their interior since was there for few minutes only, but the wood fired oven creates great atmosphere around it. Plus the staff seemed very nice. We got...More
Was driving around looking for a pizza place and ended up at the most unlikely of places. This restaurant oozes authenticity and the gourmet pizza was devastatingly delicious. Customer service was top notch. Will come again every time I visit Vancouver.
This is where my spouse and I go for Turkish food, and have been going for many years. On our most recent visit, we split a large cold vegetarian mezze plate, which comes with a large, hot, freshly baked lavash and a side of thick...More
servers are good and friendly food prices okey order the pizza and the tilapia dish decor is drab washroom is clean customer service is good i ask for extra and was not charged parking must be behind the building do nto meter park you get...More
The ambience is great. Middle East decor, very comfortable, casual, with great service. We had appetizers (calamari and prawns) and both were generous and delicious, as were the entrées ordered (lamb, and souvlaki). Prices were reasonable. Would definitely go there again.
This restaurant is family run and has a certain funkyness Middle Eastern style. Nothing too fancy and nice and clean and always busy which shows how much it is liked. We have had two great occasions to eat here with different friends and everyone enjoyed...More
I have been here a few times and love it, especially the lavash bread and incredible yogurt sauce that goes with it. It's cooked in a traditional wood oven. I could make a meal of just that bread. It's sooooo good. This time I had...More
Anatolia's Gate is a fantastic Turkish food stand in an unassuming store front in Burnaby. Focused primarily on grilled meats and salads - the portions are huge. On my last visit, I had the Beyti Sarma: a skewer of ground beef and lamb kofte served...More
We've been going here for years and have introduced several people to it. It is a very plain, unassuming place but the food is fantastic. The restaurant is nothing to rave about, old pictures on the wall and old tables and chairs kinda thing but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2363751-Reviews-Anatolia_s_Gate-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Ancora Waterfront Dining and Patio - Ambleside,"Ancora is a fabulous restaurant on Ambleside beach, framed with ceiling to floor windows overlooking the ocean, Lions Gate Bridge and Stanley Park. I love to stop in at Ancora for desert. We tasted a delicious chocolate mouse cake that was out of this world....More
First opportunity to try Ancora and it was FANtastic. The ambience is lovely, inside or Patio, really nice. The dinner was amazing. We enjoyed Sable Fish, that our guest said was “outstanding “. I had Mussels, the appy version and the dish was more than...More
We came here for a nice feeling upscale dinner after going to the Christmas Market on a Saturday evening. We got in last minute (as in 3 days before) This is a gem. Great and attentive staff. Very knowledgeable about wine. The food was exquisite,...More
Two luncheons in two days and many times before: Impeccable service, beautiful ambience, spacious seating allowing for undisturbed conversation, good range of food choices. The only dish I would not recommend: ""Lobster Bun"". To little lobster, too much shredded greens absorbing the tiny bits of...More
Got completely hosed with the wine selection. What was purported as a house wine ( after clearly indicating to the sommelier that we were not looking for an expensive Chardonnay) we found ourselves with a $300 wine charge. (1 bottle and 1 glass). In a...More
Sushi pizza was unique and to die for. Highly recommend. Get it. Just do it. The menu was unique and tasty / except for the lobster roll. Dont get it. It is shredded meat, cold, and uninspired. The waitress we had was also less than...More
After a lovely walk on the sea wall in West Vancouver, we found this beautiful restaurant. There is a pastry chef who is always busy creating delightful deserts. This is a beautiful restaurant, with highly skilled serving staff. Polite, friendly, helpful and quick. Every detail...More
My nephew and I went for dinner tonight and were amazed at the prices in the very limited menu this restaurant has. Most restaurants have a choice of 6 ounce or 9 ounce glasses of wine for approximately eight or nine dollars to $12. At...More
After a pleasant lunch this week, I wrote a note to the restaurant thanking them, but saying we had ""one small comment of concern.....in conversation with our waiter, it turns out he hasn’t had either a first or second vaccine -- this is, of course,...More
Had an amazing time dining in at Ancora. The food was spectacular and the service was amazing. The drinks were so good here too, definitely recommend checking this place out!
We liked it - the service was a bit slow, but good; the food, while hardly bearing a resemblance to anything Peruvian, was very good; nice atmosphere. But, very expensive, especially for what you get. For example, my wife had a non-alcoholic drink (I forget...More
It was the first time my wife and I have been to Ancora. It was a very nice experience. The staff were super friendly. The food was also very good and fresh. We had the Ancora glacier, grilled octopus, uni taglierini, and the roast duck....More
Dear Guest, Thank you for the review and feedback as this is how we improve. We are happy to hear you had great experience. We look forward to welcoming you back soon. Ancora Waterfront Dining and Patio - False Creek Team
Erenee has been our server for nearly 20 years in Vancouver fine dining establishments and this evening didn’t disappoint. Fantastic food, excellent wine recos (associated to our talented sommelier, Michael) and an overall incredible experience thanks to our server, Erenee, who curated everything to be...More
Hello, Thank you for the review Look forward to welcoming you back soon. Regards, Kelly Jordan -Hamilton Sales and Marketing Manager
Erenee @ Ancora Ambleside Is FABulous! She made our dining experience incredible. Food is excellent, martinis and wine too! Already have a reservation to return this week! Can’t wait!
We live downtown and love to come over the bridge for a change of scenery. When Ancora reopened we were excited to check it out. We loved the food, the service was excellent and the attention to detail is outstanding. We highly recommend it. If...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d15701423-Reviews-Ancora_Waterfront_Dining_and_Patio_Ambleside-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ancora Waterfront Dining and Patio - False Creek,"Eric was an incredible server, we had such a wonderful experience. The food, vibes, service, and patio were amazing. Highly recommend!
This place is one of the best in Vancouver for sure. The sablefish and octopus are amazing. Eric our server went above and beyond, like wayyyy above and beyond he is awesome. He made our night extra extraordinary. Thank you Eric Thank you to the...More
Pleased to see vegetarian options on the sushi menu, and the mushroom soup was gorgeous. The delicate spices in the roasted vegetables were perfect. All staff were friendly and efficient, and the service was excellent. Highly recommended.
Amazing mains we had the halibut cheek and sablefish both were phenomenal! Our server malia did a phenomenal did a fantastic job! Great recommendations and very knowledgeable.
Beautiful patio, excellent food and exceptional service. Never disappointed when I come here. It never disappoints!
Food at its finest. What a delightful experience. Surrounded by scenic waterfront and Granville Island. This was the highlight of our recent vacation to Vancouver. Highly recommend. Just stunning.
Stunning food, excellent service, We felt totally looked after and will definitely come again when visiting Vancouver
We went here while visiting vancouver. I had such a lovely time dining by the water! The staff here are a delight! Service was 5 stars. I liked the dessert, Japanese citrus tart Nom Nom 😋
Amazing food and service! Would highly recommend this restaurant to anyone looking for fresh fish and a great dining experience!
Excellent dinner and service! Really enjoyed. Would recommend to locals or visitors. Fresh seafood. Delicious! Thanks!
I had an incredible dining experience at Ancora! The service was top-notch, thanks to the amazing team of Sephora, James, and Phillipe. They made sure every detail was perfect. And let me tell you about the acevichado roll - it was absolutely amazing! The flavors...More
Great setting for lunch, amazing staff and food. The beer and wine selection is great as well! Would definitely recommend.
I took my wife here for our anniversary. Service was fantastic and they brought us complimentary bubbles on arrival. The bread and humous amuse was perfect too. A classy establishment by the water!
My friend and I are regular patrons of this restaurant and enjoyed a great lunch on Wednesday. The restaurant is located in one of the premier viewing spots on False Creek in Vancouver and has a great patio across from Granville Island to compliment the...More
I had a wonderful lunch with friends at Ancora, a Peruvian-Japanese fusion restaurant in Vancouver. The place has a great view of the water and the service was attentive and friendly. We ordered the Fish and Yucas Bravas, which were delicious and well-prepared. The yucas...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8570489-Reviews-Ancora_Waterfront_Dining_and_Patio_False_Creek-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Angry Otter Tap & Forno,"Great atmosphere. The food was fantastic and the beer was good too. Lots of choice on the menu. Our server, Angela was helpful, friendly and went above and beyond to serve us. Not sure when we will be back in this neck of the woods...More
Yesterday was our first time at the restaurant. We were in the neighborhood for Santa pictures with our 3 year old.The staff were very attentive and my daughter loved the popcorn. It was nice they had a kids menu too. Very good selection of beers...More
Hello, thank you so much for dining with us and for your kind words. Our team looks forward to serving you next time!
Had not been in a couple years. I used to really like it there. The food and beer selection was always great. I guess there were some changes to the service since I had been last. I wasn't told that now you have to order...More
Our go to place for pizza and beer. Recommend the bourbon bacon and forager. Lots of beers on tap - ipas, lagers, sours and wheat covered
Came here after hiking at Cleveland Dam. Great beer selection and their IPA was my favorite, my husband was a big fan of the Dark Matter. They have a kids menu and even brought crayons and coloring booklet for our toddler. The Cottonwood was on...More
My GF and I have eaten here a few times as it’s right by our gym and it was always really good, however.... today our gym was closed and my gf really had to use the bathroom... she went in to use hearthstones and was...More
This place is certainly a winner when it comes to beers and burgers. their fries are excellent. Their beer flights give you a perfect taster before trying out full glasses. Certainly a place I would recommend if you are in the neighborhood looking for a...More
repeat visits to this brewery resulted in the same conclusion. great stouts and porters. average to poor food. double forno heated to 400 degrees and kamloops-style drizzled pizza instead of 900 degrees and napoli style. damn shame. looks like the place sold in september. that...More
This is a solid place. So much is going for it...including great, friendly staff, TONS of great beers on tap, Killer wings, and solid pizza. Specifically a big fan of the spicy lime sriracha wings and the maple bourbon bacon pizza from their Forno oven....More
As an Englishman in Canada during these unprecedented times, I’ve been missing a taste of home. I came in for the first time today, and tried the Taylor’s special bitter and it was phenomenal. Exactly what I wanted, and what the Canadian beer industry needs....More
We frequent Hearthstone for the awesome atmosphere, impressive beer list and solid menu. No matter what time of day, Hearthstone is a great option. It’s perfect for an afternoon enjoying beer and pizza. The service is good and it’s spaced appropriately so you feel safe...More
This place is our favorite for a pizza and beer It's a pretty cool taproom with good choices for beers and pizzas Must visit for anyone looking for comfort in pizzas and beer
Looking for some new places to try, good choice for sure! Saturday evening, very popular, good vibe, can be a tad loud with serveral big screens and music as well. Order and pay at the til routine. Decent selection on the menu with generous portions...More
Good food, nice place, and some interesting beers. I particularly liked the graham cracker ale. I had the maple bourbon burger, which was very good, with great french fries. My wife had a citrus arugula salad, and a side of hummas and pita. Service was...More
This is a very nice gastropub with plenty of seating choices in their woody, attractive interior. Some outdoor seating is also available, weather permitting. The location is on a main thoroughfare and near public transport (bus stop). The kitchen includes a large, wood-fired oven that...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d11785297-Reviews-Angry_Otter_Tap_Forno-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Anh and Chi,"I hadn't intended to stop here or anywhere to eat, but I was drawn in by the what I perceived as an attractive bustling eatery. 4:00 pm and it was busy. Enjoyed their signature beef noodle bowl. The beef was fantastic.
Its been ages since I'd been to this location for lunch, and a rare date night brought my wife and I here for dinner. First off, hats off for producing an elevated Vietnamese dining experience to the city. Attractive decor, nice ambiance and attentive service....More
Having been hearing about this place for awhile and finally checked it out. We were not disappointed. There were five of us and all of us were happy with our meal. We only had to wait a few minutes to get in mind you it...More
I used to love coming to Anh and Chi but I have a number of issues after a couple of recent visits. It is usually difficult to get a table and forcing patrons to make a $10 donation to a charity to make a reservation...More
I had a business lunch with a colleague of mine. She asked me to consult with her. We had three dishes chicken rolls, a veggie platter with rice paper roll ups and lettuce and a beef salad. Great service.
Always love the food here, but today I was disappointed with the chicken banh mi, I paid an extra $3 for the liver pate, but couldn’t even see it, I pointed it out to the waitress who asked the kitchen, they said it gets put...More
100 % when I go to the any Vietnamese restaurants , I just order the Pho and spring roll quick eat and leave , do not care much any decor or fancy menu , one of my Vietnamese client hear that I am a very...More
The menu and spectacular food offered at Anh and Chi’s really stand out. We’ve eaten at many Vietnamese restaurants, but none with quite the creative drink and food menu. It can get crowded during the dinner rush, but we didn’t wait long to be seated...More
I've been here a few times in the past year alone. I stumbled onto it quite by accident. I then read the great reviews and heard from others how awesome it was. I have nothing to compare from previous years. However, our experience has been...More
We used to love this place pre Covid. This time we ordered take out as their outside seating is pretty closed in by plastic walls. The take out was not great. One order was wrong. The lemongrass chicken tasted off and not of lemongrass. The...More
Really awesome spot for Vietnamese food with a modern take on it. Not sure about reservations but there is always a line to get in there. This time around we had the beef short ribs on rice, bun bo hue and pork spring rolls. I...More
We ate here pre Covid in 2019, twice, and always thought of coming back. Finally Covid is almost over and we made a much anticipated visit, everything was wrong. The service was slow. Ok, there is a shortage of staff everywhere, fair enough. we waited...More
The food wasn't very traditional, but was tasty. We tried a number of items, and everyone in the family was pretty pleased. The restroom was a novel setup.
Very bad service. Ordered 2 pork and veggie spring rolls. I received 2 pork and veggie spring rolls and 2 veggie spring rolls. Hostess and manager refused to removed the extra spring rolls from my bill. Will not come back -
Had an absolutely amazing time dining here at Anh and Chi. The food was delicious, and the service was excellent. I had the spring rolls and the crispy prawn cakes which were so good and then the spicy noodle soup. Chelsea was my server and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9681067-Reviews-Anh_and_Chi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
AnnaLena,"Firstly, no question the food is wonderful and the service superb. Each course was met by all four of us at table with pleasure. But have to say the loud volume and vibration of the rap music that made conversation difficult made it clear this...More
Best restaurant we visited in Vancouver. Creative, well-executed tasting menu served by very friendly staff in an unstuffy environment. Oyster with shaved foie gras was outstanding. Shrimp and mussels in an herbed cream sauce was beautiful and excellent.
From the moment you walk in the door to the time they offer to bring you your jacket, the service is absolutely impeccable! Everyone really shows a lot of passion for what they represent and as they should. The food is exquisite! I planned my...More
My husband and I got a tasting menu treat for a Christmas present at the newly awarded Michelin star restaurant. And what a deserved star it was!! What was especially enjoyable was how layed back the atmosphere, staff and decor was and how much fun...More
Wasn't sure it would live up to all the hype - it did. Absolutely amazing. To start, the service was top notch. They used our names frequently, they explained things, they were engaging, we weren't rushed. Service was definitely some of the best service I...More
AnnaLena is an amazing restaurant and a must-try if you are visiting or in the area. Service was excellent and the food was delectable.
The tasting menu at Anna Lena was creative and well done; the service and casual chic vibe equally good. Will definitely return!
Had a great time with my wife here on our anniversary. Service was great and the food was delicious!
Got lucky and scored a last minute reservation at the bar. We love tasting menus and have eaten lots of them around the US, where we are from. This was right up there in deliciousness. Every course was plate licking good. We were sitting at...More
We were fortunate to dine at AnnaLena on July 13, 2022. We were visiting from overseas and dined with our sons and their partners. To say this was an incredible dining experience would be an understatement. We have been fortunate to dine in outstanding restaurants...More
We dined here during a 5-day trip to Vancouver and were not disappointed. We followed the 6-course tasting menu with wine pairing, and every course was excellent (though we were particularly fond of the salmon main and the mushroom pasta). The beverages were as varied...More
Go, just go. Reservations are necessary and should be booked several weeks out. We had a delightful evening dining at the bar. Everyone was wonderful and the food was amazing. The food tasted great, but the complexity of textures was a highlight. We easily got...More
We had an unreal experience here at AnnaLena. We've been meaning to try this place forever and finally glad we got to try it. The service was unreal, our server Cherish was so friendly and amazing. The food is insanely good. The experience is set...More
The tasting menu was sublime. Each course (there were 6 of them) was more delicious than its predecessor. The food was creative, locally sourced and beautifully presented. A very special experience.
I was lucky enough to be in Vancouver for a recent birthday and my partner booked this fabulous experience for my birthday meal. From the moment we walked in until we left the service was excellent, the place is modern and you feel comfortable to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7741695-Reviews-AnnaLena-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Anton's Pasta Bar,"Super recommended! Our family's favourite restaurant in Vancouver! We try to join them for dinner at least once a month. The food is delicious, huge portions, great customer service and the best part...the place is wheelchair accessible. A must-go! =)
Great pasta. Portions are huge and everyone takes away what they don’t eat. Very reasonably priced. Soup and salad also great. Would recommend a visit.
We stayed in the lineup for 1h30, but when we were about to seat, the servers started taking people behind us to be seated first. They called a group of 5, then a group of 4, and I was with 3 friends plus 2 toddlers....More
Ordered the Alfredo, but unfortunately, this dish was tasteless. A classic Alfredo should have ground NUTMEG. Won't order this again!!
We had lunch today at Anton’s and i have to say I was disappointed. We have gone to this restaurant many times over the years but today it was a disappointment. Two of us ordered the seafood linguine and the pasta was so thick, like...More
My husband, daughter and I went to Anton's today, during the afternoon (around 3pm). I asked my husband to go ahead with my daughter so he could secure a table (it was not rush hour, but just in case). My mom uses a cane and...More
I really liked the virgin pina colada, and our server was very fast, but the food is not good here. The wait to get in is not worth it, and I don't understand why people keep coming back.
It was a long time ( over 10 years) when we last visited and enjoyed a sumptuous and delicious Italian cuisine. We finally made another visit to Anton's, when my son from London, UK visited us lately. The food and service were as usual great...More
Nothing has changed here in decades - huge portions, delicious homemade pasta, and lineups. If you go with more than 4 people, expect to lineup. We only saw one big table for 10. A couple of us had the specialty pasta dish of seafood cannelloni,...More
Great atmosphere, great service, huge portions and very reasonable prices. The Portuguese buns that accompanied our meal were so good that I had to buy some to take home. They come from Fortuna Bakery which is next door to the restaurant. Sadly it closes early...More
We had such good service and the food was so good and there was so much of it! My husband ordered the dinner size and ended up taking half of it home with him (which never happens) and I had the smaller size and brought...More
Save your time and money. Pasta was overcooked to the point it was mush. The asparagus in the pasta was cooked till it was wilted, soft and brown. Everything was goopy. Cooks either don't know how to cook or simply don't give a damn. Bread...More
Weekday visit at 1:30 pm the service was great! The wiatress was on the ball and very attentive. The pasta lunch portions were huge and thats whete its stops for me the crusty dried out bread placed on a basket on the table was very...More
We visit this restaurant at least three times a month and the service isn't that great. My boyfriend order the diner size and twice has been very small. Today we were there for lunch and when I asked for an extra box to pack the...More
Because of COVID restrictions, they will likely revert to take-out only. But, they will be on our list of take-out next visit to Vancouver! We had spent the day enjoying the sights and sounds of Vancouver, and felt we could justify a big plate of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d701534-Reviews-Anton_s_Pasta_Bar-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Aphrodite's Organic Cafe,"I’m sad to have to write a negative review here, however 3 bad experiences in a row warrants this in my opinion. We’ve been coming to this place for well over 10 years, the big draw was the organic ingredients, atmosphere and wonderful staff. The...More
I love going for brunch and Aphrodites provides so many high quality choices on their menu. The atmosphere is casual and fun and the servers are all very friendly and experienced. It's also a great restaurant to bring vegans, vegetarians and meat eaters alike. Make...More
I visited a breakfast restaurant this morning, and the service was a bit cold. The food was a good, and the cost was average.
We visited upon recommendation of our host where we stayed. Even though the food was nice (not extremely overwhelmed, there are nicer places to go to); we found the price extremely high. For 2 x breakfast (nothing extra ordinary), 2 black coffee and 1 orange...More
If you're looking for delicious breakfast or lunch this spot should definitely be on your shortlist! The Café itself is inviting, the staff very friendly and helpful and the food is incredibly good! Everything is organic and for the most part locally grown/sourced. The portions...More
I have been in this cafe many times and I am never disappointed...the quality of the food and service is very good. The staff have genuine smiles!
I had the “green eggs and ham” for breakfast. The atmosphere, service, and cleanliness were first rate. The problem I had was the ham was dry and the toast was burnt. Having said the negatives I definitely would go back for maybe something else.
We stopped at Aphrodite’s with friends during a day visit of Vancouver. We took quiches and salads. Fresh, tasty, served by friendly and efficient staff : perfect place for a quick lunch.
Hip funky place to eat with great art and service. Were here with family for a weekend brunch and we all had excellent food. Can be loud. Portion are large and the special is super value.
The food is great here, the portions very large. For breakfast on a weekend, the special is a better deal than ordering eggs and then sides separately. They have unusual and excellent sausages, such as smoky bison sausage and venison and blueberry sausages. We shared...More
My favourite lunch/brunch restuarant. Returned today before Folk festival. Eggs benny bacon gluten free bread and lovely salad. and I tried something different poached eggs bacon and gluten free toast. Service is always amazing.
The food was interesting but the acoustics were so BAD that to hear or talk with the person next to you or across from you meant that you had to talk within an inch of their ear. The sounds just bounced off the ceiling and...More
It was a beautiful winter's day and we decided to have a coffee and a hot chocolate at the little patio table available outside. As everything is made FRESH, it does take a little while for your order to be completed. Expect to pay close...More
My son and I came to have brunch on the Monday of three-day weekend. It was very busy but after a ten minute wait, we were seated. The food was delicious. One of us had the stuffed French toast with their dark hot chocolate and...More
This was my first experience of dining in Vancouver and I wasn't disappointed! Wide choice of healthy, organic options, generous portions and great service. Highly recommend!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4104862-Reviews-Aphrodite_s_Organic_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Aphrodite's Pie Shop,"Great awareness of gluten contamination, with all GF pies stored in a separate fridge. Separate utensils and chopping boards are also used. Staff had good knowledge about gluten ingredients and it was a real comfort to eat here. Chocolate pecan pie was incredible!
I have tried numerous items at this adorable little joint and I can say that even though it is a bit expensive I can tell that the products are made with care and love. The pie fillings are never excessively sweet and I like that...More
Delicious pie. But how about using an oven or toaster oven to heat up? Microwaves make the nice pastry soggy. For the price and organic ingredients I'm surprised by the use of microwaves
Ordered a slice of pecan pie and it was great. Lots of pecans in it, very yummy fudgy caramel filling and dense pie crust. Also friendly service and cosy seating.
Chocolate Raspberry mousse pie - I dream of that. Perfect for sharing, it is rich, decadent and never disappoints. All of their pies are delicious, fav's are Lemon Meringue, chocolate and apple. Great place to sit and chat over pie and tea!
I loved this place and was a repeat customer during my vacation. The fresh, healthy options were exceptional. I especially enjoyed the salmon burgers and brunch offerings. Wine list was great.
Pie tasted like a poor quality supermarket pie not a gourmet organic pie shop. Pastry was extremely poor and cherry filling bland. Very expensive for what we got
Tourtiere hand pie was very fresh and made with very crisp and crumbly, expertly made pastry with a subtle buttery flavour. Filling was tasty enough but ratio of filing to crust was a bit low if I’m being picky. Easy enough to eat on the...More
Pros: The chocolate banana cream pie was delicious. The filling was light and not too sweet with fresh bananas. Cons: Pecan pie was too sweet and bland. Pies not always fresh. inconsistent quality. Service terribly slow. Staffs were confused with our orders.
The pies didn’t have enough sugar in them to be called fruit pies. They used Bing Cherries for their cherry pie - WTF ! bing cherries are for eating fresh or for Jam or for Duck breasts Montmorency. really! I’ve been there twice, disappointed both...More
Had lunch here with a friend. My wife and I both had the veggie hash. Also had a smoothie. All really fresh and delicious. A little on the pricey side but I believe they use local, organic ingredients so that’s part of why. Would eat...More
This is a must visit organic pie company in Vancouver west close to ubc, the taste of coffee and pumpkin pie here is NOT comparable to anywhere and this is coming from a guy who denies coffee religiously. Must visit place for coffee and food...More
If u happen to be in the area, try the place. It has a nice variety of pies and quiches. It also has gluten free and vegan options. Also, there coffee is pretty good! The place it self feels pretty homy, too :)
Popped in as we were walking past, lovely place, helpful staff, good variety of produce both classic, vegan and GF. The coffee was very nice, I had a couple of expresso’s to while away the early evening and my partner had the Earl Grey Tea...More
i heard so many good things about their pies. at $8.25 a slice i was expecting a lot. it was meh. crust was doughy and filling was underwhelming. i have had better at other local bakeries. tried both the strawberry rhubarb and raspberry which was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d803632-Reviews-Aphrodite_s_Pie_Shop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Apollonia Greek Restaurant,"I have gone to this restaurant a few times, but I have been disappointed each time. The pizza isnt as good as Pizza Hut down the road, the rest of their food is fair but nothing special and nowhere near as good as Vassilis in...More
Wonderful ambiance, great food and and great service. Make sure to have a reservation as it was very busy for a Tuesday night!
We were Apollonia in time to take advantage of their happy hour. We shared an appetizer of saganaki and had a bottle of wine from the happy hour menu. There is a substantial mark up on wine prices. With the $10.00 discount during happy hour...More
We ordered and picked up from Apollonia tonight. It wasn't cheap - $110 for a family of four. I walked over, picked it up and brought it home. We discovered there was no tzatziki with our calamari. We phoned them, they admitted it was their...More
We have been looking for a great Greek restaurant since our favourite Kalamata closed down due to retirement. We've found it!! Easy to call and have takeout ready when you arrive. the food was excellent. I had the prawn and scallop souvlakia and my wife...More
The food was good. They were nice in supporting my food needs. I ordered Roast Lamb with rice, potatoes and salad. Very good and tasty. My wife had the Lamb Souvlaki and it also was yummy. The takeout was accurate in packing it up.
We have been to this restaurant a number of times but starting in April 2020 with COVID we ordered a birthday dinner for my wife. Delivered hot and was wonderful. Since that time and just about every Friday night we have been ordering a pizza...More
I’m sad to be writing this review, as Apollonia has been a restaurant my family and I frequent often and have enjoyed visiting for many years. On Saturday, we ordered a meal of two chicken slovakias and asked for the rice to be substituted with...More
First time trying this restaurant as I had heard great things. Had a mixed platter delivered and loved it all. Chicken, lamb, salad, lemon potatoes, rice and best calamari. Highly recommend and will definitely be back.
Delicious Greek food - melitzano and lamb souvlaki - perfectly prepared, just-right proportions, attentive, friendly service, most attractive ambience - not too noisy.
this is a very cozy restaurant very close to Granville Island which is a key destination for visitors and residents of Vancouver.. we really enjoyed the pizza on this evening visit after strolling around Granville Island..the staff are very friendly and welcoming.. the seating is...More
This is a small restaurant so the tables are tight together, and the noise level can be high. Wouldn’t go here for a romantic dinner but good for business. The food is very good; the lamb chops are 3 to a plate and prepared as...More
I made a reservation at least 2 weeks prior to our 30th wedding anniversary in hopes of getting a decent table. Instead we got stuck between two tables of four and had to hold on to our wine so it didn’t get knocked over by...More
I am quite a fan of mediterranean food in general and have eaten it in many places, including several time in Greece. Apollonias food is among the best I’ve had. Very fresh ingredients. Full of flavour. Traditional. Not trying too hard. There were four of...More
I'm a bit hesitant to write this review in case the word gets out about just how great Apollonia is. A family run gem close to Grandville Island and if you didn't know it was there you would miss it when driving by. The food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2213650-Reviews-Apollonia_Greek_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Applause Japanese Restaurant,"This is a great restaurant with good food and good service. everything is as you would expect and they deserve their recent awards. We will be visiting again soon and this may become a habit as it is such a great place to have a...More
I had walked by this place on a previous trip to Vancouver and decided to dine there on this trip. Not a huge place, seemed pretty busy and I was glad that I arrived early for supper. I had a bento box which covered all...More
My dad and I were actually trying to go to the Taiwanese Beef Noodle place down the block but it was randomly closed on a Tuesday. We ended up at Applause and were very pleased. I had a lunch bento box that had so much...More
Good value and decent service. Good for families and groups up to 12. Casual setting and feel, parking on 68th Ave if small lot to the north is full.
We stayed overnight at the Coast in order to catch an early morning flight so walked up Oak Street to this place. Staff were friendly. Food was good. Decor was ok with cheap curtains hung between tables to afford some degree of privacy. We had...More
We did not expect much but it was a good surprise. The food was great. The highlight is the tuna tataki salad, it was simply delicious !!! The eggplant appetizer was amazing as well. Makis and nigiris were very fresh. The salmon tartar was too...More
We have eaten here a few times now. They are always busy but get you in fast. The service is quick and the food is always good. We have enjoyed everything we have had including the noodles, bite size steak and the sashimi.
This restaurant was close to our hotel (Coast Vancouver Airport), about 10-minute walk. The staff was very friendly and attentive. The restaurant didn’t have much ambiance, but surprisingly the food was delicious. It would be great if more veggie dishes were added to the menu.
Not good ,small portion, expensive.not worth the money I paid.low quantity service.they were chatting instead of hearing the customers.
Applause is a small but stylish izakaya kind of Japanese restaurant. Moderate prices, good robata choices. There is a small parking lot for patrons. Tempura was indeed crispy. Service was quick and courteous. The venue was a little out of my neibourhood (downtown), it is...More
I frequent go past this restaurant when heading to Richmond. Timing worked out it was convenient I could stop in for lunch on a Saturday. I chose the Chef special ahi tuna poke rice bowl. It was very good and filling. It had seafood, cucumber,...More
At the time of visit, I noticed all sushi chef were Chinese, rather than Japanese. The servers, especially the lady server's attitude is very poor. She never cleaned her hands after touching the floor for adjusting the table height and wiping with her bare hand...More
Since there are so many sushi places in Vancouver, I would not go out of my way to eat here. However, if you are in the area, its definitely worth a try! I came for lunch and got the sashimi bento box (see accompanying photo)....More
Excellent Japanese food on the Westside. Broad menu selection. It is usually packed and at times hard to find parking.
I work nearby so come here often. The food is very good and it is the only authentic Japanese restaurant in the Marpole area. Set lunches are a good value and the sushi is fresh and varied. Ambience is fine, not too noisy and the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d953889-Reviews-Applause_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Archer,"My friends & I thoroughly enjoyed the classy cozy atmosphere, delicious food & fantastic friendly service. A special restaurant for locals, out-of- towners & those with exquisite taste.
Celebrated birthday here with friends. Service was exceptional, everyone was very pleasant and friendly. Every dish was nicely presented and tasted delicious. I can see why they are Michelin recommended. Would like to come back to try the brunch and happy hour.
I have tried this restaurant a few times. It looks like they change their menu often to keep up with the seasons. My most recent trip was for fathers day. They had a dinner special that weekend and it was my favorite dish I have...More
Archer dining and restaurant 👍👍👍 excellent food that was recommended by Michelin guid this year! Cozy environment and super friendly serving, what an amazing experience! I keep coming back with family and very impressed that they always keep up the standard on the food quality,...More
Went there for dinner since it was added to the Michelin recommended. The restaurant was stunning, the decor was so beautiful and elegant. The menu was not big, but it had everything that we liked. For 4 people we ordered 3 appetizers, 4 mains and...More
Went to try their newly launched a la carte dinner menu. Quality experience with amazing new menu items from their new chef. Would highly recommend.
A group of us gather for brunch most Sundays at several different restaurants. We tried this place recently . It was great . Excellent menu . Creative dishes well prepared with fresh high quality ingredients. Service was terrific . The owner was very pleasant ....More",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d25445458-Reviews-Archer-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Argo Cafe,"Small local Cafe. This was extremely amazing. The service was so pleasant the food was so comforting and the price was completely ideal. Locals are lucky to have this food Cafe!! 😋
The best little diner in Vancouver. I overheard a customer calling it a foodie haven and gourmet diner. I liked that description. Be sure to ask Lynda what's for desert after!
This quality Argo Cafe is situated near the very busy Olympic Village strolling and bike pathways along the False Creek waterway..near Main Street and just off 2nd Avenue and Ontario Street..there is quite a nice patio area for easy relaxation ..it is a very friendly...More
We both bad burgers and fries with the fixins. The fries were crisoy and good. The burgers were tasty, yummy and good. Nice patio and good service.
a canadian typical breackfast place, a real must for who lives in town. Would suggest pankackes and waffles.
Unbelievable, just had to see how my Favourite Vancouver Cafe was doing, they have now a small outdoor patio and some indoor dining, but I got the take out and I tell you the Lasagna that we just ate is probably one of the Best...More
The menu at this restaurant is amazing. The regular breakfast and lunch menus offer something for everyone but the lunch specials are upscale choices at a very reasonable price. The day we visited the specials offered choices of ahi tuna salad, New York steak, sockeye...More
Met a work colleague here for lunch on his recommendation, think I might have eaten here once before. This is one of those iconic ""greasy spoons"" that's been around forever and offers good food at a very decent price in a run-down environment. The menu's...More
Went for lunch - place was jammed. Sat at the counter on stools that must have been installed in the 1950""s - not real comfortable. BUT the food, though took a while was basic, good fare, good value. Caesar salad was OK. Club sandwich was...More
I decided we should try Argo because it was featured on ""You Gotta Eat Here"" . Everything was very good, We both had bacon and eggs. it was very well done. Nice clean dinner. Outside look a little off. parking can be difficult and it...More
Beyond Good, Chef Lynda and Chef Denis have created the Best priced quality restaurant that I've been to in Years, happened in today and had for $16.95 fresh Rock Fish,perfectly cooked,cream sauce, fresh cut veggie, white rice and their amazing complimentary soup, today was Lamb...More
CAme heere with a group of solo travellers for breakfast after our Via rail train journey. It didn't look like much when we got there but service was quick and cheerful and the food was tasty and good value for money, with plenty to choose...More
Best cafe in town with AMAZING CHEFS. Try thedaily specials! Specials include SOUP! Best HOMEMADE desserts! They are FOOD ARTISTS here!
We had a nice breakfast/brunch at this local joint, one that does not offer dinner but focusing only on breakfast and lunch in the weekdays and breakfast and brunch on Sat. Very reasonably priced and great service!
This place rocks ambiance. We had the combo of soup, fries and a burger. Food was just yummy and the service if friendly and efficient. The old school ambiance if a 50s diner is the best. The booths are formica table tops, counter service as...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d701581-Reviews-Argo_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Arike,"My wife and I had a great meal here. A pleasant, understated interior with well spaced tables, and interesting music that was at a reasonable volume – you could have a conversation. Excellent service, our server was very knowledgeable about the food and wine, appeared...More
Excellent tasting menu in an intimate space just off English Bay. Five courses of exquisite food prepared with Nigerian sauces and spices, beautiful presentation, and friendly service. The lamb dish last night was one of the best I’ve ever tasted — great flavours! They easily...More
This little family run gem is easy to miss but once you locate it and try it out, you will be pleasantly surprised. A small cozy place that serves a limited number of guests everyday and their rational is to maintain the perfect taste of...More
Went to Dine-out Vancouver with another couple. They wanted African food. I have not had much experience dining African but liked the sounds of ARIKE's Nigerian-inspired food. The entire meal was amazing! Everything is tapas style -- easy to share, which makes it easy to...More
We had a truly lovely, relaxed meal at this little hidden gem of a restaurant last evening. We started off with some cocktails, after having a hard time deliberating as they all sounded good. We each ordered a sour and they were very interesting and...More
There aren’t many of us on the lookout for Nigerian food so it’s easy. It to even consider Arike for a meal. But, that would be your loss. Terrific food and excellent staff who know their stuff and are happy to see you. The food...More
Came to Arike primarily because of its English Bay location. Left after being wowed by the great food: had the lamb flat bread, steak skewer appetizer, and prawn rice bowl. The service was very professional and at the ready to provide whatever we needed. Arike's...More
I had mini burgers appetizer, followed by a lamb flat bread. I also tried both desserts - an ice cream and pof pofs. Everything was awesome!!
Really tasty food. I liked every bit. Worth the visit. Worth every penny spent. Highly recommended. I'll recommend drink French 75. My wife loved it.
Have been here twice now and already planning my third trip! The food was absolutely amazing! Everything is set up for sharing, which I would Recommend as you want to try it all! Wasn’t sure what to expect with Nigerian inspired food, but I was...More
It isn't often that you get to try something truly unique in a restaurant. Arike is that opportunity, As stated in the other reviews, the food is fantastic. The menu is designed to share, like Spanish Tapas, only a completely different flavour profile. The menu...More
The venue nicely appointed the chef and bartender are nice and open about there business and service. I had a fantastic negroni made in a professional and beautiful way, I watch the care in making an old fashion that was beautiful. The food selection is...More
My friends and I tried every item on the menu and the food just got better and better with each bite. A fantastic meal from beginning to end. Don't even get me started about how delicious their Milo ice cream was. Staff were extremely friendly...More
The atmosphere is fun and relaxed but that doesn’t begin to describe the experience! Oh my gosh, THE FOOD!!!, there are dishes that they create that can only be described as heavenly. Seriously not what you expect. We did a plethora of share dishes. AMAZING!...More
Just opened - Nigerian influenced menu. Awesome flatbreads with unique and interesting flavors. Well stocked bar with specialty cocktails.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16864699-Reviews-Arike-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Arms Reach Bistro,"Look, Arm's Reach is a tourist spot with a great patio and ambience, but how they ever got such a high rating on the north shore is beyond me. The menu selections are stale and the food is so-so. It's the only fine dining option...More
Delicious food and great service, in beautiful Deep Cove. Mussels are my favorites but everything is yummy. Highly recommended.
Aside from the view, this restaurant is a hard no. I had the spicy spaghetti it was undercooked, and the taste wasn't pleasant at all. My wife had the tiny $30 duck, it was just a leg and she was hungry and didn't enjoy it.
A dog at a nearby table at Arms Reach Bistro barked throughout our lunch, ruining our experience at an otherwise decent restaurant that we have regularly frequented. To be clear, with a couple dog owners in our party we have no problem with dogs in...More
We visited the arm reach for a family birthday and we're very pleased with the quality of the food and of course the service
We have been coming here for years, it is our local 'go to' restaurant to celebrate special occasions, showcase the cove to out of town friends, or just drop into after a bike ride or walk. We had friends visiting from Ontario, and took them...More
It was a beautiful Sunny day , me and my bosom buddy biking around North Shore almost six hours , dropped in for a quick bite and REST ! too early for dinner , it is a North West cuisine , not expensive at all...More
Fairly disappointed in this restaurant. I ordered a “Winter salad” for take away and to save you from finding their online menu, the description is the following: Julienne beats, honey crisp apple, shaved carrots, fennel and ricotta cheese. I’ve attached a photo of what I...More
We've been going to this location for over 40 years. Was the best view of Deep Cove. Restaurants have always been high quality fine dining offerings. This time, with the Covid rules, the passport system worked efficiently, seating was done quickly. Got our requested table...More
Wonderful patio dinner on our first night in North Vancouver. We enjoyed the chicken penne, steelhead trout and wine. Beautiful backdrop of Deepcove made this night special.
I had penne chicken here at this fabulous restaurant. It was well cooked and the service was excellent . Good selection of local beers and good menu selection.Excellent
Awesome experience. We had guests waiting at our house-otherwise we would have stayed for a full meal. The service is top tier. We were greeted right away. Our server listened to our request and quickly found us a table outside with a fabulous view. She...More
Hi, we are regulars that have been coming since the restaurant opened. The last few times we have come, the restaurant has been out of mussels. So..... today we phoned around 3, and said we wanted to be sure we could have mussels when we came tonight....More
Food was excellent, friendly staff, dog friendly patio with amazing views. We were greeted warmly and our names were put on a text list and we waited about 20 minutes. It was worth the wait. Our table was perfectly located and there was a space...More
We randomly chose this restaurant after a hike. It literally made our trip!!! The restaurant is so cute and cozy and the view is stunning!!! Our server, Simone, was fantastic!!!!!! She was so friendly and Super attentive!!! The food was mind blowing!!! The best beef...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1102089-Reviews-Arms_Reach_Bistro-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Arriva Ristorante,"Lovely authentic Roman style restaurant; nice straightforward menu without fussy fusion influences; good service, well prepared food with generous portions. Highly recommended.
We had Linguine con Gamberoni and Lasagna. Portions are smaller but they did give us bread with olive oil/balsamic dip to start. The flavour of both pastas was good. The house red Cabernet and house white Chardonnay was good. Good service. They do recommend a...More
It was the lowest rating available. This restaurant used to be a four or five but has fallen badly. We went out of our way for an anniversary dinner and were sadly disappointed. Started with a tasteless mozzarella salad, slice of tomato with a ball...More
First time back since pandemic. Everything was just as good as we have greatly enjoyed over many years. Our server was knowledgeable and friendly. He recommended a killer Brunello that we absolutely loved. A shellfish linguine and special of pork tenderloin with mushroom sauce were...More
This was our second dinner at Arriva. We were here once before during Dine Out Vancouver in early 2019 and enjoyed our meal so wanted to try it again with their regular meal. The place is very busy and servers were struggling to keep up....More
I went to this restaurant with same friends Saturday night and I have been the pleasure to be served by Rodika that she took care of us from wines to desserts in extremely professional matter She knows perfectly any kind of wine and item in...More
Didn't need resos on a wednesday night. Tables are socially distanced and all servers wearing masks. We ordered the Grilled calamari feature appie, the linguine pescatore, the mixed grill feature entree and the creme caramel for dessert. Food: Bread starter: served with olive oil &...More
Returning once again to one of our favourite restaurants in Vancouver, after a longer than normal absence due to the COVID situation, we were so excited about dining there again. As we had consistently experienced over many years, the restaurant was as wonderful as always....More
We ate with friends and were very disappointed with most aspects of the experience. The venue is very ‘70’s but clean and reasonable space between tables. We ordered bruschetta to start and after 15 minutes had to ask if they had our order. We tried...More
Group of 10 to celebrate the holiday season. Drinks came fast, food ordered was served hot, Italian dishes, including crab linguine, fettuccine Americana and tortellini cardinale were all very tasty and filling. Our food, however, was slow in coming, maybe because of our number and...More
I have given it a four but if you could rate the stars, I would actually give it a four plus for the food but a two for the service. We hadn't been to Arriva's for years but It use to be one of our...More
Arriva Ristorante Italiano is located in on Commercial Drive in the heart of Little Italy. We booked a table for 12:30 on this November Friday and the restaurant was had less than15 customers. I picked this restaurant after having a look at the some of...More
We went here to meet old friends at the suggestion of one of them . We were looking for a place with good food where we could also sit and catch up. Arriva fit that bill perfectly. It is located in the Little Italy section...More
Delicious pasta, quickly served in table, wine in perfect temperature, all good. And the dessert tiramisu is a very good
This restaurant is good. I’ve dined there twice in the past week ... once for lunch and once for dinner. It’s spacious the tables are well separated and the noise level is moderate. The service is prompt and friendly and special requests are handled well....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d681979-Reviews-Arriva_Ristorante-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Asa Sushi,"Stopped in at Asa for some sushi and was instantly pleasantly surprised by their friendly prices with most specialty rolls around $8-12 for 8-10 pieces as opposed to most sushi nowadays which is $15-20 for the same stuff!! Walked in on a cold, snowy night...More
If I could give a 0 stars I would. Showed up with 3 people to order lunch. After ordering, my teens went out to grab a smoothie. Even though we had full meals ordered and on the table when they returned, they wouldn't allow them...More
Cozy restaurant run by Koreans, so they have some Korean dishes on the menu. The food was prepared and presented nicely and fresh. Wife and I were on a bicycle ride and decided to stop in. They have partitions between tables but it a small...More
Wow everything was so good and fresh! In my pictures: Salmon Sashimi, Tuna Sashimi, Spicy Salmon Sashimi, Awesome Yam Roll, Ebi Aburi Oshi, Sockeye Salmon Oshi, Chicken Teriyaki, Unagi Roll, Salmon Roll, Tuna Roll. Trust me you won't regret trying the amazing food! :)
There is so many restaurants in Kerrisdale , special Japanese sushi , Asa in the neighbourhood since 96 , very casual laid back sushi and raw bar and Korean food too , not too crazy busy during lunch hours , very clean with very nice...More
Decent sushi and reasonable prices. Premises pretty low key but decent for everyday meals. A solid choice all around for lunch or dinner.
Ordered take out. Amazing sushi. Beautiful presentation, fresh, good portions. Would order it again!
Enjoyed dining here in December 2019 for a lunch break while checking out kerrisdale. The portion of the don katsu teriyaki was sufficient. The deep fried crab and shrimp rolls with cream cheese weren’t overly rich and sweet chilli sauce was an ideal choice. Staff...More
Absolutely spectacular! Incredible flavours in the foods with exceptional service by the staff. You couldn’t ask for more! The highlight was the Mango Tower, with fresh mango, seafoods and rice, topped with fresh salmon. Also enjoyed just as much were beef teriyaki, unagi sushi, shrimp...More
The restaurant, a little bit outside of Vancouver, is really a MUST for everone loving japanese food. The interior is the same that one can find in Japan. The menue is extensive and offers japanese food for everyone. Most impressive to me are the sushi...More
I was so hungry I ordered Dynamite roll and some nigiri , but it fell short, it just left a bad taste in my mouth, the rice , sea food all ugh. The service also was poor, I had to wait to even get a...More
This place has great food, can be a bit crowded and people sitting right next to you, as if you were a group of 4, not 2 separate couples. The sushi rolls were all very tasty and well prepared. I got a tank sized Sapporo,...More
We were strolling down 41st looking for a spot for lunch, and this small place had a line out the door. We found out it was worth the short wait. Excellent quality food. Very reasonable lunch specials. Friendly service. Lots of take-out service going on.
The Bento box, Rocky Mountain roll and nigiri were amazing! The goma ae and tempura were great as well. Nice and quick for lunch, perfect.
Randomly picked this restaurant among the half dozen Japanese restaurants that can be found in Kerrisdale. It's a central location and decent looking space, but food and service weren't all that impressive. We tried: - Lunch Box A - Average. Food altogether was OK, but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5107599-Reviews-Asa_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ashiana Tandoori,"We recently learned that Vancouver has a lot of Indian restaurants. Now we really love to visit Vancouver because of excellent Chinese and Indian food. I saw Ashiana Tandoori on TripAdvisor and saw great near perfect reviews. So I decided to come here with my...More
Three of us went for dinner and got there right as it was opening - after a long day of flying in, we were hungry! We were seated immediately - and our server was Rick who is also the chef and owner. He was extremely...More
For someone who is looking for an Indian Dine In , this is one of the best go to restaurant in Vancouver. Really enjoyed the lunch with family - Lamb Curry, Mutter Mushroom, Daal Makhani. Butter chicken with Lachedar Paratha was my personal favourite. Ambience...More
I came from india to visit Vancouver. We checked google reviews, it was highest rating of Ashiana tandoori. During our visit, we went few times. Dishes we tried Goat curry, butter chicken, lazeez E khumb, saag paneer etc.was amazing!!!! Even in India, we haven't tasted...More
The best mild butter chicken in Lower mainland , a truly authentic Indian ambiance n Rick‘s phenomenal customer service .. indeed a great culinary experience
Very authentic place , staff is very friendly and helpful. The best part is the menu with lots of options . Vegan + GF menus available. The food was delicious with huge portions. Prices are very affordable. We also loved the décor inside and the...More
We visited several indian restaurants in Vancouver, and this one is far the best! Don't let you fool by the look from outside.
We ordered a couple dishes for takeaway and thought they were great--especially the butter chicken. The owner was very friendly. Food was ready quickly, but we did order right after they opened.
We had a family of five for dinner. The food was excellent and the older members of our group had no trouble hearing each other, which is often a problem. We always enjoy the atmosphere as well as the food. The host was charming and...More
I notice all the reviews from the newspaper he hang on the wall. From 1992. It’s a big restaurant that seats a lot. They no long open for lunch only dinner. They open 5pm till 10pm. I have always seen this restaurant in the entertainment...More
Just had dinner at Ashiana. The food was excellent. The personal service for the owner can’t be surpassed.
My title for this review is not trite or a joke, this really was the best Indian food I have ever eaten. The goat curry was luscious and complex and that old standard and usually boring Malai Kofta was creamy and delicious. We also had...More
Great service, Lovely location and some of the best Indian food I've had anywhere. Wonderful for a larger gathering. Tasty without being too firey. Wonderful suggestions for ordering.
We were looking for a good Indian restaurant that's fairly central in Vancouver on pretty short notice. After a quick search online, I noticed Ashiana had some nice reviews so we decided to give it a try. There were 10 of us and I was...More
We and our friends like and appreciate good Indian style meals. In our city we have many choices and, unfortunately, many are precooked, ready to serve when the guest arrive. Nothing wrong with that as some dishes such as dahl need to sit and absorb...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d701612-Reviews-Ashiana_Tandoori-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ask for Luigi,"Trendy little restaurant that you definitely should try!! They were accommodating and we were able to get a table without a reservation. Our server was knowledgeable and friendly. I had the rigatoni a la bolognese and it was delicious.
Excellent service and amazing food to a reasonable price. With no reservation on a Saturday night there was about a 90 min wait. Just left them a number and then got a text when it was time. Since there are several nice places to get...More
Firstly, make sure you book a table on their website, bc the restaurant is very small. The area is a little bit sketchy at night, but it's easy to park. I chose the ""campanelle & wild boar ragu"". It was good, but not the best....More
Visited this restaurant with our daughter and friends. It is what is best described as a yuppy restaurant. While the food was excellent, the prices were high and the wine prices were totally outrageous, catering only to those with a very large wallet - how...More
Nice hideaway, family styles service, super small but delicious menu, fantastic atmosphere - we can definitely recommend this place. Those German fellas who gave it only one star because of the pricetag are probably unhappy across Vancouver
It's hard to say how good this place is. Their dishes are always high quality and very tasty. They also serve some of the most unique pasta dishes. The small menu ensures that they prepare each dish with excellence. This is my favourite Italian restaurant...More
I had the most wonderful and memorable meal in my visit to Vancouver. This restaurant is awesome. Food is incredible, the most amazing pasta dishes in many years. Couple this with the suggestions of our server on wine, antipasti and desserts. A must if you...More
Simply deliciously. No words for this Really we enjoy the most delicious past we ever try Totally recommend. You need to make a reservation because is a small place
Small restaurant, tables so close together (without plexiglass in between) you could spit on your neighbours food, and very loud with so many people in such a small space. My pasta, the Fregola Sarda needed more sauce and was skimpy on the mushrooms. Expensive and...More
The food and service here are exceptional. Takeout pickup was so organized Food was packaged and left me with a warm and friendly feeling.
We ordered the takeout menu. Pasta was delicious and the pick up order was waiting exactly at the time we arranged.
The food here was ABSOLUTELY INCREDIBLE. I can't wait to come back here again. The pasta was amazing, the short rib was amazing and the dessert was amazing! You definitely won't be disappointed here, the staff are incredible too. Till next time!
We visited this restaurant when it first opened for dinner, which was wonderful, and finally made it back for lunch a few days ago after many years of meaning to. Everything was great both times. Warm, welcoming service. Great food, well prepared using good local...More
We had a most pleasant culinary experience. The bocconcini appetizer was pleasant, but the ricotta raviolis was splendid. We had two different red wines, both very nice. We tried the olive cake which was beautifully cooked. A great date night
We recently ordered take out and picked up the order ourselves. The service was good (order hot, ready and on time) and the quality of food was excellent. Some take out food does not travel well, especially salads. But they package well, dressing on the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5562584-Reviews-Ask_for_Luigi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Assembli,"Excellent online ordering experience; pickup smooth and easy; pizzas and salads delicious. Every pizza and every salad is $14. One of each will feed three people.
Thin, crispy crust with high quality toppings. I was expecting something on par with Blaze Pizza, but this was far better. Highly recommended.
That's it! It's just the best pizza I ever had. You can add as many toppings as you want all for one price, $16. Same with the salads, as many ingredients as you want for $16. But the best part is its delicious!
I like Greek salad without onions, but with tofu for protein. My wife likes less dressing than most folks, and loves onions. I used to pick out my onions and give them to her, while she regretted not asking for light dressing. PROBLEM SOLVED -...More
My husband picked up a couple of their recommended pizzas. He didn't understand the BYOP concept...like Subway you pick unlimited gourmet toppings for one-flat price. The crust is thin, DOP Napolina-like and the pizza is wood-fired. Our minds were blown by how outstanding these pizzas...More
Went in with my mom for a quick bite. I ordered the build your own pizza and was genuinely surprised at how amazingly fresh the ingredient options were. I chose a basic mushroom, olive, and bacon pizza. It arrived at our table in under 5...More
We went to Assembli for lunch, sharing two pizzas between us. The fresh pizzas were really good and free refills on soft drinks very good on a hot afternoon.
Hi Robin- thanks for stopping by and taking the time to review us! We are glad you enjoyed your experience and hope you will be back again soon!
We stopped here for lunch last weekend. We're glad we did. We had their Backyard BBQ Pizza and a custom Pepperoni pizza for the kids. Both were very good. It's a ""Subway assembly"" like setup where you place your order, and then you can watch...More
Thanks for the review! We are glad you enjoyed your experience and your pizza. Next time you are in the area (and in the mood for salad), you should try building your own salad- with over 50 toppings, the options are endless! Hope to see...More
Came to Assembli as I wanted something quick but never expected the pizza to be that good! Not only was the service amazing and the guy was beyond helpful but you can pick from either their ready made flavours or make your own pizza/salad. We...More
Thanks for the great review! We can't pick between those 3 pizzas either- they are some of our favourites! You should definitely come back for a beer- we also have wine! See you soon!
This restaurant is a spin off of MOD. They make the pizza right in front of you, exactly to your specification, for the same price (except a few ingredients). This is in-between 'expensive high-end pizza' and 'cheap domino pizza'. It has a delicious freshness to...More
Thanks for the review! We are glad you enjoyed your experience and appreciate the positive feedback. You should definitely come back and try building your own salad- with over 50 toppings, the options are endless!
Assembli recently opened in my neighbourhood and I wanted to try it out with my daughter. They have small personal sized pizzas for kids and other larger sizes in a variety of flavors. Loved the Greek pizza and the o-mega salad. Really yummy and nice...More
Thanks for the review! We are glad you and your daughter enjoyed your pizzas & salads! See you again soon!
I really enjoyed being able to 'craft' my pizza to my personal taste. I'm vegan and was excited to see all their options. Unfortunately when I got my pizza back to my office I discovered it had mozzarella cheese on it. I contacted them and...More
Hi Dr. Schoen- thanks for taking the time to review us- we are sorry about the cheese but glad it got sorted it out. Come back and visit us anytime!",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12441255-Reviews-Assembli-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Atlas Steak + Fish,"Had a wonderful dinner for my sons and my girlfriend's Birthday dinner last night at the Burnaby Atlas , I am a regular here for their Happy Hours Oysters ! and business meeting , lot of Casino and Hotel parking , very relax upscale modern...More
Food and service was amazing. Richard was excellent and attentive. Anticipated our needs before we even had to ask.
Great service!!! Delicious dinner!! I love this restaurant, best in town. Every time I come, I have the best time. Richard was the waiter, very professional.
Very happy with the service. Food was amazing. Brought my two kids, and although not really a kid friendly restaurant, both left feeling over the moon with their meals.
Thank you Jody!
We love the food and atmosphere at Atlas, definitely one of the best places for steak and seafood, have never been disappointed.
Thank you!
Sat at the bar, near piano player. Food and drink very good. Piano player was superb, very talented and played upbeat medleys of 60s to current music.
Thank you for the kind words!
One of my friends had her birthday dinner here and everything was so delicious. I loved the grilled vegetables and the steak was mouth watering. I was still thinking of that steak days later. For dessert we had the chocolate peanut butter marquis bar and...More
our server, Lisa L, was awesome, helped us change our table (original seating was near the piano, so too loud) and was very helpful and attentive during the entire meal.
I was there with my friend 2 weeks ago and we were served by Kim. She is an exceptional and professional waitress. Able to explain to us in detail and recommend some signature dishes from the restaurant. Overall we had a great time and would...More
I haven't been here for dinner since 2019 because I had a sour experience that left me disappointed. I decided to give it another shot to see if the experience would change. I love live music and there was a pianist playing (he's good). I...More
I took my family to Atlas to celebrate my mothers birthday. Our server, Brigette was phenomenal. She was a kind soul who was knowledgeable of the menu and enthusiastic to ourselves and her surrounding tables. She went above and beyond the call of duty, and...More
We recently had a delightful dining experience at Atlas Steak + Fish in Burnaby. The ambiance was charming, and the dishes were delicious. What made the evening even more special was the excellent service provided by Bridgette. She went out of her way to offer...More
We had a delicious supper at Atlas Steak + Fish in Burnaby. Pleasant atmosphere and succulent food was topped off by the wonderful service provided by Bridgette. She made great recommendations and made us feel at home. Thanks again for a wonderful dining experience!
My family visited the restaurant for the very first time and first and foremost, I need to give a shout out to our server Brigitte, whose service was absolutely stellar.. So incredibly, kind, friendly as well as offering very professional service. The food was fantastic...More
Our Server tonight is Kim.. she’s a darling.. no pressure on taking orders and took care of us like she’s part of the family.. and the food is awesome., she even recommend what i should get and didn’t disappoint",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d12920798-Reviews-Atlas_Steak_Fish-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Au Comptoir,"Immediately after walking into this restaurant, we felt that we were in Paris with the beautiful decor and ambiance. For seating the restaurant had some booths. There were also bar stools around the ornate bar. However, as we were having a late lunch, we were...More
Just dropped in for lunch as we saw a table open walking by. Previous experience, over a year previous, did not bode well but, hey, it was lunch. Everything was really good. Service, food, prices. The next week we went with friends for dinner. Really,...More
Au is located in kitsilano neighborhood , well know for their cozy , trendy European French Bistro , so after helping my aunt for her grocery shopping for the holiday and I surprised her having dinner at the Au Comptoir , ( she love French...More
Pub Bistro Food at Inflated prices no reservations why bother when better alternatives around the city
I have loved all the meals I have had at Au Comptoir (AC) since I started eating there soon after it opened, some eight years ago, located conveniently, as it is, just off the corner of Vine & 4th. Last week I popped in for...More
Food was excellent but guest service experience ended up being very poor. I will not return because of this issue. This is a lively French bistro in our neighborhood that my husband and I were looking forward to going to for a nice date night...More
Au Comptoir — the French bistro on 4th Ave in Kits — is just the place to celebrate Macron’s Sunday victory over Le Pen. Ouf! It has French beer to raise a glass to the second-term French President, and, of course, many sumptuous French dishes...More
We read rave reviews of this place and since we love typical French bistro food we tried it on our Vancouver visit. This in spite of its no reservations policy, which we normally shun because we think it disrespects the customers. We were certainly not...More
I have enjoyed almost all of my visits to Au Comptoir, & I have been there frequently, with family, friends, clients and solo. I love the food, the service & the ambience. Once it was a little bit of a disappointment about a year ago,...More
This very special restaurant is open Wednesday to Sunday from 8 am till 9 pm and Friday & Saturday till 10 pm…Covid-19 restrictions are followed… having been to France many times, it is a delight to experience the French experience of fine food here in...More
We had a great lunch here last weekend. The food was amazing and the service was great. The drinks were really good too, I definitely recommend checking out this awesome little spot. The steak was delicious, and so was the soup! Can't wait to come...More
This was a truly excellent bistro on opening and for the first year or two. Today the service and food were mediocre and the red wine ($16 for a small glass) was served far too warm. I recommended it highly in the past to many...More
We arrived from a trip of a lifetime in Central America and came home to the Parisian comfort food we love to re-familiarize ourselves with western cuisine. Once again the kitchen here didn’t disappoint. We were waited on by our “hands down” favourite waiter and...More
Visiting with friends and wanted to finish the evening with a little dessert and coffee. Heard good things about this restaurant. Waited outside for about 15 minutes (around 8 PM) before getting in. Sat down and requested a dessert menu from the server who was...More
We went with our friends. Food was great and service was exceptional. great atmosphere. Make sure you try Tomatoes et coxcombs... so good!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7230688-Reviews-Au_Comptoir-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Au Petit Café,"Cant speak to the Phi but plenty around me were eating it. Au Petit Cafe is a small sit down joint close to 33rd. Friendly staff and $6 for a delicious sando. Thanks!
This is a small Vietnamese family run restaurant. It’s been around a long time! There’s always a line up especially on the weekends. Soup broth is tasty. Beef stew is like my mom’s. Meatball sub is fantastic. French bread is crispy on the outside and...More
I have been eating here at least twice per month for past 5 yrs. By far the best Vietnamese food in Vancouver. This place has never disappointed me. Excellent Bahn mi, curry stews, vermicelli bowl. It’s a quintessential hole in Th wall with excellent food.
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew au petit cafe . This place is hands down a hidden gem. Featuring some amazingly simple but tasty Vietnamese food, its no wonder this place is always packed and busy. The food is very good. My favourites are...More
The beef pho is the best I have had, soup is flavourful paired with delicious beef and beef balls. The lemongrass chicken with noodles was delicious with lots of fresh vegetables and variety too. Well priced and the coffee is really good. Fast and friendly...More
Long standing little place that makes great Vietnamese sandwiches. The original owner, the father, still makes the hot sauce for the place. Very busy on the weekends for lunch. Cash only and closes at 7pm
We tried this place last weekend and really liked the atmoshpere of the friendly staff and buzzing place. The pho was amazing, very flavorful and delicious. We also had the lemongrass chicken, which was good too. Be aware, they only take cash and they are...More
An family run and unassuming eatery located in Main Street and next to Long's Noodle House serves the best Vietnamese Sandwich. The bread roll is crusty and very nice. It also serves very nice Vietnamese style noodles and the stewed beef is excellent.
Nice small decent restaurant with basic decor. Had the beef stew in curry with noodles and an Vietnamese ice coffee. Not really that cheap but the quality of the food is good. Would drop by again with the family for a quick bite.
As expected, always got a line up for this pho restaurant. Despite its tiny shop layout, it's always packed. The food is great. We ordered two small bowls of beef pho and half an order of spring rolls with a cold Drip coffee and lemon...More
Was in a bit of a rush as mom and I missed lunch at noon-ish. Wanted something quick and could not sit down for late lunch. Decided on banh-mi sammy and shrimp salad roll. Thought it was quick, can eat on the run, sorta but...More
Many of friends kept on saying this restaurant since last year and we finally went there last week ! Honestly it's very disappointed, the coffee just normal and the foods so so and even my friend said their bread with curry is excellent, but that...More
im not sure why but i love the taste of the banh mi's here. we would sometimes drive just to grab one. food is great here, just don't like sitting in because its a small place. Take out is very fast!
After reading the reviews,we decided to pay a visit to try it out ourselves. surprise ,this store wasn,t run by any vietnamese.in facr, by cantonese. the food were just ok. a bit too pricey for what they were 4.30 for a Vietnam coffee,very small serve....More
The pho quality was up there with any in city I have had though msg content bit high and I was drinking water for hours after. I also had a sub which was totally enjoyable mix of sweet and spicy. much better than subway fare...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3265428-Reviews-Au_Petit_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Autostrada Osteria,"We had dinner here on a warm midweek evening in July. The service was friendly & attentive (almost too attentive) and the food was very good.
I used to love this restaurant, but after two recent visits I am less enamoured than before. The pasta was not that great--the stuffed pasta filling (veal and something else) was gooey; the rigatoni alla norma was heavy; the bolognese average. The salad had potential,...More
Amazing chef combined with excellent service. Consistently top notch on all levels. One of our favourite restaurants in Vancouver.
I do not wish to complain too much here, as the three of us enjoyed our appetizers and pasta dishes. All of the food was tasty and the service was good. However, the Bucatini dish that I ordered as an entree was the size of...More
We booked Autostrada for our first night in Vancouver and we are so happy we did! On entering you are hit with the smell of freshly grated parmegiano reggiano - what a way to get your mouth watering! We were seated immediately and our wonderful...More
MAGNIFICO. Waited far too long to eat at this splendid restaurant. The decor is simple and rustic. The vibe is casual yet fine. The food and its flavours subtly yet bursting with flavour. The service from Stephano was attentive professional and knowledgeable, with just the...More
The food is spectacular. The staff is spectacular. This is a local spot that we go to at least once a month. Great pasta. The bolognese is one of our faves but they are all delicious. The duck liver pate is to die for. The...More
didn't make reservation on Saturday night, but was able to find seatings along the bar. first time in this restaurant, food is awesome. I had the stuffed daily pasta with black truffle, absolutely amazing!
The food was excellent, right from appetizers through to dessert, and the wine selection was ideal for the menu. The service was great, providing just the right amount of information on the menu items to allow us to make the right decisions on what to...More
We had an amazing time here at Autostrada. The food is amazing here and the atmosphere is awesome. Definitely would recommend checking this place out, the service is incredible. Can't wait to come back here again.
The food was pretty good (not great) but there are problems here with the noise level (bordering on horrendous) which may be a function of Covid screening, but I suspect not as there appeared to be little in the way of soft surfaces to absorb...More
Not our first visit but first time to have the tasting menu. All 4 of us had it and we ate family style. We all thought the portions were small and we all came away hungry. Food was presented well and was tasty (a light...More
Visited Autostrada a couple of weeks ago and the food was fantastic. Better than many restaurants in Italy - and the bistro style, friendly staff and great kitchen make it a place to visit again and again. Had the Panzanella salad, focaccia, and seafood ravioli...More
Very busy place. We enjoyed the delicious octopus “salad “ for appetiser . Ordered a few dishes of different pastas with different sauces to share family style and enjoyed envy bit . Service staff were very friendly and helpful.
One of the few restaurants in my life where it smelt so great inside, like when you cook at home. The service was very nice. The wine was very good too. I ate a risotto that felt like a proper comfort food.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17348049-Reviews-Autostrada_Osteria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Autostrada Osteria - Main Street,"I was craving pasta and Googled Italian restaurants close to where my Aunt was staying. This one popped up and had good Google reviews, so we headed over. It wasn't too busy when we arrived, about half full which is pretty good for a neighborhood...More
This place is cozy and slightly cramped but that's about the only flip side. I am not a big Italian food fan and went there only because my wife loves pasta and other Italian food. The place is noticeably very vibrant and every one of...More
Loving the Vancouver food scene with lots of selection and variety. Never noticed this place and it’s a vibrant restaurant with great food! Started off with their duck liver and it’s fantastic. So decadent and creamy on top of the crostini and pickled beets. Ordered...More
My head is spinning. I cannot believe that we spent $200 to eat microwaved food. This restaurant has no kitchen. There is a warming kitchen for food prepared else where. The pasta had the classic dry feel of pasta that was reheated. Service was also...More
I went there more than once, as an Italian I can say that It's very good and the staff is very welcoming and friendly.
Atmosphere, staff, food, all fabulous. The protocols were in place and maintained thru out our meal. Lucy was absolutely wonderful. Friendly, knowledgeable, and you can tell she loves working here. The customer experience was top notch. We ordered so many menu items to mention and...More
This is my second time to dine in Autostrada. Nice, little place with simple but cute decor. Friendly servers, delicious food and reasonable prices! Their chicken liver is so smooth! From antipasti to desserts, good quality of food and decent portions. Parking on the street...More
Ordered ahead and picked up puttanesca with tuna/capers and garganelle with fennel sausage. The puttanesca was fantastic, beautiful flavours. The garganelle (?) was a little too on the oily side, was just fine. Overall, nicely done pastas, takeout handled well.
There are a number of recipes for success in the food industry. Many routes lead to culinary & financial achievement but most include the recognition, it seems to me, that one has to do one thing mainly & do it well. I had had this...More
We were in Vancouver for four nights and it was only the fourth night we could find a reservation opening at this popular spot. So pleased we persevered. It was a slower night and our server was utterly delightful. We ordered according to his recommendations...More
A very creative menu and perfectly prepared meals. Service is excellent and the room is warm and inviting. First class dining in a casual atmosphere.
We have been to Autostrada on Main Street a number of times and each time the food has been delicious. The chef and staff work out of a very small kitchen, but all the food comes out on time and all the ingredients are handled...More
The old adage that the customer is always right does not apply to this restaurant. We arrive on time for our reservation, our table is delayed because the diners arrived late for their earlier reservation. We are forced to wait 30 minutes standing up in...More
My first visit. The food menu is a bit limited but I am sure everyone can find something appealing. The wine list is a bit more expansive with some additional choices on the blackboard. The pasta itself was delicious. My sauce was also delicious but...More
Our first visit under the new name. Whilst the food was good, my wife and I didn’t think it quite as good previously experienced....under the former name.....not sure if the chef has changed or not. The service, on the other hand, could not have been...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13688340-Reviews-Autostrada_Osteria_Main_Street-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Axum,"My wife and I went to this hidden gem in Vancouver’s eastern downtown after reading rave reviews about it on trip advisor and open table. Needless to say this place lives up to the hype and expectation. We ordered kitfo (minced raw beef, marinated in...More
Truly a dining experience. This is the place if you want a new adventure. Not a fancy place but clean and friendly. Food is great,very tasty. BIG thing is you have to eat with your hands.There is no cutlery. Food is served on special bread,...More
Stumbled across this little restaurant wandering around one night. It was like an oasis in a sea of sketchiness of DTES. Great vegetarian comfort food with plenty of kick, friendly service, and live music. Couldn't ask for more.
Arrived for dinner with friends, there were already 5 tables seated, and no one had food. 20 min passed before one table got food. Then a table of 6 got up and left. Over the next 30 min only 2 more tables received food. Food...More
Visiting in Vancouver & feeling adventurous, we ate here tonite. Owner, Almaz was helpful in picking out dishes that were not too spicy or hot. It was all delicious! The injera bread was fresh, pungent & tasty. Such a nice diversion from the everyday offerings...More
Ordered the veggie combo which comes with 4 vegan curries served with injera. Huge portion was enough for two people. Delicious, healthy meal. Highly recommend.
Axum is the best Ethiopian restaurant in all of the lower mainland. The food is just so rich in taste-unlike any other places in Vancouver I’ve tried. The restaurant is very spacious with also lots of parking spaces which is a bonus! They have a...More
Axum Restaurant is a West African type restaurant in Vancouver. Most of the cuisine are Ethiopian. The restaurant has West African live music in Friday nights.
In East Van for the Culture Crawl, we headed for this supper at Axum. The decor is unpretentious and the food was good. Service was good.
Took my daughters and niece here for some very fine Ethiopian food. Had Awaze tibs, Doro Wot, Tikil Gomen, Miser Wot, Gomen and lots of Injera bread! Yummy stuff!
If you have not had Ethiopian food before, try this place. It is a surprisingly wonderful experience. Great food, wonderful service. And yes - location in no way reflects the quality of experience.
Super friendly staff. The online ordering through YP made ordering very simple. After going to pick up the food I as a little disappointed we were not eating in. The atmosphere looked great. We got the food home and loved the taste. We would definitely...More
I recently had the opportunity to attend an event catered by the friendly folks at Axum. This was my first foray into Ethiopian cuisine and I am happy to say that it will not be my last. The variety of dishes was outstanding as was...More
I co-worker recommended this place. I am so glad he did.My brother-in-law had the Awaze Tibs. My wife had the Yebeg Alicha Wat and I had the Doro Tibs hot. I tried my the two other items that were ordered both were good. Mine was...More
We had dinner after a long day. Just delicious. Tender meat. Perfectly spiced veggies. Smiling service. Reasonable price. And there was live music. My son played African drum in accompaniment.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1071230-Reviews-Axum-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
BC Kitchen,"Located at the JW Marriott, in the casino area the 24/7 pick up window can be found. Full menu and pleasant staff. Food was quick, hot and perfect for taking back to your room. Smashed burgers, cooked perfectly and fries were hot and crispy.
We enjoyed a very tasty butter chicken pizza with a beer. Many interesting items to choose from.Monica was so ,friendly and super service.
Stayed at the Parq Marriot and decided to try this place on a Saturday. Had a beer and a burger. Prices were great and everything was cooked to perfection. Came the next day to get the prime rib special with an Encore card. Meat was...More
Me and my family are visiting Vancouver for two days and in our hotel we found this place. My dad ordered one of the curry bowl and he enjoyed it very much. My mom and brother ordered the fish and chips were ok. I ordered...More
I had the turkey burger and my wife had the regular beef burger. Both were fresh and cooked properly. They were very tasty as well as the french fries. Way too much food to have desert though :). Rosty our waiter was friendly with a...More
Dear RussW146, Thank you so much for your excellent review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are happy you had an enjoyable dining experience, highlighted by the good humour provided by our team. A good laugh is always in the cards! We look forward...More
This was my second visit to BC Kitchen. Had the Sunday prime rib special which is $10 off for players club card holders. Well, I must say that it is great value, prime rib was cooked quite well and comes with a side of mash...More
We have had two great meals here before events at Rogers Arena and BC Place Stadium. Good food, friendly atmosphere and efficient staff.More
Dear Valued Guest, Thank you so much for your excellent review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are happy to know that your experience was enjoyable highlighted by the friendly service and good food. We look forward to welcoming you back again soon. Warmest...More
Had some really good burger and fries with the wife. Reasonable prices. Tzatziki was really good. Only issue is that you can only get burger well done. Think it is a Canadian thing but still really juicy and good. Service was great too.More
Dear billier137, Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are happy to know that you enjoyed the burger and fries, and the Tzatziki! We are always happy to customize and order to your satisfaction. Please do not hesitate to reach...More
Ah, the BC Kitchen! It took me a while to get around to this place, but could you blame me? My experience at “BC Kitchen 2 Go” (now re-named 24/7 Eats) just over a year ago was so underwhelming that I wasn’t feeling overly motivated...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience at BC Kitchen with us. We are happy to know that the service during your visit was friendly and prompt. We will take your valuable feedback into consideration about the various food items...More
Went there on Saturday night We were welcomed with a smile.. Great start and seated on comfy casual sofas. Had couple of drinks.. they were wonderful. Food yum.. pakora calamari nachos pizza all top notch and done well. Will definitely we back again.More
Dear cloud0926, Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are so happy to know that your dining experience was wonderful! It's always great to receive positive feedback on the service and food & drinks. We look forward to welcoming you...More
The service is excellent, they have a decent selection of beer and a lot of screens for the games. The food is quite good, the Buffalo Cauliflower is great and the sliders are good as well.More
Dear JDA60, Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. It's great to hear you received the excellent service we so strongly strive to achieve with each of our guests. We are happy to know you enjoyed the food, including the Buffalo...More
The BC Kitchen is a mix of pub and sports bar, they serve snacks, starters, finger food burgers and a few hot dishes. The place is spacious and modern, the staff is very polite and the food we ordered was of good quality. It is...More
Dear DrTM8, Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are happy to know you enjoyed the snacks, starters, burgers and entrées, and the service provided by our team. We look forward to welcoming you back to Parq Vancouver in the...More
Despite it clearly being a very busy night we received a warm friendly greeting and the bartender was very attentive, personable and took time to make some quality cocktails with. Decent bar fare and very fair prices. Nice decor and setting. A relaxed setting. Enjoy!
They have a good selection of food and beer. The food is really good for a hotel/casino. I eat there regularly.
Dear Hank3512, Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. We are happy to know you enjoyed the food and selection of beer. We look forward to welcoming you back in the near future! Warmest Regards, Emily Davis Community Relations
We had burgers, salad and fries. Our friends had many other food items. We had prosecco to celebrate our becoming Canadian Citizens. Great service.More
Dear JoelK382 Thank you for your review and your patronage at BC Kitchen. And thank you for celebrating your very special occasion with us - Congratulations! We are happy to hear you had an enjoyable experience. We look forward to welcoming you back in the...More",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12938982-Reviews-BC_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Babylon Cafe,"Two places next to each other, one for takeout, the other has a few inside tables. Additional seating on the sidewalk. Not fancy but good food. Got the mixed shawarma wrap, chicken shawarma wrap and the hummus and pita bread. All were delicious. We ate...More
First time with this dish and the lady cook made it spicy for me. So juicy it ran down my arms. Worth a visit if your in the neighborhood.
Amazing chicken shawarma poutine! Reasonable price and friendly staff, highly recommend this for a quick bite to eat.
Great location in English Bay. Saw the recomendation on You Tube to try this place out. They did not disappoint. I had the chicken shawarma plate and asked for extra crispy. Great portions and flavour. Recommend.
Highly recommended restaurant , food was perfect service was amazing, we had a great dine , all good ,you better tried it. Dont missed it out perfect for dine and takeway.😊
I wanted a quick bite on Christmas Day around 3pm after walking around and thought a chicken shawarma pita should hit the spot. I have been here before and it is usually good but not this time. The chicken was so dry. It was non...More
We were walking past this café and a lady outside was offering free tasting of the chicken meat. It was really good so we bought 2 chicken kebabs. They had lots of filling in them and good value for money. We went back the next...More
I always stop by with my kids fir shawarmas. The place is very small and unassuming but the shawarmas are delicious and cheap. Friendly staff too :) Best shawarmas in town!
Delicious falafel roll packed with tasty salad. The falafels were freshly cooked. Not many seats but you can take it down to English Bay and watch the sunset. Delicious chicken shawarma also.
Tried Lebanese/Mediterranean food in a few places in Vancouver but kept going back to this one! Not fancy - a hole in the wall place - can sit on the sidewalk if you wish - but they have amazing food! The next door place has...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew babylon cafe . Babylon Cafe is hands down my favourite place to get shwarma. And I've had a lot from many places. I've been a fan ever since they had a small hole in the wall booth that...More
Been here a few times, there are a few Mediterranean cafes along this block and this is one of the better ones. The chicken was well seasoned, nicely cooked and came with rice, greek salad, potato, tzatziki and pita bread. Portions are huge, always had...More
By far, the most un-sanitized restaurant I have been to. The chicken so under-cooked you could see the raw layer. The Shawarma was priced for $9.45 but he decided to charge me $12. The gentleman cleaned his hand with a dirty cloth that was used...More
its just regular donair kebab. and its busy as their location. i had food there for few times and there is nothing special .
Need to get to this place at least a few times each year - and we come all the way in from Surrey. Their Shawarma is the absolute best!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1077520-Reviews-Babylon_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bacchus Restaurant & Lounge,"Loved this restaurant! The ambience is very cozy and comfortable. The food was quite delicious starting with an amuse bouche, apps, entrees, dessert, and ending with petite fours. Our server (Whitney) was quite good and very attentive - can’t go wrong at this restaurant! They...More
We were on vacation at this hotel for a pre-cruise stay of 2 nights. We had dinner at the Bacchus and the only thing we can say is wow! The service was excellent and the food so fresh and delicious! We highly recommend this restaurant!
WOW WOW WOW …. What a beautiful experience! One of the loveliest fine dining experiences in Vancouver. Pianist playing in the background. Beautiful ambience. Great wine list. Food was outstanding. Service was excellent.
Old school classic fine dining spot for a very enjoyable dining experience with great food and service. Food: 4.5 Service: 5 Atmosphere: 4.5 Cost to worth it rating: 3 Opentableable: no, but via Tock Return worthiness: sure Eve awards: favorite waiter of our trip Highlights:...More
Lovely place for drinks in the evening. Live music, not too loud. Great cocktails. I enjoyed the Hemingway Daiquiri. Nice selection of wines/beer. Best service!
Dear suebK9935RZ, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus for drinks. I am pleased that you enjoyed the cocktails, service and live music. We hope to see you again soon. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Food and Beverage
Ive ordered a couple of appetizers and main course was duck. Absolutely loved the hotel and restaurant that had a live music...which was a very nice touch. Bar had more then a good variety of alcohol to choose from and the prices was not too...More
Dear sergepY1735SF, Thank you for visiting Bacchus, I am delighted that you enjoyed the selections on our bar and the live music. We hope to see you again soon. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Food and Beverage
We enjoyed our time at the bar with Jessie. We had a couple cocktails along with fish tacos and cobb salad before heading out on a tour. The bar and lounge are so pretty, warm, and welcoming. We also visited the lounge the following day...More
Dear J5867RHchristinew, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus, Scott and Jessie will be thrilled to read that you enjoyed their service. I am glad that you enjoyed the experience, and we hope to see you again very soon. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of...More
We came here for my birthday. It was the most amazing experience. Not only did we feel like we were the only two in the restaurant, but every morsel of food was outstanding. Tim, Whitney and Benito were superb. A truly magical experience. Highly recommended....More
Dear tracykL6418UH, Thank you for selecting Bacchus Restaurant to celebrate your birthday. Tim, Whitney and Benito will be pleased to hear that you enjoyed their service. I am delighted that you enjoyed the food and had a magical experience. Thank you for the recommendation and...More
Franklin was an excellent server! The food was excellent and they accommodated our very particular food restrictions.
Dear Lisa G, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus, I am delighted that you received excellent service from Franklin and enjoyed the food. We will look forward to your next visit. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Food and Beverage
Service great , beautiful place. Everyone is extremely nice . Would definitely come back again. The continental breakfast was part of room rate.
Dear Phil A, Thank you for visiting Bacchus Restaurant for Breakfast. I am delighted that you enjoyed the croissants and the service. We will look forward to your next visit! Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Food and Beverage
Dropped by Bacchus with my girl for some happy hour action, and gotta say, it was a pretty decent experience overall. The vibes and food were on point though, and the place had a killer atmosphere. But here's the deal-breaker: the staff had some major...More
Dear L6248LHjamesw, Thank you joining us at Bacchus Restaurant and Lounge, and for taking the time to share your feedback. Please accept our sincerest apologies for the frustrations you experienced with our service. The issues you have highlighted are of the utmost important to us,...More
Wonderful dinner and atmosphere. Lynn and Rachel were so attentive and kind. Highly recommend for a calm and delicious place. All of our food was delicious. I especially liked the vegetable dish of the day. The hamachi was also a yummy preparation. It’s so lovely...More
Dear DayTrip543934, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus, I am pleased to hear that you enjoyed a wonderful dinner! I will thank Lynn and Rachel for their attentive service and share your kind words with our kitchen team. We will look forward to your...More
Perfection. The food was the best I’ve ever had. The setting was beautiful. Our server Lynn was helpful, nice, attentive and her service was top notch. I would definitely come back here. We dressed up. We enjoy dressing nicely. This is a place you can...More
Dear Salish S, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus and for your kind words. I will thank Lynn for her attentive service and that the food was perfection! We will look forward to seeing you again very soon. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of...More
We have eaten here several times and have never been disappointed. The menu is creative, the has food has always been presented beautifully with impeccable service.
Dear George S, We appreciate your visits to Bacchus, and I am pleased to read that you appreciate the food and impeccable service. We hope to see you again in Bacchus. Warm Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Food and Beverage
Nice all around - went for breakfast. Manager was on top of his game. His staff did a great job serving but wished they could take a sec to pause n smile or acknowledge.More
Dear DowntownComfort, Thank you for your visit to Bacchus for breakfast, I am pleased that you enjoyed the service from the manager and his team and I will share your feedback. We will look forward to your next visit. Ward Regards, Edward Sweetman Director of...More",26,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d701775-Reviews-Bacchus_Restaurant_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Baci Ristorante,"Wow! We have been all over Burnaby and Vancouver trying new Italian places all the time! This was the BEST pasta ever! My husband had the halibut and was blown away! Amazing food, service and atmosphere!
Hi My name is Lara.I love the pizza.the staff are so kind.my dad love the lasagna my mom love the pasta my sister love the pizza to. Thanks
Thank you Lara for great review. hope to see you guys soon
Hi my name is lina. I loved my meal. I wanna go back as soon as possible. People were really gentle with our table. Marguerita pizza was amazing.
Hi Lina. Thank you for kind review, we look forward to see you soon
I was staying in Burnaby with my wife and parents-in-law, looking for a place to eat. Baci came up on a map search so we gave it a try. I'm so glad we did. It's on a busy street, but inside the ambience was quiet...More
We decided to try Bacci Ristorante before a PNE concert last Sunday and what a pleasant surprise! While the food was excellent, what really stood out was the remarkable customer service! Firstly, they accommodated our request for a time change. We arrived to see members...More
We felt like we were in Italy! This is a family owned restaurant and has been in the neighbourhood for over 30 years. The food is delicious with authentic Italian offerings. The staff were great. We arrived at 5:30 to a virtually empty restaurant, and...More
I finally had an oppurtunity to dine at Baci restaurant the other night . the food was outstanding from the appy to my main entre. What i did enjoy was the service from Bela, knowledgeable , professional and a good sense of humour . the...More
outstanding food, great service, nice wine list, great martinis. i will be back very soon. no need to go to downtown
Restaurant been open less around 30 years , well know for their Dinner and Dance in 70's , surprised they still open for business ! located in Burnaby Highs neighbourhood where so many good Italian restaurants around ! it is for a while since my...More
My friend wanted to come here for her birthday.  I haven’t been here for years.  Apparently, there is parking at the back but tight, otherwise there is free street parking.  We ordered the capresse salad-good sized, seafood risotto-not as creamy as I like.  My friend...More
We have been to Baci many times and never disappointed. The food is fabulous, music is great for dancing and the owner, Marino and his staff are fabulous. This time we had a wedding celebration with 40 people, they were so accommodating and couldn't do...More
Was here a couple of nights ago. The food was excellent but $11 for a glass of Chianti was a bit much. Hubby checked the bill when we got home and found we were charged $23 for my pizza instead of the midweek price of...More
Had a good dinner but for three beer and the dinner special that consisted of gnocchi with pesto sauce it cost 70.00 and that's because they automatically add 15 percent of your bill for the tip so you cant add your own tip
Four of us went for a celebratory Grad dinner Friday evening. Our server, Avalino, was excellent. Super friendly and efficient. Our meals were all different, and all delicious! We will be back.
Granted we were there for a Party for a friend and there was a number of us - which was well prepared for in advance. First time ever and sad to say it will be the last. Prearranged dishes had been ordered well in advance...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3699357-Reviews-Baci_Ristorante-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Bad Dog Bread,"While you think you want to avoid bread Bad Dog Bred makes that an impossibility. It is bar none my most favourite bakery in the entire lower mainland. Excellent bread using their own milked flour.
We were having a late lunch at Orto Artisan Pasta which is in the same building plex. We are never disappointed by the bread. This time we ordered the Seedy Bread which is just such a beautiful, tasty loaf of goodness. Yummy, tasty and oh...More
wonderful bread and pastries ,expensive, but good value for the cost. High quality ingredients make for great nutrition !
Multigrain was not cheap but worth every penny (all 900 of them for the round smaller loaf). Has coffee/expresso and many types of breads. Hard to find and a real hole in the wall place but authentic bread!
Been living in North Vancouver for 25 year and I have never found such amazing bread it's for everybody around but for all people across ocean visitors or local who are use to bread with amazing taste and hard crust. When you put fresh butter...More
There is nothing more enjoyable than home made, handmade bread. There guys and gals have it dialed in, and excel above any expectations of what you could have wanted. A real pleasure to do business with such an established quality establishment. Thank You
Serves some very nice lunch dishes but quantities are small and price is no longer in the 3-11 CA$ bracket. Most dishes are at CA$10 plus and mains are in the CA$15 range.
I was disappointed to find that Bad Dog is now JUST a bakery ( albeit an excellent one for breads!). I had planned to meet a friend there for coffee and when we got there we were surprised to find that they no longer offer...More
Wonderful North Shore find. Bad Dog Bakery sells fantastic artisan bread and the staff are amiable and attentive. There is a small cafe that sells good coffee and bread. Check it out.
The bread is to die for and the fresh buns ,specially on Sunday are magical, by the way , the restaurant is very good as well
I am somewhat reluctant to write a review for the Bad Dog Bread bakery. As it often happens, too many good reviews may result in an establishment getting so popular they're not able to keep up with growing demand. But I will take a chance...More
A bit hidden but worth to go. Artisan bakery. Finally place in Canada with tastefull bread. Friendly staff.
We stumbled upon this place while turning around to go to another restaurant. It looked much more inviting so we went in for a late lunch. Two had sandwiches and two had omelets. Both were excellent! Slices of bread and caramelized onion butter came with...More
Expensive, but fantastic bread. Can't really say more- it's just fantastic. Every kind is delicious.
Great selection of delicious freshly baked bread. I go on Sunday mornings and pick up bread that’s still warm!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d14002726-Reviews-Bad_Dog_Bread-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Baghdad Cafe,"For improvement, I wish if there was nice Arabic music that will create amazing atmosphere and vibes for Arabic visitors. We ordered chicken shawarma wraps and it was really fresh and delicious, I would come again to have it for sure!! clean place and clean...More
Since our 2019 visit here, things have changed a little at the Baghdad Cafe. There were not as many things to have included in the wraps (I missed not seeing their coleslaw as an option) but the basics were there. Seeing the marinated chicken being...More
The place is very small, but the Shawarma is incredible and the staff are so nice. Make you feel right at home and happy to answer any questions if you have never been there before. I go as often as I can! Great quality food,...More
Great price- quick informal- great healthy food I had the falafel wrap and my husband had chicken wrap- filling!!! Tv plays sports
Our chicken wraps were perfect: the chicken was shaved off the spit (not sliced) so it was really thin and flavorful. When we passed by at about 10 am, they weren't open but the spit was fully threaded with marinated chicken pieces that were beginning...More
The lady was nice, so was the elderly man. In fact, all staff were friendly. However, I found them a bit chatty, as in they were talking to each other which held up service time and i needed to be at a conference. The food...More
This cafe is on Seymour Street. Its well run and clean. The prices are very reasonable for Vancouver. Most meals are around $10 mark. There is an area to sit and eat. I had the Bagdad large salad bowl for under $7. It was great...More
The chicken shawarma plate is ample for dinner. My wife and I each got a plate with brown rice, houmus, pickled turnips, olives, tabouleh and chicken. It was a fresh, tasty, and nice spices. Service is at the counter. But, very nice and friendly. The...More
The food at this joint is quite good and tasty. The chicken shawarma combo is a family favorite. Service is good at the counter.
I had my dinner in the Baghdad Café. I ordered a dish with chicken Kebap and Rice. It was very good and also cheap. The server were very friendly. I can really recommend this place.
The chicken shawarma plate was very delicious and very reasonably priced. The server on the counter was very friendly and helpful. Great place for a takeway meal.
Saw this while heading back from Robson to our hotel and decided to check it out later for an early dinner. Though it looks fairly small, and most people do takeouts, it does offer several tables inside and while not fancy, it is a fine,...More
I was walking down the street and found this cafe. Went inside to check how the foods are, wasn't at all in a mood of swarma.. Found a middle eastern lamb curry plate, took one and got hooked into it for next three days for...More
Had dinner here the other night before our cruise. Don't let the inside fool you. While the décor is nothing fancy, the food and service are off the charts! Food is so fresh and authentic. Portions are huge and prices are decent! We will be...More
Saturday night, and we didn't really feel like cooking or spending too much money on dinner out, so we went to Baghdad Cafe. My dining partner is a lunch-time regular -- he loves the flavourful wraps, and the friendly service from the ladies behind the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4686470-Reviews-Baghdad_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bai Bua Thai Cuisine,"We were staying at a hotel up the street and ate here. The pad Thai was good and not as oily as the pad Thai I usually get at home. Would recommend.
Amazing food and service! Very reasonable prices for what you get! Highly recommend! Very clean and friendly!
Several of us came here based on someone’s previous visit. Overall, no major complaints. The Pad Thai noodles were on the mushy side, more like a blob of noodles. The spring rolls were good, not greasy and served temperature hot. The pineapple fried rice was...More
I was here for lunch on May31st(Sunday) and it wasn't our first choice. We were hoping to go to Laksa King it was closed. Thank God, Bai Bua was open for dining in. We ordered L2 Penang Curry Chicken ($10.90) and L16 Sukothai Noodle ($11.90)...More
Bai Bau Thai Cuisine is located on the East Hastings corridor near Nanaimo Street – near my former haunts. There’s nothing like finding a nice new Thai restaurant (well, new to me at least). We checked this place out in mid-August and started with a...More
I had been to Bai Bua, the first time, taking friends and was not particularly impressed as dishes were overly heavy in pepper and onion strips and not much meat in the balance. A neighbour then took me to Bai Bua, a second visit, years...More
It doesn't hurt for me to say that I fell in love with Thai food during my U.S. Air Force assignment during the Vietnam War at a Thai-controlled AFB NE of Bangkok. Fast-forward to now and our family of four vacationed throughout the Pacific Northwest...More
I had an Pad Thai it was very delicious. I recommend it to 100%. The prices are very low. No meal is over 15$
Went to Bai Bua with friends and between us we ordered quite a range of dishes. Everything was really fresh, and the flavours nice and strong. They even brought us nam plaa prik to go with our pad graprao (my favourite of all the dishes...More
Came here with party of 4 after we played hockey and service was A+. Food was prompt and delicious, place was extremely clean and prices were reasonable given the large portion sizes. Can't wait to come back to try lunch special combos. Highly recommended.
Delicious Panag/cashue chicken/ Pinnapple fried rice is awesome ans the sticky rice is also great. Highly recommend eating here, good value and not bougie. I have been a few times and never disappointed!
Went here with my extended family. 9 yrs to 83. Very quick service. This place has a vast menu of delicious items. Most of which are classified as Thai street food. Clever presentation and spiced to your liking. Service was spot on with the restaurant...More
My husband and I stopped in here for dinner before an event and had a fabulous meal. The staff are attentive, accommodating, and clearly like working there. The food was also very tasty! We had the papaya salad for an appetizer and it was perfect...More
We were in Vancouver for business, and decided to take a break from the hotel restaurants to go for some Thai food. I have spent a lot of time in Thailand, and really appreciate good, authentic Thai food. This was fairly close to where we...More
Excellent Thai food! I had the pad gra pao moo (pork) and asked for it very spicy. They obliged! I almost never get food spicy enough, and when they prepare it really well and authentically to boot, it makes me very happy. The service is...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12829465-Reviews-Bai_Bua_Thai_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Balkan House,"The food was good. The timing was way off. 40 MIn. to get any bread then meal,salad and bread came all at once. They need to go to a school to learn the timing of the meal. Bread with your drinks, Soup or Salad next...More
Terrible experience!! Booked an event for 50 people and chose tge option buffet. My quests were not asked if they want coffee/drinks or deserts!! I was not aware of this because I did not need anything extra and because I was too busy dealing with...More
They been in these location since 2001 , it is Mediterranean style cuisine , not your 5 star restaurant , scuzzy area , it is a long time since my last visit ,few years less , mum love their Sunday Buffet , due to the...More
The last time we visited Balkan House it was situated on Renfrew across from the PNE (20years ago!). I then thought the food was very tasty and affordable. Nothing has changed...large helpings (we shared) tasty southeast Mediterranean cooking. The venue in Burnaby is a bit...More
I do not see many recent reviews and many of the past reviews are somewhat negative. If you are looking for a fancy downtown restaurant, this is not for you. This is and traditional European style Guesthouse/ Gasthaus that you would see in any small...More
You cannot beat the value given to you here (huge portions for a very reasonable price)! Service is very fast and seats and table are very roomy and comfortable. The only negative of this restaurant is that it's obvious that none of the profits are...More
After several years of driving by this place on Edmond’s street we decided to give it a try. We tried the pork schnitzel with mushroom sauce and the special schnitzel which is stuffed with cheese (very rich). Both dishes came with rice and potatoes, Greek...More
Wide variety of Balkan meat with delicious dessert. Nice staff and atmosphere. Its one of the best Eastern European restaurants in Canada.
If you’re going for the first time it is difficult to find as the signs are not lit up and in fact the large sign on the post is broken. We tried Balkan House for the first time last night. There is a parking lot...More
Just went there last night. The weather is getting cooler at night and you feel hungry for meat and real meat! Here they have lots to choose, from veal to chicken to lamb chops to pork, all very tempting! I’m gonna try out different ones...More
Have to give great credit to this place.Fast friendly waiter and waitress . Very polite and hospitable. The food looked good and was even better in my stomach...very tasty 😋 definetly a going back for more soon.......thank you Balkan house...
We arrived with10 people and received friendly service,Interesting food including a huge meat platter with fresh baked bread and the most amazing cheese cake.We will go back again.
4 for dinner on a Saturday with a reservation. Nicely separated seating arrangement, friendly service. Ordered the Chicken and Veal Schnitzel in mushroom sauce and the Veal Cordon Bleu. Dishes came with a small greek salad, rice, garlic mashed potatoes and fresh bread. The quantity...More
We loved both the beef soup and the meat platter. This not a fancy restaurant, but service is friendly, fast, and food is good.
Great food!!! German food done exceptionally. Mid priced. Bruch on Sunday offering a great array of German foods.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d1728087-Reviews-Balkan_House-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Ballyhoo Public House,"Drinks were fine, pub food was good but waitress didn't mention that when i asked to pay for everyone's meal she added a service fee. I have no issue with auto service fees but most restaurants inform you prior to paying. Ended up giving 2...More
Enjoyed a meal here. Pizzas were good as were the drinks. My friend was pretty certain he left his cap there and returned a few days later. They had a drink whilst waiting for the barman to check. After 30 mins they reminded him and...More
Food, service, and drinks were good. Atmosphere was terrible. Music and audio from basketball game drove us to eat on the patio as the volume was WAY too loud. Even on the patio it was loud. Whoever had control of the audio must have been...More
We were staying in a hotel nearby and were too late for the in-hotel restaurant, but the hotel staff recommended we visit the Ballyhoo for a late night snack. It was perfect, the menu has great options and the food was delicious. We liked the...More
Hi there, Thank you so much for the great review! We're happy we were able to provide what you were looking for, and look forward to hosting you again the next time you're in the city. Cheers!
Went here about 5 times on our stay in Vancouver, mainly for a pre dinner or after dinner drink. Great atmosphere, great staff and a great selection of beer. Well worth a visit
Thanks so much for leaving us a review! We're glad to hear you enjoyed your pre and post-dinner visits. Hopefully, we'll get to host you again if you're back in the city. Cheers,
We had a great time dining here. The food is good and the drinks were great. Definitely would come back here again soon. The kimchi grilled cheese was so good.
Hi Wilson, thank you for coming in and leaving us a review! We're happy to hear you enjoyed your time at Ballyhoo. Hope to see you again soon.
Really a bar not pub as advertized. - very noisy. but the tood & service were excellent. Worth a visit.
Thank you for coming in! We are glad to hear you enjoyed your time at Ballyhoo. We hope to host you again soon. Cheers,
One of the best experiences I had dinning in downtown Vancouver. Allot of restaurants just care about money fast rude service however this place felt fun and staff were welcoming and friendly. Ty
Hi Ty! Thank you for taking the time to leave us this kind review! We hope to host you again on your next visit downtown.
we called in before going to the cinema opposite and got a table OK. We had beer and pizza, both of which were just about OK ish. Nothing to write hone about but did the job
This is a Great relaxed establishment. Their food and staff were fantastic. They seated us as soon as we arrived. Many lo als were coming in to enjoy the space too.THANK YOU for helping travelers to your city.
Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us this great review! We really appreciate it. We look forward to hosting you again. We hope you enjoy your time here in Vancouver.
This was near where we were staying , so went here for something to eat.we shared chicken wings a burger and fries. Both delicious and freshly cooked and generous portions. Prices reasonable for area . Pleasant service .
Stopped in for a nightcap. Good selection of cocktails etc. Wine not so much. Friendly service but much too loud! Overall, nothing special except the noise level.
Best to go here during happy hour because outside of that the prices for a glass of wine are very high! We were shocked to be charged $20 for a 9 oz glass and $14 for a 6 oz glass of white house wine. Guess...More
Nice pub, good food, good service! Stopped for late breakfast. Food was nicely presented and tasted great.
popped in for a cocktail before going off to eat. A noisy and lively place that was great fun. We managed to get a seat in a busy room and found the staff friendly and pleasant .Not the place for a quiet drink or conversation...More",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17803127-Reviews-Ballyhoo_Public_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Banana Leaf Malaysian Cuisine,"Food is good, although rather heavy for an Asian cuisine. The apparent owner was not very friendly and with a hasty approach. Maybe it is common in Canada, but bringing the check without having asked for it is rather rude in many other places. A...More
Food is good, although rather heavy for an Asian cuisine. The apparent owner was not very friendly and with a hasty approach. Maybe it is common in Canada, but bringing the check without having asked for it is rather rude in many other places. A...More
I went here four times while visiting and every meal was 10/10. I'd planned to visit other places in the area but stumbled across Banana Leaf on my first night in town and I couldn't go past it. Great food, large servings, excellent prices, and...More
I went here four times while visiting and every meal was 10/10. I'd planned to visit other places in the area but stumbled across Banana Leaf on my first night in town and I couldn't go past it. Great food, large servings, excellent prices, and...More
We happened on this restaurant by chance, feeling a bit fragile after a long flight from the UK. We had only one starter and one main between us but the service couldn’t have been friendlier. The Rendang beef curry was melt in the mouth and...More
We happened on this restaurant by chance, feeling a bit fragile after a long flight from the UK. We had only one starter and one main between us but the service couldn’t have been friendlier. The Rendang beef curry was melt in the mouth and...More
We had dinner at the Robson St branch of this restaurant chain. Excellent food and reasonable pricing.
We had dinner at the Robson St branch of this restaurant chain. Excellent food and reasonable pricing.
The food, the service, the ambiance was fabulous! We were seated upstairs with a ceiling full of mini lights! Our Server James was so helpful in advising us on our food choices and amounts. We ordered Tom Yum Soup, beware the HOT Thai Chili’s &...More
The food, the service, the ambiance was fabulous! We were seated upstairs with a ceiling full of mini lights! Our Server James was so helpful in advising us on our food choices and amounts. We ordered Tom Yum Soup, beware the HOT Thai Chili’s &...More
We enjoyed our meal hear so much we came back a second time for happy hour. No fuss, good service, quite clean, well spaced out restaurant. Back home in Australia we eat a lot of Malaysian food so I was apprehensive at first. However the...More
We enjoyed our meal hear so much we came back a second time for happy hour. No fuss, good service, quite clean, well spaced out restaurant. Back home in Australia we eat a lot of Malaysian food so I was apprehensive at first. However the...More
Stopped into Banana Leaf on a rainy Thursday afternoon, and got a nice surprise! We ordered the 7-course tasting menu, which includes these dishes: Green Asian Salad Roti Canai Satay Chicken Gulai Fish Fillet Sambal Green Beans Rendang Beef Curry Served with Jasmine Rice Pandan...More
Stopped into Banana Leaf on a rainy Thursday afternoon, and got a nice surprise! We ordered the 7-course tasting menu, which includes these dishes: Green Asian Salad Roti Canai Satay Chicken Gulai Fish Fillet Sambal Green Beans Rendang Beef Curry Served with Jasmine Rice Pandan...More
This place is amazing. The food is delicious and surprisingly affordable thanks to the daily specials and happy hour. The staff are friendly, cheerful and efficient. No faults.
This place is amazing. The food is delicious and surprisingly affordable thanks to the daily specials and happy hour. The staff are friendly, cheerful and efficient. No faults.
This is the third time I’ve eaten here. It’s always been extremely good for both the food, and the service. Also a good value. I’ll definitely be back.
This is the third time I’ve eaten here. It’s always been extremely good for both the food, and the service. Also a good value. I’ll definitely be back.
Great food, Great staff, we had the lunch menu was well priced for a city. We just dropped off our hire bikes and stubbled upon this Malaysian restaurant.
Great food, Great staff, we had the lunch menu was well priced for a city. We just dropped off our hire bikes and stubbled upon this Malaysian restaurant.
Didn't book but the waiter fitted us in within 15 minutes. Service was really friendly and attentive and food came out super fast. When it did arrive it was also of superb quality. It's a very unassuming restaurant but one I would recommend. Probably worth...More
Didn't book but the waiter fitted us in within 15 minutes. Service was really friendly and attentive and food came out super fast. When it did arrive it was also of superb quality. It's a very unassuming restaurant but one I would recommend. Probably worth...More
Their nasi forent is awesome. Flavourful and spicy. The papaya and pineapple salad was served a peak freshness. A great exotic meal.
Their nasi forent is awesome. Flavourful and spicy. The papaya and pineapple salad was served a peak freshness. A great exotic meal.
Have eaten at Banana Leaf at other sites and this one is very beautiful and the food is great. We did the tasting menu and really enjoyed the variety of dishes. Service was very attentive.
Have eaten at Banana Leaf at other sites and this one is very beautiful and the food is great. We did the tasting menu and really enjoyed the variety of dishes. Service was very attentive.
Excellent GF selections notated in the menu and they are eager to adapt many of their other dishes. Super service, very friendly wait staff, excellent, delicious fare. A terrific and unusual find on Robson St, Vancouver's West End.
Excellent GF selections notated in the menu and they are eager to adapt many of their other dishes. Super service, very friendly wait staff, excellent, delicious fare. A terrific and unusual find on Robson St, Vancouver's West End.
Food was delicious. We had the short ribs and the beef randang and the roti which was fabulous! The staff were very attentive, warm and welcoming, without being overbearing, The drinks, both alcoholic and non-alcoholic were excellent.
Food was delicious. We had the short ribs and the beef randang and the roti which was fabulous! The staff were very attentive, warm and welcoming, without being overbearing, The drinks, both alcoholic and non-alcoholic were excellent.
We’ve been searching for Malaysian food for nine months. Seattle’s “best” was utterly disappointing. Banana Leaf hit it out of the ball park — totally delicious: a distinct blend of Indian Thai Chinese flavors but not a generic mix. We opted for the nine course...More
We’ve been searching for Malaysian food for nine months. Seattle’s “best” was utterly disappointing. Banana Leaf hit it out of the ball park — totally delicious: a distinct blend of Indian Thai Chinese flavors but not a generic mix. We opted for the nine course...More
Thank you for the outstanding 5-star review! We really appreciate you taking the time to share your rating with us. We look forward to seeing you again soon.
Thank you for the outstanding 5-star review! We really appreciate you taking the time to share your rating with us. We look forward to seeing you again soon.
My wife and I enjoyed a delicious lunch here near our hotel. The service was excellent and prices were quite reasonable.
My wife and I enjoyed a delicious lunch here near our hotel. The service was excellent and prices were quite reasonable.
Thank you so much for your 5-star review! We really appreciate you taking the time to share your rating with us. We look forward to seeing you again soon.
Thank you so much for your 5-star review! We really appreciate you taking the time to share your rating with us. We look forward to seeing you again soon.
Whoa...we haven't been here for many years. Decided to try it during the Vancouver Dine Out festival. We had the 9 course set menu and started with a tasty lichee mojito. The beef skewers were good but I got the tough part of meat. I...More
Whoa...we haven't been here for many years. Decided to try it during the Vancouver Dine Out festival. We had the 9 course set menu and started with a tasty lichee mojito. The beef skewers were good but I got the tough part of meat. I...More
We came across this restaurant on Robson Street by chance and thought it was great. It was our first time eating Malaysian food. We particularly enjoyed the eggplant fries, green papaya mango kerabu, tom yum goong soup, mee goreng and singapore laksa. The service was...More
We came across this restaurant on Robson Street by chance and thought it was great. It was our first time eating Malaysian food. We particularly enjoyed the eggplant fries, green papaya mango kerabu, tom yum goong soup, mee goreng and singapore laksa. The service was...More
Thank you for the outstanding 5-star review! Your kind words truly inspire our team to keep up the amazing work. We can't wait to see you again soon!
Thank you for the outstanding 5-star review! Your kind words truly inspire our team to keep up the amazing work. We can't wait to see you again soon!
We had two mains; tiger prawns mango chili with basil and rendang beef curry; both were excellent. Both were very generous servings, no need for desert, for us anyway.
We had two mains; tiger prawns mango chili with basil and rendang beef curry; both were excellent. Both were very generous servings, no need for desert, for us anyway.
Happened upon this place and decided to take out the lamb stew with rice. Big mistake. The rice was refrigerated cold and hard. Like they had just pulled it out of the fridge. The lamb “stew” was a soup with grease floating on top. Not...More
Happened upon this place and decided to take out the lamb stew with rice. Big mistake. The rice was refrigerated cold and hard. Like they had just pulled it out of the fridge. The lamb “stew” was a soup with grease floating on top. Not...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are sorry to hear that you did not enjoy your experience at Banana Leaf. We will make sure this feedback will passed along to our kitchen team.
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are sorry to hear that you did not enjoy your experience at Banana Leaf. We will make sure this feedback will passed along to our kitchen team.
I have been a long -term customer 0f Banana Leaf on Broadway, near Macdonald, as I both like Malaysian food & their food in particular. The service there was often not great but good enough. The Davie street location was very different tonight. My server...More
I have been a long -term customer 0f Banana Leaf on Broadway, near Macdonald, as I both like Malaysian food & their food in particular. The service there was often not great but good enough. The Davie street location was very different tonight. My server...More
It is the most awful restaurant in the city. You will pay a lot with your health and money for the awful food the give. The worst food, no taste, no quality, awful service and I got sick right after them with throughing out all...More
It is the most awful restaurant in the city. You will pay a lot with your health and money for the awful food the give. The worst food, no taste, no quality, awful service and I got sick right after them with throughing out all...More
My family and I went to this restaurant for dinner after reaching Vancouver on 06/08 afternoon. Being a born & bred Singaporean, but currently living in Holland with some disappointments on the proclaimed 'real' Malaysian/Singaporean food in some restaurants there, honestly speaking, I have my...More
My family and I went to this restaurant for dinner after reaching Vancouver on 06/08 afternoon. Being a born & bred Singaporean, but currently living in Holland with some disappointments on the proclaimed 'real' Malaysian/Singaporean food in some restaurants there, honestly speaking, I have my...More
The Banana Leaf is our family favourite restaurant when we visit Vancouver. It’s my (teen and tween) kids’ all-time-favourite-anywhere restaurant (they’re pretty adventurous eaters). Everything we ordered was fresh, flavourful and perfect. We also had excellent, attentive service. It’s really hard to choose what to...More
The Banana Leaf is our family favourite restaurant when we visit Vancouver. It’s my (teen and tween) kids’ all-time-favourite-anywhere restaurant (they’re pretty adventurous eaters). Everything we ordered was fresh, flavourful and perfect. We also had excellent, attentive service. It’s really hard to choose what to...More
Excellent food. Carl our server's recommendations were great. Everyone enjoyed especially the beef rending.
Excellent food. Carl our server's recommendations were great. Everyone enjoyed especially the beef rending.
My sister in law brought us over there as this is her favorite spot...I now know why ! OMG the food is delicious portions are fair . We ordered too much food .....When ever I go back to BC I will have to go there...More
My sister in law brought us over there as this is her favorite spot...I now know why ! OMG the food is delicious portions are fair . We ordered too much food .....When ever I go back to BC I will have to go there...More
We followed our friend's recommendation to eat here and we were not disappointed. It was the best Hainanese Chicken I have eaten. The boneless chicken had a lot of flavours. The dipping sauces were great. We made the right decision to order the special Hainanese...More
We followed our friend's recommendation to eat here and we were not disappointed. It was the best Hainanese Chicken I have eaten. The boneless chicken had a lot of flavours. The dipping sauces were great. We made the right decision to order the special Hainanese...More
We lived in the Malay world for some time - Singapore, Brunei - so are very familiar with the cuisine of these countries which is very similar to Malaysia. We had one of a number of lunch specials...all well priced at about $13 - I...More
We lived in the Malay world for some time - Singapore, Brunei - so are very familiar with the cuisine of these countries which is very similar to Malaysia. We had one of a number of lunch specials...all well priced at about $13 - I...More
Great place in the heart of the City. Fast and friendly service, at an affordable price. I would recommend this restaurant to any downtown worker or passing tourist.
Great place in the heart of the City. Fast and friendly service, at an affordable price. I would recommend this restaurant to any downtown worker or passing tourist.",68,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3635022-Reviews-Banana_Leaf_Malaysian_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Banana Leaf in Kitsilano,"i had high expectations of this place seeing some reviews but was a bit disappointed. The food was not nearly as good as i hoped and it was pricey for what it is... $24 for Beef curry (they ran out of lamb) and it doesn't...More
It is for a while since our brother and sisters got together for dinner , I also been away in Dec , I can say it is later Xmas and New Year dinner , my sisters choose the Banana Leaf in Kitsilano location , close...More
It's been a number of years since I've eaten here, but by chance we've eaten here twice now in the past couple of months and both times were great culinary experiences despite having two toddlers with multiple food allergies (wheat, dairy, egg, cashews). Both times...More
My wife and tried some of their happy hour items to compare with their other Broadway location. Baba's chicken wings were not as well seasoned. Eggplant fries and Calamari were under fried. Both came up a bit soggy. The Assam curry scallops were great -...More
Six of us at 7 pm on Thursday. Half-filled. People must have been away for the Labour Dsy weekend already. Our server was great. Food was delicious and all consumed. We got satay lamb, chicken and beef, roti canai, lettuce wrap, sambal green beans, char...More
We decided to go here because they could seat more than 10 people. This restaurant was bigger than the other broadway location. The food here however, was not as good as the other restaurant but the service and atmosphere was excellent.
Visited with a large group, great choices definitely not disappointed and would return next time back in Kits. Lived up to expectations for genuine Malaysian cuisine.
This is a casual eatery that offers a range of Malaysian cuisine. The food was very good, service very accommodating and prices very affordable. If you are in the mood for some Malaysian dining, a good place to check out.
We checked online and the restaurant said it was open until 10pm, when we got in it was 9:15 and the guy at the front said we have 10 minutes to order and that we had to leave by 10pm (not very hospitable if you...More
I can’t speak to the authenticity of the food here, but boy is it delicious. We were here with a rather large family group and got excellent service. We ordered a wide range of dishes and loved them all. Even the spiciest ones had a...More
The place was not busy as we thought. We had a table right way but the food came to us a bit longer than I thought. Anyway, this was my first time ate Malaysian food.
Fresh cooked, interesting & very tasty food. Great atmosphere, cool staff and ambiance. Very interesting menu, from light bites to feasts. Had a great lunch here – superb!
We came back for more, our last visit was a year ago...like it then, loved it even more. Hot & Sour soup is very hearty, Appetizer Sampler a good way to experience a vast variety. KungPow (sp?) excellent, Hookiem Noodles nicely done, Radang Beef deep...More
Our daughter in law and son took us there for a birtday dinner. The atmosphere is war, friendly and quiet, the service is great and the food is excellent. The price is reasonable and we have found that the dishes are consistently excellent. I would...More
We often stay in Vancouver and almost always visit the Banana Leaf for an evening meal. The staff are friendly, the food is marvellous and the price is right. All the dishes we have tried are flavourful and the quantity is such that sometimes we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1441313-Reviews-Banana_Leaf_in_Kitsilano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Banana Leaf on Davie,"I have been to Davie Village before and wanted to try something new. I could smell this restaurant and knew I would want to try it out. I walked up and down the neighborhood and came back to Banana Leaf. The special was ribs and...More
Famous malaysian chain it is. Had our dinner. Gives good amount in dish. So plz order wisely. I liked there nasi gorang a lot and didnt like pineapple rice. price wise it is a $$ restaurant.
I love Malaysian food and was excited to see this restaurant. The drinks - cocktail (The Empress one), tea (lemongrass ginger tea) and the teh tarik were excellent. I enjoyed the eggplant fries. The roti was OK, but could have been flakier and I didn't...More
We arrived a little past lunch, but they still allowed us to order lunch specials. The food was tasty and excellent. Really a gem in Davie St.
The staff here were lovely and service was attentive and friendly. However we were very disappointed with the quality of the food. The roti was undercooked and I had to pick out the raw bits from the middle. Our main courses were certainly plentiful but...More
We really liked this place. Doesn't look much from outside, don't let that put you off, quite smart inside. Busy and popular with locals, lots of carry outs. Roti Canai to start (a cross between bread/pancake/omelette, stuffed), followed by Spicy Veg and Check Curry. Very...More
Came to this restaurant with friends from work after a conference nearby. Impressed with the separation of each tables with plexiglass dividers that made us feel safe and felt like a private booth. Portions are large and plenty of authentic Malaysia options on the menu....More
While I can't complain about quantity, there was serious lack of quality in all four dishes we ordered. Basically, the spicing ranged from mediocre to non-existent. The Veg spring rolls were deep fried so much that the various vegetables (I'm assuming a lot here in...More
Whenever my partner and I find ourselves in Vancouver, we make it a point to patronize the Banana Leaf. With its unique flavours, authentic taste and exceptional value, it’s become one of our “go to” establishments in the city. We typically visit the location on...More
Lovely restaurant, good food and very plentiful. Rice comes to you wrapped in a banana leaf. Portion size large so took a box for the next day. Great value for money. And good beer!
very good Malaysian-Chinese fusion restaurant in Vancouver downtown on busy Davie street. We liked their food. We ordered Nasi Goreng, Mei Goreng noodles, kung pao chicken (it was delicious). We did not like their appetizer: chicken satay skewers. Some street parking can be found.
Take out orders are easy to place. The phone orders are taken promptly and efficiently. The lobster tails are excellent while the sable fish and okra dishes are above average. The single rice portion is rather small. Orders are ready at the estimated time.
Visited Banana Leaf on David for lunch in August 2021. Lunch was available until 3 PM, and I opted for rendang beef curry with rice and vegetables. Good volume, tasty, quick service, and reasonably priced. Overall good experience for solo lunch. Their dinner is good...More
First time trying Malaysian food & this restaurant is a great place for it. Lots of options. All the dishes we ordered were delicious.
The food was really really really bad. We ordered several nasi goreng portions. Nasi Goren is a family favorite which we have been eating for many years from restaurants all over the world. What we were served here is NOT nasi goreng, but rather a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2054985-Reviews-Banana_Leaf_on_Davie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bangkok City Cafe,"Only had delivered. As I said, it was excellent 4 out of 5 times. Last one so bad will not try again.
I live in Kitsilano. And have been going to Bangkok City Cafe for a few years now. Always good quality food, reasonable rates, and great staff. Customer service is great. This is a very small restaurant, and is always full... A must to go to!
Had an amazing dining experience here. The food is excellent and the staff are soooo friendly. I highly recommend checking this place out for amazing food. I can't wait to come back again!
We learned about this great spot t hrough a neighbour and were so impressed. It's cosy with a lovely ambiance and great food and service. Definitely worth a visit.
Very small place on the north side of West 4th Avenue. Stopped there for lunch and only one other table occupied. There was nobody at the counter when we arrived. Eventually, someone came out and we took a seat. Decided to order from the lunch...More
The dining room is TINY so we often pick up our order. It’s consistently delicious. Very authentic. It’s the family touch, as this is truly a family owned and operated restaurant. Best peanut sauce, ever. When you ask for spicy you will get SPICY.
Small place, very friendly staff, quick, efficient service, but the main thing is the food, just wonderful, and so reasonably priced. The panang curry is to die for, the pad see-iw was great, and the bbq chicken too. And for four hungry people, with appetisers...More
I was in the area for work and went to the local knitting store (Wet Coast Wools) just doors down from this place and there was a group of people at a sit and knit. All of a sudden the aromas of Pad Thai came...More
I arrived just a few minutes after the doors opened for the day and was the first customer. I ordered the pad thai for lunch, a nice and tasty dish which arrived piping hot and in a timely manner. There appears to be no issues...More
The CO and I found this hidden gem, no other word for it. A small family run enterprise,very friendly and top quality food. It has only 8 tables,so you may have wait,we were fine. It also does takeaways and the locals clearly use it and...More
Had an amazingly delicious lunch here. Fantastic spring rolls, soups, pad Thai, pad see ew. There is clearly love and care in this place from the gracious service to the delicious food made with quality ingredients. We look forward to returning and highly recommend.
Great lunch spot with great specials. Their curries are great. The cashew chicken could use more flavor and spice.
Great food and super friendly staff and management! Small restaurant though so arrive early or be prepared to wait.
Small but charming Thai restaurant on 4th avenue. I believe it is a family owned restaurant, or behaves like one, they are very friendly and welcoming. The food was delicious and served quickly. The menu features traditional Thai food, very similar to what you can...More
Great place, delicious food! Loved the cozy, personal atmosphere and very friendly service. Prices were very reasonable.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3579377-Reviews-Bangkok_City_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Banzai Sushi House Ltd,"We ordered take-out sushis for the familiy. The service was fast and friendly (cash only). The sushis were tasty. However, the sushis were too big and hard to eat. We could not eat them without breaking them.
I think the ""House Roll"" is named because it is proverbially, as big as a house! It's huge with sliced of the roll being about 4.5"" in diameter. It takes about six bites to consume it. The amount of sushi/maki you'll get here is usually...More
Best sushi joint in the lower mainland. Massive portions, good quality and service. They only take cash so plan ahead. I try to make a habit of getting there when I fly into yvr. Also the proprietor does a good job of COVID-19 mitigation’s.
i love to eat here. the food is delicious; fresh and the most important is reasonable price. The staffs are friendly and quickly fill my tea. Highly recommend for family; friend, couple especial tourist who come to BC and want to discover foods in this...More
First impression the place is expensive and then you see the service and pieces of each sushi piece and you suddenly value the entire experience. we ordered a 34 piece platter and barely finished 20 pieces between the 2 of us. We normally go through...More
Dishes are huge but fresh and taste good at the same time. Highly recommended for family and students
I had been their customer for a long time. Before the food is not perfect, but the cp value is good. Now, it has been changed. I will not discuss their poor service, I was never expect for that. But for row seafood, fresh is...More
If you don't know what to order and want value, do the party tray. $25 is enough for 4 people with leftovers. There are various sizes and kinds, all are large pieces, tasty and served quickly. This place doesn't go for style or looks, but...More
...and the wait for a table. I always go to this little hole in the wall when we're in Canada. I could care less about fancy authentic (and expensive) sushi. I just want moderately good, super-sized portions, with decent prices and fast, adequate service. The...More
You will be fed here! Excellent quality fast and delicious. Tremedous value here, the futomaki was the best I have had.
I tried this off the beaten path restaurant following the advice of a friend, and I was not disappointed. Largest pieces of sushi I have ever seen and very modestly priced
I always have such a difficult time ordering Japanese. I finally decided upon the Maki Roll for just over $11. Banzai Sushi offers larger portions than most other Japanese restaurants in metro Vancouver. Parking is always such a challenge, especially in this part of downtown...More
Cash only??? We should have walked away seeing this sign posted as you walk in. They have no accountability! Everyone would do chargebacks. We know good sushi and this was the worst sushi we have ever experienced, anywhere in Richmond, Vancouver, or USA. We have...More
We went as a family of five. The food is of reasonable quality and tastes fresh. Prices are also competitive if not a bargain. However the meal/sushi sizes are *huge*. It's nice getting value for money but if we go out for Sushi we like...More
I am a longtime regular customer. Banzai is known for generous portions and this why I regularly order take-out here. Unfortunately, the portions are constantly getting smaller and smaller. It's to the point where it is no longer filling. Banzai needs to ensure portions are...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4853808-Reviews-Banzai_Sushi_House_Ltd-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Bao Bei Chinese Brasserie,"Great find in Chinatown. It's sort of legendary, which makes me wary, but it lives up to the hype. The owners were happy to reseat us after we were stuck next to a really overbearing guest, which we are grateful for. And the potstickers and...More
For the members of my family who are vegetarian they loved it. For me a meat eater not overly keen on spice not so much. The chicken wings were great but tbh there wasn’t much else that took my fancy on the menu. However the...More
We went there pretty late in the night and loved the food. Not an authentic Chinese restaurant as the menu is tweeked a bit every week but we did enjoy what was served there. Quite difficult to get seating as the restaurant is pretty small...More
Opted to sample their menu based on TA reviews. Did not disappoint w/ eclectic choice of ingredients & creative cooking/sauce. While many of the ingredients were traditional Chinese, the chef took a very creative yet incredibly flavorful approach. Button mushroom, for example, tasted better than...More
We had a delicious meal choosing a varied selection of vegetarian dishes that went together very well! Great ambience and vibe.
Very tasty and high quality food, small dishes - Perfect size for sharing when dining as a couble. One dish from every category showed to be exactly what we needed.
Please be aware that the Shan Tofu is spicy… And something in the salad was extremely (it’s burning my mouth) hot! So much so that I dare not risk eating any more of it. I had only eaten one cube of tofu so it was...More
This is a small, busy restaurant, popular because the food is amazing. The staff works quite hard to serve food and beverages and they are great. Located in Chinatown. Make sure you have a reservation.
We booked this place before visiting Vancouver on the recommendation of some friends and it was as good as they said. We were a big group so ordered lots of different things from the menu - the staff were so helpful in recommending dishes -...More
We had a superb meal here on our last night in Canada before flying home later that night. We had to book about 2 weeks ahead but it was well and truly worth it. This is one of the very best Chinese meals we have...More
This was a great little find in Vancouver with some amazing Chinese cuisine - with a twist! Also bonus marks for the staff who were really friendly and very knowledgable. The food was absolutely fantastic and we certainly did not leave hungry!! Would highly recommend...More
We passed by this Chinese Fusion restaurant when looking for a bite to eat before the Roger Waters concert. It was VERY busy, even though it was a weekday. We would soon discover WHY it was so busy! The dishes kept coming out, each one...More
Wow… fabulous little find by sheer good fortune .. Charles our server was brilliant.. the food was Devine! You chose your dishes and they came out as they were ready and each dish just got better! Cannot recommend enough
We found this place after a walk around china town, not the easiest place to find, very busy but they managed to find us a table. It had plenty of atmosphere, noisy and dark, great for a group, but not so for couples. Food was...More
Excellent cocktails, food and service. Bartender Jason was outstanding- friendly and helpful. He suggested what to order and made us creative cocktails based on our preferences. We had a wonderful experience and would highly recommend it.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1806120-Reviews-Bao_Bei_Chinese_Brasserie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bao Down,"We slipped in here after having already eaten but just wanting to explore the city. The atmosphere is fun and laid back. The drinks were good and not overpriced. The owner and his dog Nacho were both fun. The food is surprisingly good! It doesn’t...More
If you don't know what a bao is, or have never tried one, you owe it to yourself to make it a priority. Baos are fluffy dough buns wrapped around delicious fillings, mostly Asian in nature. There seems to be a rose in trendy bao...More
The food is unique and absolutely delicious ...the interior is nothing fancy and it is a small restaurant....however the food is amazing and makes it soooo worth while to book or stand in the queue if it is full ...great service too. What a little...More
Great spot for snacks! Highly recommend this place. Really cool atmosphere and spot for sure. The fries are awesome.
Nice music and atmosphere, very helpful owner, extremely good snacks and beer for a very cheap price! Pretty awesome actually!
Went for happy hour after work during the week. Good deals on food and drinks for happy hours. Nice selection of local beers, and the food was tasty and well priced. Being on W 2nd, the patio can be a bit noisy with the traffic,...More
I saw this place on instagram and wanted to make sure I tried it when I came to Vancouver. It's located in Gastown, about two blocks down from the Steam Clock. We came in the early afternoon and it wasn't crowded. The place is small...More
2 is enough, but it was delicious with various types of sandwiches. I like it there, the food is fresh, the taste fusion and just a great place to have these unique sandwiches.
We ordered delivery from Bao Down and it was very disappointing. We had the chicken Bun and it had one very small piece of chicken on it and little else. And as it was a delivery we had no way of rectifying. Shame as I...More
Bao Down is fantastic with an incredible variety of different sandwiches ranging from fish to chicken. The fries are also some of the best I have had anywhere. Prices are good as well unless you're really hungry because then you'll end up going back to...More
I've gone here several times on visits back to Vancouver and everytime I leave very happy. The cocktails are unique and so delicious. I've tried them all and they're all tasty! I've had all the dishes too and like to share them with friends or...More
Up the top of Gastown. Had lunch with my two children. Absolutely lovely. I had the chicken with Bo and some slaw type stuff - absolutely great taste. Brilliant food, and cheap as chips.
We were walking through Gastown and stopped through on a whim when we saw someone eating through the window. The Bao looked so good we stopped in our tracks. It's a small restaurant but extra seating is available upstairs. Since it was just a small...More
Really unique flavour combinations that work. Simple and easy going staff with basic surrounds. Highly recommend if you want quick, fresh and extremely tasty food that is not too expensive
While visiting Granville Island, a local recommended Bao Down in Gastown as a place not to be missed. We ate dinner there and loved the kimchi fries. Our family also tried the Bao Chicka Bao Bao, Jaws and YVR baos. Delicious! Glad we listened to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7914773-Reviews-Bao_Down-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bao Down OV,"We received great and attentive service. The Sinigang Ramen and mermaid bao were especially tasty. Our table shared our dishes so it was fun to try different flavours.
Not enough flavor. With the exception of Mermaid, all the baos we had were bland and tasteless. Also dry and the meat was overdone . Great service.
I bao to the Bao. Who doesn’t like a light fluffy bao filled with savoury goodness?!? Digging the Ticino that has a harmony of flavours with the sweet pork, banana ketchup, slaw and golden yolk of the fried egg. So good! Definitely needed their juicy...More
We live 2 blocks from Bar Down in Olympic Village and opted for delivery. When our dinner arrived, we were disappointed that it wasn't warm. It tasted fine, but wasn't that great. The grilled vegetables had a simple bbq flavour, but they were charred and...More
I went to the Gastown location a long long time ago, and I don't remember being very impressed. I thought I would give the Olympic Village location a try since I was in the area and I saw they had 20% off takeout prices. I...More
Maybe there are new owners but Wine Wednesday was no longer available. We tried the Sangria and sadly, once was enough! Also the food quality seems to have dropped in the happy hour offerings. Maybe we are just not into street food anymore as the...More
Trucked across the city to take this place in. Has a funky bohemian feel with really good food. The Bao Phones are all amazing as is the smoked Maui rib dish with garlic rice. And Importantly the fish sauce and garlic wings are on fire.
We had light lunch recently. We ordered 'flight of baos' to share. We especailly liked Jaws and YVR. Very fresh ingredients. The restaurrant offers discounts for patrons of nearby theatre, BMO Theatre. Thank you!
the good managers and servers have all gone at once. an it has never been the same. it is empty and at 8:30 PM there are people sweeping around your feet for closing in the heart of vancouver. used to have afresh oyster bar and...More
Server was very friendly and knew her products. Have a number of suggestions. Ordered a 4 Bao Flight see pic and a morning glory. Just as good as when they were a food truck but without the wait.
Not only was our server Jon (or maybe John, sorry) super friendly and attentive, he also made one of the best Mojitos my girlfriend has ever had. Period. To those who aren’t like Jon; be more like Jon. Thanks, Connor and Courtney
I dont think that there is a bao bun in this place I dont like. ANY bao bun on the menu is a explosion of flavour. I do miss the Jack Daniels bun though that they used to have. Recommend!!
When we first visited Bao Down, the service was a bit slow, but the freshly shucked oysters were great. A year ago, we had really bad oysters two times in a row as well as over-fried chicken wings. We stopped going for a year. This...More
Stopped in to ""wet the whistle"". Sat at the bar and had a couple drinks. A few craft selections which was great. We didn't eat here but the food coming out looked great!
Went on a quiet Thursday night for 0.75 cent wings (must order a beverage). Ordered spicy Thai and lemon butter sriracha wings, truffle fries and two baos. Wings were very nice and crispy. Fries were okay, nothing too exciting. Server was very friendly and attentive....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9878829-Reviews-Bao_Down_OV-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Barcelos Flame Grilled Chicken,"This place gets full marks across the board. Call and in ten minutes the food is ready to go. The sauce is great, the chicken cooked to perfection. The baked potato is high quality, though they used to give chives and recently stopped. But this...More
This restaurant was one of the best I’ve been to in a long time. I would give food, service, presentation, cleanliness, and the restaurant itself a 10/10 rating. I left here, feeling satisfied, with no complaints. Even the coffee was really good . I will...More
The chicken here was excellent! Had a great lunch here while on vacation. The flavor was good and the sides we got were great , salad was fresh and FF hot !
Helen, the owner is the best. A very friendly, helpful and personable individual. Food was hot, fresh and tasty. The server could learn to smile but Helen and the food made up for her.
A friend recommended this restaurant. It is off the beaten path and is worth discovering. It is casual dining in a nice atmosphere with tables and booths. Their chicken is very good as are the side dishes. I eat out often and will definitely put...More
Good portions, great rice and garlic bread. The service was very fast and efficient. No problem there. The peri sauce was just right- spicy but not overwhelmingly so! I feel that the trip was worth it and I definitely will be back for more!!
Excellent chicken and sides, for very few bucks. Just what we were craving. After a nice hike up to Quarry Rock, this is the perfect stop to refill your energies back home.
Have eaten at the Burnaby location several times but started going here as closer. Been there 3 times. Son eats spicy peri peri chicken and I eat the lemon. Like the Greek salad with my chicken. Good service and nice and clean.
Went to Barcelos in North Vancouver and the service was friendly as you walked in the door. Everyone was helpful and the food arrived and it was very good. It is a bit of a hidden gem but I recommend you visiting. The South African...More
We have visited this restaurant many times and the service has always been exceptionally good. The Salads are probably one of the best for value, freshness and size that we have had anywhere in Vancouver. The food, both regular and vegetarian are equally as good...More
The food was great, but they have one lovely South African lady working there, who gently takes charge when someone comes in who doesn't know the menu. She's their best asset, for sure :) She really elevated our time there.
This is a great restaurant for lunch or dinner. They also do take out. My favourite is the two legs with tangy lemon sauce. My husband says the coleslaw is great. Really good flavours and generous portions. Great service too!
This food is really tasty, the owners care and it is obvious by their welcome. There are many choices of chicken, with excellent salads. Desserts were a surprise, different and tasty
Foods is good more choices and combinations rather than the competitors. Need more branches among each city. Service is good keep it up
Were headed for lunch at Marinaside but found it closed. Drove into the new development at Riverside Dr and found Barcelos. In a strip .mall and with the decor of a chain eatery we were uncertain as to what we would get. But welcome was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d12859903-Reviews-Barcelos_Flame_Grilled_Chicken-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Basil Garden Pho,"Stopped for Pho at this little place off East Broadway , it was packed with families which is always a good sign as it means that prices are reasonable . Had the Pho Tai , very tasty broth , noodles cooked perfectly , fair amount...More
Its a good clean Pho place. The soup his good, and the lemongrass chicken was also good. Service was fine, they're there to take your order...nothing more.
I had the pho GA which is chicken pho and it was delicious and the portion is generous plus great service as well. I just moved to the area so this will be my go to pho place.
A very clean pho restaurant compares to others. Tried the pork soup pho and it was very good. Would definitely recommend.
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew basil garden pho . I tried this place with a friend, and another friend recommended the pork bone broth noodle soup. It was delicious, like a hybrid ramen/pho dish. They also do regular beef pho, but my friend...More
We just did a large order of 11 entrees and about 10 sides and everything was absolutely delicious and plentiful. Everyone enjoyed their meals and so we will definitely be ordering from here again. Service is very friendly and the restaurant is very clean and...More
I use to work for a company that was located in the business center diagonal across from the small ""food"" plaza that this restaurant was located in. It use to be a small sushi restaurant so when I was driving by one day, I noticed...More
We went once for dishes on the menu, the pho (I think they said no msg) was really nice, and the spring rolls and chicken wings were perfect - crispy and not not overdone, we really enjoyed it. Then, we got a tip from someone...More
The restaurant looks nice, I went there by myself around 8:30pm, there are still many open tables but I was asked to sit at a table close to door which is not very nice! The Pho was ok, but the source was very simple, only...More
The flavour of the pho was excellent with lots of noodles and meat. More importantly, the large special was only $10. I got a large bowl of pho and everything was as expected. The broth was delicious, the noodles plenty, and the meat not too...More
I always enjoy the pho here, either the beef or pork. Spring rolls are also delicious. I admit that I haven't ventured beyond those dishes, but the food is consistently high quality, and the restaurant is very well run. They care quite a bit, are...More
Decided to go out for an impromptu team lunch. Went for a large bowl of the special beef pho. Perfect way to warm me up on a snowy day. My co-workers had the fresh spring roll and chicken on skewers and fried spring roll on...More
Curious about this new Pho place. Nice and clean interiors. Good thing we came in just before noon as the lunch time crowd was starting to trickle in. Food was great and service was quick and courteous.
Awesome Satay Peanut Pho. Not my favorite beef balls (just moved them aside) Big Big Portion for a Food Tour Event. Chef was nice came to say Hi. Visible from Corner of Road. Co worker had Plain Beef Pho nothing to different standard fare.
Finally found a place that is both clean and actually serves great Vietnamese food. Had the rolls and vegetarian pho - they were great. I will definitely come again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10557671-Reviews-Basil_Garden_Pho-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Basil Pasta Bar,"We picked this restaurant on a whim because it was nearby, while visiting Vancouver, and so glad we did. The build your own pasta was amazing!! The food was so fresh and the portions were excellent.
We were hungry after a long journey and headed for the 7/11 to pick up something quick and easy to eat in the hotel, when we stumbled across this place. There were 2 people waiting to get their takeaway orders, an uber person waiting to...More
We were desperate for a reasonably-priced pasta meal and walked all over Vancouver and were thrilled to find this little place. It is small and mainly a take-out/delivery place but portions are good and tasty and it gave us what we wanted. You order and...More
We were staying not far from this restaurant and on seeing the reviews decided to give it a go. On arriving the place is nothing grand, a small busy shop which for all the world looks like an old school cafe. There are very few...More
Little hole in the wall inexpensive place to grab a tasty dinner. Quick convenient and really good.large portions and nice varieties . Not only recommend but we’re going back tomorrow!
We decided to take advantage of the 2 for 1 deal on Uber Eats. We ordered the carbonara and salmon pasta. The carbonara was a bit salty. The salmon pasta was tasty but not much salmon. Portion size good.
Got take out from here and was very pleased with the carbonara. The food was very delicious, filling and the service was quick. Definitely will be back here again.
My husband picked up two pasta dishes and a Caesar salad yesterday evening. While the food was prepared quickly and was priced fairly, the staff made an error, even after my husband confirmed the order. He asked for spaghetti and meatballs but to have bolognese...More
It was excellent!! Very good service, friendly for children, big size dishes Very clean , The food was ready very fast
Good selection of pasta, protein, sauces and vegetables. Size of portions “just right” -not too small or too large-
Superfast service and yummy food! The smoked salmon one was so yummy. I liked the sauce and the well prepared salmon. The portion size was also just enough. Overall, it totally worths the price, and surprisingly, the price is not high as well!
I ordered Spaghetti and meatball. And the meatballs was cold, like out of the freezer cold. The spaghetti was watery and have A LOT of cheese. Taste alright but pretty messy.
We went into a tiny restaurant with no expectations other than to try something/place new. After searching the menu I placed my order, recurved my glass of wine, chose a table & sat down. Meanwhile my friend also placed her order & then sat down...More
I ordered online and received a very disappointing meal. I ordered the green lentil soup and was instead given minestrone. The frittata was wet scrambled eggs, leading me to wonder if the kitchen staff had ever seen a frittata. Could be unjustified but I’m left...More
It’s basic, but the food is great. From the outside you’d probably walk straight past it. If you like freshly prepared pasta without any pretence then this is the place for you. You can either choose from a selection of known dishes or you can...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4026109-Reviews-Basil_Pasta_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Beach Ave Bar and Grill,"We spotted this bar from the ferry travelling back from Granville Island and decided to call in for a drink. Excellent service from friendly staff, kept us there for several more drinks and dinner. Lovely views watching the seals swimming in False Creek.
Stopped in for lunch while I was walking the Seawall one day. Got the Cajun Combo Rice Bowl, which was quite tasty. Refills on my drinks (both a soda and a water) were timely. Service otherwise was a little slow, particularly when waiting to pay...More
Great food and beer in a perfect spot looking across at Granville Island. Spent a weekend in Vancouver while on a work trip and walked most of the city. Tried restaurants in Yaletown but they were not very personal. This was perfect for a spot...More
We dine here often. And I almost always get a burger. They are amazing. The staff is also very friendly. We sit on the patio often and they allow our dog to be close at hand. They bring water bowls and we often order him...More
The Beach Ave bar and grill is lovely spot to view the river in the sun while having Beer, good service and plenty of alcoholic choices
My wife & I, who live in northern BC, rented an apartment on Beach Ave for two months, Jan & Feb. Our location was just steps away from this bar/grill which resulted in many visits during the course of our stay. The staff were very...More",6,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21509777-Reviews-Beach_Ave_Bar_and_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Beach House,"I’d like to start out by saying, we have had great service and food in the past visits to this location, but last Sunday must have been there off day! Or training day? I strongly believe your last effort is all anyone ever remembers. And...More
My husband and I went to The Beach House Restaurant for a Very Special Birthday Celebration. We were seated at a lovely table with views of the beach. Our Server, Sara gave a Wonderful Birthday Card to him. Other personal came to express their Birthday...More
The menu was limited and uninspiring, lacking the fun choices of bygone days. Even the specials seemed to be minor variations on the regular items. Worst of all was the poor service. Our server took forever to take our orders and forgot our wine until...More
It has been a year since we’ve been here. Everything has improved since then and is now back to its old self. Excellent service. We had a bottle of Blue Mountain bubbles accompanied by various dishes from the Happy Hour menu. Superb.
I've been to the Beach House many times and never fails to please. the location is amazing, and the food is great. the only downside, I found there were not a lot of choices for the main course. still, what they do have is excellent....More
We booked a few months in advance having read trip advisor reviews. It was out 17th wedding anniversary so wanted somewhere nice to celebrate. We were given a lovely table on the patio with a good view. Despite asking us if it was an occasion...More
Absolutely spectacular . The host was friendly and the waitress was so friendly. The food was delicious and priced appropriately. The views were stunning. They made my bday special by bringing me a cake . The staff were kind and attentive to all in my...More
Before a short walk along the beach on a Friday in Dundarave, West Vancouver we went to lunch at one of our favourite spots, the Beach House restaurant. We were surprised how quiet it was in the restaurant. We both had the prawn & scallop...More
Spectacular view, great service and amazing food. My husband and I had the saffron shrimp and spaghettini and it was delicious. Better yet pasta dishes on Monday are $5.00 off. The table behind us had the halibut and chips and they said it was delicious.
Eliza was amazing and so friendly - truffle fries also so so great!! And the view - can’t miss it 💕💕💕. Best place in town for a beach side drink
Hi Janelle, Thank you so much for this great review about Eliza. She truly is one of our best and I'll be sure to share your kind words with her. Kind Regards, Ellen Barbour GM - Beach House
My group of 10 friends visiting Vancouver shared two seafood towers for dinner. It was well cooked and delicious and the broth underneath the tower had a hint of spiciness that I only realized towards the end. That itself made the dish so memorable. It’s...More
Visiting from out of town. Enjoyed a walk along the Seawalk and couldn't resist stopping for lunch on the outdoor deck. Service was impeccable and food delicious!
Fantastic meal. Used open table to reserve. Free parking nearby. Great view. Hot seafood tower was delicious. Perfectly cooked items. Flavorful. Fresh. Fantastic. The bread to dip in the sauce was great. The chowder was also superb.
I was coming from Vancouver Island and I decided to stop to have dinner. This places was great. Good food and nice view. The oysters were great.
Very chilly welcome - difficulty in finding a table - more concerned if we had a reservation instead of welcoming us in, as restaurant was empty - food was very disappointing - ordered seafood chowder, limited fish and veg - sandwich very disappointing - ""our...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d763076-Reviews-Beach_House-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Beeryani Indian Bistro and Bar,"Excellent menu, with a lot of choices. The server was very helpful in steering us to the food we wanted. Excellent Mango Lahsi. Great location, upstairs on a restaurant street with a view to the water.
My wife and I were visiting family in Vancouver on our return from Australia when coming across this gem! We had just completed a walk through Stanley Park and so the appetite for Indian was significant and this restaurant and Arjun our host and server...More
Such a cute bistro. Up top a lively, interesting row of ethnic foods we had a wonderful meal! First, the guys waiting on us were so friendly, helpful and went above and beyond explaining about some of their dishes. The food was delicious! We had...More
Really good food, great location, and friendly service. Liked the cocktails too! Right by English Bay. We will definitely be going back.
We were unsure what to order so we asked the waitress and she was extremely helpful and explained the dishes and made suggestions. We had never tried the items she suggested before but we were feeling adventurous and we are glad we did. We had...More
The food was absolutely delicious. The take out service was excellent - my only complain was that by paying online there wasn't a tip option. I owe them a tip!
Our resident foodie found this gem, and we had a great experience - excellent food, really friendly staff and great tunes too! The Medium spice was pretty spicy already so I would only order the 'Spicy' option if you have a pretty high tolerance! Highly...More
When I find Indian food while visiting different cities, I always try to give them a try. I am rarely disappointed. Beeryani was less than a 5 min walk from my hotel. It was on the second floor above a store. I walked in a...More
This is a great place in a great location on Denman St close to the beach. The food was reasonably priced and delicious. They have super cheap drinks as well. The service was very courteous and attentive without being overly in your face. Will definitely...More
We are SO EXCITED that an affordable and authentic Indian restaurant is across the street from us. We have tried a lot of different from the menu, and have absolutely loved it all. In particular, the kadai paneer was so good (especially with basmati rice...More
I was walking by, pandemic times.... the scent caught my attention. Tried their special breyani and dhall, dammmmn, authentic Indian food... I'm Indian
Friends told us about a new Indian restaurant that opened up on Denman so we thought we'd check it out. Were we ever glad we did! We were hungry so we started out with the veggie pekoras. Definitely very well seasoned and fried to perfection....More
We've now gone three times since they opened just 2 weeks ago. So far we've tried Street Chicken Tikka which is on the Appy menu, very delicious and moist, definitely will have this each time, generous amount, and our favorite, so far. We also tried...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d19822982-Reviews-Beeryani_Indian_Bistro_and_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Belgard Kitchen,"overpriced place, staff is very friendly but the food didn't taste great and was a bit cold. ordered the waygu beef parpadelle and was disappointed. was disappointed the burrata caprese as they dont give you proper bread just breadsticks. the chocolate cake was too dense...More
We love Belgard Kitchen. This was our first visit. It has a beautiful, historically interesting interior - beer caskets, historically decorative items, and a stunning front door from Argentina! A load of character! The staff were cheery, helpful and very welcoming. And the food was...More
The restaurant is extremely attractive and the food is exceptional. I had the corned beef skillet. Having lived in the corned beef heaven of Winnipeg for many years I am always very cautions about finding good corned beef in Vancouver. I took a chance on...More
This place reminds me of the legendary Golden Steer Steakhouse which is located in a less than glamorous location in a run down strip mall across the SLS Hotel in Sin City but once inside you will be captivated by the old Vegas charm. Same...More
My partner and I live nearby but for some reason we haven’t come in ages. A friend was in town and we decided to come here. Fantastic food, great service and fun room. The crowd is vibrant but not pretentious which is hard to find...More
Great food and drink, beer and wine. We had a number of shared plates and the food was excellent. We also tried beers and wines, the waiter was great at swapping out some wines when I shared what my preferences were. Sean, or Shaun, sorry...More
We were STRICTLY told that we have only 1.5 hours to sit at the table. The extremely rude server mentioned that tables are reserved and he could not even get an extra chair for us to use. - Looking around 80% of the place was...More
I’ll start with the Pros: Food is dependably delicious and wine selections are always well curated. I’ve brought larger groups here several times and enjoyed our time. Cons on our most recent visit. The Host staff immediately made us feel unwelcome as a few of...More
Where should I start? The cocktail menu was... pathetic. The appetizer was... pathetic. The fish dish I had was... small and thus pathetic. And, the pizza I tried from someone else on the table was... so sweet that I thought they used ketchup instead of...More
Like another recent reviewer we went for the dine out promotion and beer paing. Beers were quite interesting and the food, what there was of it, was tasty enough. I had the impression that the restaurant was trying to recoup all their covid losses with...More
Very tasty food, the burger with side popcorn is great and the tomato soup is so good. Definitely would come back again and recommend checking out this spot.
I have been here once before but this time for dine out which was advertised as a 4 course tasting menu with beer pairing. It was more of a beer tasting with shared appetizers. I didn't expect anything fancy, but we were shocked how little...More
My friend was here for dinner few weeks ago , she love it so much , and she know I am so fussy , for sure she know I will like this place , surprised me for Brunch yesterday ! restaurant is inside the settlement...More
We were looking to try a new place out to celebrate our anniversary and a friend suggested the Belgard kitchen. I was told that it was casual but classy and had a romantic feel in the evening. Upon arrival we were greeted promptly and sat...More
Nicest place in Rail Town for Great Eat. I was so impressed I went for lunch and dinner. Not far from Gastown. Very good selection of craft beers and wines. Nice atmosphere for couple and power lunches. Food menu has great varieties to select from....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6601062-Reviews-Belgard_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bella Pizza,"The pizza is mediocre and overpriced but I've been ordering it regularly anyways despite that. They always say it will take 45 minutes to arrive. On one occasion, it took well past one hour and on another occasion my pizzas never showed up at all....More
Visiting from the Island and wanted take out for dinner at our hotel. Found Bella Pizza on TA with great reviews. Ordered a large neighbourhood special for pick up by phone, great service. It was ready fast and was delicious. Would order again for sure.
Wow Fantastic pizza, fresh toppings friendly people, delivery was quick and pizza was HOT not warm. Great place if you enjoy pizza
I loved the pizza at the Denman location 30 years ago so I was happy to discover the Burnaby location near me. Bella has the best pizza ever! It's reasonably priced and the quality is superb! The toppings are fresh and generous, the cheese is...More
A bit pricey, but you have to pay for good food, eh? It's Italian, so their Pasta is good too. Highly recommended!
Talking to a friend and he said have you tried Bella Pizza? Went here for the first time. Got the ""Masterpiece and the Gourmet Vegetarian"" well it brought tears to my eyes. They were better than Excellent. I don't need to look for a new...More
I grew up working in a family run pizzeria so I know good pizza... and this is exactly that. We ordered out 3 very different pizzas with different sauces - the Mediterranean, the Bella chicken, and a meat pizza. All the pizza dough was excellent...More
We just arrived in Burnaby for 3 nights... and at the corner of the street where we are rating is Bella Pizza. Our host (Airbnb) told us it was the best. We walked there and ordered a BBQ Pizza.. service was excellent, the place is...More
Delivery was on time pizzas were hot and delivery man was courteous. The pizzas were delicious and yummy as always
First of all, we ordered the food to arrive at 6, and they were very prompt. The food arrived on time and piping hot, which is always extremely important. The pizza was good. It wasn't spectacular, and if you are looking for authentic Italian pizza...More
Quick delivery, friendly people, great pizza at a fair price. I also like the little ball of cooked dough that came in the middle. A cute original touch!
I have tried EVERY pizza place around my area and Bella is the best! As matter of elimination I ended up with with the Best In South Burnaby. As I said II have tried them all. They are always hot and consistently taste great !...More
Had frequent Bella pizza at original location years ago and decided to check out the Burnaby location as within my vicinity of work. Quality pizza, very tasty; covered sufficiently with ingredients accordingly to one's order, not token sprinklings. Crust is usual thickness, well balanced with...More
In a world of conveyor cooked, mass produced pizza, I was thrilled to find reviews for something a bit more mom and pop. It did not disappoint! Ordered in on two consecutive nights! Buurrrrrp! Quite enjoyed both that were intended for me. Wife ordered a...More
If this is the best pizza in Vancouver, then Vancouver doesn't know how to make pizza! Can't say I was overwhelmed, their salami looked and tasted like bologna. Sauce was good, but nothing to write home about.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d760243-Reviews-Bella_Pizza-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Bella Roma Pizzeria Restarante,"Jimmy and his staff are wonderful. Very helpful. The food is amazing. My husband always orders the linguine pecatore. Which is very good but so are loads of other dishes. Thank you
Best place with authentic Italian food Love the carbonara and grilled veggies pizza Owner is so friendly and professional
Absolutely beautiful little quaint place, with an Italian atmosphere inside. Service was very good. Food was fast and delicious. I would definitely recommend this place for anyone wanting good fresh Italian seafood.
We requested a table near the heaters as we were dining with my 80yr old mother. The restaurant had 2 other tables seated, the male host seated us perfectly. Away from the other patrons under the heater. Our impaired server started an altercation immediately with...More
Amazing food, amazing service. Real Italian recipes and the best seafood. The deep-fried oysters were very good.
Amazing food 10/10. Every dish was delicious. Lovely atmosphere everyone had a great time. Will definitely return.
We ordered take out. The order was repeated to me and I was told to arrive for pick up in 35Minutes. 35 minutes later we arrived for PU. Order had been lost...cook was incredibly rude to me and the waitress who was stressed and very...More
, As the owner, I apologize for the unpleasant experience you had at our restaurant. We were having an especially busy night while temporarily understaffed. I included a complimentary salad to make up for the delay, which I hope you enjoyed. Regards, jiummy
Bella Roma is across the street from my dentist's office, looked interesting, so we tried it out. The outside makes one think of a small, take-away place but once inside the whole mood changes. The atmosphere is welcoming with just the right amount of interesting...More
Food... mediocre, at best. Zero customer service. Call to attempt to rectify issues with order - wrong order delivered, cold food, almost 2 hours to arrive - all you get is someone who says they ""don't care"". Seriously!?! So much for trying to support local....More
We came here on the fly for an anniversary dinner. Unassuming little place from the outside but full of charm. Delicious food - my partner had puttanesca and I had the snapper. They hit my marks for value, atmosphere, taste and appreciation of my business...More
My partner and I ordered a pizza and pasta to share, and we're horrified to find a chunk of what looked like a brillo pad.. and then we found a black hair baked into the cheese on the pizza. When we told them about it...More
These are written by our ex- employees (being anonymous) , and clearly they have serious angst about not being a part of the Bella Roma team anymore. This incident is a completely made up and false accusation and an attempt to smear the restaurant's reputation.
Do not go to this restaurant. We booked for new year’s Eve. We were told we could order off the regular menu instead of the set one. Our party was large - 23 of us. I knew we would be in trouble when I asked...More
Great Italian mid-price restaurant, open kitchen concept, even a live pianist some evenings, prices reasonable, huge servings.
My favorite restaurant in Vancouver. Always delicious food and friendly service. The pizza is to die for!
A small restaurant that provides attention to details. It has delicious authentic italian food with generous portions!",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2255150-Reviews-Bella_Roma_Pizzeria_Restarante-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bellaggio Cafe,"We had breakfast at Bellagio Cafe twice during our four days in Vancouver. The food was absolutely delicious and the service was attentive and professional. The only reason I am not rating it a five is that the food took quite awhile to arrive. We...More
We had breakfast at Bellagio Cafe twice during our four days in Vancouver. The food was absolutely delicious and the service was attentive and professional. The only reason I am not rating it a five is that the food took quite awhile to arrive. We...More
Had lunch here after a long travel day. It was pretty good - -nothing earth shattering. Had pizza and salad. Close to our hotel and close to everything.
Had lunch here after a long travel day. It was pretty good - -nothing earth shattering. Had pizza and salad. Close to our hotel and close to everything.
We are Walking in Vancouver was searching for a Restaurant, found Bellaggio. Welcome was nice the Service was friendly and you get your attention. The lunch at self, was good regarding quality. The Services regarding people was good and helpful. Restaurant was clean and nice.
We are Walking in Vancouver was searching for a Restaurant, found Bellaggio. Welcome was nice the Service was friendly and you get your attention. The lunch at self, was good regarding quality. The Services regarding people was good and helpful. Restaurant was clean and nice.
Visited here on two mornings for breakfast as we were staying in the Sutton Place hotel nearby, great breakfast and not expensive. The service was friendly and quick, and the menu had plenty choices with the food freshly prepared to order. Would definatly recommend for...More
Visited here on two mornings for breakfast as we were staying in the Sutton Place hotel nearby, great breakfast and not expensive. The service was friendly and quick, and the menu had plenty choices with the food freshly prepared to order. Would definatly recommend for...More
Had a meal for two tonight. The food was very disappointing, bland and the pasta was very rubbery. The service was functional but nothing special.
Had a meal for two tonight. The food was very disappointing, bland and the pasta was very rubbery. The service was functional but nothing special.
Very nice breakfast. Good coffee. Service was great. Just a few short paces from our Hotel (Fairmont) - would recommend First full day in Vancouver so can’t compare against anything yet, but a very positive start!
Very nice breakfast. Good coffee. Service was great. Just a few short paces from our Hotel (Fairmont) - would recommend First full day in Vancouver so can’t compare against anything yet, but a very positive start!
Visited here each morning as we were staying in the Fairmont hotel nearby, nice breakfast and not too expensive. My partner is Coeliac and she was ok to eat here with the choices. Would recommend for breakfast if in the area.
Visited here each morning as we were staying in the Fairmont hotel nearby, nice breakfast and not too expensive. My partner is Coeliac and she was ok to eat here with the choices. Would recommend for breakfast if in the area.
We were staying nearby at the Fairmont, and wanted a place outside the hotel for breakfast.We actually ate here twice, once at the beginning of our trip, and once at the end on our return to VancouverBC.. The service was friendly and quick, and the...More
We were staying nearby at the Fairmont, and wanted a place outside the hotel for breakfast.We actually ate here twice, once at the beginning of our trip, and once at the end on our return to VancouverBC.. The service was friendly and quick, and the...More
Good value, high quality breakfast in a nice location over the road from the art gallery. The fried potatoes with the breakfast were very nice, but very filling for breakfast. Would recommend if you are staying in the area.
Good value, high quality breakfast in a nice location over the road from the art gallery. The fried potatoes with the breakfast were very nice, but very filling for breakfast. Would recommend if you are staying in the area.
My highlight of visiting the Bellagio Cafe was seeing my coworker enjoy the ""coffee experience"" which included a pot of coffee, cream, milk, a tiny cup and a croissant on the side! It's a cool thing to have on the menu! The ricotta french toast...More
My highlight of visiting the Bellagio Cafe was seeing my coworker enjoy the ""coffee experience"" which included a pot of coffee, cream, milk, a tiny cup and a croissant on the side! It's a cool thing to have on the menu! The ricotta french toast...More
The owner of this spot was outside and beckoning us to come in for breakfast so we decided to give it a try. I feel that there was some miscommunication somewhere along the line becuase there was a delay in getting our meal served, which...More
The owner of this spot was outside and beckoning us to come in for breakfast so we decided to give it a try. I feel that there was some miscommunication somewhere along the line becuase there was a delay in getting our meal served, which...More
Food was fantastic. We came for breakfast. Good choice and quality top notch. Defp come back. Great value for money. Didn't get a photo as we tucked right in. Service was also really good.
Food was fantastic. We came for breakfast. Good choice and quality top notch. Defp come back. Great value for money. Didn't get a photo as we tucked right in. Service was also really good.
Surprisingly not busy the evening we visited so we got to choose where to sit in this casual yet elegant restaurant. We had friendly service and food came out in a timely manner. Good Italian food without issues: pancetta mushroom pizza, bolognese, lasagna, and prawn...More
Surprisingly not busy the evening we visited so we got to choose where to sit in this casual yet elegant restaurant. We had friendly service and food came out in a timely manner. Good Italian food without issues: pancetta mushroom pizza, bolognese, lasagna, and prawn...More
For a quick dinner I selected a pesto lingine with spinach. It's the first time ever that I've 'tasted' pesto without any of the htree principal ingredients!
For a quick dinner I selected a pesto lingine with spinach. It's the first time ever that I've 'tasted' pesto without any of the htree principal ingredients!
Great Breakfast specialties. Wonderfull attentive service, Highly recommend. With generous portions. Outside dining, if desired . Sure beats Hotel overpriced buffets
Great Breakfast specialties. Wonderfull attentive service, Highly recommend. With generous portions. Outside dining, if desired . Sure beats Hotel overpriced buffets
This restaurant dusn’t excise nomore . Now it’s a steakhouse bar called CHOP and it’s quality is very very good there a like to gif them a 8
This restaurant dusn’t excise nomore . Now it’s a steakhouse bar called CHOP and it’s quality is very very good there a like to gif them a 8
We have been to Bellaggio Cafe two days in a row for breakfast. It offers and extensive and interesting breakfast menu. Excellent food, great friendly service and traditional Italian decor. A winner, for sure.
We have been to Bellaggio Cafe two days in a row for breakfast. It offers and extensive and interesting breakfast menu. Excellent food, great friendly service and traditional Italian decor. A winner, for sure.
Bellaggio is a nice spot near the water, close to the Vancouver Convention Centre, to get desserts and interesting coffee, tea and hot chocolate selections. I selected the Nutella Hot Chocolate at 7:50 $. As it came in a smaller cup with lots of cream...More
Bellaggio is a nice spot near the water, close to the Vancouver Convention Centre, to get desserts and interesting coffee, tea and hot chocolate selections. I selected the Nutella Hot Chocolate at 7:50 $. As it came in a smaller cup with lots of cream...More
Depending on the season and time of the day, you may have difficulty to find a place. It's located conveniently near Canada Place. We've got bellaggio breakfast and Italian omelette. Dishes are big and fulfilling. Prices are reasonable...
Depending on the season and time of the day, you may have difficulty to find a place. It's located conveniently near Canada Place. We've got bellaggio breakfast and Italian omelette. Dishes are big and fulfilling. Prices are reasonable...
My first negative review... I messaged them about two months ago, and have heard nothing back. So now I’m warning others. Definitely the worst food I’ve had in Downtown Vancouver...and possibly... well, anywhere. I took my wife out for her birthday to the Bellagio at...More
My first negative review... I messaged them about two months ago, and have heard nothing back. So now I’m warning others. Definitely the worst food I’ve had in Downtown Vancouver...and possibly... well, anywhere. I took my wife out for her birthday to the Bellagio at...More
Service not that great but very friendly. Food and drinks well priced and tasty. Had best Baileys Coffee.
Service not that great but very friendly. Food and drinks well priced and tasty. Had best Baileys Coffee.
The service is terrible. The server didn’t even care about putting napkins or spoon for the coffee. The coffee was terrible..
The service is terrible. The server didn’t even care about putting napkins or spoon for the coffee. The coffee was terrible..
Bellaggio Café has a great location: right next to the Convention Centre West and pretty close to the CC East and Canada Place. It has a heated, covered, outdoor patio with views of the North Shore and the cruise ships docked at Canada Place. The...More
Bellaggio Café has a great location: right next to the Convention Centre West and pretty close to the CC East and Canada Place. It has a heated, covered, outdoor patio with views of the North Shore and the cruise ships docked at Canada Place. The...More
Visited here while on an across Canada trip on 25th September. We were seated outside. Had a large glass of Peroni. Our mains were Fish and Chips and Baggio Pizza. Bill came to $52.72. Service was fine.
Visited here while on an across Canada trip on 25th September. We were seated outside. Had a large glass of Peroni. Our mains were Fish and Chips and Baggio Pizza. Bill came to $52.72. Service was fine.
With such a great location I expected better for breakfast (I have had dinner her a few times and it was good). First off for an Italian restaurant one would think that the ITALIAN omelet with prosciutto wouldn’t actually be deli black forrest ham -...More
With such a great location I expected better for breakfast (I have had dinner her a few times and it was good). First off for an Italian restaurant one would think that the ITALIAN omelet with prosciutto wouldn’t actually be deli black forrest ham -...More
I was in Vancouver for UBCM and walked past this inviting looking restaurant twice thinking I should give it a try. Well, a local friend of mine tracked me down one day and suggested we meet for dinner one night and I suggested here. I...More
I was in Vancouver for UBCM and walked past this inviting looking restaurant twice thinking I should give it a try. Well, a local friend of mine tracked me down one day and suggested we meet for dinner one night and I suggested here. I...More
My wife and I ate at the cafe just looking for a small meal. The staff were very attentive and we did not have to look for service. We shared fish and chips and a small pasta carbonara and were pleased with the quantity and...More
My wife and I ate at the cafe just looking for a small meal. The staff were very attentive and we did not have to look for service. We shared fish and chips and a small pasta carbonara and were pleased with the quantity and...More
The food here was ok and overpriced. I ordered a 12 inch margarita that was $18.95. I’m from NY where prices are higher but not this high. The pizza was fine. My husband ordered fish and chips for $20.95. It came with a small amount...More
The food here was ok and overpriced. I ordered a 12 inch margarita that was $18.95. I’m from NY where prices are higher but not this high. The pizza was fine. My husband ordered fish and chips for $20.95. It came with a small amount...More
Our group of 6 dined twice. Both times the cafe was virtually empty. Service dismal. Food acceptable first night. Second night caesar salad served without toast, bacon, anchovies, Parmesan or any taste of garlic. Neither night were any of us asked how our meals were...More
Our group of 6 dined twice. Both times the cafe was virtually empty. Service dismal. Food acceptable first night. Second night caesar salad served without toast, bacon, anchovies, Parmesan or any taste of garlic. Neither night were any of us asked how our meals were...More
Ordered pasta dishes. Needed a lot of seasoning. Waited a long time for food to arrive. Not offered any extra parmesan. Partners dish looked like it had been under heat lamp for ages, was a bit dry. Wouldn't go back.
Ordered pasta dishes. Needed a lot of seasoning. Waited a long time for food to arrive. Not offered any extra parmesan. Partners dish looked like it had been under heat lamp for ages, was a bit dry. Wouldn't go back.",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2255154-Reviews-Bellaggio_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bene Sushi Restaurant,"I love the food here but my customer service experience was absolutely terrible. I went their with my friends and asked the waiter if we could order lunch plates. She said yes then later when she came to order said we couldn’t. Then we tried...More
Amazing, delicious, fresh sushi that is by far one of my best sushi experiences. We are a family visiting from Sweden and I wanted to get my “sushi fix” while in West Van visiting family and friends. I had never heard of this place but...More
We used to order here all the time but our last few experiences have been poor. Especially the last time when the food was cold, was low quality, and service had a major attitude.
Best tempura i have ever had. Very light batter delicately salted. Ready on time for pick up. Telephone order obliging, clear and polite. Hard NOT to go back every day now!
Quality of sushi is good, and service was attentive. Nice variety and presentation of dishes. Somewhat small serving sizes compared to other Japanese restaurants, particularly the pieces of sashimi
Always the best sushi and a great value for money without skimping on the quality. They also have some amazing special rolls that quite tasty
Came with a party of friends and did not disappoint. Left extremely full and satisfied on sushi, sashimi, and salmon rice. Totally worth the reasonable prices, parked on the street in front, very good service from staff.
We arrived for our reservation early and were taken right in, the staff were polite and courteous, We ordered the Ambleside speciality roll and it was beautifully presented and very flavorful, as was the rest of our meal. We had a nice quiet booth and...More
Live in the area, can walk there, been many times, food ok, but, and I say this again, but.....check your bill!! Just because you may be one of the very few who order an alcohol drink there, they think you may not notice....really! No apologies...More
As I walked into the Bene Sushi for a quick lunch, I said to my buddy ""Oh great, expensive sushi in the middle of West Van"". Quite the opposite! It was very inexpensive. We're both good eaters and we ordered the five plate lunch and...More
Call me a creature of some bad habits including the expectations that the poor service and quality will one day improve to days of old. Been coming here for years and noticed the overall performance of Bene to drop to the bottom of sushi restaurants...More
We have been Bene customers from the opening...always good food...the service is now horrible...we had a party of 12 in the special room at the back...it was as if we didnt exist...drink orders 30 minutes...needed to keep asking to order...we had no food arrive for...More
It's almost a mission for me, to try out all the sushi restaurants in an area I frequent. The Ambleside strip has 7 such places, 8 if one includes Zen out at 22nd and Marine. Bene is the best so far (1 left to go)....More
My spouse & I are passionate about sushi & we thought we had tried it all. We stopped in this location on a whim & have now added this to our ""must do"" list when we return. The prices are reasonable, but even more so...More
Great service! Exquisite dishes & presentation ...our weekly dine out place....we always bring friends family there... . Definitely recommend !",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d2271573-Reviews-Bene_Sushi_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
BiBo Pizzeria,"Stunning, which I would normally say about restaurants buried in the middle of a retail park. Reception was friendly and promptly shown to a table. Small wait until our server appeared, but after some retail therapy, did not concern us too much. My wife had...More
This is a hidden gem in an outlet mall. Nice ambiance, great service from making the reservation, to paying the bill. I have never left this size tip before. The food was spectacular; 2 people had pasta, I had pizza, and another had a steak....More
The service was very friendly, and the pizzas were absolutely top notch. Maybe we were hungry, but even so! We were licking our fingers!
We ordered in a couple of pizzas which were very nice. We were slightly let down by the delivery service which took ages to deliver (not the fault of the restaurant).
Where has this resto been all my life??? Went shopping and got really hungry with a craving for some pizza. I ordered the following: Vegetarian pizza--absolutely DELICIOUS. Non-greasy, fresh ingredients, crust and everything baked to perfection. Tiramisu-- YUMMYYY! One of the highlights of our trip...More
There's a saying that first impressions matter. When I walked through the door, it took 5 minutes for a server to notice me, with many just walking by, looking me in the eye, and ignoring me. Weird, I thought, but at least I got seated...More
Pizza was excellent with a wonderful crust but the place lacks any soul. We were not offered oils and peppers that we noted on the way out. The TV above the bar ran a 1 minute loop ad for the outlet mall which drove me...More
We came for a quick dinner from the airport in between flights. Since it is located in an outlet mall there was plenty of parking. Service was great as was the food. We enjoyed their green salad, Bolognese spaghetti (gluten free) and the Amatriciana. Three...More
Authentic Neapolitan pizzeria. Best pizza we ever had was in Naples and this restaurant was a beautiful and scrumptious reminder. We had the bruschetta with loaded tomatoes and elegant touch of garlic and olive oil. Husband had the capricciosa pizza and I had the ortolana....More
No idea how the food is here, but the service is terrible. We walked in and were told it would be a 5 minute wait for a table. After taking a seat and waiting 15 minutes, they gave our table to another group that was...More
Food was excellent. My friend and I shared a pizza, house wine and dessert. SOOOOO good and authentic!!
Two times I have been at Bibo’s and the experience was the same. The food has a great taste but the service is practically nonexistent. You have to wait 15-20 mins to get seated even though you can see all the unoccupied tables. After that...More
Pizzas are the best in town! Thin crust n baked to perfection. Simple ingredients might be the secret to their delicious pizza? We ordered Margharita (tomato sauce, cheese and basil), Marinara (this one is with anchovies, tomato sauce and olives, no chesse). Both pizzas were...More
I ordered a 4 Formaggio Pizza and add Pepperoni. I did that as they do not permit half slice of each flavor. Anyway, the taste was very good but attention, the Pepperoni are very spice! They are quite good but spicy. My wife ordered a...More
Since I discovered this Pizzeria, my wife has taken it on as her special pizza get away! We come here approx once per month and we always order the same two Pizzas! The pepperoni and cheese and the Margarita pizza.... both are delicious. This time...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d9557594-Reviews-BiBo_Pizzeria-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
BiBo Pizzeria con Cucina,"Delicious pizza, lovely fresh ingredients and great service . Definitely worth taking sometime out of your shopping trip to refuel and relax in the sunshine .
The tagliata di manzo is always a generous portion. The side roast potatoes were baked to perfection. I had the panna cotta for dessert which was smooth & creamy. An excellent dinner at a decent price point.
Had a whie pizza with mushrooms and the mushrooms looked and tasted like canned mushrooms. Couldn't eat them... Mushrooms DO NO taste like that on a pizza...spongy and slimy..exactly like canned. My grandson had a Margaritta pizza and did not eat it....literally no cheese on...More
As a first time diner at ""BiBo"", we were pleasantly surprised by both the authenticity and quality of the cuisine and would definitely return for another round of admirable Italian servings. The Carpaccio di Bresaola was particularly noteworthy, but the pizzas and pastas were also...More
It had been a long time since I'd visited Bibo. I remembered it being a reliably decent quality but didn't anticipate wanting to leave 5 stars. Recently, a few friends and I decided to stop in for a late dinner. The happy hour here is...More
We went here on fathers day. Ordered 2 gnocchi and one pizza. To be fair the pizza was OK but there are many better pizza restaurants in Vancouver. The gnocci was cold, mushy and tasteless. Portions were child sized. I am sure the porcini mushrooms...More
Hi, ordered a Pizza, arrive ice cold from Door Dash, who's fault, they say door dash, driver said Bibo. all I know is I got an ice cold pizza and it was awful
After a matinee movie at nearby theatre complex, we stumbled upon this gem clearly having no reservation but got in because it was still early evening. Wine menu was focussed on Italian wines with reasonable prices or high end if you chose to for glass,...More
We went there 'cause we wanted to try some Italian food abroad. No words can describe their food. The pizzas were made in the Neapolitan way perfectly, the pasta is perfectly prepared with high quality Italian and also hard to find ingredients. The service is...More
Have been there a few times, always to the Kitsilano restaurant - I’ve never to the one in Richmond. They have nice authentic Neapolitan pizzas. One of the best I’ve had in Vancouver - if not the best! I would recommend going and eating at...More
Very busy little restaurant. Food is excellent, tastes authentically Italian. Our son had carpaccio and a superb pizza, we had butternut squash soup. I then had ravioli which was excellent and my husband had lemon chicken.Desserts- panna cotta very good. Staff excellent. 4 stars as...More
Portions small, expensive and cold when delivered. Maybe nice to eat in. Better priced restaurants in Vancouver.
A real taste of Italy. Pizza was perfect with the right dough. Service was impeccable. Price was reasonable
It's thanks to a friend we came here for a later supper after seeing a documentary film. Comfort food was necessary. With authentic Italian, we certainly got that! Each of us ordered different Neapolitan style pizzas to try. Each one was impressive. We had the...More
Great food, great service by the waiter from Argentina and the atmosphere was wonderful. The house red is excellent too! Can’t wait to come back :)",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2079779-Reviews-BiBo_Pizzeria_con_Cucina-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Biercraft Bistro,"Note: I went to Biercraft at University Drive, Burnaby. Our home bar! We are friends with the staff and the rotating craft beers meet everyone‘s taste. If you go to SFU Burnaby, this is your home bar!
We'd been visiting the city hall and carried south along Cambie street looking for somewhere to eat and drink. Biercraft certainly ticked the drink box, but we decided to go elsewhere to dine.
We visited this place several times while we were in Vancouver. It was in a great location, had a variety of beers and other drinks, lunch was great and the dinners were very tasty. A nice atmosphere.
The place was very busy (and noisy), even on a rainy evening. The draft beer wasn’t as cold as it should have been. The frites were excellent; the house salad average - nothing exciting about it. The mussels were a major disappointment - they were...More
The food was good and the beer selection ample my Mac 'n' cheese was delicious...our server was fantastic and his veer selection are good......
Been a regular here for at least 5 years. I unfortunately got one of those arrogant server types a couple of times recently. Won't be going back. If you're not a big table (hence big tip) you'll be waiting 20 minutes to get your glass...More
When vacationing we’ve developed the habit of picking somewhere to stay outside the city center, but on a subway line that gets us into the center quickly, we save a lot on the hotel bill that way. Which is why we ended up in a...More
We went on a Monday night when the restaurant wasn't busy. It took quite a while for the meals to be brought to the table, not a problem we were socializing and didn't really notice. I can only comment on my own meal although my...More
A Friend took our family with her and her boy this evening, promising no nonsense, simple, good Canadian food (we’re from out of town). BC Bistro on Cambie delivered on that promise. Our kids (8, 6 and 6) tucked into the kids burgers and chicken...More
Our family has frequented this restaurant (UBC location) at least once a month for the last year. We absolutely loved it. Yesterday we went and were very surprised that the menu had drastically changed. My three favorite meals had vanished from the menu. I tried...More
A few months ago, a good friend, told us to go to Biercraft and try their burgers (we'd been discussing how difficult it is to find good burgers in Vancouver) Biercraft been there for a long time and we've lived in the neighbourhood for 34...More
Thank you for coming by and making us your 'hangout'!
Went with friends for a casual lunch. The restaurant cleverly has many ""zones"" with out door tables, a café-casual area by the bar, and a more cozy dining room with banquettes. First thing you notice walking in is the impressive bar with a great selection...More
Usually Bier Craft is awesome. We've been so many times I can't even count and it is always incredible. The servers are always very knowledgeable and are on top of everything. Last night not so much. Could have been an off night so not it's...More
Of all the Biercrafts, this is the best. Hats off, most especially to Matt the server, who knows his beer, and is an excellent host. From one Matt to another, thank you! The food is always excellent, the beer always good... exceptional choice in Vancouver,...More
Biercraft is a place that is on my ""must go"" list for every visit to Vancouver. I have enjoyed breakfast, lunch and dinner here, not on the same day, but oh, it's tempting! If you like mussels, this is a perfect dinner spot, the veggie...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2365397-Reviews-Biercraft_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Big Bite Donair,"This is one of the best Donair shops I’ve eaten at. Having tried numerous foods and restaurants in the area this place is one that never disappoints! I’ve tried the chicken donair, beef donair, butter chicken, as well as the beef tikka kebab special. All...More
I loved the food and the customer service. Just choose anything on the menu and you will surely love it. I am going to keep coming back for more.
Not quite the donair I expected (not Halifax donair), more like a shawarma, but very tasty. The baklava ice cream was delish!
I highly recommend grabbing a meal here. It’s become a regular stop for me when I hike at Lynn Headwaters. I love the donairs. Make sure you ask for spicy mustard. Fresh ingredients. Delicious! The owner and staff are very friendly. They gifted me a...More
It was so delicious 😋 and their customer service was very friendly and helpful we recommended this restaurant
This place serves your traditional donairs: Good portion sizes, very tasty. The owner works fast if that's what you need - but what separates this place from others, is that if you have a bit of time on your hands and show interest in the...More
After a 3 hour visit to Lynn Canyon my friends and we’re really hungry and stopped by this little restaurant. The young man working, just him, an Iranian native, did everything he could to makes us comfortable. We were offered to taste the 8 levels...More
The owner is a super nice and great guy! He loves to make good food and takes pride in the providing quality meals to his customers! He made me some special fries that isn't on the menu... fries with garlic and hot sauce! It sounds...More
We stopped in after a long hike in Lynn Canyon. We had read the amazing reviews online and I now completely understand why. The owner was such a kind and lovely person - showing the greatest pride in his food. He provided many samples so...More
A great North Shore find. This little shop in the Lynn Valley Village plaza is absolutely delicious! All food and sauces homemade. The owner, Yaseem, is charming and welcoming. Eat in or take out. We had the Butter Chicken and the Chicken plate as well...More
Great service! Yummy food! Excellent choice to support local! Owner is very nice and was so kind to my daughter.
And great food! We stopped in one night after googling donairs. Great decision. Left with a wonderful diversity of thongs to try. All was delicious. Lots of vegetarian options as well. We’ll be back!!
I have never had boulanie before but oh my goodness it is so so good. I went back to get some more and tried the samosas (I for sure also got more boulanie - with the cilantro sauce) which of course were also amazing (not...More
When traveling, our family's policy is to eat where we cannot back home in Utah. I know its about the food and the food was wonderful, but there is another element here at the Big Bite. The owner and his wife are genuine people so...More
After a hike or run in Lynn Valley, treat your taste buds to an array of flavours that are sure to satisfy the desire for delicious food made with passion. Have the owner, Yaseen, describe the process of making some of these dishes .. like...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d12072352-Reviews-Big_Bite_Donair-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Big Rock,"Big space with well spaced tables, good menu and always an intriguing daily specials menu. Plus the best Happy Hour around: 5$ beer and excellent dry ribs, wings, and my favourite korean cauliflower on special. Best of all happy hour is 3 hours every day:...More
Stopped into Big Rock Brewery Vancouver as the start of a birthday beer walking tour. So impressive is the taproom & gift shop growler fill areas. Had a delicious Cidradelic IPA. Loved it. Tip is to get there during happy hour for $5 ribs. Super!...More
They have quite shady business practices. I ordered a six pack for delivery through the website. I waited over 50 minutes for the beer, and then they decided to cancel it last minute, but re-opened their website now with a $4 charge for delivery. That...More
I'd stopped in to the adjacent brewery outlet store months ago to fill a growler, and had meaning to try the restaurant ever since. I was in the neighbourhood and on foot on a Saturday afternoon, and decided to give it a try. I might...More
Thanks for the feedback WandererOnTheRoad! Hopefully next time your in I can thank you in person! Look forward to seeing you again, Cheers! Kirk AGM Big Rock Brewery kashton@bigrockbeer.com
We recently visited Vancouver and Big Rock was recommended to us as a great place with great atmosphere, food and beer. Well, they weren't wrong and we were not disappointed!!! Lamb sandwich is spot on. Wings and dry ribs were excellent and I am pretty...More
Hello there! Just wanted to say thanks for checking us out, and were very sad to see you leave! If you're ever in town again, make sure to stop in and say hi again, take care!
Big Rock Urban is an amazing local gastropub brewery with a wide array of delicious eats. I personally enjoy their Pan Fried Brussel Sprouts and Wild Mushroom pizza. They have a many options for vegetarians which is great to see at a brewery. Their service...More
I highly recommend Big Rock Urban, I have gone a few times and have always enjoyed excellent service and GREAT food. Decided to check out wing Monday on New Year’s Day, not only was it a great deal (and the bit of hang over food...More
Hey Liz, thanks for your review. Glad we helped with your New Years hangover! :)
Stopped in for brunch and it was a pleasant suprise. Always good choice of beverage and the breakfast was tasty.
Second visit here with work friends for dinner. Really appreciated the service. Good atmosphere. Mostly wanted to share photos of the menu and food. Great specials.
They take reservations! They have a great beer list. Tonight they had Hemp Beer (ABV 4.20% IBU 42.0), and a Kolch that compares to the Kolch we found in Köln. They have friendly servers who tell you about the menu and help customize it; they...More
This place is great. Stopped by for a pint on St. Pattys day. The place was packed full. The stout deserves a tasting!
Both the beer and the food are fantastic. The pizzas are all great as is the grilled cheese sandwich and the burgers . Try the nano flights for beers or get a recommendation from the server as they are able to recommend a beer based...More
I stopped on a Friday evening with a group of friends. The premise is fairly large and appears best equipped to deal with groups of people (6 or more). Service was average. Nothing wrong with it, just nothing remarkable about it either. The food (Bru...More
I'm writing this about the restaurant at the facility. I'm not sure why there is another Trip Advisor page for the brewery since the reviewers seem to be speaking of the same place. BRU has a restaurant, lounge, and area where you can simply buy...More
I really like this place... not because they have a lot of veggie options (they don't have that many), but they bend over backwards to help you enjoy your meal. The beers area great, they have a beer store attached, and you can view the...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7894757-Reviews-Big_Rock-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bin 4 Burger Lounge Vancouver,"It was nice,staff great,bartender was professional,U could see they worked together professionally.
Convenient for a meal before or after a play at the Stanley Theatre. Burgers are 50% off after 9. Enjoyed the spicey chicken strips with a large order of fries. Burgers with a salad are tasty too. Friendly service. Show your Stanley Theatre ticket for...More
We went with friends that moved to Vancouver from Montreal. I had the quinoa bowl with an array of veggies and added blackened tofu. My wife had a burger with fries and salad. Both dishes were very tasty and good. Service was helpful, attentive and...More
We booked a pre-theatre lunch reservation and arrived before our 12:15 time slot. Over an hour later, we finally got our meal. Note: diners who ordered after us were served their meal within 15 min. The burgers and bin salad were good. The fries were...More
After an hours, I could not get my ordered food. It is a lounge to serve cocktail not as a restaurant which serves food. Kitchen was run by some very young people, possible not a professional chef.. There were many servers standing and were chatting...More
Amazing spot for burgers and drinks, friendly and quick service. Definitely would come back again soon.
I love this place , the burgers are great . Mine had wild mushrooms and was delicious . Their appetisers looked good but I went straight in to the main event. There are a good selection of sides to compliment your choice be it chicken,...More
With so many choices it was tough to decide what to order. We went with the Big Spenny featuring wagyu beef and the bison burger which you rarely can find anywhere and I loved the fried onions. We asked for the burgers to be split...More
I love Bin 4.Every time we come to Vancouver we come here as I just love the Ahi tuna salad.It is the most amazing salad ever. My husband who usually has a burger had it too and absolutely loved it. The Tuna is crusted and...More
We decided to go for burgers at Bin 4 as it had outdoor seating. The day was hot and smokey from the forest fires but still being cautious re Covid. They were great about bringing water and ice. Lots of burger options from lamb to...More
Fabulous salads and burger. Service very helpful and friendly. Food amazing!! Nice terrace , beautiful athmosphere.
We had lunch here and it was delicious! The home made chips we excellent, the spendy burger was great. We thought the fries were better than the onion rings and the service was perfect too!! Definitely would go back and would recommend too!!!
Had a fantastic dinner here. Burgers were delicious, especially the mushroom and the Greek lamb burgers. Service was great and love the big patio!
In these times of voluntary quarantine and social distancing it helps your local restaurants by placing an order for pickup or delivery. I did that with the Bin4 in my neighborhood. I walked over and there was my burger and fries waiting for me. It...More
Great selection of burgers - excellent friendly and quick service - A fantastic spot for pre theatre or post shopping the neighbourhood",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13330828-Reviews-Bin_4_Burger_Lounge_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bistro Sakana,"Smack in the middle of Yaletown, this upscale Japanese restaurant has a large selection of food; whereas I concentrated on sushi dishes ... absolutely yummy!!! Sat outside on the patio and service was friendly and professional. Would return anytime. Bernd Williams Lake, BC
We ordered takeout. It said 15 min then we got an email that said 55. Not a huge deal but whatever. The kicker for us was- this place had come recommended so we wanted to try it. Thus we got approx 100 dollars of sushi...More
Best sushi in Vancouver by far! Been to numerous sushi places in town and nothing compares to the fresh fish and variety from Japan. We had a great time enjoying the food while watching the skilled professionals at work. Just Outstanding service and food!
We ended up in this restaurant by chance and did not expect to be treated to a culinary adventure that included deliciously sumptuous pork belly that was served with a smoke trapped under a glass cone (quite a show), outstanding sablefish with beautiful glaze, beef...More
First, Sakana seems to have become a cult Japanese bistro; the night we went, it was packed even though it was mid-week. Second, the food was just as good as before 2020. Third, it is a small place, and when crowded, might not be ideal...More
I have not gone out for Japanese for months because of COVID-19. There is heated covered patio seating which is great. We enjoyed so many good items: fish neck, wagyu beef, scallop sushi, assorted tempura, salmon sashimi and unagi roll.
The happy hour runs until 6:30 which is quite unusual in my neighbourhood and we were quite pleased to give it a try. The menu several selections with the reduced happy hour rate and the wine by the glass (also at a reduced rate of...More
Very clean, excellent service, friendly atmosphere, Authentic Japanese food. good pricing, a peaceful place to enjoy your journey
Outstanding sashimi, sushi, tempura... I was expecting good and it was great. Good COVID-era experience too, with very friendly staff. Very good value for the quality.
This is my fourth visit to Bistro Sakana as I cannot get enough of its excellent food and great service. The most recent visit was during Vancouver’s Dine Out program which provides excellent value. The ahi tuna poke and sushi were excellent as the fish...More
Stumbled into this pretty small and cosy Japanese restaurant and was pleasantly surprised to have Japan at our doorstep. The special menu contains many types of fish that were apparently freshly brought in from Japan. Not to make any mistake choosing the right fish to...More
This restaurant was recommended to us by the staff at our hotel (L'Hermitage). It is located in the Yaletown area of Vancouver a gentrified area full of stores, restaurants, residences and small businesses. We sat outside on the terrace (converted from the loading dock of...More
This place offers some amazing sushi options, and all the food we had tasted amazing. The staff was hard to find at times, so I would suggest looking at everything and ordering all at once. I was going to do three stars, but I went...More
Great food, quick and great service. Very elegant. Has an authentic Japanese feel to it. Lots of creative variety on the menu. Kinda pricy.
We were lucky enough to be seated outside to have our supper The food was fabulous the service brilliant and overall a really great night",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1065325-Reviews-Bistro_Sakana-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Black + Blue,"Outstanding service, great food, value for money! We were 2 adults with 2 kids, evening for dinner. super friendly service.
First off - LLOYD IS THE BOMB! Ok, Lloyd was our waiter but he was incredible. The wife and I went here for a special anniversary dinner and were completely floored with the quality of the food and service. We got steak, salmon, Caesar salad,...More
Dear Matt, Happy Anniversary from all of us at Black + Blue. We are so pleased that Lloyd made it a memorable one for you. He spoke to me briefly about a wonderful couple in his section celebrating an anniversary so you left a great...More
We really enjoyed this restaurant. Service (Scott) was first-rate. Wine selection was extensive, befitting a superb steak house. Had the 14 oz sirloin & Caesar salad to share. Beware the brioche bread, the size of a pie & covered in cheese. Portions were LARGE. Too...More
Thank you so much dkandbk1988 for taking the time to leave a review. I am so happy you enjoyed your evening with us. Scott is one of our senior servers and a great asset to our team. He makes the best Caesar salad in the...More
Thanks to Ryan for a great evening. The brioche, the steaks, the table side Caesar, but don’t forget the butter cake. Cheers!More
Thank you so much Cdntrip456for leaving us a review. I am so pleased you enjoyed your meal. Ryan makes a great Caesar salad while maintaining an engaging conversation. What a talent. I will be sure to let the culinary team know how much you enjoyed...More
Our waiter Alex was fabulous, I have never had such a polite server. He was personable and really made the experience! We loved the Caesar salad prepared table side by Alex and the tomahawk was great!More
Thank you 711ilanasfor taking the time to leave us a review. I am so happy you had the opportunity to meet Alex. He is a warm and cuddly charmer who always aims to please; and makes a great Caesar salad too. He is loved by...More
The overall experience was excellent from the initial greet on the roof patio to the food quality. In particular, the service staff was very attentive (including moving an umbrella to shield my guests from the setting sun…..without the need for us to ask) and was...More
Thank you 360-Strategist for leaving us a review. I am so happy you enjoyed your time on The Roof. The staff up there is a great team who understand the special needs of patio guests. Shelbey is a superstar on our team. She has such...More
The food is always incredible/consistent, the service is even better! Our server Kent was attentive and hilarious!More
Thank you so much Explorer25260700663 for leaving us a 5-star review. I love reading reviews from repeat customers. Consistent quality is essential in a steakhouse. We aim to keep you coming back for all those special occasions. With Kent as your server, you had front-row...More
Service and food was all amazing! Sam, and the staff, never missed a beat. Nice, relaxing evening… great environment on the roof! Highly recommend themMore
Thank you DarylNBfor taking the time to leave us a review. The Roof is a beautiful spot. The staff up there are fun and engaging. Sam has such a bubbly personality; it's impossible not to have a good time when she serves you. I hope...More
Sydney was a great waitress. Service and location is excellent. The restaurant is very nice inside..More
Thank you so much Sherpa790671 for leaving us a 5-star review. I am very happy you enjoyed your time with us. Sydney is an absolute delight. I will be sure to send her your compliments. I hope we see you again soon. Sincerely, Lisa Lacroix,...More
We were in Vancouver for a few days before boarding our ship for an AK cruise. This visit we decided to find some new restaurants and so glad we decided on Black+Blue. It was welcoming from the minute we walked through the doors. Although we...More
Happy birthday Daydream569442 and thank you so much for taking the time to leave a review. I am so pleased to hear about your experience. Way to go hosting team; making people feel welcome and at home is super important to us. First impressions mean...More
Hershey was fantastic and I want her to be our server every time. She went above and beyond. Special thanks for help with the wine spill. Great atmosphere and service. Ciara rocked too!More
Thank you davesC9370MIfor taking the time to leave us a review. I am delighted you enjoyed your time with us. Hershey and Ciara are incredible servers that are a pleasure to have on the team. I am happy they made your visit special. We look...More
Fantastic dining experience led by Zivko. Particularly enjoyed the table-side preparation of the Caesar Salad and all the advice and recommendations given by our 10/10 waiter!More
Thank you Y10CYhelenhfor taking the time to leave us a review. I am so happy you enjoyed your meal. The tableside dishes add to the dining experience. Our tableside Caesar salad is a classic Steakhouse dish that never fails to please. I am pleased that...More
Staff was fantastic! Michael was our server and he helped make the experience absolutely perfect. We went for our 5 year anniversary dinner and he helped us pick out food, drinks and dinner! Black and blue is definitely one of the best restaurants in Vancouver!...More
Happy Anniversary 577luckygfrom all of us at Black + Blue. Thank you so much for your 5-star review. I am pleased that the staff contributed to a memorable anniversary celebration. I will be sure to thank Michael for his part. His knowledge of our food...More
Enjoyed a great anniversary dinner mid week Jenna was a lovely server who made the experience enjoyable
Happy anniversary Van02452930391 from all of us at Black + Blue. I am delighted that Jaenka made your anniversary a memorable occasion. We look forward to your next visit with us. Sincerely, Lisa Lacroix, Sommelier
Food was excellent and the service was outstanding - Sasha was very knowledgeable with wine suggestions and took exceptional care to ensure our dining experience was perfect.More
Thank you jaygP7225EM for taking the time to leave us a review. I am so happy you enjoyed your evening with us. Nice of you to give Sasha a shout-out. We love him around here as he is such a kind and friendly soul. I...More",29,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2399483-Reviews-Black_Blue-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Black Bear Neighbourhood Pub,"We stopped in for a late lunch after hiking up in the canyon. It wasn't crowded in the middle of the afternoon, so we were seated right away. Service was terrific. Our waiter was very friendly and fun. They had a good selection of beers....More
Its a pub, if you like deep fried pub foods it’s for you. Its a take it out of the freezer and deep fry it sort of place. I’m not criticizing the Black Bear, just stating fact. Nothing great or unique for food, beers are...More
This is where the locals go for decent food and drinks. We came here for brunch on the weekend. There is a good selection on the menu to suit everyone’s food preferences. I ordered the soup of the day – lobster bisque which was yummy....More
Quiet little pub around Lynn Valley Center. Cosy neighborhood atmosphere. Nice and friendly staff. Decent service. Their Black Bear Exclusive Pale Ale is overrated and food is very average.
After a rocky start to my trip to BC, I found this gem. I arrived right as they opened and had Wendy as my waitress. Not only was the food delicious, the service was fantastic. Wendy was friendly and efficient. Wish I lived closer to...More
My wife and I dropped in after visiting nearby Lynn Canyon Regional Park. Service was slick and friendly. There was a welcoming neighbourhood feel about this place. We weren’t massively hungry - my wife ordered stuffed mushrooms and I had a steak sandwich. We both...More
Great Service, we each had the decedent chocolate dessert and it was fabulous. Great location if you want to play Pokemon Go as it's right between 3 Poke stops.
After not going to this pub for many years, I recently visited twice. On both occasions, the service was fantastic: Taylor and Michelle were both welcoming and friendly, and excellent servers. The meat loaf was very good and I would definitely order that again. The...More
I came to the blackbear pub for a birthday party n had only dessert but got to look at the menu n I will be back ,it looks so good ,the dessert was a chocolate type of dish n very yummy ,well worth ,a must...More
Just stopped in for a quick bite and drink. Had the steak sandwich, it was a good portion however it was not seasoned, bland tasting- could use some seasoning. Good atmosphere and friendly staff.
There are plenty of different beers on tap, and thee food was tasty, with generous portions. We met friends here and, although a busy Friday night, the noise levels weren’t so deafening that we couldn’t talk easily. A really nice atmosphere.
We ate lunch at the black bear pub as a quieter option to avoid the weekend crowds at Deep Cove. Service was really good,very welcoming and a good choice of hearty food on the menu.The fish and chips were really good. Quiet areas within the...More
Black Bear Pub is a great local spot in North Vancouver. It has a great selection of beer and food. I appreciate the outdoor patio because it is less noisy and brighter. If you are inside, it is still a great venue as they have...More
Very nice little pub with great atmosphere. Food (cod and meatloaf) was good but service left a little to be desired. Improve the service and this could be a great little place!
My boyfriend and I live near this pub and it is our favourite. The menu is superb and reasonably priced. The staff are friendly and welcoming and they’ve got a great vibe.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d761739-Reviews-Black_Bear_Neighbourhood_Pub-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Black Rice Izakaya,"I was in town for about 24 hrs between the end of an Alaska cruise and my flight home the next morning, and Black Rice was around the corner from my hotel. I tried several small dishes, including the broiled scallops w cheese, mayo and...More
Very Friendly and quick service. Nice place near the hotel. Menu with traditional dishes aswell as some challenging combinations
I dropped in close to closing time, so I didn't have time for more than a meal. It was delicious, and I would have liked to sit longer, try some more dishes, and drink quality sake.
Great experience. Aburi sushi was phenomenal. Also got some sukiyaki which was better than what we had in Tokyo. Sake selection impressive. Service very nice. Properly attentive without any sense of being hovered over. Presentation of food all aesthetically pleasing, to say the least. Would...More
We were pleasantly surprised by this restaurant, which I assumed was hotel-run and would be just average. Miso soup was about the best that I have had, and the sushi rolls were outstanding! The Soy Chicken Karaage was very good. Service was also good -...More
We went with friends visiting from out of town. It’s a Japanese restaurant run by Koreans. One of our guest didn’t eat seafood and was allergic to shellfish and crustaceans but they could not guarantee that the kitchen could accommodate, so he had to have...More
Open since 2015, Black Rice is a Korean-run Japanese izakaya restaurant specializing in tapas. Conveniently located on Cambie, near the Vancouver Public Library and BC Place, this establishment is usually busy given that it’s situated in a high traffic corridor. I’ve been curious to try...More
Got take out here and the food was very delicious. Service was fast and the prices were decent. The aburi was delicious, definitely would want to check this out for dine in again soon.
We have been in this izakaya before it was fantastic. But this time the sushi smelled pretty bad. Also service was very bad. Some of waitresses were seems like trying to not eye contact to guests. Disappointed!
We went to Black Rice without a reservation on a Saturday night and got seated at the bar. Service was beyond attentive and genuinely friendly. Food was delicious. They had a special limited-time Korean feature menu, which we ordered off of - a spicy kimchee...More
Black Rice was such a good experience that my girlfriend and I had to go twice in a short 5 days trip to Vancouver. We were staying at Hotel Blu and Black Rice is right next to it. I personally lived in Tokyo for a...More
As a first time visitor to Black Rice Izakaya, I must emphasize that the food was really quite tremendous save for the O-Toro Sashimi, but resulted in a completely sullied culinary experience as a result of the terrible servicing. At least a third of the...More
This place is amazing, from the food to the service everything is on point(I’m sitting in the restaurant writing this) ! Some of the most unique and amazing menu items as well to top it off. When my partner and I move to the city...More
The restaurant seemed pretty basic but the menu looked fabulous and we ordered a lot of different plates and were delighted with everything. We would definitely come back here, it wasn’t pretentious or over-priced like some of the other spots people rave about in Vancouver.
Really nice staff, good function on everything even though the place was crowded! Food was delicious!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7952045-Reviews-Black_Rice_Izakaya-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Blarney Stone,"We stopped here for lunch during a City tour after a cruise. The waiter was friendly and the food and drinks were good. We had the whole restaurant to ourselves for awhile so it was romantic! I would eat here again.
Food not very good, over crowded and the ladies bathroom was absolutely disgusting, the stench of urine made me sick to my stomach and put off the place. Will definitely never go back or recommend to anyone.
Service was sub-par, for sure, The servers were more interested in complaining about their vapid lives outside on the sidewalk. Food was pretty okay. Drinks prices were good for happy hour. I doubt I would go back, but it was a serviceable visit.
My boyfriend and I have about 40 years experience in hospitality between the two of us, and last night we decided to stop and have a night cap after dinner. Both of us have never experienced a worst bartender in our entire lives. He was...More
Great night out in Vancouver. We chose the place to start the evening because of the name (reminded us about our honeymoon), and came back later because of the bartender and the ambiance.
We visited and had the Meat Lovers Pizza. It is absolutely loaded with all kinds and meat and thick cheese. It was delicious.
We stopped in here while in awe of Gastown... the atmosphere here was so welcoming. The staff was amazing as well. Very well sanitized.
i ordered double crown with pelegrino with lime twist...the server natasha asked if i knew this drink is expensive..wtf???i just got profiled that i cant afford the drink ? gastown irish pub customer i guess are mostly skid and rif raff? low income folks...... how...More
Great fun with Live music great bartenders in Gastown so much fun. Highly recommended . Will definitely go again especially once Covid ends
We booked a table out a week before and had an upper level booth. Loved our seats as they looked down in band and dance floor. We were surprised how great the food was. Super fun night!
I went with friends for a Halloween night! i did not eat just drank and had a great night with live music, the band was great and the atmosphere was super cool
It was our first impression after landing in Canada. We had nice food, despite the small difficulties when ordering. As per usual in BC they have a nice beer menu. Staff was friendly.
We stopped in for dinner and to watch the end of a baseball game. We had chicken pot pie with a side salad, grilled salmon with quinoa and roasted vegetables, and beers. We expected typical pub quality food, but were surprised that it was more...More
You would imagine that going out to an Irish pub in Vancouver would be something that you and your girlfriend would enjoy. You would also imagine that after paying a C$78 bill you would, at least, be respected as any other person should be. Not...More
If you want a decent pint and decent food with the addition of colourful locals, then this is your place. Street side tables enable you to witness what can only be described as a Victorian freak show, think the cast of the Greatest Showman who...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971294-Reviews-Blarney_Stone-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
BlowFish Sushi & Japanese Food,"I came here for the first time and loved both the variety of food and ambience. Nice decor inside. I had the Blowfish combo and for $2 extra had wild salmon. The 3 small pieces of salmon were sliced thin and I found it to...More
First time making a visit to this restaurant. I had a soup with beef and we also had the Dragon tail. It was all good.
This place is decent. Some food is really good. Price is reasonable. If you are going to an event at pne this would be a decent place to stop.
Great place to go for a quick and fresh sushi. The combos are really great and the staff very welcoming.
Blowfish is my neighbourhood sushi restaurant and I go there often. The food is fresh and always good. My favourites are the gomae (no peanuts!), Tuna Tataki, Mango Island Roll, octopus balls and pumpkin croquettes. They have great Sashimi and Nigiri boxes too. Takeout can...More
A big group ordered sushi from this location - portions were very small and my sashimi was quite slimy. Co-workers also were not impressed with the quality/quantity.
We all had blowfish combos night. The California roll was delicious and the chicken teriyaki was tasty as well. Wait staff were friendly and helped with tourist questions. Very nice time was had by all.
Tried Blowfish last night, and were pretty happy with it. Lazy Sunday night, so we got delivery - driver was prompt and friendly. Gomae is always a good test - it came with no gooey sauce, just a nutty sesame dressing, very good. Dynamite rolls...More
All I can say is this place has the best nigiri sushi in Vancouver for the best price. Wild salmon for $2.20. That is unbeatable. Eat here! Park on the street as the parking in front is really skinny.
Love their sushi! It is the place we always do take out or sit in. They now have a sweet potato croquette ... Yummers! it is soooo good - and their deep fried avocado dish is great! What an interesting take on doing avocado. The...More
I have been here solo and then returned with family. Both visits offered amazing food and good service. Will visit again!
Second time to Vancouver and second time this place has served the best food of the trip. Ordered a whole bunch (fried rolls are just incredible) whilst with friends and there's no complaints across the board. Next time I visit Vancouver I dare say it'll...More
Great Food with very reasonable pricing. I have driven from Port Moody to this restaurant just to pick up my order from them (There are many many sushi restaurants but this is far the best I know in regards to price-quality-service).
Very good sushi. Super fresh. We had tuna and salmon sashimi and the crazy blaster roll and rainbow. All very very good. Too bad no nice cold beer here but definitely a great dinner!
I've actually eaten twice here today, once for lunch and once for evening take-away. Sat down in the restaurant, served by a lovely young lady who was not only very helpful but extremely nice. We ordered the 3 roll meal combos, sushi was very delicious...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1806950-Reviews-BlowFish_Sushi_Japanese_Food-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Blue Hat Bistro at Pacific Institute of Culinary Arts,"Thanksgiving Feast Takeout. We ordered the feast for 2. It included Turkey breast, buttermilk mashed potatoes, herb stuffing with cranberries, glazed carrots and Roasted Brussel sprouts and a container of turkey gravy. Another side was the Beet salad with greens and vinaigrette. It came with...More
We picked our Turkey and fixings Package and as we ordered for two we guessed we’d have two dinners for two & were right & more! We heated easily with few tweaks to instructions & ate less than half early due to some family reasons......More
Never been here before but always walking by. Well ordered a birthday cake (the Broadway) and have to say everyone thought it was incredible, beautiful and elegant. My friend had a raspberry scone and she thought it was the best. Went back to take one...More
I’d been here once before, many years ago... my parents were in town and we have been to many of our faves before so I decided to take them to The Blue Hat Bistro for something different. It did not disappoint... Clams, Beet Terrine, Salmon,...More
Excellent muffins! What a great location - no need to go all the way into Granville island if you want a good coffee and some food.
Thanks for visiting us! Happy that you love our muffins. See you again soon!
We only discovered Blue Hat Bistro through Dine Out Vancouver and were blown away! The 3-course lunch menu was only $25 and included beautifully displayed dishes made with fresh ingredients creatively combined to make a delightful meal - impressive! Talk about the perfect balance of...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us 5* review! We happy you found us and appreciate you feedback. We'll pass your compliments on to Michael.
We were on a Road Scholar tour of Vancouver and it included a visit to the Pacific Institute of Culinary Arts. The tour that Chef Ben gave us was great but the lunch we were served was wonderful. The service was friendly and informative. The...More
Hi Doug, Thank you for sharing your 5* review! We're so pleased to hear you enjoyed your tour with Chef Ben and that you had a wonderful experience in our bistro. We will pass your compliments on the students and the rest of the team....More
The restaurant is of moderate size but spacious. Tables near the kitchen may find it noisy. They offer a fixed price menu with five or six options in terms of appetizers, main courses and desserts. The quality of most dishes was quite high but my...More
Hello Brian. Thanks for taking the time to post your review! Your feedback is so valuable to the students' experience and we will be sure to share it with them. We hope to welcome you to Blue Hat Bistro again soon. Best regards, The PICAchef...More
Matthieu the Matrie’d welcomed us and as it was September explained that the students had only been cooking in the kitchen for two days as it was the start of term. Before that , the students had spent three months in the classroom and kitchens...More
Your words are too kind. We are very fortunate to run one of Western Canada's finest culinary education training academies with such an awesome and committed team. Mathieu, Alex, faculty, students and staff live by our motto ""Continuous Improvement and a Commitment to Excellence"". We...More
We were here 5 years ago when it was called Bistro 101 and had been looking forward to returning. We loved it even more than the first time. We arrived a day early because I had it wrong on my calendar, but Matthieu, the maitre'd,...More
We're happy to hear that Mathieu made your recent visit to Blue Hat Bistro a memorable one! Thank you for your 5* review and your kind compliments. We will pass them on to the students and their chef-instructors. We look forward to welcoming you again...More
Despite average service, I’m rating this a 5 because the food was excellent and our server was very friendly. I recommend everyone add this to a lunch spot list when visiting Vancouver @ Granville Island.
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a 5* review! We are always striving to make the dining experience at our student-run Blue Hat Bistro the best it can be. Your feedback means a lot!
After 2 wks of hamburger (this is dramatic for Italians as me) we approched this restaurant. Fantastic! Finally someone Who really cooks with attention to details and ingredients
Thank you for your 5* review! It means a lot to us that you so kindly took the time to write a post about your experience in Blue Hat Bistro. We'll pass on your comments to the Chefs and students!
Enjoyed a great meal with lovely views overlooking Granville Island. The three course Table d’Hote menu had lots of choice. The Alberta steak was beautifully cooked and truly outstanding. Our waitress Liselle was very personable and professional, amazing really as seemingly it was only her...More
Thanks for joining us at Blue Hat Bistro at Pacific Institute of Culinary Arts. Your 5* review is sincerely appreciated as the students and their chef-instructors strive for excellence in everything they do. We will pass on you kind compliments to the team!
I've been there twice. First time is an a-la-carte lunch which was very tasty. Only the presentation needed to be enhanced. Last one was a buffet lunch which was good too. Like the way their staff came to check and asked for comments. You can...More
Hi Christine. Thanks for taking to the time to comment on your recent experience at Blue Hat Bistro at Pacific Institute of Culinary Arts! As we are a teaching facility, your feedback is valuable learning for our students. They will be so pleased to know...More
Last week we attended the ‘West Coast Culinary Experience’ at the Pacific Institute of Culinary Arts (PICA), and it was a fantastic experience! We started off with a tour of Granville Island. To be honest, I was not anticipating much since I have been to...More
Thanks for joining us for our ""West Coast Culinary Experience""! We're happy to know that you had a good time and learned something new too. We'll pass your compliments on to the entire team. See you again soon!",26,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707621-Reviews-Blue_Hat_Bistro_at_Pacific_Institute_of_Culinary_Arts-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Blue Water Cafe,"Recently had my first opportunity to dine at Bleu Water and the restaurant not only lived up to its reputation, it absolutely exceeded it! We dinned here as part of a larger group in the private dining area. Right from the start, the service, and...More
I hosted a celebratory meal in one of the private rooms, and it was a flawless evening. The Atlantic Room was gorgeous (like dining in a lavish wine cellar, but with natural light from the French windows that face the terrace), and the dishes were...More
Amazing service.. terrific bar and selections. The host at the front entrance was terrific! Benny the bartender made for great conversation and Benny the waiter defined service! Outdoor dining made the atmosphere great! Remember… you get what you pay for and this was well worth...More
This restaurant has a great choice of seafood but also fresh sushi chefs on the premises. It’s smart compared to a lot of other restaurants (white table clothes) but it’s lovely terrace is a great spot to eat. Good food.
Some of the best sushi I’ve had. Fresh, delicious fish that melts in our mouth. Well decorated / presented dishes. Excellent service. Relaxing outdoor setting. Reasonable pricing. We came here twice during our visit to Vancouver because this restaurant definitely beat the other high-end spots...More
Ate here in June 2023 due to excellent reviews online. Family of 3 of us, we were having a great evening in Blue Water with excellent food, drinks and service up until before we were offered dessert a mouse ran right by our table. I...More
We adore the Blue Water Cafe. The staff are very accommodating, the food is exceptional, it's one of the very few if only bookable patios (a huge plus) and it's consistent from one visit to the next. The Blue Water Cafe is where we go...More
We had a private room as we were hosting 50 people for a dinner the night before the wedding. The food, the service exquisite and over the top customer service.
Our family celebrated two birthdays at the Blue Water Cafe in Vancouver British Columbia. We have frequented the restaurant over several years and the experience was always excellent. This time dinning with 19 family members the experience was even more rewarding and fulfilling. We dinned...More
This eatery has been on our “Must Do” list for a long time, so when we were in town on business, we booked a table. The word that describes our experience would be outstanding. The service was spot on and the food was amazing. Yes,...More
Best seafood restaurant we have ever experienced in Canada!! The food was soo fresh and soo well priced. We ordered the Blue water tower and I have never left feeling so full, my body was saying stop but it tasted soo good. We will 100%...More
Massive disappointment from my visit for my family’s birthday dinner last Sunday as they overlooked our 3 main courses and kept us waiting for about 40 mins before they were served at 8:54pm. The servers taking care of my table were too busy with the...More
There are so many great dining spots in Vancouver, but this one really stands out. We had two of the cocktails - the sequoia and the provencal G&T. We started with the seafood tower (2-tier) and the dragon roll and then split the halibut. All...More
The best in the Vancouver, if you like sea fruits i recommend. My friends have eaten in there they recommend and i recommend too.
The food and service exceeded expectation. As a professional Alaskan fisherman, who is used to catching and cooking his own seafood, can say the chefs at Blue Water Cafe honored the King Salmon. Cooked to “just right” and subtly seasoned the Salmon melted in the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d702167-Reviews-Blue_Water_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Blvd Bistro,"Great spot if you want to support local- friendly, efficient service and amazing food. We ate there 2x during our six day stay in the area.
Best brunch in town. I’ve been checking brunch spots for a year and that was the best in everything. From ambiance and service (shout out to Vojtech) to presentation and AMAZING taste. Got the pulled pork and can’t wait to come back.
From presentation to flavor this Place Rocks!! The pulled pork is amaning, need to try other options next time...
Be aware that you cannot be seated if the whole group is not present at arrival. Another pretentious place to avoid
Stumbled across this place for brunch on a Sunday and so glad we did! Delicious food, prepared with care and great service. Will be back for sure. My Dad has fallen in love with the banana macadamia nut pancakes! If you're in the area, eat...More
I’m sure the food here is okay but their time estimates for the wait times was off by 30-35 mins. We had to make other plans as we catching a ferry. Be more professional!
Last weekend we were in Vancouver to visit our son and before heading out on the sea to sky highway he took us to BLVD for our friday morning breakfast. A short waiting list and they sat us in the garden patio ... wonderful. The...More
I’ve been here 4 times and have not been disappointed. I like the menu selection, and while you can find cheaper places, the quality of ingredients and the execution of the meal are on par with the price so I would say it’s overall good...More
Had an excellent breakfast this morning out on the back patio. Really nice atmosphere. We had the cinnamon French toast with a side of maple bacon and it was really good. Get there early as it apparently gets busy fast.
While the food is tasty (although overpriced), I absolutely did not appreciate being asked to leave not 3 minutes after I had paid, so others could be seated. I understand this is a small restaurant, but it felt like a 'You've paid and we're done...More
In my top 2 favourite breakfast restaurants in North Van. Simple and delicious. A little pricey but definitely worth every penny, and the service is great
Cute spot for breakfast! Looking at the reviews we knew this hot spot would be busy and we were on a tight schedule so we got here right before they opened. Looks like we weren't the only ones with that idea. I ordered the Mean...More
Great food, simple menu, staff following covid protocols to the letter. Requires a few simple modifications for those restricting carbs.
Blvd took a smart approach to our current takeout-only world and designed options that will travel well. The standard Bennie on potato bread pudding (came with Hollandaise in a separate container) was really tasty and more enjoyable than a piece of bread. The breakfast paella...More
Excellent brunch! Busy place but for good reason :) I had one of the eggs benedict dishes, can’t remember the name, had basil infused tomatoes on it- delicious!!! Highly recommend! Can’t wait to go again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d8067175-Reviews-Blvd_Bistro-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bob Likes Thai Food,"Food was scrumptious. Patricks recommendations are not to be missed! The Green Curry was exceptional, the Mango Rice was divine!
Food was scrumptious. Patricks recommendations are not to be missed! The Green Curry was exceptional, the Mango Rice was divine!
I was excited to try the food however I was served grey curry not green curry with mounds of fresh chilli which I could not even eat or enjoy. Did not even ask for hot ! Disappointing!!!
I was excited to try the food however I was served grey curry not green curry with mounds of fresh chilli which I could not even eat or enjoy. Did not even ask for hot ! Disappointing!!!
Absolutely delicious thai food. Super authentic! The poutine (basically thai nachos) and the shrimp salad were super flavorful and tasty. Really fantastic. The tom ka gai soup was also superb. Highly recommend!
Absolutely delicious thai food. Super authentic! The poutine (basically thai nachos) and the shrimp salad were super flavorful and tasty. Really fantastic. The tom ka gai soup was also superb. Highly recommend!
The food was not bad- it was pretty good. But it was so over priced. The portion sizes are very small, and expensive! Highly recommend trying someone where else.
The food was not bad- it was pretty good. But it was so over priced. The portion sizes are very small, and expensive! Highly recommend trying someone where else.
Go to a cheaper Thai place like Thai Basil and you’ll have tastier food worth every cent! Given this is my favourite cuisine, I’ve had my fair share of Thai food in Vancouver I was expecting a flavourful wow dish, sadly I was disappointed. My...More
Go to a cheaper Thai place like Thai Basil and you’ll have tastier food worth every cent! Given this is my favourite cuisine, I’ve had my fair share of Thai food in Vancouver I was expecting a flavourful wow dish, sadly I was disappointed. My...More
So, I googled this place and talked it up to the group I was with. I knew it would be a hole in the wall but I didn't think it would be as shabby as it was. The service started out great and then went...More
So, I googled this place and talked it up to the group I was with. I knew it would be a hole in the wall but I didn't think it would be as shabby as it was. The service started out great and then went...More
Also checkout their new fast location Bob Puchannna on Robson street! FANTASTIC Thai food! All Bob Likes Thai locations serve up great selections of yummy ethentic thai dishes!!
Also checkout their new fast location Bob Puchannna on Robson street! FANTASTIC Thai food! All Bob Likes Thai locations serve up great selections of yummy ethentic thai dishes!!
Short wait for a table on a Saturday night but staff was efficient and friendly. The servings were big enough for two to share. Note that rice has to be ordered extra but there are choices (jasmine, sticky).
Short wait for a table on a Saturday night but staff was efficient and friendly. The servings were big enough for two to share. Note that rice has to be ordered extra but there are choices (jasmine, sticky).
We Went to this restaurant with friends. The food was very good but we ended with our first course and mains all plonked on our tiny table at the same time. If you go ask for the first course to come on it's own. It's...More
We Went to this restaurant with friends. The food was very good but we ended with our first course and mains all plonked on our tiny table at the same time. If you go ask for the first course to come on it's own. It's...More
Service was great. Restaurant has a nice, cozy vibe. I ordered the green curry (my favorite Thai dish) and it was excellent. Perfect amount of spiciness.
Service was great. Restaurant has a nice, cozy vibe. I ordered the green curry (my favorite Thai dish) and it was excellent. Perfect amount of spiciness.
My wife and I each had a lunch special today, beef with ginger and chicken cashew nut. Both dishes were excellent. The service was fast and friendly and the prices very reasonable. Highly recommended.
My wife and I each had a lunch special today, beef with ginger and chicken cashew nut. Both dishes were excellent. The service was fast and friendly and the prices very reasonable. Highly recommended.
A group of 19 of us came to Vancouver last Saturday for a week trip. Tonight, our last night in town we finally organize a group takeout meal of Thai food. 11 of the 19 of us ordered (i found Bob Likes Thai) on TripAdvisor...More
A group of 19 of us came to Vancouver last Saturday for a week trip. Tonight, our last night in town we finally organize a group takeout meal of Thai food. 11 of the 19 of us ordered (i found Bob Likes Thai) on TripAdvisor...More
We went on a Thai food hunt one hungry Saturday. We were tired of the usual and really wanted something different. Thai places are far and few in Vancity, and most aren't too great. Thanks to Google reviews, we did the calculations based on reviews...More
We went on a Thai food hunt one hungry Saturday. We were tired of the usual and really wanted something different. Thai places are far and few in Vancity, and most aren't too great. Thanks to Google reviews, we did the calculations based on reviews...More
After hearing years of positive reviews, we finally decided to experience Bob Likes Thai Food for ourselves and were certainly not disappointed to say the least. The restaurant is a bit of a ""hole in the wall"" with substandard seating and the like, but serves...More
After hearing years of positive reviews, we finally decided to experience Bob Likes Thai Food for ourselves and were certainly not disappointed to say the least. The restaurant is a bit of a ""hole in the wall"" with substandard seating and the like, but serves...More
Two thumbs up for fast and fresh. The vibe here is casual, but you can tell everyone had been there once or twice before. We were interested in trying the restaurant for lunch and noticed a really good variety on the menu, including options for...More
Two thumbs up for fast and fresh. The vibe here is casual, but you can tell everyone had been there once or twice before. We were interested in trying the restaurant for lunch and noticed a really good variety on the menu, including options for...More
The Thai food was delicious! We shared the Thai poutine (gorgeous coconut dressing!), chicken satay, spring rolls and vegetable red Thai curry. Each dish was so yummy and we would happily eat it all again. Lovely and quick service too. Thank you!
The Thai food was delicious! We shared the Thai poutine (gorgeous coconut dressing!), chicken satay, spring rolls and vegetable red Thai curry. Each dish was so yummy and we would happily eat it all again. Lovely and quick service too. Thank you!
I just ordered takeout of 2 dishes and 2 appetizers yesterday. I was sorely disappointed. The servings were shockingly pathetic !!! Because it was for a get-together, i was so embarrassed. I would never eat there again.
I just ordered takeout of 2 dishes and 2 appetizers yesterday. I was sorely disappointed. The servings were shockingly pathetic !!! Because it was for a get-together, i was so embarrassed. I would never eat there again.
Yummy Thai food! We ordered online and loved it. The sticky rice was sooo yummy, too. The portion size was so good.
Yummy Thai food! We ordered online and loved it. The sticky rice was sooo yummy, too. The portion size was so good.
Great service and food, lunch was hot and delicious. Had a nice quiet corner where we could discuss some business.
Great service and food, lunch was hot and delicious. Had a nice quiet corner where we could discuss some business.
We just loved this small and funky restaurant. Had some wonderful small dished off the menu and some special dishes for the evening. Everything off the menu is great - just order to your taste.
We just loved this small and funky restaurant. Had some wonderful small dished off the menu and some special dishes for the evening. Everything off the menu is great - just order to your taste.
Finally a great Pad Thai dish! Had the proper favour profile of tangy and zesty, with fresh prawns and ingredients. Sorry no pic.
Finally a great Pad Thai dish! Had the proper favour profile of tangy and zesty, with fresh prawns and ingredients. Sorry no pic.
It was my first time to Bob Likes Thai and I'd definitely return. The Choo Chi Pla (fish curry main) was very good - tender fish and well flavoured. However, the Koong Prah prawn appie was stupendous! The blending of strong but not overwhelming lemongrass,...More
It was my first time to Bob Likes Thai and I'd definitely return. The Choo Chi Pla (fish curry main) was very good - tender fish and well flavoured. However, the Koong Prah prawn appie was stupendous! The blending of strong but not overwhelming lemongrass,...More
So ambiance is definitely not what you're after? This hole-in-the-wall in that now fashionable blocks of Main Street makes no effort or pretense at dining but brings the street food of Bangkok into a plain little diner-like establishment. All dishes were tasty- we had pad...More
So ambiance is definitely not what you're after? This hole-in-the-wall in that now fashionable blocks of Main Street makes no effort or pretense at dining but brings the street food of Bangkok into a plain little diner-like establishment. All dishes were tasty- we had pad...More
Very friendly staff and quick lunch. My son loved the chicken kebabs and coconut rice. I had Bobs Fish and chips and I would order it again if I didn’t want to try other dishes!
Very friendly staff and quick lunch. My son loved the chicken kebabs and coconut rice. I had Bobs Fish and chips and I would order it again if I didn’t want to try other dishes!
Quaint little hidden gem of a Thai food place. A bit hard to get around as it such a tight space but the curry portions are good. Rice is extra so it adds up a bit. Definitely recommend
Quaint little hidden gem of a Thai food place. A bit hard to get around as it such a tight space but the curry portions are good. Rice is extra so it adds up a bit. Definitely recommend
This is our go to Thai place for take out. We go there every few weeks. As they are not licensed I'm not rushing to dine in. Love the food and the friendly service!
This is our go to Thai place for take out. We go there every few weeks. As they are not licensed I'm not rushing to dine in. Love the food and the friendly service!
Went here for the first time and this place is very good. Got the MIANG KHAM, PANANG BEEF and the PAD PIK KING CHICKEN. Really good. The Miang Kham is excellent. Bites!!!Both the beef and chicken are excellent. Portions are good. Will go back.
Went here for the first time and this place is very good. Got the MIANG KHAM, PANANG BEEF and the PAD PIK KING CHICKEN. Really good. The Miang Kham is excellent. Bites!!!Both the beef and chicken are excellent. Portions are good. Will go back.
One of my favourite places for Pad Thai. They make it right with authentic ingredients, no silly ingredients like ketchup. I like how they pay attention to detail including adding a wedge of lime, peanuts and sprouts. Yummy for dine in and take out.
One of my favourite places for Pad Thai. They make it right with authentic ingredients, no silly ingredients like ketchup. I like how they pay attention to detail including adding a wedge of lime, peanuts and sprouts. Yummy for dine in and take out.
- small busy Thai food on Main - ordered tung yam kung soup large size, it’s deliciously done, a bit sweeter than the average yam kung soup - a traditional snack popular in Myanmar and south east Asia- Miang kham - served in a plate...More
- small busy Thai food on Main - ordered tung yam kung soup large size, it’s deliciously done, a bit sweeter than the average yam kung soup - a traditional snack popular in Myanmar and south east Asia- Miang kham - served in a plate...More
It was time to finally go in. Overall very good eating experience. We came in later on a week night so it was not that busy. We enjoyed the Miang Khan bite sized snacks, Green chicken curry, jasmine rice, Pad thai and a thai iced...More
It was time to finally go in. Overall very good eating experience. We came in later on a week night so it was not that busy. We enjoyed the Miang Khan bite sized snacks, Green chicken curry, jasmine rice, Pad thai and a thai iced...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3941704-Reviews-Bob_Likes_Thai_Food-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bodega on Main,"We were at another restaurant and the server was terrible and rude so we left. This was close so we walked in and they were able to accommodate us. AS Bob Ross says there are no mistakes just happy little accidents. Everything was great the...More
Bodega has been around for a very long time and still serves excellent dishes, coupled with friendly staff. Was served by ""Daniel""; who certainly knew his metier in regards to food and wine. After all, he is the ""Director of Wine"" there :) Will surely...More
Had friends in town who wanted to check this out. It wasn’t terrible it just wasn’t great. The room was great. The food let it down but my friend ordered and maybe some different selections would have been better. Service was functional. We had been...More
We enjoyed our visit to bodega on Main. It was loud, brash and alive. The service was fine, and the food might have been better but was still pretty good. I suppose this is a tapas thing, but everything tasted like it had been sitting...More
It is one of the best authentic Spanish Tapes and seafood dishes outside North Spain , ( Bilbao ) , happy to say I got invited to my Spanish friend's Dad 90 Birthday at the Bodega on Main Street , large group , over 20...More
We are a Spanish couple that went for dinner with a couple of friends last night. We had been at Bodega already only and we were not impressed but decided to give it another try. The place is well decorated but it was just too...More
We had an unreal dining experience here for my sister's birthday. We love Tapas and everything we ordered was unreal. The service was great and the drinks were amazing. Definitely would recommend checking this place out and we will definitely be returning soon.
I hadn’t been to Bodega in decades. At another location on Main Street near the Pacific Central Station. The 4 of us shared a bit of everything. For starters we shared the charcuterie board from Spain (very tasty) with grilled bread. We had the meatballs...More
We'll recommended and did not disappoint! Excellent vibe, great decor and a very enjoyable evening. Tip top service, food kept coming, great suggestions and excellent service! Bravo! I think we tried everything on the menu from the paela Negra to the squid, garlic prawns, meatballs...More
Waited there for appetizer , food came before appetizer, asked water for 5 times. Music was way too loud and waitresses were not paying attention at all. Would not recommend it's just waste of your time and money
Everything is very good and really Spanish. A trip to Spain in Vancouver. Tiny restaurant very clean and very safe. We really enjoyed our lunch there.
We were having a great time on this October 17th night until one of the waitresses told us no rush but you have to go as we will be needing the table soon. I know when we arrived we only had the table for two...More
Now that you hesitate to book a tour to Spain due to current situation, Bodega is the next best place to experience Spain. 3-6 Happy Hour is a real good deal, Sangria, tapas and the figs covered with chocolate is sooo delicious. The servers are...More
Authentic Spanish Tapas, excellent food and great service! Ambiance is very nice, candle lit at night. Fairly big restaurant, with a large banquet room downstairs for bigger parties/special occasions.
This restaurant was excellent. The employees do not look snobby. The food selection as well as the wine selection was good. The food was very good and the time it took to get it to the table was reasonable. They need to pay attention to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8773755-Reviews-Bodega_on_Main-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bombay Kitchen + Bar,"This restaurant has an enjoyable outdoor seating area on a not very busy street. The food is first rate even if the service was somewhat slow - perhaps because we were outside. When the owner came to see how things were, everything moved along quickly....More
Relaxed, appealing atmosphere and fabulously good, authentic, desi Indian food — complex and sophisticated flavours to the daal (with curry leaves!) and baingan bharta. It was packed, and we were the only non-South Asian people there. It's new and so no surprises that service felt...More
Nice, cosy place to dine in. The cuisine is nearly authentic Indian, though there is scope of improvement. The staff is very courteous and warm, especially Ashmeet, who carry a smile and are prompt to attend to your requests.
Great to have Bombay Kitchen in the neighborhood! The food was excellent and the service was quick and friendly. Lots of happy customers when we were there. Glad to see that people are as excited as we are to have them on the West End!
i was in this one at denmainstreet, nearby english bay, the food was really delicous, i had a vegetarien dish with cauliflower, potatoes.. we have to wait 30minutes but it was worthy the staff were very friendly
Against local advice, we went there out of convenience. We arrived early. The place was not crowded. Very slow initial service and went downhill from there. Food was ""Indian"" only because it contained some of the Indian spices. I would never return there. They sould...More
Excellent service. Fantastic flavours. Friendly staff. And all very quick. This was excellent Indian food. My only criticism is to put a bit more meat in the Korma and Butter Chicken. It was a lot of sauce.
A comfortable and casual Indian restaurant with friendly staff and wonderful curries. Complete with Kingfisher Beer! We’ll be back.
Went to dinner here while visiting a friend. We sat outside as the weather was nice. The service was fine; they were clearly busy but we had no issue with that. The food was generally good, however we were focused to leave as at least...More
The place was empty when arrived (and left). Stood at the entrance waiting for a few minutes until a chap got up at the table by us and offered to seat us. Loud music and the same chap walking back and forth talking loudly into...More
We visited as part of a food tour of South Granville. Very tasty samosas and chicken wings. Lovely staff and very smart premises.
It was time to get Indian food fix along Commercial drive. We very much enjoyed our chicken tikka, lamb kalya, and keema naan. The food and service were excellent. Tables are physically spaced out and lots of hand sanitizer. Plenty of pay street parking.
At 12.95 plus tax this luncheon buffet is extremely good value and offered 7 days a week. Two meat dishes, usually either chicken curry or butter chicken and one other meat - we had beef once and a delicious goat curry another day (our Fiji...More
Not my favourite. It didn't taste like butter chicken, more like spicyish rosé pasta sauce with giant chunks of overcooked/hard chicken. I really wanted to like this, I had high hopes for this place and wanted to support a neighborhood restaurant.More
Holly-Ann, we are saddened that we were unable to meet your expectations. We would like to assure you that we strive to meet and exceed all customer expectations. While we cannot confirm whether your butter chicken was an error of our chefs or simply a...More
The best indian restaurant in many ways ..best food ,professional service, Amazing owner ...love their style of business!",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15067755-Reviews-Bombay_Kitchen_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bombay Masala Indian Restaurant,"We had difficulty getting reservations because no one was available to answer the phone or email request. Wanted to eat here because they can cook gluten free and we had a celiac in our group. Restaurant was incredibly noisy due to a very loud chiming...More
Have had takeaway twice from here over the past couple of months and the food was delicious. Chicken Jalfrezi the best I've had anywhere and the Garlic Naan excellent and fresh. I've tried many Indian restaurants around Vancouver but don't need to try anywhere else...More
We just had dinner at Bombay Masala and it was amazing. They had a very extensive menu, and everything we ordered was great. I'll definitely be going back soon.
absolutely delicious food, the service is great, the restaurant is a nice place, highly recommend it to you, I gave five stars.
Absolutely terrific food and incredible service. Everything we had was amazing!! Definitely worth checking out.
As an Indian food cook, I am very critical of taste and portion size. Our first time dining at this restaurant we chose to order from the “Vancouver Dine out Menu” . A mountain of tasty fish pakoras appetizers arrived at our table accompanied by...More
Delicious food, we’ve enjoyed take out 3 times recently. Bhindi Bhazi is to die for and the Saag - chicken and lamb - combines the food and flavours wonderfully.
My wife and I had a nice meal at the restaurant recently, which has replaced the upscale French restaurant that had been at that location. The Coconut Chicken Curry was very nice, as was the peshwari naan. The service was excellent, and the atmosphere was...More
We love Indian food and were intrigued when we saw a new restaurant in the 'hood. We decided to check it out tonight and ordered take out. Their website made it super easy to order. The food is absolutely divine. We had a hard time...More",9,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21088880-Reviews-Bombay_Masala_Indian_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bon's Off Broadway,"Back to Bon's after over 2 years of being away due to the Pandemic. Things seem to be back to normal for the most part, except prices are way up. Me and my friend used to get away for under $10 for 2 breakfast and...More
breakfast special for 2 and coffee comes to 12 bucks, its sitdown and some people dont realize that you get up to get your refills if you want them quicker, its allowed just dont crowd the coffee bar lol. Same for the water. Breakfast special...More
I used to go to Bon's regularly about 30 years ago. Breakfast was good and cheap, and the decor was decent with old movie posters and framed photos of personalities on the wall. Not any more. The place has turned into a rundown pile of...More
Awesome food and Awesome service!! Its the place to eat breakfast! Reasonable to super cheap for what you are offered to eat . Yum Yum and ive never been here before, However i will be back. Dont forget to tip the waitress PLEASE
Since moving to Vancouver, I'd been told to try this place for breakfast - it definitely presents like the quintessential greasy spoon - and the cheapest breakfast in town! My neice and I finally found the opportunity on a Saturday morning to check it out....More
The food was decent and the price (for the breakfast special) was awesome! The ambiance was interesting - felt a little greasy. Certainly a good option if your looking for somewhere inexpensive for breakfast.
I don't even know how to write this review because the truth is this place is kind of beyond description. The draw must be the cheap and filling food. To put it nicely, if you don't mind who you eat with or what the place...More
First I want to start by saying I've been going to Bon's for about 15 years now and absolutely love it. My one star review is not reflecting the restaurant as a whole, but one particular server. There is an older blonde female server who...More
We have been here many times. Usually have the breakfast special (good portion!), one getting the delicious breakfast sausages and the other one the bacon (which is ok) plus some pancakes and orange and grapefruit juice, yum! Will come back, over and over again :)
Wow Vancouver has some high end options for sure, it is nice to see some places still allow those with little spare cash to get quality food. Yes $2.99 breakfast still rocks Serve yourself coffee for $1 Sandwich/soup special is $3.95 While the vintage mismatched,...More
Where else in City in Vancouver can you get a full breakfast for $2.95 and a coffee for $1.00. Coffee is also bottomless. Coffee today was strong.
I really don't think there's a less expensive option out there. (they advertise a two egg with sausage or ham breakfast for $2.95). I had 3 eggs with sausage, no toast and a side order of bacon. Pre-tip it came to $8.40 (taxes in). Their...More
When we first arrived here, 2 years ago I was afraid it was a biker place.(we're from a small town on Vancouver Island) Everyone outside was tough looking with tats everywhere. But we ventured in and were blown away by the energy, the hustle and...More
We visited Bon’s off Broadway around noon.. the place was packed! We waited about 15 minutes before being seated but it was worth the wait. Pricing is unbeatable for the portions you get. Down side being it is street parking only and the streets directly...More
this is where you find good and inexpensive food that'll fill you up with friendly service. can't beat the prices here.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d811825-Reviews-Bon_s_Off_Broadway-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Boston Pizza,"Being from the states, we were not familiar with a Boston Pizza place but it was close to our hotel so convenient..we were very pleasantly surprised..I had a delicious Caesar salad and my friend tried their Spinach and Mushroom Bake..she was ""over the moon"" with...More
Thank you for the 5-star review! We're glad to see you enjoyed the Caesar salad and the Spinach and Mushroom Bake. See you again soon!
My husband, 6year old and I went to have dinner. He ordered the jambalaya fettuccine with dr. pepper, I got the big bite sandwich with a Pepsi and mango margarita, and my son got the pizza with gummy worms pudding and apple juice. When the...More
Hi, there. Thank you for visiting us and sharing a positive review! Come back soon!
This BP is next to the boat show entry / exit. It’s been extremely busy. We have been treated well, BP Food served up at n a timely fashion.
Hi, Penny! Thanks for the shout out! Jessica is certainly a huge asset to our team. We're glad to hear you enjoyed the food and the service. We hope to see you again soon!
Left BC Place Home Show icebox Friday nite to catch Canuck's 3rd period on BP's big screen on Beatty St. Result: Canucks had great comeback, but lost in OT; BP never made it over the boards. Numb from BC Place, so asked waitress to slow...More
Hi there, we're sorry to read this. Please share your feedback with us at https://bostonpizza.com/socialcontact so that we can improve. Thank you.
Typical Boston Pizza, the food is as expected. It isn't anything different than other locations however this is the best service I've had at any Boston Pizzas. The serving staff and manager are super nice and were quick to help out and take our orders....More
Thank you for the 4-star review, Wilson. Our team will definitely be happy to read what you wrote. It was a pleasure to serve you. See you next time! 😊🏒
Saturday night team dinner. 20 plates all at the same time. Excellent job done by the staff. I had a steak which was good but not perfect. The excellent friendly staff and this restaurant's location make up for the tiny shortfall on the steak. I...More
Thanks for the shout out, Harold! Guest comments are really important to us and we're glad you had fun and liked the service. Come back again soon! 😊
Staying at the JW nearby we decided to stop here on our last night for an early dinner before flying out early the next day plus I had a $50.00 e-certificate to use up. When we arrived it was not busy at all as it...More
Hi, there. We're sorry to hear about your recent experience and we would like the chance to look into this. Please share these details at https://bostonpizza.com/socialcontact so that we can follow up with the team involved. Thank you.
Walking by and looking for lunch saw a signboard advertising all day happy hour. 6dollar drinks 5 dollar wings. Went in and had a decent experience. When it came time to pay however they refused to honour advertised deal. Mentioned sign out front and still...More
Hi there, we're sorry to read this. Please share more details with us at https://bostonpizza.com/contact-us.html so that we can correct this situation. Thank you.
BOTH the staff and the management at this location are horrendously rude and lack customer service 110%. (BPs please contact me) My girlfriend and I went for a celebration dinner and were just getting started and had just ordered our food and drinks when being...More
Hi, there. We're sorry to hear about your experience and we would like the chance to look into this. Please share further details at https://bostonpizza.com/socialcontact. Thank you.
A good example of the Boston Pizza proposition. Menu is pretty much the same as other locations, service is pleasant and quick.
Thanks for the review. Sorry to see that you felt your visit was only a 3-star one. Please let us know if there is anything we could have done to make it better at https://bostonpizza.com/B6socialcontact. Thank you!
Great location, especially when there are events going on for right outside of the Stadium at the main ramp.
Thanks for the 5-star review, Judith! We're glad to hear this! 😊
Ate here after having lunch at a BP in Calgary. Good service and good food, very filling. Attentive staff.
Thank you for the positive review! We hope the next time you come we can provide you with a 5-star experience! See you again soon!
I admit that I enjoy Boston Pizza and I’m sure “Garry_BP,” the BP media relations manager, has noticed this. I’ve attended Boston Pizzas all across this province and into Alberta. A lot of people tend to give chains like BP a hard time simply because...More
Thank you for the 4-star review. Hopefully, we can make your next visit a 5-star one! See you again soon!
Great venue for drinks and food as well as watching all the latest NHL, NBA and NFC games on the huge screen. Staff were extremely helpful and polite and also remembered our drink combination from the previous visit. Highly recommend!
Thanks for the 5-star review! We're glad to hear this! 😊
Located right by my hotel, so popped in for dinner and so good went back another night. Really friendly staff, big portions and good value. Lots of screens showing various sports, so perfect if by yourself or if in a group and wanting to follow...More",29,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8051120-Reviews-Boston_Pizza-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Botanist,"On the plus side: The room inside The Fairmont hotel is beautiful. Softly lit (oh but read on) and warm and sophisticated. And the food is delicious. Turning seeds and roots and bulbs etc. into such delicious plates really is an art and the chef...More
Fantastic halibut dish that both my wife and I enjoyed. Large portion of fish in an excellent preparation. Good table service and good wines by the glass.
All I can say is AMAZING. We thoroughly enjoyed our evening eating at Botanist and Alyssa did an amazing job walking us through the menu! After discussing, we decided to take a chance on the We’ll Take it From Here which is a 6 course...More
We enjoyed breakfast daily during our stay at the Fairmont. We were so warmly welcomed by Jackie and Sahldy — they were both so lovely and attentive. Our eggs arrived hot and poached perfectly. Would highly recommend and return. Would also try to hire Jackie...More
Food was really good but service was slow. Cocktail served after meal service, not together. Music was way too loud. Could not have a conversation. Waitress said she would talk to DJ but husband did so half hour later. Too bad, we won’t be back...More
Elegant fine dining is the hallmark of this exceptional restaurant. The gracefully adorned spacious environment comprises a quixotic cocktail bar, an outdoor terrace garden with a profusion of plant life, a stylish dining room, and a tranquil lounge. Service is knowledgeable, discreet, highly proficient, and...More
This hotel is located in a gorgeous location right next to the harbour. As soon as you walk up the stairs to enter the Botanist you are greeted by bartenders and hosts. We sat with a beautiful view of the busy streets of Vancouver. A...More
This was the main place in the city we wanted to try, and it delivered. The tasting menu was fantastic, from the wagyu carpaccio (hard to mess that up!) to an inspired octopus/cilantro/jalepeno dish I'm still imagining weeks later, to steak that was served with...More
Five stars for sure, but we weren’t wowed. The place is beautiful and the service was really nice. The bread was really yummy and they were happy to give me more without my asking. We ordered the cavatelli and the tagliatelle. The tagliatelle were really...More
Would like to add a follow up to our unfortunate experience in December. Since then multiple Fairmont and Botanist reps contacted us directly to inquire about our health, apologize and provide updates on the internal investigation on what may have happened. Once the due diligence...More
The vegetarian holiday menu we experienced was outstanding. Never tasted anything like it. Truly the best vegetarian meal we have ever had. The service was spectacular and the variety of dishes was extraordinary. We loved the palate cleanser (mushroom marshmallow).
We had Christmas brunch here and it was terrific. From the ambience of the plants to the amazing service, to the excellent food and drinks it was a very magical holiday experience.
The restaurant is quite known for its elegant dining so we chose to celebrate our 15th wedding anniversary. We had a couple of cocktails ($18+, no longer handcrafted) and the we take it from here dining experience ($145pp). Our server was superb; she was so...More
Excellent food and atmosphere. Would highly recommend sitting near the pass. Not only was the food great but seeing all the chefs at work was really entertaining.
We adored our server; staff was lovely, wine & dessert excellent. Drinks too sweet (sent one back); salmon was practically inedible (also sent back). the other dishes were acceptable, but not spectacular. Ordered the halibut because the menu said it came with Dungeness crab. It...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12333692-Reviews-Botanist-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Boulevard Kitchen and Oyster Bar,"Fantastic food fantastic wine and cocktails and fantastic waiter Johnathon Highly recommend for a great vibe and exceptional food
I rarely give anything five stars… Because this means it is perfect with no room for improvement. However, I feel like I must give this a five star review because the Boulevard is excellent! Their raw bar is very well appointed — and they have...More
We had a great meal and the staff were terrific and attentive. The desserts were artistic masterpieces and tasted delicious too!
During a stay of a few days in Vancouver, we chose to dine at the Boulevard Kitchen & Oyster Bar on one of ur nights. We thoroughly enjoyed the evening with delicious food and excellent service. Three of us opted for the special white asparagus...More
This popular newish restaurant is located in the Sutton Place Hotel and a therefore a great location if staying downtown in the Robson St/Burrard vicinity. We thought we were going for seafood, but had salads, foie gras, and ""melt in your mouth"" wagyu beef instead....More
The service was excellent, mainly by Jerard who was informative and helpful. Wine list was impecable and the seafood fresh and delicious. The whole atmosphere was a great experience.
Let me start with a metaphor. Indulge me, it gets there in time. To wit - There was a wall lamp above our table that was fancy looking, hung on an equally fancy looking wood panelled wall. But the lamp shade had obviously been hit...More
The food was delicious. We had the seafood tower for two, baked oysters, pear pie and chocolate log. Amazing food. The service was second to none. Highly recommend
I wanted a nice 3 course dinner and I wanted to splurge on a nice bottle. I was also staying at the hotel and there were a lot of empty tables but the very rude hostess told me only at the bar or high top....More
Hello Rosegold88, Thank you for taking the time to provide feedback. I am sorry that you felt because you were a solo dinner we chose to not accommodate you. We have many solo diners each night and always ensure they have a great experience. Regarding...More
Terrible service. So many staff rushing around did not create a calm and relaxing atmosphere. The only staff who didn’t rush around was our server who would deposit something - water, wine, whatever - and then be in absentia for an unacceptable amount of time....More
Hello John J, I’m sorry your experience was disappointing. We pride ourselves on delivering a high standard of service and hospitality. Clearly we missed the mark with your table. Please reach out to me directly so we can correct the situation and make amends. jppotters@boulevardvancouver.ca...More
The seafood tower was uber fresh comprised of uniquely flavoured small dishes and delightfully fresh oysters. The whole sea bream ‘en croûte de sel’, share between 2, had a perfectly seasoned velvety dense texture, complex in its simplicity. The beautiful visual presentation matched the taste.
The service was so friendly, I'd return just for that. Oysters were tender and such a selection! Happy hour was enjoyable, oysters available then also.
Highly recommended. Stopped in while visiting Vancouver. Relaxing elegant space with excellent service. All the staff members work together so you always feel well taken care of the best experience possible. The food was absolutely delicious.
We had an unreal experience here at Boulevard. We had such good food and the wine list is so good. Definitely would recommend checking this place out and we will back very soon. Our server Richard was awesome, he was so friendly and was so...More
What a wonderful restaurant this is, richly deserving the rave reviews it gets. As our superb server Francesca put it, ""I really like working at a place where the customers have a great experience."" That we did, a group of six on a busy Friday...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7062030-Reviews-Boulevard_Kitchen_and_Oyster_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bowen Pizza Company,"The reviews for the Pear and Brie pizza were great and I was intrigued by the combination. Unfortunately I found this pizza selection to be extremely underwhelming. The pear slices had no flavour and were actually tough and could be “ripped” in half (rather than...More
We had the Spicy Chickpea pizza for lunch. On paper, chickpeas on a pizza should not work. But it works, and how! Since turning vegan, we've had a hard time finding good pizza. Not anymore. It helped that Green Leaf brewing next door allows food...More
The very best crust and excellent choice of ingredients to top it with. Choose from their suggestions or make up your own.
I don’t know why but it’s hard to find good pizza on the North Shore. But this little newly opened shop in Lonsdale Quay is a godsend. The owner and staff were great to talk to and the pizza was really tasty ( and I...More
We had a bite at Bowen Island Pizza Company. It is one of the food eateries located on the first floor of the Lonsdale Quay Market in Northern Vancouver. There is lots of seating inside and outside the market with a view of downtown Vancouver....More
For such a small place on busy Londsdale Quay market is Pizza Bowen island the best in North Vamcouver. Maybe even in whole Vancouver. I love their pear pizza!
While shopping in the market I found this little gem and decided to get myself a Pizza to enjoy with my brothers and our wine
Not enough crackers in Chacuterie Platter about 6 small ones they should add more. Pizza ia great, cheese and meats are good too. Family friendly
This place is a gem. All the options sounded good, so I asked the staff for their recommendation and they suggested the pear and brie with roasted garlic and onions. Excellent choice. It was super-freshly made and delicious. The crust was thin and had a...More
Their pizzas are different and creative. Always delicious and they have a few vegetarian and vegan options too. Perfect after a visit to the Lonsdale Quay.
Having a glowing recommendation from the lady at the Fish & Chips shop, we decided to go for the Pizzas. At first I thought that both establishments belonged to the same owner, but this is not so. We had the Chorizo & Blue cheese and...More
Pizza was great...organic flour and source locally. We had a pear and brie pizza and a mushroom and pepperoni. Both were excellent. We ordered them and then they delivered them to the brewery for us. Would definitely order them again.
I had the best meet and greet today. I also got to sample some fantastic Salami and cured meats. I was surprised that a small shop cared so much to answer o many questions. They also carried so many good, quality meats - and I...More
Pizza was tasty made with local ingredients. Unique menu items that change weekly including veg and meat options. Pizza appears to be made ahead of time and is reheated in the oven before serving it up to you. Price is good for what you get.
My first stop every time I fly in from the UK. Wonderful pizza, good company. Take a left when you get off the Seabus, in the market opposite the fish monger. Can't go wrong, worth the journey.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d8077556-Reviews-Bowen_Pizza_Company-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Boy With A Knife,"We had some difficulties to find the restaurant in the strip mall. It is the place with veranda that you can see from the street. We went there for lunch. Nice outside patio and good tables inside. Staff is attentive and friendly. We ordered Cobb...More
Great food. Good choice. Good place for lunch. Also outside seating area. Two sides of a commerce box. One side deli other side restaurant. If you look for it: next to the railroad tracks.
Had lunch at the grill two days in a row - the Miso Bacon Mushroom burger and the old school bacon cheeseburger. Both were delicious and very satisfying. Friendly service. They have a small patio. Would come back if I was in the area.
Went with friends— the cuisine is all over the place the only unifying feature is that it was all great. I had the butter chicken— delicious! One of us had a fancy salad, another the salmon. Good service, reasonable prices, nice decor, ample parking, friendly...More
I took a client to lunch here this week and once again was impressed by both the food and the service. The menu is extremely interesting with everything from Poke Tuna Bowls to Bahn Mi Burgers (fried chicken) to something a little more run of...More
Stopped by here recently for lunch as the wife's nephew is ""The Boy with a Knife"". I was amazed at how well-run this operation is. There is a deli/take-out counter at the front with inside or outdoor seating areas. A gourmet catering division in the...More
Ya, and this Boy has a Knife ! A very creative menue, not too large to be confusing, but large enough to offer tasty and varied healthy choices. Located in an industrial mall just east of Knight Street and west of Viking way, this comfortrable...More
We went to try a tasting for our daughters upcoming wedding and the food was fantastic! We started with appys and from the mini fish tacos to the Korean cauliflour, to the black pepper tofu spoons, everything was delicious. Then there was fig and walnut...More
This is an awesome place to eat at. Highly recommend to anyone that is looking to eat healthy and on a budget. I highly recommend the seared tuna sandwich.
Really enjoyed learning about this restaurant. On recommendation; I had the Hokey Pokey bowl - sadly; our server was not up to DOING the Hokey Pokey while serving, but at least he got a laugh when I asked. The food is fresh and some (but...More
Went for lunch after looking at the menu online; with some coworkers. I had the HOKÉ POKÉ BOWL: Salmon, green onion, chili, sesame, soy, avocado, wakame, tobiko, shredded nori, taro wonton crisps + steamed rice. Beautiful presentation... sadly the waiter would not actually do the...More",11,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d12191886-Reviews-Boy_With_A_Knife-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Branas Grill,"This was one of the worst dining experiences I have. We had a reservation for dinner and when we arrived it was not busy, but there were a few tables. There was one server and she was overwhelmed and could not keep up with serving,...More
The service was terrible. Whatever I ordered from Starter and Mani food there were out of order. My husband couldn't refill his beer the one he was drinking, it was out of order. They knew that we are 35 people and they were expecting that...More
Patio dinner dining, what a view. Food was good. Company was great. Service was very good. My wife had lamb souvlaki and I had the beet and goat cheese salad with salmon. Both tasty and good.
For most ""greek"" restaurants here, I wouldn't cross the street. Same old. Same old. And not even that good. But this place was GREAT. And best of all, live music with a dui from SAmerica singing and playing guitars. This place should be PACKED Friday...More
We ordered a hamburger and chips and the roasted lamb with rice and potatoes. Both were very tasty and good. The lamb was an abundant portion. Our friends ordered calamari appetizer and the same lamb dish. They enjoyed it as well.
This neighborhood go to restaurant has a diverse menu. We had hamburgers and fries. Tasty, yummy and good.
We ordered 2 takeout Greek Style Fish n Chips with Cole slaw. My wife and I enjoyed it. It was tasty and good. Chips were a tad soggy. But prepared nicely and hot.
Casual mediterranean place with great service. Menu is full of tempting choices and all our selections were winners. COVID protocols are strong. Patio is a great place to eat (no heaters, so bring a sweater)
We were 5 people there for lunch. The waitress was overwhelmed, as it is a popular spot especially on a Sunday and she was all by herself, while patio was full of patrons (social distancing was observed) and so was the dining room. She tried...More
We haven't been getting much take out or eating in restaurants since the lockdown in Vancouver. This was our best experience thus far. One it is close to where we live. Two the food is good and tasty. My wife had a burger 🍔 and...More
We went with friends for dinner on Christmas Day. They were open. My wife had the turkey fixed menu - with soup, turkey and all the fixins and pumpkin pie for dessert. She was happy with the food and thought it tasty. Our friends had...More
This was our first time for brunch at Branas. We sat outside and enjoyed the False Creek view. We had great food and excellent service. It was a great brunch experience.
We went on a Friday night to this quite local Greek eatery. Service was good. I had the Keftika lamb. It was very good, tasty and peefectly spiced. The icing on the cake was a great night of music and dancing.
We showed up for our booking that was made 2 weeks ago and we were told that there is no table available for us. The staff were so rude and the owner was acting so irresponsible , like it was our fault.They have over booked....More
Wanted a casual place with a view in this area. Had checked the menu online first and there seemed to be something for everyone. First thing we saw was that they had a small patio seating area facing the water! We were seated right away...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1886575-Reviews-Branas_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bravo Cucina Ristorante,"This is our favorite restaurant! Always, always great food and the wonderful service! The last time we were there I ordered the Cioppino .. I've had it in other restaurants but theirs truly is the best! We are never disappointed dining at this restaurant‼️
We have been to Bravo Cucina several times and always enjoyed the meal. So, we brought our friend there for her 85th Birthday to with Dine Out Vancouver. The menu looked wonderful the restaurant was busy and we had a truly wonderful wine. Unfortunately that...More
We were promptly seated (without reservations) despite being a very busy Sunday evening. Our waiter was attentive and we had a very nice meals at a reasonable price.
I have had dinner here several times over the past few decades as it's close to where I stay when visiting North Vancouver. Always considered it a pleasant restaurant with a reliable menu of pastas. Today was lunch with two friends. All three of us...More
The first time we went to this restaurant was on our last trip to Vancouver in 2019. It was wonderful then and we wanted to go back this time. Post Covid meant that the atmosphere wasn't the same with fewer customers and a less cosy...More
Shocked to see that this far into the pandemic there were virtually no protocols in place (fewer/spaced tables). No sanitizer available, no masks work, no disinfecting, same-as-old-days restaurant and bill sleeves, staff in very close proximity. The more we noticed the more we were horrified...More
Having seen all the 5 star reviews for this restaurant we had dinner from Bravo last evening. All I can say is that this absolutely could not have been the same chef -- pardon me -- ""person"". He most certainly could not be categorized a...More
Absolutely beautiful meal served in lovely surroundings by friendly staff. We were here for a celebration dinner with kids in tow. The waiter was so helpful and fun with the kids. We enjoyed everything we ordered and were tempted by so many more items on...More
This is and has been a favorite Italian restaurant in North Vancouver for many years but last night while the service was good the kitchen failed.. It was a limited menu at a fixed price and the Scallop Starter was luke warm and The Halibut...More
This restaurant is unique in terms of its ambience, service and food. White table cloths, warm and accommodating service, good quality food all combine for a wonderful visit. There is always a complementary white bean dip with freshly made bread. The lobster bisque and butter...More
We have been to this restaurant many times… This time was a bit of a disappointment. Perhaps because there were two large tables in the restaurant was quite busy, the quality of the food was not what we had become accustomed to. The scallops were...More
I love this restaurant. It has to be my favourite restaurant in all of North Van and its all I can do to not frequent it to bankruptcy. The Chef and kitchen staff are clearly top level at what they do as the food is...More
Outstanding in every way. Had the lemon creme sauce veal with vegetables and lemon potatoes. Exquisite. Presentation was flawless and food impeccable. Some of the best veal I have ever had. Serving could be a little bigger perhaps. Service was attentive, friendly and efficient. Add...More
It's been about 5 years since I had lunch at Bravo Cucina, where I've only had dinner lately. What a delight to discover that their Smoked Salmon Omelettes are still the best in town!
For our 66th anniversary we went to Bravo Cucina. We have here annually for this event and each year I have the osso buco which consistently the best I have ever had. My wife has the lemon chicken with mushrooms which she says is excellent....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d761742-Reviews-Bravo_Cucina_Ristorante-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Breakfast Table,"Meeting my old friend from UBC for brunch yesterday , located at the South Granville by 14 Ave , street parking , not a big eatery, , small clean friendly place , my friend told me all way line up , surprised the place only...More
Absolutely delicious food. I had the benedict - a nice vegetarian option for breakfast. Nice interior design and art in the restaurant also makes for an enjoyable visit. It is a bit noisy when the restaurant is full but it is worth the trip.
Best breakfast I’ve ever had. Gourmet high end quality everything. Whipped cream was coconut whipped cream.
Clean, prompt service. Nice variety on the menu. Attentive staff. Friendly. A good cross section in the restaurant. The restaurant is well situated and easy to locate. Simple decor, but it works.
This is a great place for breakfast in Vancouver and although a little bit out the centre, it’s very easy to get to by public transport. Staff were really friendly and the food was fantastic! I had the Vegetarian omelette and my wife the BT...More
Highly recommended for brunch enthusiasts this interesting decor (including outside terrace) serves excellent eggs Benedict from classic to fancy and flat whites at their best. Exemplary service (and they ask you how you like your eggs done !) Reasonably priced - well worth the stop.
Came for breakfast on a Sunday morning - wasn't too busy. Had the pork belly benny which I enjoyed and thought was tasty and the side veggies and potatoes were good too. Yummy overall.
Great vibe. Standard breakfast items like bacon and eggs but also creative combinations for more adventurous tastes. Loved the grilled veggies that came with the meals. Hot chocolate was rich and creamy. Friendly staff.
A smallish understated breakfast restaurant on Granville three blocks south of Broadway on the east side. You are welcomed upon entry. Plenty of seating (I counted 40-45 seats). I could either scan the menu or view the printed version. The menu is not extensive but...More
Service was top notch, music was easy listening and above all the food was amazing. They do in house bacon and sausage. Try the hangover!
Nice place to eating breakfast and lunch. If you go in the weekend try to be there around 9 to 9:30 to avoid lineups. You can enjoy seating inside , in the patio and outside at the roadside.
We tried to come here one time before and the lineup was about half an hour... but we vowed to come again. So here we are! I asked Michael (think he might be the owner?!?) as he helped us with our order. I was torn...More
OMG the best eggs Benny I've had hands down. I had the coffee crusted pork belly eggs Benny and my wife had the classic. Mine had a Béarnaise sauce instead of Hollandaise and it was sooo damn good. My wife loved hers and the back...More
A Favourite Place to Eat! Had the Halibut Benedict today....So very tasty!! Brunch Food and/or late afternoon cocktails & small plates are all great! Delicious food,creative cocktails & great service make a good experience Really worth the visit to try!!!
We chose Breakfast Table for our first post Covid meal out because we have always enjoyed their food and staff. They are paying close attention to social distance and other regulations (contact info taken at the door, space marked on table for servers to put...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11778585-Reviews-Breakfast_Table-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Brioche Urban Eatery,"Excellent value for money. Food delicious and served fresh. Staff very helpful and friendly. Also had dinner here and couldn't fault the quality of the food or price
Stumbled upon this restaurant while strolling around Gastown. the food was fantastic and really reasonable with great service.
This is a small, family owned restaurant in an fantastic place in Vancouver. Excellent food! The cheese tortellini was absolutely amazing. We also had a sandwich, the roasted veggie & Bocconcini that was an absolute delight. The service was outstanding as well. Very friendly and...More
My wife noticed this restaurant as we drove past on an On-Off tour bus. Great vibe and OUTSTANDING food. I had a beautiful creation of sourdough, avocado, greens, roasted tomatoes and balsamic vinegar. My wife had a “simple “ sourdough with pesto and fried eggs....More
Excellent on both occasions. This is a lovely restaurant run by Sicilians with great help from Turkish guys. The coffee is zillions better than Starbucks and food is all great. Good menu choice. Service was excellent. Good decor.
After a sleep in and a walk we stumbled upon Brioche in Gas Town. Great little restaurant/cafe. The service was excellent and the food was tasty. The menu has lots to choose from all the food coming out looked great. Very satisfied
Fantastic restaurant - hidden in plain sight on Water St! Very reasonably priced, good quantities of fresh and high quality food. Fast and friendly service. I will be going back!
Fantastic food, great friendly service, nice atmosphere, and really reasonable prices. Nice desserts, too, and kind enough to add a candle for our grandaughters bday. highly recommend
Just needed a casual dinner while in town. This lovely restaurant had a great atmosphere, interesting menu, and delightful service. Not a big place but oddly quiet so had our pick of seats. The servers were very attentive and the food fresh, well considered, and...More
Cozy small Bistro in Gastown , been in the area for almost two decade , very traditional Italian dishes with a touch of West Coast flare , and the pasta just fantastic , it is my flavour solo place for their All Day Breakfast ,...More
Great restaurant, really tasty food. Moderatly priced. Try their tortellini, apple pie, and teramisu which are delicious
Wonderful flavourful food and huge portions. One of the best Italian food experiences in Vancouver. Thank you Chef!
This was the best breakfast I’ve had in a long time, the eggs, the ham and the french toast was absolutely a 10/10, i was so full after eating all of this🤣
We ended up indulging in the delicious delights of Brioche in Gaston three times during our Vancouver interlude. The fare is fresh, tasty and authentic. A special casual gem 👍🏻
We arrived looking for somewhere for breakfast, while looking at the menu outside we were approached by the owner who offered us to come inside to see the counter which was full of delicious looking cakes, We decided to have a late breakfast,early lunch. Poached...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d784970-Reviews-Brioche_Urban_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Brix & Mortar Restaurant,"We sat in the courtyard upstairs which was elegant and lovely. Wonderful service and food. A real treat during our stay.
Great restaurant, food was excellent and our server Karan was very friendly. All the staff were more than helpful and customer service was second to none. Would have no problem recommending to a friend!
We had dinner for the first time at Bricker and Mortar. Service was excellent and the food was delicious! Everyone loved their meals. Highly recommend.
Very nice restaurant in great area. The food was amazing! We were on family dinner on Wednesday so we were happy to enjoy the live music. Also the staff is very nice. Definitely recommend
We had a family birthday dinner here. It was absolutely fantastic. Can not come up with any negative to say. The food was delicious. The Wedge Salad.... who orders a wedge salad but I did, and with the lamb bacon - absolutely delicious. The tenderloin...More
Thanks so much for taking the time to review your experience with us. We always appreciate thoughtful detail as it helps us know where we are succeeding and where we can improve. We hope to see you again in the near future!
We hosted a large group in the upstairs dining room. The food was exceptional and well served. The extra effort to produce a custom menu with our branding was appreciated and the presentation of the venue would make it a must do again.
Thanks so much for taking the time to let us know about your positive group dining experience with us. We take great pride in hosting both private and corporate events. We would be honoured to host you again in the future!
Everything was perfect. Dine out menu with prawns salad salmon and sorbet. Excellent wine. Great service. Will return.
We are so happy that your Dine Out experience with us was so positive. We look forward to taking care of you again in the near future!
Fantastic meal, impeccable service. One of the best wedge salads I’ve ever eaten,and I’m a traveler and a foodie. Perfectly seared duck breast. Comfortable outdoor seating. A real winner.
Stellar venue for an urban chic wedding. Elegant setting, delicious food, world class wines and impeccable service, all in the heart of beautiful Yaletown. What a magical experience it all was...sheer perfection!
Food was delicious, portions are generous. Staff was courteous and attentive. Fresh Salmon & Halibut... tis the season.
Came here with 4 girlfriends for dinner. There was a private function going on inside so we sat outside which was fine. Not much decor or ambience though. Our server was excellent, very attentive to dietary restrictions. The food took forever, probably because of the...More
It's that time of year --- all of the salmon is fresh and wild caught, and at Brix & Mortar, perfectly cooked and presented. Delicious! We started by splitting a Wedge Salad, and two glasses of Spearhead Pinot Noir (from the Okanagan Region I believe)....More
Had a marvelous meal seating in their outdoor covered patio room. Wonderful remodel of an old industrial building. Service was friendly and very efficient. Food was marvelous. If you are near Yaletown I sugget you enjoy a meal here.
First time eating here and pleasantly surprised on the standard and quality. The food was absolutely delicious. Definately recommend the duck! Staff was lovely and looked after us very well. Best to book as the place it is busy and in downtown location
A simply amazing meal that impressed everyone at the table at every course. Amazing wine list, great staff, wonderful response from who I believe was the manager when my vegetarian wife quizzed the deserts to clarify what she could have that was veggie. Substantial whiskey...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d682960-Reviews-Brix_Mortar_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Broken Rice Restaurant,"We had dinner with my Canadian nephew, he ordered for us. The dishes tasted wonderful and beautifully presented. Will go there again when I am in Burnaby, it is worth a repeat.
My fiancé ordered a bowl of pho beef balls and beef slices. Literally one beef ball cut into 4 quarters and 2 slices of beef for 15.00 this is absolutely ridiculous. 1 beef ball and 2 slices of beef
I was disappointed there were no combination dishes. This is fine if you are with a big group, but for two of us, not so. The lettuce leaves were huge and difficult to eat. This was not what I was expecting as a lettuce-wrap. The...More
This is a nice clean place that is run by a friendly and hard working family. I had the lychee shake, the salad rolls and the grilled lemongrass chicken over broken rice. All were tasty and filling. Definitely heading back for lunch when in the...More
My family spent the morning at a cold pumpkin patch, two hours driving back and forth and the afternoon in a mall; after that we really needed some great food. My wife found this place online and - oh my goodness. It’s a smallish family...More
The best Vietnamese restaurant in all Vancouver and Burnaby. We are high-end foodies and this has the quality, freshness, flavour and consistency of any hip restaurant in Vancouver.
My husband and I had green papaya tofu salad, hot and sour seafood pho and three way pork on rice. But salad is not enough seasoning so I ask more dressing to eat and pork dish is not really enjoyable but seafood pho is tasty....More
I tried the Lemongrass chicken and egg on rice (13.75$): chicken was soft and tasty, rice was slightly salted. They served me a pot of hot tea for free, when I sat at my table.
My two daughters and I entered the Broken Rice Restaurant on Gilmore and Hastings in North Burnaby. The first thing you see is a place where you can light little candles and then the restaurant is beyond clean, not a crumb anywhere. It is a...More
It’s always fun to go to a restaurant and be surprised by a new dish.... The Broken Rice did just that with several dishes including our starter the Mango Salad. A totally unexpected presentation that was fresh and super flavourful. The duck sliders were another...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew brokenrice vietnamese restaurant . I went to this place because of a recommendation from a friend. Its good Vietnamese food if you live in the area, but its far for me personally. I had the lemongrass chicken on...More
It’s been a while since we last visited Broken Rice in North Burnaby. This Vietnamese restaurant located on Hastings Street has always been a spot where we knew we would get a good quality meal. Unlike most Vietnamese restaurants which seem to be hole-in-the-wall joints,...More
Broken Rice does a great vegetarian pho at a reasonable price. They have a good selection of other dishes as well.
Came here with my partner on busy Friday night, no line up but place was busy. Prompt service and food was delicious with a great variety available. They have a TV showing sports, which is always a plus :)
We came in for pho and salad rolls. They customized the salad rolls for us at our request (we don’t eat pork) which was nice. Unobtrusive and friendly service. Delicious dinner. Very reasonably priced. Forgot to take photos as we gobbled everything up!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3692345-Reviews-Broken_Rice_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Browns Crafthouse,"Stopped here the other night first time. Lots of on tap beer which I did not know any. The bartender was excellent and gave me a 3 glass sampler. Two good one so so , he added half of another kind. Ordered the avocado roasted...More
I wasn’t sure what I would think of this place but once I tried the poutine I knew that this was a great place. Don’t be fooled by craft house, yes they have beer but also amazing food and drinks. We split the poutine between...More
This is one of the more interesting bars/pubs in the downtown core. I love the décor, which is witty, kitschy and well curated. We just stopped in for a couple of quick IPA genuine crafts and shots. The bartender was well informed and fun. Overall,...More
I was taken here for a business lunch and enjoyed it very much. There's good variety on the menu, from a superfood green salad that was filling and tasty to roast beef sandwiches and thin-cut frites-style fries. It's not over-priced, despite the lack of real...More
Me and my boyfriend came in and the manager Alex was so friendly and came to introduce himself to us and made amazing recommendations. Our server Lindsey was so friendly and really set the date night ambiance. Highly recommend!
Had a lovely time. Alex took amazing care of us! Highly recommend! Will see you again soon! highly Recommend the chicken tacos
Dropped in for a drink at 5pm and happened to be happy hour with good deals on selected beer and wine as well as select menu items. We opted for cauliflower bites which were super fresh, delicious and a generous portion. Served by Melanie who...More
Great selection of craft beers. Very nice selection to choose from the food menu. My burger and red ale were delicious. My server was pleasant and attentive. A definite return is in order!
Nice spacious bar/crafthouse. Some screens / TV monitors. Good selection of beers on tap. Main surprise for me was the food. Kale Avocado Salad was very cood but the gyoza were simply yummy !!!! And the (at least tonight) only dessert on the menu, the...More
Visited this restaurant with my family on a recent trip to Vancouver. We were impressed by the staff and the diverse menu, which offered each of us a taste of something we like. I would recommend this restaurant to anyone passing through. The food was...More
This place was amazing. Good service. Good food. Good drinks. The decor was amazing. I has the guac apoy and the chicken salad. Both were so good. We shared the mimosa tower. This was so good and fun. I like the individual bathrooms. The only...More
Randomly stumbled upon this establishment, it looked nice from outside, so we decided to have a few drinks. While we chose to be seated inside, I should say they have a fantastic patio, which not everyone will like since it is so close to the...More
Walked by this place on our way to the Waterfront from Yaletown. Food is really good. Wife had the best wings she's ever eaten. Definitely recommend the social IPA.
We stumbled upon Browns craft house for dinner. The service was excellent, food was tasty, and the place was pretty cool. They had sports on the big screen, as well as lots of beer options!
We stumbled upon this place which was a wonderful find. We’re new to the city and are always on the lookout for the best fried chicken burger. Browns is up there! 2nd only to Tap & Barrel at the moment. The atmosphere in the restaurant...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17371018-Reviews-Browns_Crafthouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Browns Social House,"Service was great, our server & other staff came by a few times to see if we needed anything. My friend ordered a breakfast dish and said it was excellent. I ordered chicken quesadilla and there was hardly any chicken in it, and the tortilla...More
I've had to ponder how to write this review. I've come to the conclusion I must have been having an off-day. I found the food a bit too spicy, and the background music a bit too loud. However, my two friends had no problems with...More
Friday Happy Hour has some happy servers, but others can ignore you unless you are a frequent social patron, where one can see the attention they get while you wait and get ignored
In the past the nachos were really good, lots of salsa, cheese, and very tasty. We had them tonight and the chips were not very good, they were similar to Dorito taco cheese chips, didnt really care for them. Overall they were pretty tasteless, won't...More
Not good, poor service, burgers were tasteless and awful, buns soggy, ran out of the special social lagers and only more expensive ones and poor customer service. Everything was rushed and main course dishes came out a minute after the starters were served, table was...More
There are a lot of restaurants that are pretty lax out there with Covid rules. Unfortunately I have to list Browns as one of them. I've been going to this place for years. With my daughter, my family and my my friends. Granted, the happy...More
It was marvellous. Romina gave us a great great service . We spent a super quality of time . Their patio is fantastic!!! And menu delicious and very generous portions . House wine is the best !! Can not wait to go back !!! Wishing...More
My wife had gift certificates for Browns social house, thus we decided to try it. I ordered Thai soup, salt and pepper ribs, and chicken Ceasar salad. ribs appetizers were a good size. My salad could have been a little larger for what is costs....More
This place is within walking distance of sky train station (Brentwood) and off the Lougheed Highway. There were 6 of us ranging from vegetarian to meat eaters. The menu had a good variety of choices even for one picky eater who requested a tomato base...More
First time to be here with 3 other friends for happy hour and birthday dinner. The place was very nice and our server JC was very nice and super friendly. He also helped us with the menu by suggesting the good ones to try. The...More
Late dinner. First time to this location, same level of service as others. Service was good. One cod bowl and one fish tacos both very good. Decent wine selection and some decent craft beer!
This is a typical chain restaurant so don’t expect anything too fancy. Food was decent, service was ok, prices were pretty good. The beer selection is poor which is a disappointment considering how many great craft breweries are in Vancouver.
A solid place to go for well prepared food at a reasonable price. The service is very helpful. The outside deck can be a bit loud with the skytrain over head, but it's really not that bothering and on a sunny day, pretty nice.
Me and a buddy decided after the gym to hit up Browns for some protein. General Tao's Chicken was great as usual. The star of the show what the Ahi Tuna Poke. Great flavour, and a perfect amount of spicy kick to keep the dish...More
First time at this Brown location and will not be the last. Very friendly service and Morgan made our visit very pleasant . As usually the menu at Brown's very delicious. Lovely house white wine. Salt and pepper dry ribs, ahí tuna salad and chili...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2289292-Reviews-Browns_Social_House-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Browns Socialhouse,"great service, nice atmosphere, very relaxing place. Recommended after a long or short hike to have a drink.
great service, nice atmosphere, very relaxing place. Recommended after a long or short hike to have a drink.
That is so great to hear Gord, thanks so much for sharing. We hope to see you for an after hike drink again soon!
That is so great to hear Gord, thanks so much for sharing. We hope to see you for an after hike drink again soon!
We stopped into Brown's after a long hike in Lynn Creek for an early dinner. The food was good and the staff very friendly.
We stopped into Brown's after a long hike in Lynn Creek for an early dinner. The food was good and the staff very friendly.
That is so great to hear Stephen! Thank you for sharing!
That is so great to hear Stephen! Thank you for sharing!
We have been venturing out more and more especially with good weather and the modified return of patio season. Dinner last night was a great experience here from start to finish. Physical distancing was paramount but it didn’t take away from excellent service. We arrived...More
We have been venturing out more and more especially with good weather and the modified return of patio season. Dinner last night was a great experience here from start to finish. Physical distancing was paramount but it didn’t take away from excellent service. We arrived...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We look forward to spending many more social hours with you on the patio!
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We look forward to spending many more social hours with you on the patio!
First time in the resto....nicely furnished with a good atmosphere, music/tv's not overly loud...a good thing and well dressed serving staff. Wait time was shorter than advised > a good thing . the owner/manager was very involved as we watched home check the kitchen, bar...More
First time in the resto....nicely furnished with a good atmosphere, music/tv's not overly loud...a good thing and well dressed serving staff. Wait time was shorter than advised > a good thing . the owner/manager was very involved as we watched home check the kitchen, bar...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We are so glad you had a great time. We hope to socialize with you again soon!
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We are so glad you had a great time. We hope to socialize with you again soon!
I eat at this restaurant at least twice a month. The food is good and predictable. They maintain a group of lovely servers who seem to really enjoy working there. They have TVs for watching sports and the general ambiance is nice. They have underground...More
I eat at this restaurant at least twice a month. The food is good and predictable. They maintain a group of lovely servers who seem to really enjoy working there. They have TVs for watching sports and the general ambiance is nice. They have underground...More
Thank you so much for the rating and review Andrea!
Thank you so much for the rating and review Andrea!
Back in N Vancouver from UK, visiting our daughter and we always like to eat at Browns. Good atmosphere and food. Our son in law celebrated his birthday, we met him from work and ate at Browns, convenient for mid week. He was offered a...More
Back in N Vancouver from UK, visiting our daughter and we always like to eat at Browns. Good atmosphere and food. Our son in law celebrated his birthday, we met him from work and ate at Browns, convenient for mid week. He was offered a...More
Thank you so much for sharing your experience Christine! We hope to socialize with you again!
Thank you so much for sharing your experience Christine! We hope to socialize with you again!
This was a family lunch and it was not busy. We felt the service could have been better ie check on our drinks or let us know when the meals might come. When I mentioned that, the server did send the manager over. He was...More
This was a family lunch and it was not busy. We felt the service could have been better ie check on our drinks or let us know when the meals might come. When I mentioned that, the server did send the manager over. He was...More
Hi there, We are so sorry to hear that you have had a disappointing service experience. We would love a chance to connect with you directly. If you are interested, please email lynnvalley@brownssocialhouse.com
Hi there, We are so sorry to hear that you have had a disappointing service experience. We would love a chance to connect with you directly. If you are interested, please email lynnvalley@brownssocialhouse.com
Have you been to a chain pub before? Then you know what to expect. We shared some salads and meaty apps and everything was good. Not elevated or superb, but good enough to return or to send friends. Great location, friendly staff, they saw we...More
Have you been to a chain pub before? Then you know what to expect. We shared some salads and meaty apps and everything was good. Not elevated or superb, but good enough to return or to send friends. Great location, friendly staff, they saw we...More
Thank you for taking the time to share your feedback.
Thank you for taking the time to share your feedback.
Just arrived in Van mid afternoon after arriving from Toronto. Had a early dinner. I had a beef and vegetable bowl and my wife had the quesadillas. Both were very good and the Stanley Park amber ale was excellent. Sat on the patio and watched...More
Just arrived in Van mid afternoon after arriving from Toronto. Had a early dinner. I had a beef and vegetable bowl and my wife had the quesadillas. Both were very good and the Stanley Park amber ale was excellent. Sat on the patio and watched...More
That is so great to hear! Thank you so much for sharing. We hope to socialize with you again soon!
That is so great to hear! Thank you so much for sharing. We hope to socialize with you again soon!
Used Lynn valley twice, service excellent, food very tasty. Coming from the UK, this was very good. Had, chicken tacos, beef Noddles, chicken rice bowl. Well done guys
Used Lynn valley twice, service excellent, food very tasty. Coming from the UK, this was very good. Had, chicken tacos, beef Noddles, chicken rice bowl. Well done guys
This is so great to hear! Thank you so much for sharing Andrew!
This is so great to hear! Thank you so much for sharing Andrew!
Service was prompt, professional and courteous by polite staff, food was of top quality tasty and hot, would recommend to anyone.
Service was prompt, professional and courteous by polite staff, food was of top quality tasty and hot, would recommend to anyone.
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We hope to socialize with you again soon!
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We hope to socialize with you again soon!
We have visited Browns in various cities and basically agree that the food is nice, the nachos are hugely improved!!, and the Social Red and White house wines are very palatable. Service is good, patio is very nice, even your dog can sit just outside...More
We have visited Browns in various cities and basically agree that the food is nice, the nachos are hugely improved!!, and the Social Red and White house wines are very palatable. Service is good, patio is very nice, even your dog can sit just outside...More
Thank you so much for your review and taking the time to provide us with feedback. We are in the process of reviewing our music and appreciate you taking the time! We hope to see you again for nachos soon.
Thank you so much for your review and taking the time to provide us with feedback. We are in the process of reviewing our music and appreciate you taking the time! We hope to see you again for nachos soon.
Visited here with family (4 of us) in June. Will give credit where credit is due. The food was very good. In regards to the wait staff and bar, not so impressed. For one, we had to ask for service. When he finally came the...More
Visited here with family (4 of us) in June. Will give credit where credit is due. The food was very good. In regards to the wait staff and bar, not so impressed. For one, we had to ask for service. When he finally came the...More
HI Scott, We are so sorry to hear about this experience. We would love a chance to connect with you directly. If you are interested, please email us lynnvalley@brownssocialhouse.com
HI Scott, We are so sorry to hear about this experience. We would love a chance to connect with you directly. If you are interested, please email us lynnvalley@brownssocialhouse.com
Went a couple weeks ago for a business lunch upstairs in their private dining area. We ordered a variety of items served family-style. Was excellent. Since returned twice for lunch. Service good, outdoor seating on a warm day, variety of high-tops and booths inside. Easy...More
Went a couple weeks ago for a business lunch upstairs in their private dining area. We ordered a variety of items served family-style. Was excellent. Since returned twice for lunch. Service good, outdoor seating on a warm day, variety of high-tops and booths inside. Easy...More
Thank you so much for sharing! We are so glad that you have had both excellent lounge and restaurant experiences!
Thank you so much for sharing! We are so glad that you have had both excellent lounge and restaurant experiences!
I visited this restaurant on my way to my hotel. It was very busy, waitress needed only 5 minutes to seat me. All personal is very kind. Drinks are offered frequently. Food is great!! Nice place to meet to meet with family, friends or even...More
I visited this restaurant on my way to my hotel. It was very busy, waitress needed only 5 minutes to seat me. All personal is very kind. Drinks are offered frequently. Food is great!! Nice place to meet to meet with family, friends or even...More
Thank you so much for sharing! We hope to socialize with you again next time you are in town!
Thank you so much for sharing! We hope to socialize with you again next time you are in town!
We love this eatery, 4 family members - 2 generations went for dinner. We were met promptly. Service excellent, food very very tasty. Will go back Had the curry butter chicken with craft beer on tape. Perfect.
We love this eatery, 4 family members - 2 generations went for dinner. We were met promptly. Service excellent, food very very tasty. Will go back Had the curry butter chicken with craft beer on tape. Perfect.
Thank you so much for rating and reviewing us Teresa! We look forward to seeing you again soon!
Thank you so much for rating and reviewing us Teresa! We look forward to seeing you again soon!
Another one of my locals. Great wings, our favourite in North Vancouver... Rotating tap is always fun... Staff are super polite and just fabulous
Another one of my locals. Great wings, our favourite in North Vancouver... Rotating tap is always fun... Staff are super polite and just fabulous
Thank you so much for taking the time to share Arash! We look forward to socializing with you over wings and beer again soon!
Thank you so much for taking the time to share Arash! We look forward to socializing with you over wings and beer again soon!
With the latest edition to our family in tow, we had a wonderful late lunch inside. Three had burgers which they raved about and I had the tuna salad which was fabulous. The service was excellent. We would definitely recommend it as a place to...More
With the latest edition to our family in tow, we had a wonderful late lunch inside. Three had burgers which they raved about and I had the tuna salad which was fabulous. The service was excellent. We would definitely recommend it as a place to...More
This is so great to hear, thank you for the review! Congratulations on your newest family member!
This is so great to hear, thank you for the review! Congratulations on your newest family member!
great ambiance , delicious GF Pizza, great martini's and great service. Several other GF items on the menu, will definatly go back and try other GF items.
great ambiance , delicious GF Pizza, great martini's and great service. Several other GF items on the menu, will definatly go back and try other GF items.
Thank you for sharing Kelly! One of our favourites is our GF Warm Double Chocolate Brownie!
Thank you for sharing Kelly! One of our favourites is our GF Warm Double Chocolate Brownie!
Grabbed some dinners via Skip the Dishes. Really great enviro presentation with 'paper' bowls in a paper bag - bravo Browns. Both the cod and the tuna bowl were surprisingly large portions and super tasty, travelled well. Yum.
Grabbed some dinners via Skip the Dishes. Really great enviro presentation with 'paper' bowls in a paper bag - bravo Browns. Both the cod and the tuna bowl were surprisingly large portions and super tasty, travelled well. Yum.
So great to hear! Thank you for sharing! We hope to deliver you the goods again soon!
So great to hear! Thank you for sharing! We hope to deliver you the goods again soon!
Most of the restaurants on Lonsdale were closed at 2 p.m., so we were glad to find Browns Socialhouse was open! My friend, who likes sushi, ordered a Dynamite Roll + a Spicy Tuna Roll & was very happy with his choices. I had the...More
Most of the restaurants on Lonsdale were closed at 2 p.m., so we were glad to find Browns Socialhouse was open! My friend, who likes sushi, ordered a Dynamite Roll + a Spicy Tuna Roll & was very happy with his choices. I had the...More
Thank you so much for sharing Judith! We look forward to socializing with you over fish tacos next time!
Thank you so much for sharing Judith! We look forward to socializing with you over fish tacos next time!
We were in the area, and needed to grab a bite to eat, and thought about trying this place, instead of fast food :) The location is good, but because of that, parking can be an issue. Their website says that they have underground parking,...More
We were in the area, and needed to grab a bite to eat, and thought about trying this place, instead of fast food :) The location is good, but because of that, parking can be an issue. Their website says that they have underground parking,...More
Thank you so much for sharing Anne! On your next visit, if you turn onto second, there is an alley right next to Salted Cycle. If you turn into the alley (on the left when heading south) there is underground parking. Hope this helps!
Thank you so much for sharing Anne! On your next visit, if you turn onto second, there is an alley right next to Salted Cycle. If you turn into the alley (on the left when heading south) there is underground parking. Hope this helps!
This place was busy, and undoubtedly the loudest establishment that I have ever experienced. This is not the place to sit quietly with anyone to review your day.
This place was busy, and undoubtedly the loudest establishment that I have ever experienced. This is not the place to sit quietly with anyone to review your day.
Thank you for taking the time to provide us with your feedback Preston. We will make sure to review our sound levels.
Thank you for taking the time to provide us with your feedback Preston. We will make sure to review our sound levels.
Solid food, drinks and service. The Browns chain is as good as earls but with more of a bar feel. It’s good a really decent outdoor seating area which allows for some good LoLo viewing if you’re that way inclined. Lots of sports tv action...More
Solid food, drinks and service. The Browns chain is as good as earls but with more of a bar feel. It’s good a really decent outdoor seating area which allows for some good LoLo viewing if you’re that way inclined. Lots of sports tv action...More
HI David, Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We hope to socialize with you again soon!
HI David, Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us! We hope to socialize with you again soon!
I visited Browns with a friend for lunch, we were seated quickly and service was fast and very good. I ordered fish tacos and for me, one would have been plenty. I also ordered a side salad. The music is not too loud and one...More
I visited Browns with a friend for lunch, we were seated quickly and service was fast and very good. I ordered fish tacos and for me, one would have been plenty. I also ordered a side salad. The music is not too loud and one...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to review us and provide us with your feedback Susan. We hope to get social with you again soon!
Thank you so much for taking the time to review us and provide us with your feedback Susan. We hope to get social with you again soon!
Brown's offers really good food. It is very busy and reservations are a good plan. Fun ambience, younger crowd. Good value.
Brown's offers really good food. It is very busy and reservations are a good plan. Fun ambience, younger crowd. Good value.
Thank you so much for taking and time to rate and review us Rose! We look forward to getting social with you again soon!
Thank you so much for taking and time to rate and review us Rose! We look forward to getting social with you again soon!
Went here for dinner on our first night in Canada. Right on the doorstep of our holiday rental so visited for convenience but glad we did. Good menu and fairly priced. Quick service and efficient. Best loaded Nachos I have ever had for a sharing...More
Went here for dinner on our first night in Canada. Right on the doorstep of our holiday rental so visited for convenience but glad we did. Good menu and fairly priced. Quick service and efficient. Best loaded Nachos I have ever had for a sharing...More
Thank you so much for your great review! We are so glad you had a chance to socialize with us while visiting Canada. We hope you come see us again if you are visiting! If you are with your kids, ask your server about our...More
Thank you so much for your great review! We are so glad you had a chance to socialize with us while visiting Canada. We hope you come see us again if you are visiting! If you are with your kids, ask your server about our...More
This is a very nice place to eat. We had breakfast here, the food was tasty and the prices were average for the area.
This is a very nice place to eat. We had breakfast here, the food was tasty and the prices were average for the area.
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us Tina!
Thank you so much for taking the time to rate and review us Tina!
With past less than pleasant experiences at other Browns locations, my heart sank when my friend and I walked into the new one on West 2nd in North Van for lunch. Damn, I thought, they've followed the trend of seating everyone on high stools which,...More
With past less than pleasant experiences at other Browns locations, my heart sank when my friend and I walked into the new one on West 2nd in North Van for lunch. Damn, I thought, they've followed the trend of seating everyone on high stools which,...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to review us Evelyn! We hope to socialize with you again soon, in a booth of course!
Thank you so much for taking the time to review us Evelyn! We hope to socialize with you again soon, in a booth of course!
Good food (tried the new tuna poke bowl, really nice!). Service was alright. Classic margarita was delicious and on special!! Busy and a little loud... and it was only Tuesday evening,,,,
Good food (tried the new tuna poke bowl, really nice!). Service was alright. Classic margarita was delicious and on special!! Busy and a little loud... and it was only Tuesday evening,,,,
Thank you for taking the time to review us and share your feedback!
Thank you for taking the time to review us and share your feedback!",120,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d3368441-Reviews-Browns_Socialhouse-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Brunch,"Mexican brunch anyone? We got the last table and so happy we did not need to wait. The food is so tasty. We enjoyed the pulled pork benny on a croissant and rib eye hash.
To paraphrase Granville Street isn’t exactly a morning place. Growing up in the lower mainland in the 1970s Granville Street was where one at night to catch a movie, or when one became older clubs and bars. In the afternoons it was a good place...More
Service fast. Food served fast. We both got the Canuck breakfast with scrambled eggs and bacon. The little roasted potToes were yummy. scrambled eggs good. But the bacon was out of my mind goooood!!! No AC so it was getting quite warm in there by...More
We too were unable to get into the Templeton midmorning on a Sunday. We walked five minutes down the street and found this little hole in the wall awesome place for breakfast brunch lunch. They were very busy but the service was great and the...More
We got take out here and the brunch was absolutely delicious. Definitely would recommend checking them out!
We were unable to get into The Templeton (long line up) and so we walked 5 mins further along to Brunch. This appears to be a hidden and unknown breakfast place (only 3 reviews on Tripadvisor, although more reviews on Google). The menu is Mexican...More
We visited this place on Sunday. There was a small lineup to get in . It’s specialty is Mexican food. We had a great meal. Staff was efficient, and friendly. The food was excellent. I loved the freshly squeezed orange juice.
Our daughter suggested we meet here for breakfast. So glad we listened to her. Hubby & I had the apple crepes - sooo tasty with such a special sauce. Daughter had banana pancakes. Easy walking distance from hotel. Would recommend for anyone.
Looking for a casual breakfast/brunch spot in downtown Vancouver and came across Brunch. Great location (even if this part of Granville Street is still a bit seedy). Easy walking distance from most downtown hotels. Big selection of dishes from Huevos Rancheros to the Canuck breakfast....More",9,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23731555-Reviews-Brunch-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bruno,"The Bruno restaurant was located in the hotel I was staying at and I sat out buy the bar where I could watch the mixologists at work! The menu had lots to offer and I started with fresh oysters, a Heirloom Burrata salad next then...More
We have experience what they call it's a ""Family restaurant"" because we need to separate foods to our own plate. Everything came out in the big plate just like home. If you happy to pay $65/ person for this types of dine out experience then...More
Four of us had lunch and we ordered the Bruno Lunch Board Experience at C$125. Very satisfying and filling. Would go back again.
I took my wife here for our anniversary and we had an amazing meal. The staff who greeted us were very courteous and accommodating. We started with the scroll loaf which was amazing! This was the first time I had foie gras (butter) and it...More
This seemingly unheralded restaurant yielded top notch food. We shared the crispy Brussels sprouts, halibut, gnocchi, and hazelnut bavarois. All dishes were beautifully composed, flavourful, and well-proportioned.
Great food, great service, nice decor. Actually, ""great"" doesn't really describe the food adequately. Apparently, there is a whole team of chiefs working under the head chief who create a fusion of the best of everything using the finest ingredients. The vegetables are grown locally...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to share such a kind and positive review with us about your recent experience here! We are so glad that from start to finish, our location, staff, services, and creations made for such a memorable experience. We...More
I visited Bruno for lunch when it first opened and I wasn't that impressed. Seemed a bit disorganized. So our friends asked us to go back for their weekend Seafood Brunch as I was pleasantly surprised. It is available every weekend from 11 am -...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to review our restaurant. We truly appreciate the time that you took to share your experience with us! We are so happy to hear that you had such a pleasant brunch. We hope to welcome you back...More
We came here for breakfast and had a great time. I definitely would want to come back to try out dinner as well as the menu looks unreal. The service was quick and friendly and the food was so good.
The staff was amazing and was very attentive to your special requests. The service was very professional and courteous. The quality of the food was top notch and well worth their prices.
We are delighted to hear you enjoyed your experience at BRUNO Restaurant & Bar. Thank you for your visit and taking the time to share your precious feedback with us, we hope to welcome you again soon. Kind regards, Team Bruno
I, with two daughters, ordered the oyster bunch which was said to provide an unlimited amount of oysters. However, the oysters came at a very slow rate of one dozen at a time. When the oysters came, I was exceedingly disappointed. The quality of oysters...More
Thank you for sharing your thoughts with us. I'm very sorry to read that your recent dining experience at BRUNO was not as expected. Rest assured your loyalty and feedback mean a great deal to us. I have personally addressed your concerns with the team...More
Looking for the first meal of the day with a guest allergic to gluten, we found this. Great coffee and avocado toast! Service was impeccable. Ambiance and facilities are stylish.More
We are delighted to hear you enjoyed your experience at BRUNO Restaurant & Bar. We truly appreciate you taking the time to share your precious feedback with us. As a small thank you, if you should join us again, please send us an email at...More
What an absolute FEAST at Bruno! Incredible food, great service and a fantastic evening with friends. Started out with their Oysters and Ikura. Super delicious and loved the creaminess that paired really with the oysters. I usually don’t get too excited about a salad… this...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to write such a complimentary review of our restaurant. We are so delighted to hear that you enjoyed your experience with us. We are most proud to read your kind words about our creations. We look forward...More
We were staying at the Versante Hotel for the weekend, so we booked a reservation at Bruno for dinner on the Saturday evening. The staff were all wonderful - the food was a hit and a miss for us. We ordered the special 4 course...More
Thank you so much for sharing this review with us. At BRUNO, we aim to provide our guests with the best possible service, and we are so glad that you were able to experience this during your experience with us. We will be sure to...More
If you want to come just for all you can eat oysters go elsewhere. First of all brunch is a set menu. All food has to arrive before you can start to order more oysters 12 per order at a time. Then after a while...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to review your experience at BRUNO Restaurant & Bar. We take feedback from our guests very seriously, and are saddened to see your disappointment. Please rest assured that all guest comments are monitored and actioned to ensure...More
I've heard Bruno is one of the most sought-after restaurants in Vancouver recently and I was excited to experience it tonight. Unfortunately, it looks like it is another overrated restaurant by so-cal KOLs. The arrival experience from the parking was terrible. There was no clear...More
Thank you for taking the time to put into writing a detailed account of your experience at BRUNO Restaurant & Bar. We are delighted to read that you enjoyed the food and are very sorry to hear of the inconveniences you experienced during your dinner/lunch....More",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d23546586-Reviews-Bruno-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Bubble World Robson,"Great little spot to pop in and have an amazing bubble tea and sit down to rest your weary shopping feet. Have only ever had drinks here and they have always been amazing - mocha oreo milkshake and regular oreo milkshake. Service is always quick...More
Lots of games you can play and room to sit - Yummy fruit mango tea, tapiocas very good and fresh! Would recommend for sure!
As always, Bubble World is the most consistent, and delicious bubble tea around! Service is always fast and friendly, can't wait to come back again for more bubble tea!
Popped in to fix a milk tea craving. The girls at the register were lovely, my pearl milky tea, and milky tea with coffee jelly order was made very quickly. Creamy taste with a good tea flavour. Toppings taste fresh. Quite sweet so may ask...More
Arguably a very popular spot among the locals. This small joint offers many different flavours if bubble tea. Regular chai tea is also offered in Asian style. There are on-site computers to try on some video games as well. Most drinks are priced between 4-7...More
Had my first ever bubble tea and it was really good. Look it back to my hotel across the street and enjoyed the tapioca bubbles in the refreshing tea.
I enjoyed this place more than Chatime near by. Hence, I came to this location twice. The vibe is great, they have video games on site and plenty of seat. The owners were friendly and explained how the make many things fresh each day. We...More
Stopped in for a bubble tea and snack. the place was a bit grungy and sticky looking. Bubble tea was Ok but decided against having food there. There re some computers to play on and tables to hang out but definitely for the teenage crowd
We had lots of bubble tea in the past and this place beat them all. Their bubble has a very nice roasted taste and the milk tea taste fresh, not powdery. Highly recommend!
I'v had bubble tea and several places, but bubble world is by far my favourite. Me and my girlfriend go here and least once a week. There Taro bubble tea is the best in Vancouver. The service is great and it's the cheapest place I...More
I was excited to see a restaurant that advertised Taiwanese food from their online menu. However, when we got there. The menus were poorly stapled together(Pages were in different orders from the three menus we had). They didn't have any of the four things I...More
Not where you want to go for ambience. It's super noisy w/ teens and young adults. Beside the noise of the kids, the blender is high power noise pretty much going all the time but I guess that's part of the bubble tea experience. The...More
I visited Bubble World Robson for a few times and I loved to have their Kiwi slush, it's really fresh and delicious.
It is not a big restaurant on the Robinson street. we are looking for 1, after compare the menus against the nearby ones. There are many very typical traditional dishes. and the soft drink attracted my daughter. We ordered 3 main dish and a side...More
Their mango bubble tea was pretty good. And their salt&pepper chicken was very crispy and tasty. They're not very crowded (probably because a ChaTime opened across the street and their also another cake/dessert place nearby as well) which means short wait times. They also sell...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5078587-Reviews-Bubble_World_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Buckstop,"We visited this bar several times during our first three days in Canada because after the first visit we knew that we would be welcomed and served well. We ate there only once, sampling their mac’n’cheese which was delicious. The boss man (sorry useless with...More
Our family of 5-1/2 had the cheese sticks, Would highly Half Stop platter and a Chicken Burger. This was more than enough food to feed us. The food was excellent and the service was quick and friendly. The Caesar cocktails were also outstanding.
All the meat tasted identical, old and wet . Nothing was fall off the bone here. My first bite was a fry and at that moment I knew I was in for a bad experience. No love in this food. You can get a fresher...More
This place has a small and cozy feel to it. It smells great! And the staff are very chatty and sarcastic with a solid sense of humour. If you are looking for a place to have a drink, a meal and a good chat with...More
We have been at the buck stop for a snack and a beer. The service was excellent, all food we ordered was homemade and good. The washroom though needed some cleaning... Maybe because of the all day festival on the street.
went there for a late dinner after work, i asked a beef brisket sandwich and beers; they just brought me a couple of slices of cold meet dish soap taste and some veg n fries on side. Bill 50 $ . I was sick all...More
...in a nice little neighbourhood pub. Totally unpretentious, simple decor. One woman (owner?) running both the bar and the tables without missing a beat. Attentive service and good beer. We sat at the window with a great view of everyone in the world walking up...More
Searched places near my hotel when I was in Vancouver for a work event and found this place. Super casual comfy unassuming atmosphere, very friendly and welcoming staff. Most importantly, awesome food! I had the small plate BBQ with pulled pork, brisket and ribs, plus...More
We were unsure about where to eat, there are a lot of options on Denman but very busy as well! We went in to the dimly lit restaurant and immediately liked the vibe. It was a little too dark as I could barely read the...More
We were staying around the corner in the Sylvia Hotel and looking for some comfort food relatively late in the evening. Buckstop was the perfect fit. We had a shared platter advertised as for 2-3 but it would have fed 4 very easily (or 4...More
While visiting Canada, my husband was craving barbecue (we are from the States). This was recommended by an owner of another restaurant but I was a little hesitant if he should try it being that most Canadians eat pretty healthy and light. I just couldn't...More
I can not recommend this place in good conscience. We went because it was featured on You Gotta Eat Here which is typically a pretty good barometer. There were 4 of us on a Monday and it was not busy. There was one waitress/bartender and...More
Recommended by hotel staff so we stopped in for early dinner. Small place -located on Denman street-with menu including BBQ, burgers, buffalo cauliflower, fried pickles, chicken wings, daily specials, and more . We had the venison burger and chili frito special. Food was very good...More
We had one of the best meals we've ever enjoyed here! Love the atmosphere as well, and great service! If you haven't yet, try the homemade fireball whiskey - wow, it was delicious, and I don't even like fireball normally! The food was excellent, and...More
Not only was our food not hot, the chef was out of the kitchen for over a long period of time that the couple next to us had been waiting 45 minutes since they ordered their food and we had to hear the entire conversation...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4848826-Reviews-Buckstop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Budgies Burritos,"Best damn burrito I can remember eating in my entire life. The service was also friendly and the music was great. Incredible experience
Always a great spot for a quick bite- filling & delicious, I grabbed one to go amid a long work day, hits the spot!
Stumbled across this place whilst exploring on our first day in Vancouver! The food and service were great, however it was a little over priced for a burrito but saying that, it was one of the best i've tasted! Well worth a visit if you...More
We came pretty close to closing and were greeted and served kindly. The burritos were delicious! Loved them!
We stumbled upon this place by accident. Being veggie myself curiosity got the better of me. Great options at good prices. There was someone friendly at the till and service was speedy. There’s lots of questions when buying a burrito so it can be right...More
Budgie's burrito has great reviews on google and on trip advisor, but this is impossible unless they had different owners in the past. The burritos were cold, service was disorganized, and the location was dirty and smelly in contrast to the pictures that appear online....More
Budgie's Burritos has a super exciting menu and we couldn't wait to try some of the stuff. We shared a Burrito and a couple of Tacos: Blair Stanley (Tofu & Chipotle), RIP (Rice, Tofurky), KTB (Refried Beans, Avocado). Fillings were aplenty, they were suitable messy...More
Good cozy Mexican restaurant. Good food and price. Maybe not good for groups >4-5. Not a fancy Mexican place but you feel being in Mexico. Great staff
This was an amazing find - excellent food for not a whole lot of money. Don't be fooled by the tiny store front -- there is more seating downstairs. Lots of vegan options. I particularly recommend the potatoes.
I am a huge burrito fan, so I was pretty excited to try Budgies. It is hands down the most amazing, fresh burrito I've ever eaten. I went with a group (some vegetarians, some not), and everyone loved it. I considered returning during my trip...More
I guess the burrito doesn't suit my taste, I tried the Henry (mild) and decided to not finish eating it. Maybe I'll try nachos or tacos next time. The ambience is kinda so-so depending on your preferences, but for me, it's good and artistic.
A great vegetarian choioce! Fabulous burritos. I had the Jamedog. Filled with lots of great ingredients including garlic roasted potato. Service is quick. Interior is very simple with limited seating on the main floor and additional seating downstairs. Self-serve water dispensers are a nice touch....More
My kids shared a baby beastie and I chowed down on a delicious Henry veggie burrito, medium spice. We loved it. We phoned our order in and it was ready for pick up. We keep on returning because Budgies is awesome. Prices are very reasonable....More
I'm not a vegetarian or vegan by any means, but this place makes it look so easy to be one! Their portions are amazing and lots of choices of what you want to put in the burrito. You can also get it in bowl form...More
I had the quesadilla with optional potatoes which made it very filling lunch for about $9. There are a variety of salsas to try out and service was fast.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d779570-Reviews-Budgies_Burritos-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bufala,"I visited for dinner this week. We did walk-in, and we could see from the two servers rushing around that they were understaffed. They ignored us for about 5 minutes, and when they did see us, they quickly sat us down and ran off to...More
Great pizza! Some staff members are rude. We live in a diverse society, so please respect diversity and create an inclusive environment! Thank you
We frequent Bufala often and the staff are always so welcoming and friendly and the restaurant has a lovely relaxed vibe. We are creatures of habit and mostly order the same things but last night we tried something different. We didn’t enjoy and realized we...More
In our hood so we've been here dozens of times and the food and service is always excellent. Wine list is small but more than adequate for the type of place this is. They have a nice selection of cocktails including some very tasty creation....More
Bufala sucks big time. We had a bad experience with ordering their food through Uber Eats. We received the wrong order and the driver took it back. I called the restaurant to attempt to obtain the food that was ordered. They admitted their error and...More
Decent $12 personal pan pizza if you are on a diet. Too bad it cost $23.00. We got a pepperoni with extra cheese. It was small. Thin crust. Very few toppings even with us adding extra cheese. Tasted good but was not worth the money...More
The staff were welcoming and professional from the start. We had a couple of starters and loved them. Covid-safe barriers between tables. I will definitely return very soon. Thank you, Annika & Taren for the VIP service!
This is an excellent restaurant in Kerrisdale. The new policy of entry by reservation will cause locals who decide to have a pizza find other local alternatives. When a ""regular"" shows up to see empty booths and is told no seating, it is not good....More
Napoleon style Italian restaurant in Kerrisdale we thought to check out for takeout for a late dinner. We used their website to order and it indicated our pizza would be ready in 20 minutes. I was greeted with a friendly smile. Our mushroom pizza was...More
Service was great, food excellent and Patio dining available. We shared two delicious salads, with the kale caesar being a winner. Bean dip was very tasty and we were all impressed with the pizza, particularly the crust.
This neighborhood pizzaria is world class. Well worth a trip. I ate the pork belly on sprout slaw and it was delicious.
Very good service, great pizza. Good reasonable prices. Easy location on west Boulevard. Nice atmosphere.
Good pizza and fresh. Lots of options of veggies and meats, cheeses and sauces. The servers are very attentive.
The salad, pizza and house wine were all excellent, staff were attentive and polite. My only comment would be this is not a place to go if you want to talk to someone over dinner- it was very noisy when full. We didn't care -...More
Extremely rude waiters with very insincere apologies. Unbelievably rude. Upon getting seated, I asked for a beer. I presented the waiter with pictures of my IDs and he paused and said would ask manager if alcohol could be served. He came back with a No....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6781268-Reviews-Bufala-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Bun Cha Ca Hoang Yen,"The bun Rieu, a crab soup with vermicelli is so packed with flavour and ingredients. Substantial portion, served very hot. Spring rolls were freshly wrapped and very tasty.
Out for Father’s Day. Decided to retry this restaurant after it moved over a few blocks to a bigger space. It was busy so had to line up over half an hour. We got deep fried chicken wings, bbq pork and shrimp noodle soup, fish...More
With so few things to do during Covid. We decided to do some destination eating. After a little homework we chose Hoang Yen. The drive from Abbotsford was very uneventful and we got into the restaurant right away. Shortly after all the tables were full...More
Good place for a hot bowl of soup noodle on a cold day. The flavour was on point (has MSG though) but it was good for the soul. The crab soup is a must have. It was absolutely amazing. Chicken wings were just alright, there...More
I was driving along Victoria Drive and noticed people lined up to get inside this restaurant. I decided to go try it and it is the closest to authentic Vietnamese food you can get in my opinion. The service is friendly, the food is fresh...More
The crab soup is a must try. The ingredients are fresh and tasty. Seafood lover is at the right place. Soups on the menu are all numbered. Enjoy the spicy hot chili pepper in the soup and sweat on your forehead. The portion of food...More
yen - menu is large and come highly recommended Famous for - Bun cha ca- L-dill fish soup -L- hot and sour seafood soup - L- crab membrane soup - chicken wings - $59.20 for 4 ppl on Victoria - signature is bun cha ca...More
Came here on recommendation. Came for the special crab soup. Only menu item I have ever eaten here and I don't have a desire to ever change that. The soup is really that good. I'm not sure what region this pho is from but it's...More
Video Review on youtube: vancity food crew bun cha ca hoang yen . This place was recommended by a friend. Their speciality is the Fish Cake Vermicelli soup, which was light and tasty. I also got the pork chop on rice, the rice is a...More
It seems like I’ve been waiting pho-ever to try this place out… Okay, go ahead and groan… that was a bad pun. As their name implies, this Vietnamese restaurant is well known for their specialty pho… a fish cake noodle soup (bún chả cá). The...More
This has got to be one of the best Vietnam Pho Restaurants in Vancouver. You know its good when you have to line up to get in. But the wait is worth it. They make one of the best Pho and Vermicelli dishes. They are...More
This is a small place you can hardly see when you are driving, especially there is always a line up by the doorway which makes the entrance invisible We came here at five oclock and it was not crowded The soup is made of home...More
If we wanted to eat anytime soon we had to share a table, that's ok. We very much enjoyed #6 fish cake, #18 seafood pho and #40 lemongrass beef and pork patty over vermicelli.
We came mid morning on a statutory holiday and was able to get seat in a shared table without waiting.  We ordered #17 seafood with fish and # 18 seafood with pork slices special rice noodle pho, the former was slightly better.  The broth was...More
After 15+ hours flight, first meal after landing YVR is still this fav place. Feels like home again. What more can I say?",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4546289-Reviews-Bun_Cha_Ca_Hoang_Yen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Burdock & Co.,"It's a casual , small restaurant. I don't know why in this kind of atmosphere they serve only tasting menu. Not too expensive but doesn't worth the money. Wine list is very limited. Dessert is the worst. Won't recommend friend to go.
We had a fantastic Michelin starred quality meal here on a trip to Vancouver. Everything was perfect, from the charming waiting staff, to the home made bread and butter (churned with aged sake), wine and most of all the 5 course tasting menu. Beautiful fresh...More
This was our first time visiting Burdock & Co after wanting to for many years, and it did not disappoint. The team were very friendly, genuine and enthusiastic, as well as being incredibly knowledgeable about the wines, cocktails and food. They delivered exceptional service in...More
Once again we were blown away by the fine dining experience at Burdock & Co. Chef Carlson is so thoughtful building the new menu and the dinner was exceptional because of that. The service, as always, was top notch with excellent knowledge of the food...More
We came in for my birthday in June and have been back twice since. Their menus are always unique and delicious. Their GM, Tiago and head chef are both incredibly knowledgeable about local ingredients, wine, and aperitifs. Burdock raises the Vancouver food profile exponentially. We...More
I can't rave about our experience enough. Andrea is an incredible Chef who manages to find the most amazing ingredients and then truly bring out their best. Service was impeccable as well, thanks Thiago and team! Right now they are running a five course $59...More
We had a very nice meal here. The dishes are meant for sharing. High tables, which can be difficult to get out if your back is to the walls as other guests need to move out of the way because of their table setup. We...More
Small restaurant the size of a store on Main. The service is unprofessional from the get go ... young servers/students with no table manners take us to our table. In the restaurant there is a persistent stench of stale burnt peanut oil ( the smell...More
I haven’t returned to this place for a long time and I regret not coming back sooner. Chef Andrea Carlson continually receives accolades for her cooking and it’s easy to see why. The 4 of us share all the dishes so we could each have...More
Comfortable and cozy restaurant. Can be a bit difficult during busy times to find parking off Main St. but lots of meter parking available. This place makes brunch and dinner but brunch is better. A little over priced but options are hearty and portions fill...More
Some of the most creative and delicious dishes I've found at restaurants in Vancouver. Our group ordered the tasting menu and the chef brought us a series of excellent tastes. All topped off by excellent service.
Yes, this resto. is small, but oh my...what goes on in the kitchen is totally amazing. Chef Andrea Carlson is one of the most creative chefs in Canada...locally sourced, sustainable ingredients are the order of the day. The level of preparation and presentation are unusual...More
I went to Burdock and Co. for a weekend brunch- it's a tiny spot (we actually didn't see the sign outside and drove right by). It's well worth a stop if you are in Vancouver- I had vegan options and my husband got to eat...More
We dined here on the final night of our trip from Calgary to Vancouver. Our son found this hidden gem as is vegetarian & it will now be one of our favourites - ever! We opted for the taster menu & it was truly delicious...More
After one mediocre experience and one terrible experience I can honestly say I will never go there again. Not worth your time or money. Bad staff and management.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4427127-Reviews-Burdock_Co-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Burgoo,"Great food, wonderful staff, accommodating and friendly. We had the Brie fondue (very good but more bread than apples if you care about that kind of thing) to share and I had the shepherd’s pie - just perfect. It was crowded - a good sign...More
Great food, wonderful staff, accommodating and friendly. We had the Brie fondue (very good but more bread than apples if you care about that kind of thing) to share and I had the shepherd’s pie - just perfect. It was crowded - a good sign...More
Great food, wonderful staff, accommodating and friendly. We had the Brie fondue (very good but more bread than apples if you care about that kind of thing) to share and I had the shepherd’s pie - just perfect. It was crowded - a good sign...More
Great food, wonderful staff, accommodating and friendly. We had the Brie fondue (very good but more bread than apples if you care about that kind of thing) to share and I had the shepherd’s pie - just perfect. It was crowded - a good sign...More
We had to try several times to get in ( weekends are horrible), but during weekdays it was easier. Bigger portions than expected. We went 2x in one week. Service always exceptional. Loved the Mac and cheese.
We had to try several times to get in ( weekends are horrible), but during weekdays it was easier. Bigger portions than expected. We went 2x in one week. Service always exceptional. Loved the Mac and cheese.
We had to try several times to get in ( weekends are horrible), but during weekdays it was easier. Bigger portions than expected. We went 2x in one week. Service always exceptional. Loved the Mac and cheese.
We had to try several times to get in ( weekends are horrible), but during weekdays it was easier. Bigger portions than expected. We went 2x in one week. Service always exceptional. Loved the Mac and cheese.
We love this place and been there many times. The most annoying thing about this place is to get in. Try to make a reservation and was told that they are not taking reservations anymore, but to come down as there was lots of tables....More
We love this place and been there many times. The most annoying thing about this place is to get in. Try to make a reservation and was told that they are not taking reservations anymore, but to come down as there was lots of tables....More
We love this place and been there many times. The most annoying thing about this place is to get in. Try to make a reservation and was told that they are not taking reservations anymore, but to come down as there was lots of tables....More
We love this place and been there many times. The most annoying thing about this place is to get in. Try to make a reservation and was told that they are not taking reservations anymore, but to come down as there was lots of tables....More
We found this to be a very pleasant place to eat - good service and not loud. Their food is more interesting and better than most. They also serve a few good beers. Overall, we had a good evening there.
We found this to be a very pleasant place to eat - good service and not loud. Their food is more interesting and better than most. They also serve a few good beers. Overall, we had a good evening there.
We found this to be a very pleasant place to eat - good service and not loud. Their food is more interesting and better than most. They also serve a few good beers. Overall, we had a good evening there.
We found this to be a very pleasant place to eat - good service and not loud. Their food is more interesting and better than most. They also serve a few good beers. Overall, we had a good evening there.
We went for a simple soup but it really crushed it! Mac&cheese were delicious and don’t mention the perogi! I was amazed!
We went for a simple soup but it really crushed it! Mac&cheese were delicious and don’t mention the perogi! I was amazed!
We went for a simple soup but it really crushed it! Mac&cheese were delicious and don’t mention the perogi! I was amazed!
We went for a simple soup but it really crushed it! Mac&cheese were delicious and don’t mention the perogi! I was amazed!
And add to that friendly and competent service. Our waiter made suggestions which were spot-on. We had mini perogies to start and then a host of sandwiches. Each was great, and a fair amount to eat.
And add to that friendly and competent service. Our waiter made suggestions which were spot-on. We had mini perogies to start and then a host of sandwiches. Each was great, and a fair amount to eat.
And add to that friendly and competent service. Our waiter made suggestions which were spot-on. We had mini perogies to start and then a host of sandwiches. Each was great, and a fair amount to eat.
And add to that friendly and competent service. Our waiter made suggestions which were spot-on. We had mini perogies to start and then a host of sandwiches. Each was great, and a fair amount to eat.
We were surprised at quality of meals. We had chicken sandwich, beef bourguignon and vegetable ratatouille. All were excellent. The prices were very reasonable and the waiter was friendly and efficient. Reminded us of great quality home cooking.
We were surprised at quality of meals. We had chicken sandwich, beef bourguignon and vegetable ratatouille. All were excellent. The prices were very reasonable and the waiter was friendly and efficient. Reminded us of great quality home cooking.
We were surprised at quality of meals. We had chicken sandwich, beef bourguignon and vegetable ratatouille. All were excellent. The prices were very reasonable and the waiter was friendly and efficient. Reminded us of great quality home cooking.
We were surprised at quality of meals. We had chicken sandwich, beef bourguignon and vegetable ratatouille. All were excellent. The prices were very reasonable and the waiter was friendly and efficient. Reminded us of great quality home cooking.
Amazing greet and amazing location Worth the time to stop in and try a great open facility. That deserves great reviews.
Amazing greet and amazing location Worth the time to stop in and try a great open facility. That deserves great reviews.
Amazing greet and amazing location Worth the time to stop in and try a great open facility. That deserves great reviews.
Amazing greet and amazing location Worth the time to stop in and try a great open facility. That deserves great reviews.
I've been visiting Vancouver from Alberta monthly for over a year and have dined at Burgoo on Main 5-6 times. What a fabulous place.... in particular.... the chicken pot pie and Billy from Cork (I think he's mainly a bartender). I will be back again...More
I've been visiting Vancouver from Alberta monthly for over a year and have dined at Burgoo on Main 5-6 times. What a fabulous place.... in particular.... the chicken pot pie and Billy from Cork (I think he's mainly a bartender). I will be back again...More
I've been visiting Vancouver from Alberta monthly for over a year and have dined at Burgoo on Main 5-6 times. What a fabulous place.... in particular.... the chicken pot pie and Billy from Cork (I think he's mainly a bartender). I will be back again...More
I've been visiting Vancouver from Alberta monthly for over a year and have dined at Burgoo on Main 5-6 times. What a fabulous place.... in particular.... the chicken pot pie and Billy from Cork (I think he's mainly a bartender). I will be back again...More
The waitrrss was lovely, offering alternatives if we wanted something removed that ee did'nt like. I had a chicken burger type sandwich that had sliced apple, not a combo I would have put together but it worked. Hubby being the adventurous type had the bugroo,...More
The waitrrss was lovely, offering alternatives if we wanted something removed that ee did'nt like. I had a chicken burger type sandwich that had sliced apple, not a combo I would have put together but it worked. Hubby being the adventurous type had the bugroo,...More
The waitrrss was lovely, offering alternatives if we wanted something removed that ee did'nt like. I had a chicken burger type sandwich that had sliced apple, not a combo I would have put together but it worked. Hubby being the adventurous type had the bugroo,...More
The waitrrss was lovely, offering alternatives if we wanted something removed that ee did'nt like. I had a chicken burger type sandwich that had sliced apple, not a combo I would have put together but it worked. Hubby being the adventurous type had the bugroo,...More
This is one of our favourite restaurants that we frequent quite regularly. Unfortunately our meal last night wasn't the best. Soup was way too hot, chicken sandwich was bland and mashed potatoes were overdone. They usually have great pizza options for kids but the only...More
This is one of our favourite restaurants that we frequent quite regularly. Unfortunately our meal last night wasn't the best. Soup was way too hot, chicken sandwich was bland and mashed potatoes were overdone. They usually have great pizza options for kids but the only...More
This is one of our favourite restaurants that we frequent quite regularly. Unfortunately our meal last night wasn't the best. Soup was way too hot, chicken sandwich was bland and mashed potatoes were overdone. They usually have great pizza options for kids but the only...More
This is one of our favourite restaurants that we frequent quite regularly. Unfortunately our meal last night wasn't the best. Soup was way too hot, chicken sandwich was bland and mashed potatoes were overdone. They usually have great pizza options for kids but the only...More
My husband and some friends came here for the first time on Dec 4th. It was so good! The pierogi appy was to die for. I had the mushroom soup and grilled cheese sandwich. Absolutely delicious. My husband had the French onion soup, said it...More
My husband and some friends came here for the first time on Dec 4th. It was so good! The pierogi appy was to die for. I had the mushroom soup and grilled cheese sandwich. Absolutely delicious. My husband had the French onion soup, said it...More
My husband and some friends came here for the first time on Dec 4th. It was so good! The pierogi appy was to die for. I had the mushroom soup and grilled cheese sandwich. Absolutely delicious. My husband had the French onion soup, said it...More
My husband and some friends came here for the first time on Dec 4th. It was so good! The pierogi appy was to die for. I had the mushroom soup and grilled cheese sandwich. Absolutely delicious. My husband had the French onion soup, said it...More
Always in the mood for some Burgoo-ey cheese! We came at night but they always have their after school special of soup and sandwich. Absolutely hit the spot! The gooey cheese grillers (with tomato) was so decadent. Mozzarella, Gruyère, ementhal, cheddar.. looks like they used...More
Always in the mood for some Burgoo-ey cheese! We came at night but they always have their after school special of soup and sandwich. Absolutely hit the spot! The gooey cheese grillers (with tomato) was so decadent. Mozzarella, Gruyère, ementhal, cheddar.. looks like they used...More
Always in the mood for some Burgoo-ey cheese! We came at night but they always have their after school special of soup and sandwich. Absolutely hit the spot! The gooey cheese grillers (with tomato) was so decadent. Mozzarella, Gruyère, ementhal, cheddar.. looks like they used...More
Always in the mood for some Burgoo-ey cheese! We came at night but they always have their after school special of soup and sandwich. Absolutely hit the spot! The gooey cheese grillers (with tomato) was so decadent. Mozzarella, Gruyère, ementhal, cheddar.. looks like they used...More
Simple, honest comfort food executed well. Elevated flavor profiles make this place tops when it comes to comfort food. Great spot for those dreary rainy days or if you're just missing Mom's cooking.
Simple, honest comfort food executed well. Elevated flavor profiles make this place tops when it comes to comfort food. Great spot for those dreary rainy days or if you're just missing Mom's cooking.
Simple, honest comfort food executed well. Elevated flavor profiles make this place tops when it comes to comfort food. Great spot for those dreary rainy days or if you're just missing Mom's cooking.
Simple, honest comfort food executed well. Elevated flavor profiles make this place tops when it comes to comfort food. Great spot for those dreary rainy days or if you're just missing Mom's cooking.
We recently had a visit to Vancouver and really enjoyed this restaurant on Main St. Our server was fantastic!
We recently had a visit to Vancouver and really enjoyed this restaurant on Main St. Our server was fantastic!
We recently had a visit to Vancouver and really enjoyed this restaurant on Main St. Our server was fantastic!
We recently had a visit to Vancouver and really enjoyed this restaurant on Main St. Our server was fantastic!
don't come here unless you want to be insulted by staff for no reason. sat us on the patio with our dog, told us it was fine, made us wait, 2 seconds after seating us, another staff member told us we couldn't sit there. I...More
don't come here unless you want to be insulted by staff for no reason. sat us on the patio with our dog, told us it was fine, made us wait, 2 seconds after seating us, another staff member told us we couldn't sit there. I...More
don't come here unless you want to be insulted by staff for no reason. sat us on the patio with our dog, told us it was fine, made us wait, 2 seconds after seating us, another staff member told us we couldn't sit there. I...More
don't come here unless you want to be insulted by staff for no reason. sat us on the patio with our dog, told us it was fine, made us wait, 2 seconds after seating us, another staff member told us we couldn't sit there. I...More
Disappointing meal and service. Not sure what the restaurant theme is but it did not work. Not a quick service and the food was cold and not very tasty.
Disappointing meal and service. Not sure what the restaurant theme is but it did not work. Not a quick service and the food was cold and not very tasty.
Disappointing meal and service. Not sure what the restaurant theme is but it did not work. Not a quick service and the food was cold and not very tasty.
Disappointing meal and service. Not sure what the restaurant theme is but it did not work. Not a quick service and the food was cold and not very tasty.
I was very happy with the selections I ordered from Burgoo. Wonderful soups, and the side order of macaroni and cheese was plentiful enough for each to be their own meal! Definitely recommend visiting!
I was very happy with the selections I ordered from Burgoo. Wonderful soups, and the side order of macaroni and cheese was plentiful enough for each to be their own meal! Definitely recommend visiting!
I was very happy with the selections I ordered from Burgoo. Wonderful soups, and the side order of macaroni and cheese was plentiful enough for each to be their own meal! Definitely recommend visiting!
I was very happy with the selections I ordered from Burgoo. Wonderful soups, and the side order of macaroni and cheese was plentiful enough for each to be their own meal! Definitely recommend visiting!
We have always loved their food and drinks but last night's meal and sangria was not what it used to be. My ratatou. was dry and overheated and my sangria was 1/2 the size that we normally got. Although the price was the same!!
We have always loved their food and drinks but last night's meal and sangria was not what it used to be. My ratatou. was dry and overheated and my sangria was 1/2 the size that we normally got. Although the price was the same!!
We have always loved their food and drinks but last night's meal and sangria was not what it used to be. My ratatou. was dry and overheated and my sangria was 1/2 the size that we normally got. Although the price was the same!!
We have always loved their food and drinks but last night's meal and sangria was not what it used to be. My ratatou. was dry and overheated and my sangria was 1/2 the size that we normally got. Although the price was the same!!
Tasty comfort food. We came with friends, and everyone found something they wanted to try on the menu. The ambience is cozy, and the service was fantastic. We really liked the craft sodas on the menu.
Tasty comfort food. We came with friends, and everyone found something they wanted to try on the menu. The ambience is cozy, and the service was fantastic. We really liked the craft sodas on the menu.
Tasty comfort food. We came with friends, and everyone found something they wanted to try on the menu. The ambience is cozy, and the service was fantastic. We really liked the craft sodas on the menu.
Tasty comfort food. We came with friends, and everyone found something they wanted to try on the menu. The ambience is cozy, and the service was fantastic. We really liked the craft sodas on the menu.
I love coming to Burgoo! They have the coziest decor and ambiance. The drinks are always tasty, even the mocktails. I love getting the after school special and having a soup and sandwich. They always have different soups of the day. The waiters are always...More
I love coming to Burgoo! They have the coziest decor and ambiance. The drinks are always tasty, even the mocktails. I love getting the after school special and having a soup and sandwich. They always have different soups of the day. The waiters are always...More
I love coming to Burgoo! They have the coziest decor and ambiance. The drinks are always tasty, even the mocktails. I love getting the after school special and having a soup and sandwich. They always have different soups of the day. The waiters are always...More
I love coming to Burgoo! They have the coziest decor and ambiance. The drinks are always tasty, even the mocktails. I love getting the after school special and having a soup and sandwich. They always have different soups of the day. The waiters are always...More
I’m not sure why I choose this place out of the hundreds we could have gone to, I suppose the idea of $10 fondues, cheese and chocolate and happy hour drinks all evening sounded like fun. I am not convinced there was any cheese in...More
I’m not sure why I choose this place out of the hundreds we could have gone to, I suppose the idea of $10 fondues, cheese and chocolate and happy hour drinks all evening sounded like fun. I am not convinced there was any cheese in...More
I’m not sure why I choose this place out of the hundreds we could have gone to, I suppose the idea of $10 fondues, cheese and chocolate and happy hour drinks all evening sounded like fun. I am not convinced there was any cheese in...More
I’m not sure why I choose this place out of the hundreds we could have gone to, I suppose the idea of $10 fondues, cheese and chocolate and happy hour drinks all evening sounded like fun. I am not convinced there was any cheese in...More
We've been coming here for years! The best comfort food lunch spot around! Love the sandwich and salad combo with so many options but they have an all round great menu - great location too!
We've been coming here for years! The best comfort food lunch spot around! Love the sandwich and salad combo with so many options but they have an all round great menu - great location too!
We've been coming here for years! The best comfort food lunch spot around! Love the sandwich and salad combo with so many options but they have an all round great menu - great location too!
We've been coming here for years! The best comfort food lunch spot around! Love the sandwich and salad combo with so many options but they have an all round great menu - great location too!
Burgoo is the go-to classic comfort food. The After School Special combo with soup and sandwich is the perfect filling and satisfying meal. Love this place!!
Burgoo is the go-to classic comfort food. The After School Special combo with soup and sandwich is the perfect filling and satisfying meal. Love this place!!
Burgoo is the go-to classic comfort food. The After School Special combo with soup and sandwich is the perfect filling and satisfying meal. Love this place!!
Burgoo is the go-to classic comfort food. The After School Special combo with soup and sandwich is the perfect filling and satisfying meal. Love this place!!
Burgoo really excels at comfort food. Love their Afterschool special of any soup any sandwich - and they have some great options. Crab bisque and Tom Kah Gai soups were delish. Sandwich-wise the gooey cheese was super rich but good, and the Tastier chicken was...More
Burgoo really excels at comfort food. Love their Afterschool special of any soup any sandwich - and they have some great options. Crab bisque and Tom Kah Gai soups were delish. Sandwich-wise the gooey cheese was super rich but good, and the Tastier chicken was...More
Burgoo really excels at comfort food. Love their Afterschool special of any soup any sandwich - and they have some great options. Crab bisque and Tom Kah Gai soups were delish. Sandwich-wise the gooey cheese was super rich but good, and the Tastier chicken was...More
Burgoo really excels at comfort food. Love their Afterschool special of any soup any sandwich - and they have some great options. Crab bisque and Tom Kah Gai soups were delish. Sandwich-wise the gooey cheese was super rich but good, and the Tastier chicken was...More
Another weekly visit to a local restaurant and we were not disappointed. The atmosphere is warm and cozy; a pleasant spot to visit on a cool fall evening. Our server, Grace, was attentive and explained the menu and the various choices. We both selected the...More
Another weekly visit to a local restaurant and we were not disappointed. The atmosphere is warm and cozy; a pleasant spot to visit on a cool fall evening. Our server, Grace, was attentive and explained the menu and the various choices. We both selected the...More
Another weekly visit to a local restaurant and we were not disappointed. The atmosphere is warm and cozy; a pleasant spot to visit on a cool fall evening. Our server, Grace, was attentive and explained the menu and the various choices. We both selected the...More
Another weekly visit to a local restaurant and we were not disappointed. The atmosphere is warm and cozy; a pleasant spot to visit on a cool fall evening. Our server, Grace, was attentive and explained the menu and the various choices. We both selected the...More
What beats a fresh soup and sandwich on a rainy day? NOTHING. Warm and cozy with a good selection on the menu. The grilled cheese and tomato soup are my go too, haven't had anyone complain when i've recommended it!
What beats a fresh soup and sandwich on a rainy day? NOTHING. Warm and cozy with a good selection on the menu. The grilled cheese and tomato soup are my go too, haven't had anyone complain when i've recommended it!
What beats a fresh soup and sandwich on a rainy day? NOTHING. Warm and cozy with a good selection on the menu. The grilled cheese and tomato soup are my go too, haven't had anyone complain when i've recommended it!
What beats a fresh soup and sandwich on a rainy day? NOTHING. Warm and cozy with a good selection on the menu. The grilled cheese and tomato soup are my go too, haven't had anyone complain when i've recommended it!
It is a small restaurant but with a great layout so that you don't feel jammed in. The food is rich with flavour. The eggs ratatouille is perfect for a rainy morning. Great service tops off the welcoming feeling. Definitely will be back!
It is a small restaurant but with a great layout so that you don't feel jammed in. The food is rich with flavour. The eggs ratatouille is perfect for a rainy morning. Great service tops off the welcoming feeling. Definitely will be back!
It is a small restaurant but with a great layout so that you don't feel jammed in. The food is rich with flavour. The eggs ratatouille is perfect for a rainy morning. Great service tops off the welcoming feeling. Definitely will be back!
It is a small restaurant but with a great layout so that you don't feel jammed in. The food is rich with flavour. The eggs ratatouille is perfect for a rainy morning. Great service tops off the welcoming feeling. Definitely will be back!
My boyfriend and I decided to go here for a cute little date night. They had drinks on special, as well as a great soup and sandwich combo. We both ordered the crab bisque with the apple and chicken sandwich. It was a great atmosphere...More
My boyfriend and I decided to go here for a cute little date night. They had drinks on special, as well as a great soup and sandwich combo. We both ordered the crab bisque with the apple and chicken sandwich. It was a great atmosphere...More
My boyfriend and I decided to go here for a cute little date night. They had drinks on special, as well as a great soup and sandwich combo. We both ordered the crab bisque with the apple and chicken sandwich. It was a great atmosphere...More
My boyfriend and I decided to go here for a cute little date night. They had drinks on special, as well as a great soup and sandwich combo. We both ordered the crab bisque with the apple and chicken sandwich. It was a great atmosphere...More
Good food. Good drinks. Friendly staff. We enjoyed our food and drinks in a nice cozy environment. I think it could do a little better on service in general Certainly recommend as a one time visit
Good food. Good drinks. Friendly staff. We enjoyed our food and drinks in a nice cozy environment. I think it could do a little better on service in general Certainly recommend as a one time visit
Good food. Good drinks. Friendly staff. We enjoyed our food and drinks in a nice cozy environment. I think it could do a little better on service in general Certainly recommend as a one time visit
Good food. Good drinks. Friendly staff. We enjoyed our food and drinks in a nice cozy environment. I think it could do a little better on service in general Certainly recommend as a one time visit
Was able to make last minute reservation although place filled up nicely while there. Service was quick and relaxed. Variety of dishes. Enjoyed the red wine and loved the butter chicken. All 8 of us liked or loved what we had. Excellent French onion soup...More
Was able to make last minute reservation although place filled up nicely while there. Service was quick and relaxed. Variety of dishes. Enjoyed the red wine and loved the butter chicken. All 8 of us liked or loved what we had. Excellent French onion soup...More
Was able to make last minute reservation although place filled up nicely while there. Service was quick and relaxed. Variety of dishes. Enjoyed the red wine and loved the butter chicken. All 8 of us liked or loved what we had. Excellent French onion soup...More
Was able to make last minute reservation although place filled up nicely while there. Service was quick and relaxed. Variety of dishes. Enjoyed the red wine and loved the butter chicken. All 8 of us liked or loved what we had. Excellent French onion soup...More
The neighbourhood where Burgoo was located was not so cosy; busy traffic and homeless people. The cocktail we took was great! The mac ‘n cheese was ok, but not super. We had to wait a long time before we got the food.
The neighbourhood where Burgoo was located was not so cosy; busy traffic and homeless people. The cocktail we took was great! The mac ‘n cheese was ok, but not super. We had to wait a long time before we got the food.
The neighbourhood where Burgoo was located was not so cosy; busy traffic and homeless people. The cocktail we took was great! The mac ‘n cheese was ok, but not super. We had to wait a long time before we got the food.
The neighbourhood where Burgoo was located was not so cosy; busy traffic and homeless people. The cocktail we took was great! The mac ‘n cheese was ok, but not super. We had to wait a long time before we got the food.
Burgoo is a local restaurant with several locations, and they only do comfort food: soups, stews, grilled cheese sandwiches, and a few other comforting dishes (salads, macaroni & cheese, etc.). No burgers, steaks, etc. On a cold winter evening, Burgoo is perfect for a casual...More
Burgoo is a local restaurant with several locations, and they only do comfort food: soups, stews, grilled cheese sandwiches, and a few other comforting dishes (salads, macaroni & cheese, etc.). No burgers, steaks, etc. On a cold winter evening, Burgoo is perfect for a casual...More
Burgoo is a local restaurant with several locations, and they only do comfort food: soups, stews, grilled cheese sandwiches, and a few other comforting dishes (salads, macaroni & cheese, etc.). No burgers, steaks, etc. On a cold winter evening, Burgoo is perfect for a casual...More
Burgoo is a local restaurant with several locations, and they only do comfort food: soups, stews, grilled cheese sandwiches, and a few other comforting dishes (salads, macaroni & cheese, etc.). No burgers, steaks, etc. On a cold winter evening, Burgoo is perfect for a casual...More
Nipped in for a spot of late lunch with two children. 3 of us ordered soup and one child, a grilled cheese sandwich (they even sorted it to make it a child’s portion). Food was fresh, tasty and we devoured it all! On our last...More
Nipped in for a spot of late lunch with two children. 3 of us ordered soup and one child, a grilled cheese sandwich (they even sorted it to make it a child’s portion). Food was fresh, tasty and we devoured it all! On our last...More
Nipped in for a spot of late lunch with two children. 3 of us ordered soup and one child, a grilled cheese sandwich (they even sorted it to make it a child’s portion). Food was fresh, tasty and we devoured it all! On our last...More
Nipped in for a spot of late lunch with two children. 3 of us ordered soup and one child, a grilled cheese sandwich (they even sorted it to make it a child’s portion). Food was fresh, tasty and we devoured it all! On our last...More
I stumbled upon this restaurant strolling from Sutton Hotel. A combo chic, hippie-ish light food with drinks option. Funky jazz plays constantly against relaxed and stylish yet simple decor. I had a fab salad with mashed potatoes- really hit the spot for light lunch. Heavier...More
I stumbled upon this restaurant strolling from Sutton Hotel. A combo chic, hippie-ish light food with drinks option. Funky jazz plays constantly against relaxed and stylish yet simple decor. I had a fab salad with mashed potatoes- really hit the spot for light lunch. Heavier...More
I stumbled upon this restaurant strolling from Sutton Hotel. A combo chic, hippie-ish light food with drinks option. Funky jazz plays constantly against relaxed and stylish yet simple decor. I had a fab salad with mashed potatoes- really hit the spot for light lunch. Heavier...More
I stumbled upon this restaurant strolling from Sutton Hotel. A combo chic, hippie-ish light food with drinks option. Funky jazz plays constantly against relaxed and stylish yet simple decor. I had a fab salad with mashed potatoes- really hit the spot for light lunch. Heavier...More
good food, appys are good but pricey. Very good flavour on the wings. The chowder was good as was the grilled cheese. Dinners were reasonably priced. The Caesar drinks were fantastic go for the spicy. Service was great, they were really hustling.
good food, appys are good but pricey. Very good flavour on the wings. The chowder was good as was the grilled cheese. Dinners were reasonably priced. The Caesar drinks were fantastic go for the spicy. Service was great, they were really hustling.
good food, appys are good but pricey. Very good flavour on the wings. The chowder was good as was the grilled cheese. Dinners were reasonably priced. The Caesar drinks were fantastic go for the spicy. Service was great, they were really hustling.
good food, appys are good but pricey. Very good flavour on the wings. The chowder was good as was the grilled cheese. Dinners were reasonably priced. The Caesar drinks were fantastic go for the spicy. Service was great, they were really hustling.
Good food, but the service was very average. It was not busy at all (2 other customers in the restaurant), and the waitress seemed to be too busy to serve us besides taking the initial order and making us pay the bill.
Good food, but the service was very average. It was not busy at all (2 other customers in the restaurant), and the waitress seemed to be too busy to serve us besides taking the initial order and making us pay the bill.
Good food, but the service was very average. It was not busy at all (2 other customers in the restaurant), and the waitress seemed to be too busy to serve us besides taking the initial order and making us pay the bill.
Good food, but the service was very average. It was not busy at all (2 other customers in the restaurant), and the waitress seemed to be too busy to serve us besides taking the initial order and making us pay the bill.
I suggested this place my friend during Vancouver pride weekend and it didn't disappoint, I loved the Tasty chicken. When you love a sandwhich so much that you don't want it to be over? Yeah..and the gooey cheese grillers are the bomb. You cannot forget...More
I suggested this place my friend during Vancouver pride weekend and it didn't disappoint, I loved the Tasty chicken. When you love a sandwhich so much that you don't want it to be over? Yeah..and the gooey cheese grillers are the bomb. You cannot forget...More
I suggested this place my friend during Vancouver pride weekend and it didn't disappoint, I loved the Tasty chicken. When you love a sandwhich so much that you don't want it to be over? Yeah..and the gooey cheese grillers are the bomb. You cannot forget...More
I suggested this place my friend during Vancouver pride weekend and it didn't disappoint, I loved the Tasty chicken. When you love a sandwhich so much that you don't want it to be over? Yeah..and the gooey cheese grillers are the bomb. You cannot forget...More
The highlight was the tomato soup which had a deep savory flavor. Although our server was very courteous, placing our order, getting our food and drinks, and getting our check took excessive time and needed prompting on our part. The server was overworked. She was...More
The highlight was the tomato soup which had a deep savory flavor. Although our server was very courteous, placing our order, getting our food and drinks, and getting our check took excessive time and needed prompting on our part. The server was overworked. She was...More
The highlight was the tomato soup which had a deep savory flavor. Although our server was very courteous, placing our order, getting our food and drinks, and getting our check took excessive time and needed prompting on our part. The server was overworked. She was...More
The highlight was the tomato soup which had a deep savory flavor. Although our server was very courteous, placing our order, getting our food and drinks, and getting our check took excessive time and needed prompting on our part. The server was overworked. She was...More
Flies everywhere! Inside, the patio seating too. We bought a bottled drink and ran out of there. The staff was reluctant to help us despite being almost empty. The staff appeared very stressed and unhappy. I feel sad for them, hope their situation improves.
Flies everywhere! Inside, the patio seating too. We bought a bottled drink and ran out of there. The staff was reluctant to help us despite being almost empty. The staff appeared very stressed and unhappy. I feel sad for them, hope their situation improves.
Flies everywhere! Inside, the patio seating too. We bought a bottled drink and ran out of there. The staff was reluctant to help us despite being almost empty. The staff appeared very stressed and unhappy. I feel sad for them, hope their situation improves.
Flies everywhere! Inside, the patio seating too. We bought a bottled drink and ran out of there. The staff was reluctant to help us despite being almost empty. The staff appeared very stressed and unhappy. I feel sad for them, hope their situation improves.
A decent selection of light meals. It was a bit noisier than I would have liked, but the food was fine and he staff charming
A decent selection of light meals. It was a bit noisier than I would have liked, but the food was fine and he staff charming
A decent selection of light meals. It was a bit noisier than I would have liked, but the food was fine and he staff charming
A decent selection of light meals. It was a bit noisier than I would have liked, but the food was fine and he staff charming
We went twice to Burgoo. Both times the service was prompt and attentive. The food was well prepared, very tasty and reasonably priced.
We went twice to Burgoo. Both times the service was prompt and attentive. The food was well prepared, very tasty and reasonably priced.
We went twice to Burgoo. Both times the service was prompt and attentive. The food was well prepared, very tasty and reasonably priced.
We went twice to Burgoo. Both times the service was prompt and attentive. The food was well prepared, very tasty and reasonably priced.
Great comfort food. Excellent music and ambiance. Santiago was a very attentive server. We will be back as often as possible.
Great comfort food. Excellent music and ambiance. Santiago was a very attentive server. We will be back as often as possible.
Great comfort food. Excellent music and ambiance. Santiago was a very attentive server. We will be back as often as possible.
Great comfort food. Excellent music and ambiance. Santiago was a very attentive server. We will be back as often as possible.
We dined here whilst on holiday in vancouver. It was clean, staff were welcoming and friendly. The place had a lovely vibe to it and to top it off the food was delicious. Enjoyed our visit and would definately recommend it. I had the beef...More
We dined here whilst on holiday in vancouver. It was clean, staff were welcoming and friendly. The place had a lovely vibe to it and to top it off the food was delicious. Enjoyed our visit and would definately recommend it. I had the beef...More
We dined here whilst on holiday in vancouver. It was clean, staff were welcoming and friendly. The place had a lovely vibe to it and to top it off the food was delicious. Enjoyed our visit and would definately recommend it. I had the beef...More
We dined here whilst on holiday in vancouver. It was clean, staff were welcoming and friendly. The place had a lovely vibe to it and to top it off the food was delicious. Enjoyed our visit and would definately recommend it. I had the beef...More
We had the most delicious meal and drink here. Chicken pot pie was just what we needed on a cold night. Cherry cheesecake was also just as scrumptious. Great service!
We had the most delicious meal and drink here. Chicken pot pie was just what we needed on a cold night. Cherry cheesecake was also just as scrumptious. Great service!
We had the most delicious meal and drink here. Chicken pot pie was just what we needed on a cold night. Cherry cheesecake was also just as scrumptious. Great service!
We had the most delicious meal and drink here. Chicken pot pie was just what we needed on a cold night. Cherry cheesecake was also just as scrumptious. Great service!
My wife had the chicken sandwich and chicken soup. She thought it was tasty and good. I had the lentil soup of the day and a Caesar salad. Both were tasty and fresh. Service was friendly, helpful, and pleasant.
My wife had the chicken sandwich and chicken soup. She thought it was tasty and good. I had the lentil soup of the day and a Caesar salad. Both were tasty and fresh. Service was friendly, helpful, and pleasant.
My wife had the chicken sandwich and chicken soup. She thought it was tasty and good. I had the lentil soup of the day and a Caesar salad. Both were tasty and fresh. Service was friendly, helpful, and pleasant.
My wife had the chicken sandwich and chicken soup. She thought it was tasty and good. I had the lentil soup of the day and a Caesar salad. Both were tasty and fresh. Service was friendly, helpful, and pleasant.
I went there and it was a bit busy but we found a spot at the counter. The food is the typical comfort food (stew, Mac and cheese, ...) but it is freshly prepared and good! Both the portion for the main dish and especially...More
I went there and it was a bit busy but we found a spot at the counter. The food is the typical comfort food (stew, Mac and cheese, ...) but it is freshly prepared and good! Both the portion for the main dish and especially...More
I went there and it was a bit busy but we found a spot at the counter. The food is the typical comfort food (stew, Mac and cheese, ...) but it is freshly prepared and good! Both the portion for the main dish and especially...More
I went there and it was a bit busy but we found a spot at the counter. The food is the typical comfort food (stew, Mac and cheese, ...) but it is freshly prepared and good! Both the portion for the main dish and especially...More
Wood paneling, a fireplace that was functioning in a chilly night. A generous portion of hearty bœuf bourguignon that was served in a casserole style dish and was reasonably priced as was the macaroni and cheese. Daily specials like garlic shrimp and an excellent choice...More
Wood paneling, a fireplace that was functioning in a chilly night. A generous portion of hearty bœuf bourguignon that was served in a casserole style dish and was reasonably priced as was the macaroni and cheese. Daily specials like garlic shrimp and an excellent choice...More
Wood paneling, a fireplace that was functioning in a chilly night. A generous portion of hearty bœuf bourguignon that was served in a casserole style dish and was reasonably priced as was the macaroni and cheese. Daily specials like garlic shrimp and an excellent choice...More
Wood paneling, a fireplace that was functioning in a chilly night. A generous portion of hearty bœuf bourguignon that was served in a casserole style dish and was reasonably priced as was the macaroni and cheese. Daily specials like garlic shrimp and an excellent choice...More
I had high expectations for Burgoo and maybe that wasn't fair. The food was just okay - comfort food that was tasty but not amazing. It also seemed overpriced for what we got. Felt a little pressure to drink as well because they asked a...More
I had high expectations for Burgoo and maybe that wasn't fair. The food was just okay - comfort food that was tasty but not amazing. It also seemed overpriced for what we got. Felt a little pressure to drink as well because they asked a...More
I had high expectations for Burgoo and maybe that wasn't fair. The food was just okay - comfort food that was tasty but not amazing. It also seemed overpriced for what we got. Felt a little pressure to drink as well because they asked a...More
I had high expectations for Burgoo and maybe that wasn't fair. The food was just okay - comfort food that was tasty but not amazing. It also seemed overpriced for what we got. Felt a little pressure to drink as well because they asked a...More
This seems to be an unpopular opinion... but sub par sandwiches for $18? Overpriced and overrated. I'm all for spending money on good food, but I'd rather make my own grilled cheese.
This seems to be an unpopular opinion... but sub par sandwiches for $18? Overpriced and overrated. I'm all for spending money on good food, but I'd rather make my own grilled cheese.
This seems to be an unpopular opinion... but sub par sandwiches for $18? Overpriced and overrated. I'm all for spending money on good food, but I'd rather make my own grilled cheese.
This seems to be an unpopular opinion... but sub par sandwiches for $18? Overpriced and overrated. I'm all for spending money on good food, but I'd rather make my own grilled cheese.
Love the soup and sandwich after school special delicious hot soup and a huge sandwich for 18.50$ Waiter was extremely friendly and the atmosphere cozy. Menu is interesting and electric I’ll definitely be back
Love the soup and sandwich after school special delicious hot soup and a huge sandwich for 18.50$ Waiter was extremely friendly and the atmosphere cozy. Menu is interesting and electric I’ll definitely be back
Love the soup and sandwich after school special delicious hot soup and a huge sandwich for 18.50$ Waiter was extremely friendly and the atmosphere cozy. Menu is interesting and electric I’ll definitely be back
Love the soup and sandwich after school special delicious hot soup and a huge sandwich for 18.50$ Waiter was extremely friendly and the atmosphere cozy. Menu is interesting and electric I’ll definitely be back
My family and I came here for dinner one time and we were blown away. We got the cheese fondue for a starter and you definitely need to try it 100%.
My family and I came here for dinner one time and we were blown away. We got the cheese fondue for a starter and you definitely need to try it 100%.
My family and I came here for dinner one time and we were blown away. We got the cheese fondue for a starter and you definitely need to try it 100%.
My family and I came here for dinner one time and we were blown away. We got the cheese fondue for a starter and you definitely need to try it 100%.
Our B&B recommended Burgoo and a few other restaurants. After checking menus, Burgoo seemed to offer good food at a reasonable price point in a relaxed environment. They characterize their menu as 'comfort food', and we agree. The staff are friendly, helpful, and of good...More
Our B&B recommended Burgoo and a few other restaurants. After checking menus, Burgoo seemed to offer good food at a reasonable price point in a relaxed environment. They characterize their menu as 'comfort food', and we agree. The staff are friendly, helpful, and of good...More
Our B&B recommended Burgoo and a few other restaurants. After checking menus, Burgoo seemed to offer good food at a reasonable price point in a relaxed environment. They characterize their menu as 'comfort food', and we agree. The staff are friendly, helpful, and of good...More
Our B&B recommended Burgoo and a few other restaurants. After checking menus, Burgoo seemed to offer good food at a reasonable price point in a relaxed environment. They characterize their menu as 'comfort food', and we agree. The staff are friendly, helpful, and of good...More
Culinary delight. I went to Burgoo, and had the Burgoo! I will rate it as one of my best meals ever! The other dishes served at our table all had similar reactions to their entrees. Perplexed that we found it on our last night.... wish...More
Culinary delight. I went to Burgoo, and had the Burgoo! I will rate it as one of my best meals ever! The other dishes served at our table all had similar reactions to their entrees. Perplexed that we found it on our last night.... wish...More
Culinary delight. I went to Burgoo, and had the Burgoo! I will rate it as one of my best meals ever! The other dishes served at our table all had similar reactions to their entrees. Perplexed that we found it on our last night.... wish...More
Culinary delight. I went to Burgoo, and had the Burgoo! I will rate it as one of my best meals ever! The other dishes served at our table all had similar reactions to their entrees. Perplexed that we found it on our last night.... wish...More
Burgoo is the place to go to when you’re craving some real comfort food. Pretty much everything on their menu spells out dishes that warm and fill your belly like mac & cheese and chicken pot pie. They don’t just focus on one region of...More
Burgoo is the place to go to when you’re craving some real comfort food. Pretty much everything on their menu spells out dishes that warm and fill your belly like mac & cheese and chicken pot pie. They don’t just focus on one region of...More
Burgoo is the place to go to when you’re craving some real comfort food. Pretty much everything on their menu spells out dishes that warm and fill your belly like mac & cheese and chicken pot pie. They don’t just focus on one region of...More
Burgoo is the place to go to when you’re craving some real comfort food. Pretty much everything on their menu spells out dishes that warm and fill your belly like mac & cheese and chicken pot pie. They don’t just focus on one region of...More
Every time I go to Burgoo, I promise myself that I will try something new....but every time I order the exact same thing. Why mess with perfection? Thier grilled cheese and soup special combined with a glass of Malbec will cure pretty much anything. The...More
Every time I go to Burgoo, I promise myself that I will try something new....but every time I order the exact same thing. Why mess with perfection? Thier grilled cheese and soup special combined with a glass of Malbec will cure pretty much anything. The...More
Every time I go to Burgoo, I promise myself that I will try something new....but every time I order the exact same thing. Why mess with perfection? Thier grilled cheese and soup special combined with a glass of Malbec will cure pretty much anything. The...More
Every time I go to Burgoo, I promise myself that I will try something new....but every time I order the exact same thing. Why mess with perfection? Thier grilled cheese and soup special combined with a glass of Malbec will cure pretty much anything. The...More
Six of us went for lunch on a Friday afternoon and the restaurant wasn't crowded, by any means. The atmosphere inside Burgoo is wonderful but we found the service very slow. Food choices we had included hits and misses. The special mac 'n cheese was...More
Six of us went for lunch on a Friday afternoon and the restaurant wasn't crowded, by any means. The atmosphere inside Burgoo is wonderful but we found the service very slow. Food choices we had included hits and misses. The special mac 'n cheese was...More
Six of us went for lunch on a Friday afternoon and the restaurant wasn't crowded, by any means. The atmosphere inside Burgoo is wonderful but we found the service very slow. Food choices we had included hits and misses. The special mac 'n cheese was...More
Six of us went for lunch on a Friday afternoon and the restaurant wasn't crowded, by any means. The atmosphere inside Burgoo is wonderful but we found the service very slow. Food choices we had included hits and misses. The special mac 'n cheese was...More
It is not a big restaurant by any means. I found it to be a quite nice and cozy place where you can have some warm food and good company and relax without being too pretensive. The selection was quite extensive enough for everyone to...More
It is not a big restaurant by any means. I found it to be a quite nice and cozy place where you can have some warm food and good company and relax without being too pretensive. The selection was quite extensive enough for everyone to...More
It is not a big restaurant by any means. I found it to be a quite nice and cozy place where you can have some warm food and good company and relax without being too pretensive. The selection was quite extensive enough for everyone to...More
It is not a big restaurant by any means. I found it to be a quite nice and cozy place where you can have some warm food and good company and relax without being too pretensive. The selection was quite extensive enough for everyone to...More
Found this restaurant by chance really. It was truly a real good find. I had the Burgoo dish and my husband had a salmon dish. Both were delicious, nutritious, and good portion. The burgoo I had never eaten before, real hearty food loved it. Restaurant...More
Found this restaurant by chance really. It was truly a real good find. I had the Burgoo dish and my husband had a salmon dish. Both were delicious, nutritious, and good portion. The burgoo I had never eaten before, real hearty food loved it. Restaurant...More
Found this restaurant by chance really. It was truly a real good find. I had the Burgoo dish and my husband had a salmon dish. Both were delicious, nutritious, and good portion. The burgoo I had never eaten before, real hearty food loved it. Restaurant...More
Found this restaurant by chance really. It was truly a real good find. I had the Burgoo dish and my husband had a salmon dish. Both were delicious, nutritious, and good portion. The burgoo I had never eaten before, real hearty food loved it. Restaurant...More
Enjoyed early supper with old friends here. Salad was crisp and fresh; soup filling and warming. Loved the fireplace too. Service friendly and not in our faces.
Enjoyed early supper with old friends here. Salad was crisp and fresh; soup filling and warming. Loved the fireplace too. Service friendly and not in our faces.
Enjoyed early supper with old friends here. Salad was crisp and fresh; soup filling and warming. Loved the fireplace too. Service friendly and not in our faces.
Enjoyed early supper with old friends here. Salad was crisp and fresh; soup filling and warming. Loved the fireplace too. Service friendly and not in our faces.",240,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1089346-Reviews-Burgoo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Burnaby Mountain Restaurant and Lounge,"We celebrated my 65th birthday here. My daughter-in-law has a life threatening peanut allergy with minor allergies to all legumes. Our server took the time to understand all of the allergies and then asked the chef to come and speak to us. We felt well...More
We ordered in time before they closed so smaller menu offering. We ordered the spicy black bean avo burger and grilled turkey & bacon grilled cheese. Both came with fries and were fine. I was bot expecting deli sliced turkey. Patio was nice to sit...More
Had a lovely day at the driving range , dropped in for a early dinner , the restaurant is not a fancy place , but clean and mordant clubhouse , not crowned at all , menu not over size , lot of operation , we...More
I was reluctant to go here since I play golf at this golf course in the mornings and head straight to work. It wasn’t what I expected it was the homey feeling of the 19th hole with incredible food. I came out for Dineout Vancouver,...More
Tucked away but worth the effort. Ample parking in a park like setting, beautiful landscaping surrounds you as you walk into the well lighted entryway.
The two of us were seated by the corner window. With the evening sun fading out and the greenery turning autumn reddish and yellow tone, such a fairy tale ambience. What a treat. We ordered the $29 dinner special and the food, the presentation and...More
Good deal for a full course Lobster and Beef steak meal at C$ 29.99.The ambiance and the guest relation officer and waitresses were generally friendly. The presentation of the dishes were nicely arranged.
We came with my husband at 5pm. The place was empty, but by the time we left around 6:30 it was packed! Lots of the golfers come after work so the place get very busy and parking gets full)) The restaurant is very pleasant and...More
Our choice for this special dinner was Mulligan's Three-course Dinner. What a fabulous price! What fabulous food! Service was impeccable from our server Katie. She was friendly, happy and efficient. An early sitting, so the place was not full which was fine. We were seated...More
Well with the change in name and change in Dineout Vancouver 2019 menu it was time to review my favourite $25 three course meal restaurant again. Well the stars were the 6oz medium rare ny steak and lobster tail and Beef Short Rib. Again the...More
We ate here to celebrate a big 50 birthday. The place didnt disappoint, has a stunning view of the city. Service wise i will give it a 5 out of 5. Lobster bisque is awesome. I ordered the rockfish and shrimp. I thought the shrimp...More
We have been a few times over the years and always good food good atmosphere and great service!! Try it you might like it too!
After a game of golf great place for a drink and apple. Dinners are large portions and delicious. Service is friendly and good. Should make a reservation for weekends.
Have Dinned there several times with friends and we were always satisfied and enjoyed the quality of the meals. The price is reasonable and service great . Norman Burnaby
After a business meeting at the University City , we end up here for dinner ,6 pm ,the restaurant only have not more them 10 peoples , may be is week day ? parking lot is so empty , ,the restaurant is very elegant and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d10335360-Reviews-Burnaby_Mountain_Restaurant_and_Lounge-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Burnaby Palace Restaurant,"Some friends and I went here for dinner for the first time and had a fantastic meal. It was very fresh, tasty and we had enough food for the next day. The best dish hands down was the ginger beef. OMG it is so crispy...More
Best Chinese in Burnaby!!! They offer many vegetarian options and have an extensive menu.I have never had a bad experience here. They offer a 10% discount for pick up orders.
Decided to try a new Chinese restaurant with a variety of dishes and it was a great choice! The food was amazing....every single dish and we ordered 7 or 8 dishes. My dad definitely loved the BBQ Pork.
Burnaby Palace has been around for quite awhile from what I understand. I've never been to them before to be honest, and I only discovered them due to COVID-19 and been looking for new take out places. We got their salt and pepper squid, salt...More
If you're thinking of ordering from here, I would order through Door Dash instead of their own delivery service and pay the extra couple of bucks. When I ordered my food, it was about 4:40 on a Friday afternoon. The website said it would be...More
We came here on a Friday night for dinner. Make sure you arrive just before prime time. We ordered the salty deep fried squid. Luckily it wasn’t greasy. Also had the chicken lettuce wrap. The lettuce was borderline fresh as it was looking a bit...More
Standard Sino-Canadian with a selection of a la carte and dim sum. Service was decent and prices were modest for what you got.
Our group of 11 people (adults and 2 kids) had a wonderful meal here last week. The round table was perfect for sharing the dishes and all of the food we tasted was a treat. The restaurant was very warm when we arrived but once...More
We showed up about 30 minutes before closing on a Sunday evening and were warmly welcomed and seated. We of course ordered quickly and the food came out shortly after. We enjoyed the house special chicken (9/10), the beef ho fun (8/10, I prefer mine...More
A lovely restaurant with happy crew and good food. Must try. One tip: When you order, please check with the crew its method of preparation so that there are no surprises. Bon appetite
I never do this but I need to this time. The service was so awful it took 20 minutes just to get a can of Sprite and food took hours. The food wasent as good as I remember. You can definitely find better for less....More
The restaurant is located in a very busy Boundary road ,not too far from Canada way ,opposite side Wendy ,the restaurant been the same location well over 10 years or more , It is our family once a moths get together lunch ,one of my...More
Excellent restaurant and service! I would eat here every weekend if I could! I do not leave nearby that is the reason I cannot come here often! 110% recommended!! My family of 6 was very enthusiastic about coming here again! Thanks for your service and...More
...Chinese food in Burnaby! The place is always busy, and the the food comes fast, hot, and is very tasty. Great place for two ot twenty.
For decades now, we have order in food from the Burnaby Palace. It always has been good and the price seems more then fair. Early (or late) in the year, a few friends join us to celebrate getting through Christmas. We have been doing this...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d760257-Reviews-Burnaby_Palace_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Butchers Block BBQ,"Best meat-up place in town. Got the 6-8 person platter and it was definitely enough for 8 hungry adults. Everything was so good. Even the leftovers for the next day. Hard to find authentic smoked meat.
The Ribs were not cooked to the correct consistency. The pork was stiff and not falling off the bone tender as was expected. No sauce though I ordered extra, really disapointing.The slaw was not anything more than dry sliced cabbage with a miniscule amount of...More
Picked up some BBQ for a family meal, so ended up getting the Carnivore Platter, so I go to try everything. Here are my thoughts: - Ribs - OK. A bit dry for me. - Beef Brisket - Mixed thoughts. Very tender, but mad a...More
Stopped for a quick bite with the family and was so impressed. Portions were decent - just remember you get what you pay for and beef (brisket) and ribs are crazy expensive right now. Excellent ribs, brisket, slaw, cornbread and fresh fries!! Good selection of...More
A friendly and cozy place to have dinner with. Portion of the platter is really big that comes with lots of BBQ favors in a reasonable price, Highly recommended, But should be there earlier next time before the meats sold out!
I love BBQ more than any other kind of food so when I saw a local blog recommend this place, I had to try it. Tried the sausage appy, it was good but not as spicy as I thought it would be. The BBQ dipping...More
On a work trip and looking for a place to have dinner. Checked local and the reviews caught my attention. Decided on the daily special and was not disappointed. Staff were friendly and the food was great.
On entering there was a delicious smell of barbecue. We were not disappointed. Tender juicy meat and tasty side dishes. The service was great too. We also had a very interesting drink of warm lemon bourbon in lemonade. Will let definitely go back for more.
We decided to dine at Butchers Block BBQ after having a desire for a rib dinner and a search came up with Butchers Block. Since it was a Friday night and the ribs etc are prepared in the morning, we got there by 6PM since...More
We hosted a large group of 17 for dinner there and although they don’t take a reservation they were most accommodating about making it work for our group. We really enjoyed the food and relaxed atmosphere. The service was also very good...would highly recommend Butcher...More
Stopped by on the advice of the positive reviews on TA.... ordered 2 meat platter. Ribs were tender and crispy; a result of grilling with BBQ sauce after pressure cooking. No real smoke flavour. The brisket was slathered in super sweet commercial sauce and was...More
Tonight, I went here with a group of nine friends and all had dinner. The server added the 15% gratuity because of our party size but never said anything to anyone (sure, it might be on the menu but every other restaurant tells you again...More
Okay, so we spoke to our server, manager and reviewed your table's receipts and payments and also reviewed the video footage from our surveillance system from the till at the front. These were our findings: - Our server printed out the bill and had it...More
Great barbecue, at great value in the Vancouver Metro Area. We are from Texas, and we love our BBQ. Glad we found it just North of the border
I had the daily special, pulled pork, chicken, fries and a salad. Pulled pork and sauce, one of the best around. The chicken pretty good, had better, but not by that much. Salad good, fresh and nice dressing on the side. Fries, 7/10 Overall 9/10...More
This is a small restaurant which is family run where the owner Calvin is also the BBQ Master...they have set hours but close as soon as they SELL OUT so go early. Calvin smokes daily starting at 4 to 5 am and only smokes enough...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2392104-Reviews-Butchers_Block_BBQ-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
C Prime,"We were staying in the hotel where C-Prime is located and for our last night in Vancouver ordered two steak-frites room service. I had asked for the steelhead but they called me back saying they weren’t serving it anymore. No biggie. Because the restaurant seems...More
We check in at hotel connected to C Prime for medical reasons.We notice that C Prime had advertisement for Happy Hour 3-5 daily. So we went to C Prime after 4 for drink and Appetizers. Been told by Maître D that they were closed, and...More
The waiter asked if anyone wanted bread and one person out of 4 said yes. Subsequently a loaf of bread was delivered at $20 including tax and tip. At no point did he say anything about there being a cost. So the person had two...More
Chose here for our wedding anniversary and so pleased we did. Food was great, service was very good and the place has a nice feel about it. I had beef carpaccio which I really like and was probably the best I have ever had. My...More
We thoroughly loved our meals and dinner here. We ordered the calamari appetizer, which came hot, well-seasoned, and well-cooked. With each serving, the pasta was hot and flavorfully seasoned. We indulged in some gelato and a wonderful Americano to cap off the dinner. We were...More
I saw how their Bar Manager takes tips from the staff. People are working so hard and he is just sitting and watching how they work. Absolutely not acceptable and a bad experience. I do not understand how someone like this is allowed to work...More
Superb food and great service. Spent a wonderful relaxing time in the well appointed restaurant. The fish maincourse and Mille feuille desert are recommended
Ne’er sure about using another hotel’s restaurant when I am travelling, book this one to make sure we had somewhere to eat. Pleasantly surprise with the service and quality of food, recommend both for the food and service they just need to have more of...More
Great food with plenty of choices, nice wine list, elegant atmosphere, and attentive service. Prices are fair for what is offered.
I was staying at the attached hotel and ate at C Prime twice. Pasta the first time and that is definitely their strong suit. Gnocchi and sauce was as good as any I have ever had. Often overlooked but something I quite enjoyed, is that...More
We had a fantastic dinner. The Caesar salad was pretty good and the burrata squash was excellent. The fettuccine was also quite good. The Atlantic cod was actually made with halibut at no additional charge. It come with clams and gnocchi in a superb sauce-...More
We had an absolutely wonderful time here at C Prime. The pastas were amazing, and so delicious and the pork belly and steak were so good too. Definitely worth checking out, and we will definitely be back again soon. Our server Gilles was so kind...More
While staying at the Century Plaza as part of a BC “staycation,” I decided to patronize their in-house restaurant, C|Prime, on my last night at the hotel. With its upscale atmosphere, attractive looking menu and many positive accolades, I thought I’d be in for an...More
Again top notch experience. Had the tomahawk steak between 3 of us and it was outstanding. We shared a tuna starter, split a crab ravioli all insanely decadent and polished it off with a delicious take on tiramisu. The sides were outstanding and the service...More
Thank you for dining with us at CPrime and appreciating what we do. We sincerely appreciate your support and look forward to being at your service soon!
I will go back to C Prime, so that is indicative of the overall experience. Had a great server who knew how to open decant and properly pour from a bottle of wine. A cheerful demeanor and super attentive throughout she was a gem, even...More
Thank you for dining with us at CPrime! We sincerely appreciate your detailed review and look forward to being at your service again soon!",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7893741-Reviews-C_Prime-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
C-Lovers Fish & Chips,"I ordered all you can eat fish and chips and obviously you can order more fish or more chips or both fish and chips if you wish, which I did order another plate of fish. The extra order of fish must be as fresh as...More
I ordered all you can eat fish and chips and obviously you can order more fish or more chips or both fish and chips if you wish, which I did order another plate of fish. The extra order of fish must be as fresh as...More
My gf and I went to have the fish n chips n went before,so we choose to go there again ,it was ok but somehow the halibut n chips didn’t agree with me n I was sick Great restaurant none the less
My gf and I went to have the fish n chips n went before,so we choose to go there again ,it was ok but somehow the halibut n chips didn’t agree with me n I was sick Great restaurant none the less
Friendly staff. Good size portions, but wish they had larger plate sizes as the plate is too small. We always have the haddock and it is delicious. Fries and slaw are great. C-Lovers, regardless of location is consistently good. The one on Pemberton is equally...More
Friendly staff. Good size portions, but wish they had larger plate sizes as the plate is too small. We always have the haddock and it is delicious. Fries and slaw are great. C-Lovers, regardless of location is consistently good. The one on Pemberton is equally...More
Trolls was our first choice, but for the second time on our trip we settled for second choice ... C-Lovers could accommodate us on their patio so we could be close to our bikes as we waited out rush hour and ferry traffic. COVID protocols...More
Trolls was our first choice, but for the second time on our trip we settled for second choice ... C-Lovers could accommodate us on their patio so we could be close to our bikes as we waited out rush hour and ferry traffic. COVID protocols...More
Since Troll’s was closed for sit-in dining at 7:00 pm we went to C-Lovers in the next block. After a long wait we were seated. There was only one waitress in the whole joint !! She took orders, collected the cash, etc and was overburdened!...More
Since Troll’s was closed for sit-in dining at 7:00 pm we went to C-Lovers in the next block. After a long wait we were seated. There was only one waitress in the whole joint !! She took orders, collected the cash, etc and was overburdened!...More
Stopped for a quick bite. I commercial fish halibut for a living and am very fussy about fish. I have to say the halibut and chips was excellent and our server was incredibly efficient and delightful
Stopped for a quick bite. I commercial fish halibut for a living and am very fussy about fish. I have to say the halibut and chips was excellent and our server was incredibly efficient and delightful
I had a terrible experience at this c lovers. I stood at the from door for 15 minutes waiting for a seat while there were 5 dirty tables and everyone would just walk by. Then I asked if they were going to clean the tables...More
I had a terrible experience at this c lovers. I stood at the from door for 15 minutes waiting for a seat while there were 5 dirty tables and everyone would just walk by. Then I asked if they were going to clean the tables...More
Went here for dinner. Service great, food very good. Had light battered haddock, mushy peas, chips, and an order of prawns. Yum.
Went here for dinner. Service great, food very good. Had light battered haddock, mushy peas, chips, and an order of prawns. Yum.
The fish at C-Lovers is much better than at Troll's (across the road) but otherwise this place is mixed. Staff are quirky and grumpy, the menu is limited and the beer selection is very poor. But I keep going there because the cod and haddock...More
The fish at C-Lovers is much better than at Troll's (across the road) but otherwise this place is mixed. Staff are quirky and grumpy, the menu is limited and the beer selection is very poor. But I keep going there because the cod and haddock...More
A busy place lots of customers. The fish and chips came quickly fish portions a bit small but you could order more as part of their all you can eat program. Standard fare ok but there are other fish and chip restaurants that serve larger...More
A busy place lots of customers. The fish and chips came quickly fish portions a bit small but you could order more as part of their all you can eat program. Standard fare ok but there are other fish and chip restaurants that serve larger...More
Went in based on reviews and the fact they had a takeaway counter. Ordered a piece of cod with chips. The fish was lovely and white but not very big but really not impressed with the chips. Large portion but no way as good as...More
Went in based on reviews and the fact they had a takeaway counter. Ordered a piece of cod with chips. The fish was lovely and white but not very big but really not impressed with the chips. Large portion but no way as good as...More
Enjoy the North Shore's best deep fried cod, haddock, halibut or salmon while seated in arbrite-tabled booths. The fish batter is light and crispy, and not greasy. It's cooked to order, so it is always fresh. Of course, there are chips, coleslaw(excellent), deep fried shrimp,...More
Enjoy the North Shore's best deep fried cod, haddock, halibut or salmon while seated in arbrite-tabled booths. The fish batter is light and crispy, and not greasy. It's cooked to order, so it is always fresh. Of course, there are chips, coleslaw(excellent), deep fried shrimp,...More
Went here with severe jet lag, this wasn't an issue, the staff were excellent and the ""unlimited"" fish & chips with a free beer was excellent, I would recommend this place to anyone with a healthy appetite.
Went here with severe jet lag, this wasn't an issue, the staff were excellent and the ""unlimited"" fish & chips with a free beer was excellent, I would recommend this place to anyone with a healthy appetite.
The location is within easy walking distance to the ferry terminal and the bay. The service was quick and the waitress was very friendly. The fish and chips were exceptional and very reasonably priced!
The location is within easy walking distance to the ferry terminal and the bay. The service was quick and the waitress was very friendly. The fish and chips were exceptional and very reasonably priced!
Spend a week and a half in Vancouver and on Vancouver Island. Had Fish and chips several places. This restaurant at Horseshoe bay was the best.
Spend a week and a half in Vancouver and on Vancouver Island. Had Fish and chips several places. This restaurant at Horseshoe bay was the best.
We have visited this place, because of somebody’s recommendation. And, mistake again. We simply ordered fish and chips, one glass of beer and water. First of all, fish and chips are way far from good ones. Halibut and haddock tails, not the middle parts were...More
We have visited this place, because of somebody’s recommendation. And, mistake again. We simply ordered fish and chips, one glass of beer and water. First of all, fish and chips are way far from good ones. Halibut and haddock tails, not the middle parts were...More
We’re Brits and love fish and chips… this was fantastic! We got the family deal for take out and watched the cooks make the food freshly in front of us. Very large portions, enough for two meals and we have hungry teens! Fresh fish, thin...More
We’re Brits and love fish and chips… this was fantastic! We got the family deal for take out and watched the cooks make the food freshly in front of us. Very large portions, enough for two meals and we have hungry teens! Fresh fish, thin...More
We love this place. We end up here as an after thought whether it be driving by or going to SaveOn. The food is consistently good, and the pitcher of beer washes it down nicely. $40 for the pitcher, two large pieces of Cod and...More
We love this place. We end up here as an after thought whether it be driving by or going to SaveOn. The food is consistently good, and the pitcher of beer washes it down nicely. $40 for the pitcher, two large pieces of Cod and...More
Having a meeting in N. Vancouver ,its been a while since I am here , the office very close to C -Love , so I surprised the staff with Fish & Chips lunch , due to the new Covid 19 guideline , all their restaurants...More
Having a meeting in N. Vancouver ,its been a while since I am here , the office very close to C -Love , so I surprised the staff with Fish & Chips lunch , due to the new Covid 19 guideline , all their restaurants...More
C-lovers is overpriced and the staff is rude. The restaurant is left to be run by kids that have no idea about customer service. Don't know where Colin travelled to think the food is good compared to other places in the world. The food is...More
C-lovers is overpriced and the staff is rude. The restaurant is left to be run by kids that have no idea about customer service. Don't know where Colin travelled to think the food is good compared to other places in the world. The food is...More
Best fish and chips I have ever had 🙌🏻 I’ll be your new regular customer for sure boss. See you guys soon
Best fish and chips I have ever had 🙌🏻 I’ll be your new regular customer for sure boss. See you guys soon
Very good fish and chips and simple but great coleslaw. They have Haddock which is what my wife likes. They serve beer and wine also. The service was great and prices pretty good too.
Very good fish and chips and simple but great coleslaw. They have Haddock which is what my wife likes. They serve beer and wine also. The service was great and prices pretty good too.
Tucked away on the very short portion of Pemberton which is north of Marine Drive (in a small mall behind the Shell Station on the corner). Fish and chips as they used to make it...light crispy batter, delicious and fresh fish (as it was haddock...More
Tucked away on the very short portion of Pemberton which is north of Marine Drive (in a small mall behind the Shell Station on the corner). Fish and chips as they used to make it...light crispy batter, delicious and fresh fish (as it was haddock...More
I took a visiting friend here for dinner when we both got a fish n chip craving. Fresh fish, light crispy batter, hot fresh chips, malt vinegar.... mmmmmm The best fish and chips around, parking spaces right out front of the restaurant. $18 all you...More
I took a visiting friend here for dinner when we both got a fish n chip craving. Fresh fish, light crispy batter, hot fresh chips, malt vinegar.... mmmmmm The best fish and chips around, parking spaces right out front of the restaurant. $18 all you...More
I ordered the Haddock and chips. The fish is cooked in a light crispy batter, very tasty. The service is quick and there is also the take out option. Great place for families.
I ordered the Haddock and chips. The fish is cooked in a light crispy batter, very tasty. The service is quick and there is also the take out option. Great place for families.
Sunday night family tradition, love the haddock burger, my family always get the two piece cod and of course The Mushy Peas delicious
Sunday night family tradition, love the haddock burger, my family always get the two piece cod and of course The Mushy Peas delicious
Ordered the one piece haddock and chips. So tasty! With not too much batter, it tasted great! Very British-style, in fact. I will definitely go back the next time we are in Vancouver!
Ordered the one piece haddock and chips. So tasty! With not too much batter, it tasted great! Very British-style, in fact. I will definitely go back the next time we are in Vancouver!
This place has both seated and take away and the seated area has a choice of indoor and outdoor. The prices are great with an all you can eat option seated and choices of number of pieces of fish for take away. If you get...More
This place has both seated and take away and the seated area has a choice of indoor and outdoor. The prices are great with an all you can eat option seated and choices of number of pieces of fish for take away. If you get...More
Found this location on a list of restaurants at the Best Western Hotel. Very nice staff and service. The fish and chips were excellent. The fish did not have a heavy batter on it and the fries were fresh cut.
Found this location on a list of restaurants at the Best Western Hotel. Very nice staff and service. The fish and chips were excellent. The fish did not have a heavy batter on it and the fries were fresh cut.
The go to place for AYCE Fish & Chips with bottomless pop. Service is friendly... you don't have to have fish & chips refill, you can just choose fish for your refill. Great value & the fish is good. They used pollock, meat is firm....More
The go to place for AYCE Fish & Chips with bottomless pop. Service is friendly... you don't have to have fish & chips refill, you can just choose fish for your refill. Great value & the fish is good. They used pollock, meat is firm....More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d2241403-Reviews-C_Lovers_Fish_Chips-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
CAVU Kitchen Bar,"Food and service was very good. Parking was a bit expensive in complex with several hotels adjoined but enjoyed our meeting and lunch
I font usually review places but this time i had too, the pictures are half way through...The restaurant is weirdly set up in the hotel, It's actually in the lobby. While your having dinner with friends people walk through with luggage to go to the...More
The restaurant was quiet, so we were able to get a choice table for 2 and enjoy a nice conversation The service was excellent. Considering we only ordered a salad, it was the best salad that I've ever had (Dynamite Salad). Would definitely go back...More
Very bad experience. I have booked with website and at our arrive the lady tell us that there weren't table free. She ask us to wait 15 min. The food is very poor and the there was only a waitress for all customer. Oter waitress...More
We were a group of 5 having dinner here. Everyone enjoyed their food very much! We all had something different! One person commented it was the best burger she ever had! Service was friendly as well!
This bar has great food and service. Sit by the big windows and people watch. The were a lot of dogs walking their owners too. The bartender was friendly, efficient and personable.
I came here for Easter brunch with my teenage son. They offered Brunch boards for Easter with bottomless mimosas. We were both so pleased with the whole experience. The hostess, Kylie, greeted us right away and was very friendly and took us to a great...More
This is a hotel bar. Service was professional. Menu is limited (unless you want a burger). Food was generally good except for the Fish and Chips.......fried fish that resulted in the batter still being flour! Big emphasis on the happy hour for cheaper drinks.
Richmond is out of the way, and not especially known for its restaurants, people here come over to Vancouver for an evening out, but the CAVU Kitchen Bar at the Hilton in Richmond was a welcome find in our particular pinch - arriving at 5:00...More
We enjoyed the buy one, get one burger soecial. Excellent beef patty with imaginative toppings. Very nice selection of happy hour local beers on tap. Great service in a clean and comfortable space
I had a great time recently in Vancouver/Richmond at Cavu. Jerry in specific was always very accommodating, greeting with a smile every morning and making me feel comfortable. The breakfast buffet was delicious. One day for lunch I was in a hurry and they rushed...More
Cavu is the best hotel restaurant among the various local ones I've visited. The food quality is excellent with a wide array of delicious and unique burgers and other knife and fork options. I choose their award winning mac and cheese burger ($20), with buns...More
Joined some freinds fro dinner at Cavu and was very impressed with the service. For the most part the food was very good but what really made the evening was our server Galia who was very attentive, helpful and a lot of fun.
My friend and I were looking for a nice place to eat in Richmond before our evening plans and we’re so delighted to have picked Cavu. Both our hostess and our server Ash were so pleasant and really made our experience. Ash helped us pick...More
Underwhelming breakfast. Adults liked it but kids hardly ate any even though they were hungry. Potatoes were greasy. Quality was just not very good for an $18 breakfast. I had the hash which was pretty good.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7008900-Reviews-CAVU_Kitchen_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
CRAFT Beer Market- English Bay,"Great friendly restaurant Made it for Happy Hour after walking perimeter of Stanley Park My husband had the Cabo Fish Tacos & I had the Carnitas on corn tortillas We enjoyed a relaxing drink with our meals as we gazed over the beachfront view..gorgeous day..sunshine...More
Excellent food and drink, as well as professional and swift service from Eddie. Definitely would recommend if in the area.
I went a few times while over in Vancouver last month. The Craft Beer Market supplies very good food and drink while providing very good service. However, I have to say its weekend brunches are superb, the best I have come across in Vancouver in...More
From having a couple of beers to ordering food this super friendly space has a great vibe. Staff were really friendly and knowledgeable about the craft beer. Whether indoors or on the patio, you will have a great time.
It has a spectacular view of English Bay Beach, better from upstairs Great selection of beers The Korean Fried Chicken is spectacular Ig they have the Bourbon blood orange beer… go for it
The drinks were good. The food was amazing. Get the burger and you won’t be disappointed. They have a large selection of beer/wine and it’s in a beautiful location on a sunny day.
Staying just around here & found CRAFT. It was so good, we visited 3 times (which was every day for our short visit)! The most amazing crew we have encountered anywhere on our world travels! Thanks Stephanie, Jess & Leah 😊 Great selection of beers,...More
Great options on the menu - and in beer - service was great, food even better ... Had the chicken sandwich which was super delicious with some of the best yam fries ever. Server gave great advice regarding the beer - overall really enjoyable and...More
Thanks so much for the love and support, can't wait to have you back! Cheers The CRAFT Team
Craft’s beer and mixed drink selection are impressive, and the food menu is good as well. The staff are outstanding- friendly, and make sure you’re getting exactly what you want. Oh yeah- great location on English Bay near entrance to scenic Stanley Park. If you’re...More
Shucks Chuck, you're making us blush! Can't wait to have you back again! Cheers, The CRAFT Team
I am a local, and I just LOVE this place! Yes, it might be a bit more expensive than other local places, but the service is next to none, and they have a great Happy Hour if you want to save a couple of bucks....More
Appreciate the review, Catnip1966. We look forward to making your next visit just as awesome. Cheers, The CRAFT Team
Great views , Super food and the server was excellent . On a very hot day in English bay we waited only 10 minutes to be seated coming straight off the street . We ordered 4 starters to share between the four of us as...More
Thank you for the shout out, abw5639! Cheers, The CRAFT Team
We were biking in Stanley Park and our ride was cut short as it started raining. We returned our rental bikes and headed here, as we had gone past it earlier and thought it looked like a nice spot with a decent view. We were...More
After visiting the sister establishment in False Creek, we thought we’d give this place a try + it sure didn’t disappoint! Super friendly staff. Great $5 lunch deal on a Tues of a burger ($2 extra for veggie burger). A generous portion of traditional Canadian...More
Thanks so much for the love and support Karen! Cheers The CRAFT Team
So went to this location while on vacay from Niagara Falls Canada. Staff was amazing, friendly and knowledgeable. food and drinks were so good. atmosphere was energetic and casual. View's.... best in that area by far. Loved everything about my time here. Prices comparable to...More
Thanks for the shout out MamaLcarrier! We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cheers, The CRAFT Team
Best time here! Our server Keri was fantastic and made our experience exceptional. Will be back for sure. Management was amazing and drinks were great as well.
EricahK, we appreciate you! Thank you so much for the kind review and support, can't wait to have you back again. Cheers, The CRAFT Team",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23499575-Reviews-CRAFT_Beer_Market_English_Bay-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
CRAFT Beer Market- False Creek,"Worth a visit for the internal design, the amazing beer list, and the view of the keg cellar. Food we had was tasty and adequate serve size. Service was good.
Very fun night with the family. Service, beer selections, and atmosphere were excellent. We had the best server ever! Nika. She was extremely knowledgeable, patient with our indecisions, and very helpful in recommending suitable beers for us. It's a great and fun place made even...More
Sophie was such a great host! Really enjoyed the visit. Fantastic choice of beers from all around the world, and the burgers were great as well.
Nice reno but the food is horrible ! We ordered what I’m assuming was supposed to be a vegan poke bowl and pad Thai …. The vegan bowl was just a huge mound of cheap white rice , a few spirals of beets, and for...More
Went here for a business lunch. I’ve never been to Craft before, so I wasn’t sure what to expect. First off, it’s already a neat space being housed in a building from the 1930s. We were seated once everyone arrived. I ordered the Sticky Chicken...More
I tried the new Craft Beer market in Victoria. The building was very nice . I ordered a Fat Tug and received a 14 ounce little glass of beer for $8 described as .4 litre glass to hide the meager amount of beer poured ....More
Hey Scottishale, sorry to hear that you were let down by your experience at CRAFT. Since we can't reach out to you directly, please contact us at arnold.martillana@craftbeermarket.ca so we can make things right. Cheers, The CRAFT Team
The food was fine, but very expensive. I found the service inattentive and sloppy. We had the tacos (very small), the hamburger (tasty, but there were no single burger options and they charged the full price when I asked them to change a double to...More
Thanks for the helpful feedback, we take your insight seriously and will use it to improve for the future! Cheers The CRAFT Team
I don't even know where to begin. We had fish tacos. The fish was immaculately breaded and cooked. The ingredients where all fresh The seasoning The sauce everything was in harmony. Margaritas beautiful. Fries crisp and savory. If you are in Vancouver you must visit.
198ilinkaz, we appreciate you! Thank you so much for the kind review and support, can't wait to have you back again. Cheers, The CRAFT Team
Attended with a large group. Two servers; one was generally okay, the other was very, very slow. Food offering is 'new wave'; odd mix of sides and ingredients. The meals were prepared well but very average. Trying to leave was a huge issue: over 20...More
Craft Beer Market False Creek has really good food and talented chefs. The happy hour menu includes many food choices and my favourite the Brewmaster Chicken sandwich which is a grilled chicken fillet and avocado, cheese, bacon, tasty sauce on bun or lettuce wrapped with...More
Thanks for providing your feedback Diane, we will be sure to pass it on to our team so we can improve. We look forward to exceeding your expectations on your next visit. Cheers, The CRAFT Team
Fabulous place to eat and people watch. So many food choices from so many cultures. Excellent local and service was very efficient.
Appreciate the review, Jim. We look forward to making your next visit just as awesome. Cheers, The CRAFT Team
Had a really nice meal during the summer fireworks. Was really busy but the booking system worked well (we queues and they texted once a table was ready). Service was good even though really busy. Food and beer great especially the tuna rice salad.
Called in for a drink + stayed for several! A super fab venue - decked out really well + a really great vibe. Staff are super friendly - our waiter Andy was awesome! Huge variety of beers + allowed us to sample a few we...More
Four of us booked in for lunch. We chose to sit at the end where there is a sort of conservatory with plenty of natural light. What a menu! The first challenge is deciding what you want to drink – the taster selection is a...More
Shucks Colinf296, you're making us blush! Can't wait to have you back again! Cheers, The CRAFT Team
We went to the Olympic Village location for the 1st time to check it out as we have been to the False Creek location and enjoyed our experience very much. The restaurant is located in a beautiful building, and my Cali Bowl with kale, grilled...More
Hi Voyage40510554132, We are so glad you enjoyed the food and atmosphere! We are sorry a portion of your visit let you down. Since we can't reach out to you directly please contact our GM kelly.kim@craftbeermarket.ca so she can invite you back! Cheers, The CRAFT...More",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5541755-Reviews-CRAFT_Beer_Market_False_Creek-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cactus Club Cafe,"Beautifully designed property with inside and outside seating. Food was fabulous for a late night dinner. Service was excellent. We split an entree which made it really affordable. Located on Burrard street, just across the street from the Hyatt and the subway entrance. On several...More
Booked in here as near our hotel on coal harbour. Food and drinks were pretty good - we had avo dip to share as starter, then two cheese burgers, one crab cakes and one med bowl with falafel - all were tasty. There was the...More
I have had the Teriyaki Rice Bowl in other cities. I had it here but was disappointed. The portion was smaller, there was much less sauce and the broccoli was only warm and not cooked.
Always lively spot with great drinks and variety of food for everyone. Bonus for the late night HH and great views. Food: 4 Service: 4 Atmosphere: 5 Cost to worth it rating: 3 (HH is great prices though) Opentableable: no, but online through their site...More
Great location and busy location next to the harbor. The bellman at our hotel suggested the Cactus Club. Great experience starting at the front door as the hostess was so pleasant and ready to help a party of six with no reservation at an extremely...More
Good food, good location and great service from Isaac. Great place for a family get together. Thanks for the great service Isaac.
Food was good. One of the better kind of burgers. Steak also very well. Fancy non alcoholic cocktails. All in all an excellent experience. Joe our waiter was a blessing!
We called at this restaurant on chance of getting a table. The staff were very accommodating one got us a patio table with a brilliant view. The food was excellent as well as the service. Only one thing spoilt the evening at least for the...More
The views from this place are ridiculous and the window looking out over Stanley Park is huge. Staff were lovely, drinks were tasty, space was clean and well managed. Would absolutely go again.More
Dear K2364IRpaulj, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience at Cactus Club Cafe Coal Harbour. We're thrilled to hear you enjoyed our location, tasty drinks, and the cleanliness of our space. It's always wonderful to know that our team's efforts to provide...More
First of all the food and the views were amazing and our server was kind and attentive too. The service that we received from the woman who brought us to our table was horrendous. This pale and slim Caucasian girl who wore her hair up...More
Hi Gellyroll, We're disappointed that this was your experience with us! Please know we're addressing your feedback with the team and that a member of our team will be in touch with you shortly. Thank you!
Great menu, really tasty food, helpful staff. Went on a Monday and didn't book, but walk in seated us in 15 mins. Chocolate peanut bar is to die for, butternut squash and prawn pasta fantastic. Go there is in the area.More
Hi David, We're glad to hear that you had a great experience with us. Our team will be delighted to hear that you found our menu delightful, our food tasty, and our staff helpful. We appreciate your recommendation and look forward to welcoming you back...More
Went to this restaurant upon the recommendation from my hotel. Had a glass of wine and the Rigatoni Bolognese before leaving for my trip back to the US. The atmosphere was very young and lively. Service was excellent and the Rigatoni was very good. They...More
Hi, We are thrilled to hear that you joined us based on your hotel's recommendation! Thank you for sharing your experience! We're thrilled that you found our atmosphere lively, our service excellent, and enjoyed our Rigatoni Bolognese. We appreciate your kind words and hope to...More
Fabulous meal here, we all had great meals, our servers and I am so sorry I cannot remember your names were so much fun. We did not feel rushed despite the restaurant being very busy and got some great recommendations. Keep doing what you are...More
Hi Candice, We're thrilled to hear that you had a fabulous time with us at Cactus Club Cafe Coal Harbour! Our team takes pride in ensuring that our guests have an unforgettable experience, from our exceptional service to our culinary delights. We will certainly pass...More
Good food and great service. Located in the heart of Coal Harbour, the staff are quite friendly and the food was fresh and tasty.More
Hi aproposltd, We're so glad to hear that you enjoyed your visit to our Coal Harbour location. Thank you for your positive feedback about our food and staff. It's always rewarding to hear that our efforts to provide fresh, tasty food and friendly service are...More
We reserved a patio table during happy hour. We showed up and followed the sign for ""reservations"" which headed inside. We were then told that as we have a reservation for the patio that we would have to join the line outside.....which was for standby....More
Hi vicxtar, Thank you for your detailed feedback about your visit to our Coal Harbour location. We're glad to hear that the service and food were satisfactory. However, we apologize for any confusion or inconvenience caused with the patio reservation and the expectations regarding the...More
This was a great find offering excellent food. The menu offered a good variety of food which was presented well and very tasty. There was a nice atmosphere from the staff, music and sport tv if you run out of something to say. Wish we...More
With huge heartfelt appreciation, and a sincere thank you, we want to give a shout out to Cactus Club Cafe on Robson. Vanessa and Jeremy went above and beyond with their kindness towards us tonight. The world is better with people like them. Thank you...More
HI Graham, Thank you for sharing your amazing review with us! We're so happy to hear that our staff made you feel so comfortable during your visit. We look forward to your next visit. Cheers, Cactus
Thé steak and frites was fabulous Would highly recommend this restaurant if you are in Vancouver service was excellent !
Hello Frances, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed our Steak Frites. We hope you will join us again soon and give us the opportunity to earn your 5 stars then! Cheers, Cactus
We had to find a place to duck out of the rain ending up at the Cactus on Robson. Menu is great for sushi or small eats. It was about noon so got 2 plates of sushi and a couple of Moscow mules. The sushi...More
Hi, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed our Sushi! We look forward to your next visit and hope to earn your 5 stars then. Cheers, Cactus
Turned away twice. My wonderful, out of town friend enjoys one of the restaurant's dishes- so we decided the Cactus Club on Robson would be a great place to catch up, and enjoy food together. We got turned away once, for one of us not...More
Hello, Thank you for making us aware of your recent visits. We will be sure to share your comments with our team. Please know that in accordance with B.C.’s provincial government guidelines, we require a physical piece of government issued photo ID to be presented...More
Went there with my partner for dinner and it was awesome. Had lettuce wraps and sushi to start and then steak frites and Salmon. Food was great, service was great and very comfortable / enjoyable evening.
Thank you for sharing your 5 star experience with us! We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed our Szechuan Chicken Lettuce Wraps and Steak Frites. We look forward to your next dining experience with us! Cheers, Cactus
Stopped in for a light bite and a glass of wine. Delicious tuna roll. My waiter, Alan, was a super server. Very polite and helpful!
Hello Sharid, Thank you so much for the solid five star review. We are happy to hear that your service and food were up to your standards and we look forward to having you back again soon. Best, Danielle-Guest Relations
Tonight my partner and myself went to our fav Cactus Club on Robson in Vancouver. For a Friday night the wait was only about 12 min and they were very accomodating by getting us a booth. our server tonight was Tris. She was fantastic ,...More
Hi Don, thank you so much for taking the time to leave a review! We are beyond happy you had such a great experience at our location, and Tristene and the team are going to be thrilled to read about it! We hope to see...More
My wife and I dined here on our first night in Vancouver and were so impressed we returned again before we left, the staff were very pleasant, attentive and were always on hand to top up drinks. The food was absolutely delicious are was served...More
Hi Gasmith62, thank you for the 5-star review! We love reading about our guests' experiences and we're happy you had a good time with us! We hope to see you again next time you're visiting Vancouver!
Very busy tourist season and day so thought lunch might be slow but quite the contrary, great service and food wonderful.
Hi randogopher, thank you for your feedback! We're glad you enjoyed your lunch and we hope to see you again soon!
Ate here recently on a short holiday in Vancouver. Very good evening in a lovely restaurant. The service and atmosphere were lovely and more, importantly, so was the food. The spicy chicken starter was excellent and the main courses that we had (Thai curry and...More
Hi ThemaceSomerset, thank you so much for taking the time to give us a review! We're glad you enjoyed your meals, the Butternut Squash Ravioli with Prawns is indeed to die for and is also Chef Rob Feenie's signature dish! We hope to see you...More
On a really quick visit to Vancouver recently, my couhe sin and I dropped in at this restaurant on Robson Street for some snacks and a drink. We were seated at one of the high tables which was in a comfortable corner near the entrance....More
Hi ianwyj, thank you for taking the time to leave us such a detailed review - we love reading about our guests' experiences! We hope to see you again soon for lunch or dinner! We also have Happy Hour every day from 3 pm -...More
First time in Vancouver, chose this location as it was close to our hotel and had a varied menu. Service was very good as well.
Hi Joractravels, thank you for the 5 stars! We're happy you enjoyed your lunch with us and we hope to see you again next time you're nearby!
Had a great meal as expected at Cactus Club. Our server Allan was fantastic and very personable. Good food and great service.
Hi X3711OBkimw, thank you for the 5-star review! We're glad you enjoyed your meal and Allan's service! Hope to see you again soon!
This looked like an interesting restaurant to try as we had walked passed it a few times and decided to make a booking for Wednesday night. When we arrived we were escorted to our table by a waitress but unfortunately did not get her name...More
Hi 17vladislavm, thank you for the detailed review! We're glad you felt welcomed and taken care of during your visit and that you enjoyed your meals! We would love to see you again next time you visit Vancouver!!
From sushi, to burgers to a beef carpaccio, every single plate was excellent. Wish I had been able to go more than once. Everything is made authentically and delicious. Excellent service too.
Hi Sara, thanks for leaving a 5-star review! We're thrilled to hear that our food was such a hit - the Wagyu Beef Carpaccio is our favourite too! We hope you can come back and try some more of our menu soon. Cheers, Cactus
Loved the food & service. Sat outside with the heaters on. Nice atmosphere. Perfect location. Four of us ate & drank for the equivalent of £30 each. Well worth it. Recommended.
Hi Davey, thanks for writing such a great review! We're happy to hear you loved our food and service and that you enjoyed our patio. We hope to see you again soon! Cheers, Cactus
Great spot if you're looking to grab some really good food and drinks at a delightful spot and are okay with moderate prices! The service from walking in to leaving was great with a large amount of waiters/waitresses willing and wanting to help and recommend...More
Hello Spades, Thanks for taking the time to leave us a review! It's so great to hear that you had a great experience with us and that our service did not disappoint! We're happy you enjoyed our tacos as they are one of our favorite...More
Megan was exceptional! Friendly, knowledgeable, kind, attentive! The food was simply amazing! High quality in every way! Did not expect this from a chain restaurant, absolutely delicious! For us, this Cactus Club Cafe location deserves an award! THANK YOU, Megan, THANK YOU CC chefs!!!! Continue...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us a wonderful review! We are so happy to hear how much you enjoy our menu and service. We look forward to seeing you again soon!
Our meals were perfectly prepared and very tasty. Everything was exactly as ordered. Our server Izzy was amazing. She kept drinks refreshed and was attentive and very helpful. Highest recommendation. Great foot and service
Hi Brooksje, Thank you for leaving us a review! We love to hear that Izzy's attentive service during your visit made for a 5-star experience. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cheers, Cactus
We decided on a dinner before the Canuck game. since we parked near the restaurant we said let go to Cactus club. There was a line up like usual . they said it would be a 30-40 minute wait for a table for 2. about...More
Hi Albert, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We're sorry to hear that part of your visit was not up to our service standards. We will be sure to share your feedback with our team. We hope you’ll give us...More
Stopped in here for an afternoon beer and was pretty impressed. Despite it being busy, we were served fairly quickly with our beers and chips. The menu looked good and we were able to get the snack we wanted and enjoyed our time there. Prices...More
Hi there! So happy to hear you enjoyed your time with us. We hope to see you again soon for your next afternoon beer! Cheers, Cactus
Went twice for lunch, sat at the bar, ordered a beer and the fabulous tuna stack. Nice vibe and service just fine. What's not to like? (And if you go, try the tuna stack - or did I mention that already?)More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us a wonderful review, Jeff. We are so happy to hear how much you enjoy our menu, service and atmosphere. The fresh and flavourful Tuna Stack is one of a kind at Cactus Club. We look forward...More
Women wore too much makeup, revealing uniforms, and seemed very unintelligent. Service was similar to a burger joint where you order and they deliver and nothing between. Food was of average quality, would not return and would not recommend.
We visited twice in a week. The first visit was planned following a ten hour flight from the UK. Service was excellent as was the food and despite being tired we all thoroughly enjoyed our meal. The second visit was 4 days later when we...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us a 5 Star Review, Odyssey! We're happy you enjoyed your experience and we will make sure to share this with our team. We look forward to seeing you again next time you're in Vancouver! Cheers, Cactus.
The light and airy restaurant with modern decor was buzzing when we arrived early evening. We decided to take advantage of their half price wine offer on a Wednesday. The offer only applied to British Columbia wines but each one we selected was sold out....More
Thank you for leaving us a review. We will make sure this feedback is passed along to our management team. We are glad to hear you enjoyed some of our signature dishes and the ambiance of our restaurant. We hope you’ll give us an opportunity...More
We were a bit disappointed when told we had to wait 20 minutes for a table whilst there were plenty tables free however we are so happy we waited as we had a great lunch! Nice table, friendly staff and great food! We had the...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are glad to hear it was worth the wait and that you enjoyed the service and food! We look forward to seeing you again soon. Cheers, Cactus
We had dinner here two nights; they have excellent outdoor seating and very friendly and helpful servers. Our best meal was the poke bowl—it was extremely good with a perfect mixture and ratio of flavors and ingredients. The Feeney burger, fries and fish tacos were...More
Hello, Thank you for sharing your experience with us! We're glad to learn that you always have a great and enjoyable experience with us. We hope that you will continue to join us as a loyal guest! Cheers, Cactus
We chanced upon this restaurant when visiting downtown Vancouver. The restaurant offered both inside and outside dining and we were seated immediately. They offer a good drink and food menu. Everything we tried was delicious, be it the sushi or the Mediterranean bowl or the...More
Hello, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We're so happy to hear that you had a 5 star experience with us. We hope you'll join us again soon! Cheers, Cactus
The Cactus Club has been something of a Vancouver institution since 1988. Known for their upbeat atmosphere and casual yet sophisticated vibe, this chain has grown to just over 30 locations as of this writing. In that time, I’ve had the pleasure of patronizing a...More
Was last there a year ago and went back today and so nice to see that quality of food and service is still so good. We were there for a late lunch which meant choosing from The Happy Hour menu. Chad our server was extremely...More
Hi there, Thank you so much for your wonderful review! We're thrilled to hear that you loved our food and received exceptional service from Chad. We appreciate your kind words and hope to welcome you back again soon. With gratitude, The Cactus Ash Team
We went during Dine Out. We thought after sitting down that the menu was lacking a bit as we delved into the ingredients of the menu items. My Mediterranean Bowl was lacking in protein with a fish option at an additional $8.75. The Zen roll...More
Hi Joel, Thank you for leaving us a review! We appreciate this feedback and will make sure it is shared with our team. We hope you will give us an opportunity to earn a five star review in the future. Warmly, The Cactus Ash Team
We were seated quickly at a booth. Food was tasty, on time, service was good. My only minor critique is to not make the kids wait for the meal while one person has an appetizer.
Hello Bexx, Thank you for taking the time to share how your experience was with us. We are very excited that you had a great time with us and will definitely ensure to pass on your feedback to our team. Warmly, The Cactus Ash team
Our party of 4 went for late lunch, we are seniors who are extremely concerned about covid so requested seating on their heated patio, behind building away from Broadway. They sat us in an area that few people were in, very few on patio at...More
Hello Karen, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a wonderful review. We are so happy to hear how much you enjoyed our menu, service and atmosphere. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Warmly, The Cactus Ash Team
The food was good, decent wine selection. As a table of 5 we were seated at the back of the restaurant, under the stairs almost. It was dark and felt a little odd to have seating there.
Hi there, Thank you for the review! We will pass along your feedback to our team. Cheers, Cactus
Love eating at Cactus club. Menu is so varied, service always amazing and food is great. We didn’t book but they accept walkies and put us on list and texted us around the time they said it would be.
Thanks for the great review! Cheers, Cactus
We were impressed with the set up at this Cactus Club with a separate take out window off the patio. The food was hot, packed perfectly, and was substantial portions of food. I had the Spicy Tuna Ahi Roll, Tuna Poke Bowl and my wife...More
You can’t go wrong with Cactus Club Cafe. A well designed menu, tasty meals, and super friendly staff. The salmon is always amazing here. This branch in particular is very beautiful in interior design. So, totally worths giving it a try.
Thank you so very much your your kind words! We can't wait to serve you again!
My husband and I recently ate at this restaurant and thoroughly enjoyed the experience. All Covid protocols were followed and staff are friendly, upbeat and efficient. We had such a great meal the first night, we went back our second night. I had the prawn...More
Hi Pat, Thank you for leaving us a wonderful review! We are so happy to hear that you enjoyed your experience with us. We have to agree that the Pumpkin Cheesecake is a must-try. We look forward to your next visit when you're in the...More
Friday night early dinner at this popular restaurant. Food was fresh, good and fairly priced. Visiting from Ontario during the pandemic we were shocked by the lack of social distancing and masks. Good meal, good place but not safe by Ontario standards.
Came for happy hour on a Saturday, it was nice with not a long wait. We got a booth and they don't really social distance with the booths - as in, they seat people in every booth without any gaps, but I think that's fine...More
Nice big spacious restaurant, well run and staff are efficient. We had Brooklin as our Server and she helped me choose my meal, I had the butternut squash ravioli with prawns, others had Dijon salmon, a fabulous choice, really divine. Enjoyed our visit to this...More
Hi there! It looks like you visited our West Broadway and Granville Location! We thank your review just the same. Next time come down to West Broadway and Ash and check out a few different items! - Katie B, AGM
Went for a dinner and was very surprised. Food was so delicious. Had grilled salmon and my friend ordered mushroom steak. Friendly and attentive staff, very cozy atmosphere. Would highly recommend
We are so glad you enjoyed your experience Erika! Be sure to come back on a Tuesday for 1/2 Priced Bottles of Wine! - Katie B,AGM
Wine is half price on Tuesdays. Good location. Nice vibe. Would recommend truffle fries and wings. The new mai tai was enjoyable as well.
this is head office if ur order is not what u want or any other complaint -- good luck to u owner should hire professional not ex waitress for customer issues mostly decoration is what u get
Hi Jim, your review doesn't sound quite up to our standards. Please feel free to e-mail us at guestexpereinces@cactusclubcafe.com so we can better address your concerns! Thank you!
huge shout out to Rebecca M and Lauren at the Cactus Club! Impeccable service, a lot of fun and they spoiled us rotten! Also to the hostess staff (can't remember their names) but were so amazing getting us the perfect table on the patio! We...More
Went for dinner with my wife on our first night in Vancouver. Only 5 minutes walk from our hotel. You can book ahead or wait as a walk in as we did. Waited about 15 minutes. Sat on the lover flor overlooking the beach and...More
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a review! It's so great to hear that you had a 5 star experience with us and that it did not disappoint! We hope to see you again soon. Cheers, Cactus
Amazing spot right on the beach. We had to wait a short while in a que but there was plenty to watch while we waited. Great table near the beach with excellent views. Our waiter was really friendly with a good sense of humor. The...More
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a review! It's so great to hear that you had a great experience with us and that it did not disappoint! We hope you'll choose us again in the future. Cheers, Cactus
Location was excellent, with a great view of English Bay. Food was great and we really enjoyed their Bellini. However, service was very disappointing. One of us is lactose intolerant and we specifically let our server know and he requested to remove a few ingredients...More
We're disappointed that this was your experience with us and we'd like to learn more. Please feel welcome to email us at englishbayguestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team will be in touch with you. Thank you, Cactus
Overall services and food are good. This is not my first time go there. I like the environment to have a dinner with my family and friends.
Came here for dinner on the random recommendation of someone we met in a shop in Vancouver. Great location by the beach to watch the sunset and the local youths from our dinner table. Had 3 courses in the end as the food was absolutely...More
Thanks for leaving us a review! It's so great to hear that you enjoyed our dishes, and the sangria, as it is one of our favorite drinks too! We hope that you'll choose us again in the future. Cheers, Cactus
A friend and I had an excellent lunch. As I am gluten free, I pointed that out to the waitress and she indicated the gluten free items on the menu. I ordered the chicken and when it arrived the server confirmed that it was gluten...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We're so happy to hear that you had a 5 star experience with us! We hope you'll join us again soon! Cheers, Cactus
We got Uber to English bay for dinner, don’t turn up without booking, you will be disappointed. Staff good, chicken sandwich and teriyaki chicken rice bowl with wine and beer, all very good
Hi Windy, Thanks for sharing your experience with us! We're glad to learn that you had an enjoyable visit at our English Bay location. The view is truly beautiful! We hope you'll chose us again in the future! Cheers, Cactus English Bay team
You can book ahead or turn up and wait as a walk in - but it's worth it Food was outstanding, service excellent and view worth any amount of time queuing for a table
Hi Susan, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are so happy to hear how much you enjoyed our food, view and service. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cactus English Bay team
Excellent service, lovely food, great views We had booked earlier in the day, and even having done so, there was a line waiting of people with reservations as well as another for walk ins. A popular place! Good table with a view out over English...More
Hi Munros, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a wonderful review. We are so happy to hear how much you enjoyed our food, views and service. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cactus English Bay team
The positive was the food served was excellent. However, when you book a table for 5 you don’t expect to be squeezed on to a table for 4 that isn’t set ready for you ! We were placed around the corner so views were very...More
Hi Karlm, Thank you for sharing your experience with us. Your feedback is important and please know that this has been passed along to our team to consider when recreating table charts. We are sorry to hear that service fell below our standards and want...More
Went for an anniversary dinner and have had really nice dinners there before, so we had high expectations. However, this dinner the service was by far the worst I've ever had at a restaurant. Our waiter didn't come to our table for at least twenty...More
Hi Sydney, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are sorry to hear that service fell below our standards and want to assure you that the necessary follow-up has been conducted with the team members involved. We want to ensure...More
Arrived 15 mins early for our res. Mayhem at front door as several patrons wanted to get out of the cold but there was no room. We were seated in dining room at the window. Ordered 2 burgers and a veggie bowl, 2 glasses of...More
Hi Wanderer, Thank you for leaving us a review. Your feedback is important to us and we would appreciate the opportunity to speak to you further about your experience. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team will be...More
We had dinner our last night in Vancouver. We sat on the top floor overlooking the bay, only after we asked to be moved to that table. (Why do staff put people at tables that are rubbish when they have four empty good tables?) Waiting...More
Hi MGJRJ, Thank you for sharing your experience with us! It's so great to hear that our staff helped make it a 5 star visit. We definitely agree that making a reservation online is the best way to minimize any waiting. We hope you'll join...More
Does Rob Fennie think his crispy chicken sandwich is worth $22? Thin slab of dry flavourless chicken on stale bun, a hint of mayo, lettuce, and tomato. Head up Davie and try the competition; better product and way cheaper. Just look for the yellow arches....More
I nearly choked to death on some grisel in my peppercorn steak, nice waitress told the mgr. When I paid the bill, I asked if she had told the mgr - who had apparently stopped by, not identified herself - No apology, not even a...More
Waitress was wonderful - even moved us to a quieter table, to avoid alcoholic volume and a child screeching. I had a peppercorn steak - half way thru I came across some grisel and I nearly choked to death. The piece of meat when chewed...More
We went during happy hour and the food was delicious. We sat in the lounge. The staff and atmosphere was excellent. Our server was Janet. She gave us great service as well as wonderful food and drink recommendations. We will definitely be going back!
My friend told me here and tried the foods. We bought six gift cards during holiday and spent over thousand dollars since October. As a traveler I like to try all of the foods from different restaurants during the time stay. My friend and I...More
Hi There, Thank you for leaving us a review. We take feedback of this nature very seriously and we would appreciate the opportunity to learn more regarding your experience with us. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team...More
had dinner here with my husband and it was great food, great service and just great atmosphere. Located right in the mall which makes for convenient parking and shopping if needed.
Hi Julia, Thanks for sharing your experience with us! We're glad to learn that you had an enjoyable experience with us. We hope that you will continue to join us as a loyal guest! Cheers, Cactus
When we arrived, we were informed that we would have the table (which we had reserved in advance) until 2:45 PM. That was fine - and it's happened before at the Richmond Cactus Club. We enjoyed our meal. Around 2:15 PM the server began hovering...More
Love Cactus club, the salad and the handhelds! Perfect cocktails. Always a great visit to this restaurant.
Hi there, Thank you for your review! We're so thrilled to hear that you always have great visits to our restaurant. We hope you will continue to join us as a loyal guest! Cheers, Cactus
It had been nearly 4 years since I’d patronized a Cactus Club, so it was nice to visit the unit in Richmond Centre (opened November 2017). My partner and I attended for lunch, following an excursion at nearby Minoru Park. I was excited to come...More
I regularly went to Cactus Club at Richmond Center, to pick up DoorDash orders, The professionalism and friendly service at the front desk , was 5 stars out of 5. Especially the service I received from one of the front desk team “ Leona Lam”....More
Hi michellE1893KS, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We're so thrilled to hear that Leona helped make your experiences with us worth 5 stars. We'll be sure to pass along the kudos. Until next time! Cheers, Cactus
Even though we didn’t have reservations for lunch, which is probably a good idea, they made room for us at the bar. When asked about our plans for the rest of the day our waitress didn’t know the actor Matt Damon whose film we intended...More
Hello Robbie, Thank you for your five star review and for taking the time to share your experience! We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed your time with us, and hope that you will join us again soon. Cheers, Cactus
I had visited Cactus Club Restaurants in BC previously, but had not visited this Cactus Club previously. The service was very good, the food was also very good. The surrounding were good. After attempting three tries to log on to this restaurant, I was about...More
It is been a long day meeting , finally we got the deal done ,, we are in Richmond office , my partner and I looking close by to grab a bite and re-wind , one of the office girl told us there is two...More
Consistently provide outstanding service, food quality, ambience that never fails. Love this place (all locations but Richmond closest to home) and go every chance I get. These guys have cornered the market on this type of dining. 10/10!
Hi Grover2016, Thank you for your positive review. We look forward to seeing you again!
I bought 10 holiday promotional cards in the new year from the business at the beginning of 2020. I used 9 of them and left one unused due to the Covid 19 virus. Since the card is only eligible for dine in orders ,we didn't...More
The staff is very stuck up and the food isn’t as good as other locations. I don’t recommend going hereMore
Hello Dahlia, Thank you so much for taking the time to write in and share some insight into your most recent visit. We apologize for your experience with our team. We have shared this feedback and will focus on these opportunities; our intention is always...More
We had a fantastic experience at the Cactus Club. Highly recommend the Hot Chicken + Pickles. Joe was our waiter in and he was a delight. There was nice outside seating and tasty drinks.
Thank you for the 5 star review! We're glad you enjoyed one of our new menu items. We hope to see you again soon! All the best, Shelby
Food was excellent and server was fantastic. We will return to a Cactus Club for sure if we have the opportunity
good atmosphere. Service is good. food excellent. we were in the area about a month ago, and was going to come eat here, but was turned away as the restaurant was packed. I felt upset at the time, but going back the other night certainly...More
We were visiting North Vancouver and stopped in this place one evening, and it was fantastic! From doing their best to accommodate my craving for a strawberry daiquiri by making a sweetened strawberry margarita to fantastic service, we enjoyed the food and the experience so...More
You forgot to mention one thing MenderB – amazing guests! Thank you for leaving this wonderful review. Family dinners are so important and we’re happy you chose Cactus. See you again soon! Cheers, Caroline - Manager.
We went there after waiting at the airport for our friends. We got there around 8.30. We are all retired Hotel and restaurant people. I told them how good the Cactus club was as we went many times in Calgary and Kelowna. Always friendly service...More
I ordered the Grilled Dijon Salmon and it did not disappoint. One of the best seafood dishes I've had in a long time. A great place to go for ""good"" food!More
Hi IslandLife21, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We're so thrilled to hear you our Grilled Dijon Salmon was one of the best seafood dishes you've had in a while. We'll be sure to share your comments with our team...More
The choices, quality of food and price for Dine-out Vancouver was excellent. I had the caesar salad, the Butternut Squash Ravioli and an Apple Tart. All for $38. My partner had the chili chicken appetizer, the Blackened Chicken main course and a piece of cheesecake!
Hi Colleen, Thank you for taking the time to write us a review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience with us as well as our Dine Out Vancouver menu. We hope you will join us again soon! Cheers, Cactus
This is a fabulous place for grabbing great food from an excellent menu. We drove up to the front door, stayed in our car - a server came out by the sign that indicates where Take Out people should line up. It was 3 pm...More
Since the pandemic began, we have been ordering take out in lieu of our dinners out. So it is Take out Thursday at our house and we have been going to the Cactus Club Cafe in North Van for most of our Thursdays. For most...More
Hi yvr2010-06, Thank you for leaving us a great review! We appreciate your continued support and we're so glad to hear that Joe has helped make your pick up experiences worth 5 stars. We will be sure to share this with our team. We look...More
Enjoyed a tasty lunch on the patio, staff were friendly & ensured we had a good dining experience. Restaurant was well organized for COVID requirements (e.g. tracing / hand sanitizer/ plexi-glass dividers between tables. Menus can be accessed through your phone.
Hi Sashakeena, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed your dine-in experience with us. We hope you'll join us again soon! Cheers, Cactus
Super friendly, thoughtful and mindful of current food delivery precautions. Felt safe picking up food from Cactus. Joe was awesome!
This Cactus Club team should be proud of themselves. Even although we are facing a health crisis they are service driven even with a curb side pick up. Well done to James, management and staff. Your friendly hellos, take cares are seen and heard. Well...More
Hi thedistractedtourist, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We're so glad to hear that you had a 5 star pick up experience with us. We will share this with our team so that James can receive the appreciation deserved. We...More
Ordered quickly and easily online (drinks too!), with curbside in-car pickup. They even have Happy Hour options til 4:00. Burger was excellent, and they really do have some of the best fries. Chicken Teriyaki Rice Bowl is my eternal favourite. Only wish it wasn't all...More
Great food and job as usual. Joe or Joa delivering to vehicles, always great service from him at the table or vehicle. Never an inexpensive meal but very much worth it, especially at the the first and best CC there is. One advice under a...More
Hi RGraham-Cutts, Thank you for leaving us such a great review! We definitely appreciate your feedback and will ensure that it is passed along. We do hope you will choose Cactus again soon! Cheers, Cactus
Ordered take out during the Covid craziness. Seamless online ordering service, curb side pick up by Joe the OG of cactus. Seamless, easy, and delicious. Thanks for always taking care of us!!!!More
Hi Kristen, Thank you for the 5 stars! We appreciate your feedback for our online ordering system and we will be sure to share this with the team so that Joe can receive the kudos! We look forward to seeing you again in the future....More
I've always preferred Cactus Club over Earl's - better food, service, etc. but sadly Earl's has. now taken over Cactus and it shows. Cactus in Yaletown has always been a favourite with great food, service, ambience, etc. Not anymore. First thing sizes on wine has...More
Hi Maggi, Thank you for leaving us a review. We will make sure this feedback is passed along. We hope you’ll give us an opportunity to provide you with a 5 star experience in the future. Cheers, Cactus
Friendly staff and good service. Had a steak and the chicken burger which were both delicious and large portions. Lovely lunch!
Stopped here for late lunch. Seems to be a ‘trendy’ place for ‘beautiful’ people - shame the food doesn’t match!
Great atmosphere in this restaurant, service is nice and fast. Food is very good but a bit pricey. Veggie sushi to die for!
Garbage staff, rude, arrogant, acting like they are too good to be working there. Then go get a new job! But maybe you couldn’t.
I dated security guard Ryan ex so he fabricated a story to have us kicked out . Unprofessional. The manager wasn’t helpful
Hi Ryan, Thank you for sharing your feedback with us. We would like to learn more about your experience. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team will be in touch with you. Thank you.
Okay so my boyfriend and I placed an order from Cactus Club Yaletown on Christmas Eve. Since it was Christmas Eve, they were only doing takeout and deliveries until 4pm. So we had placed a pickup order to be ready for 3:55pm. I had order...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to share this great experience with us. We look forward to seeing you soon!
The food here is always good. It’s one of my go-to restaurants. Yesterday, there was a small error on my order and I called to let them know. The manager not only addresses the issue promptly but followed up afterwards to ensure everything was addressed....More
Hello Cygnet72, Thank you for the solid five star review. We pride ourselves in world class customer service and ensuring a great dining experience every time. Thank you for being a loyal guest of ours and we look forward to having you back again soon....More
Stopped off last night to order a take out. Everyone was very nice and we waited outside in their patio until the food was brought out. However, when I got home the food was awful......ordered 1 chicken quesidelia and yam fries and it was burnt...More
Firstly the Jalapeño cocktail is a definite recommendation, the balance in the cocktail is extremely well executed. The service the team offer is one of the best I have ever experienced from a bar as well. And of course the kitchen definitely know how to...More
WHY does the “music” have to be so LOUD? Had to yell the whole time we were there. My friends steak & prawns were excellent, my steak was “interesting”, well done on one end, not bad in the middle & dust on the other. Yes,...More
Went to the Cactus Club (Vancouver Yaletown location) recently for our usual faves: the prawn ravioli and the perfectly cooked steak. Just had to write a review, as the service was so stellar. Rachel treated us like VIP's, going out of her way to insure...More
I have a new favourite drink now - the Brazilian drink had bacardi white rum, fresh kiwi, lime, cane sugar, and soda. It was mixed perfectly and was so refreshing. We had the teriyaki chicken rice bowl, four mushroom steak, and lava cake. The four...More
I always go there but last time two days ago after I’ve been in Europe for three weeks! I want to for my Favourite tuna Tataki but they changed the menu! I am really disappointed about that location for that Matter.!!
Great place to eat with options for vegetarians and non-vegetarians. Decor and atmosphere was casual but classy and staff were welcoming.
Truly an outstanding meal experience.Although casual in decor and menu, the service kicks it up a notch. Servers were attentive and knowledgeable. The meal choices ranged from burgers to steaks. Cajun chicken was spiced modestly and very tasty. Asparagus was cooked Al dente which is...More
Visiting Vancouver for just a few days. This was just down the street from our Airbnb. Though it was busy, the staff were sweet and very accommodating. Food was SO good! Chocolate Peanut Butter Crunch Bar is a MUST try!!
We regularly meet at this restaurant several times a year with old friends. This time I decided to try something new on their entree menu, which were Crab & Shrimp/Prawn Cakes. I was disappointed to experience spicy heat when I ate the cakes, which overpowered...More
The food is delicious, I also enjoyed the atmosphere and the customer service, but They should be a few faster thank you.
There was a long wait but we didn’t mind but that should have been the first clue. Our orders were taken and food arrived at a decent time but no one checked on us after that, no drink refills or question of how the food...More
As usually excellent culinary and today and outstanding, friendly and very professional service offered by Austin. He was was very attentive and diligent with each and everyone of our orders. Service like that make us go back again. The menu has a great variety and...More
Hi TAB2014, We're so happy to hear you had a great experience with us. We will be sure to share this feedback with our team so that Austin can receive the kudos he deserves. We look forward to your next visit! Cheers, Cactus
Had a wonderful Birthday Brunch with my sister. The food quality is always excellent. Great location and great service. They change-up the menu to keep it interesting.
Hello Recovery_suite2, Thank you for leaving us a 5-star review! We're glad to hear that you joined us for a Birthday meal and thought that the food was excellent. We hope that you will think of us again soon. Cheers, Cactus
Friend from work was in the neighborhood so he called and wanted to go for lunch. I picked Cactus club because it is close to both of us. Service was good, food was also very good. I had the grilled Chicken sandwich.
Hello Albert, Thanks for the review! We're glad to hear that you chose us for lunch and enjoyed the food and service! We hope that we'll have an opportunity to provide you with a 5-star visit in the future. Cheers! Cactus
Tried something new today called Bandara salad (instead of Cajun chicken I had grilled chicken with it) - absolutely delicious! Definitely will order it again. Finished with another item I haven’t had before: chocolate lava cake w/ice cream. Man oh man…can you say delicious!
Hi there, Thank you for sharing your 5 star review with us! We are so happy to hear that you enjoyed our Bandara Salad. Cheers, Cactus
Always a great experience at this location. Great Covid protocol and felt comfortable dining here. Service and food are always top notch.
Thank you for this terrific review, Sammie! We look forward to seeing you again soon. Cheers, Cactus
We have been frequenting this restaurant for many years. But last Sunday, we were very disappointed in terms of service. The food was okay. But the service sucked big time. The waitress didn't have a clue as to when to serve our dessert. The coffee...More
Hi there, We're disappointed that this was your experience with us and we'd like to learn more. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team will be in touch with you. Thank you. - Cactus
As usually great service offered by Dewa Z. We had a blast at the patio and the culinary and Happy Hour are a plus . Tuesday and Wednesday half price any bottle of wine 👍🏻👍🏻👍🏻. Ready to go back !!!More
Hi TAB, Thank you for leaving us a 5 star review! It's so great to hear that you enjoyed the food + drinks, but also your time spent with Dewa. We will be sure to pass along your comments to the team and we look...More
I am a long time customer, dating way back to when paper mâché cows hung for sale from the ceiling. I am constantly impressed by the the Cactus Club's ability to change and adapt to the times and their customers, without loosing their vibe. There...More
Hi Mr. & Mrs. Myth, Wow, thank you for leaving us this incredible review! We love hearing about our guests' experiences with us so thank you for taking time out of your day to let us know. It's great to hear you enjoyed some of...More
I decided to order online and pick up due to covid. I ordered the tofu lettuce wraps and the jambalaya. When I got home, I was pretty shocked that I had paid over 40$ for the small portions of food. The lettuce wraps came with...More
Hello Suzie, Thank you for letting us know of your experience. While we're happy to hear that the hostess was very polite and friendly, we are sorry to hear that the food was not up to your expectations. Please feel welcome to email guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com so...More
We came here for the first time a couple weeks ago with friends. They are very good with Covid regulations with people waiting outside 6 ft apart to get into the restaurant. Make sure to make reservations to save some time, like we did. Once...More
The burger was burnt, and the waitress was in a rush to send us out. She did not even ask us if we want the bill, just put it on the table. They want you to eat as fast as you can and go out...More
Hello, Thank you for leaving us a review. We will make sure this feedback is passed along. We hope you’ll give us an opportunity to provide you with a 5 star experience in the future. Cheers, Cactus
I like cactus club but I wish they have better selection of the food. I am sick and tiered of the same menu for the past 10 years!More
Hi Roxijones, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are sorry to hear that these menu items fell below our standards. This feedback will be shared with our culinary team. We hope you will give us the opportunity to earn...More
Takeout orders are chaotic, unorganized and sloppy. Extremely disappointed with the quality of takeout food. On several occasions we have had missing orders. We addressed all these concerns with the restaurant manager each time and were assured measures will be put in place to assure...More
A reliable place for a good lunch. Our first visit since the first lockdown and we were pleasantly surprised that the standard was maintained. Good service and good sushi.
Hi Moniaits, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We are happy to hear you enjoyed your visit with us. We look forward to seeing you again soon and hopefully earn your 5 stars then! Cheers, Cactus
My Mom and I went to the Cactus Club for a late lunch, early dinner after see the Van Gogh exhibit Downtown. We were going to go to the Coal Harbor restaurant but, changed our mind due to the construction right out side that location....More
Hi Sunrainstorm, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us! While we’re so glad to hear that you received great service, we're disappointed to hear that some food items were not up to your expectations. We appreciate this feedback and will...More
Got the holiday special - one appetizer and two mains. Sushi was okay, nicely plated but taste was just alright. The burger was a bit too salty but good flavour. Spaghetti had 6 prawns in it, lacking in tomato sauce and tasted a bit greasy....More
Hi BillOnFridays, Thank you for leaving us a review and for the feedback. We're sorry to hear you were a little disappointed about the flavor. We will be sure to pass along your comments to our culinary team to review. We hope you give us...More
My last visit at cactus club cafe was the worst dinning experience ever. On October 30th, 2020 I went for dinner at cactus club West Vancouver location with my friends. We ordered a bottle of red wine to start and as the server was opening...More
My wife and I went for dinner last week and everything was absolutely perfect. I was so impressed with the ceviche that yesterday, I went back by myself and ordered just that with, of course, a Caesar which are always the best in town.
Hi Peter, Thank you for this great review! We're glad you enjoyed the Ceviche and that it is becoming one of your Cactus favourites. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cheers, Cactus
We have eaten here 5 times since the restaurant reopened for dining. We booked online and have have requested and always been seated on the patio which is very pleasant. The Staff, from the hostesses to the servers have been amazing! We have sampled several...More
Hi ViVi1819, Thank you so much for this great review! We appreciate your continued support. It's great to hear that you've had 5 star experiences with us. Also, Cactus Park Royal offers half price wine Tuesdays + Wednesdays! We hope you will be joining us...More
Visited on a Saturday night in July, 5 minutes wait time. Friendly staff, good food and a great vibe as always. Loved the appi chicken that comes with the lettuce. Burger was also ok.
Hi Arash, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed the Szechuan Chicken Lettuce Wraps during your visit. We hope to see you again soon! Cheers, Cactus
Today, my baby and I joined four friends, three of whom also had babies with them and one who was pregnant, for lunch at the Park Royal location. The Assistant General Manager, Jeremy and his staff went above and beyond. They took the strollers and...More
Hi Natasha, Thanks so much for your amazing review! It was a pleasure meeting you all yesterday and glad you had such a great time. Please don't hesitate to come back if another ""break"" is needed, we'd love to see you again. If it's easier...More
The Cactus club has done a fantastic job of keeping their food & service consistent across the provinces. We stopped for lunch and were treated to exceptional food, service and atmosphere. Highly recommend this restaurant.
We were going to a place but when we arrived it was closed out. I searched for close by restaurants and the Cactus Club was one of them. We had talked about going there some day. Well today was the day. The atmosphere was great,...More
The Cactus Club Cafe at Park Royal is one of the better ones in the restaurant chain. The food is always well prepared and services professional and quick. One thing I will never understand is why they took one of the best Caesar salads off...More
Hi Peter, Thanks so much for your 5 star review! We are always happy to hear that the team has done well and left our guests with a great experience. The caesar salad was great, have you had the chance to try the Kale salad?...More
I was hungry, filling in time before an appointment & thought I could get a quick lunch at Cactus Club..... I was seated immediately, got my latte almost as quickly but the fish tacos still hadn’t arrived 30 minutes later. I was pretty irritated (...More
Hi AlvaMai, Thank you for your feedback regarding your latest experience with us. We're sorry that the food took longer then it should but happy that Alex was able to help remedy the situation. We look forward to seeing you again soon, Cheers, Jeremy
I only have good things to says about this place. Fabulous staff. Amazing food..... Well most was exquisite apart from two things that left bitter taste in my mouth..... Literally. One was a chargrilled Hunters chicken which had an overwhelming bitter taste of coal!!! The...More
Hi Al, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are sorry to hear that these menu items fell below our standards. This feedback will be shared with our culinary team. We hope you will give us the opportunity to earn...More
First of all I would like to say its not the service ""its the quality the food"". My wife and I have been going to The Cactus Club off and on for years and in the beginning the food was good. But something happened. Each...More
I picked this place for a family reunion as it has a reputation for decent food and advertises a patio. THeir 'patio' is a misnomer. It is simply a light room with high ceilings surrounded by closed windows which apparently don't open. I do not...More
The service was middle road, and the info provided for the wine list was very poor. Wine lists should always be available and staff should be always available even during this time with disposable paper menu. This should be a no brainer when you charge...More
Hi there, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. This feedback will be shared with our management team. We hope you will give us the opportunity to earn a 5 star review in the future! Cheers, Cactus
Came here last night for a birthday and engagement celebration for 2 of my girlfrends. We made a reservation and were thankful we did because it was busy for a Tuesday. We were served by Rhoda and her server in training. The service was great...More
Hi lexis672, We're disappointed that this was your experience with us and we'd like to learn more. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team will be in touch with you. Thank you.
We came here for the first time with friends. We had been to other locations so wanted to try out this one. The restaurant is huge with plenty of seating spaced out between tables. The service was very good. I am gluten sensitive along with...More
Hi Julie, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us! It's so great to hear that you enjoyed the service and our Gluten Friendly menu items. We are glad that your husband enjoyed the Ceviche and Tuna Stack. We will be...More
Good foods with good price Service are definitely excellent Everyone definitely helpful and courteous The best place I have ever went!!!!!!!! Keep up the good work
Wow !! after almost two hours shopping with my niece in the area ,before she going back to the Island on the week end ,( Shopping at Michaels ,Winners etc ) so we went in to the market crossing Cactus Cafe for dinner ,this location...More
Hi Tony, Thank you for taking the time for sharing your experience with us! It is so great to hear that you and your niece enjoyed the food and service during your visit. We will be sure to pass along your compliments to the team...More
This Cactus Club has a nice, big patio attached to their lounge and dining room. I ordered a Cajun Chicken Sandwich With Salad. While the Cajun spiced Chicken Breast was flavourful, it was almost paper thin. What made it worse, was that the cook didn’t...More
Hi NoshTraveller, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. While we're happy that you had great service during your visit, we are sorry to hear that your meal was not up to our quality standards. Please email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com so...More
Visited Cactus Club for lunch on a Wednesday at noon. A little challenging to find a parking spot but glad we did because we had a very good lunch here. I had the chicken quesadillas with a sangria and thoroughly enjoyed it. My friend ordered...More
Hi there, Cindy. Thank you very much for taking the time to fill out a review. We are so happy to hear that you enjoyed your experience here with us... our Signature Sangrias definitely make lunch breaks more fun! We cannot wait to see you...More
My husband and I had a leisurely Saturday lunch at the Cactus Club, one of our favourite restaurants. We were at the Market Crossing one. Service was wonderful, our food came promptly and was delicious! I highly recommend the Chimichurri Guacamole as a starter and...More
Wow! Thank you so much for the amazing 5 Bubble Review. We are so happy to hear that you enjoyed your experience here. The best part about our Chimichurri Guacamole is that it's also offered on our Happy Hour menu. We can't wait to see...More
My girlfriend and I were searching around for a good happy hour last Monday night after a long day at the office. Nearly giving up, we found cactus to have a Monday night happy hour (turns out they have one every night of the week,...More
WOW! Thank you so much for taking the time to fill out such an amazing review for us and your server, Mitch! I am so happy to hear that we were able to turn your night around. At Cactus Club Cafe, we truly to strive...More
I generally like cactus club and enjoy their food enough to over look the fact that they serve 14 oz beer. However, last visit my companion ordered a bottle of beer(355ml) and cactus club provided the same size glass that they served my 14 oz...More
Good Afternoon, Thank you for taking the time to write us an online review. Our guests' feedback is very important to us. I am very happy to hear that you enjoyed the food and service at our location as Cactus Club Cafe holds ourselves to...More
Cactus has a great menu with many options. We were particularly impressed with the bartender, Ryan! Merci!! The only drawback on this visit was that we’d made reservations, but everyone else was seated before us and we were not seated until 15 minutes after our...More
Wow! ""De rien"" for the 5 Bubble Review. I am so happy that you got to meet Ryan. He is truly an asset to our team and we are all happy to welcome you back on your next visit. See you soon. - Adrienne J....More
It actually might be above average, as far as quality of food and service but not by a significant margin. What knocked it back to 3 stars for me was the price for what you get. We'll likely return to one of the many locations...More
Good Evening, Thank you so much for taking the time to write us a review. Thank you for your feedback regarding our pricing, I will ensure that this information reaches the right people. We would love to invite you back to check out our Happy...More
VERY very disappointing, went there last night for an occasion Food came out freezing cold , the side dish came out after the main was finished because the wrong thing was brought with the actual meal and they still charged even tho It was there...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us. We apologize that our service fell short of our usual standards. We will be sure to pass along this feedback to our culinary and service team. We look forward to the...More
On May 4th, 2022, there was a piece of glass on my child's meal; a tofu salad bowl!! I immediately called the restaurant and talked to the shift manager, Ash, and sent her pictures of it. They acknowledged and claimed to be extremely sorry. I...More
Hi there, Thank you for leaving us a review. We take feedback of this nature very seriously and we would appreciate the opportunity to learn more regarding your experience with us. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and a member of our team...More
Food was really not great. My husband had a burger, I had the chicken terryaki bowl and it was covered in yoghurt - I couldn’t taste anything else. The server was nice, food was really not good. The atmosphere and lighting was also really off...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us. We will be sure to pass along this feedback to our culinary team. We look forward to the opportunity to improve in the future. Cheers, Cactus
It’s been my experience that all Cactus Clubs were pretty much the same…then my best friend and I stepped up to the bar on W. Broadway and Granville and my opinion is forever changed! The food was delicious (I had the grilled Dijon salmon, my...More
Hello Jeff, Thanks for taking the time to leave us a review! It's so great to hear that you had a great experience with us and that it did not disappoint! We hope to see you again soon. Cheers, Cactus
As Covid kept us from enjoying all the excellent restaurants that Vancouver has to offer , we have made the decision to support one of our favourites each Thursday, be it by way of take out or patio dining. The Cactus Club has a unique...More
Hi there, Thank you for sharing your review with us! We look forward to you dining with us again very soon. Cheers, Cactus
Love the raincoaat salad but the take out dish got smaller and the price higher, I get it everything is more expensive these days, its still a good salad, and the only thing I order for myself from thereMore
Hello Monetf2015, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We pride ourselves on the consistency of our food amongst all of our locations. Please be assured that we have shared your feedback with the appropriate people at our head office to...More
We typically frequent the Park Royal location under the supervision of Jeremy Boileau, who is just fantastic. The kitchen crew are outstanding and always willing to make our orders just right for us. Consistency is the main ingredient here and the fun and lively ambience...More
Aware of how restaurants have been impacted by the pandemic, my family and I have been ordering in from our favourite spots twice a week to support the restaurants we love so much. We've been dining at Cactus for years and have never had a...More
Having just completed oral surgery and unable to drive, I ordered a family dinner from Cactus Club through DoorDash. The only item that I was able to consume on the menu given the circumstances were the Mashed Potatoes. On meal arrival, the delivery person informed...More
Hello Dalecorp, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We're very sorry to hear about this and would like the opportunity to learn more about your experience. Please email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com and we will be in touch. Thank you.
On a busy New Year’s Day, we sat at the bar and had a great lunch. Highly recommended the Raincoast Greens, for a healthy yet hearty option. Our bartender, Kelsey, was very attentive and welcoming!
Went here for new hire team lunch and it was a great choice! Great menu full of excellent options, good prices, good speed, not noisy, and service was fast. Will definitely be back!
We make a point of visiting our favourite Cactus Club location every time we visit Vancouver. Two words to sum up this gem: consistent excellence. From the food to the drinks to the service and the atmosphere, everything is top notch. We feel warmly welcomed...More
You can count on these places to be popular with locals and visitors alike. Staff are friendly and professional. There's a nice and varied selection on the menu including some of Chef Rob Feeney's classics but be prepared to drop $70 for 2 for dinner...More
We visited the Cactus Club Cafe while in Vancouver for a Convention. Since we had never been to this establishment we were lucky to be blessed with a great server who was well versed with the menu, and after asking us what we were looking...More
Brought my family from Ontario for dinner. Emma F was our server and again her assistance in drink and dinner choices was impeccable. Love the food and the service. Keep up the great work. I’ll be back soon for my fave potato skins!!!
We would have rated Cactus Club Station Square Burnaby location Zero if that be an option, we paid around $135 for simple dine in for 2, and came home still hungry not satisfied, our order was.... 1 beer $8, served without bringing it on a...More
Hi, Lucas! We're sorry to hear about your experience. Please reach out to us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com so we can address your concerns and ensure a better visit next time. Cheers, Cactus.
Have enjoyed our last few stops here, and with another big group for a birthday, immediately thought of this place for its varied menu and central location. There were five of us from three generations, and all pronounced the food as great. Our waiter, however,...More
Hi there, Chris! Thank you for your feedback. We're delighted you found our dishes tasty and satisfying. Your compliments mean a lot to our team. Cheers, Cactus.
Celebrating my cousins birthday who was visiting from California. They brought him a desert @ no charge. We all had different meals, and all were good. I had the Ravioli & Prawn Trio. Was very good, but not much food for the price. Service was...More
Hi Berthab41, We're delighted to know you had a memorable birthday celebration with us. Thank you for choosing Cactus Club Station Square! We hope to see you again soon! Cheers, Brooklyn
The Cactus Club at Station Square has been our “go to” restaurant for Friday Night, Date Night, since it opened! Our server tonight was Eryn. From our first introduction she was so awesomely enthusiastic and welcoming! Our meals were spot on! Then the challenge! We...More
Hi Jder998, Thank you for writing in to Cactus following your experience with our Station Square location! We truly appreciate it when our guests take the time to write in – especially when they are positive comments like yours. Please be assured that I will...More
Good Choice of food. I had the Blackened Creole chicken which was very nice and well cooked. My wife had pasta which was good.
Hi there, U7119Qlandrewb! We're delighted you found our dishes tasty and satisfying. Your compliments mean a lot to our team. Cheers, Cactus
Went there for lunch with 2 other friends. The food and drinks were good. the vibe was good until we were looking for our waitress, her name was NADA. we were looking around for her for a while and once we saw her, we WAVED...More
Hi Scott, Thank you for taking the time to write in. I see you have also left this review on Yelp. As mentioned, we take this feedback very seriously and would love the opportunity to speak with you further regarding this matter. If you are...More
First time at Cactus Club. The decoration is beautiful, minimalist, full of wood. Went with family for lunch on a Wednesday (3 adults + 1 kid). Before getting inside, we saw a couple of empty tables, which led us to think we'd be sit right...More
Hello, Thank you so much for taking the time to write a review for Cactus Club Station Square and for visiting us for lunch last week. We are glad to hear you enjoyed your experience with us! Thank you also for your feedback regarding the...More
We came here specifically for their happy hour and they did not disappoint. There’s a good selection of items in different price categories starting at $25 , $21, $18, $16, $10, $7, & $5. I can’t forget to mention there’s a good assortment of happy...More
Thanks for the great review, 712melaniee! It's fantastic to know you loved our happy hour specials and prompt service. See you soon! Cheers, Cactus
Still catching up on birthday get-togethers deferred due to Covid. Good job screening us for ""passports"" at the door, seated well distanced from other occupied tables. Chicken fingers great, said my friends; I very much enjoyed the hamburger, which I figured was healthy, due to...More
Hello Chris, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed your experience with us, and look forward to hosting you again soon. Cheers, Cactus
Excellent service and the appetizers were great. We went for drinks and a snack. Social distancing was in place and there are shields between the tables.
Hello 20mickeys, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us! We're flattered to hear that you enjoyed your visit, and hope that you will join us again soon. Cheers, Cactus
My husband and I always enjoy going to Cactus Club locations for a night out with our friends. It is their favorite restaurant chain and they always treat us, so best of both worlds. It was our first time at this location and it did...More
Hi Julie, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us! It's so great to hear that you had a great experience on your first visit to our Station Square location. We're glad that you enjoyed the Thai Green Curry with Prawns...More
Cactus Club is one of the casual relax dining restaurants chain restaurants throughout Canada ,about 31 locations ! Happy to have Fathers Dinner with my son and his girlfriend ,at the Station location , it is my flavour place to Chile Out ! restaurant very...More
Hi Tony, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us and for choosing us to celebrate your Father's Day dinner. We're so glad to hear that you enjoyed our menu selection. We will be sure to share your feedback with the...More
Celebrating a belated birthday for a friend, she picked this place. We were not disappointed. Still VERY serious about Covid: difficult to get past the front desk, distancing, separators, etc. The three of us all had different dishes, and all enjoyed their choices - salad,...More
Hi Chris, Thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us and for choosing us to celebrate your friend's belated birthday! We’re so glad to hear you enjoyed your dishes and also your time with Isabelle. We will be sure to share...More
It is a well-established network of restaurants, so you can always expect good service and solid food. I can't say that I was amazed by everything I've tried here over the years, but I can say that it is always good trendy food that forms...More
Hello Almatronic, Thank you for taking the time to write us a review. We are happy to hear that you enjoy the food and our Happy Hour menu! We appreciate your 5 star rating and we hope to see you again in the future. Cheers,...More
Decided to go for dinner and drinks for meeting asked hostess for a booth in the back a bit more privacy but totally unaccommodating and very complicated?..Food was just ok not very much option in Vancouver to eat after 9:00pm unless it’s Asian..Not going back...More
Hi Tony, Sorry to hear that your experience was not up to the Cactus standard we strive to achieve. Please email us at guestexperience@cactusclubcafe.com to discuss this further. Thank you",326,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d702682-Reviews-Cactus_Club_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cafe L'Orangerie,"We first laughed at the notion “modern Italian Japanese fusion”…but decided to give it a try. The Homemade croquettes were very tasty, as was the pork sauté with onion ponzu sauce. The fried prawns were large, and did not disappoint. Salmon and chips were a...More
This local restaurant in a neighbourhood strip plaza combines comfort food with an Asian Japanese twist. We ordered the Nanban chicken dinner and the chicken cutlet dinner. Each comes with white sticky rice and a small salad. The chicken cutlet is thin breast meat that...More
My wife and I were coming home from Pender Island week stay and googled some restaurants and found this hidden gem. I had the curry with the Chicken cutlet, rice and salad. Yummy, tasty and delicious. My wife had the Chicken Nanban and found it...More
What a hidden gem this café is! Japanese 🇯🇵 & Italian 🇮🇹 fusion at its best. We started with their octopus 🐙 karaage which was super flavourful and light. A tad bit chewy but delicious. We also had their carbonara spaghetti with hamburger steak and...More
Drove my friend to the Seaborn Fish shop to pick up some black cods and salmon , my friend want to take me to lunch , one of the staff from the shop told us to go try the Cafe de L'orangertie , iot ios...More
We had a creamy rice, cheese & shrimp dish, as well as a creamy tomato chicken spaghetti dish! THEY WERE AMAZING! The prices are great as well for the portions you get. Super quick to get our meals and the staff were constantly checking in...More
Was't quite sure what to expect with Japanese-Italian fusion. Both cuisines use noodles quite a lot so that is what we ordered...very tasty. The other dishes looked good as well (I may try the Japanese style curry next time). Restaurant is not large and filled...More
Found this place on Yelp and decided to have Japanese style Italian food for my daughter's birthday dinner. It was quite nice. If you like fusion, this is the place to try out.
High recommend! Excellent food great music wonderful service. The eggplant Doria is something we won’t forget; it was so so good. The menchi sandwich was actually equally amazing. We loved the ambiance and service too.
My husband and I went to Cafe L'Orangerie for lunch around noon on a week-day. There were two other couples there, and the place didn't get so busy until after 1:00 when we were about to leave. My husband ordered organic genmai-cha and hamburger steak,...More
Pasta with Japanese elements? Check. Plated entrées bursting with flavour? Check. A sizeable variety of desserts to choose from? Check. Café L’Orangerie elevates the definition of comfort food and transforms it into something novel and surprising.
This isn’t the run of the mill Japanese menu we usually get. This more of a true modern Tokyo bistro menu. Found in Japan but not here. Worth the visit!!! Paul
Some traditional Japanese food such as spicy tuna sashimi, edamame, chicken karaage available. Pastas are tasty and delicious - slight twist from the traditional. Add $4 and you get a hamburger on top.
I like the setting of the restaurant, give you a sense of family run/ casual run restaurant. They always have bunch of house-made cake in the glass cabinet for you to choose from. Their spaghetti is also delicious, and also great value.
The place was packed for weekday lunch, 80% were Japanese. The menu had traditional Japanese food, but also Japanese styled spaghetti and poutine, rice with sauce and mozarella, thick batter fried (not tempura) vegetables and a full expresso bar. We had gomae tuna (sashimi with...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4756601-Reviews-Cafe_L_Orangerie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cafe Medina,"A very popular cafe for breakfast and brunch. It has a vibrant atmosphere and quick and attentive service. We visited the cafe for a late brunch, and we were not disappointed. The cafe was full when we arrived, but we did not have to wait...More
I can't say enough about this spot, it was amazing! 4 sisters on a birthday trip went for brunch and the service was excellent and the food and drinks too! We stayed way longer than we needed to but our waiter was so friendly and...More
Pros - food and service were both very good. 1980s music in the background. Cons - quite noisy & tables felt rather crammed together down the window side (there were only a few inches between us and the tables either side). Larger tables in the...More
After a early cycling around the sea walk , we stopped in Medina for brunch luckily the restaurant just open 10 mins ago , there is already few people having breakfast and coffee , very spacious , high ceiling , I been here few times...More
Fantastic breakfast/brunch, with middle eastern flavours. The coffee and mocha are terrific. Always bust with a great buzz.
Sat morning brunch was excellent. There was quite a wait to get in, but it was worth it. Outstanding service and very yummy food.
Food was superb . The servers were friendly and efficient . We love Medina and will return. The restaurant was clean as well as the bathroom .
Waited about 20 minutes for a table for two- worth the wait! Coffees were delicious, we had the lavender infused mocha. The service was great, friendly and very efficient. Food was very tasty. For dessert we had two waffles with yoghurt, berry compote and salted...More
Love the ambiance. Great quality coffees. Great menu! Lots of options all with eggs - lots of flavour, really city place, but apparently Very busy often - just missed the rush.
Decided to have lunch here after looking at the amazing reviews online. Here is a list of pros and cons that sum up our experience: Pros: Restaurant has a lovely relaxed vibe and the decor is beautiful Staff were particularly attentive and friendly Menu is...More
Stopped in for breakfast hour wait. Came back at 2:00 for late lunch got right in. The host was a five star gentleman! My husband is in a wheelchair chair. He was most helpful and polite. The waiter was right on top of everything. But...More
Since it's been a minute!! What's not to love about this beloved brunch spot. After many tries! I made it! Meaning I actually made it in, got a seat and got to eat!! Before that, lined up, put my name down! And never made it!!...More
Cafe Medina has a well deserved reputation as being Vancouver's premiere restaurant for breakfast and brunch. Expect to wait for a table if you don't have a reservation. Our wait, on a cool Friday morning, was 20 minutes. Our meals were served hot and were...More
Bring your appetite because the food here is amazing. I also cannot rate the staff high enough either. So attentive, knowledgeable and the we never waited long for our food. We booked online for a fee but it was refunded after our visit otherwise you...More
Went for brunch on Sunday with reservation, thank goodness, as it was very busy and had people waiting outside. Had the Fricasee with short rib, waffles, Medina bacon and eggs. Everything was excellent. Definitely recommend.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1159855-Reviews-Cafe_Medina-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cafe Portrait,"Their Spiral croissant is so delicious. We tried Turkish coffee along with it. It’s so bitterly but really taste good. Try it for a change.
I was staying at the Sylvia Hotel nearby and was looking for a little gem in the neighbourhood to have breakfast at. I stumbled across Cafe Portrait, and it was everything I had hoped for. I had one of the best lattes that I have...More
We were visiting Vancouver for the Christmas period and this place was recommended by our hotel concierge. We have nothing but great things to say about Cafe Portrait, staff were nothing but warm and hospitable, and the food and coffees were excellent. We struggled during...More
Great location close to English Bay - lots of options for breakfast and great coffee. Had the poached eggs and smoked salmon option which was delicious and a really generous serving.
Located in Denman Street not from English Bay, this is a fun and quirky cafe for any art lover to have breakfast! All the dishes are themed on modernist artists. My husband had the Modigliani Benedict (eggs in that style with smoked salmon, salad and...More
OK so the café itself is SO cute, great vibe to it. The food I found overpriced, especially since the potato served is simple french fries.. Also, the service was sporadic - half the table received their meals, while the other half waited an additional...More
Loved this cafe so much! I spent my mornings here having breakfast before walking to the beach and heading to Stanley Park. Great music, great food, great art!
Visiting Vancouver with family and decided to eat at Cafe Portrait. The person who greeted us upon entry was great and accommodated our request for indoor dining. The other staff at this place was great as well.Ordered Shakshuka, latte, Turkish cafe, cruffin and the pistachio...More
I’ve been here twice for brunch and both times was super excited about what I ordered. All the ingredients are super fresh the service is friendly and kind and the atmosphere is warm and cozy. Definitely my #1 brunch spot in my neighborhood.
I live in the area and always try new places near my home, so I had to try Cafe Portraits food when they added food items. I only recommend the coffee here when it’s not busy because they limit you to one hour at the...More
The atmosphere, the paintings, the staff & the food. Loved everything about it. we went there every day of our stay.
Great food, staff and a Europeanesque vibe. Jazz playlist to compliment the intimate seating. Coffee and croissants were wonderful. Highly recommended!
Beautiful outside tables and great coffee. Good desserts. Nice staff.Very friendly. Great food.Sat on the terrace and enjoyed the view.
The food is delicious and the menu has something for everyone. Great rich coffee and espresso, homemade chocolate chip cookies, and fresh dishes. The little shortbread cookie was reminiscent of Europe and added the perfect touch. The restaurant is clean and we felt safe ordering...More
The coffee here is really good! Definitely recommend checking this place out. The Turkish Coffee is delicious, I can't wait to come back again!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23098972-Reviews-Cafe_Portrait-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cafe Zen,"It’s a fine place to meet up with friends and enjoy a hearty hot breakfast. Food is simple and clean. Coffee is hot and endless. Clean and always friendly. Staff helpful and pleasant.
While walking around Kitsilano, we stopped at Café Zen for a quick lunch. We had the baked veggie bagel melt and the strawberry/banana crepe. The crepe was fine but the bagel was not very tasty. Nice terrace on a quiet street, reasonable prices.
During my visit I decided to meet Harry at Cafe Zen. We have not seen each other in over 25 years. I had the French Toasts and he chose Eggs Benedict. No disappointment there. Service was friendly and professional. She recognized Harry from a past...More
Never disappoints! Old fashioned eggs, toast, waffles, pancakes, juice and coffee. Does not pretend to be anything but a place with a good breakfast. Favoured by locals and visitors alike.
Went to zen cafe after walk along kitsilano beach. Great place to warm up with hot coffee and friendly service.
My wife & I found Cafe Zen by chance on a sunny Sunday morning. We both had eggs benny for brunch. Very impressed with the quality of the food & service. Cafe decor and decoration very colorful and bright. Will definitely visit Cafe Zen again...More
This place USED to be among the very best breakfast joints in the city . But the last few times I've come either the food or forgetful service ruined a simple meal . Yesterday we had a brunch for two . Service was pleasantly fast...More
I remember this place opening over 3 decades ago when living in Vancouver but never visited. This time my host took me there and it was very enjoyable. My eggs were done just the way I like them. Most places can't get them right ie...More
Our friend who lives in Vancouver found this place for a Sunday morning breakfast. . We got there about 9:00, the place was sort of busy, but when we left there were at least 20 people waiting to get in. The exterior doesn’t give a...More
We live nearby and had a breakfast there a couple of times. Very cozy place with comfort food and very friendly staff.
My friend and I visited Cafe Zen on a Wednesday early afternoon (today). I arrived earlier and then my friend arrived. I knew I wasn't hungry because I'd had a late lunch but my friend was undecided when she arrived. She ended up also deciding...More
Nice place for breakfast. Have not been for many years but still good as we remembered. Do try it out one weekend
Eggs Bennie are served with very strange hollandaise sauce, watery and tasteless. Likely, the sauce is made of instant powder, mixed into a sauce. Eggs were not properly cooked, whites were watery yet the yolks were hard. Potatoes were out of a bag, ok if...More
A cozy atmosphere with servers knowing their repeat customers. Serving sizes are large and food variety is typical western. Nothing extraordinary, but very busy for a Sunday morning.
We walked along the water and then up the hill on Yew St to find this little cafe. If you are walking up the hill, look out for the hanging spider 🕷. My husband had a great omelette with home fries. I had oatmeal with...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d702731-Reviews-Cafe_Zen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cafe il nido,"We had a mixed experience at this restaurant. It was a pleasant atmosphere with an excellent live pianist playing. The caprese salad looked beautiful and the taste was fine, although a little bland. The linguini al Nero was good, although the sauce was a marinara...More
I had the carbonara, my wife had the lasagna. Both were perfect. Good size portions. The room is small but comfortable. Very good service. Not filled on a Wednesday night but they deserve to be.
We had a family dinner here for my husband's birthday. The service was impeccable and the food was amazing. The waiter must have overheard it was my husband's birthday and surprised him with a free dessert! Such a nice treat! Highly recommend the penne bolognese.
Called in without a booking, looking for an early dinner. Not a very extensive menu. We had two Peroni’s and the lasagne, followed by coffee. The Lasagne was served promptly but it was a bit dry and had a bit of a strange flavour. $91,...More
I love everything at Il Nido, the live music, the ambience, the service and the food. Served by an Italian speaking server when I visited that night. The manager was knowledgeable about wines and helped us picked a great bottle of red and champagne. Excellent...More
The pasta were taste, the wine list is very good and unpretentious. We enjoyed the music on the weekend.
We sat outside and the food looked good. The service was good and the food looked good. The issue is that, for the price, there wasn't a lot of flavor. I had the pork chop which was prepared well but the only flavor was with...More
Awesome meal, great service, thank you Christian! We found this little restaurant by chance. The food was superb. The wine Christian helped us select paired beautifully with the meal. My wife is a gourmet chef, and very difficult to impress, she loved the meal, the...More
One of those I want to like places but no A/C, warm wine (very reasonably prices) and generally bland food. Service was friendly and excellent. Room is a cozy hideaway. Sigh.
We had a problem with management of this restaurant. We had purchased a gift certificate at a charity auction, which the manager refused to honour (“we have changed ownership and do not have to accept your coupon”) . Although the waiter was quite apologetic and...More
Amazing food, and excellent service! The price of the food was very very good considering how delicious and well crafted each dish was.The food was very delicious here. I ordered the squid ink linguine with squid and prawns. The prawns were perfectly cooked and succulent,...More
Tucked hidden in a courtyard inside the NE corner of Thurlow and Robson in downtown Vancouver. In my quest to scope out patio restaurants I was initially attracted to live music one weekend evening as I walked past. We dined on a beautiful, quiet Monday...More
This was one of the few restaurant patios in Vancouver where we could get an on-the-day reservation on a hot late-summer Saturday - and it worked out perfectly! Am delighted to have been introduced to this gem. From Robson Street you can peek into the...More
Went last night for dinner with my husband and will definitely be going back. They have been here for 32 years and they definitely are worthy of customers thru covid days. We sat outside, the courtyard is really cute. The decor maybe doesn't quite ""wow""...More
This place looks a little dark and quiet from the outside but had a slightly dated interior in a charming kinda way! The food, wine and service were absolutely top notch. It is on the expensive side - but 100% worth it. One of the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d702770-Reviews-Cafe_il_nido-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Caffe Barney,"Fantastic menu, great ambiance, and an excellent back patio! Well done all across the board and absolutely fantastic service from Maxx. Perfect attention to detail, one of those workers who shows great pride in service and stellar hospitality. We will be back!
I had the worst experience ever of the bartender who was so rude and aggressive with me when i sat at the table greeting my friend who just had arrived . The guy literally was talking and sarcastic us so ruthless that we sat there...More
We stopped in here for Sunday. Brunch while shopping on South Granville. The restaurant was very well organized during COVID with lots of sanitizing happening between customers. The service was fine, but not overly friendly. The coffee was excellent and the food was very good....More
On a miserable grey rainy day, I came in here for a bowl of soup, something comforting.. The server expressed that Minestroni soup was soup offering and considered a meal when I asked about soup of the day. After a long wait, a large bowl...More
There's usually a lineup, particularly on Sundays... so don't mind the wait. The owner comes out to say hi and take your name, and checks back too. Really good coffee (from next door). Had eggs benny (3 of us did), all good... Hollandaise a little...More
Family group enjoyed the relaxed atmosphere and the good food. Only one complaint and that was the chicken with the waffles was so crispy it was dry.
Big shout out to the bartender Brian who looked after us during a hungover brunch on St. Pats day. Bri was the TSN turning point. Guy is an absolute beauty and we’ll 100% come back to this spot to get some M3 Therapy - Brian’s...More
The vibe in Caffe Barney is as it always was (I speak as a nearly 20 year veteran). But the current food menu left a lot to be desired. The other night a friend and I ordered 4 plates to share: chickpea lollipops, spiced eggplant...More
We tried this place for a pre-theatre dinner. Should have turned around at the door, because there was a lot of noise at the bar which never let up. Then the booming sound system came on. Food was okay and the big bonus is that...More
This place crowded and tight for space but the breakfasts are excellent. I had the full e flush and could not eat it all. I think they are short of staff because while the single staff person was excellent she had no time for anything...More
The breakfasts are totally decent. Lunch was bland though. Nice patio out back in the summer. It seems like a real neighbourhood spot.
Dashed in after 9pm for a late meal with a friend. Music was blaring but the volume was turned down upon request. Burger was good, but sadly the kalamari was not. Large pieces had too much breading and very little taste. I'll stick with the...More
If you’re along this part of Granville St to begin with, you’re probably okay with busy establishments. Busy comes with loud conversations and a boisterous atmosphere. That, with good food is fine with me. Don’t get me wrong, Caffe Barney has some fine eats and...More
We have been here a couple of times for brunch. This part of Granville Street is full of shops and small food places like Barney. You can seat either at the bar (and chat with the lovely bartender/server), at the patio on the back, inside...More
My boyfriend and I stumbled upon this cute restaurant. We didn't expect there to be a patio in the back but that was our favorite part! It was a beautiful sunny day and the server was lovely. My pulled pork sandwich was a million times...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d802707-Reviews-Caffe_Barney-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Café One,"Stopped in for a business dinner at Cafe / Bar One as colleagues were in town / staying at the Wall Centre. We were served by a charming / quirky irish fella by the name of Shane. He mentioned he had only been with the...More
The service was amazing, the vibe was superior all around, fabulous experience, will definitely be back again
I think the highlight of the night was the service. All the staff were nice and welcoming. But our server Ana Davila was just the best. She did an amazing job. Always was just so kind and warm. Food was good as expected. Definately a...More
This is art of the Sheraton Wall Centre. The hotel makes it sound as if Cafe One and Bar One are two places - they are not., but are two ends of the same room, and have the same menu. The musician was stationed in...More
Excellent venue. Attractive, bright, well laid out, good spacing of tables. Service is excellent and does not have loud blaring music.
We were staying at the hotel and came down for breakfast. The buffet was very expensive and ok. Next time I’d order off the menu for sure. Convenient location when staying at the hotel and great staff. We also had room service for dinner the...More
My family was staying in the hotel for a staycation, so I had the chance to have two breakfasts and one dinner at Cafe One. As for food, they provide the standard hotel fare - something familiar for everyone, and nothing too adventurous. I tried...More
Had a very relax dinner with my old friend for dinner at the Cafe One ,located inside the Sheraton Vancouver Wall Centre lobby , she come here for Breakfast all the time ,it is so relax and not that busy at all ,safety guidelines well...More
We decided to eat here because we were staying at the Sheraton Wall Centre. I asked if I could modify the meal I wanted and they told me this was no problem. The food arrived and was beautifully presented and tasted great. Would eat here...More
We had a fantastic date night with my wife! The food was delicious and to top it all the server “Catalina” was fantastic! She was very friendly and gave us very good advice. We will come back for sure. Gracias
As this was a last minute booking I will not judge this restaurant too harshly. The food was okay but was expecting a little more finesse as it was at the Sheraton Hotel.
This has become our favourite breakfast spot. Staff is very attentive and the kitchen does a great job preparing eggs to your liking. Thank you for providing non-dairy milk options!
My husband and I went for breakfast at the lobby of Sheraton. This was our first time here and I must say that it was delicious. I had Salmon Benedict and the avocado puree was a good addition to the hollandaise sauce. Overall, the restaurant...More
Great Service with a very good ""single"" Espresso provided by beautyful Yulia. Loved it... :-) Adrian
Service was excellent, menu is good but implementation wasn’t great. I had salmon for my main course that was over cooked and nothing was special about it otherwise. Salad was really tasty. Lemon tart for dessert was also really good.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1674567-Reviews-Cafe_One-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Calabash Bistro,"I had been waiting to visit this place since the moment we booked our trip to Vancouver. Unfortunately, the ONE thing I was most excited about (jerk mussels) was the first thing the server said they were totally out of. Have to say, that was...More
I enjoyed my first visit to Calabash pre-pandemic. I brought my sister this time around. The fried dumpling (bakes) was still outstanding. My cocktails were good. Service remains friendly and attentive. Toilets were clean. Crowd was far less rowdy than the last time I went,...More
My husband and I were very pleased with the meals we had a the Calabash Bistro. Service was attentive, the selection was excellent. We highly recommend their poutine, it was fantastic. We will definitely visit Calabash Bistro again should we visit Vancouver again in the...More
Loved the place. Not often you find a hip, trendy , Caribbean restaurant. Usually its just some whole in the wall with excellent home made food but here you have style too. Bouncer Ben was chill and the manager Gilbert is a really nice sweat...More
I would have given this place a 4 or 5 review if it were not for their lacking COVID protocols. The food is very good and reasonably priced. Staff is friendly, atmosphere nice. However, the tables are WAY too close together. Also, the music is...More
The drinks are delicious! They have a great selection of rums and really yummy cocktails... i had the mango mojito and it was special 😍 The manager, Mark, is so nice and very accommodating. The food tho !!!!!!! Can't recommend enough. A small business with...More
I was craving some West Indian food in a nice restaurant, not the typical greasy spoon. Calabash certainly fit the bill. It is casual and comfortable. The service although initially a bit slow, was friendly and accommodating. I ordered beef patties and the oxtail stew....More
Definitely worth stopping into Calabash if you’re in the area and will probably go out of my way to go back there again too. We called up 10 minutes before on a busy Saturday evening and they managed to squeeze us in, thanks! The food...More
Lovely place albeit loud in a bit of a dodgy area. Close to attractions in the Chinatown area. Busy. I would recommend reservations. The staff was kind enough to squeeze us in. On recommendation we had pork belly and the roti stack (goat cheese) and...More
Took our out of town guests- our 1st time as well. Like some of the other reviews state, the location is kinda sketchy- but hey, the atmosphere and vibe inside well makes up for the street life outside. Our waiter was funny, pleasant and quick,...More
The food was pretty good but the atmosphere was a little uncomfortable due to the location. A Security person outside would have put us more at ease.
Quality of food is good but not outstanding. Service is very friendly. I think it is overpriced. I would order oxtail or jerk chicken, not the fish tacos. I have rated the restaurant based on the overall experience. Do not bring kids here, not a...More
My daughter and I went for a ‘date night’. The food, atmosphere and service were perfect. We had meat patties and plantaine for our appetizers and jerk chicken for our main course. All was divine.We will be going regularly!
Went to the Calabash bistro for dinner for the first time based on the great reviews. Ordered oxtail, jerk chicken, goat curry and pork belly. The food is like home cooked with good flavour but would not describe it as outstanding. The service was amazing.
We visited here as I really wanted some jerk chicken on our trip to Vancouver. The jerk chicken was pretty good but the reason I want to highlight this restaurant is the pork belly starter, one of the tastiest dishes I have had in months....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2371112-Reviews-Calabash_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cambie Vietnamese Restaurant,"From reading past discussions and reviews, I had the impression that the best pho outside of Vietnam is found in the US and in Australia. So I wasn't expecting much when my family decided to try a highly rated pho shop while we were in...More
I've never actually been inside this restaurant, just ordered online. I literally cannot believe how good their wonton soup is! every restaurant that serves wonton soup, I've always ordered it, for years, waiting to find the best one. and this is by far the best...More
The food at the Cambie Vietnamese is very good. I had the Bun Bo Hue no noodles. They are happy to make modifications, swap out the noodles and sub in sprouts or vegetables. Very tasty broth. Had me groaning with pleasure. Super crispy rolls.
I’ve always wanted to try this place out, and it’s become my sister’s favourite Vietnamese hotspot in recent years. Well, it doesn’t replace my favourite spots, though I think this restaurant does have fair prices and decent food. They’ve got combo sets that include any...More
I know very little about vietnamese food, but this restaurant was near to our rentaL Apartment so we had passed it a couple of times. Initially I was slightly put off by the ""old fashioned"" decor, and the fact that the menu consisted mainly of...More
Parents and son were on hand to make sure the 5 of us had a good meal over lunch. Accommodating with a 1-year old too. Reasonable prices with good portions. Worth a visit.
We have been going to the Cambie Vietnamese for years (since it was actually on Cambie!) and always found it reliable and easygoing. The owner and staff are always friendly to a high degree (as someone else commented, one quickly becomes his ""brother""); my elderly...More
What a fantastic meal and cheap as well. Very freindly staff. Decor is a bit retro but who cares when the food is amazing. Oh try the spring roll as well. Best one I have ever had. Recommend this for anyone looking for some yum...More
I love this place! The prices are cheap. The food, particularly the steamed crepe appetizers, pho, and hotpot chicken, is delicious. But best of all is the service: ""Cambie Vietnamese"" (no longer on Cambie as it had to change locations) is owned by an extremely...More
We both had pho and 2 different combination. Lots of flavour!!! We had it delivered to 13 West Ave. They were nervous about parking but I convinced him that we had parking outside that was for postal trucks, delivery etc. He arrived, extremely kind and...More
Love going here it's like a family place we can't stop from going best beef Bon mi's ever and so fresh and so good we feel like family always walking in . Don't love the decour but the food and great service make up for...More
Best Bon mi's by far love the beef tenderloin , great food and great pho , customer service exception and food great , we go here often
Been going here for years. You're likely to be greeted by "" hello my friend! "" if you' be been there more than twice in the last year. Small place and very casual almost with the atmosphere of an old diner . Run mainly by...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5294346-Reviews-Cambie_Vietnamese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cannibal Cafe,"we decided to go for dinner on teh Drive. Burgers were on our mind. Bacon Burgers were very good . They were juicy, fries were also good. Wish they would have brought out cutlery. But all was good.
The burgers were delicious. We hit happy hour and the burgers were $5.00. Wow. The atmosphere was fun. The service was excellent.
One of the best burgers I've had in Vancouver and I've had a lot LOL. Friendly staff with a great atmosphere. I'll be going back!
We orderrd two hamburgers, one with fries and the other with onion rings. We split them. The burgers were tasty and good. Nice sitting out on a patio and enjoying the sun ☀. I had a nice, cold Fire Truck Laher Beer.
Our burgers were good but $17 for a burger without a side is over priced. Service was good and not too long a wait for our burgers. Not sure that we’d return unless there was a special price to give us more bang for our...More
we try to order in once a week to support the local restaurants. I had a flyer for Cannibal cafe. we order burgers and fries all was good. no complaints.
We popped in for a meal on BC Family Day and appreciated the free milkshake Monday special and the build your own burger option. The servers were friendly, the burgers and fries were okay but the place looked a bit tired and in need of...More
Attentive staff, imaginative menu, really good Caesar. Impressive options for burgers or build your own. Plenty of other options. I had 6oz burger, Korean bbq sauce, kimchi and a cilantro fritter...... delicious. We all liked this place a lot.
Want for beers and a snack with a buddy and was pleasantly surprised. Small, open kitchen cranking out some solid looking food - burgers figure large on the menu and next time that will be my choice! I enjoyed a stellar selection of brews and...More
Great burgers and cold beer can't get much better. All of us had a rendition of their burgers and no one was disappointed. If you don't order fries, your life will still be complete. Burgers are a meal in themselves.
3 of us visited. I had Cajun wings, salt and pepper wings and a side portion of poutine! The wings were the best I had in Vancouver and I had a lot of wings! The poutine I had more for the experience and was tasty....More
We used to be regulars at the Cannibal Cafe as it used to serve one of the best burgers in Vancouver. The spot was funky, casual, friendly, serving delicious burgers and tasty bites. Since moving to another neighbourhood, we eaten here as frequently. We visited...More
Located on Vancouver’s hip Commercial Drive, the Cannibal Cafe more than holds it’s own in this competitive strip. The fun, 70s/80s Punk Rock theme compliments the tasty bar bite fare. Our server, Danielle, was terrific. Definitely worth seeking out when you’re in Vancouver!
Went to the Cannibal Cafe a couple of weeks ago. They offer U a free birthday burger ( only on your actual birthdate & up to $ 14 value ) as long as U purchase a side. I ordered the Good Morning Vietnam burger (...More
Cannibal Cafe is one of my favourite local dining spots. It's an unpretentious burger joint on Commercial Drive in east Vancouver. The food is consistently good, the service is friendly, and there's something on the menu for every palate. There's a nice variety of local...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3703501-Reviews-Cannibal_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Canra Sri Lankan Plus,"Ok, this is in a mall and the mall is not the cleanest mall in the world. This Sri Lankan place is in the food court and it is very clean from what I saw. The food is freshly cooked to order and is authentic....More
Do not let the food court setting fool you, this is genuine good Sri Lankan food. We got really nice kottu roti here with loads of fresh herbs and spices. The chef is super friendly lady who shows real Sri Lankan hospitality
Friendly family run Sri Lankan food booth in the International Village Food Court. The food is fresh and super tasty. We have been going to this place for 9 years. You should eat here.
This family run Sri Lankan joint in the IV is great street food. We love it. We had the fish and chicken roti and split a masala dosa. Just yummy food. Great flavors. Counter friendly service.
My son and I were off to watch a movie at Cineplex and he suggested Canra given that he has two very good friends who are brothers from Sri Lankan descent. We were amazed with what we ate. The mango lassies were delicious and I...More
The food was so amazing, we actually bought food twice! The owners were kind enough to provide two dishes outside the menu for our child. This was the first time I experienced such a friendly and personalized service. I recommend this hidden gem for anyone...More
We travelled to Vancouver from Saskatoon and we were looking for a restaurant like this. The food was delicious, filling, and affordable. The owners were more than happy to generously offer us a personalized meal. It’s definitely a must for our next trip to Vancouver!
We ordered a veggie dosa, chicken rotti and lamb rotti. all were prepared from scratch. the owner is so friendly and nice. the food is always good, tasty, and perfectly spiced.
We have been going to this food court gem at International Village for many years. It is consistently good. the food is terrific. this last visit we had the chicken roti medium spice level. just served spicy, temp hot and very good. family run. you...More
We have found that Canra is just great before or after a movie at International Village. the Owners are very nice and it is family run. The food is quite fresh, tasty and served hot. The rotis prepared on the grill are just great and...More
We split a vegetarian dosa and two chicken roti dishes. All was hot, tasty, spicy and fresh. The food is very good. Service is friendly.
Full disclosure: I have reviewed Canra before. This is an update based on our recent experiences. First, I have given the ""Excellent"" ranking based on the food and personable service, not on the ambience. This is a food court restaurant, not Hawksworth. Don't be fooled...More
My Sri Lankan friend brought me here and it did not disappoint. The owners were super friendly, the food was incredibly flavourful and filling, and the price can't be beat. I love spicy food, and the owner put some homemade chili spice concoction on my...More
we had the chicken and lamb roti. it is always made up fresh, with nice fresh ingredients, spices, and roti. they grill it up and serve it piping hot. yummy.
Great GF dosas, go in the morning (before noon) if you can, they get busy and you don't want them to run out. The chickpea flour dosas are a god send. Add some spicy curries and you will be back guaranteed. Best eatery in this...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3846661-Reviews-Canra_Sri_Lankan_Plus-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Canucks Bar & Grill,"If I were Canuck owners I would be ashamed to have our name associated with this “restaurant “. There seems to be many employees. The problem is they don’t seem to want customers. Most huddled in pairs talking while customers waited…and waited…and waited. Some left...More
This bar is very convenient right inside the YVR airport. It was next to our waiting area for and Air Canada flight. Good drinks and service.
Myrna was the only person that had a huge genuine smile we encountered in Vancouver airport! She is what customer service is. The food was delicious. We appreciate the warmth of Myrna, the hostess could learn to smile as well from Myrna. Thank you I...More
Prices are too high for what they serve. Potions are small and the food is poorly presented. The quality is questionable and service is mediocre. This restaurant is like the team they represent, a loser.
It is one of the best if not the best restaurant in Vancouver International Airport . Maria offered us the best courteous and professional service . She is very diligent and friendly with great skills of customer service. We had sandwiches, poutine and calamari ….....More
Hope this is the Canucks at the Vancouver Airport. The service was FAST! Our Bloody Marys were fabulous! Breakfast was very good! The bread the toast was made from tasted home made! Jasmine, our server, was attentive and pleasant. Overall wonderful experience!
Decent bar and grill to check out when waiting at the airport. The food is decent and the service is quick. Definitely worth checking out if you'll be waiting for your flight.
We had some time before our vacation flight to Maui. We stopped in for two salads. My wife got the Asian Chicken salad and I ordered the Green chicken salad both were good, tasty and hit the spot before a 6 hour flight. Service was...More
The bar for most airport restaurants and food courts is not high. It is always a ""crap shoot"" to find a decent one on your first shot. It is far easier when in airports you frequent on a regular basis. This was my first meal...More
We decided to eat here as we had time to kill while in the international terminal. We were seated at the end of the bar(where there is a pillar blocking the view of the rest of the bar). Therefore, we were kind of sitting out...More
Handy to USA departure gates at YVR. A sports bar with several large TV screens. Pub style food. Enjoyed the chicken strips and fries. Good local beer selection.
Located in the US (E) gates section of the airport, this place is a consistent pleasure to stop by. When you travel as much as I do, it's nice to be able to rely on a good meal. The attention to details, for fresh and...More
Our food was okay and the waiter was great. The restaurant seemed a bit dirty and in need of some TLC. There's not many other options though.
The fish and chips were the best ever. Huge portion with fresh coleslaw, and extra crispy chips. Nice bar area as well as booths.
The food was great, wonderful cob salad, service was good and all the protocols in place for COVID. Staff were well informed with the menu and had people skills to deal with the variety of travels that came in, that was part of the entertainment...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d9856613-Reviews-Canucks_Bar_Grill-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Cardero's Restaurant & Live Bait Marine Pub,"80th birthday meal for my mum suggested by the hotel. Good lively atmosphere with views of the boats. Excellent food and good choice of wines, would definitely recommend.
Excellent Views Home made sabor! I liked everything and kids loved their menu Worth it ! Highly recommend when visitjng VC
We always love dining at Carderos because of the excellent food, the jaw dropping view, and the great service. Three of us went for a celebratory birthday dinner. Our favorite dish is the wok squid but it's a little pricey at $19 but well worth...More
Lively atmosphere. Wide range of menu options—something for everyone. The AK Sock-eye special was delicious. The seafood chowder was good also. Celebrated a birthday—it was discreet but still celebratory! Noise level was high—but that’s the norm these days.
The food was refined and delicious! The salmon was exceptionally cooked and the curry was delicious. Don’t walk away without having the lemon ice pie…gelato and lemon curd…well balanced and a must try!
The first experience is at the door Make sure it’s pleasant! When you aren’t properly greeted it poisons the entire experience! Train the Director of first impressions!!
We have enjoyed Cardero's in Coal Harbour many times, especially during the summer on the patio overlooking the water and boats. The food is consistently wonderful, as well as the service. We always look forward to seeing the maitre d', Kirby. Kirby always greets us...More
WOW! Outstanding food, excellent service and beautiful view and the cold Rose made for a wonderful lunch with friends visiting from out of province. The signature wok squid was the best I have ever had. Would highly recommend for any occasion!
We stopped for lunch here as we loved the outside decking and it was fantastic, the food was delicious, the views were fab and the service was excellent. It was the beginning of June when we went and if memory serves Melissa was our server...More
My first time @ Cardero's and it was the best! Patrick, our server was super amazing! So friendly and kind! Sat out on deck and staff was so attentive to give us some shade from the sun! Had the lingcod as suggested, was perfect and...More
We enjoyed the ambiance of the restaurant, we had an excellent server and the food and drinks were very nice. Unfortunately rain meant that we were inside but we still enjoyed our visit.
Cardero’s has a very nautical theme, older diving equipment used as decor and models planes hanging from the ceiling. The food was good. The hamburger was good on a wheat bun, with lettuce & tomato. The Margherita pizza was had a thin crust, it was...More
Came in on a rainy afternoon and sat at the bar. Had a fantastic and attentive bartender!! Food amazingly!! Brody for Prime Minister!!
Such a wonderful spot for dinner! Great views and food. If you are lucky enough to be served by Dawna, you will have an exceptional night out. Thank you.
The ambience is lovely. The food was delicious and our waiter (MJ ?) was attentive, knowledgeable and friendly. Live background singer was a bonus.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d683321-Reviews-Cardero_s_Restaurant_Live_Bait_Marine_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Carlino Restaurant,"We had an excellent meal at Carlinos - the oysters were great, loved the salmon, and the pate was delicious. Would go back. PS - service was top notch!
Visited Carlino on a Friday evening in June, as a pre-Father's Day celebration. Parking is available underneath the Shangri-La hotel, and the valet attendants were efficient and helpful in directing us up to the restaurant. The entrance to Carlino is fairly dark, as is the...More
Carlino's menu is a delightful fusion of Italian and Canadian flavors, leaving our taste buds dancing with joy. Don't miss their heavenly pasta dishes and beef tenderloin with truffle! For a perfect ending, indulge in their decadent tiramisu. With every visit, Carlino's commitment to quality...More
Meeting a old friend from U.K for dinner before they fly to Hawaii for their Honeymoon and they choose the Carlino because they stay at the hotel for few days , located at the terrace of Shangri Lai hotel downtown , very cozy upscale authentic...More
Dinner with friends who are local and we are coming back to town for a visit. Ordered a couple of appetizers from their daily specials and the pesto and squid ink pasta as well as the 45 oz steak. Server was very nice and engaging....More
Most fantastic dinner! Branzino was excellent. Made my night! Well done Carlino! Tiramisu is not to be missed either!
We all abosoluetly loved this restaurant! We llive in Vancouver and eat out often, so it was a treat to all be so impressed by the night out we had here. The ambiance was moody, romantic, and beautiful. The food was outstanding.The depth of flavour...More
Authentic Italian. Italian like in Italy. We all had pasta, and it was one of those moments you have your first mouthful and realise “ah, al dente!”. Just perfect. A little bit hard to find - from outside take the elevator or the stairs up...More
This visit was amazing. Firstly they welcomed us in a very welcoming and professional way. We had a server who was nicknamed «Biggie». She was amazing. She helped us picking the right foods and also the right drinks for us. We ate three courses and...More
We arrived to Vancouver and first meal was at this restaurant, note that we are also a guest of their hotel. Waitress was polite and informative and give good suggestions. Dinning experience was great, food quality is good. We have also had breakfast here most...More
I am an Italian journalist and food and wine critic, always before going to a restaurant I look at the web site. I have seen errors that denote the absence of Italian professionals, example on the menu it says Negroni Spaglaito instead it is Negroni...More
Carlino is now in the space that previously housed Market. Renovation created an Italian look and tables are still nicely spaced apart. Very good variety of Italian influenced dishes. Proscuitto was excellent and branzino was cooked perfectly. Our server Kanis and food runners, Kat and...More
This is the hotel restaurant for the Shangri-La. hotel. Typically, in my experience restaurants located in 5 star hotels offer a pretty pleasing dining experience. Indeed, often the restaurants are amongst the best in the city they are located in. Not on this occasion, however....More
Delicious food, knowledgeable server and sommelier, lots of vegetarian options. Beautiful decor and location, will definitely bring friends & family here to enjoy a dinner
Staff were pleasant. Somm was knowledgeable and friendly. Food was average and expensive. ‘swimming scallops’ were the smallest scallops ever and overcooked. tartare good but needed crostini. Osso bucco tasty bit served as a tiny ravioli - don’t expect a regular OB. okay - but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23801356-Reviews-Carlino_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Carmelo's Ristorante Italiano,"small nice place for good italian food I ordered the mushroom pizza, it was delicous, my friend had spaghetti bolognese, he really liked it friendly staff prices higher than usual but okei for the quality
Fine dining, home-made pasta makes this a great option on the north shore. Authentic Italian food, good service, high prices.
First time visit: Arrived with my adult son for a casual dinner on a Wednesday night - without reservations. Fortunately, we got a charming table for two by the window. I was amazed to discover this charming restaurant because i have driven by many times...More
Your review made my day Georgia108! Thanks for telling everyone on Tripadvisor about your dining experience with us. We appreciate so much you taking the time to write such a positive review. We strive to please,and are very thankful you enjoyed. We look forward to...More
Carmelo’s relies on their loyal older regulars and doesn’t pay attention to anyone new. It was my BFs bday so we were looking forward to a nice dinner out (4) of us. Food was under seasoned, bland and big time lacking in flavour. No amount...More
Dear Alexandra, We appreciate your feedback regarding your recent dining experience and are disappointed we did not meet your expectations. Your comments were shared with our management team for their review. Firstly, Carmelo’s is a neighbourhood restaurant with a strong following, yet we strive to...More
Great atmosphere, delicious food and wonderful service! Nice to find a great Italian restaurant while travelling!!!
Thanks for the great review, and hope your travels bring you back to Carmelo’s soon!
This family owned restaurant in the heart of West Vancouver, serves up so wonderful Italian dishes. Exceptional traditional Italian food, Their Seafood Linguine, with prawns, mussels, calamari was exceptional. Not a lot of room left for desert. Their Stracciatella soup is exceptional! One of the...More
Ordered takeout pasta for three adults. Seafood pasta, vongole, and veal Bolognese. Mixed green blue cheese salad, burrata salad and cheese bread. All delicious and still decently hot once delivered. Will definitely be a repeat customer.
We have been local fans of Carmelo’s for nearly 30 years now. Not just loyalty, but the food, best reason to visit a restaurant. There are may Italian cuisine Restaurants in town, we have tried them all. Carmelo’s keeps returning to our list, of tonight…....More
One of our favourite restaurants on the North Shore. John is more than welcoming. The food is excellent. I always have the veal cannelloni and it is truly amazing. I had affogato for dessert and I love it. Service is above average. We will continue...More
Excellent service and delicious food! Very attentive server and made our bad day into a relaxing wonderful evening. Prawns were perfectly cooked, salad was well seasoned. Chicken was perfectly done, not over cooked just the right tenderness. Most of all pasta was done just like...More
Went for a small (3) family dinner. The food was just ok, except for my lasagne, which was lukewarm (at best). On top of the poor food, the service was indifferent - there were only 4 tables seated, but it took a long time to...More
We went for a very nice dinner tonight and split a Caesar salad and enjoyed the fettucine as well as veal piccata. Everything was cooked perfectly and the service was excellent.
My friends and I absolutely loved our experience at Carmelo's. From the moment we were greeted by friendly faces to the last bite of tiramisu, everything was exceptional. The mixed greens salad was perfectly balanced, with blue cheese, candied pecans, slices of apple, and house...More
My girlfriend and I had a great dinner and the servers were excellent. They have great wine list also.
Food is to die for, staff are friendly and attentive, can’t rave enough! Only downside is that I️ don’t live closer!",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d763087-Reviews-Carmelo_s_Ristorante_Italiano-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Carthage Cafe,"The food is excellent at Carthage Cafe, and this cute little restaurant is a great choice for a cosy night out. The staff were a little nervous and unsure of themselves (probably new?) but overall it was a great experience.
My Mrs had treated me for a dinner out at Cartharge once before and we loved it then, so we thought we would share that experience with our good friends after our visit to the Broadway Church Singing Christmas Tree evening and our dinner at...More
We were the first ones in the restaurant, so glad, didn't realize how close the tables were. My only issue. The service was EXCELLENT, the food was sublime! Mussels to start, cilantro dressing was so flavourful. Lamb shank with coucous for dinner - so tender...More
A cozy cafe with a good selection of food and wine. Friendly and efficient service, willing to accommodate our requests to mix and match items from the menu. All in all, our group of 6 had a pleasant evening.
I came here for lunch. We were on a work lunch so had a bit longer than usual. The food was delicious! I had the lamb shank and it was very tender. Another person had the salmon and another had a salad. My only negative...More
We only wanted a light meal and enjoyed their brilliant salads. Such wonderfully attentive staff. I can recommend the spinach salad. Gorgonzola and raspberry dressing.
What a stroke of luck!! Just happened to be passing this little place when we got hungry. Went in for lunch and was totally blown away! Tunisian French fusion was a mix I have never had and I think would be hard to beat. The...More
French bread was ordinary, the salad saturated with dressing, too much salt and saffron in the bouillabaisse. The food lacked subtlety. The french fries were very good, coconut cilantro mussels were just right, service was good. my overall impression was disappointment.
Came here after 9pm on a weeknight and there was hardly anyone in the restaurant. We weren't sure when the place closed but even though it seemed 'late,' the server was super nice and we didn't feel rushed. I tried the mussels Provencale and the...More
Unreal couscous. Growing up it was one of my least favourite dishes but Cafe Carthage made it my favourite now. It’s so good you won’t wanna stop eating it. I got the couscous royale and it has juicy chicken, tender lamb and delicious merguez. The...More
The Carthage Cafe is a small place on Commercial Drive in Vancouver. It offers French and Tunisian food which is unusual for the area. The food is very good. I has the sausage Couscous which was outstanding. There are a couple of issues with the;...More
I came here with a friend with whom I eat out once a month, since it was her turn to choose the eating location. I am so glad she chose this place! The atmosphere of this restaurant is very nice, like something out of the...More
What a find ! This is a tiny treasure. Food is unusually good and well presented. Service is top notch. A nice feeling throughout the evening. Quiet sophistication. Perfect for any occasion. Do not bring small, untrained children to spoil the experience of other guests...More
Been here a few times. Interesting experience. They do try hard and the food is unique. Must say the Mussels with fries are awesome. And the Tunisian coffee near perfect.
Treated with HATRED and DISCRIMINATION today at Cafe Carthage. Our family of 4 sat down at lunch time. There was 1 other table of customers. My toddler was fussing because he was hungry. Before we had a chance to order the waiter RUDELY told us...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d966784-Reviews-Carthage_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Casa di Amici Restaurant,"It’s not apparent when walking by that this previously all Italian restaurant now has a curry section! The sign for the Golden Curry is high up and close to the building - easily seen driving by, but almost impossible to spot on foot. However its...More
Excellent! We chose to have Indian food and every dish was unique and excellent. We requested no cream and we’re happily accommodated. The food was perfect. Highly recommend.
Some of the best Indian cuisine we have had in a long time! They seem like a lovely family and can sure cook. We had Dahl, fish and a mushroom pea curry. To die for. We will be back!!
The restaurant has changed hands and is now predominantly an Indian restaurant with some Italian food. We went there for dinner at 5:15 on a Tuesday and they were only two other tables seated at that time. There was a baby crying in the kitchen...More
We had a an absolutely delightful dining experience at the Casa di Amici at 1747 Marine Dr. W. on Sunday, Sep 12. I ordered the seafood cannelloni - best I have ever had! Everyone had delicious meals as well. It was my birthday supper and...More
This has been a favorite eatery for lunch for many years. They do an excellent soup or salad with a half order of pasta at a ridiculously cheap price but is always excellent . Good servi ce
Excellent food and service, located on Marine Dr in the heart of W van ,new owners doing an incredible job. Ceaser salad, Pecatore pasta and the Veal all Fantastic and of course they have Hess Vino Thanks for the great evening
Amici has been a favourite of ours for years, serving wonderful Italian meals. Our visit last night was a great experience with perfect pasta in a setting which was totally Covid compliant. We are glad the new owners have done such a good job in...More
We start it off for the seafood salad that we split and it was really really good. We both had the veal scallopini and finished up with tiramisu. All in all it was a great dinner
Have been going there for a while now and the experience is always refreshing. Great food and the staff are very good. You dont get the same one during the meal, they change around and keep things moving. Their 3 course Sunday Prime Rib dinner...More
This is the 3rd time we have attended Amici. The food, service and ambiance were great as usual. Last visit I had the 1/2 rack of lamb which was outstanding. This visit I tried the veal medallions which I found a little tough. Two of...More
My husband and I did the set menu with the 4 course dinner and it was delicious! Highly recommend this place it was our second visit since we came for our first wedding anniversary. Great food great service!
I haven’t been to this restaurant for a couple of years and had forgotten just how good it is. The service was absolutely spot on and the food cooked to perfection The seafood salad was a good size and very tasteful, the veal scallopini was...More
We picked Amici for a family dinner of 10 of us. Our server was efficient and took care of the table. Friendly service. Wine selection was decent as well. The ambience is cozy but the customer base seems to be mostly seniors. Food overall was...More
This place is so authentic and the service is second to none. The Caesar salad is the best anywhere. Tangy and dressing is not too thick. The spaghetti Bolognese is the best ever. It must be simmered for hours. The pesto sauce is to die...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d763069-Reviews-Casa_di_Amici_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Casereccio,"Food was 5 star---had pasta spaghetti (i choose) carbonara will go back sooner rather than later. reasonable prices friendly staff and has home like feel---can hardly wait to return
What amazing place! The food is extremely delicious, and the people are very attentive. I recommend the pasta carbonara, and you have to try the gelato either.
Visiting Vancouver with Family…looking for authentic Italian Coffee….FOUND IT!! Excellent coffee, pastry, food & service! My first stop next time in town!!
I love Italian food. I make my own egg pasta and sauces from scratch and try new sauces and noodles all the time. It gets tiring though, which is why I like to eat out. This place is SO good and authentic. Their menu is...More
The bucatini Carbonara is SO good. I love the amount of selection this place has for pasta, I can't wait to try more pastas here! The food is so delicious!
I’ve been here twice now, and thrilled this place exists. I’ve had pastas with their bolognese and porcini & cream sauces which are both really good. I bought extra to take home. The maccheroni and cheese is a big hit with kids too. I’ve also...More
This little Italian café has made the neighborhood! With authentic Italian food and such a great atmosphere, it’s a must try. The gelato is so good.
Recently stopped by for dinner at Casereccio and was impressed by the quality of the authentic Italian pasta dishes, reasonable prices, and friendly service. We ate at one of the patio tables outside on a warm summer evening. The carbonara and bolognese pastas were excellent,...More
Lovely Italian place in the neighbourhood! The chef’s risotto was delicious. I prefer it a bit less salty, but still so good. The cannoli tasted like heaven!!! Needless to say, they use Illy coffee so the coffee is so good.",9,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23217116-Reviews-Casereccio-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Catch 122,"Busy breakfast spot with a wide range of options. If you’re looking for either a healthy and unhealthy breakfast they’ve got you covered. I went for the Dutch baby which was tasty but the ratio of toppings was all wrong. Either the actual pancake needed...More
Amazing food. Great variety. Literally everything we ordered was memorable and delicious - this is coming from a party of 11 connoisseurs. Nice desserts. The best service from the server Sonya!
Beautiful Lower Lonsdale location. Natural lighting. Inviting decor and ambience. Walked in for a mid-week brunch. Reservations not an option - the only thing I don't appreciate about this place. Busy. Seated at the bar. Quite comfortable. Extensive menu. Gorgeous baked goods. Hard to choose!...More
Recently reopened and they have managed to get the place looking great. The food and service were excellent. The menu has a lot of choice and all of it was good. Coffee was great and the staff very attentive a happy.
Catch 122 moved to North Vancouver (from Gastown) in Jan.23, so the reviews here may be confusing - same people, totally different location. Had a nice brunch of drinkies, and tasty pulled pork benny and BELT (bacon/egg/lettuce/tomato) sandwich. Pastries looked delish - quite the selection....More
The menu includes some usual breakfast items but also some that are unique and creative. Nice to try something different, especially when it tastes so good. Our group of 4 consisted of 2 pescatarians and 2 carnivores. The menu easily covered all our desires. We...More
Another Sunday another brunch in Vancouver and we chose Catch 122. We ordered the mango passion fruit youlgurt parfait (Greek yogurt | ricotta cheese | mango passionfruit compote | house-made granola with nuts | fresh berries) and this was delicious. We then ordered the mushroom...More
Pending a move to the Shipyards District Catch 122 currently inhabits a space labeled as Rosette, the Restaurant’s daytime hours switching names, concepts and ownership at dinner from “Contemporary Canadian"" to “Slow Food & Wine.” Previously next door for a decade, Chefs Ana Laura Ramos...More
Superbe brunch, the menu is well thought and products are of very good quality. Atmosphere is charming and quite vibrant.
Warning - portions are MASSIVE! Really tasty, fresh delicious food. Home made breads. Great for a veggie. Really unusual and well thought out brunch menu. Service was great. Really reasonably priced.
Wow! Great casual service , unique menu and very large portions . The chicken and waffles were the best I ever had. The waffles hadj tones of flavour (yeast style) and the chicken was tender and fried perfect. Everything is scratch made and it shows....More
Poor experience with staff. I was in a group of 6 people and we were unfortunately ten minutes late to our reso due to a phone being locked in an evo. I called the restaurant twice to let them know of the situation and was...More
Stopped in for breakfast, and had a delightful breakfast (which, okay, included a cronut and a cruffin, both of which were fantastic). The food was fresh and really well prepared, and the tables were far enough apart that one isn’t rubbing elbows with strangers! Really...More
Great brunch location! We didn’t have reservations but the hostess managed to find us a table. (We just had to finish our breakfast within the hour. It worked fine for us.) we ordered several of the croissants and the mushroom bagel. The croissants were nice...More
I heard about Catch 122 googling best brunch downtown and Catch 122 is on the list. I made reservations and arrived right at time for 11:30am. We walked to Catch 122 about 15 minutes in the heat 26 degrees. I guess I should not expect...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d3619033-Reviews-Catch_122-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Catfe,"The only reason I gave this 4/5stars is some of the customers ended up keeping some of the cats to themselves which is a bit selfish as it doesn't let other customers have fun interacting. Whilst it isn't the owners fault it could be good...More
Mornings are the best time to go as the cats tend to be more active. It’s all about the cats, so don’t be getting all caught up on the food. There’s a Starbucks around the corner if you are fussy. Just enjoy the cats and...More
Most noble restaurant in Vancouver. They literally save lives, reduce homelessness and find people new fur babies and best friends. What other ""restaurant"" does that?
Up until about a year ago, TripAdvisor had two listings for Vancouver’s original cat café – this “restaurant” listing and an “attraction” listing. I suppose it makes sense that this “restaurant” listing is the one to survive since the great majority of reviews were posted...More
I was told that this is Vancouver’s original cat café. Catfe is housed on the second level of International Village; which is a fairly central location. Catfe is divided into two separate, yet interrelated, sections: A café side and a cat loune side. The café...More
Catfe is Vancouver’s original cat café, having opened its doors for the first time in late 2015. Like other cat cafes, the mission of Catfe is simple: 1) To serve as a temporary shelter for adoptable cats until they find their forever home; 2) To...More
This is a coffee and tea ...with a special experience of getting your kitty fix. You can play for an hour with kittens and cats that are up for adoption.
I like to check out cat cafes in the cities I travel to and this one was one of the best I've been to. The entire establishment is 2 separate spaces- 1 is the cafe with pastries and espresso drinks and merchandise. The other, bigger,...More
Really cute cats, very quirky and interesting place to visit. Food was OK, but we went for the cats. Good place, visit if in Vancouver.
I have been to cat cafes in Newcastle and Tokyo the one in Vancouver is very similar. Admission is $10 which is fairly reasonable. Cats get adopted out which is very nice.
This is such a cute cafe! The staff are very friendly and obviously care for the cats in their care. I highly recommend this place if you’re in the Vancouver area-call ahead though! They make appointments so that the cats don’t get overwhelmed by too...More
Visited here with my car loving family. The mall it is in is a bit run down but the Catfe itself is great! The staff love the cats and they all appear very healthy and well looked after. There are strict rules on handling the...More
So you're visiting Vancouver but you really miss your cat at home? Go here and visit with some wonderful kitties, all of whom are available for adoption. This is an enormous room full of cat playthings, and unlike some cat cafes in other cities there...More
Such a wonderful spot. You can tell the staff love the cats. The cafe is located at the top of the International Village mall. There are also tasty snacks for the humans.
Incredibly poor service from frustrated staff. Heroin junkies browsing around too. Avoid at all costs.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9586169-Reviews-Catfe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cavino,"I really enjoy eating at Cavino. They take my multiple food allergies seriously and yet always manage to feed me a great meal.
This bistro wine bar is in the Residence Inn by Marriott, where we stayed for three nights. We went in to dine around 8 on our first night, because we were tired and didn't feel like walking around the area, looking for another place. One...More
Thank-you for taking the time to review Cavino. As we pride ourselves on delivering a memorable guest experience, we have unfortunately fallen short of our goal. Please accept our sincere apology for this. I would greatly appreciate more feedback should you wish to contact me.
Cavino is conveniently attached to the Residence Inn, where my husband and I were staying during our trip to Vancouver. It was great to stop down for an appetizer, dessert, or late night drink. I would recommend for anyone staying in the Residence.
Thank-you for taking the time to give us a review and recommendation. It was a pleasure having you stay with us.
If your staying at the Marriott Residence Inn and either short of time, do not want to go out or just lazy the Cavino Bistro and Wine Bar is a nice place to have a beer or wine and a meal. Menu is limited. I...More
Thank-you for taking the time to review Cavino. I'm glad we could accommodate your dining preferences.
Ate here several times, food excellent. Shawn and Scott very personable and assets to their employer.
Thank-you very much for writing a review on Cavino. We are delighted that you enjoyed your time with us.
We stayed at the Marriott Residence Inn and had dinner in this pretty, informal space over two nights with Shawn as our waiter. The menu is somewhat limited but the food is delicious -- which is why we went back a second night. We each...More
Thank-you for the review. It was a pleasure having you dine with us and we are glad we could help your day get better!!
This restaurant was accommodating Marriott guests so it was busy. The service was excellent at times and scattered at other times.
Enjoyed a nice glass of wine at happy hour before exploring Granville Island. Was the perfect thing to get me in the mood for a salmon burger at Go Fish.
Staying at the very nice Residence Inn on a rainy day I was keen to find a good restaurant close by and I'm glad that Cavino was attached to the lobby. Both the Cavino salad and the seafood chowder were delicious, generious, and reasonable. Service...More
My friend and I were attending a convention and at the end of the day, all we wanted was a good glass of wine and quick meal. We got more than that at Cavino. We ended up with several excellent meals (chicken parmesan with vegetables,...More
This is essentially the restaurant of the Marriott Residence Inn, where we were staying in Vancouver. We arrived a bit ragged from the trip and in no mood to go searching for a restaurant so, even though this establishment offers a very limited food menu...More
David and Erick help make our holiday really special, by providing such excellent customer service. The food was very good even though the menu never changed. The cocktails were really good. We were staying in the hotel where Cavino is located, so we didn't have...More
We had a happy hour drink and some food. Service was superb and the food was very good. Nice atmosphere.
On our second visit to Vancouver we again chose to visit this restaurant as we were so happy when we visited only eight months earlier. We can only praise the wait staff in their friendliness and service. The food however was a huge disappointment. On...More
First time in Vancouver and I always stay at Marriott properties. Read the Cavino reviews on tripadvisor.com and wanted to try. Excellent wine choices and the spinach quesadilla was delicious! Glad I can be here a few more days and try additional menu selections.More
So glad to hear you came in and tried our new menu! The Spinach Quesadilla is one of my favourites! Hope you got an opportunity to try some of the other menu options and enjoyed the rest of your stay! Cheers Jenny Bulmer Assistant Operations...More",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4242549-Reviews-Cavino-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cavo Bar & Kitchen,"Very nice experience! The people who work here are very sweet, I’d definitely come back again to try the food and the drinks are good.
Our waiter refused to make eye contact... We had to hunt him down for everything. I'm not ultra picky, and I rarely don't tip at all.... but no tip on this one. We'd had drinks earlier in the evening and just wanted food. I think...More
We were looking for a great place for breakfast, stopped and looked at the menu and decided to give it a try. Great friendly service and excellent breakfast. Will be back to try dinner. Loved the music and the ambience!
Wow, 20 bucks for a glass of local draft beer and 6 wings. Your joking right! Happy hour? I think not.
This place is nice to sit & have a drink outside. However, we made the mistake of ordering a margarita pizza. It was an absolutely disgusting pile of GREASE! I had to use all the napkins to blot away what I could. A frozen pizza...More
Everything was awful. First, none of the servers were wearing masks. Second, one server female was really rude. She didn’t even know the no-alcohol drinks that the bar served and she didn’t know the daily soup. After her staring at our table for 10 minutes...More
I knew of this restaurant from a friend and after being at the Orpheum Theatre for a concert, made a reservation to eat there. We arrived early and were seated tight away. The service was excellent, food, delicious and the music and ambiance, relaxed, contemporary...More
Wow, really great breakfast with fresh ingredients and creative choices. Family of four that had different dishes and all agreed they were excellent. Service was great as well. Stop by you won't be disappointed.
Restaurant is near my office and I attend regularly. You can tell they pay attention to the ingredients; always tasty.
We arrived around 4:45 mid-week when it wasn't too busy. It was getting busy when we left at about 6:30. The happy hour menu has lots of choices and has pretty good value. The drink prices were reasonable and the service was excellent! The food...More
Was here yesterday with my girlfriend and we both had amazing breakfasts here, we wish we found it sooner! Would 100% recommend to anyone!!
We ate here on our first night in Vancouver and it was a great find. The food was delicious and the staff were friendly and attentive. There was live music at the front of the bar area. A good lively bar with a great atmosphere.
The restaurant is very nice and is located among the main streets of the center ... The atmosphere is very convivial and youthful and the food was also good! The staff as always is very attentive so we spent a nice evening. We know the...More
Ate dinner with my family -location is fantastic in Granville... great outside eating to watch the world go by. The food is fantastic and consistent- eaten there now about 3 times. Service is great and would recommend... also fab cocktails.
We had a two-night-stay in Vancouver and we've been two times to Cavo because te food was excellent en de staff was very friendly! Good food for a good price.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6894343-Reviews-Cavo_Bar_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cayenne Bistro & Grill,"We were in the area and decided to give Cayenne Bistro a try. We were glad we did. Each dish we had was fresh and delicious, well portioned and spiced perfectly for our taste. Trying to avoid rich sauces, we opted for the Chicken Tikka...More
Thank you, Dalilama2016 for the review, we are happy to know you enjoyed the food, beer and service at Cayenne. We look forward to seeing you both again soon.
Wonderful evening - very friendly and personal service. Food was amazing - quite a unique combination and certainly more of an experience tasting the different dishes. Owners and staff definitely care and are committed to making sure their customers are looked after and well fed....More
Thank you, NovaScotiaMark, for the review and we are happy to know you enjoyed your visit to Cayenne.
The food at this restaurant is truly exceptional. Very high quality, authentic, sooo tasty. Wonderful ambiance. Speaking with the owners after our dinner I found a passionate, loving couple who truly love what they do with all of their heart, and it shows. I can’t...More
Thank you, silkeElaysa for the beautiful review. It was a pleasure meeting you and we are glad you enjoyed Cayenne's food and service. We look forward to seeing you both soon and have a safe & fun Easter with the family. We will certainly keep...More
This lovely little restaurant has fabulous food and excellent service. Four of us enjoyed 4 totally different items and all were delicious and beautifully prepared. Highly recommended for a casual but elegant evening out.
Thank you, simbat for the review. We are happy to know you enjoyed your visit to Cayenne.
We had two delicious meals here and will definitely go back next time we’re in Burnaby. The owner explained the dishes to us and was very helpful and friendly. A real gem of a place!
Thank you, Sarajd067 for the review and feedback. It was a pleasure having you at Cayenne.
Spotlessly clean great staff very very friendly and excellent service along with great food, can't get any better than that period.
Thank you, 719dennisg for the review. Happy to know you enjoyed your visit to Cayenne Bistro.
WOW!!!! This is one of the best experiences I have had at a restaurant in a long time, from food to service, the owners are exceptional, very friendly and hospitable. The food was beyond my expectations, the depth of flavour was mind blowing. Will definitely...More
Thank you, Mybuck for the review.
I have been to all the Indian/ East African restaurants in the Lower Mainland and I must admit,Cayenne is the best in my opinion. First, the food is exceptional,delicious but not too spicy,resonably priced and above all the premises is very clean. The space is...More
Thank you, 795salimh for sharing your positive experience at Cayenne. We appreciate you taking the time to leave us a review.
As soon as I walked in the door, I could feel the welcoming atmosphere of the staff and owner. The food was amazing and I will certainly come again…
Thank you, 437Dawn for the review and look forward to seeing you again soon at Cayenne.
Family of 3 stopped by for lunch on a Thursday afternoon and had a delicious, flavorful lunch. Wish I had taken pictures but we dived in and didn't thinking about pictures until we'd finished eating. Food is cooked fresh, so leave time to relax and...More
Thank you, SouthSeattleMom for taking the time to leave us a review. We are glad you enjoyed your visit to Cayenne.
We arrived in Burnaby on labour day and took the best choice for dinner. At Cayenne's we experienced the most delicious dishes and met the friendliest owners and team. Thank you very much for your kindness and professionalism.
Thank you, Annajita. We are happy to know you enjoyed the food and service at Cayenne.
What an amazing, beautiful restaurant in Burnaby. We joined friends who have been regulars at Cayenne for quite a while. Great, personal and professional service and such a delicious meal tasting a range of menu selections. The owner and his wife who is the mastermind...More
Thank you, L2990SJeugenek for the review and compliments.
I was here a few days ago with my family. The food was soooo good. Both the owners greeted us so warmly. This is as good as it gets. They cook their food from scratch and it shows. I have never been disappointed here. I...More
Thank you, Mebs C for the review. We are always happy to see you and the family at Cayenne!
My husband and I have walked & driven past this place many times and finally decided to try it out. Wish we hadn't waited so long to go there as everything was so very tasty! We shared the appy platter and the choma platter and...More
Thank you, snakelady100 for the wonderful review.
We chose Cayenne because we wanted to meet our son somewhere halfway between our residents - so this popped up and I'm glad it did. We really enjoyed the food and the service was warm and friendly. This family run restaurant is truly a hidden...More
Thank you, Liddellmom.",30,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d15865774-Reviews-Cayenne_Bistro_Grill-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Cazba,"Dined here on a Friday night 6:30 and we were taken aback at the lovely, exotic decor and professional service, feeling quite safe with COVID protocols observed. The menu was rich; we started with shrimp with tomatoes and mains were Lamb Pirzola (generous delicious lamp...More
I have order meals for the family and spent over $70 and when I got home, there was two items missing!!!, I called the restaurant and brought it to their attention. The man who took my order apologized and promised me next time meals will...More
The food is always good. Servers are polite. Service is quick. They are happy To do a little bit extra to keep you happy. Never had a bad meal here.
Compare to other Iranian restaurants, they try to keep their quality as much as possbile consistent, there are sometime change quality druing the time is possible, but as soon as you mentions they will try to fix it. But someting is always the same, very...More
It's classy Persian restaurant in North shore. The Server Hoda, she's very nice and polite waitress in Cazba.
We have ordered from Cazba from years. And have been loyal customers. But this evening they forgot to provide the delivery service with our full order. Which they admitted to be their fault. And after waiting for 3hours they finally delivered what they claim to...More
The location is beautiful (expect crowding & parking non-availability during weekends). Welcoming is great, a little waiting time. What I like: Good food, the bread is absolutely awesome, the manager tried his best. What I dislike: The menu items were not available, they forgot to...More
My family has been going to Cazba for the last 7-8 years off and on. Consistently good food - good flavour and a good amount of food. The only complaint is the lamb shank used to be slightly better. The sauce for the lamb is...More
The food is fantastic, the service good and the prices are reasonable. Best value is the Casba platter for under $30 and feeds 2 to 3 people. Highly recommend this place.
Our first visit here and we will definitely return.... many times, and with family & friends! We had the tah dig, salad, lamb shank (excellent!), and fesenjan. All were the fabulous. The service was helpful and attentive. Very spacious space, and overall pleasant ambiance. Best...More
Ordered the Baked Eggplant (smokey flavour) and Kookoo Sabzi appetizers. Good size portions. For mains we tried a chicken kabob and the combo chicken and beef kabob. Both came with too much basmati rice and grilled tomatoes. Generous portions, we went home with a doggie...More
Excellent food and service . Went for lunch and good atmosphere . Clean , spacious and friendly servers - the girls weee charming
Went to the Cazbar on the recommendation of a friend. Had a salad which we shared as it was quiet large.It contained fresh lettuce, cucumber and tomatoes. I had the Barg Kabob which was sliced steak with rice and cooked tomatoe and wife had Jejen...More
Used Groupon and ordered 3 mains for our family of 4. Lamb shank was the best and everyone's favourite by far. The lamb chops was pretty good as was the combo beef steak & ground beef kabobs. Had these for take out and they were...More
I travel all around N. America I go to Iranian restaurant on my business trips and this is very good quality and service for the money they charge as well we gather up with friends and we always order out from them and we are...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2387621-Reviews-Cazba-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cazba restaurant,"We went to Vancouver on a family trip for a concert only to find out the concert was postponed so we looked for something new to us and found The Cazba. We lucked in for tickets to their first Comedy at the Cazba and enjoyed...More
I had watched out for good weather for a few days while staying nearby because I really wanted to sit out on their attractive terrace to eat and watch the world go by, but it wasn’t to be so eventually we went inside to dine...More
Went for dinner yesterday. Order two family platters for family of four. Food quality was good but per person cost just over $35 per person which in my opinion is the n higher side for Persian food. Wait staff was polite and service was fast....More
I've ordered delivery a few times, and finally came here in person a couple weeks ago. It was great. Service was nice and friendly, our server was sweet. The food tasted good and was presented in a very appealing way. Had the lamb and the...More
This is our Monday Hot Spot....The food is generous, served hot and delicious! The young staff are attentive and kind. Great for take out as well. The chicken is over the top tender and well seasoned. I can't wait to try the Lamb Shank!
I love lamb shanks and this is where I go for that. It's a casual Persian restaurant and all dishes are reasonably priced. There is a small patio great for sunny days.
Went for dinner with my family on Sunday. Walked in to ask for a table outside - the fellow came right up to me and I had to step back. The face shields they are wearing are a joke as they barely cover the mouth...More
BRING UR SANTZR..... if u dining inn I wrote a good review before but today we could not eat the food and took it home they act as they do their job but be very careful this isnot a joke talk to manager -- they...More
Persians who travel make it a point to visit at least one Persian restaurant in the city they are visiting. It’s in our DNA! I choose Cazba in Vancouver and I’m glad I did. My standard is 2 appetizers and the Soultani or sometimes called...More
Five of us went for late lunch. Server was an exceptional man who took the time to explain the food so we could make the right choices. He was very patient. Food was amazing and very good with lots of leftovers. Place was clean and...More
Great service and fabulous food especially for a busy New Year’s Eve. We had no booking but they made us a table and bought us some decent cocktails and Hummus entree. The kebab platters were delicious. Two platters were plenty of food for five hungry...More
Average quality food! It’s surprising to me why the managers do not run such a restaurant better?! An amazing location in downtown, a good history in serving Persian food... But the quality was not that acceptable to me. It’s good if you really crave Persian...More
What an adventure into the wonderfulness of Persian cuisine. Highly recommend this restaurant the food is delicious and the price is so very reasonable!
This is one of my husband's favorite restaurants in Vancouver. The service is good, the food is always excellent and the atmosphere is great for just couples or for a group of friends. Prices are on point for the quality and size of their dishes....More
Tonight we ordered from Cazba for 8 people and they neglected to provide the third party food delivery service with our entire order. So we recieved rice and salad for 8, and nothing else. We have ordered from Cazba for years so we gave them...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4872315-Reviews-Cazba_restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Central City on Beatty St,"This is our favourite local brew pub. Features the Red Racer family of beers. Good location very close to B.C. Place
Called to see if I could get in with a wheelchair, advised to called back in a week or so ?? Very disappointed. I hope it's n ot going down like their place in Surrey. Shame !
There were 4 of us for lunch. This is a big place and it was sparsely populated on the day we were there making for a certain lack of atmosphere. However, the food was decent for pub food and the service was efficient and friendly.
My family of 5 went to the crayfish Betty's boil last year and really enjoyed it. So, when the lobster, mussel, shrimp and clam boil was advertised for tonight, my family jumped at the event. Unfortunately, after tonight , we may never go again. When...More
Coming here off and on for years as I live across the street. Service used to be quite good, I actually took my staff here for a night out in the private room years ago, Seems like they have very high turnover now. I came...More
Central City makes good beer. Sit at the bar for better service. The food was ok. I had the salmon and the fish was cooked well but the sauce flavour was strong and too much sauce. It saturated the rice... more like a teriyaki soup....More
Central City perfectly encapsulates Vancouvers craft beer scene. With around 40 craft beers on tap as well as serving the normal wine, spirits and mixers, it's also has own blend of coffee. I ordered the wings and the Red Racer BBQ burger and have to...More
Stopped in here towards the end of an 11 mile walk for Wednesday burger and beer lunch special. Great selection of craft beer but my burger was bare bones....tomato and lettuce only, probably should have asked for mustard and mayo. Nota bene ...fries are extra.More
Alan, Yes $10 will get you a simple burger and a 16oz beer, yes it is basic but this is a lunch special, we have a regular burger which is $17.50 with all the trimmings. Considering we charge $6.75 for a beer we think this...More
Stopped by for a pint and a bite and realized it was trivia night and stayed till the end. Good choices for food and Great choices for beer.
Our hotel on the edge of Yaletown recommended Central city as a good spot to grab a beer. The place was pretty empty mid afternoon, so we sat at the bar. The have a ton of their own beers, plus a bunch of visitor taps....More
I didn't even know this existed until we drove past. Once installed in our hotel, we immediately came to this exceptional pub/restaurant. Great happy hour food and an amazing selections of beers. I cannot say enough about this terrific little find. Amin, our bartender was...More
Central City is a fun pub and it had great beer but we couldn't get past the plastic straws and stir sticks at the bar. Many establishments in Yaletown have already gotten with the program. We'll return when the straws are gone-
We found this place while out exploring our first day of vacation in Vancouver. Our beer was cold and they had a nice selection. I thought the service was really lacking especially since it was mid day on a Monday and it was relatively empty
The location is great, as is the decor of the brewpub, but the beer was just fair. The Amber Ale didn’t sit well with us. The imperial IPA was pretty good.
A huge variety of beers available for selection, with a beer there for every taste. Most beers are under the CAN$7 which means it's under the €5 mark which is very reasonable for a city centre pub. The food is ideal for a pub scene...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8468180-Reviews-Central_City_on_Beatty_St-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chad Thai,"Our group had a lovely time at this Thai restaurant. The food was great. The place is quite small, however, and staff are not all fluent in English, which posed a few minor challenges when ordering. Overall, it was a good experience.
Excellent food & good price. No.1 Thai Food this side of Burnaby. I love spicy food. The chill jam fried rice is excellent
We popped in for lunch and I had Pad Ped ...chicken in red curry. It had zero flavor! I ordered med- hot spice level but it really had no taste.....the rice had more flavor! Worst curry I have ever had very disappointing. We would never...More
There is a good reason why Chad Thai has consistently won various awards over the years. Jean, the owner, goes out of her way to make sure everything is perfect for her customers.People from all over the world can be found enjoying the unbelievably 😋...More
We have always been impressed with the friendly service and delicious food at Chad Thai; lately we’ve been using takeout which is generally very quick; we highly recommend them if you’re in the mood for some yummy Thai
Having spent three months in thailand, I've been on the hunt for the best Thai in and around Vancouver. This place has got to be the best I've discovered so far. The khao soi, curries and pad thai are my favorite and luckily I live...More
I found Chad Thai 3 years ago and continue to frequent this restaurant. The employees always greet me personally and truly make me feel special when I visit, the price is absolutely right compared to other Thai restaurants I have tried in Vancouver and North...More
Run by a very friendly Thai women. Greets you at the door....quite a small place but clean and tidy. Had lunch here recently, and have been to Thailand 3 times mostly in the North and Central Thailand. I had the Khao Soi and it was...More
When we crave thai, we aren't looking for the elevated experience most places are slinging - we want sweet sour hot and spicy drinking food. Chad Thai is the closest thing we've found to Pok Pok in Vancouver and they do it very well. I...More
We come here every couple of months and are never disappointed. The food is great, and being gluten free, I can easily have their green curry and pad Thai (my favorites). As I don't like eggplant, they substitute other vegetables for me. Service is always...More
The food is very tasty. Authentic spices and the flavors incredible. We had Cashew Chicken and the Red Curry Penang. We had some leftovers. The prices are reasonable. We got seated right away, but no one waited on us for at least 20 min. They...More
It’s been a number of years since my last visit to Chad Thai in the Burnaby Heights area… mainly because I wasn’t really thrilled with the food the first time around. However, finding us in the area on a rainy Sunday with a hankering for...More
We visited early on New Years Eve. Busy, but we found a table and it’s not a big place. Service was friendly and helpful. We shared dishes to experience a greater variety of flavours. All the dishes we superb. You can adjust the spice level...More
This time visiting this small restaurant on Hastings and won't be my last. Visited during the last heat wave only to discover that they didn't have air but that didn't stop us from feasting. We went for the green curry fried rice and ground pork...More
The best Massaman that I’ve had since Thailand. Brought another friend that spent time in Thailand for her favourite dish Khao Soi. She wouldn’t stop thanking me for bringing her there. Another friend loves the Tom Yum soup there. Great lunch special and the owner...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4848003-Reviews-Chad_Thai-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Chaise Lounge,"Great spot to meet friends for casual dining! I love the patios (both front and back). Staff are friendly and the drinks are cold. Definitely one of my ""go to"" places on Main Street.
We went with friends for lunch. My wife had the Beef burger with fries and I had the Spanakopita with tzatziki and a side Greek salad. Both tasty, yummy and good. Service was good and attentive.
Server got order wrong. Food was served on a badly chipped plate. When it was replated I lost half my fries. Shame as grilled cheese was good.
We enjoy Chaise for comfort foods, great prices and great service. We went with friends. My wife had a Classic Hamburger with fries and I had the Salmon Burger with Chicken Soup. Both were very good, tasty and yummy. Service was great.
My wife had wings and a house salad. Both were great. Our friend and I had omelettes with side salad, avocado, toast, and unlimited coffee refills. Service by Morgan was just great - friendly, attentive, and helpful. Nice sitting in the shade with an umbrella...More
We went in before the Vancouver Canadians Game. We had a patio table. Beautiful weather. I had the lamb, with grilled vegetables and potatoes. My wife had a Cobb salad and chicken wings. Great service by Francine.
So many of our regular lunch places aren't open at lunch time any longer unfortunately, we decided to try something new. Chaise Lounge was unpretentious and busy. Wonderful vibe, very true to the neighbourhood around it. The restaurant was mostly full, and a few folks...More
I will say I come here often as I live in the neighborhood and I love to support local businesses however I am always appalled at how horrible the service is. I am always asking for another drink, hardly ever does the server ask if...More
Great food and beverage and service. Good Times for all. Food excellent and always tasty. Stop friendly and never make you wait for a beverage
This local bar and eatery on Main St had good comfort foods and a very eclectic menu. Prices are reasonable. Service is good. My wife had the burger and I had the Corned Beef Sandwich with the Chicken Soup of the day. Our friends had...More
We stopped in for lunch and had beers, catfish po' boy, and a Caesar salad with shrimp. The food was quite good, staff was helpful, and the place was all decked out for Halloween!
Huge portions Friendly servers Tvs small Definitely come back Love it Clean bathrooms Good taps Menu super dsecriptive
Great food and beverage with exceptional service. Menu knowledge good and recommendations were excellent.
This place service is hit and miss. Sometimes the service is okay. Sometimes it’s absolutely borderline terrible. One server. Pretty rude. And blunt. Absolutely no sense of hurmor and we took it to the manager. Seriously. Chill girl. When your patron SAYS EXCUSE ME MISS,...More
Contrary to what you might think, Chaise on Main isn’t a furniture store where you can find an assortment of lounge chairs… it’s actually an eatery in the Riley Park area of Vancouver with a gastropub concept. It does have a bit of a bar...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2173367-Reviews-Chaise_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chambar,"I’m writing this from the restaurant right after finishing dessert. This place is out of this world. Amazing food. From the shrimp scampi and Moroccan venison to the curry vegetable and beef brochettes. The Pavlova for dessert, amazing. To go with it fantastic French Rose....More
Three of us stopped here for a Saturday brunch. We found the place to be quite busy as would be expected. The selections on the menu are quite eclectic. My guests seemed to really enjoy their food. I wanted something light so ordered the granola...More
We did the ""dine around Vancouver menu"" it was fantastic. Server Connor was really entertaining. Second time was just off the menu and it was also very, very good.
I read good news about this place and decided we would brunch at Chambar. We had made a reservation, and upon arrival was allocated a not so nice table. I requested another table and the hostess was most unaccomodating to the extent I requested to...More
We had a excellent diner with all my Management team in midland for X'mas dinner at the Chambar , location is fantastic , just a short walk from the sky train station , it is my flavour place for business meeting and dining , I...More
Can’t say enough good things about our experience and service at Chambar. My girlfriend and I were visiting for the weekend from Victoria. I booked the table online and provided a small note that it was our anniversary, and they went above and beyond our...More
This restaurant is our favourite in Vancouver Cham-bar none. The muscles, the wine, the staff and of course TJ what can we say….we were treated like family from the moment we arrived!!! Again!!???Amazing! Loved everything about the place. Six people$220?? Unbelievable value! Best time ever....More
My wife and I have been coming here on a regular basis for brunch on Saturdays for over ten years (apart from the COVID interruption)... and marvel at how wonderful this is. The Ratatouille and Shakshuka are wonders - a veritable ""party in your mouth""......More
This restaurant was recommended to us by a local. Reservations booked, welcoming was friendly, the setting nice and the service as expected. However, food (still core business) did not live up to our expectations. We chose the veal & calamares as main course. Food was...More
Went here for dinner slow service disinterrsted staff and over cooked food. The worst restaurant. How they stay in business is beyond me terrible restaurant.
Lovely dinner at Chambar, meals are a bit overcomplicated but quite tasty, wine selection is okish and service is average. The real deal was the pleasant and relaxing atmosphere.
Lovely patio for an outside dinner. Service was fine. Food was maybe a bit too complicated, erring on interesting over subtle. Glad we dined here nevertheless.
Absolutely fabulous meals and our server Dylan was top notch! Food was run out hot and fast! Highly recommend Chambar and their server Dylan she’s lovely.
Nice ambience. Good food. Great selection of belgian beers. Food portions are generous. Staff is attentive.
There were mice Running around both inside and outside on the terrasse. We were several people noticing and we made the nice waitor aware to which the reply was that they know, unfortunately these mice are impossible to keep out! It was clear that this...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703130-Reviews-Chambar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Charlie's Little Italian,"We were looking for a local place for dinner we hadn't been to before and we decided to try Charlie's. We had two other couples with us on a Friday night. We had a nice booth, the server was excellent, the atmosphere had a great...More
The crispy baked Brussels sprouts with bacon .. ammerinth... parmesan.. . Followed by their fettuccini carbonara with fresh pancetta... was insanely delish .. they gave us complimentary coffee flavoured gelato ... which we complimented with 2 beautifuls... yummy ...just food happiness ! ❤
This restaurant was one of the highlights of our trip to Vancouver, the fresh pasta is incredible, appetizers were shockingly delicious and the dessert was borderline a sexual experience. Our waiter Colm was a hoot and the chef Sarah, on top of being talented was...More
Charlie's Little Italian is a solid place to eat for breakfast, brunch and dinner. I have been a handful of times and I can say it has never blown me way, but also never disappointed me either. It's just a good vibe with decent food,...More
Brilliant place to visit. Very moody and brilliant food. Myself and my wife visited and had 3 courses each and all courses were fantastic. They do local beer also which is an added bonus
wow, what a great discovery! Had dinner with a friend and was greatly impressed with the quality of the food. We had an arugula salad, which was very fresh and had pine nuts and a good pecorino cheese with a citrus vinaigrette and LOVED the...More
AMAZING food we go for the vegan benny its so nice it would be great to see them incorporate more things on the menu that are vegan. We also had hot chocolate that was vegan friendly and nice and hot on a cold fall day....More
We had calamari appy, pizza and Osso Bucco, so can only speak for these. Pizza had excellent toppings but the dough was frozen dough level. Sorry- see the photo. Osso bucco was more like rissoto with a bit of meat (rissoto was good, meat could've...More
We had brunch here on Sunday. Vegan and vegetarian options are available for your ""special"" friends that want a vegan hollandaise...whatever that is. The fennel sausage was tasty...not too salty or greasy. Cute atmosphere and very friendly and positive service. For the brunch menu, it...More
This restaurant is a hole in the wall but the food is very good. It has a small menu so they seem to focus on doing a few things really well. We had the arancini balls to start. They had an interesting orange flavour which...More
In a city overrun with restaurants of all stripes, our meals tonight stood out from the fray of over 40 years of dining internationally. With little pretence in style, a family-friendly pretentious-free decor presents a caring and professional staff. But it all takes a back-stage...More
Everything was absolutely delicious. To start I had a really good aperol spritzer. And for dinner we had the special of the night, was a roast beed with mash potatoes, mushrooms and a cherry sauce on top... was so tasty and good. The service was...More
Stopped here on $10 pasta night. Four of us had pasta - all excellent, one pizza and one salad - both good. Great atmosphere. High chair for our grandson was no problem. Service excellent. Bruschetta very tasty. Local craft draft beers good. Worth a visit!...More
We were staying nearby and went in without any expectation - it simply looked nice. We thoroughly enjoyed our evening and the meal. There was something for everyone (some of us are a bit picky). It happened to be Sangria night - so we ordered...More
We loved Charlie's, got pasta dishes & garlic bread twice we were there, so yummy both times, they do pasta dishes for $10 on a Tuesday & pizza for $10 on a Monday & other specials the rest of week, really worth eating in, very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4816032-Reviews-Charlie_s_Little_Italian-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chef Hung Taiwanese Beef Noodle,"Two of us had the A2 beef shank, flat noodles with clear soup and one other with spicy soup. Our remaining friend ordered A1 beef brisket in clear soup with vermicelli noodles. The noodle was perfectly cooked. As appetizers we had the marinated beef wrap...More
Two of us had the A2 beef shank, flat noodles with clear soup and one other with spicy soup. Our remaining friend ordered A1 beef brisket in clear soup with vermicelli noodles. The noodle was perfectly cooked. As appetizers we had the marinated beef wrap...More
It is one of the best well know Taiwanese Beef noodle in mainland , due to the Covid19 lot of their location is permanently closed , this location is the best above all , they open from 11.30am to 6.30pm in weekday , Fri and...More
It is one of the best well know Taiwanese Beef noodle in mainland , due to the Covid19 lot of their location is permanently closed , this location is the best above all , they open from 11.30am to 6.30pm in weekday , Fri and...More
Went to have dinner with my family together with my 2 grandchildren ages 2 & 4 years old. My son in law recommended this place because it gained good reviews, I would say that the food is bland, not that impressive except that you have...More
Went to have dinner with my family together with my 2 grandchildren ages 2 & 4 years old. My son in law recommended this place because it gained good reviews, I would say that the food is bland, not that impressive except that you have...More
We visited this place for late lunch, it was fairly quiet. The ambient is nice, it is situated in Aberdeen centre, Richmond, easy access by skytrain and ample parking if you chose to drive. The service was quite fast. We had beef pancake, black fungus,...More
We visited this place for late lunch, it was fairly quiet. The ambient is nice, it is situated in Aberdeen centre, Richmond, easy access by skytrain and ample parking if you chose to drive. The service was quite fast. We had beef pancake, black fungus,...More
If you want a good beef noodle place, give this place a miss. We tried different varients of the beef noodles, and we found the beef to be scarce, very chewy and rubbery. Getting anything took a while, and we had to constantly ask. For...More
If you want a good beef noodle place, give this place a miss. We tried different varients of the beef noodles, and we found the beef to be scarce, very chewy and rubbery. Getting anything took a while, and we had to constantly ask. For...More
Pretty good beef noodles. Very tender meat. Flavourful soup. Noodles just the right amount of chewy.
Pretty good beef noodles. Very tender meat. Flavourful soup. Noodles just the right amount of chewy.
I tried this place before and I think the noodles was much bigger. But I still like the soup and it’s noodles. They are good. The soup doesn’t taste like msg. And the noodles are cooked perfectly....not too soft. The appetizers on the other hand...More
I tried this place before and I think the noodles was much bigger. But I still like the soup and it’s noodles. They are good. The soup doesn’t taste like msg. And the noodles are cooked perfectly....not too soft. The appetizers on the other hand...More
Stopped here for the lunch at the request of my son. We go to the food court in Aberdeen semi regularly but he wanted something a little different. It was a decent visit. We were there right at noon so we got the last open...More
Stopped here for the lunch at the request of my son. We go to the food court in Aberdeen semi regularly but he wanted something a little different. It was a decent visit. We were there right at noon so we got the last open...More
I’ve been wanting to try this place for a long time. We went to the Aberdeen centre location on a weekday for lunch. Décor was very nice & it was great that the kitchen was in full sight where you can see the dumplings being...More
I’ve been wanting to try this place for a long time. We went to the Aberdeen centre location on a weekday for lunch. Décor was very nice & it was great that the kitchen was in full sight where you can see the dumplings being...More
Fantastic! I recommend any noodle soups but you have to try their fried chicken. Yum! I recommend the sit down restaurants as oppose to the food court stalls.
Fantastic! I recommend any noodle soups but you have to try their fried chicken. Yum! I recommend the sit down restaurants as oppose to the food court stalls.
Had the shrimp and pork dumplings which were excellent. The beef noodle soup was a generous size and full of great tasting noodles and beef. We ordered white wine but it was not cold so we had to settle for tea. Service very professional and...More
Had the shrimp and pork dumplings which were excellent. The beef noodle soup was a generous size and full of great tasting noodles and beef. We ordered white wine but it was not cold so we had to settle for tea. Service very professional and...More
Beef in clear broth was good. It doesn't taste like there's any MSG, which is why I was a regular customer there once a week for almost a year. One day, I went there after an exhausting medical treatment, tired I somehow thought I was...More
Beef in clear broth was good. It doesn't taste like there's any MSG, which is why I was a regular customer there once a week for almost a year. One day, I went there after an exhausting medical treatment, tired I somehow thought I was...More
I really enjoy Chef Hung Beef Noodles and of course I ordered the award winning beef noodle soup, which was delicious. The restaurant was comfortable enough with clean interior and good service. I also like the cold dishes too - the beancurd skin appetizer is...More
I really enjoy Chef Hung Beef Noodles and of course I ordered the award winning beef noodle soup, which was delicious. The restaurant was comfortable enough with clean interior and good service. I also like the cold dishes too - the beancurd skin appetizer is...More
This Taiwanese noodle place is situated on the second floor in Aberdeen Mall. We went with friend from another country on a week day. The place was quiet and pleasant and we could comfortably enjoy our noodles and catch up on old times. Their beef...More
This Taiwanese noodle place is situated on the second floor in Aberdeen Mall. We went with friend from another country on a week day. The place was quiet and pleasant and we could comfortably enjoy our noodles and catch up on old times. Their beef...More
The depth of flavor in the soup is lacking, tastes are just like a average chain store in Taiwan. The smoky flavors of the thin sliced beef is a plus but that's it. Noodles a chewy and has body. I think the championship award puts...More
The depth of flavor in the soup is lacking, tastes are just like a average chain store in Taiwan. The smoky flavors of the thin sliced beef is a plus but that's it. Noodles a chewy and has body. I think the championship award puts...More
Staff was courteous and helpful. We were allowed to share dishes. Some dishes are spicey but very good
Staff was courteous and helpful. We were allowed to share dishes. Some dishes are spicey but very good
I hadn’t been here for a few years. We came here because I was in the neighborhood. I brought a picky eater here for lunch and she was impressed with the braised beef tendon and shank noodle soup. The beef was tender and soup was...More
I hadn’t been here for a few years. We came here because I was in the neighborhood. I brought a picky eater here for lunch and she was impressed with the braised beef tendon and shank noodle soup. The beef was tender and soup was...More
I'm a long time customer of Chef Hung since 5/6 years ago when they first opened their doors. Their transition into online order is all round bad. This happened TWICE already using the same delivery service with the same restaurant (Chef Hung West Vancouver). Here...More
I'm a long time customer of Chef Hung since 5/6 years ago when they first opened their doors. Their transition into online order is all round bad. This happened TWICE already using the same delivery service with the same restaurant (Chef Hung West Vancouver). Here...More
My parents favourite noodle place. Owners are so friendly and nice. Dumplings are out of this world. Go here and enjoy
My parents favourite noodle place. Owners are so friendly and nice. Dumplings are out of this world. Go here and enjoy
Excellent drop in with friends. The noodle sizes vary but I chose the large noodles. It can be a difficult meal to manage if you are not used to using chopsticks. Staff are very attentive and the service was grand.
Excellent drop in with friends. The noodle sizes vary but I chose the large noodles. It can be a difficult meal to manage if you are not used to using chopsticks. Staff are very attentive and the service was grand.
I love the atmosphere in this restaurant and the youthful, very efficient staff. I really enjoy their hot and sour soup and dumplings.
I love the atmosphere in this restaurant and the youthful, very efficient staff. I really enjoy their hot and sour soup and dumplings.
We went here on the recommendation of our Vancouver relatives. The noodle dishes come with a variety of beef, vegetables, and chicken dishes. Very large portions are given. Also feature bubble tea. Excellent taste.
We went here on the recommendation of our Vancouver relatives. The noodle dishes come with a variety of beef, vegetables, and chicken dishes. Very large portions are given. Also feature bubble tea. Excellent taste.
Authentic noodles...we had the pork/spicy noodles and the braised beef noodles. Both excellent, comfort food. Broth was fresh tasting. Fungus dish as a side probably the highlight. Excellent, attentive service, moderate price.
Authentic noodles...we had the pork/spicy noodles and the braised beef noodles. Both excellent, comfort food. Broth was fresh tasting. Fungus dish as a side probably the highlight. Excellent, attentive service, moderate price.
Love this place. It’s probably my parents favourite noodle spot. Whenever I’m in town they mention Chef Hungs at least once. Tomato would with thick noodles is their fav. And holy smokies this pork fried dumplings will rock your world
Love this place. It’s probably my parents favourite noodle spot. Whenever I’m in town they mention Chef Hungs at least once. Tomato would with thick noodles is their fav. And holy smokies this pork fried dumplings will rock your world
I come here once every couple of months and wow its great. The soups have lots of interesting ingredients and wonderful flavour. If you come here, you absolutely need to get the shaved ice, its amazing!
I come here once every couple of months and wow its great. The soups have lots of interesting ingredients and wonderful flavour. If you come here, you absolutely need to get the shaved ice, its amazing!
TERRIBLE NEW MANAGEMENT - this used to be the go to place for my kids to eat after skiing or any type of extracurricular activity. Management and staff has completely changed. The place is somber when you go in. Staff is completely different and when...More
TERRIBLE NEW MANAGEMENT - this used to be the go to place for my kids to eat after skiing or any type of extracurricular activity. Management and staff has completely changed. The place is somber when you go in. Staff is completely different and when...More
If looking for beef noodle soup this is the place. I chose A2 - Champion beef brisket with my choice of thin noodle in clear soup. It tasty fresh and healthy. My dinner friend chose A3 champion braised beef also thin noodle in tomato soup....More
If looking for beef noodle soup this is the place. I chose A2 - Champion beef brisket with my choice of thin noodle in clear soup. It tasty fresh and healthy. My dinner friend chose A3 champion braised beef also thin noodle in tomato soup....More
The walls are plastered with many awards that this restaurant has won, and for good reason. The Taiwanese beef noodle soup is outstanding, with hand pulled noodles with real texture made the old fashioned way. The beef in the dishes is amazingly tender and spiced...More
The walls are plastered with many awards that this restaurant has won, and for good reason. The Taiwanese beef noodle soup is outstanding, with hand pulled noodles with real texture made the old fashioned way. The beef in the dishes is amazingly tender and spiced...More
The menu has lots of items, but really, people come for a bowl of soup. Chef Hung's versions put Pho to shame- richly flavoured not too salty base and genuine chunks of beef rather than thin slices. Some veggies added in, all over your noodle...More
The menu has lots of items, but really, people come for a bowl of soup. Chef Hung's versions put Pho to shame- richly flavoured not too salty base and genuine chunks of beef rather than thin slices. Some veggies added in, all over your noodle...More
I ordered the 5 vegetable with beef brisket and noodle soup. It should read 5 pieces of vegetables. My piece of cabbage was 1"" x 1"" x 1/16"" in size. The carrot was 1"" x 1/2"". The piece of broccoli was about 1.25"" x 1.25""....More
I ordered the 5 vegetable with beef brisket and noodle soup. It should read 5 pieces of vegetables. My piece of cabbage was 1"" x 1"" x 1/16"" in size. The carrot was 1"" x 1/2"". The piece of broccoli was about 1.25"" x 1.25""....More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2365618-Reviews-Chef_Hung_Taiwanese_Beef_Noodle-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Cheshire Cheese Inn,"Since the pandemic, I have not felt as safe in the Cheese Inn. The cook frequently comes out of the kitchen to glad-hand the patrons, without wearing a mask. The bartender only wears a mask half way on her face. The patrons are allowed to...More
My partner all but insisted we go here for dinner. I was skeptical, but agreed. We has the Wellard burger and Cottage. The burger was outstanding and the cottage pie was very good. Service was very good. Parking was easy to find on side street....More
good pub food, excellent beer. it is a fantastic place, took the girlfriend there after the beach for some tasty food and drinks.
I believe the Inn is now under new management and it is a great place to eat, drink and relax. The staff were friendly and helpful, the first night we had Jacob and the second Holly looked after us. They have succeeded in providing an...More
Unfortunately the Chesire Cheese Inn is no more. Another victim of high rentals and overtaxation by the city of Vancouver's policy of having high tax rates for businesses. Sorry to see it go!
We love heading to the Cheshire Cheese Inn when comfort food is in order. Every Sunday you can count on a marvellous turkey dinner; other nights offer delightful choices. If your are a calves liver enthusiast, you have come to the right place! Crispy onions...More
Boo..... why do u ask that i say this...... well.... a few days ago my fellow friend asked me to go to the chesire cheese for a snack and my first thought was .. the chesire cheese? and it wasnt positive .....
Great food, friendly people. Visited often when in town for courses. Daily specials are delicious, the environment is pleasant. Very inviting.
The owner of the house we are staying in recommend that we try the Cheshire Cheese Inn for a meal. After traveling all day then unpacking we where getting a bit hungry, so we walked around to the Cheddar Cheese Inn. I started with Curry...More
Extremely disappointed with a recent visit, especially since I'd heard good reports on the food etc. However, no one approached us to seat us for 20mins past our booking time and didn't even come to explain the delay to the queue waiting. Seemed crazy that...More
We usually stop by the Cheshire Cheese Inn when we are in the Dunbar area. First off, it is a true neighbourhood pub with specials and really good service. However, when they’re busy though, they might forget your water but never your beer : )...More
Warm friendly atmosphere and delightful service combined with absolutely delicious food and drink at reasonable prices make this pub a ""must experience "" in my book. Despite being quite full we were served quite quickly by a cheerful and helpful waitress. Will definitely visit again.
This neighbourhood pub is very reminiscent of an English pub. The servings were substantial, service was friendly. Good fun if you're in the mood for pub fare.
We arrived in Vancouver and while waiting for our holiday rental to be cleaned, had lunch at this place. The omelette was wonderful, as was the soup. We also used the free Wi-Fi .One evening I had the tasty fish pie and all the food...More
We're regulars in Vancouver from the UK and always try this place as it's just a block away. Service is consistently good and whilst the British food isn't 100% authentic it's a damn good effort. Any UK visitors be warned- Expect to pay £8 a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1877701-Reviews-Cheshire_Cheese_Inn-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chewies Smoke and Oyster Bar - Kitsilano,"I went to this restaurant for brunch on last Sunday , food very good , crispy seafood crepes was the best of the best , crabs and lobster benedict also so good , biscuits little bit hard but the flavors made up for the mistakes,...More
The newly inaugurated brunch at Chewies offers 23 options . So a great array, I had the prawn & scallops at 20 $ with salad with coconut with spicy dipping Recommended s fuller
Chewies in Kitsilano is now the only Chewies location, after it closed down its Coal Harbour restaurant on April 9th with a big bash and oyster shucking competition. Fresh oysters are in good supply in Kits and well shucked by friendly bartenders like Cory, Jer,...More
I had had a fairly substantial brunch/ lunch & wanted just a few culinary treats to add to my Saturday eating out experience. Fresh oysters always come to mind when I think treats &, as Chewies — on the corner of Yew & First Ave...More
Chewies— the oyster bar — in Kits, which I first started frequenting. when it opened circa 12 years ago when it started in 2011, has staff T-shirts, which read Shucked by a Gentleman. This gentlemanly attitude extends across the place, including the kitchen, which is...More
Chewies, the New Orleans-Style Oyster Bar on Yew Street in Kitsilano, just up from Kits Beach, has a great long bar behind which bartenders give good welcome & service, often shucking oysters at a good pace, alongside tending to the liquid requirements of guests. It...More
Chewies has a great menu and great food, but the service last night was terrible. I went to watch the NFL game (great sports bar) and we had to get the server's attention numerous times for service. The restaurant wasn't busy, so the server should...More
The weather in Vancouver is warming up & yesterday there was a warmth that called out for oysters & beer. Chewies Smoke & Oyster Bar in Kitsilano on Yew, just up a block from the beach, is the place to go to answer that call....More
Wish I could comment on the food - but I can’t. We were seated by a nice host at 6:45 in a nice corner location. 20 minutes passed and we were not even so much as acknowledged by any of the servers (there were 3)...More
Greeted by the oyster van pulling up as it opened, as fresh as could be. Excellent and knowledgeable service on oysters and beers - it's a must visit stop! (Happy hour is not to be missed)
I had not been to Chewies Smoke & Oyster Bar for some time, albeit I had enjoyed my previous visits & indeed in previous years written favorable reviews whenever I ate there. I came across a Chewies card which said “come in for oysters on...More
we have been here a few times, on date or with family, for happy hours or dinners. Every time we are very satisfied with the atmospher, the food, the drink and of course the premium oysters. Surprised to see comments re racist staff. We never...More
Apparently Todd the waiter decided to be condescending and make fun of us being from Saskatchewan on Saturday, right to our face. We have more class than him and still left a 20% tip for the staff. Good place if you don’t get Todd as...More
This place seems so perfect but it did not deliver on this particular night. Was our first time there for a date night with my wife and the night started out okay. The staff were awesome, they took our orders fairly fast, we had our...More
This restaurant served me food with hair in it and the servers told me to deal with it. The manager was of no help and is super racist. Wouldn't recommend to support this racist business.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2655077-Reviews-Chewies_Smoke_and_Oyster_Bar_Kitsilano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chewies Steam and Oyster Bar,"Family event, 12 of us, made a reservation for brunch. Memorable experience from the friendly greeting to excellent service to awesome food. We will be back and recommend others visit.
Chewies in Kits — corner Yew & 1st — can be seen by oyster lovers as a beacon along the cluster of eateries on the Yew food strip, metaphorically signaling that incredibly fresh & expertly sucked oysters are available in abundance. Better still, its Beach...More
Great to learn of the happy hour, and able to have shared plates. Menu was ample to choose from. Oysters were fresh. Service was calm and attentive without any stress despite closing on the happy hour, much appreciated. When the bill arrived, our last wine...More
We were seated for lunch. The restaurant was not busy and the wait staff ignored us for over 15 mins. We never got a menu or were able to make an order. It was obvious that the wait staff were more concerned about talking amongst...More
We stopped in for some Oysters and a beer during happy hour. There were a number of servers on staff and on large business party and a couple of other tables. No one else arrived while we were there. We were quickly seated but then...More
We were lucky to score 2 seats at the bar. Here, we saw up close the gentlemen behind the bar and how they all seemed to like each other, enjoy what they do and where they’re at. What about the food? We had gumbo and...More
Had an amazing time chillin and enjoying drinks and oysters on a hot summer afternoon. Friendly people and a good choice of oysters
Great place. Oysters could not have been fresher. And inexpensive too. Try their local lager, so good. Easy to write a review and simply say from start to finish all was great. Staff were over the top friendly. Food was awesome.
In all fairness the white wine seafood bowl was quite good (hence the two stars) but otherwise the Monday evening experience was pretty much a disaster. Pan seared salmon (with wild rice) would be expected to have a bit of flavour and texture - at...More
We ate oysters here during happy hour (lower prices). They were excellent. The staff were friendly and efficient. We sat at the bar so we could watch the staff shucking the oysters. The prices were good. We will definately return on our next Vancouver trip.
Like so many restaurants the kitchen was short staffed and over worked. The good news is the food was excellent. The fried chicken and grits was as good as it gets. I hope management is properly rewarding the limited kitchen staff for their efforts.
Very good ambiance and service. Food is good mostly for oysters. I found Ribs not very tender but tasted good. Nice place for happy hours
Great food and service. My husband and I went here for dinner. The fried chicken, shrimp and grits, buttermilk biscuits, and charbroil oysters were delicious. The chicken by itself was unseasoned but with hot sauce and the honey butter it does not need it.
As a resident of Kitsilano, this is the only bar I can stomach more than one visit a week to. Awesome vibe, great menu, excellent rotating range of beers and the staff are fantastic. I love visiting this place and do it often. Culture of...More
Could be one of the most legit happy hours in the Waterfront area. This place gets loud and busy at night, hoppin’ as they say. Not my scene after long days at the conference centre. BUT, I was by early during happy hour and I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8085051-Reviews-Chewies_Steam_and_Oyster_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chez Michel Restaurant,"I went here yesterday with four other people, having been there frequently before the new ownership. It was quite a disappointment. None of the five different main courses was either up to the expected level or reflective of the cooking standard in this restaurant previously....More
Chez Michel is under new ownership. Michel has sold the restaurant. We were there for dinner last evening. We had reservations and Linda one of the waitresses acknowledged our presence as she was taking care of customers at a table. An lady came, seated us...More
The venue is superb, not surpassed by any restaurant I’ve visited so far. As is the service, impeccable. But the food itself which used to be on the same plane of excellence, is just not anymore. The quality of the ingredients is still first class....More
We had six different dishes of the menu and they all were outstanding!!! Wine selection outstanding and reasonably priced!!
It is cozy, private with good lighting, yet not too bright. You quickly feel comfortable. Private and not too tight It is a very pleasant place for a dinner with your wife or family great experience The price is also reasonable It is a very...More
Chez Michel continues to excel in food, decor, presentation, cleanliness, and fantastic staff. I have never been disappointed with anything...the menu is superb, the wine list is terrific, and the ambience is perfection! White table cloths, candles, and wonderful French music are the norm, as...More
Chez Michel is a treasure! The food, the ambience and the service are 10 out of 10. Every dish is beautifully presented and prepared as it would be in France. The service is impeccable and the menu extensive. The escargot and the Chez Michel appetizer...More
We went for a nice dinner at 6 PM on Saturday without reservations and were able to get in. The service was very fast; almost too fast. The food was well presented but not as tasty as we would’ve expected. The salad we had was...More
Wow ! I totally forgot this great French place ,it is awhile since my last visit , it is on a busy Marine Drive ,is on the second floor ,very narrow stairs , the dinning room very big ,but ambiance and atmosphere very cozy and...More
Excellent service. Food was ready for pickup when we arrived. Excellent meal with several little extra touches which added to the enjoyment. Will be back
Over the years, I’ve come to really appreciate good French restaurants more and more. So when we found ourselves on the North Shore in early November, we decided to pop into Chez Michel. Located on the 2nd floor, this cozy eatery didn’t disappoint. Our meals...More
Have not been there for many years and was nice to see that both the service and food and stood the test of time!
Chez Michel restaurant has been in business for over 40 years which says a lot about the consistent quality of food and service. Very few restaurants stay in business for that many years. The owner, Michel, is a constant figure in his restaurant and ensures,...More
We were kindly taken to dinner here by a British couple we met cruising some years ago. You climb up the steep stairs and come to a compact room crowded mostly with old women. So old that I wondered how they made stairs, but was...More
We always have a nice meal there. Wine by the glass is expensive, but that s the norm these days. Service always very good and the host very expansive. No view because of the building opposite. Have been there many times so that says enough...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d763090-Reviews-Chez_Michel_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chi Modern Vietnamese Kitchen & Bar,"4 of us went to Chi for a real feast. Only 1 person in our party was Vegan who has to pick from a small menu when we go out, so it was her turn. The ambience is very cool and the people are very...More
Delicious and creative food, drinks that equally impressed us and fantastic service. We literally walked out of the restaurant and started telling strangers passing on the sidewalk that they should check it out. Amazing!
Hello, I am sorry to write this view but i had to share my experience. I went to delivery to your restaurant Saturday 05/20. I entered restaurant as usual i was told they will check and back to me. They asked me to wait outside....More
Good choice for Vegans. As my host was a Vegan I went in to give it a try. My host ordered for us except for the drinks. Very flavorful food. Fresh and tasty. Infact I liked it. Good ambience and service. Worth trying
On business in Vancouver and couldn't get a reservation at recommended restaurants. Asked the guards at the museum of anthropology who recommended this restaurant, said that it was worth the drive. Well, that was the understatement of the year! This restaurant was beyond fantastic, it...More
The food was good, however the meat substitute was too much like the living thing and so put my partner off her dinner. We only went once due to this.
Now called Chi Vegan, this restaurant is 100% plant-based with delicious, authentic and exciting Asian dishes. This is one of my favourite restaurants in Vancouver!! The drinks and ambience make it an awesome spot for dates. I can’t recommend this place enough. My top picks...More
One of the best Vietnamese restaurants in Vancouver. You don’t need to be vegan or vegetarian to enjoy the foods at Chi! The Bun Cha Ca is the best I’ve had, and it’s not even real fish!! Had this as take out to my office,...More
One of my favourite restaurants in Vancouver, every dish is well thought out and delicious! Chi the owner is a delight to chat to and so passionate about her business. The turmeric fish is a high light but no dishes we’ve tried have been a...More
Best vegan in town! Everything is done with lots of passion. Just close your eyes and pick from the menu. My favorite... veggie roll and bun Vietnamese.
Where should I start? The food is so delicious that we visited Chi Restaurant twice in a week. Chi is the name of the chef and she is so adorable. She took the time to discuss with us about the food and her inspiration. We...More
Came here a couple of weeks ago for some vegan food and was not disappointed! Everything was delicious and the server was super friendly.
Delightful place with amazing vegan food (no bland tofu in sight). The food was flavourful and fresh and the mango cocktail is a MUST have. We loved Chi!
What I love about Dineout is trying new restaurants. We came here with friends and we were warmly greeted by the owner. Not too busy on a Tuesday night but with the fantastic food quality, it should have been! We started off with wagyu beef...More
I was at Chi Modern Vietnamese yesterday for Dine Out Vancouver 2020, because Vietnamese cuisine is one of my favourites. Everything about Chi Modern Vietnamese was excellent, from the clean layout and look of the premise to the super friendly and attentive service to -...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10882451-Reviews-Chi_Modern_Vietnamese_Kitchen_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chickpea Food Truck,"Once I stood in front of the Chickpea truck and waited and waited in the cold for the cook to turn around and notice me. After waiting 5 mins I left. The same thing happened the 2nd time; same cook not looking for customers at...More
I stumbled across this amazing vegan food truck at a huge street fair whilst on holiday this fair had over 200 stalls so attracted quite a crowd as did this truck. I had to wait over 30mins for my food but it was well worth...More
This is the most tasty pita I have ever had. I could eat that everyday. I had the one with sweet potato and eggplant. The whole menu is vegan and there is nice variety. I wish I could try it all!
Definitely its a popular food shop.. I found a long queue of people waiting for the food.! And, had that finally after 20/ 30 minutes on the last day of our Women Deliver conference. Food was good.. salad was great..!
We went to an event at the Van Dusen Garden to hear the Vancouver Chamber Orchestra of the Vancouver Symphony. It was a great evening. Chickpea Food Truck was at the event. My wife and I ordered 2 plates and shared them. We got the...More
If there were an award for food trucks, Chickpea would take it home! This was the very first meal I had in Canada when I arrived last year. Now, every time I'm Downtown, I make sure to stop by and eat some of my favorites....More
was standing in the centre of Vancouver about to start the trek to the chickpea restaurant and turned a corner and saw this food truck. it was like a gift from god (although he doesn't exist). we both ordered platters and it was a huge...More
We had heard about the restaurant and had no idea these guys had a food truck! Great selection to choose from on menu - lots of different vegan protein sources eg. beyond burger, schnitz tofu and many more. We got the platters and for just...More
Stopped at this food truck by chance and had a delicious, healthy lunch. Quite messy so you need to sit down (take extra napkins) but the staff was super friendly and it was very reasonably priced.
I had the kasum pita- Cauliflower with sautéed mushrooms and onions in turmeric and a lemon garlic sauce. Every bite was packed with flavour. It was also a good value at $10. Make sure you have napkins.
Absolutely loved this truck, the food was amazing and tasty. It was quick service and really delicious. We managed to share one between us as they were so big.
Being unfamiliar with the city we just started wandering downtown and happened upon a line of food trucks. I was so excited to find a chickpea truck! I ordered the hummus pita, with a mint lemonade. The pita was HUGE! Definitely worth the money. The...More
I think this place was just OK. The food was quite tasty, large portions, very good value. The service was not very good, like they just couldn't be bothered. I know it is vegan/veggie but the selection was all too similar. I went for dinner...More
I rarely go to food truck but this is one of those comfort food I seek for lunch when I am on my break. They serve up great vegan food and although I am not vegan, I thoroughly enjoy their food. Price is acceptable, and...More
Just stopped here for lunch. You get lots of really tasty food. The hummus is the best we have ever had. The girls on the truck were also delightful! Well worth the visit.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10341075-Reviews-Chickpea_Food_Truck-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chickpea Restaurant,"I love a fully vegan restaurant and this one is no exception. It's such a chill place with a cool vibe and the food is delicious. The portions are huge, so come with a big appetite or something to take your food home in!
Amazing food with complex flavours. Everything tastes fresh and the portions were generous. Some of the best chickpea steak i‘ve ever had!
Had an amazing meal here with family. We ordered a mixture of the breakfast options and they were all delicious in terms of flavour and seasoning. Would recommend to anyone who is looking for something a little bit different. The burgers are amazing, and the...More
A special find on Main Street. Varied veg menu. Large servings. Highly rated. Casual service as very busy.
The plate of food I had in Chickpea was everything I wanted and more! I arrived really hungry (and this is advise I would give to anyone going to Chickpea) so when my crispy fried aubergine platter arrived along with chickpea chips, their legendary hummus,...More
I do like Chickpea and I have to say that I ordered while not thinking clearly due to hunger but want everyone to be warned that the FRENCH TOAST WAS TOO SWEET. Too sweet for even a dessert let alone brunch. I ate less than...More
Ordered delivery from Chickpea two days in a row because they were quite good! I’m not a big vegan/vegetarian restaurant diner, but was introduced to this place by a coworker. I got the ChickCheese sandwich and it really surprised me. The vegan cheese was flavourful...More
The place has good atmosphere, all things considered with COVID separation. And the staff was super-friendly. But here's what disappointed: the most basic items on the menu are pita and hummus, and both were ultra-bland. And I mean ZERO flavour. I suspect the hummus had...More
My wife thought it’d be good to expand our horizons with trying different foods especially restaurants that are vegan. I was a bit apprehensive at first and thought, as long as it tastes good, I’m game. We decided to come here and boy was I...More
I noticed chickpea on Instagram when I was looking for places to eat falafel in Vancouver. I'm a big fan of falafel so I had high expectations when we went there for the brunch. I opted for a pita falafel and a glass of the...More
I ordered from this restaurant through door dash in february. I ordered quite a bit (attached photo). My experience with the food was awful. The amount of oil that I squeezed from a small chickpea fries could fill a cup. The sausages tasted like something...More
Had a lovely brunch at Chick Pea. Casual dining, with very friendly service and delicious food with generous serving sizes. The coffee was also excellent, try the non dairy options for your latte or cappuccino.
An amazing restaurant for great middle eastern food. A must try if you are in Vancouver. We tried many different items on the menu and everything was really good. I will certainly be back.
Unique and very yummy vegan dishes. Great for all types of diets. They have more indulgent dishes and lighter dishes as well. Their all-day breakfast is bomb as well. I recommend getting the Lox Scramble with Benny Sauce and sub the hashbrowns for chickpea fries.
My pet peeve here is that, for some reason, they changed the recipe on the cabbage salad so now it's not gluten free anymore. I really enjoyed this salad, but at least they have lots of other good stuff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12667618-Reviews-Chickpea_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chili Pepper House,"Horrible food, messed up the order, and price is so expensive. Noodles and rice was not cooked properly. Never will go again.
If you like spicy this is the place for you! Fusion of Chinese and Indian food very tasty. If you like your food mild this may not be the place for you but you can specify mild, A very busy place as it is well...More
Still good flavorful food, but disappointed at the terrible service, and the miniscule sized portions compared to past times. Been a fan and supporter of this restaurant like many locals going back years now. Sadly the level of customer service tonight was well below sub...More
They dnt deserve any star. Horrible service and such a useless lady(owner). Her attitude is like she is giving a free food to people.She need to learn some customer service. There are more beautiful places in Vancouver for best food, dnt waste your time, Money...More
I have ate a whole lot of Chinese food and I have to say that when I came here with my son for my Birthday Dinner that I was hooked. I am not into spicy but have to say that the spice level here was...More
I love this place. Indian style Chinese. A match made in heaven. Like everything on the menu but especially like the Hakka chicken chow main. The chili tofu is also excellent.
Our house birthday or anniversary or just crossing Repert on Kingsway , Chilli Pepper is where we have our jurney break. Our family live in downtown, Surrey as well as Downtown Vancouver. we order fish curry, Eggplant, manchurian noodle Vege balls and enjoy it. Good...More
1st.: I called to order for take out, made a note to pick up at 3 pm., but when I get there, the waitress said ""what do you want?"". 2nd.: When time to pay, she said $45, that's it, no bill, not even when I...More
Great tasting Chinese halal option in Vancouver. Prices are decent and portions were good too. Order time was long but well worth the wait. highly recommended if in Vancouver.
This place is excellent, every dish that I’ve tried is bursting with flavour in every bite. Highly recommend the Manchurian Chow Mein! Big portions, reasonable prices, excellent flavours.
Me and my husband has been going to them for years now, almost once a week! That's how much we LOVE their food! They customize to your wants and always deliver amazingly. And that's saying a lot since not only am I from India (moved...More
I used to frequent the surrey location, but stopped since their management changed as the taste was not the same. This was the first time I was trying out the Burnaby location. Parking is a bit of a pain as there are limited spots, however...More
Now a days the Food Taste has gone down... they were best in town... And every thing taste the same.
Very good food! The vegetarian potstickers with garlic sauce was so good! Definitely our favorite. We also enjoyed the masala fried rice and dry green beans.
We visit chilli pepper house at least once in a month as the food here is very delicious and pretty much similar to indian Chinese. My favourite food order every time is seafood fried rice with schezuan sauce and hot and sour soup or sometimes...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1940605-Reviews-Chili_Pepper_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chinatown BBQ,"We decided to walk from the port which was a bad choice as the neighbourhood did not feel that safe on the way to the restaurant. However when we arrived there was a queue outside as they had not yet opened - we took this...More
Wow! Delicious BBQ pork, soy chicken, and oyster gai lan (Chinese broccoli), along with hot lychee tea and super friendly service from Bobby and Ian! We highly recommend this Vancouver Chinatown gem!
I would give them 3E ratting. That is, excellent service, excellent taste, excellent quality. While waiting for food, you will notice the people who work there move around very fast to bring out food, cleaning tables for the next customers. The taste was excellent, just...More
It is very difficult to eat alone in a Chinese restaurant - the meals are meant for sharing, but I was walking past a few weeks ago and the decor was so appealing that I could not resist. At the suggestion of the waitress, I...More
Visit here based on review. Foods are delicious. Staff is super friendly. Ordered Roast Pork (great), Bbq pork (too sweet), Bbqduck (great), Jellyfish (good), curry beef brisket (great). Hard to find parking spot. We got parking a few blocks from this place. Took us 12...More
The food was fantastic, with good sized portions and is well priced. The menu is concise but has a good variation on offer. Staff were friendly and courteous. This restaurant has a great vibe!
I surprised my mum and my aunt for a lovely lunch at the China Town BBQ restaurant after their TCM consolation , Because I know mum love her fatty roast pork and Soy Chicken , sadly to say the area is very scruffy and no...More
Fantastic food, probably the best Chinese bbq meats I’ve eaten. Great service - the kitchen was extremely fast and Bobby, our server, was attentive, personable and informative. Excellent food, fantastic service at a fair price - all delivered in a historic cultural setting. We’ll definitely...More
Wondered around Chinatown and found this absolute gem …the experience was overall wonderful. Authentic Chinese BBQ and sides, the staff is great and will guide you to an amazing meal. Very clean and great value. We will absolutely be back ❤️
Very accommodating for last minute family dinner in Vancouver! Staff gave great suggestions on what to order and the perfect amount. Our favorites were the BBQ pork & BBQ duck!
The roast pork, soy chicken and curry beef taste like a piece of nostalgia from my childhood. These dishes are the best I've had in and around Vancouver. Service was great, the retro decor was cool and the food was excellent!
Delicious pork. Quick service. Vegetarian options were good. Staff very friendly and accommodating. Spacious set up.
Our first meal arriving Vancouver last Sunday night. Order 2 items BBQ plate + curry with rice for the 2 of us. The BBQ duck skin is not crispy since it was late in the day, BBQ pork was good. Maybe better if going for...More
Great authentic place for Chinese bbq. The recommended option is to go for a mixed bbq - chicken, duck and pork. The service is friendly and the food tasty. The menu is simple and that adds to the beauty/authenticity of the place. The bbq duck...More
Stopped by to snack on some char siu bbq pork and it was good. Saw the pork and duck hanging in the window and was glad I grabbed some take out. It’s like any other Chinatown where you have some seedy areas within the general...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12961592-Reviews-Chinatown_BBQ-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chipotle Mexican Grill,"The insides of my soft tacos were icy cold and crunchy. Then I realized the beans and corn they served me were still frozen.
Perfect end to a very busy day. 2 x burritos with our choice of filling. Very tasty, very filling. Friendly and helpful staff. Excellent vfm. Highly recommended if you want a very good meal for a very good.
Everything here was inedible. Definitely just fast food too, but they priced everything like it was a real mexican restaurant. The staff just hurried me along picking stuff like I was the employee. Everything was awful.
My son wanted Chipotle for dinner. he ordered it through Uber Eats. It arrived relatively quickly. it was good over all. the portions of their bowls should be a little bigger. Or you need to ordered a side.
Love the chicken burrito, customize your filling. The line moves fast. Good service and fresh ingredients.
When I want a quick bite I often come here for take out. I had a chicken burrito, with black bean, brown rice and all the fixings which just hits the spot when I need something hot and filling that I can walk and eat...More
Basically a fast food place or fast casual. Kind of like a subway concept, with a mexican twist. Ingredients were fresh and tasty. Staff appeared to do a good job following covid rules. Nice for a quick bite.
Chipotle is an outstanding restaurant that provides, fresh, healthy, and delicious food for a reasonable price...there is most often a line up but they are able to handle the crowds quickly
I always look forward to my trips to Vancouver because I get chipotle! I make sure I get my burrito!
I LOVE MEXICAN FOOD . I like it because you can choose and make your favourite Burrito they way you like it . their service is fast and the food great !
One of my go to places for a freshly made, filling carry out meal meaning the burrito wrap. The line may be long at times but the assembly line moves. Ingredients are fresh and tasty and customized to your liking.
Absolutely loved this place. Their burrito bowls are amazing and very filling. Prices are reasonable and the taste is very good. Love to visit them again.
Recently enjoyed burrito bowl here with family while on a trip to Vancouver. Food service and ambience are great.
If you want Quick bite and closer to authentic Mexican, this is the place. Be careful on hot sauce, don't pour all of it. I cannot resist on spicy food even my acid reflux kicks in and bothers me rest of the day. We liked...More
Service was very efficient but not very friendly nor undfriendly either. However the steak bowl was awesome and cheap.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4061607-Reviews-Chipotle_Mexican_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chong Qing,"We ordered pork dumplings, ginger beef, cashew chicken & shrimp fried rice for takeout. Everything was delicious and portions were large, The dumplings were exceptional but be aware that they are under ""pastry"" on the menu, not appetizers.
went here off a TA recommendation and was right on. Lettuce wrap pork was great. had ginger beef, also great and shanghai noodles and green beans with snow peas. all four dishes were very good and very generous. dining room is small but very clean...More
Well over twenty years , they still in business , lot of location in mainland , I find these location is one of the best in food quality and services , small parking lot , dinning room is not that big , but clean ,...More
Terrible. Not at all like it was before. We ordered 4 items and all were inedible; and our takeout order was wrong.
Definitely a spot you need to hit when in Burnaby, quick, tasty, clean, staff are kind and helpful. Get the ginger beef stir fry ! Get the ginger beef stir fry
Vancouver has over 600 Chinese restaurants, but this has got to be one of the best. WQere were in the mood for spicy Szechuan and thi place had some of the best I've had. Very small with mostly loyal locals. Reservations are not required, advised....More
The food here is good and price is reasonable. They do have luncheon specials. We had dinner and had left overs for lunch the next day. It's a small place but the service is fast.
This is my favourite Chinese food anywhere The service is great food fantastic and good value my favourite dish is Mongolian Beef there also have great lunch values We have went here many times before before temperarly moving to Edmonton when I get back it...More
We went with friends for lunch, they have good price menu for Lunch , combination of soup, appetizer and main entree with noodle/ rice , meat & vegetable
They have a quick menu for lunch - choices of a , b or c a is soup , b is appetizer, c is Main course - rice or noodle with meat & vegetable.The a & b & c together is $12.95, just c is...More
For seriously good Szechuan, this is the old standard. The food is always tasty, super fresh, arrives sizzling at the table and the service is super quick. A many many years favorite (going on 25 years), and their other location at commercial and 12th is...More
Our family chose to do takeout and ordered 7 dishes such as honey garlic sparerib, spicy calamari, mixed seafood vegetables. I was slightly surprised to see that food came in those containers you get at the Chinese fast food of 2 choices combos. Let’s put...More
Chongqing was the venue chosen for our lunch recently. We (the usual threesome) arrived about 1 pm, and fortunately, were able to catch one of only two vacant spots available in the restaurant’s small and busy parking lot. The restaurant - though rather small in...More
Generally I like that heat that comes with Szechuan cuisine so we decided to try takeout from Chongqing, I can tell right away that flavours were there. Delivery was super quick. Both duck with plum sauce, and sweet and sour fish were pretty tasty with...More
Their lunch menu is a good deal. Skip the appetiser & soup though and just go with the main course. It's pretty filling already and you can take the rest away if you wish. Prices are reasonable. DO NOT have their Xiao Long Bao. Definitely...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3469599-Reviews-Chong_Qing-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Chongqing,"I stopped here for dinner on the recommendation of my hotel across the street. I ordered shrimp and pea pods. The shrimp was very good, there were few peas pods and lots of the small corn which I don't really like. Service was OK. It...More
I stopped here for dinner on the recommendation of my hotel across the street. I ordered shrimp and pea pods. The shrimp was very good, there were few peas pods and lots of the small corn which I don't really like. Service was OK. It...More
We always enjoy a visit to Chongqing when we are in Vancouver. This time they outdid themselves. Hot and sour soup on point. Partner had the wontons in chili oil and peanut sauce. Can I lick the bowl? Mains were sweet and sour pork, bean...More
We always enjoy a visit to Chongqing when we are in Vancouver. This time they outdid themselves. Hot and sour soup on point. Partner had the wontons in chili oil and peanut sauce. Can I lick the bowl? Mains were sweet and sour pork, bean...More
We canceled our delivery after waiting over 2 hours for a meal that never showed up. Called twice, were lied to that the order was on its way. Waited another 45 minutes for the food to be delivered just 5 blocks from the restaurant. Never...More
We canceled our delivery after waiting over 2 hours for a meal that never showed up. Called twice, were lied to that the order was on its way. Waited another 45 minutes for the food to be delivered just 5 blocks from the restaurant. Never...More
Read reviews here, went to the place... it was not clean or welcoming. Relying on the fact that reviews were good, I decided to order three dishes for takeout. It was a mistake. The food is absolutely appalling... 1. Fried rice with chicken turned out...More
Read reviews here, went to the place... it was not clean or welcoming. Relying on the fact that reviews were good, I decided to order three dishes for takeout. It was a mistake. The food is absolutely appalling... 1. Fried rice with chicken turned out...More
We ordered takeout and found the food to be pretty tasteless. The Dai Ching Chicken was particularly disappointing as it was supposed to be spicy. It was bland and tasteless. We won’t go back.
We ordered takeout and found the food to be pretty tasteless. The Dai Ching Chicken was particularly disappointing as it was supposed to be spicy. It was bland and tasteless. We won’t go back.
Small, unassuming restaurant on Robson Street. Extensive menu of authentic dishes. Huge portions. Prompt and friendly service. We loved it.
Small, unassuming restaurant on Robson Street. Extensive menu of authentic dishes. Huge portions. Prompt and friendly service. We loved it.
Very nice set of meal set. Ordered from the hotel and the pricing was ideal. Quite tasty....well done
Very nice set of meal set. Ordered from the hotel and the pricing was ideal. Quite tasty....well done
The place looks like a hole in the wall. I woman does all the out front work. I got the green pepper steak and Pork Fried Rice. Absolutely the best green pepper steak Ive had in my life. Something about the sauce that's just wonderful....More
The place looks like a hole in the wall. I woman does all the out front work. I got the green pepper steak and Pork Fried Rice. Absolutely the best green pepper steak Ive had in my life. Something about the sauce that's just wonderful....More
Ordered through DoorDash the evening of March 26, 2021 and gave special instructions for the dish ""No onions and No shrimp"". Guess what it came with... both onions and shrimp. So I phoned the restaurant and the guy said contact DoorDash cause it's their fault....More
Ordered through DoorDash the evening of March 26, 2021 and gave special instructions for the dish ""No onions and No shrimp"". Guess what it came with... both onions and shrimp. So I phoned the restaurant and the guy said contact DoorDash cause it's their fault....More
We ordered 3 items for takeout, based on my experience going to the restaurant on Commercial about 30+ years ago. It was a complete disappointment. The MaPo tofu was inedible - Tofu was hard and taste was awful. The dai ching chicken looked nothing like...More
We ordered 3 items for takeout, based on my experience going to the restaurant on Commercial about 30+ years ago. It was a complete disappointment. The MaPo tofu was inedible - Tofu was hard and taste was awful. The dai ching chicken looked nothing like...More
We ordered so much because everything sounded and indeed tasted so good! A nice walk from our hotel (Pan Pacific) to locate this little gem that is hidden in a store front in an okay area but so well worth it! The prices are very...More
We ordered so much because everything sounded and indeed tasted so good! A nice walk from our hotel (Pan Pacific) to locate this little gem that is hidden in a store front in an okay area but so well worth it! The prices are very...More
Back for the first time since 2015, we enjoyed our meal at least as much as we did back then. All three of us had the hot and sour soup, and shared three plates, one full size and the other two half size. That provided...More
Back for the first time since 2015, we enjoyed our meal at least as much as we did back then. All three of us had the hot and sour soup, and shared three plates, one full size and the other two half size. That provided...More
Visiting from Australia and staying just across Robson St. Lovey friendly staff. Food was fresh and full of flavour. A lovey meal.
Visiting from Australia and staying just across Robson St. Lovey friendly staff. Food was fresh and full of flavour. A lovey meal.
I have been one of their regular customer for past 5 years their taste n flavours r very consistent over these years thanks to the team. Service is very professional special thanks to Jeff for ur hospitality.
I have been one of their regular customer for past 5 years their taste n flavours r very consistent over these years thanks to the team. Service is very professional special thanks to Jeff for ur hospitality.
What a pleasant surprise! Called for delivery after choosing from the website. Reasonably priced. Very quick delivery on a Saturday at dinner time. Meal arrived hot and DEELICIOUS! I wish I had a bigger stomach. Best Chinese delivery I've had in decades. Generous portions, fantastic...More
What a pleasant surprise! Called for delivery after choosing from the website. Reasonably priced. Very quick delivery on a Saturday at dinner time. Meal arrived hot and DEELICIOUS! I wish I had a bigger stomach. Best Chinese delivery I've had in decades. Generous portions, fantastic...More
This was my first time at this restaurant, I was visiting Vancouver and this restaurant came highly recommended. The food was very good no doubt. However the servers are not friendly at all. They seem to be in a hurry to serve you and get...More
This was my first time at this restaurant, I was visiting Vancouver and this restaurant came highly recommended. The food was very good no doubt. However the servers are not friendly at all. They seem to be in a hurry to serve you and get...More
We had delivery. It arrived quickly but the food was really disappointing. The deep fried prawns were so over cooked it was almost impossible to cut. The General Tso chicken was also over cooked but edible. The rest of the meal- egg rolls, chicken fried...More
We had delivery. It arrived quickly but the food was really disappointing. The deep fried prawns were so over cooked it was almost impossible to cut. The General Tso chicken was also over cooked but edible. The rest of the meal- egg rolls, chicken fried...More
My friend and I had just landed and Vancouver and wanted to get some food. We happened to walk by this place and went in for lunch. The food portions are INSANE. For two people we definitely ordered too much, but it was really good....More
My friend and I had just landed and Vancouver and wanted to get some food. We happened to walk by this place and went in for lunch. The food portions are INSANE. For two people we definitely ordered too much, but it was really good....More
CHONGQING RESTAURANT Made order to this restaurant and the delivery guy banged and held the bag badly so everything was licking, and even the sauces were opened and spread all over the bag. I called the manager and he was disgusting 🤮 wanted me to...More
CHONGQING RESTAURANT Made order to this restaurant and the delivery guy banged and held the bag badly so everything was licking, and even the sauces were opened and spread all over the bag. I called the manager and he was disgusting 🤮 wanted me to...More
they made us pay twice, first online - second time within 15 minutes - as a member of the family picked the order up; upon relizing that my wife went there and they made her wait for half an hour - and dismisserd her saying...More
they made us pay twice, first online - second time within 15 minutes - as a member of the family picked the order up; upon relizing that my wife went there and they made her wait for half an hour - and dismisserd her saying...More
The food is great. The prices are too. The place is chill. Best ginger beef anywhere. The wontons in red pepper peanut sauce are to die for as are the tan tan noodles. We have tried half their extensive menu over the years and NEVER...More
The food is great. The prices are too. The place is chill. Best ginger beef anywhere. The wontons in red pepper peanut sauce are to die for as are the tan tan noodles. We have tried half their extensive menu over the years and NEVER...More
The food is always flavourful, portions are generous, and the delivery is super prompt – there's been times where I've placed an order and they dropped it off only 12 minutes later! I order directly through the restaurant and the delivery people are very friendly....More
The food is always flavourful, portions are generous, and the delivery is super prompt – there's been times where I've placed an order and they dropped it off only 12 minutes later! I order directly through the restaurant and the delivery people are very friendly....More
Great service, amazing food and good prices. Very friendly and elegant atmosphere with prices anyone can enjoy. Very knowledgeable and friendly staff. Very relaxed, we loved it and will go again.
Great service, amazing food and good prices. Very friendly and elegant atmosphere with prices anyone can enjoy. Very knowledgeable and friendly staff. Very relaxed, we loved it and will go again.
I had lunch with my daughter here during the summer of 2020, smack in the middle of Covid 19. They did everything right. Tables were spaced out and clear glass tops were freshly cleaned. All staff were masked and they brought the contact sheet over...More
I had lunch with my daughter here during the summer of 2020, smack in the middle of Covid 19. They did everything right. Tables were spaced out and clear glass tops were freshly cleaned. All staff were masked and they brought the contact sheet over...More
My partner and I have ordered twice from this restaurant through Skip the Dishes. I decided upon it after doing pretty thorough research into Chinese food on Skip the Dishes and this place seemed to have the best reviews. This is our new go-to Chinese...More
My partner and I have ordered twice from this restaurant through Skip the Dishes. I decided upon it after doing pretty thorough research into Chinese food on Skip the Dishes and this place seemed to have the best reviews. This is our new go-to Chinese...More
First off, I would like to say that I have been ordering from this restaurant for years and really enjoy most of the food. Tonight, however, we decided to try the duck crepes that we used to enjoy enormously in our home the UK. I...More
First off, I would like to say that I have been ordering from this restaurant for years and really enjoy most of the food. Tonight, however, we decided to try the duck crepes that we used to enjoy enormously in our home the UK. I...More
I order pick-up here quite frequently, you really can't beat their Crispy Noodle Beef Chow Mein. It is a very large portion, and they always have it ready within 10 minutes of ordering. This place is always packed with families enjoying an evening out and...More
I order pick-up here quite frequently, you really can't beat their Crispy Noodle Beef Chow Mein. It is a very large portion, and they always have it ready within 10 minutes of ordering. This place is always packed with families enjoying an evening out and...More
We joined family here to have lunch today. We decided on dim sum. Delicious fresh food, light and delicious. Service prompt, clean environment and an easy walk from the sky train station. We will definitely be returning for more delicious lunches.
We joined family here to have lunch today. We decided on dim sum. Delicious fresh food, light and delicious. Service prompt, clean environment and an easy walk from the sky train station. We will definitely be returning for more delicious lunches.
We were in the mood for some spicy Szechuan food and did some research and read some good reviews on Chong Qing Restaurant. It's right on the corner of Commercial Drive and 12th Avenue in Vancouver. There is ample parking behind the restaurant as they...More
We were in the mood for some spicy Szechuan food and did some research and read some good reviews on Chong Qing Restaurant. It's right on the corner of Commercial Drive and 12th Avenue in Vancouver. There is ample parking behind the restaurant as they...More
The Chongqing has the best Sezchuan food in the LM. Don't miss out on their General Tso's Chicken or their Spicy Green Beans. Other favourite dishes are the Hot and Sour Soup, Rainbow Lettuce wrap, and House Vegetable Dish.
The Chongqing has the best Sezchuan food in the LM. Don't miss out on their General Tso's Chicken or their Spicy Green Beans. Other favourite dishes are the Hot and Sour Soup, Rainbow Lettuce wrap, and House Vegetable Dish.",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2519438-Reviews-Chongqing-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Chop Steakhouse & Bar,"I order a drink a martini the waiter said he can make any kind of martini. When I asked for a Chocolate Martini he said he doesn't know how to make flavor martini's. Why would you say you can make any kind of martini. My...More
I order a drink a martini the waiter said he can make any kind of martini. When I asked for a Chocolate Martini he said he doesn't know how to make flavor martini's. Why would you say you can make any kind of martini. My...More
I was in Vancouver for a business trip and had been put up at the Sandman Hotel in Richmond. On The ground floor, attached to the hotel was the Chop Steakhouse & Bar. It is a beautiful looking bar with lots of TVs to watch...More
I was in Vancouver for a business trip and had been put up at the Sandman Hotel in Richmond. On The ground floor, attached to the hotel was the Chop Steakhouse & Bar. It is a beautiful looking bar with lots of TVs to watch...More
We highly recommend this place. The best customer experience in BC and the food is stellar. We visited this place for the first time and loved it. From the moment we got there until we left the whole restaurant team knew how to create a...More
We highly recommend this place. The best customer experience in BC and the food is stellar. We visited this place for the first time and loved it. From the moment we got there until we left the whole restaurant team knew how to create a...More
Food was excellent. Steak and lobster were very good. Service was good and very attentive to our needs. We were given a nice dessert for our anniversary.
Food was excellent. Steak and lobster were very good. Service was good and very attentive to our needs. We were given a nice dessert for our anniversary.
We thoroughly enjoyed our dinner at Chop's Richmond location. We had a reservation and, after registering our vehicle for the free parking, we were seated promptly. My partner and I both ordered from the Dine Out menu. He enjoyed Caesar Salad to start. I had...More
We thoroughly enjoyed our dinner at Chop's Richmond location. We had a reservation and, after registering our vehicle for the free parking, we were seated promptly. My partner and I both ordered from the Dine Out menu. He enjoyed Caesar Salad to start. I had...More
~~ ~ Dine Out Vancouver 2023 #3 ~~~~ This restaurant is one of top premium steakhouse in Vancouver , for top quality in food and in services , very upscale ambiance , WOW ! charming bathroom , you want to stay in forever ! drop...More
~~ ~ Dine Out Vancouver 2023 #3 ~~~~ This restaurant is one of top premium steakhouse in Vancouver , for top quality in food and in services , very upscale ambiance , WOW ! charming bathroom , you want to stay in forever ! drop...More
Excellent restaurant with great steaks and very friendly staff. The food was fresh well prepared and tasty. We had the Rib-eye and a Filet Mignon with baked potatoes. The French onion soup was very hot and tasty. The bathrooms are out of the ordinary. A...More
Excellent restaurant with great steaks and very friendly staff. The food was fresh well prepared and tasty. We had the Rib-eye and a Filet Mignon with baked potatoes. The French onion soup was very hot and tasty. The bathrooms are out of the ordinary. A...More
I really liked the restaurant design and decoration, and the staff is super friendly but the Menu needs to have more options. Drinks are also very well mixed in here and I give 5 stars to the bar itself.
I really liked the restaurant design and decoration, and the staff is super friendly but the Menu needs to have more options. Drinks are also very well mixed in here and I give 5 stars to the bar itself.
Had a medium sized business meal and was provided a private room. Private room was very nice with a round table that allowed for easy conversation! Excellent food with plenty of options.
Had a medium sized business meal and was provided a private room. Private room was very nice with a round table that allowed for easy conversation! Excellent food with plenty of options.
Food is really good, service is always with a smile. Menu doesn't offer much choice (This might have been caused by Covid restriction at the time i was there). My favorite the ribs and the chicken wings. They're worth the trip and the wait. Not...More
Food is really good, service is always with a smile. Menu doesn't offer much choice (This might have been caused by Covid restriction at the time i was there). My favorite the ribs and the chicken wings. They're worth the trip and the wait. Not...More
We were only here because of a cancelled flight but armed with a $90 voucher for dinner we attacked the Chop House and the resulting steaks. The steak was as good as I've had anywhere in some time. The service and side dishes were just...More
We were only here because of a cancelled flight but armed with a $90 voucher for dinner we attacked the Chop House and the resulting steaks. The steak was as good as I've had anywhere in some time. The service and side dishes were just...More
Steak was delicious and the service is exceptional. The only downfall is the temperature of the restaurant was a bit warm
Steak was delicious and the service is exceptional. The only downfall is the temperature of the restaurant was a bit warm
This is my number one Dine Out Vancouver restaurant this year , I ate out a lot of different restaurants during the Dine out 2022 , some restaurants is great some just so so , based on Accuracy Quality , services , clean friendly comfortable...More
This is my number one Dine Out Vancouver restaurant this year , I ate out a lot of different restaurants during the Dine out 2022 , some restaurants is great some just so so , based on Accuracy Quality , services , clean friendly comfortable...More
This was the best steak i have had since a very long time, i loved it. I had the ""Smoked Rib eye"" wowww what a taste. So nice, so tasteful, i really loved it. The service was great, atmosphere nice and the food fresh.
This was the best steak i have had since a very long time, i loved it. I had the ""Smoked Rib eye"" wowww what a taste. So nice, so tasteful, i really loved it. The service was great, atmosphere nice and the food fresh.
We just finished the most undesirable $42 steak dinner ever. We both ordered the steak oscar . The best part of the whole meal was the baked potato and the purple carrot. Both of our steaks were under done and tough. The béarnaise sauce was...More
We just finished the most undesirable $42 steak dinner ever. We both ordered the steak oscar . The best part of the whole meal was the baked potato and the purple carrot. Both of our steaks were under done and tough. The béarnaise sauce was...More
The fish was mediocre at best. It tasted like packaged frozen fish that you would get on a dinner cruise. It was dry and tasteless. The Ahi tuna also lacked flavor. The steak bites were tough. The waiter was excellent and the selection of wine...More
The fish was mediocre at best. It tasted like packaged frozen fish that you would get on a dinner cruise. It was dry and tasteless. The Ahi tuna also lacked flavor. The steak bites were tough. The waiter was excellent and the selection of wine...More
Loved this place so much we returned the following week when back in Vancouver. The happy hour prices are great value for money and the food is delicious for the price too. Staff are friendly and efficient and the location is perfect for watching the...More
Loved this place so much we returned the following week when back in Vancouver. The happy hour prices are great value for money and the food is delicious for the price too. Staff are friendly and efficient and the location is perfect for watching the...More
We were staying nearby and looking for something to eat after 9.30pm on a Sunday night. We had been past previously during our stay and it looked good so we thought we'd ask if they were still doing food? They were until 10.30pm, I think,...More
We were staying nearby and looking for something to eat after 9.30pm on a Sunday night. We had been past previously during our stay and it looked good so we thought we'd ask if they were still doing food? They were until 10.30pm, I think,...More
We stumbled upon this place late in the evening walking around Canada Place after sunset. We really enjoyed the happy hour menu and thought the service was great. We did wait a few mins after the host sat for someone to come take our drink...More
We stumbled upon this place late in the evening walking around Canada Place after sunset. We really enjoyed the happy hour menu and thought the service was great. We did wait a few mins after the host sat for someone to come take our drink...More
This is a tale of two dinners. Ate here early on a Thursday evening during a short visit to Vancouver. Brilliant service and lovely food - garlic prawns and vegetable tempura. Loved it so much we went back on the Sunday. It could have been...More
This is a tale of two dinners. Ate here early on a Thursday evening during a short visit to Vancouver. Brilliant service and lovely food - garlic prawns and vegetable tempura. Loved it so much we went back on the Sunday. It could have been...More
Lively bistro and bar in downtown Vancouver with panoramic views of Vancouver Harbour and of the North Shore Mountains. Service is swift and cheerful, and the food is freshly prepared, tasty and served in generous portions. Imaginative cocktails, and good wine list. “Happy hour” between...More
Lively bistro and bar in downtown Vancouver with panoramic views of Vancouver Harbour and of the North Shore Mountains. Service is swift and cheerful, and the food is freshly prepared, tasty and served in generous portions. Imaginative cocktails, and good wine list. “Happy hour” between...More
Made our way over to Chop on a recommendation from family who’d also visited a month ago - was not disappointed! Food was fantastic: cooked to perfection and plenty of it to suit all tastes and requirements. Great selection of beers and wines, and all...More
Made our way over to Chop on a recommendation from family who’d also visited a month ago - was not disappointed! Food was fantastic: cooked to perfection and plenty of it to suit all tastes and requirements. Great selection of beers and wines, and all...More
After a quick visit to my friend at the Pan pacific , last mins she want to have a quick lunch with me to catch up the good old days , so I choose the newly open Chop restaurant at the West Building at the...More
After a quick visit to my friend at the Pan pacific , last mins she want to have a quick lunch with me to catch up the good old days , so I choose the newly open Chop restaurant at the West Building at the...More
They just recently opened. Only 2 reviews, but a local said it was excellent. Wow. It was. Friendly service. Great menu. We got the furious fries, vegetable tempura, The steak bites, the garlic strip, and the roast beef. We shared the tastes with all four...More
They just recently opened. Only 2 reviews, but a local said it was excellent. Wow. It was. Friendly service. Great menu. We got the furious fries, vegetable tempura, The steak bites, the garlic strip, and the roast beef. We shared the tastes with all four...More
We had an absolutely delicious lunch here. The service was impressive and friendly. The menu selections were good and the food was delicious. The steaks were cooked perfectly and very succulent. Would happily return
We had an absolutely delicious lunch here. The service was impressive and friendly. The menu selections were good and the food was delicious. The steaks were cooked perfectly and very succulent. Would happily return
Location on Coal Harbour has views of Canada Place, cruise ships and some sea and mountain view. The room is spacious and comfortable. The waterfront patio seats 100. Upstairs is a 30+ seat area that would suit a private function. Bathrooms are spotless. The menu...More
Location on Coal Harbour has views of Canada Place, cruise ships and some sea and mountain view. The room is spacious and comfortable. The waterfront patio seats 100. Upstairs is a 30+ seat area that would suit a private function. Bathrooms are spotless. The menu...More",52,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1370962-Reviews-Chop_Steakhouse_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Chung Chun Rice Hot Dog,"Chungchun Rice Hotdog specializes in Korean-style hotdogs. We got the Mozzarella Cheese Hotdog, and the Whole Mozzarella Cheese, and added extra potato toppings for $1.50. I loved the ooey gooey, stretchy mozzarella cheese. It's amazingly delicious with the spicy mayo sauce. Choose other different sauces...More
Uuufffff!!, delicious!!, this time i order the nugget one, fantastic; they always have new flavours, fast service and well cooked.
My cousin suggested to have when we were looking for HOT DOG. And it seems we did not do any mistake. This small shop on the corner of the Robson St has a good varieties of rice dogs with pork, beef and chicken. But most...More
First time coming here and it was amazing, staff was very sweet and quick especially with a long line we waited under 10min, we had the double cheese stuffed with potato topping and the chicken nugget, both were delicious and extremely filling, I'm excited to...More
Chungchun (or Chung Chun) seems to have come out of nowhere: It was founded in South Korea (2017) and, by the end of 2020, expanded globally to over 300 locations in Japan, China, Philippines, Vietnam, Malaysia, Indonesia, Australia, USA and Canada. The first Vancouver location...More
Excellent variety. Great taste. We tried 3 different versions and they were excellent. Cant wait to try more. Will definitely be back $4-$7
We had a great time eating a rice dog, it is such a good experience and interesting concept. We had the potato topping with hot dog and cheese filled. It tasted super good, definitely worth checking out!",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23868605-Reviews-Chung_Chun_Rice_Hot_Dog-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cibo Trattoria,"Stumbled up this little gem close to the orpheum, WHAT luck , food was excellent but most importantly Jordan our server was exceptional, with a brilliant personality and help with wine and food selection, impressive and memorable, thank you
Excellent and friendly service. Beautiful décor and comfortable. There were great menu choices. The roasted cod and the zucchini carbonara dishes were very flavourful and top-notch. The grilled baby octopus tasted delicious; however, were very overcooked. I would definitely return.
This restaurant is a must for anyone wanting to experience great food, relaxed ambience and a really good wine list! You will meet Jordan, who makes your overall experience amazing. Knowledgeable, friendly and efficient. We were there on a Friday night as a return visitor...More
My wife and I dined at this bistro/trattoria in downtown Vancouver, before a concert. We did not have a reservation, but were warmly received and seated quickly. Cibo serves very good food and has an excellent location, if you are attending an evening performance at...More
After enjoying the brilliant New Years Day VSO Strauss /Viennese concert we walked a block to Cibo Trattoria for a brilliant meal. The carpaccio was delicious and delicate. Cornish game hen was succulent with a delightful collection of root vegetables . The steak was tender...More
Casual Italian in a nice atmosphere. Close to the downtown venues like the vso to stop in for dinner before a show. Warm, friendly service. We had the octopus, bocconcini and meat sauce pasta.
We stayed at the Moda Hotel and treated ourselves to dinner at the Cibo Trattoria with just an elevator commute! The atmosphere was lively, but relaxing. We ordered the red house wine, fried small artichokes with arugula and feta cheese, grilled octopus with cannellini beans...More
The food was amazing. The chef spent time with us and what an interested person. Jordan our waiter was one of the best we have experienced. I just can’t say how good our evening turned out to be!!!! We have rebooked for our next evenings...More
We are staying at the Moda Hotel which opens directly into the restaurant. Sunday evening, 6.15pm…the restaurant was almost empty and we asked to be seated, no reservation. The maître’d told us they were booked for the evening despite the fact that only 1 table...More
Perfect date night spot: quiet, elegant room with fireplace and candlelight. The food was innovative (kumquats in the duck sauce, chorizo with the cod) and delicious. We chose the flight of wines, which allowed us to taste a range of offerings from the wine list...More
Just returned from a group brunch Jan. 23/22. It took 1 1/2 hrs. to get our food after ordering it. We were the only 2 tables in there! No drip coffee at all, so you are paying $3.50 for each lukewarm cup. That's a way...More
Had an incredible experience at Cibo Trattoria. The service was amazing and their wine flights were really good. I highly recommend checking this place out. All the food we had was really good especially the risotto. We definitely will be back soon!
Dear Guest, Thank you for the lovely review. Hope to see you again soon Regards, Kelly JH Sales and Marketing Manager
After the rugby, we decided on italian, and called Cibo and they had availability for a table for 4. Very cute cozy place. The manager was great, very knowledgeable in wine and her menu. 2 ordered the lasagna, 1 order of Clams in white wine...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for the lovely review. Hope to see you again. Regards, Kelly JH Sales and Marketing Manager
This small eclectic restaurant is GREAT - we liked it so much we ate there 2 nights in a row. Bethany, our server, made our visit even more delightful. The food is delicious and you can taste every component. Lots of dietary options. The Tiramisu...More
This place is incredible. The good is fabulous and the service impeccable. The staff is very warm and welcoming. And best of all there are no Television screens and no loud music. The room is inviting, washroom are clean and stylish. We had a most...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1205134-Reviews-Cibo_Trattoria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
CinCin Ristorante + Bar,"There were four of us. We all ordered something different and we all had a great Italian meal. The staff were terrific. The atmosphere was also very good. In a very central position.
The service was outstanding. The meals were delicious and presented well. I had the squash maracapone pasta . It was delicious. It was slightly over salted .
Our server, an older/senior Caucasian man, was very rude. I asked for a small dish of pasta, not the larger entree (they have two sizes available), but he charged me for the large dish. When I questioned it politely, he got frustrated with me and...More
Came here for my wife's birthday on a Sunday night. Hadn't visited in many years and was happy to see its still the same excellent quality as it was before. We were very well treated by all staff, our server (Japanese lady, didn't catch her...More
First visit to Cin Cin and it was very good. We had the Sunday lunch and it was more than acceptable. The highlight was the live music that started at 4pm. Great venue for the music and the band were excellent. Will be back very...More
A disaster. Ticket number 4744. The carpaccio was great, the wine was ok. My wife's Caesar salad was dry, hardly any dressing or flavour, so it was half eaten. I ordered the cassa pasta dish. The sauce was excellent, the pasta not so much. I...More
This is a nice restaurant, though the food was only average. They have an extensive wine list, though their wines are then extremely expensive and they want to decanter everything.
This restaurant came as a recommendation from a friend and it did not disappoint! The staff was beyond welcoming and helpful being it was our first time with all the delicious recommendations! Patio seating was so cozy and our waiter Chris was awesome! We will...More
I was visiting from Calgary with a friend and we had the most incredible evening, start to finish. We were seated at the bar while we waited for a table, where we had some unique, delicious cocktails. The bartender was attentive, friendly and when we...More
It has been a long time since I felt so amazing after a restaurant visit! CinCin impressed with amazing service (and I mean amazing!), delicious food, amazing bar choice and a fabulous atmosphere! Thank you!
In stark contrast to Bluewater Cafe on the previous evening, this restaurant was a great experience. My husband was keen to enjoy a really good steak before our return to the UK. However, I much prefer eating fish. We both came out very happy. Both...More
First, the staff is very personal, the food was divine and it is in a very pretty setting where you have a lot of space to enjoy the most extensive wine list created with passion and love. You must be the best when you win...More
Went for a dinner here with my Wife and a friend. The food was fantastic and we very much enjoyed the ambiance. This was our first time here and we will definitely be back. Thank you. Fine dinning at a reasonable price, great value.
Early June 2022...we dined here with 2 other couples. The waiter told us what the specials were, and one of the guys ordered the steak special (10-oz. I think), medium rare please. The steak came absolutely blood rare, and so my friend sent it back...More
The food was satisfactory. Highly unusual, however, the paper CinCin birthday greeting brought to the table to start.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d683749-Reviews-CinCin_Ristorante_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cindy's Palace Chinese Seafood Restaurant,"These family restaurant is in East Vancouver's neighborhoods flavour hang out and special for the retired teenagers for their budget dim sum and old style Cantonese dishes , you do get 20% off for early bird Dim sum , not a fancy upscale place ,...More
The 3 of us came here for dim sum on a weekday. I hadn’t been here before and we were impressed with good ol’ fashion Cantonese food. Our eyes were bigger than our appetite & we weren’t disappointed. All the dim sum dishes were tasty...More
My father in law saw their ad in the Chinese newspaper of their set menu deals. We wanted to try the Peking duck 2 course meal that comes with 3 dishes of your choice. We got chicken knuckles, green beans and sweet and sour pork...More
Some of my staff craving for Dim sum almost a year , so I surprised them having dim sum on a patio at Cindy's Chinese restaurant before the long week end , , the restaurant in the neighbourhood for long long time , lot of...More
I live just up the street and pass this place all the time. Visited the other night with friends and was pleasantly surprised. Hot and sour soup is perfect and beef with broccoli stir fry - excellent! Highly recommended for a local meal in a...More
Always great dimsum here! Each dish was hot and tasty! Ha Gow, shui Mai, spare ribs and squash, Cindy’s BBQ baked pork buns, rice in bamboo wrap, beef and cilantro balls, and spring rolls were wonderful! Absolutely filling. Service was great with both jasmine tea...More
Cindy’s is my go to place what the mood for Dim Sum occurs. They have an incredible assortment of plates and when the place is not full, everything is made when ordered. During the week, I sometimes order the fried tofu with garlic and chilli,...More
Since finding Cindy’s, whenever I feel like Dim Sum I have to go there. The food is fantastic. The service could improve, but nobody really cares when you can eat the best food. I love their meatballs, shrimp cakes, eggplant with shrimp.... I think I...More
We had out of town visitors who wanted dim sum for lunch. We were not disappointed. Large portions and good value for money. Salt and pepper squid was the best!
Nanaimo and 1st Ave is not known as a commercial hub of activity which is all the more reason why I was surprised we came here to a little known Chinese eatery called Cindy's Palace. For starters, this is not palatial by any stretch with...More
An attractive Chinese Restaurant specializing in Dim Sum lunches. They have a wide variety of steamed and stir fried dishes.
This is my usual go-to place when I’m in the mood for Dim sum. The quality of the dishes is top notch, the servings are nice size, and they have an extensive menu. If not for dim sum, the rest of the food is exquisite....More
my family has been coming here long before i did. I come several times a year with friends and family for Dim Sum. They do a very good dim sum for lunch... quick too. They have a great Hot sour soup.
Great selection of both usual and unusual dim sum items. Prices are reasonable as is the serve. Friendly servers. Crazy busy after 1100 on weekends. Hangover cure place to be. Try avoiding it if it’s Chinese New Year. Packed.
I think i have finally found my favorite chinese restaurant. We decided to order take out fron Cindy's during our visit to Vancouver. Everything we ordered was delicious and were large portions. I think they have the best BBQ pork fried rice. I will recommend...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2641771-Reviews-Cindy_s_Palace_Chinese_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cinema Public House,"Finally a bar in Vancouver that we truly felt safe going to after all the positive feedback given to us before hand by others that have attended this establishment. They strictly adhere to COVID rules and regulations and are diligent maintaining all patrons stick to...More
Thank you so much for your kind words! We really appreciate it during these strange Covid times. Can't wait to see you next time!
Visited here for an early football match at 8:30. When I was first greeted, I was told the usual chef was sick but there was a replacement coming in ASAP. I ordered an orange juice, and accepted that issues with the kitchen happen so I...More
Zoe was our server and treated us like Gods... what a legend... we will definitely come back again. Thanks Zoe!!!
Thirsty work, shopping. Good job there are some pleasant bars on the city's main shopping streets. The street side terrace was busy so we ventured into the drak interior for a couple of tasty local brews.
The central location is good and the outside tables are ideal for people watching and gives the pub extra ambience. The food is tasty and ample portions and the young staff are friendly and accommodating and service is speedy. They serve some good beers including...More
we came here at happy hour which we didnt realise but was a bonus. right on granville st, we had a seat outside as it was a nice day (got there when it was just sunsetting) so were people watching which was fun. service was...More
Ridiculously priced admission on NYE, $30 included one drink and a few small canapés, but no live music, and coat check wasn’t included either. Small space too. Bit of a waste of money honestly.
The blackened chicken tacos were to die for. Best food I’ve had during my 10 days in BC. It’s a pub environment so it’s definitely a little loud with the music, hockey games on TV and just the people talking. It was pretty full when...More
Before heading to the Vogue theatre we stopped in for dinner. Service was fast and efficient and food and drinks were great! I had the Block Party drink and the brie fig bacon grilled cheese. Sandwich was a little flat and crispier than my last...More
My wife and I popped in for a quick bite before a concert at a theatre across the street. We were warmly greeted at the door and seat at a table. Our server was friendly and efficient. I had the Chopped Kale and Chicken Salad....More
We stopped in for some beer before going to a concert the the Vogue. The service was great and there was a good beer selection. We really enjoyed playing pinball and foosball . I can't comment on the food as we did not eat but...More
Watching the champions league match at the cinema with a packed house of Liverpool supporters. Very organized with their reservation system & kept the customers happy. Food was great & the specialty drinks menu excellent too! Not just beers & burgers. I had the Brie...More
My wife and I stopped in at the Cinema to watch the Champions League Final match. We were seated promptly at a table with a great view of various tv screens. I had the classic pub burger with bacon. It was delicious and the fries...More
This place is great. Its location is perfect to meet at to preclub. Happy hour is 3-6. Drinks are cheap. Lots of seating. Great payio on granville. Pinball. Shuffleboard. Definitely start your night here.
Went in here on Christmas eve in the hope of getting a good feed. And a good feed is indeed what we received. There were plenty of options on the menu to keep everyone in your party happy. The sausage plate was superb even though...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1990364-Reviews-Cinema_Public_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cioppino's Mediterranean Grill,"We were recommended to come here for lunch by the concierge of our hotel. We were delighted to find that our charming waitress Holly was like us Northern Irish . We had an excellent lunch and tried a very acceptable dessert wine afterwards. Very friendly...More
We had an unreal time dining here at Cioppino's. Location is awesome, right in Yaletown. The service was amazing, and the food was unreal. We had a risotto and a gnocchi and they were both so delicious. We've wanted to try this place for a...More
I booked one of the private rooms for a small dinner with family and friends to celebrate my wife's milestone birthday. the entire evening was absolutely perfect - great service (thanks Pino, Stewart and the entire team!), food that was incredible (can see why Chef...More
The food was excellent. Cioppino's is unquestionably a wonderful choice if you want to treat yourself. Great meal all around, with the rack of lamb being a standout entrée. Be mindful that the portions tend to be larger than those at fine dining establishments.
We had just spent two weeks touring round British Columbia, and had a couple of nights in Vancouver before flying home to London. An old friend recommended Cioppino’s, and I am glad we made it our final night destination. The welcome was warm, the menu...More
The food was good, the service was good. What disappointed us was that the entree, Cioppino was no bigger that the appetizer and not much fish. It was not a good value for the price.
My best friend called me a month ahead of our anticipated dinner engagement and invited me and my husband to dinner on March 12. That day she called me to say she called the restaurant to reconfirm her reservation and they did not have record...More
We had dinner on their patio. It has been a long since I was here last and we had wonderful food such as: Octopus, Buffalo caprese, porchuni soup, lobster bisque, pappardelle, porterhouse, spaghetti vongole, mixed seafood, lemon tart, and ice cream. Very good service and...More
After a 3 years, we finally made it out to Cioppino’s. This is a difficult restaurant to book it seemed like it alway booked solid. Our sever Richard was very helpful with his preferences. He was very reassuring and energetic when we ordered. Started with...More
We went to Cioppino's to celebrate my wife's birthday! We were greeted warmly at the door & taken to our table...a lovely setting by the window. The decor is beautiful giving a romantic atmospere & the food was delicious. Our server Alanna was very attentive...More
I came here to celebrate my birthday. I've ordered the lobster pasta before, so I got that again and it was just as good as I remember it. For appies we ordered the octopus, and the prawns. Both were good, very tender octopus and flavorful....More
Good food but very pricey. Well presented and service was excellent. Very cozy and great spot for a romantic night
If you want to go to a place where, when you turn your back to be subject of backbiting, the bold brother of the chef do specialize in this field, very pretentious and and empty concept. a place to be avoided, unless you are a...More
The food: subpar ingredients, subpar cooking techniques, subpar portions. The staff: on my way to the washroom, I heard the manager and waiters make fun of an innocent elderly couple that were dinning right next to us that couldn’t pronounce a word on the menu....More
I ate here with my girlfriend and a friend july 2020 while visiting Vancouver. The food and the service were great. My only issue was ordering one of the specials not on the menu. Had I known the price, I wouldn't have ordered it, my...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703377-Reviews-Cioppino_s_Mediterranean_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cliff House Restaurant and Bar,"Called in her for a drink. We ordered an Earl Grey tea and a Mango sunrise. Having delivered the Mango surprise the waitress knocked it width the tea pot spilling some on my wife’s hand and the table. “Lucky it didn’t fall over” was all...More
It is SOOO expensive, for what it is. Do yourself a favor, go to the outdoor counter service restaurant at the other side of the gift shop. Trust me, it's just as good, and much better prices.
Came hungry after the suspension bridge visit. The Views and Ambience was Mazing. Busy place but well kept. Service was topnotch. Loved my Chowder and Salmon. Small menu but well prepped and executed. Best lunch in our Vancouver trip
This beautiful restaurant warmly welcomed us after walking through the Canyon Lights at Capilano Suspension Bridge. Tomas was our server and was very attentive to our needs and very friendly. The food was fantastic- we ordered the seafood chowder and pulled pork burger with a...More
The Butter Chicken was off the hook. The manager runs the front of the house like a professional. Great day came to an end with beers, new friends and great food. Thanks!
The Cliffhouse in Capilano Suspension Bridge Park, North Vancouver is a great place for lunch when exploring the fantastic sites the park has to offer. Ambience is really nice given that this is normally a high volume tourist spot. Menu and drink selection not extending...More
The best salmon I’ve ever had. Seriously.!! Simple healthy. Also had very nice cauliflower bites (vegetarian). Not cheap but not outrageous with a view of the capilano bridge right in the park. Highly recommended.
Moderate beer selection. Order a side. Do not invest in an entree. Stay away from the grilled cheese. The menu is strange and not worth the trip. I hate to be so negative but not impressed.
It was in the pricey side but when all we got was 1 drink each and a cheese board to share. So total of 2 alcoholic drinks and a cheese board. Then found out at the end after paying the bill they charged us for...More
Really disappointing experience. $25 burger (over cooked and chewy), $25 Mac and cheese. Nothing to see here folks. Waiter was a total goofball no energy and couldn’t care less if he was here or not. Cleaning the table just not watching where he’s spraying, spraying...More
We had a fabulous meal at the cliff house in December just after Christmas. We went up to see the lights in the canyon display and decided to have an early dinner (around 5.30pm). The bridge and attraction were absolutely packed so I am happy...More
Spent the day sight seeing at Grouse Mountain and Capilano Suspension bridge. In the evening on the way home from Grouse Mountain we returned to Capilano to look at the Christmas lights. (stunning) We managed to get a table at the Cliff House for dinner....More
This is a great little place to eat. Now I’ve only been once but the food was surprisingly very tasty for a tourist attraction restaurant. The seafood chowder was really good and the Ribs with mash was also very good.
We had been roaming around the park looking for a cozy place for a late night dinner and came upon this cozy restaurant. We opted for soups which were massive and super tasty! Joline our server was friendly, cheerful, and accommodating. She even found me...More
I don’t expect much from food in a tourist attraction, but the food at the Cliff House was quite good. We enjoyed very good fish and chips and soup and the beers on offer were a good selection. The staff was very friendly and working...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d13554738-Reviews-Cliff_House_Restaurant_and_Bar-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Clough Club,"Went there two times, one on a date - it is a romantic dark little bar. And one with a bunch of friends, had a good time both times.
Some places in Gastown take themselves a bit too seriously (and/or their customers do). Clough Club is small, friendly, and has pretty good food and drink. It's a great space as well - good for hanging out and talking with your friends.
I attended a recent gathering of 15 people at the Clough Club for cocktails plus a light meal. The selection of beer was impressive - from local craft beers to well known brands, while the food was remarkably good 'cuisine' ---- The ambiance is 'British...More
Vancouver doesn’t have many options for late night food and a solid cocktail list, but this place offers both and doesn’t disappoint! Service was hit and miss. The drinks were always good but had to wait a while at times. One can’t blame them for...More
Tucked away off the main drag in Gastown. Called in for pre-dinner cocktails & went back a few nights later after dinner two, we liked it so much. Cozy & quirky bar with a laid back vibe. Friendly staff. Large selection of spirits & great...More
Worst Aperol Spritz (easy drink) I've ever had. When I asked them to rectify the bartender offered to sell me more Aperol. Hint: the recipe is on the Aperol bottle.
We went post dinner and enjoyed some decent cocktails on a warm July evening. Not very busy but a good spot to meet up. Good service too.
Even if the Clough Club served bad drinks the cozy seating, perfect lighting (unless you are getting old like me and need glasses and a cellphone light) and chill ambience would more than make up for it. But do not fear, the service on this...More
Stopped in here and had a few drinks pre concert. The bartender was knowledgeable told him what each of us liked and he recommended drinks to suit our tastebuds. Would be great to see more options on the menu to pick from as well. Worth...More
Great place to have a couple of drinks! The staff is friendly, and the music is good! Drinks on point! Great vibe overall!
Meet your best buds here or sit at the bar and make some new friends. Definitely grab a drink here when you visit Gastown
Quite a long wait at our dinner place, so we wandered for a drink. This spot seemed alluring from the outside. So glad we stopped in. Very chill ambiance with groovin music. Wide variety of cocktail and beer choices. Enough of a selection of wine,...More
Where Vancouver can be beholden to far more formulaic hubris than genuine outré stylishness, the Clough Pub comes as a huge shock if not relief, intimate and yet clad in the most outlandish and intriguing decor, somewhere charming, somewhere freakish, and an unquestionably exciting backdrop...More
Stopped in on account of the TripAdvisor reviews. Wasn't disappointed at all, our bar tender was great! Mixed a lot of different drinks for us and had a friendly conversation. Drink prices were steep but if you're expecting that than its not a problem.
Despite the cheeky bartender, or because of, this is a lovely place to enjoy a cocktail after work. The HH goes til 7pm, which is such a treat. We didn't eat, just enjoyed a few fine beverages on the patio. Even though it was warm...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3184493-Reviews-Clough_Club-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
CoM Vietnamese,"Food is delicious and nice service but a bit overpriced however the pho is so tasty due to the good quality broth. I would definitely come back despite the price.
This place is very clean and service is ok but they will add additional 18% tip if 6- more person which I said it was not good if my service is poor
Drove by Com Vietnamese a few times but have never tried it until this afternoon. The moment I walked in, the restaurant’s high ceiling and simple but contemporary decor was very welcoming. The servers were attentive and adhered closely to the hygiene measure of covid-19....More
We had the veggie pancake, seared eggplant and yellow curry with noodles. Everything exceeded expectations. The service was friendly and cheerful. The restaurant was clean, comfortable and modern, and the food was really amazing. The price was reasonable for the quality of the meal. Not...More
we have eaten here a couple of times in the past and this visit is just as good as the previous ones. Their soup is very tasty and the rice dishes is excellent!
CoM was recommended by a friend several times. Having a good staple of places we rely on for Vietnamese food, we never tried it. The opportunity came up when friend asked us to go. Why not? May as well give it a go. The restaurant...More
This was a first visit and we were not disappointed. The ambience is bright and cheerful and staff very friendly. The food was exceptional and tasty We had the chicken wings ( two varieties) and both the best we ever had Try the Vietnamese crepes-...More
What to say! Everything about this restaurant is awesome - the food, ambiance, staff courtesy - all of em. The butter garlic chicken wings are these lip smacking, perfectly cooked chicken wings. I could have a bucket of these only and go home completely satisfied....More
Came here today with my family of six through their internet reservation a day before with relative ease. Underground parking available next to this restaurant and also street parking around the corner. Very attentive service all through the entire meal. Food is very authentic paired...More
CoM Vietnamese is legitimately the best Pho place in the Lower Mainland. I'm a huge Pho enthusiast and have visited many pho spots from Abbotsford to North Van. This is DEFINITELY worth it. The noodles are thicker and so smooth, the spring rolls are amazing...More
We hit all the boxes for being hard to serve; Last sitting of the night and a large group including several persons with multiple allergies. Not exactly guests from Hell but a challenge. Com Staff rose to the occasion, taking great pains to explain the...More
Came here on a Sunday night so it was pretty calm and not busy. Our server and all the staff were great, friendly and professional. The décor is really nice and modern. I ordered the Bún Bò Huế, which was the perfect size for me,...More
Went with my friends the other day since we were curious about what this place is. Overall amazing experience the food was great! You could tell by the ingredients that they used. Service was a plus as well.
We passed by this place many times and thought they are the cafe, all we see is the sign CoM. After my friend posted on the FB, we realized they are a Vietnamese restaurant. The decor is modern, warm and clean. The service is very...More",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d15661161-Reviews-CoM_Vietnamese-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Coal Harbour Bar,"As we were staying at the Pan Pacific hotel this restaurant was handy to eat in especially on our first night when we arrived late. The location is excellent with views over the harbour and the visiting cruise ships and service on the whole was...More
Service was good. We ordered the fish and chips and a burger. Both were good. Fish was a large portion and the burger was acceptable. Tried the locally made lager which was good but not very cold. Would recommend for the convenience of being in...More
Six of us went for pre-dinner drinks, but ended up staying for dinner. The views are amazing, the staff were friendly and the food was great, and reasonably priced.
Great place to grab a drink & enjoy the view. Also has a few good food options if you need a bite to eat. Relaxed atmosphere with excellent service. Pricey, but most things at Pan Pacific hotel are well worth it.
Horrible experience at this bar with a meal. Had been talking to friends online for 2 years ahead of a Disney Cruise to Hawaii (previous cruise cancelled due to Pandemic). Seated fairly quickly after around 15 minute wait. 2 Spaghetti bolognaise dishes ordered, a chicken...More
We waited 27 minutes just to pay our bill. Right from the start I felt like this would not be a good experience. We were standing at the entrance to the bar - at the 'wait to be seated' sign for what felt like too...More
Had a couple cocktails with my wife - Pencillin highly recommended! Bar staff was attentive and friendly and the view was incredible
This bar is really nice. Drinks and desserts are amazing. The staff are really nice and friendly. Love this place.
This bar / pub is located inside the Pan Pacific hotel. It is a more casual atmosphere than their Oceans 999 Restaurant. Great for a relaxing drink with lovely views of the cruise pier and the harbor. I ordered their ling cod fish and chips...More
Dear GilB867, Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Coal Harbour Bar. We were pleased to read you enjoyed the service, harbour views and your dining experience. Your comments have been shared with our Culinary team whom will be pleased...More
After a two day stay before a 10 night cruise we treated ourselves to a lovely high quality big breakfast. High recommend, food and serivice was top quality.More
Dear DayTrip776633, Thank you for taking the time to post a review of your recent stay at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your pre cruise stay and you dining experience at our Oceans 999 Restaurant. Thank you for the...More
Dave is the best bartender. Drinks were out of this world, and he answered all our questions about life in Canada. View of harbor is amazing and loved our time here. Thanks Dave!🍸More
Dear 979abbyd. We were delighted to of received your review of your recent stay at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read your visit to our Coal Harbour Bar exceeded your expectations, especially the service extended to you by our Bartender Dave, whom...More
This bar is adjacent to the Five Sails restaurant inside the Pan Pacific Hotel. Service is efficient and friendly, drink prices are fairly reasonable, and you can’t beat the views. Great spot to start or end your evening.More
Dear conifer_doc. Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Coal Harbour Bar at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your visit and you found the service and beverage selections to your liking. On you next...More
This is a very comfortable place to have a drink and small snacks. The staff is friendly and if you are staying at the hotel it is convenient. We never had to wonder where they were as they were always there to help us.More
Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Coal Harbour Bar at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your visit and our associates service exceeded your expectations. We look forward in welcoming you back to the...More
Title says it all. Perfect way to end the day. Beautiful views both inside and out. Foods good although pricey.
Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Coal Harbour Bar. We were pleased to read you enjoyed the menu items and the spectacular harbour views, We look forward in welcoming you back to the Pan Pacific Vancouver.
I was in Vancouver for a conference and stayed at a different hotel across the street. But friends told me to visit this bar, which is tucked inside the Pan Pacific Hotel on the third floor, the Coal Harbour Bar. The drinks and the view...More
Thank you for taking the time to post your review on Trip Advisor of your recent visit to our Coal Harbour Bar. We were pleased to read you enjoyed the views and especially the service extended to you by our associate Patrick, whom will be...More",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10260282-Reviews-Coal_Harbour_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Coal Harbour Cafe,"Small but all you need when taking a stroll along the boardwalk towards the cruise ship terminal and for views of the water. Good coffee and tasty food. Just right.
This café was our favourite place for coffee after walking round Vancouver. Never had the food but coffee was always served with a smile and a chat. Sit by the window and gaze at the mountains in front of you or watch the sea planes...More
The seafood was very fresh and the view is amazing! Also good for larger parties! Be prepared to wait though!
Patio terrace at the Pan Pacific is a delightful place to have a meal. Phenomenal view of the harbor and seaplane terminal. Service is excellent,professional and friendly, prices are a bit steep, but that view comes at a cost. Stay away from the grilled chicken...More
After a long walk around the cruise ship harbor it was time for coffee and fresh pastry. If a ship is not in adjacent slip the view is extraordinary. Coffee was surprisely well brewed and presented. This is not the resturant located further upstairs in...More
Walking round harbour called in for coffee nice pleasant place friendly staff very clean fast service lovely Views of harbour
Ordered a double shot of esspresso on ice. They charged me extra for the ice and a plastic cup. Have been ordering this for years and never have been charged extra for ice or a plastic cup. Curious?
This place is huge - and busy. Best to have a reservation. Food and service was good. We sat on the patio - yes they had heaters.
Delicious food, excellent service and amazing view. We arrived at 5:30 on a Monday evening without reservation and were seated immediately but reservations strongly advised.
Stay away from the ""Opera Night"" unless a huge buffet is your thing. The sound was less than perfect.
Stopped after seeing the Fly over Canada experience. The coffee is ok, you can sit inside or out and you get served relatively quickly because they are not that busy.
Right near the dock for the Cruise Ships this is a nice spot for a fresh croissant and a coffee or soda. The Scone was also fresh fresh. Simple, easy, friendly, and reasonable. Let's go!
Stopped in while walking around Canada Place for a treat. Had a really good brownie with chocolate chips baked in. They appear to a a variety of coffee/pastry type items. I would stop in again for a snack.
Typical quality you expect. Enjoyed. When we come into Vancouver it's Centre and we have the chance to drop in we like to stop by for some favs. Great fish tacos and ribs. Lots to choose from. Good quality and service. Good place to bring...More
A good restaurant that is in the hotel. There is a bar attached also that is popular. You have water views.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3927379-Reviews-Coal_Harbour_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Coast Restaurant,"Happened upon this place by chance as near our accomodation. What a delight service was amazing and the food just as good. We dined at brunch - the waffles are a must try with fresh fruit and candied banana. Our server (did not catch his...More
This is a lovely restaurant with a great patio. We experienced wonderful service. I forget our waitresses name but she had false eyelashes. Very attentive and pleasant. Food was wonderful as well. Would definitely return if I am in Vancouver. Great location to the Fairmont...More
What an excellent restaurant, visited 10th July, our last night in Canada !! Great food, reasonable price and terrific service. The staff were very knowledgeable - my 1st ever Sushi !!
I had never tried Coast or its affiliates before last Sunday, but they're definitely on my list for future dining. My friends and I were on a ""girls night out"", had used their July promotion, were seated promptly, and were treated to excellent service by...More
Brooke is the freaking baddest B word in Coasy restaurant, she made us felt welcome and really welcomed us with a great hospitality, nobody can beat Brooke service the freaking Barbie of Coast Restaurant! Nobody can beat her!!!
It had been a long while since my besties and I were able to indulge in a night-out. Coast was offering a special lobster seafood dinner that none of us could resist. Upon arriving we were greeted warmly & seated quickly. Our server, Laura, was...More
Thank you so much coral493 for the great rating and for taking the time to review your experience. I apologize for the less than perfect Paella and Lobster you received, and am pleased my team took care of you and rectified the situation. We are...More
I had such a memorable dining experience at Coast! I went with friends for the Buy Up seafood dinner for 2. The decor is very trendy and upscale yet comfortable. The food was very good, but the service was outstanding! Laura our server was friendly,...More
Thank you anitahF5769BD for taking the time to give us such great feedback. I am please Laura and Mohit were able to make your dining experience a memorable one; I will make sure they get the recognition they deserve for their wonderful service! We look...More
My friends and I went to Coast Restaurant for their special seafood deal. The restaurant is beautiful and our table was very comfortable. Our waitress, Laura, anticipated everything we needed and she was funny and so helpful! Even though the restaurant was full, she made...More
Thank you so much fey0nam for taking the time to write such a wondferful review. I am pleased to hear that you enjoyed your dining experience, and that Laura and Mohit made it a memorable one; I will be sure to pass your compliments to...More
My son and I had a very nice dinner at Coast restaurant. Our waiter, Ben, was excellent. He was honest and kept checking on us during our dinner to make sure everything was OK. I had sushi which was fantastic. I loved the Sablefish sushi....More
Thank you so much Paradise53761 for taking the time to write such a wonderful review. I am pleased to hear that you enjoyed your dining experience, and that Ben made it a memorable one. I will be sure to pass your compliments on to Ben,...More
We were excited to go to Coast. Very nice upscale atmosphere. BUT. I ordered the lobster and prawns pasta dish. Was very dissatisfied the half mini lobster tail was about 1 to 1.5 ounces of lobster and there were 4 small shrimp. I asked where...More
A lovely birthday meal for family! Their Pris fix menu gave our group many choices. A seafood restaurant with something for the carnivores in our group. A nice meal with excellent service!More
Thank you so much ElizabethS827 for taking the time to write a review about your experience with us at Coast. I am pleased we were able to accommodate the seafood lovers as well as the carnivores in your party. Please feel free to reach out...More
This restaurant had a nice menu of seafood, had excellent service and was very clean and pretty in its architectural design. The salmon was excellent as well as everything that went with it, and the server was kind and attentive.More
Hi JeannieD_12 I am so pleased to hear your experience with us at Coast was a memorable one..and visually appealing! I will be sure to pass on your compliments to the kitchen team. Please feel free to reach out to me personally if you would...More
Great happy hour atmosphere. Food outstanding. Best ever calamari. Sable fish cooked to perfection.More
Hi 848jpc, Thank you for taking the time to write about your recent experience with us at Coast. I will be sure to pass your compliments on to the kitchen team, and I agree, our calamari is amazing! On your next visit you should try...More
Incredible service and menu quality! Our server, Rhonda, made my spouse’s birthday so special and memorable. Absolutely coming back, again!More
Thank you Christopher for taking the time to write a review about your experience with us at Coast. I am so pleased we were able to make your visit a memorable one. I will be sure to pass on your compliments to Rhonda. We look...More
We had a wonderful birthday dinner at Coast! What a treat it was being served by Laura 😍 helluva waitress! Food is excellent, decent wine menu, cool atmosphere! Will be back next time for sure! 🤞",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d683802-Reviews-Coast_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cockney Kings Fish & Chips,"had the three taco lunch (2 shrimp & 1 cod) Amazing! The what what sauce is spicy but very good and so much shrimp per taco!
We come to New Westminster just for the all you can eat fish & chips. Always great!! Cannot beat the price. Staff are friendly and restaurant is clean. Covid-19 protocols are in place. They need MORE locations!!!
We had a Birthday dinner for 7. Of course it was take out! We ordered our food in the early afternoon for pick up at 5:30. The line was fairly long when we got there, but very well organized. Our food was ready on time...More
Cockney Kings is one of those unassuming places that has a strong local following, and it isn't hard to see why. Service is always excellent, and the food is reliably good. It doesn't offer a huge menu, but anything you might want from a fish...More
My grandkids have very restricted diets...grilled salmon is their favourite. I have regular halibut fish and chips...very good. Portions are very adequate! Busy place. Service is good, and quite fast!
Finally every one left Vancouver ,almost a week running around with family from U .K and,girl friend #5 in town, now I can regroup and relax for few days , I had craving for Fish & chips all night , , so I drop in...More
This place has great fish and chips! Every Monday to Wednesday, you can go for all you can eat. Their meat pies are also awesome.
Excellent fish and chips in the most normal and unassuming environment. Great service. Super fresh. I don’t eat Cole slaw but apparently it was great as well. Highly recommend.
While visiting Vancouver on vacation, we went out for dinner at Cockney Kings Fish and Chips the first night we arrived. Great meal! We then made a second visit when the rest of our “entourage” arrived later in the week. Again we were not disappointed....More
We live in North Delta but every now and then when we visited the area we would drop in to enjoy the good food. May 18th - 5 pm we did just that as a party of 5. They (server Allison with a big and...More
Loved the deals they have for fish & chips. Mouthwatering and delicious. I liked the Haddock & Cod both
On of our favourite eating spots in New Westminster. Not only are the Fish & Chips delicious but so are their Tacos. One dish we order when hungry is the Sea Food Platter that comes with choice of fish, prawns, oysters, chips & coleslaw. All...More
This pace has excellent fish and chips. I was very impressed so fresh and cheap. The tar tar sauce is excellent.
Decor: 4 Service: 5 Presentation: 4 Quality: 5 Price: $$ Very good fish and chips... possibly the best I've had in Greater Lower Mainland. Fries were yummy too. Great friendly service and fair price fornthe food. Try the Haddock fish it's between Halibut and Cod...More
This is by far the best Fish & Chip place around. Always fresh & reasonably priced.Nice selection of Cod, Halibut, Salmon, Pollack , Haddock , Shrimp & even Calamari. Can have the fish grilled or deep fried, handmade fries & coleslaw, all done on site....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154936-d10304305-Reviews-Cockney_Kings_Fish_Chips-New_Westminster_British_Columbia.html
Cockney Kings Fish & Chips (Burnaby),"It is a family owned good quality Fish & chip restaurant in midland have two locations one in New West , and this one in Burnaby , dropped in for late lunch it is been a while since my last visit , not much change...More
The food is so delicious and always freshly made. Generous portions of fried fish and calamari. Bottomless soft drinks too. The waitresses/waiters are friendly and cheerful. Very welcoming and comfortable atmostphere inside. I am already counting down the days to my next visit. Shannon
Just about 8 mins from order to service for take outs of my favourite fries with chicken strips. Huge pieces of chicken by the way. The real stuff. Freshly battered like “to order” just seconds before it’s dropped in the oil. Doesn’t get fresher than...More
This is now the best fish and chip place in the area. We travel all the way over or around Burnaby Mtn from Coquitlam just to go to the Burnaby location of Cockney Kings. We enjoy dining here every week or two. Today we ordered...More
Best fish and salad ever! They subbed for fries. Mushy peas are good too. We wanted to try the clam chowder but it had bacon in it.
Gone downhill,there fish and chips are hit and miss ,had to take food back twice so far ,fries soggy and fish was greesy and mushy,so disappointing
Excellent service even though staff had to deal with a number of customers! We had the cod - nice batter and golden fries. First time at this location. We will be back when the urge to have fish and chips strikes us again.
Lots of food good service! Fun people clean tables. Very bright and good prices on fish and chips!!!!!
I took my god daughter for her birthday as always good food great service and good atmosphere and very clean
The halibut fish and chips is awesome buns and coleslaw great compliment to the fish good service and lots of free parking excellent restaurant.
My friends and I have come to this restaurant for lunch in the past 3 years. We always were greeted with a smile and professional service.
Love this place! The fish is fresh and tasty. The batter is not oily or too thick. They have all you can eat on select dates so you can't beat that.
The best fish and chips we have found in the Burnaby area! Good fresh reliable and friendly, only down side is they are always busy, hense the always fresh reference! Yum!!!
Very good food and portions. Centrally located in a shopping centre on Hastings St. near Sperling. You won't be disappointed!
I’m never disappointed!! Great fish and chips. Always fresh and hot. A good place to take the family.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d703430-Reviews-Cockney_Kings_Fish_Chips_Burnaby-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Coco Rico Cafe Bistro,"Three of us stopped there for drinks and appies before a concert and we’re we ever glad we did! The service was excellent as were the drinks and food. Fish tacos, garlic prawns and crispy yam fries we all shared were sooo good. We went...More
Prices are up from any on line searches. They do not have an updated menu on line Went for breakfast. Had the usual eggs hashbrown bacon Place was not busy service was pleasant. Food was standard. Now my really. Went to bathroom. It was messy....More
Nice place with adequate menu at reasonable prices. Pleasant staff . We both had omelettes , nicely cooked and plenty filling and served nice and hot . Also has large TV where football game being shown live . ( Made husband very happy!)
Located on a busy corner of Robson St was entertaining to people watch. Service was quick and beer was well priced
July 19th 9pm we sat at a table and ordered drinks,(3 adults) they arrived and we were enjoying a wonderful chat when a cockroach runs right across the table. we are freaking at his point and in hind sight should have walked out right then....More
It’s the type of place that has ‘regulars’. Nice people, casual, welcoming and a bit on the shabby side. Some outdoor seating. Good breakfast menu and the lunch/dinner menu has a fair variety. Food is just OK but generous portions at bargain prices. Cocktails, beer...More
Dated March 20 Today I took a stroll after a full day of self isolation during a global pandemic and noticed that this ONE restaurant on Robson offered in-store dining and patio dining with the restaurant 1/2-3/4 full and patrons (shame on them) within 2...More
My girlfriend and I live 5 minutes away. Have probability ate here 20 + times. Food is amazing for such great prices
I stopped here for happy hour - they have a good deal on drinks, even double well drinks are discounted, and the server was friendly.
If you are looking for a good breakfast that won't break the bank, check out the Coco Rico Cafe on Robson Street, Vancouver. My wife and I were in vancouver and ate at the Coco Rico 3 times. Service is excellent, food is good, quantity...More
We went back there several times as well for breakfast as for dinner. Good food, well-prepared burgers... Friendly staff
We stopped in on the way to Stanley Park. We both had the special. It was cooked to our liking & very good. Very friendly staff too. Easy check out.
Great position on Robson St, popular bar/restaurant. Nice to try some local beer. Beef stroganoff was really good. Lots of choice on the menu. Very pleasant and efficient staff. Good prices.
We tried the Coco Rico Cafe for lunch and found it wanting. It boasts a well stocked bar and possibly it exists more for that than for its food. Salads were over whelmed with a strong-favoured dressing and some fish was over-cooked and dry. Give...More
Had breakfast, food was excellent but service extremely slow. Hardly anyone else in the café yet it took over a half hour to get our food. For that reason alone, we wouldn't return.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2645797-Reviews-Coco_Rico_Cafe_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Congee Noodle House,"After almost 4 years shut down , due to the pandemic and construction problem at the back , finally they reopen end of May , it is well like from locales with their late OWL hours and cheap snack , ( Close 1 am )...More
As locals know, the CNH has been closed for over 3 years due to a construction problem next door which caused their parking lot to partly collapse and made the building unusable. Thankfully, after a prolonged delay due to insurance (as reported in the media)...More
Don’t even get me started with the customer service. The server had the audacity to say that us “oh you’re not going to tip” I’m one who does tip but we never saw her but she was in a rush to get us out of...More
I was shocked by the level of service that I experienced with this restaurant because I was treated an unwelcome manner. I can hear that the owner was swearing at me while I was doing nothing wrong.
We seem to come monthly during the fall. I always love the house special chow mein and we also had the minced pork with long beans one time.The beans were cooked beautifully and not salty, so great with rice. The next time we came for...More
I ordered curry chicken and Singapore Vermicelli- both were waiting for me when I came by to pickup. Service was very pleasant and the place does a LOT of business as it is always crowded. Not the absolute best food I have ever eaten but...More
Judging from the crowded restaurant, I figured this place must be good. After perusing the extensive menu, I decided to get the dumpling soup and a plate of soy chicken with noodles. The soup was good and the dumplings were large, fresh and generously stuffed...More
Almost like a chinese version of the fast food restaurant! Start off with a lovely big bowl of congee soup, and then there are hundreds of other choices to fill out your meal.
This restaurant is not fancy but has good Cantonese food. It is conveniently located along East Broadway (at Main St). This is my second time at this restaurant. The previous time was July 2017. My cousins like coming to thus restaurant because it is reasonably...More
We (and by that I mean a huge group) dine here every year when we come to town, but this year may be the last. The food was sub par and they were unwilling to accommodate slight additions or changes. The dishes were mushy... I...More
I was surprised how early they open. We enjoyed Fish congee, shrimp with egg scramble over rice noodle, and ox tongue shaped deep fried pastry which is slightly sweet. If you are a skilled parker they do have free parking in the back else street...More
From the look of it their congees seem very popular and good sized portion for less than $10. I didn't try them so can't rate. Had their 4 treasures rice (BBQ pork, roast pork, soy sauce chicken and half day salted egg), they were unimpressive....More
First of all the reviews that says its cheap, its not its average. The one dish I usually order (rice noodle wrapped around donut) was complete soggy disgusting, I know the type of place it was so we just left it instead of making a...More
Its been years since coming here for noodles (Hong Kong) style, this used to be our go to place when we wanted congee and or noodles, and of course BBQ items! But with more and more ethnic restaurants opening in Vancouver, this restaurant's priority falls...More
We have not been here for years. It used to be fairly good but now it is not that clean looking and the servers are very rude and the foods are full of MSG and not very good quality. Especially it is very difficult to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d807896-Reviews-Congee_Noodle_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Connie's Cook House,"Connie’s Cookhouse is. favorite place for Chinese food on Kitsilano’s 4th Ave. Regulars have long beaten a path to its door for its wide- ranging Chinese fare, which includes other regions besides the more usual Cantonese only, often common in Vancouver’s Chinese food offerings. It...More
The food may be acceptable but the people are seriously messed up. When your deliver person mocks the recipient because they’re blind (legally, but can still see a jerk) and you leave them feeling like crap, you need to seriously check yourself. Plus you got...More
Connie’s Cookhouse became a quick favorite from the moment we discovered it on Kitsilano’s 4th Ave, just west of Arbutus and a few doors away from Lululemon. I generally was happy to be the family cook and most commonly had a meal prepared for our...More
I've been a regular lunchtime customer at Connie's for several years. The cuisine and the decor are simple and non-pretentious. The lunch special includes either hot and sour or won-ton soup, rice and tea besides a variety of beef, chicken, pork and seafood dishes. My...More
We had dinner at Connie's cookhouse decided on from a quick web search and proximity to where we were staying in Kitsilano (4th Avenue, 2100 block). Totally unpretentious but also totally Chinese. For our first visit we both had the dinner for one combo allowing...More
I loved this place. Great food. Generous portions. Great service. Good price. Great pick up service too.
We are visiting family in Kitsilano and came here last year. We were looking forward to a return visit but left feeling underwhelmed. The food was bland, overcooked and unappetising. Will we be back? Probably not.
The locals like coming here for Chinese Food as its one of the best in Kits. The lunch specials are filling, the food is well prepared. Just expect a basic restaurant, if you're dining in. We use the 'take out' all the time.
Hard to find the real deal ... Cantonese.. outside of Richmond. You google 'Chinese restaurant'' in the Kitsilano area, and it's 'fusion', or 'taiwanese', or generalised 'Chinese' which you can't tell what exactly it is. Connie's is where you wanna go for authentic Cantonese, massive...More
This is totally the real deal - a ripper - Connie is for real, the food is totally classic Canadian-Chinese Cantonese - slightly updated. There's nothing chic chic or bespoke or fusion about this place: it's vibe is just like the one you went to...More
This is a very nice and comfortable diner on 4th Avenue which is so easily overlooked. Who would think that with a name like Connie's Cook House that they would only serve Chinese food. When in the neighborhood drop in for a bite to eat,...More
Got the cashew chicken to go. Was very reasonable and good portion for $9.25 CND. Service was fast and I was allowed to charge my cellphone will waiting for the meal to be prepared. Quite tasty.
When visiting our son in Kitsilano this is our ""Go To"" take out restaurant. Their Chinese Food is CLEARLY made from fresh ingredients and very flavourful. I can honestly say we have not tasted better. Delivery is fast and HOT!
We love going here when we come to Vancouver. We used to live here a zillion years ago but didn't know Connie's existed back then. It is nestled amongst quaint quirky shops on West 4th in Kitsilano. Parking is a pain but a couple of...More
I am Cantonese Chinese and this Cantonese food is excellent! I absolutely love the Egg Foo Yung, the Deep Fried Peppery Squid, and the Beef Chow Fun (flat, wide rice noodles). Everything was cooked to perfection! No MSG! Just 2 blocks away ... I must...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d787642-Reviews-Connie_s_Cook_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Continental Seafood Restaurant,"We have been here many times and always has been great. This being Father's Day, they opened earlier and luckily we had reservations as the place was packed when we got there at 10 am. They offer a great variety of Dim Sum as they...More
4 of us went for Brunch on Sunday to the Continental Seafood Restaurant. As always, the food was fresh, and all delicious. Our favorite place in town for Dim Sum.
They still have the carts!!! It feels like a dim sum restaurant when you have the push carts of food being brought to your table. And the little plates are so good!! Shrimp shumai, fried dumplings and noodles - so yummy. Not the cheapest thing...More
We have been here many times for Dim Sum, and always great food. Everything we ate tasted very fresh, and the service was excellent.
We have been eating here for many years, and always have great Dim Sum. I have written many review about this place so not sure why I had to write all about it again.
Stopped in end November for lunch 12 of use at one table. Price $30 not worth it, first few dishes were food like scallop shrimp, pork rolls and few others one item per person, then chow mien type dishes. Food was good, but not enough,...More
We came due to a recommendation through a Chinese friend and we were luckily seated at this busy, large restaurant without reservations on a Friday at lunchtime. The ladies pushing food carts were helpful, telling us in English what they had, and one of the...More
This is one of our favorite restaurants for Dim Sum. We make reservations, and always go on a Sunday morning. The food is always fresh, and just great. They bring the carts around with food in the little bamboo baskets. The staff all wear masks,...More
They have just re-opened after being closed for the Covid19. You have to have reservations. They have a machine that takes everyones temperature before they seat you. Many tables are now gone in order to do proper spacing. Staff all wearing gloves & masks. 4...More
This is a very busy restaurant with good reason. Always full and you need to make a reservation if you have a few people. Get there early. The selection of food keeps coming and you pay for the dishes that you eat from. Excellent value...More
Very Large Place & Very Busy at times Food is Great !!!!! Shrimp Won Ton Soup is my Fav Service is very good Dim Sum served till 3:00 ...... could eat it all day !! Highly Recommend
Love the food trolleys that the waitresses bring around. We can look at each item and choose immediately. Always fresh, always good. Only draw back is that many of the staff do not speak English.
I have been going to this restaurant for many years. I cannot resist the dim sum and the atmosphere the restaurant has to offer. The dim sum is still served on the rolling carts. The old fashion way. You can see and chose the portion...More
Very nice restaurant. They speak English with difficulty but it is worth the effort. The food is brought out on carts like the old times. The food was exceptional. We has some familiar food and some new ones and they all were very good. We...More
came here based on reviews in TA. The place is enormous, service is indifferent and abrupt. The selections were not as varied as anticipated. There is a lot of custom ordering from the menu.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2697686-Reviews-Continental_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Cora Breakfast & Lunch,"We went twice while visiting Vancouver. Four of us had delicious meals, beautiful presentation. The variety of fresh fruit that came with our meal was amazing. Lots of yummy menu items. No frills dining, standard service.
Absolutely delicious. The best place for breakfast. I had the custard filled waffle, topped with extremely fresh fruit and cream. I ate it all, even though it was huge. Definitely 10/10. Staff super friendly. Huge portions. After trying Cora, we tried other places which were...More
Had a delicious breakfast here yesterday morning. The staff were really friendly and attentive, particularly our server, Viviana. Kept us topped up with coffee and water. Great choice of food available. Would highly recommend.
We stopped at Cora's for breakfast. It is a typical Cora restaurant with friendly staff. The restaurant is clean with plenty of seating.
Looking for somewhere on Robson Street for a good quality breakfast, then look no further. We had a lovely experience at Cora. The food was fresh and the service was spot on. All staff still wearing facemasks which is actually re-assuring. Thankfully the tea was...More
Just a delight to see after experiencing staff shortages and long waits at other breakfast places that Cora’s in Kelowna is staffed with smiling, intuitive, efficient, timely, and attentive staff along with colorful presentation and delicious taste of the breakfasts themselves. The prices are reasonable...More
Visiting from Texas we chose Cora’s for brunch after riding the Ferry to Victoria. We were seated quickly by the friendly host and opened the menu. What beautiful food. Their presentation on each dish was a work of art. I have never enjoyed eating fruit...More
Big portions. Completely tasty. Massive menu. Something for everyone. What sold me, however, is the fact that from the website you can order breakfast to be ready for pick-up at a specific time. We tried the feature and it worked a charm. Our travelling party...More
Consider sharing....the portions are large but then people are eating more these days. Right next door to Barclay Hotel and has outdoor seating in a parklet.
It's a great place to get some breakfast! The fruit is really fresh and tasty. You have a choice to sit in or outside. Very friendly and helpful staff! But it's a little too much, that's the only down side. I highly recommend eating here...More
Nice restaurant to have a good time with your family or friends. They have classic options for breakfast. Excellent hot chocolate.
Came here for breakfast - what a great choice! The menu is huge - the only problem is deciding what to have. We were seated quickly and also served quickly by a friendly and efficient server. The breakfast tea was decent for British tastes, the...More
We love Cora in Victoria, so we were really looking forward to hitting up their location in Vancouver! It was really disappointing, as the quality of food and service was quite different from the Victoria branch. The signature fruits were brown and dry when they...More
What a wonderful place for breakfast! Staff are friendly and helpful and food is good value and beautifully presented. I had the bagel with lox plus fruit and the attached picture shows what a wonderful selection of fruit this included. I was watching other people...More
We used Cora for breakfast while staying in Vancouver. Fantastic meal, massive choice and wonderful service!!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10145567-Reviews-Cora_Breakfast_Lunch-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Corduroy,"Corduroy on Cornwall in Kits has enlarged its menu, offering an enlarged veg menu. Additions are imaginative. II started with two sweet potato tacos on special at 5$’a taco. They were wrapped with arugula , black beans, and corn. I followed with a tuna poke...More
Corduroy, on Cornwall in Vancouver, has joined other eateries in the Kitsilano neighborhood, adding raw ahi tuna dishes to its menu. Corduroy, mainly known for its pizza, now offers an ahi tuna rice bowl and ahi tuna tacos. It had as an opening special three...More
Friday nights at Corduroy — just off the corner of Walnut on Cornwall — offer a happy hour from 5 to 8 pm, where beers are 5$ for a sleeve, 2 $ off, as are some wines and cocktails. It also usually has a special...More
After testing a few bowl recipes over recent weeks to see how they were received by customers, Corduroy formally added four bowls to its pizza- focused menu, the night Japan began the 2022 fireworks series, I had the Thai “Beach Bowl” as the four additions...More
Just Awesome! Corduroy 1943 Cornwall Ave, Vancouver, British Columbia is owned by excellent people who are willing to stand up and fight for what is right!!
Some of these low reviews are hilarious. Covid magically knows how to avoid the tables and bars at other restaurants in a sheeps head. Great service and excellent food. Highly recommend. Especially if you want to be around people who can think for themselves and...More
Very pleasurable happy hour with lager and potato bacon pizza . Great service and ambience. We had a pleasant experience s and will be back next week to try a different pizza.
A couple of friends and I went to Corduroy for lunch today and the food was amazing! We had the wings, brussle sprouts and bacon wrapped scallops and everything was delicious 😋 Can't wait to go back!
nice ambient and decor. tasty food. great service. I would definitely recommend it. Overall great experience.
Great restaurant! Great people! Great food! Highly recommended 👍 we always enjoy our visit to Corduroy, never disappointed.
Amazing place absolutely love there pizza, Staff did a great job. Amazing ambience and decor. Highly recommended!
Had fun, good service. Food was tasty, beer was cold. I would definitely recommend this place. Check it out.
Fantastic location! Kids loved the pizza :) we had lunch.. beached for the afternoon and got takeout for dinner. Fantastic staff were really great with the kids. Perfect location and cool VanCity vibes. Thanks!!!
Went there for a meal yesterday. The food was spectacular, service top notch. Love the ambience and decor. Highly recommended!
What a FANTASTIC place to gather over food! Amazing food, and super, friendly service. Highly recommended!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4411123-Reviews-Corduroy-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Corduroy Pie Company,"We ordered the mushroom with red sauce and the Margarita with Anchovies. Both were good. We were a bit disappointed with the arugula in the mushroom.
Forget your sourdough starter, Corduroy’s sourdough crust can’t be beat! And make sure you get their green goddess salad too! Chambré and the gang are so friendly. Love the draft beer and wine selection. Everything you could ask for a in a local hot spot....More
I seen this place on Triple D so we had to check it out. We had a little bit of a wait because of Covid restrictions but not long. We tried the special pizza of the day and it was excellent. The crust was thin...More
I love the pizzas here - been here a couple of times for both eat-in and take out and the pizza quality have been excellent. I don’t usually order veggie type pizzas but the mushroom pizza with oyster mushrooms, goat cheese and arugula is truly...More
Seeing as we are visiting Corduroy frequently I must truly say the Pizza is outstanding but the customer service is probably the worst I have ever experienced. That saying I have lived in a couple of countries, working in customer service myself and worked as...More
I am Italian and this the absolute best pizza that I ever had on the north American continent (I’ve been flying as a flight attendant for the last 13 years so believe me I know what I am taking about!) The dough is just perfect!...More
Really friendly staff and great pizza. Especially like the lamb sausage. Wish they were open a bit earlier though (they open at 5pm)
Chose this place because it’s close to the medical district. What a great choice!! Small place with friendly staff. Lots of takeout going out so it has to be a local favorite. The man on the street recommenced the special but we opted for the...More
Our third time here - the pizzas are great: slightly unusual toppings, made fresh and with generous amounts of ingredients. Delicious crust too! They have a great selection of local and craft beers too. The staff are great - running around to get everyone served....More
It's really good but I hadn't been there in a while and they have shrunk their pizzas - for $40.00 you get 2 child size pizzas. They are good but ridiculously overpriced. Better off with Don't Argue or Pizza Garden. Same price, twice the size,just...More
The best! With so many pizza joints around town this one really sticks out. Great menu, plenty of options for everyone
Wow this place knows how to cook great pizzas! We,eat a couple of friends in here tonight and had a really good meal and drinks. It’s small inside and doesn’t take bookings so get here early! There’s about 8/10 pizzas on the menu and all...More
A tiny spot located between Cambie and Oak along 16th. Seats maybe 25. Good draught beer selection, fun staff, nice pie. Maybe a little pricey at 17-20$ per, but if you want to complain then stay at home and eat bland Panago.
The pizza is incredible! Great flavours and selections. Try the Brussel sprouts and bacon or one of their specials- so many amazing pizzas to try. Great drinks menu also!!
This place stays open late (yay) and offers up great pizza options. Good location. Tighter quarters on the inside, so take-out isn't a bad option if you have more than a few in your group. Probably the best pizza dough I've had anywhere in Vancouver.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7931121-Reviews-Corduroy_Pie_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cottage Deli Soup and Sandwich,"If you’re a tourist and looking for some diverse, trendy place with a 10 page menu, this is not the place for you! I was walking through Gas Town and thinking to myself, it’s pretty touristy here, yet I was hungry and looking for a...More
Excellent no frills deli run by a couple of elderly gentlemen. Great value tasty sandwiches. Nice seating area outside with a view.
Enjoyed a nice soup and sandwich for lunch. it's no frills but feels like eating with family at the same time. The two older gentlemen seemed quite but answered questions as needed . The view overlooking the bay is spectacular and a bit whimsical
The delicious bowl of chilli was just what we needed after our morning of relentless sightseeing. We sat outside looking over some of the best views in town. Don’t rule this place out because it looks a bit dark and old fashioned as you peer...More
Great atmosphere! Upstairs has a view of the cruise ships. Two delightful older men run the cafe and have quite a personality. They will take US money, but can't make change. In Gastown. Highly recommend.
Right in Gastown, tucked in above the railroad tracks, this little deli is a tiny, funky, affordable breakfast or lunch option. One person behind till and grill, so it takes a few minutes to get your fare, but very tasty, friendly fellow and a price...More
Delighted to find this old school cafe in the heart of Gastown. With views past the railyard towards the sea and unpretentious deli style food, this place is a welcome reminder honest family run cafes from days gone by.
Looking for a new place to eat near my new workplace. What a treat, very old school decor and menu with fabulous views of the tracks and harbour. Food was delicious , soup and sandwich was absolutely perfect. Will come to this cool spot regularly....More
We were looking for a place with good soup and sandwiches and this was it! Almost missed it as it is tucked away. Very friendly owner, great meal, great view from the second floor. Simply a quaint, great place you should not miss! (I should...More
Nice little place with panoramic views over the railway sidings. Lovely gent running it although wasn’t made to feel overly welcome and ignored on way out. The lack of matching crockery was a surprise and food only alright for the price. Good job it wasn’t...More
nice quiet place just off the crowds near the steamclock in gastown. lovely patio with a great view and very affordable good food served by friendly men
We stumbled on this deli in a side street close to the Steam Clock. We’d just arrived in Vancouver on a very rainy day and we’re looking for some quick and hot food. The soup and sandwiches are superb and at amazingly low prices. The...More
Tucked up a little side street down the road from the steam clock. Very rustic. Lovely fella running it from Cyprus. He's been here 20 years. Coffee was smooth and good. Loved the mug! $8.50 for latte and cappuccino It's no frills but the view...More
Wandering down a very windy cold waters street in Vancouver we discouvered a original piece of old Vancouver deli serving hot soup and sandwiches. Wife had a gluten free sandwich. Both soups wrer homemade wonderful.
Freshly cooked food. Friendly and quick service, wide choice. Lovely views over harbour to North Van. Very close to the Hop On, Hop Off Bus stop and handy if you’re visiting the Steam Clock.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5107455-Reviews-Cottage_Deli_Soup_and_Sandwich-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cotto Enoteca Pizzeria,"This restaurant is permanently closed, too bad great place. It had great pizza, pasta. No idea why it closed, I asked the Surrey location, but they would only say it will not reopen.
Decided to try for lunch on a friend's recommendation. Ordered antipasti platter, caprese salad and capricciosa pizza to share. Took half pizza home. Was delicious. Truffle ricotta cheese on platter and the meats were great. Caprese salad was a variety of tomatoes and lovely drrssing....More
GOOD: App are amazing Friendly service Great patio (COVID) BAD: Pizza was nothing special, maybe even below par Constantly loosing reservations Too expensive for what you are getting (MAINS) Not worth returning. This is just an opinion.
Amazing!! We visited from out of town, this was our first real ""date"" since the VID hit. Everything was perfect...pizza...pasta..antipasto....wine...wine ...wine serving staff were super friendly. I'd come back here again in a heartbeat!!
Enjoyed our dinner here. Great service - excellent job with Covid safety, talking through the options, and checking in. The interior feels a little garage-like so it doesn't have a cozy feel, which may work great for you. Nice selection of local craft beers and...More
We’ve been customers of Cotto for years now. Always a great experience and the food is great. I love the outdoor patio, the happy friendly servers and the menu. Their pizzas are awesome and so is their happy hour. They also have an app that...More
If Commercial Dr is Little Italy, then North Burnaby is Little Rome. The oven brick pizzas and pasta restaurants are so good here and Cottos is one. We started off with the meatball appetizer and the callamarri appetizer. Both were great tasting and filling. We...More
Service was mediocre at best. Food was decent but for a pizzeria the pizza sucked. Was cold, dry and cardboard like. Had chicken saltimbocca and that was good but cold with cold red sauce. Not coming back
My husband and I stumbled upon this place tonight. All I can say, is WOW! The atmosphere and decor were so welcoming - it’s exactly what we were looking for. Rachael, our server, was so sweet and so friendly, (but not overly, if that makes...More
The atmosphere is very nice and the decor as well. However, they do not offer much variety on the menu and I found the food very bland.
We had a pleasant date night out this past week. Starter Caesar salad was mediocre, it did not have the extra bite it used to have, no fresh parmesan nor anchovies. Meals were delicious, considerably smaller than the past I remember. Our server was very...More
We had things to do in Burnaby, and chose this restaurant virtually by chance for dinner. How lucky that we did! We liked the room, and the fact that it had football (soccer) on its television screens was a good omen for an Italian restaurant....More
We repeated this restaurant twice in four days of our stay in Vancouver itself describe that how satisfied we were . Drinks 🍷 moctails starters all were very good . Top of it all the girls taking orders were full of energy and positive vibes...More
Truly amazing food, friendly atmosphere, and great service. Our daughter only wants to eat at Cotto's when she is in town. The pizza is perfection as is the pasta. The onion jam is my new favorite, I was missing the fig jam on the antipasti...More
Stopped in Cotto on May 8th. The service was professional and friendly, the place had a nice vibe and the food looked amazing. Our meal was delicious and I left excited to have found a new great spot near the office. On May 27th, arranged...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3382346-Reviews-Cotto_Enoteca_Pizzeria-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Cozmos Cafe,"My boyfriend and I went for brunch on a Sunday morning and it was less than satisfying to say the least. When we arrived there were no tables available inside which was fine, and we were offered a table on the back patio. No vaccine...More
Its about a half hour drive from where my wife and I live.But it well worth the drive.Perfect homemade hollandaise sauce.Great coffee. The lady whom is one of the owners it polite and provided great service.Our go to Benny spot! Johnathan and Cynthia.
Excellent food & coffee. Very compliant with covid 19 procedures which was not always our experience in the Burnaby area. Ate there on two occasions as family eating places are increasingly rare with urban redevelopement pricing out small enterprises.
Checked reviews when looking for a new breakfast place. Have now been there twice. 1st time the heat was not working so very cold but packed. Good sign that people still will go despite a freezing place. Waitress was entertaining and made our experience even...More
Very pleasant brunch on a cold December morning. Nice staff,good value and a welcoming atmosphere. Good coffee too!
Met a friend here for brunch. It was a Saturday- fairly busy place. We both ordered the chicken eggs benny - it was delicious. The Hollandaise sauce was made perfectly- not too rich. Staff was super nice - my friend and I stayed a bit...More
Cute little local place - bright and charming, with a nice back patio. Good selection of breakfast options. Enjoyed our eggs benny and omelettes. Nice to support a local place where the food is close to homemade. Will be back!
Went to cozmos for Sunday brunch. Nice interior somewhat small but cozy. Had the Greek benny's. Precious little to make it 'Greek'. I was mistakenly thinking it would be a little like a Greek salad or similar- not. The hash browns were too crunchy for...More
Some friends took us here for lunch and we were very happy with everything. The service was fantastic and the food was very good, The restaurant is not very big but it was comfortable and the staff is great. We definitely will be back and...More
My wife and I have eaten here a number of times, breakfast, lunch, and dinner. All food is made to order so it is always fresh, great menu as it has a bit of everything. The staff will bend over backwards to make yoh happy....More
The service was very good and the food was delicious. The Eggs Benny was to die for! Hubby had a Mexican omelette, which was good, but he wasn’t crazy about the sausage links. They also have express drinks.
We really enjoy this small local restaurant. Food is always hot and delicious, and service is friendly. We enjoy sitting out on the back patio in good weather. They have recently remodeled and the result is a much brighter space. Nice addition to the front...More
Breakfast serve all day, coffee good all in menu are good, easy to park, and easy to find, big plates awesome food.
My husband and I went to Cosmos Cafe to meet up with a friend from North Van. This was our first time, but I enjoyed the visit. Their special for the day was smoke salmon Benny, and I ordered it. I liked the cream cheese...More
We've passed by this place many times going to the soccer stores. Nice neighborhood style cafe. Good choices on the breakfast menu. We had the standard and Benny. Food was good and hot. Americano coffee is ok, could use better beans. Otherwise lots of food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d971537-Reviews-Cozmos_Cafe-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Crave India,"The best Indian restaurant in town! Cheap, friendly and GOOOD!!! Menu in good and have vegan options. Fresh and fast food.
I was looking for something close, something Indian. So I came across this place. The people definitely are friendly, however the food was not to my taste. I ordered a Palak paneer, expecting it to be creamy, spinachy and loads of paneer. However this did...More
Nice staff, understands your requirement, good food, and great customer service. We tried the vegetarian options and it turned out to be really tasty.
This dish has depth, flavorful sauce, tender chicken and a spicy punch. Had this over rice bowl to go... it is very good. Will be back.
The samosa is big and yummy - great value. Service was good and friendly. Had the curry lamb combo and the chicken tikka masala combo - both were good. The best thing is their naan
It's a small take out restaurant with few table to sit down and enjoy your meal. prices are very affordable and food is tasty, home food.
Nice butter chicken with a nice little zing. Nan bread was huge and delicious! Not much chicken but forcthe price it was excellent. Tiny little spot,not fancy but great food.
The food was awesome and the curry really spicy, just the way I like it! The owner was very nice and friendly too. Amazing food and amazing prices! :)
Good food for takeout. Small place doubt you will get a seat. I had the butter chicken combo not much chicken but cheap food, naan is great. Clearly got takeout and wasn't given any cutlery thus the four stars.
Only a few tables available and appear to cater more for takeaway. Friendly staff, quick service and excellent Indian dishes.
It's a small restaurant and easy to get missed out on Granville Street. Their food are always great (esp their butter chicken and naan bread). Highly recommended.
Awesome little place open for 8 years now. Family run and authentic, our nann was hand made while we waited with lots of fresh garlic and herbs, amazing! Super cheap and generous portions we go every time we are in the city, first time in...More
This is a hole in the wall. Does not even have a window. Neighborhood is sketchy. Can only seat 6. Garlic naan is exquisite they are a little stingy with the meat in their dishes (pucca Indian style) but the dishes are tasty. A tad...More
This place is little but between the spice of the food and the smiles of the owner it's filled with the kinds of good things a restaurant should have - flavor and friendliness. It's not a pretentious place but the food was great! I only...More
What a great find! Delicious chicken tikka masala and lamb curry and without question the best Naan bread, baked on order and perfect! Totally made the meal. Cannot wait to go back again! Definately do not hesitate to eat here!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2365895-Reviews-Crave_India-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cristos Greek Restaurant,"Please update the phone number for this restaurant. This page has my number and I receive phone calls all the time.I do not know the actual number but I am sure it is on the restaurant’s website.
All good in price and value made with very fresh ingredients and was served promptly, but a reasonable pace.
The food it's self was decent but lacking flavor the price for what we got wasn't worth it. Not a place I would go out of my way for, plus we were ignored by our server before they went to sit and eat with eachother...More
Six of us went there to celebrate a birthday, mostly because the location was convenient for everyone. My husband and I had been there before when it was Cristo’s. We thought that the food was good, but overpriced. We met the owner and discovered that...More
i want my $$ back.worst dining experience ever . ribs dry, calamari a few pieces...… worst ever...……………………………………………………..More
Thank you Ben... we do serve our ribs on the dry side and our fried calamari is never a few pieces... but we cannot comment on how much customers want to eat. Our portions are large by any standards. Our meals come with rice and...More
First time here and was not disappointed. Generous portions of delicious food. The Lamb Shank was melt in your mouth. Everything was tasty and the service was excellent!
Thank you so much Ryan!
If atmosphere is what you are after this is the place. Unfortunately the food is lacking! Pretty pricey for its quality. The tzatziki is really lemony which is strange..I think there was actually lemon rind in it. The calamari looked way over done but actually...More
Hi there. Our meals come with rice and potatoes and start at $10 with the most expensive one be $17. Our Happy Appy hours start at $4. We use organic products when possible and fresh herbs to make from scratch all of our menu items....More
Next to Chinese, I like Greek best. Have a favourite restaurant in New Westminster, but when a friend recommended this place, I looked forward to the opportunity to try something new. I wasn't disappointed. Firstly, I appreciated the ""a la carte"" option. Not one who...More
Thank you so much! Its true that the ALA CARTE option is used often as customers want to make their own plate.
Ordered 1 chicken and lamb pita pocket, it comes with veggies, fries, tzatziki sauce and 2 pita bread pockets per order. What I got was 1 sauce cup, 2 skewers of lamb, chicken, 2 untoasted pita and nothing else. I called the restaurant right at...More
Hi Rob This is interesting. You got way more food (2 skewers of lamb) ... thats not half the order, but we do understand that your error to order from the lunch menu during dinner time was not explained to you properly.
We had friends in from out of town and wanted to meet up before they flew out the next day. They were staying at a B&B in north Burnaby and as it was raining we decided to avoid the popular pasta place down the road...More
Thank you for this review.
Went to Cristos the other night as much because visitors from Toronto were staying in the neighbourhood as the fact we used to go there more than 20 years ago when we lived in North Burnaby. Don't know if the ownership and management is the...More
Thank you for the review. We have changed management and changed certain things including the decorations. However,if you did enjoy our food that is most excellent and we are thankful all went well.
First visit and pleased to say this is a great place to eat if you appreciate traditional Greek restaurants. The food was great, a little on the pricey side but the portions are fair. My only compliant is that they don't make good mojitos, but...More
Four of us visited Cristos recently after a long absence. Used to go maybe 2 to 3 times a year before, always enjoyed the food, atmosphere etc. Unfortunately, this visit was not quite what we had anticipated. We were seated, given menus, asked for water,...More
We've been to Cristos on several occasions now. Food and service are always good. The decor is nice. A few days ago several of our family went for lunch (we usually just go for dinner) and once again had a very good experience. Recommended, we...More
We both loved it! My daughter had the Spanakopita & Greek Salad, and I had the Calamari & Caesar Salad. We were both raving to each other about how amazing it all tasted. Even the pita bread was to die for. The tzatziki sauce was...More",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d1071614-Reviews-Cristos_Greek_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Crowbar Restaurant,"Unassuming spot in an up and coming culinary neighbourhood (savio volpe is across the street). The food was innovative and unique, well executed and very satisfying. Whole roasted branzino was very memorable- served on a tasty bed of sauce, greens. Also served with a side...More
Service was top notch- casual and welcoming. Menu changes regularly. Every dish has personality and great attention to detail without overwhelming your taste buds. Soooooooo good! Both visits we had share plates with the whole table. Too many favorites to choose from!
Favorite place in Vancouver. You can tell the chef loves his job. Love the ambience and service is fantastic. Menu changes often in such a good way.
On the outside its easy to pass by this place without thinking much of it but this place has some serious good food and some good drinks. I've been here several times and always leave feeling content. I remember having a pasta dish and was...More
A friend and I popped-in one night when the Hipster Triangle restaurants were full to capacity. We had a couple of cocktails and wine which were as expected but the food was a joke. It is like some experimental wanna-be chef has been let go...More
Cute place with a great vibe and even better drink selection to hang with friends or enjoy with a date. Friendly staff. Didn’t get to eat here as we had dinner plans across the street but perfect and fun place to wait and have a...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew the crowbar . I heard about their secret menu burger and wanted to give it a try. Its aged beef so its very juicy but very rich. It comes with a nice side of salty potatoes but the...More
A friend took me here. Sharing plates. We had the amazing burger, meat aged for days and not available every day. The vegetable sides were so tasty. Will definitely come back.
Came here for a post-dinner drink, but wish we had come for dinner! Diners around us were eating dishes that looked wonderful, and everyone seemed to be enjoying their meals immensely. Our cocktails had wonderful flavours, and we'll definitely return again. Also, thumbs up on...More
A group of us shared a number of dishes the Brussel sprouts, broccoli and scallop ceviche were crowd favourites. Their burgers are AMAZING!
Well, we came from HK and since we have friends that ate there back in Oct and recommended this joint for a go. However, the menu have changed (afterward when we compared note of what we ordered). Definitely nothing that good worth bragging and for...More
Nothing beats a wonder gastropub for a long over due meet up with friends. Make a reso because it does fill up fast. We came during Happy Hour, cheap drinks and 50% off selected food menu. Shared a bunch of appetizers and some pasta dishes...More
Burger. Brussel sprouts. Broccoli. Risotto. So delicious! The staff are so wonderful. The chef kills it in the kitchen. Definitely worth a stop!
Had time to kill while waiting for our table at another restaurant. Stopped in for cocktails and so glad we did. The bartenders are so good at their craft and you can’t go wrong with whatever you order. Didn’t eat anything except the arancini and...More
Found this place on Yelp for a late night dinner on Saturday night. The atmosphere was inviting and so was the staff. Prices are good for the portions. Creative drink menu. Food was outstanding. They accommodated a vegetarian request with something the chef created on...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11923192-Reviews-Crowbar_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Cuchillo,"We had a fabulous meal at Cuchillo, the food was amazing and we were looked after by a real sweetheart, Brenda, who provided great service with a big smile. Great decor and ambiance, we loved it.
Our server's attitude was just terrible. When he was not able to answer our question, he became super aggressive. Then he forgot our order and didn't even apologize as if we were wrong to think we ordered it. Later we overheard him saying ""20 years...More
I have been to Cuchillo several times and reviewed them in the past. My experience was great, but something has changed, and that is terrible. I am Latino with a Latina wife. I invited a couple that is Latinos as well to join at Cuchillo....More
What a taste treat! Wonderful and friendly service. Great atmosphere as well. Will definitely go again.
My husband and I visited here on holidays as it was highly recommended to us by his brother who lives in Vancouver. It did not disappoint. Really high quality food with lovely cocktails. Get the scallops!
We went to Cuchillo for my husband's birthday with 10 people and the experience was fantastic. I made a reservation and the restaurant suggested a tasting menu for $35pp which came with a lot of food and gave us a diverse sampling of the menu....More
It was my first time here and I loved the food and the vibe. We had a bottle of wine but we saw many cocktails served. We were seated in the last table shared in a sitting lounge format that had two separate tables. It...More
One of our guests has a very unique allergy to cumin. I emailed the Cuchillo team ahead of booking to explain and two of the owners/managers took the time to answer back and pointed to the regular menu items she should avoid and those that...More
Went for the dine out and was happy with the food and the taste. 100% percent worth every penny. The scallops, prawns, chicken tacos simply outstanding. The ambience was a total let down. Music was loud and guests talking even louder spoilt it for a...More
I tried once and it was very good, excellent place the food is excellent. Prices are Ok. The Dine Out Is good idea for them
We have dined at Cuchillo twice in the last couple of months and enjoyed it very much. Service is pleasant and ""Covid aware"" with care paid to cleaning, contact info, and physical measures. We felt totally safe both times. Food is excellent with varied tastes:...More
We visited for dinner at the end of July. This is the best restaurant I have been too in Vancouver so a local gem for Vancouverites more than tourists maybe. A great selection on all fronts: from appies to entree to dessert and drinks. Everything...More
The staff are friendly and helpful. The ambience is relaxed and contemporary. The food is excellent. I love the cucumber, jicama salad!
Thanks to Bartender Gregor Kennedy for making our evening unforgettable by being attentive, witty, kind, and knowledgeable. Recommended Laughing Stock wine which we now love and enjoy at home. The sable fish, cornbread, roasted peppers, scallops and cauliflower were all delicious and cooked to perfection....More
We went to Cuchillo at happy hour last night. The four of us all gave the experience thumbs up. There is a youthful energy from the moment I walked in. Twenty-somethings fill the group tables near the front door and it is a mix of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4601837-Reviews-Cuchillo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Curve,"Waited 15 minutes for 2 drinks that never came. We sat and watched wait staff hovering around each other. I went up to the not busy bar and said we've been waiting 15 minutes for 2 drinks. She pointed to a bill and said coming....still...More
The Curve now sever breakfast from 7 am , very limit menu , not pricy at all , around $30 with tip , very quiet like a funeral home , surprisingly my west coast benny very delicious , eggs just right , not runny ,...More
My husband and I went to Curve restaurant 2x during our stay, and stayed less then 10 minutes each time. The first time it was 10am on a Monday morning and I wanted some iced tea. When I approached the bar, I was immediately turned...More
Great place to kick back and relax with friends and family! !The bar has limited but good choice of beers. There is an extensive cocktail list and the bar appetizers/meals are absolutely delicious
The service was slow and the food was ok. We enjoyed the live music while we dined. I wasn't wowed and don't think I'll be back.
Went in for a drink and ended up staying and having a great Saturday night! Allan, Evelyn and the team were amazing!! Will definitely go back...can not wait for the patio to open💖
Curve is an open area concept bar situated below the River Rock’s signature curved escalator – hence the name! Often a favourite destination for drinks or snacks just before a show, Curve offers patrons a casual setting with an intimate, sophisticated ambiance. Featuring large comfortable...More
We stopped by Curve for pre-show drinks and an appetizer. We shared a delicious prawn and chorizo flatbread that was perfect for two. I enjoyed a glass of Sumac Ridge Merlot. Nice to see lots of BC wines on the menu. My partner had a...More
“Thank you for your feedback! We are delighted that you had a pleasant visit with us at Curve Lounge. We hope to see you again soon!” -Paulyn De Castro, Food & Beverage Duty Manager
Great pub food we came back from thailand after two months we craved poutine and burgers 🍔 😝 this place has amazing old fashions and the service was 👌👌
“Thank you for leaving us such wonderful feedback regarding your visit at Curve Lounge. We are pleased that you had a great experience; and we will definitely pass along the comments our team. Thank you, and we look forward to seeing you again.”
Allan is the name to remember. If you appreciate personalized and professional service and enjoy be treated like a human, visit him at the Curve lounge. Seating is comfortable, The music is not invasive and decor is pleasant.More
“Thank you for leaving us such wonderful feedback regarding your visit at Curve Lounge. We are pleased that you had a great experience; and we will definitely pass along the comments to Allan for his excellent service. Thank you, and we look forward to seeing...More
We visited and stayed in the hotel for business. We made our way to the Curve bar and restaurant and sat at the bar. The food and ambiance were very good, but it was the service by our bartender Allan that stood out the most....More
Good Day, We are delighted to hear that you had a wonderful dining experience at the Curve Lounge . Your positive feedback will be shared with Allan your bartender and the Curve Team as we continue to strive for the best experience to all our...More
Perfect for a late night snack. Quick service with a nice variety of choices. Good location just inside casino...........
Thank you for your feedback, please visit us again for happy hour and our new menu offerings in the New year.
Curve Lounge is a nice, casual spot to stop by and enjoy a bite and beverage before catching a show at the River Rock theatre, or blowing all your money in the casino. It's a small, open concept/lobby style restaurant that fills up quickly when...More
Thank you for joining us, we appreciate your feedback and look forward to seeing you again soon.
Outside on a sunny day, Curve has fabulous views of the Fraser River and lovely gardens. Inside on a weekend, there is always good entertainment. Anytime, the food and drinks and service are all top quality!
Happy to hear that you enjoyed your time at our Curve lounge! I will pass along your comments to our Food & Beverage team. Thank you for sharing your feedback and we hope to see you again soon!
Great lounge in the lobby. Very good live music the day I was there. Very good service. Nice spot for a quiet drink",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7716569-Reviews-Curve-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
DJJ's Wedge Pizza,"THE BEST PIZZA I’ve had in a very long time. Perfect crust and loads of cheese. My new favourite and go to!!
The best pizza I have ever had its perfectly cooked its not cheap crappy food ingredients its high quality and cheaper than most other pizza restruants its a must do
Best Thai Chicken Pizza ever! Wish they would advertise more and even have some coupons! They used to be located Upper Lonsdale. I believe it was created by the sons of Ray Baroni who used to run Dino's on Lonsdale in the 70-80s.
Been hoping for a decent and not crazy priced pizza in the cove for a long time. Sorry Raven your pizza has declined in quality and price has increased. DJJ’s hits the spot nicely. We ordered the traditional and pig and whistle. Tasty, good quality...More
This is a go to for my boyfriend and I. We were so upset when they closed on Lonsdale. I check periodically for them to re open but couldn’t find anything for months then finally they re emerged. What a great day! Their service is...More
Thrilled to have DJJ's in the neighbourhood - delicious pizza literally 3 minutes from my house. They saved us a couple of weeks ago after the wind storm we had no power for 21 hours, at home in the dark, hungry and unable to cook...More
It was 18 years ago when I first tried DJJ's pepperoni pizza. It was awesome then, and tastes the same today when I had it again. That is incredible. Best combination of cheese in the business. Love everything about this pizza.
Working in this area of NorthVancouver, needed a quick lunch ,saw their sign and walked in.Ordered one of the single slice choices and a soft drink.Slice was huge and fresh.In the year of 2017 my lunch was under $5.00 ! And no wait!
I never order pizza from any other place, and there are LOT in North Van. This place is my number 1 go to, and it should be yours too! I've never actually eaten inside the restaurant as it is very small with just a countertop...More
This place Rocks! Try the Thai chicken it may be the best pizza I have eaten. Great for the family. You can eat in or take our.
After years of dabbling with take out chains and trying to find good pizza options we found it! DJJ's offers super tasty, great inventive choices. Nice thin crust, quality ingredients. Love the florentine pizza - kids like to build there own. No need to mess...More
Really good and cheap! The place is a bit small but you can seat and eat there!! One of the best pizzas in the neighbourhood
Decided to order my usual Thai spicy peanut & chicken pizza (I've made others addicted to this pizza, it's that good!) and also a side of honey garlic wings and a Greek salad. The pizza - perfection. The wings were some of the best I've...More
The pizza and salad was good. While the delivery man initially forgot the salad, he brought it very quickly. This was a great options after a day walking in the rain.
Great crust. A hint of herbs and always on delivery. Pretty good prices. Take out is fast too. Try the traditional!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4854124-Reviews-DJJ_s_Wedge_Pizza-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Daddys Delight Pizza,"Fantastic food. So favourable. Everything is made from scratch including the naan bread. Bread is made fresh with each order. It is take out only right now due to the covid crisis. Best to phone your order in ahead as it may take a while...More
First time to Daddy’s grill, ordered the joje kebab meal and Cholo Vaziri, grilled chicken and grilled beef freshly made, tender and juicy inside, lots of natural Flavours. Very satisfying, definitely a man meal. My girlfriend who is not a meat eater gives a a...More
Some of the best Kababs my entire family has had hands down. Just stumbled across this place and couldn’t be more happy, excellent meat, veggies are fresh and naan isn’t oily! Excellent price as well, if you find yourself in Richmond we all highly suggest...More
Daddy’s grill is one of my colleagues and myself favourite restaurant for lunch. It’s clean, tasty and fresh , I highly recommend it.
They are the BEST Kebabs in Town. Period. From a small restaurant with less than 10 people seating Shapoor the owner expanded his business with the acquiring of his next door option. Now it's bigger and better but is loosing his old personal charm. I...More
The venue was welcoming with delicious aromas. The food was great in presentation and taste. Really enjoyed the chicken wrap that I ordered as did the others in our group.The food is well priced and real value for money. Will definitely come back when I...More
I went to this small restaurant and I have to say I was impress (and my expectations were high after reading reviews). Great fresh food at a reasonable price and the portions are huge. I tried the chicken and beef kebabs and both were cooked...More
Ordered the mix of chicken and beef kebabs and they were delicious! So tender and flavorful! Excellent and will return!
First off, they moved to a bigger space in the same location several months back, and the signage is for Daddys Grill, so don't be looking for Daddy's Delight. This is my favorite lunch spot in Richmond. I travel here to a remote office about...More
Took my family there. We loved the chicken wrap. I had the chicken salad. It was delicious. Deliciously marinated chicken. Great value. We will go back.
Place was recommended by a Persian coworker of my husband and food was exceptionally delicious. We shared 2 kebabs, rice and salad. The chicken was tender and beef was skewered hamburger meat. Restaurant ran out of pita bread and they had to turn people away...More
Daddy's Delight Pizza is recently renamed to Daddy's Grill. Cambie Plaza is across the street (where numerous restaurants are located) so the Intersection of No. 5 Road and Cambie Road is really a destination location for dine-out. Daddy's Grill appears to have been renovated not...More
Good food--the ingredients and the meat seem fresh. The meat and the rice tastes really good. I've been back several times as a result. There's parking out front which is nice. The place gets crowded quickly, but food wait time is only 10-15mins. It's a...More
A wonderfully tasty kebab. Homemade wraps filled with plenty of grilled chicken and salad! Fast, polite and great value! Best kebabs in Richmond!
Stopped here for lunch with my son. The space was recently expanded and renovated so it's very nice and modern inside. We ordered and paid at the counter, and then food was served to our table when it was ready. Food probably took about 8-10...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4873660-Reviews-Daddys_Delight_Pizza-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Damso Modern Korean Cuisine,"We liked the food and friendly staff. Recommended! Fresh, good taste. Will visit this place again when on the road in this area.
The fried chicken is very good and tasty. The dipping sauce is perfectly tangy. The Topokki is rice cakes, noodles and some vegetables in a tangy sauce. Yummy.
We were here 2 years ago during a conference in Vancouver and we really enjoyed our time here. We had a decently large group and we tried a variety of dishes here, which were all pretty good overall. We had a variety of soups, drinks,...More
Small but cosy restaurant. We had the bibimbap which was very nice. Would come back for their other dishes.
Excellent place for AYCE pork belly, in addition it is served with rice, sauces & lettuce to wrap the pork belly. Unlimited yummy bean paste soup with a generous portion of thinly sliced beef belly with zucchini, mushrooms & cubed pieces of tofu... so yummy!...More
strong flavors with rich soicy sauce on a small restaurant where the smile and laugh of young people run free as a wild cat; it’s impossible to leave without a smile on your face and spending very little money, do be quite honest. a place...More
We were recommended this restaurant by my friend. Well for me, as a European person, service and cleanness is a number one. The glasses were not completely clean, the water from tap with lots of chlorine. The hot pot with rice and veggies & no...More
There were a queue waiting outside the restaurant when we arrived thus we waited for about 15 Minutes to be seated. In my point of view they need more as they are even too busy to clean the table when people left. We ordered “all...More
Recommend the 24hr gamjatang and 48hr korean short rib. They are flavorful and the meat is super tender. They have all you can eat option too - gonna try that next time.
While visiting my son who attends the Vancouver Film School, he insisted on taking us to this popular student hangout for Korean BBQ. The food was quite good and with the all you can eat chicken wings or all you can eat pork belly lettuce...More
loved the fried chicken even as leftovers the next day. family enjoyed korean bbq. nice small place close to stanley park, lunch before heading to biking around the park. would come here again.
Got there at opening time, tables got full fast. Yummy! Soup - 24 hour bone soup Fried chicken glazed Bbimbap - spicy pork Yogurt soju the best! ❤️ We'll eat again here!
Went there for a dinner with my girlfriend, food was okay, nothing you cannot find anywhere else in Vancouver. Big up for the bulgogi!!! Biggest problem is that the place is very small so you end up eating with someone else! Not very romantic!
If you are coming for the all you can eat wings and pork belly then you better come hungry! you can either do AYCE wings OR pork belly and not both. You have to order a drink and there is a fee if you can’t...More
I would not recommend this restaurant. After having lunch here, my stomach was very upset. I took pills and went to washroom so many times till next day. Me and my friend had some dishes on lunch menu. One food tasted awful and tasteless. Another...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2446862-Reviews-Damso_Modern_Korean_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Darby's Public House and Liquor Store,"Darby’s, a craft beer hub in Kitsilano, on the corner of 4th & Macdonald, with 35 beers on tap, will hold its Rare Brews festival on May 28th, with 32 craft breweries pouring their most exciting creations. It is a ticketed event (80$) to be...More
Snow came again to Vancouver last week, this time as late as late February but happily Darby’s again came to the rescue, delivering fish and chips, and a small- bottle six-pack of 33 Acres IPA. Staffer, Jessica, who took my phone call, was most helpful...More
Darby’s Liquor Store & Pub delivers, no matter the weather, & what snow & ice its delivery staff have to confront to do so. Tonight was a snowy but also icy night, & it seemed treacherous to venture out at all. I had not eaten...More
This place was open after a wonderful Monday night comedy club in the nearby Holywood Theatre. The reason it gets 5 stars is the best Caesar cocktail I had my whole trip. The only place to offer a gin-based cocktail rather than vodka and it...More
I have been going to Darby’s for over 5 years now and have always enjoyed it for the beer choices and the food. In the last year, though, the food has become dreadful. It’s poorly served, lazy, unattractive and often a bit cold. I know...More
I went to buy a case of beer and some vodka. I brought my son, who is one month shy of 19, to help me carry it home. I brought the beer to the counter and I picked the vodka from behind the cash register....More
They say there is always a first time, & this first time came fairly late in for me. While I have ordered from Darby’s Liquor Store when my son & his family were coming off Island to visit, or for one of my son’s birthday...More
Used to be our go to place, but the last month the service is bad, not their fault, don't think they're trained well.
This was my second visit to Darby's in two years and, once again, the food and service were excellent. I had the vegetarian benny - the surprising difference was that it included beetroot which melded wonderfully with the other ingredients. The others in my party...More
Went for an early dinner, tasty snapper tacos and chickpea fries. Choose 2 tasting boards of beer (4 in each), didn't realise $2.50 each so $10 a go, which was a tad expensive, and two were poor. Don't let this put you off, it's a...More
I met some friends there recently for a bite to eat - we all had the fish and chips along with an ale. Both the meals and the drinks were excellent. The service was friendly and responsive. Their upstairs outdoor terrace was a perfect place...More
There are no shortages of places in Vancouver to eat and drink. This place is very nice with a varied menu, reasonable prices and an outdoor deck. A good neighbourhood pub in Kitsilano.
We decided to go to Darby’s for burgers and drinks. Being a nice warm evening, we thought it would be nice to sit on the terrace patio. It was very pleasant and surprisingly very little traffic noise. We had the Jalapeño burgers, one with regular...More
The girls were out shopping, we are staying across the road. I went up on the Roof Terrace,natural Air conditioning and a pleasant setting. I had an ice cold lager which I enjoyed and the Darby Burger with Creole potato’s which went well with the...More
I went with my cousin and a group of friends to this place for some afternoon beverages. It was a great choice! They have a wide selection of beers, and some yummy appetizers. We got the nachos to share and the sweet potato fries. I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7226279-Reviews-Darby_s_Public_House_and_Liquor_Store-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dark Table,"I had a great time here! It is interesting to note how you enjoy food differently with no visual aid. There is an option called the “Daily Surprise” as a main course that I recommend. I think it so much fun to discover what you...More
Great meal - fabulous mojito and a really amazing experience. Pitch black and fun experience- we all enjoyed it and would do it again!
I was given a gift certificate many years ago for Dark Table. I didn’t want to go because I thought that the food wouldn’t be good. But I found the voucher when I was cleaning my desk and thought, why not. What a snob I...More
This is a highly recommended restaurant to visit for the simulated experience of being blind - a figurative and literal eye-opener. As we stepped back into the world of light and sight at the end of our visit, it was sobering to realise that for...More
We have been to places like the ""dialogue in the dark"" in Hamburg where you explore ""environments"" in complete darkness. So we were not completely unprepared but having dinner in the dark was exciting and inspiring beyond what we expected! We chose the surprise dinner...More
Food is basically barely edible bad cafeteria quality, no creativity at all, paper napkins and cheap Pyrex dinnerware. We speculated the place is dirty (can’t see, but we could feel a gross piece of half torn off tape next our table used to block out...More
An absolutely amazing experience. The waiter was really friendly. Every course of the food was great and the darkness enhances the evening so much. You put much more focus on tasting. Not knowing what you'll eat before the first bite is really exciting. Overall a...More
My boyfriend and I, decided that although we have lived in Vancouver for a very long time, we were surprised that we hadn’t yet dined at the dark table. So finally we went, excited and not certain of what to expect. When we arrived, we...More
It was a really neat experience with wonderful service by Yoku. Very tasty food, but a little too high a price point for how much you receive. The bathroom is in desperate need of a repaint (woman’s washroom noted) the baseboards and the door base...More
I had read many reviews before our scheduled dinner so thought I ""knew"" what it would be like. Thankfully you read the menu and order outside before entering and your very cheerful server leads you into the darkness in a congo line and seats you...More
This is a very unique dining experience that everyone should experience at least once. I have been 4 times, as I enjoy taking out of town guests for the experience. Every server I have had has provided incredible service! Sharon is my favourite. I always...More
My partner and I thought this was a fantastic dining experience!! Yuko made our evening amazing. The dining in the dark experience was unbelievable and the food topped it off! We both decided to have our whole 3 course meal as a surprise as well...More
Great experience overall. Our waiter, Omie, was brilliant, made us feel comfortable. The complete darkness is a little disconcerting initially but you get used to it. The food was good too. Enjoyed trying the surprise dishes and trying to figure out what they were. One...More
Eating a 3 course meal, in the pitch black dark, while relying on all your other senses was nothing like I had ever experienced before. Even though we were able to choose our main dish, we enjoyed guessing the flavors and ingredients that we were...More
Took our friend here for his birthday dinner. We picked the 3 course dinner and were then introduced to our server Leon. We then entered the pitch black restaurant. We felt like 3 blind mice in single file, our hands on each other’s shoulder. After...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3618850-Reviews-Dark_Table-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Davie Dosa Company,"Excellent Indian food at Vancouver. It has been a while since I had such amazing dosas. The staff is best courteous and the restaurant has an overall cozy ambience.
Thank you so much Vijaya Krishnan, we appreciate your visit and review.
The food is great, the price is reasonable for large portions and the manager and staff are courteous. If you like Indian food, this restaurant is a must to visit.
Thank you Orval for your visit and review, we appreciate it,
Dovie Dosa Company on Davie Street is a go to when you are in. Vancouver’s West End. Unfortunately there are not too many good dining options on the Davie Strip. Davie Dosa stands above most of the rest. First of all the owner is very...More
Thank you so much for your visit and recommendations, looking forward to see you on your next visit.
Great, reasonable spot in the West End by English Bay. Absolutely delicious and consistent. We always feel so good after we eat there. This time we split Spinach and Paneer Dosa and a mixed Veggie Dosa. Yummy as usual. We have had the curries and...More
Thank you so much for your visit and review, we really appreciate it.Looking forward to serve you more on your next visit.
Authentic South Indian food in Vancouver. We ordered 2 Masala dosas, prawn Biriyani and tea, all the food that was served to us tasted really good. Rightly . The prawn Biriyani tasted really good with lots of prawns in it never had such Biriyani in...More
Thank you so much Sharath Chandran for your valuable feedback, we really appreciate it. Looking forward to see yo again soon.
Wonderful time sitting by the window having fresh Dosa and Chapati! Definitely recommend coming here!
Thank you Iconico07 for your visit and review, we appreciate it.
Went to try South Indian food with my family on a late night at the time when most restaurants are closed. it’s good that is restaurant opens till late so we made sure we were quick. We ordered various dosas from their menu, me and...More
Thank you so much for your visit and review, we are happy that everyone enjoyed. See you on your next visit
Pretty authentic dosas, also with northern indian fillings as well. Good prompt and friendly service. Beer selection was poor.
Thanks for your visit and review, we appreciate it. We definitely look in to improving beer options.
I'd eaten here once before (maybe six months ago) and thought it was good, but more recently was disappointed. Although our dosas were supposedly spiced ""medium"" it was as though they'd left out the spice altogether, especially the masala dosa which was flavourless. Meanwhile the...More
Thank David for your valuable feedback, it was taken seriously. On your next visit, you will defiantly see the difference. My sincere apology on the slip on that day. Thanks for your compliments as well. Sharv Ramachandran
it was a cold and rainy afternoon on Davie at Butte. My wife and I ducked into the Davie Dosa in the early afternoon for a warm lunch. We were quite amazed at the menus diverse offerings, and living close by we determined to make...More
Thank you Hugh and Colleen for your visit and great review, we appreciate it and looking forward to see you soon.
With our recent move back to Vancouver we took a walk down Davie street to see what changed. We came across Davie Dosa where a previous Italian place was. My partner is South Asian and loves Dosa. (Dosa is a large lightly spiced crepe filled...More
Thank you Mark for your visits and compliments, we really appreciate your support. We hope to see you soon again, good luck with your new place.
The food here was amazing! Portion sizes were large and flavourful, location in the heart of Vancouver with lovely ambiance and seating that allows you to admire the action on the street while enjoying a delicious meal! The owner was our server and was kind...More
Thank you Morchimo for your visit and compliments. It was our pleasure to serve you and looking forward to see you again soon.
Today i had masala dosa and veggie biryani at this place and it was really delicious. I never had this taste before. I would like to recommend to all my friends to come to this place and enjoy the delicious food. The servers here are...More
Thank you so much for your compliments, we appreciate it. See you soon again.
The service and food was great. Had a good time on the patio with my wife and friends. Very tasty, chicken dosa.
Thank you Stephan for choosing us and giving us your feedback. Looking forward to seeing you again.
This is basically fair food. It’s okay if you’re really hungry but definitely not a destination. Sure basic. Nice service.
Thanks for your opinion.",30,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12905344-Reviews-Davie_Dosa_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
De Dutch,"Perfect offering: good food, excellent service in a prime location. Couldn’t fault anything. Such a good gluten free menu made the difference for us.
Our group of 9 ate breakfast in their private room. Our orders included Dutch pannenkoeks, various teas, coffees, juices, and meats. All were great and served in a timely manner.
Good food. Lots of food. Interesting to try Dutch version of pancake. Very popular spot right on the water. If you have time, I'd say it's worth going.
This beautiful restaurant is situated in a beautiful location on the water and provides a magnificent menu backed up by delicious food and fantastic service. A must do in Vancouver
Hit this quick breakfast spot to start the sightseeing day. The Pannekoeken is a mix between a pancake and a crepe. It's crispy, yet chewy type of cake. It is huge! It covers the entire plate and it's toppings are sat right on top of...More
We were looking for an early breakfast while we waited to board our cruise. De Dutch was right around the corner from Canada Place with stunning views. Food was wonderful but I was most thankful they allowed me to order a scaled down eggs Benedict...More
I didn't know what I was getting myself into but I was happy I did it! The crepes are SO much bigger than you think they'll be and are very filling and delicious the whole time. Getting to take a delicious bite and then look...More
We were excited to return and bring a newbie. The crepe is the highlight. I’ve never had a drier scrambled egg. The potatoes could have been fully cooked because they are tiny squares, We can say we went.
Had a fabulous breakfast two mornings in a row. Enjoyed the food, service, people and view so much first day, came back the next. So good, so fresh.
We ate breakfast there 2 days in a row because it was quality food and reasonably priced. The view was nice on the water even though it was rainy outside. Very good service.
Visited for a late breakfast with a couple of friends before flying back to the UK. The food was amazing such a great choice. Staff were incredible, so helpful and friendly. Really fantastic value for money. I wish there was one local to me in...More
A bit pricey but given the location, not unexpected. The flat pancakes looked interesting but the wife had a chicken quesadilla (good portion size) and I had an omelet. I like that one of the side choices was fruit, and it was anice little mix...More
We dined at De Dutch for 3 consecutive mornings.The first morning I had the Boer Breakfast and my sister had a banana and walnut pannekoek.The second morning I had banana,strawberry and whip pannekoek and my sister had peach Melba and whip pannekoek.The third morning I...More
This place was just opening when we were looking for an early breakfast and filled up fast but we only waited a few minutes to get a table. The young waitress did a good job at taking everyones orders and drinks arrived quickly. There was...More
During a three-day stay in Vancouver at the beginning of July, went to De Dutch twice for breakfast/brunch. What an absolute delight!! The range of pannekoek-inspired dishes was just too much to choose from - so many delicious options. And the serving staff were so...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703702-Reviews-De_Dutch-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
De Dutch Pannekoek House,"Staying in the Pan Pacific in beautiful weather it seemed a shame to eat indoors, so found this spot on the waterside. Great view of the harbour and seaplanes, even if a bit noisy sometimes. Very friendly, quick service on 2 days, slower on the...More
Breakfast is their specialty but they stay open until early afternoon. No dinner. The DPH chain was set up by a Dutch immigrant and the menu is mostly Dutch themed. The decor although pared down now, retains a trace of its original Dutch flavour. I...More
We enjoyed a variety of options from the De Dutch menu. Good, albeit frantic, service and a relaxed vibe. Pancakes were obviously a hit but various other choices also went down well. Fresh squeezed orange juice not exactly freshly squeezed but perhaps that boiled down...More
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a great review. We're happy to hear you enjoyed your lunch with us. We hope to see you again soon!
A small quaint restaurant in North Vancouver but a huge and unique menu including lots of gluten free options. A definite breakfast experience you should have while visiting Vancouver. Be sure to have the authentic pannekoek....sweet or savoury they are all excellent! So happy we...More
I enjoy visiting De Dutch. The atmosphere is usually welcoming, bright and jovial. Likewise, the staff are efficient and personable. Combined, these elements make for a truly remarkable breakfast/brunch/lunch experience. That’s why I come to this modest chain whenever I get the chance. It’s a...More
Fantastic establishment! Best whipped cream on a yummy dutch mocha or panekoken. Portions are large, food is fresh, Service is friendly and establishment is very clean. Highly recommend this place for breakfast or lunch. (Oak street location)
Undoubtedly the rudest experience of our otherwise wonderful trip to Vancouver. We visited on Monday morning, August 6. The storefront had an itty bitty front door to the left of the open patio into the restaurant which we apparently missed. When we walked in through...More
Their savoury pannekoeks are my favorite! I've been having them for years and they still taste so good!
De Dutch on Oak is a perfect spot to get a reinvigorating breakfast or brunch on a sunday morning. It’s one of those breakfast-based restaurants that specialize in eggs, burgers, french toasts, pancakes, and so forth; they have gluten free bread but vegans will have...More
I LOVE pennekoek! This restaurant is an excellent choice when you need a nourishing breakfast or brunch to fortify your day. The service is excellent and the staff are loyal, stable and customer oriented. I always feel well looked after and completely satisfied. Sunday mornings...More
We were a party of two adults and two teenagers for brunch on a Friday morning, arriving at 9:30 a.m. The restaurant wasn't too busy, but became busy while we were eating. Not a fancy place, but a nice cozy, clean, welcoming atmosphere. There is...More
Good food, service, and atmosphere. Would recommend for an informal breakfast on the Bay. They have a large variety of breakfast choices.
If you've never experienced the Dutch pannakoek you definitely should. Similar to a thicker style crepe, it is the size of a large plate and easily served with sweet or savoury toppings. The menu here is vast with a lot of options (including other traditional...More
This place is a the perfect choice for brunch if you like delicious Dutch cuisine, specially the various flavours of pannekoek. They serve brunch everyday, and even if you are not into 'pancake', you can have your traditional eggs benne, hum and toast, granola and...More
I was here last Sunday for lunch with a friend. I enjoyed an apple and cheese pancake - an unusual but delicious combo. It's a small restaurant that would do well to expand if possible as it was quite crowded. My friend and I did...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11621320-Reviews-De_Dutch_Pannekoek_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Deacon's Corner,"Staff (manager lady in particular) very rude with customers and others. Will never go back and do not recommend at all. Would also like to talk to the owner about the manager at gastown branch.
This place is always busy and I now know why. The food is incredible. Simple and tasty and great value. The chicken and waffles are my favorite breakfast item. Great staff too. Check it out but make sure you are really hungry.
Service was good. Quality beer offered there. Value for the price was okay. However, after having re-opened following the pandemic induced closures, I would have expected the owner had used the down time to put some time and rather little money into the remedial work...More
Went for a Sunday morning breakfast at 9 AM. Booths were all full, sat at one of the centre tables for two. Service is prompt and friendly, the coffee good and strong and continually topped up. We had the Breakfast Quesadilla (large and very flavourful)...More
Thank you or your comments. We hope to see you again sometime soon.
Fantastic food. This place ticks all the boxes. Good coffee, excellent down home food and a great mix of people. You won't be disappointed.
I had the Pulled pork Montecristo - it was so good, and huge. The french toast was soft and buttery and just the right amount of sweet. The two eggs on top were yummy. The pulled pork was tasty, had a perfect amount of sauce,...More
About 3 weeks ago we met our Daughter there for lunch and it made quite the impression on us. We have since gone in the last 2 weekends for breakfast. Everything we have tried has been first rate, the grilled cheese with pulled pork, the...More
Visited fir breakfast and was very happy with the service and the food. It is a little off the beaten track but make the effort and I don't think you will be disappointed. Two pancakes more than enough. Suspect the bacon is pre cooked and...More
Thank you for your review. We appreciate your comments. Chander
We live nearby and have been coming on and off for many years. In that time different management have come and gone and with it mixed bag of food quality and value. Not sure if it’s relatively new again? We stopped going for a while...More
Came here for Breakfast saw it on TV show and was not disappointed it was great love the biscuits and gravy with the fried chicken
We ordered the chicken fried steak and fried chicken with waffles. We've had a lot of chicken fried steak in the states so we're really familiar with the taste and texture. The one at Deacon's just wasn't the same. I think maybe it wasn't pounded...More
A friend took us to this place for a late breakfast and it was great. The attention from the waitresses is good, the place is clean and welcoming. It is located a little far from the normal busy Gastown area, right in the limits but...More
Went for breakfast, service was very helpful but a bit slow. Place is funky and clean. Food was good. Was offered an avocado when I asked for no bacon, great substitution. Pancake was deeelish... and loved that they offered real maple syrup. Coffee was hot...More
Deacon's Corner has the perfect balance of old school diner meets contemporary cool foodie hangout. Do not let my photographs fool you. There were always people coming in and out of Deacon’s Corner with smiles on their faces and a nice thing to say. (I...More
Thank you Suzie. You have taken the time to go into so much detail. We appreciate that.
Went for breakfast, and was blown away! The southern fried chicken breakfast was to die for, the chicken was perfectly crispy and grits amazingly flavourful. Service was wonderful, very friendly and welcoming. Will be back!
Thanks very much. We look forward to serving you again and again.",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2658587-Reviews-Deacon_s_Corner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Deacon's Corner Kitsilano Diner,"Had breakfast here on a weekday, it was a sunny day and the place is very comfortable and it has a nice casual vibe which I really enjoyed. I had the kits breakfast which was delicious - the eggs, bacon and sausage were yummy, the...More
We were looking for a breakfast place in Kitsilano and came across this excellent diner. Service was friendly and efficient. We were immediately offered coffee as we perused the menu. There was a large selection of breakfast options and our group sampled waffles, pancakes and...More
Ordered the two big pancakes and bacon. One of the pancakes was nearly burnt on the underside. Perhaps the cook figured I wouldn’t notice. Had to ask for butter. Food was nearly cold by the time we got the server’s attention to get the needed...More
They always offer an “off menu” special. Ask for it. Order it. Eat it. I had the salmon. It is wild sockeye and a great value. It comes blackened which I find take away from the full rich flavour but that’s up to you. The...More
We were just driving around the neighbourhood and looking to grab a quick bite. We saw this diner and it looked to be exactly what we were looking for. We were seated very quickly and I was drawn to the many different options and I...More
We went in and it was not very busy. We got seated right away and got coffee immediately. Our server was very nice, and the music playing matched the space and was quite enjoyable. I ordered the fried chicken and biscuit breakfast with gravy. It...More
Go here quite frequently and never disappointed with the meal or service. Good breakfast selections and portion sizes. Nice outdoor patio on a good day to eat and people watch. Staff are always friendly and happy to adjust order to suit your needs.
The entree, a Jambellia, was very good, as usual, but since my companion and I ordered the same dish, the ""chef"" must have made up one big dish and split it without making sure that the fancy bits (ie the shrimp) were divvied up equally...More
Visiting friends in Vancouver I came across this little gem on West broadway. Good food very friendly and capable staff... Kitchen pumps it out with super quality and fast fast fast even when busy... If your lucky Boris ( manager) will be working that day....More
This was our first visit, and we will definitely be back. We sat inside next to the patio and enjoyed a nice breeze with breakfast. I had the brioche French toast and couldn't finish it. The bacon was crispy, the French toast was delicious, and...More
Had a breakfast-Brunch here. Typical diner food and service. Nice shredded Hash-browns - would have been nice to have some GF breads.
Friendly staff promptly seated and served us. Bacon and eggs with fresh avocado were perfect. Lots of choices for toast. Clean restaurant and bathrooms..will go again when i am in town.
Burger and beer deal not mentioned on their website but this walking fool saw the deal when passing by and finally got to partake in this great deal. The service was very quick (so important after 12 km. walk). The burger came without fries, an...More
I went here for brunch yesterday, and was so full had to bring half home. The food was great and the server/waiter was as well. It was so good and I was so impressed, I went back again today for lunch. I had the chilli...More
Found the staff and server very congenial and trying hard o please but found the food below par. Had the Kits breakfast that had both the sausage patty and the bacon cold from sitting. Eggs were cooked but only 2 instead of the menu listed...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8123602-Reviews-Deacon_s_Corner_Kitsilano_Diner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Deep Cove Brewers and Distillers,"I stopped by during a bike ride. The food was ok, the beer was good and the service adequate. Nothing wrong with this spot but you can find better.
A friend recommended I go and try the tacos and he was right The pulled pork tacos are awesome and the beer is great too I have for years enjoyed the blood orange beer they produce I checked the website for busy time and we...More
The beer was good and the staff was very friendly. However, I ordered the lobster roll and there was literally no lobster in it. It was all Imitation crab meat or what is referred to as a crab stick. This is totally unacceptable. Being an...More
Came to eat here on the Monday afternoon (1:45 pm) I of the labour day weekend. It didn’t look that busy (saw 2-3 empty tables), and the server informed that there was a 45 minute wait to even get a drink because he was the...More
I’m in love with their Hazy IPA, the atmosphere and the food. The staff are very creative, constantly changing and upgrading the brewery & the libations.
I last visited this venue in 2017 on my last visit to Vancouver and promised that I would visit again (at the time I did not write a review). The atmosphere is still great and the beer on tap is still amazing. I ordered the...More
The restaurant is located away from the mainstream city and had plenty of parking. Once inside the atmosphere was very casual with an industrial flair to its decor. Great beers and only tried a couple of items from the menu but look forward to trying...More
Been there twice recently, both times had a great experience. We had the local lager, $5, great value, and food both times. Cocktails pricy - $11 for a speciality gin one. The mussels in a Thai coconut broth are delicious ($18) and the ciabatta-type garlic...More
I liked a lot, It was a great experience to know the place. It was very good to taste the craft beer from Vancouver!
Good food in a modern but informal setting. The four of us shared two platters and there was ample and varied food for all of us. Drinks were fine, and the service was very good. We were not impressed by the music provided (singer was...More
Extremely disappointed, very under staffed with trainies no management support. Food to table approx 45 minutes, I understand the front of house staff were also helping in the kitchen, total shambles. Dispute the fact it's a brewery, if you're going to have a restaurant attached...More
We included this establishment to our North Shore brewery tour, and I'm glad we did. At 5 pm on Friday, it was already jam-packed, and we had to wait for a bit, but after all, it was worth it. Great interior and friendly staff. An...More
The vibe here is good, especially when they have live music on, but it's a relatively small space. We went here on a quiet Tuesday night, but the after-work crowd was loud and the place was full which was great. Once they all left however,...More
This is a cool looking pub, the people are really friendly and efficient. I and my brother-in-law went there for lunch. Good thing we checked but the place only opens at noon. We had a lager and a stout to start and accompany our meal,...More
Their gin is delicious. I wanted 4 bottles to give as gifts. Live an hour away, so looked at several bc liquor stores. No luck. So I called. The person answering the phone assured me it is available in some liquor stores, but had no...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d9858104-Reviews-Deep_Cove_Brewers_and_Distillers-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Delara Restaurant,"We'd heard that Delara was an excellent place to eat so when we saw that they have Happy Hour daily we decided it would be an opportunity to find out how good it is without spending a lot of money. We shared their marinated smoked...More
This is an exceptional restaurant for those who like refined food. We loved the quality and the taste of all dishes. Melisa and Dorsa provided a caring, kind and professional service. I loved chatting with the highly trained and knowledgeable chef, Bardia. His creations are...More
Lousy service - impossible to get the attention of the distracted staff. We came for brunch on a Sunday morning, as they advertised brunch from the street. And there was one brunch item on the menu, an uninspiring egg dish. And of course - overpriced...More
My first visit to this restaurant for a family dinner occurred during their Dine-out Vancouver promotion. The decor was simple and pleasing, but the acoustics seemed to amplify a noisy place. The room was full but our reservations allowed us to be seated shortly after...More
Delara, which serves Persian food, & which opened on 4th Ave in Kitsilano around 1 1/2 years ago, continues to impress with its food & its good service. Guests are welcomed warmly. It was my third visit This time I found the menus — brunch,...More
Loved the experience! Great venue, attentive service and first class food! All of the appetizers, very tasty, the cauliflower was excellent! For mains the halibut was excellent as were the lamb shank and the short ribs! All generous portions. The wine a selection from the...More
A modern Persian restaurant, lovely decor and comfortable seating. The food was excellent, and the cocktails to die for. Saffron Negroni yummmmmm! Service was what you would expect in a restaurant of this class. Definitely worth a visit if you’re in Vancouver and looking for...More
I went up the length of 4th St w looking for a place to sit down and eat. Most of these either were full cos it was a Saturday or didn't have seating. The decor is light and spacious and I sat next to the...More
They asked for two tips. Bill already included an 18% tip. But still, ask for tips when paying. It is so odd and unprofessional, also tiny small portion when overpriced
The restaurant put together a wonderful tasting menu for group of 15 from all over the U.S.. The food was wonderful, the hostess was extremely friendly and explained the dishes and ingredients to us, and the ambiance was great. We were in Vancouver for a...More
Excellent food, ambience and service! I had the green salada, it was perfect. I also had a chicken stew that was delicious, the spices were just perfect. The service is the best I received in Vancouver. I’ll return for sure!
Delara, which enters its 10th month, having opened its doors in August 2021, is drawing in ever more guests to experience its Persian cuisine, and has recently extended its menu. The smells and tastes are infused often with rose water and turmeric and the menu...More
Staff is very nice but dinner menu for example only has 2 short pages of food listings and 4 pages of beverages I find the dinner menu outrageously expensive, and way too high for the quantify of food you get!
The dinner menu selection is limited - only four entrees and 5 starters. I ordered the fish dish (cod) and my son had the chicken kebabs. We shared the flatbread and salad starters. The food was very well prepared - the fish was cooked moist...More
Delara is a fine dining, farm to table restaurant grounded in the chef's Persian roots. It is a unique and refreshing take on Middle Eastern fare (not your average kebab!). Beautiful decor, incredible service, and food filled with love and attention. Highly recommend for brunch,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23630137-Reviews-Delara_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Delhi 6 Indian Bistro,"This Indian cuisine culinary experience was totally delicious and very satisfying..our choice to visit this restaurant was made from two different friends recommendations…we used the online reservation system…there is both takeout order and delivery service..what a warm welcoming and continued friendly service …our fusion food...More
Delhi 6 is one of the best restaurants in Vancouver. Delicious North Indian food and good service. Well done !
We had a quiet lunch for two. The server helped us with our selection for something light. Delicious butternut squash didh & an eggplant dish for my friebd. Not too spicy, but very tasty. All washed down with chai tea. Service very helpful. The restaurant...More
We've eaten in the Delhi 6 before, and have been pleased with our meal. With that, we decided to order take-out for our New Year's Eve dinner group. Two of the dishes were definitely poor value. Mango chicken was very scant on the chicken, with...More
Visited this D6 several times and always enjoyed the food, spice level, service and setting. Portion size is good and good selection of food. Great location - a little tucked off Burrard St so you have to know its there. Service is good and friendly...More
Highly recommend this place! They easily accomodate large groups and have nice booths for smaller groups. Best curry in Vancouver!
Wonderful menu and nice ambience. Good for larger groups too and the vegetarian menu is as large as the meat, the seafood curries are delicious! The staff are helpful and unpretentious.
Dropped in on a weeknight after going to the nearby Fifth Ave Theatre which is a 3 min walk. Nice room, hospitable staff, very accommodating and absolutely delicious food. We sampled a variety of familiar dishes between the four of us. Great spot before or...More
Went here today for lunch with a small group of 5 total. We arrived around 12:30pm and the restaurant was understandably not crowded for the time. Sadly, that didn't matter as it took over 35 minutes to receive our food after ordering. And getting our...More
we, a group of 12 persons visited Vancouver, Canada,after cruising Alaska. In the morning we went for Whale Watching,and came back at about 2.00 p.m. All were very much hungry and in search of Indian Veg. Food. In google search we found this restaurant. We...More
I always knew and had earlier experience in eating Indian food in Canada that the it is authentic and of excellent quality. Salam Bombay if you are looking for good Vegetarian food look no further. We live in USA and trust me most of the...More
Quality and presentation of food was great and exceeded my expectations. Portion size however could have been larger for the price charged (dinner), and the menu served was dirty. Will come back again for the lunch set.
After we landed in Vancouver, we had long waiting time for the ferry to the Sunshine Coast, so we were looking for a nice Indian restaurant to have dinner in Vancouver. We were very lucky we found out about the Delhi 6 Bistro. Our entire...More
We have been here a few times before and its sad to say so disappointed!!!. Portion size has been reduced drastically, good flavour though. The server was so inexperienced she messed up our order twice and was quite intrusive throughout our meal. I asked for...More
We went expecting mughlai food like that of the royal kitchens of Delhi 6 ( Old Delhi ) . The food is an insult to the great chefs Delhi 6 . Probably neither the owner nor the cook seem to know what Delhi 6 cuisine...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12537776-Reviews-Delhi_6_Indian_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Delicious Pho,"I had the beef ball pho and brisket pho absolutely delicious the broth is so nice. It was a big portion I had them both to go they provided everything I needed and lots of veggies to go with it. Definitely a must try and...More
We ordered a noodle bowl with steak and brisket to go. The food was absolutely incredible! The portion size was impressive and the flavours were yummy. I highly recommend.
Open since 2015, Delicious Pho on Robson turned out to be a fairly tasty surprise. We’d been craving pho and decided to stop by for lunch. Going in, we wondered if this place would live up to its name. The atmosphere at Delicious Pho is...More
We've been coming here almost every week for the last few months, and the staff know my order by heart, and always do a great job taking care of our party, which can be pretty challenging. You have to be somewhat assertive in catching the...More
I got a food poisoning in this restaurant. It was awful and lasted for 2 nights. I went to the place to get some kind of compensation, they said manager wasn't at work, but he'd call me. Nobody called me. Absolutely unacceptable. I never write...More
Good food with reasonable price. The marinated pork on top of vermicelli was delicious. Pho was pretty good, even though the thinly sliced beef was not completely separated.
This was the second time ordering take out from here and the food is incredible, very good. We have tried a sub. pho, and a couple of other items and were very impressed with the portion sizes and the flavors were more than we anticipated,...More
We needed a fairly quick bite and Asian food normally is. We had the grilled pork bun, excellent taste and nice crusty bun, #16 large pho, very good and grilled pork, pork sausage and fried roll over vermicelli noodle, good. The restaurant was full and...More
This is one of my favorite restaurants in the neighborhood. Pho and the rice dishes are generously served. Service is friendly. It is very affordable. Overall, great quality for the price. I recommend the dish number 64. Simple but delicious.
there are not many places in downtown that sell good pho as usually the good ones you mind more in east van. but i have to say this place was just AWFUL...... the service was standard and was expected from a pho restaurant. no problem...More
My family and I were on Vancouver for holidays last month, and we are from Mexico. They wanted to get some tacos but I didn’t. So I stopped by ""Delicious Pho"" and ordered Vermicelli with fried spring roll and I loved it. We don’t have...More
We stayed at the Robson on Rosedale and this restaurant is located on Robson opposite the hotel - so we decided to try it. We ate here on several nights and the quality, freshness of the food was EXCELLENT. I thoroughly enjoyed the seafood soup...More
We stopped by for a bowl of soup. The Pho was hot but average. The grilled chicken was not very flavorful. The service was adequate. Nothing outstanding
Good place for pho, broth was excellent and they have a good variety. Took a traditional raw beef and it was good. Good spot if you're in the area and looking for fast meal.
Stayed at hotel nearby and noticed that this restaurant always had customers inside. The beef pho, beef spicy hue noodles and the ‘bun cha’ noodles are great, delicious, decent sized and value for money. Service in the evenings is great.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7143412-Reviews-Delicious_Pho-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Denny's,"Another great experience at Dennys, Americas Diner. Always a welcome place to eat, attentive friendly staff and a menu including many Gluten Free options. Only 5 Minutes walk from our Hotel and prices more than reasonable.
Another great experience at Dennys, Americas Diner. Always a welcome place to eat, attentive friendly staff and a menu including many Gluten Free options. Only 5 Minutes walk from our Hotel and prices more than reasonable.
Another great experience at Dennys, Americas Diner. Always a welcome place to eat, attentive friendly staff and a menu including many Gluten Free options. Only 5 Minutes walk from our Hotel and prices more than reasonable.
We Stayed at a Hotel in North Vancouver and this was an easy 5 minutes walk. Usual Denny's Fayre freshly cooked and not much of a wait. We ate there 2 nights and the staff were attentive and friendly. Good wholesome food and many Gluten...More
We Stayed at a Hotel in North Vancouver and this was an easy 5 minutes walk. Usual Denny's Fayre freshly cooked and not much of a wait. We ate there 2 nights and the staff were attentive and friendly. Good wholesome food and many Gluten...More
We Stayed at a Hotel in North Vancouver and this was an easy 5 minutes walk. Usual Denny's Fayre freshly cooked and not much of a wait. We ate there 2 nights and the staff were attentive and friendly. Good wholesome food and many Gluten...More
Wanted some comfort food while in the middle of a very long trip. This Denny's fit the bill. We ended up eating here two nights in a row because it felt like home, the service was good and friendly, and the food was good.
Wanted some comfort food while in the middle of a very long trip. This Denny's fit the bill. We ended up eating here two nights in a row because it felt like home, the service was good and friendly, and the food was good.
Wanted some comfort food while in the middle of a very long trip. This Denny's fit the bill. We ended up eating here two nights in a row because it felt like home, the service was good and friendly, and the food was good.
Delicious brunch as usual in Dennys. Highly caloric but delicious. Parking is spacious and service is very good. If you don't know where to take the kids on a Sunday I will recommend.
Delicious brunch as usual in Dennys. Highly caloric but delicious. Parking is spacious and service is very good. If you don't know where to take the kids on a Sunday I will recommend.
Delicious brunch as usual in Dennys. Highly caloric but delicious. Parking is spacious and service is very good. If you don't know where to take the kids on a Sunday I will recommend.
I attended June 6 2022 with my baby in my arms. I decided to stop for a quick (and rare) breakfast in between our morning activities and found myself waiting for over 10 minutes. A manager finally approached and stated “sorry it’s now exactly 9am...More
I attended June 6 2022 with my baby in my arms. I decided to stop for a quick (and rare) breakfast in between our morning activities and found myself waiting for over 10 minutes. A manager finally approached and stated “sorry it’s now exactly 9am...More
I attended June 6 2022 with my baby in my arms. I decided to stop for a quick (and rare) breakfast in between our morning activities and found myself waiting for over 10 minutes. A manager finally approached and stated “sorry it’s now exactly 9am...More
Was pleasantly surprised as to how grateful the waitress was for our business during these trying times. She was very courteous. Large helping, well prepared and presented. The restaurant efficiently practised Covid-19 protocol. Minor point - washroom could be better maintained.
Was pleasantly surprised as to how grateful the waitress was for our business during these trying times. She was very courteous. Large helping, well prepared and presented. The restaurant efficiently practised Covid-19 protocol. Minor point - washroom could be better maintained.
Was pleasantly surprised as to how grateful the waitress was for our business during these trying times. She was very courteous. Large helping, well prepared and presented. The restaurant efficiently practised Covid-19 protocol. Minor point - washroom could be better maintained.
Friendly staff. Restaurant not too busy. The meal came quickly. Prices are average. The menu has stayed the same.
Friendly staff. Restaurant not too busy. The meal came quickly. Prices are average. The menu has stayed the same.
Friendly staff. Restaurant not too busy. The meal came quickly. Prices are average. The menu has stayed the same.
I'll admit, I mainly visited this Denny's as I wanted to recreate a scene from CW's Supernatural as Vancouver is a filming hot-spot for the show. On the other hand we had been craving a visit to a Denny's the entirety of our trip through...More
I'll admit, I mainly visited this Denny's as I wanted to recreate a scene from CW's Supernatural as Vancouver is a filming hot-spot for the show. On the other hand we had been craving a visit to a Denny's the entirety of our trip through...More
I'll admit, I mainly visited this Denny's as I wanted to recreate a scene from CW's Supernatural as Vancouver is a filming hot-spot for the show. On the other hand we had been craving a visit to a Denny's the entirety of our trip through...More
I've been coming to this location for quite a while... several years.... so I notice when things go wrong. A new manager was irritating both the staff and the customers... constantly running back and forth, constantly micromanaging even experienced servers. Calling out to guests 10...More
I've been coming to this location for quite a while... several years.... so I notice when things go wrong. A new manager was irritating both the staff and the customers... constantly running back and forth, constantly micromanaging even experienced servers. Calling out to guests 10...More
I've been coming to this location for quite a while... several years.... so I notice when things go wrong. A new manager was irritating both the staff and the customers... constantly running back and forth, constantly micromanaging even experienced servers. Calling out to guests 10...More
Hash browns were raw potatoes so I sent them back. The next batch was the same, pancakes were tasteless, and $1.60 for orange juice from concentrate which wasn’t even stirred. What can I say?? I had to apologize to my friends for taking them to...More
Hash browns were raw potatoes so I sent them back. The next batch was the same, pancakes were tasteless, and $1.60 for orange juice from concentrate which wasn’t even stirred. What can I say?? I had to apologize to my friends for taking them to...More
Hash browns were raw potatoes so I sent them back. The next batch was the same, pancakes were tasteless, and $1.60 for orange juice from concentrate which wasn’t even stirred. What can I say?? I had to apologize to my friends for taking them to...More
We chose this Denny's restaurant as it is close to several budget based hotels which can be found in this area of North Vancouver. The menu really hasn't changed too much over the years. Patrons still get good value for their money and the service...More
We chose this Denny's restaurant as it is close to several budget based hotels which can be found in this area of North Vancouver. The menu really hasn't changed too much over the years. Patrons still get good value for their money and the service...More
We chose this Denny's restaurant as it is close to several budget based hotels which can be found in this area of North Vancouver. The menu really hasn't changed too much over the years. Patrons still get good value for their money and the service...More
Around 2 PM. been here before and service was fine. On this day staff were more interested in yakking with each other than serving customers. This was especially true for the Asian woman manager who either fawned over certain customers or ignored others completely. If...More
Around 2 PM. been here before and service was fine. On this day staff were more interested in yakking with each other than serving customers. This was especially true for the Asian woman manager who either fawned over certain customers or ignored others completely. If...More
Around 2 PM. been here before and service was fine. On this day staff were more interested in yakking with each other than serving customers. This was especially true for the Asian woman manager who either fawned over certain customers or ignored others completely. If...More
Went with my daughter, waited 18 minutes for my drink, then when I finally got my food the order was wrong, then I sat there again trying to eat with no drinks.i had to go to the front counter to get a glass of water....More
Went with my daughter, waited 18 minutes for my drink, then when I finally got my food the order was wrong, then I sat there again trying to eat with no drinks.i had to go to the front counter to get a glass of water....More
Went with my daughter, waited 18 minutes for my drink, then when I finally got my food the order was wrong, then I sat there again trying to eat with no drinks.i had to go to the front counter to get a glass of water....More
Denny's is hit-and-miss, usually. Some of the staple food is always good no matter where you go, other times you have to wonder if the cooks were high on something while making your meal. This particular location is clean and the service is great. Very...More
Denny's is hit-and-miss, usually. Some of the staple food is always good no matter where you go, other times you have to wonder if the cooks were high on something while making your meal. This particular location is clean and the service is great. Very...More
Denny's is hit-and-miss, usually. Some of the staple food is always good no matter where you go, other times you have to wonder if the cooks were high on something while making your meal. This particular location is clean and the service is great. Very...More
Took forever to order our drinks after we sat in an almost completely empty restaurant, watched our food sit for at least 10 minutes while the servers complained about a table not tipping... not surprised they didn't get a tip. Took almost the same amount...More
Took forever to order our drinks after we sat in an almost completely empty restaurant, watched our food sit for at least 10 minutes while the servers complained about a table not tipping... not surprised they didn't get a tip. Took almost the same amount...More
Took forever to order our drinks after we sat in an almost completely empty restaurant, watched our food sit for at least 10 minutes while the servers complained about a table not tipping... not surprised they didn't get a tip. Took almost the same amount...More
Again great service this time from ""Doris"" and always great consistent food and atmosphere. Our local favourite.
Again great service this time from ""Doris"" and always great consistent food and atmosphere. Our local favourite.
Again great service this time from ""Doris"" and always great consistent food and atmosphere. Our local favourite.
My server Daisy made my day! Thank you for the great service. Your recommendations and suggestions on my food selection is very appreciated. 🙏🏻
My server Daisy made my day! Thank you for the great service. Your recommendations and suggestions on my food selection is very appreciated. 🙏🏻
My server Daisy made my day! Thank you for the great service. Your recommendations and suggestions on my food selection is very appreciated. 🙏🏻
Denny's 5605 Kingsway. Eva is a very polite diligent person and server. Who was always right there refilling my coffee, ...3 times.🏆 The + 55 menu is very reasonable, didn't expect the garlic toast either. Bonus. Restaurant was clean friendly, and quick with the order.⏱...More
Denny's 5605 Kingsway. Eva is a very polite diligent person and server. Who was always right there refilling my coffee, ...3 times.🏆 The + 55 menu is very reasonable, didn't expect the garlic toast either. Bonus. Restaurant was clean friendly, and quick with the order.⏱...More
Denny's 5605 Kingsway. Eva is a very polite diligent person and server. Who was always right there refilling my coffee, ...3 times.🏆 The + 55 menu is very reasonable, didn't expect the garlic toast either. Bonus. Restaurant was clean friendly, and quick with the order.⏱...More
We chanced upon this place when walking near Loughheed mall. It is a typical American diner chain with quick bites, burgers and sandwiches. The food was fresh with large portions. The coffee was hot and fresh. Overall a good place to grab lunch.
We chanced upon this place when walking near Loughheed mall. It is a typical American diner chain with quick bites, burgers and sandwiches. The food was fresh with large portions. The coffee was hot and fresh. Overall a good place to grab lunch.
We chanced upon this place when walking near Loughheed mall. It is a typical American diner chain with quick bites, burgers and sandwiches. The food was fresh with large portions. The coffee was hot and fresh. Overall a good place to grab lunch.
I come here nearly every year for my birthday breakfast to treat myself. The scrambled eggs were absolutely stellar, hash browns top notch, bacon perfect and the pancakes were as perfect as you could get them. Best birthday breakfast ever I would say. Only downside...More
I come here nearly every year for my birthday breakfast to treat myself. The scrambled eggs were absolutely stellar, hash browns top notch, bacon perfect and the pancakes were as perfect as you could get them. Best birthday breakfast ever I would say. Only downside...More
I come here nearly every year for my birthday breakfast to treat myself. The scrambled eggs were absolutely stellar, hash browns top notch, bacon perfect and the pancakes were as perfect as you could get them. Best birthday breakfast ever I would say. Only downside...More
We came to Dennys this morning. We ordered our favourite shakes and Nachos. They have the best shake and Nachos ❤️❤️
We came to Dennys this morning. We ordered our favourite shakes and Nachos. They have the best shake and Nachos ❤️❤️
We came to Dennys this morning. We ordered our favourite shakes and Nachos. They have the best shake and Nachos ❤️❤️
Really great place.. great food and excellent service by our server Jan and great to see attentive manager on floor and checking for customer service.Thanks
Really great place.. great food and excellent service by our server Jan and great to see attentive manager on floor and checking for customer service.Thanks
Really great place.. great food and excellent service by our server Jan and great to see attentive manager on floor and checking for customer service.Thanks
One of the best place for all day breakfast option. Super friendly staff and food was so yummy 😋. Value for money.. Will recommend it...
One of the best place for all day breakfast option. Super friendly staff and food was so yummy 😋. Value for money.. Will recommend it...
One of the best place for all day breakfast option. Super friendly staff and food was so yummy 😋. Value for money.. Will recommend it...
We are always happy to visit Dennys Kingsway as the staff there Daisy, Agnes, Doris, Karen, Eva and Jules are always very attentive and pleasant and get our orders perfectly and in good time so the meals are served piping hot. It's always been very...More
We are always happy to visit Dennys Kingsway as the staff there Daisy, Agnes, Doris, Karen, Eva and Jules are always very attentive and pleasant and get our orders perfectly and in good time so the meals are served piping hot. It's always been very...More
We are always happy to visit Dennys Kingsway as the staff there Daisy, Agnes, Doris, Karen, Eva and Jules are always very attentive and pleasant and get our orders perfectly and in good time so the meals are served piping hot. It's always been very...More
If you have a hankering for breakfast at any time of the day, this is the place. I came here for their free breakfast which is available on the day of your birthday. You just need to provide photo ID with proof of birthday. The...More
If you have a hankering for breakfast at any time of the day, this is the place. I came here for their free breakfast which is available on the day of your birthday. You just need to provide photo ID with proof of birthday. The...More
If you have a hankering for breakfast at any time of the day, this is the place. I came here for their free breakfast which is available on the day of your birthday. You just need to provide photo ID with proof of birthday. The...More
Saw the promotional ad, decided to try some Denny's Sunday breakfast. Of course not the first time dining here but just wanted to review the Benny. We also ordered some cinnamon pancakes with breakfast. There is definitely no quality and just quantity. They pour so...More
Saw the promotional ad, decided to try some Denny's Sunday breakfast. Of course not the first time dining here but just wanted to review the Benny. We also ordered some cinnamon pancakes with breakfast. There is definitely no quality and just quantity. They pour so...More
Saw the promotional ad, decided to try some Denny's Sunday breakfast. Of course not the first time dining here but just wanted to review the Benny. We also ordered some cinnamon pancakes with breakfast. There is definitely no quality and just quantity. They pour so...More
Awesome breakfast! We went on Dec 27 and they still had the holiday menu on. We had the steak and chicken combination for breakfast along with omelettes and it was absolutely divine! Our server was very good. We went around 10am and it wasn’t as...More
Awesome breakfast! We went on Dec 27 and they still had the holiday menu on. We had the steak and chicken combination for breakfast along with omelettes and it was absolutely divine! Our server was very good. We went around 10am and it wasn’t as...More
Awesome breakfast! We went on Dec 27 and they still had the holiday menu on. We had the steak and chicken combination for breakfast along with omelettes and it was absolutely divine! Our server was very good. We went around 10am and it wasn’t as...More
We went with friends on a Saturday for brunch.The portion is big, The price is reasonable, good quality of food
We went with friends on a Saturday for brunch.The portion is big, The price is reasonable, good quality of food
We went with friends on a Saturday for brunch.The portion is big, The price is reasonable, good quality of food
We pooped in here for a quick bite after a night out at the casino. Parking is in behind the restaurant off Kingsway. Street parking is metered at $2 per hour. It was pretty busy but we were seated fairly quickly. The waiting area is...More
We pooped in here for a quick bite after a night out at the casino. Parking is in behind the restaurant off Kingsway. Street parking is metered at $2 per hour. It was pretty busy but we were seated fairly quickly. The waiting area is...More
We pooped in here for a quick bite after a night out at the casino. Parking is in behind the restaurant off Kingsway. Street parking is metered at $2 per hour. It was pretty busy but we were seated fairly quickly. The waiting area is...More
Typical Denny's American Diner. The staff were great, the food was good, delivered quickly. We have visited several times, it's always good. This last time was after 9pm on a Tuesday, and the place had several customers, so that's a good sign :-) Recommended if...More
Typical Denny's American Diner. The staff were great, the food was good, delivered quickly. We have visited several times, it's always good. This last time was after 9pm on a Tuesday, and the place had several customers, so that's a good sign :-) Recommended if...More
Typical Denny's American Diner. The staff were great, the food was good, delivered quickly. We have visited several times, it's always good. This last time was after 9pm on a Tuesday, and the place had several customers, so that's a good sign :-) Recommended if...More
Group of 2 couples. Shown to booth where seat cover was split showing foam beneath. One member ordered hot chocolate drink, but so sweet had to send back. For an evening meal we found limited items to inspire. I ordered Salmon, as did 2 others....More
Group of 2 couples. Shown to booth where seat cover was split showing foam beneath. One member ordered hot chocolate drink, but so sweet had to send back. For an evening meal we found limited items to inspire. I ordered Salmon, as did 2 others....More
Group of 2 couples. Shown to booth where seat cover was split showing foam beneath. One member ordered hot chocolate drink, but so sweet had to send back. For an evening meal we found limited items to inspire. I ordered Salmon, as did 2 others....More
A good breakfast with friendly staff. However, we went for dinner there and walked out. Clearly, the waiter (oldish man) slow service and a lady (customer) on an IV drip passed out on the table in front of us. I have award 4 marks for...More
A good breakfast with friendly staff. However, we went for dinner there and walked out. Clearly, the waiter (oldish man) slow service and a lady (customer) on an IV drip passed out on the table in front of us. I have award 4 marks for...More
A good breakfast with friendly staff. However, we went for dinner there and walked out. Clearly, the waiter (oldish man) slow service and a lady (customer) on an IV drip passed out on the table in front of us. I have award 4 marks for...More
Very nice meal at Denny’s. Servers are always really friendly and very helpful with what you want to order. Nice to have a good meal when away from home. We will be back when we’re here again.
Very nice meal at Denny’s. Servers are always really friendly and very helpful with what you want to order. Nice to have a good meal when away from home. We will be back when we’re here again.
Very nice meal at Denny’s. Servers are always really friendly and very helpful with what you want to order. Nice to have a good meal when away from home. We will be back when we’re here again.
Went to Denys Restaurent on Davie street to have dinner with my friend, went to Men washroom, it was disgusting urine all over the floor, toilet were unfleshed after use, I was going to throw up. Lost my appetite couldn’t look at the food in...More
Went to Denys Restaurent on Davie street to have dinner with my friend, went to Men washroom, it was disgusting urine all over the floor, toilet were unfleshed after use, I was going to throw up. Lost my appetite couldn’t look at the food in...More
Went to Denys Restaurent on Davie street to have dinner with my friend, went to Men washroom, it was disgusting urine all over the floor, toilet were unfleshed after use, I was going to throw up. Lost my appetite couldn’t look at the food in...More
This was my first visit to a Canadian Dennys ,I have dined at several Dennys restaurants in California and Nevada. This was a disappointment, firstly there was notable shortage of staff ! Finally a friendly waitress/ server took me to a table . My order...More
This was my first visit to a Canadian Dennys ,I have dined at several Dennys restaurants in California and Nevada. This was a disappointment, firstly there was notable shortage of staff ! Finally a friendly waitress/ server took me to a table . My order...More
This was my first visit to a Canadian Dennys ,I have dined at several Dennys restaurants in California and Nevada. This was a disappointment, firstly there was notable shortage of staff ! Finally a friendly waitress/ server took me to a table . My order...More
Very good food and good friendly service! Great family place. Muskan Preet was our server and the host was very nice and accommodating too.
Very good food and good friendly service! Great family place. Muskan Preet was our server and the host was very nice and accommodating too.
Very good food and good friendly service! Great family place. Muskan Preet was our server and the host was very nice and accommodating too.
Came here for one last breakfast before leaving Vancouver. It was meh. Got the eggs Benny which was mediocre at best. Kind of cold and eggs weren’t cooked the way I liked them so I didn’t finish it. Hash browns were great as always though!...More
Came here for one last breakfast before leaving Vancouver. It was meh. Got the eggs Benny which was mediocre at best. Kind of cold and eggs weren’t cooked the way I liked them so I didn’t finish it. Hash browns were great as always though!...More
Came here for one last breakfast before leaving Vancouver. It was meh. Got the eggs Benny which was mediocre at best. Kind of cold and eggs weren’t cooked the way I liked them so I didn’t finish it. Hash browns were great as always though!...More
Having sampled a couple of Denny’s restaurants in the USA it would have been rude not to try one in Canada especially as it was so close to our hotel . We were not disappointed and were greeted ,served and fed in the traditional Denny’s...More
Having sampled a couple of Denny’s restaurants in the USA it would have been rude not to try one in Canada especially as it was so close to our hotel . We were not disappointed and were greeted ,served and fed in the traditional Denny’s...More
Having sampled a couple of Denny’s restaurants in the USA it would have been rude not to try one in Canada especially as it was so close to our hotel . We were not disappointed and were greeted ,served and fed in the traditional Denny’s...More
There are so may wonderful places to eat in this area but sometimes only pancakes and bacon will do and that’s where Denny’s comes in. Good service, reasonable prices. Tasty and fast. Does what it says on the tin.
There are so may wonderful places to eat in this area but sometimes only pancakes and bacon will do and that’s where Denny’s comes in. Good service, reasonable prices. Tasty and fast. Does what it says on the tin.
There are so may wonderful places to eat in this area but sometimes only pancakes and bacon will do and that’s where Denny’s comes in. Good service, reasonable prices. Tasty and fast. Does what it says on the tin.
Had breakfast at this place and my experienced was good. The place is a bit busy for weekend breakfast. The place looks like it was renovated and updated. Staff are wearing face coverings but not attentive with your needs. You have to asked everything you...More
Had breakfast at this place and my experienced was good. The place is a bit busy for weekend breakfast. The place looks like it was renovated and updated. Staff are wearing face coverings but not attentive with your needs. You have to asked everything you...More
Had breakfast at this place and my experienced was good. The place is a bit busy for weekend breakfast. The place looks like it was renovated and updated. Staff are wearing face coverings but not attentive with your needs. You have to asked everything you...More
A great breakfast staff friendly and attentive. Denny’s is very reasonable and the portion sizes are large so much couldn’t finish. Unlimited coffee added bonus with breakfast.
A great breakfast staff friendly and attentive. Denny’s is very reasonable and the portion sizes are large so much couldn’t finish. Unlimited coffee added bonus with breakfast.
A great breakfast staff friendly and attentive. Denny’s is very reasonable and the portion sizes are large so much couldn’t finish. Unlimited coffee added bonus with breakfast.
Went here ordered chicken strips I got the chicken strip which must have been cooked last year. Ordered breakfast it came with french toast and poached eggs and bacon. Again food Awful Dont waste your time and money
Went here ordered chicken strips I got the chicken strip which must have been cooked last year. Ordered breakfast it came with french toast and poached eggs and bacon. Again food Awful Dont waste your time and money
Went here ordered chicken strips I got the chicken strip which must have been cooked last year. Ordered breakfast it came with french toast and poached eggs and bacon. Again food Awful Dont waste your time and money
As stated above, my eggs were cooked perfectly. While my French toast is better, the French toast here was pretty good (in fairness, my French toast is made from my own home made cinnamon bread and is the best I have ever had). Over all...More
As stated above, my eggs were cooked perfectly. While my French toast is better, the French toast here was pretty good (in fairness, my French toast is made from my own home made cinnamon bread and is the best I have ever had). Over all...More
As stated above, my eggs were cooked perfectly. While my French toast is better, the French toast here was pretty good (in fairness, my French toast is made from my own home made cinnamon bread and is the best I have ever had). Over all...More
Really nice food really scary man shouting at his waitresses. Really nice food really scary man haha
Really nice food really scary man shouting at his waitresses. Really nice food really scary man haha
Really nice food really scary man shouting at his waitresses. Really nice food really scary man haha
This Denny's is done in a diner style and I would describe the food as retro. It is however dependable and afforadable, however 3.69 for lemonade seems a might steep for me.
This Denny's is done in a diner style and I would describe the food as retro. It is however dependable and afforadable, however 3.69 for lemonade seems a might steep for me.
This Denny's is done in a diner style and I would describe the food as retro. It is however dependable and afforadable, however 3.69 for lemonade seems a might steep for me.
Great food, location and service! Clean and relatively quiet. Meals were exactly as described and hot!
Great food, location and service! Clean and relatively quiet. Meals were exactly as described and hot!
Great food, location and service! Clean and relatively quiet. Meals were exactly as described and hot!
I am not usually a fan of going to Denny's but I was on a business trip in Vancouver recently and decided to check out the one that was right beside the Sandman Hotel that I was staying at. It was 7pm and I was...More
I am not usually a fan of going to Denny's but I was on a business trip in Vancouver recently and decided to check out the one that was right beside the Sandman Hotel that I was staying at. It was 7pm and I was...More
I am not usually a fan of going to Denny's but I was on a business trip in Vancouver recently and decided to check out the one that was right beside the Sandman Hotel that I was staying at. It was 7pm and I was...More
Amazing! Grace, our Server, was most Friendly, Conscientious and Quick to answer any questions we had.
Amazing! Grace, our Server, was most Friendly, Conscientious and Quick to answer any questions we had.
Amazing! Grace, our Server, was most Friendly, Conscientious and Quick to answer any questions we had.
We ate here twice. Once before our vacation and once after. Both times the service was AWESOME and food was awesome too. Definitely eat at this Dennys :)
We ate here twice. Once before our vacation and once after. Both times the service was AWESOME and food was awesome too. Definitely eat at this Dennys :)
We ate here twice. Once before our vacation and once after. Both times the service was AWESOME and food was awesome too. Definitely eat at this Dennys :)
One of us ordered the super slam and The other ordered whole wheat toast. What We got was slightly warm brown bread, absolutely no toasting and only buttered for about an inch in the centre. It was inedible. The super slam came with greasy limp...More
One of us ordered the super slam and The other ordered whole wheat toast. What We got was slightly warm brown bread, absolutely no toasting and only buttered for about an inch in the centre. It was inedible. The super slam came with greasy limp...More
One of us ordered the super slam and The other ordered whole wheat toast. What We got was slightly warm brown bread, absolutely no toasting and only buttered for about an inch in the centre. It was inedible. The super slam came with greasy limp...More
5/5 This hockey mom was so thrilled. Travis and Dorothy were so accommodating and made us feel welcome. Usually a big group of hockey boys is intimidating. But these two were amazing. Food was fast and delicious and the service was spot on.
5/5 This hockey mom was so thrilled. Travis and Dorothy were so accommodating and made us feel welcome. Usually a big group of hockey boys is intimidating. But these two were amazing. Food was fast and delicious and the service was spot on.
5/5 This hockey mom was so thrilled. Travis and Dorothy were so accommodating and made us feel welcome. Usually a big group of hockey boys is intimidating. But these two were amazing. Food was fast and delicious and the service was spot on.
Popped into Denny’s off Marine Drive for a mid-morning breakfast. Our server was great. The food was fast and plentiful and the eggs done as I like them. The pancakes were great! For what it is, Denny’s does the job.
Popped into Denny’s off Marine Drive for a mid-morning breakfast. Our server was great. The food was fast and plentiful and the eggs done as I like them. The pancakes were great! For what it is, Denny’s does the job.
Popped into Denny’s off Marine Drive for a mid-morning breakfast. Our server was great. The food was fast and plentiful and the eggs done as I like them. The pancakes were great! For what it is, Denny’s does the job.
Had a quick snack at this location and we’re happy with our stay. The interior of the place was very nice, very far and different from other branches. Staff are friendly and our server was great and funny to chat with. The Nachos was very...More
Had a quick snack at this location and we’re happy with our stay. The interior of the place was very nice, very far and different from other branches. Staff are friendly and our server was great and funny to chat with. The Nachos was very...More
Had a quick snack at this location and we’re happy with our stay. The interior of the place was very nice, very far and different from other branches. Staff are friendly and our server was great and funny to chat with. The Nachos was very...More
Paid $5 for RAW potatoes that I’m now forced to cook myself. Food showed up cold and under done, eggs overdone. Find a mom and pop diner to eat at instead, $5 for a side of raw potato is ridiculous.
Paid $5 for RAW potatoes that I’m now forced to cook myself. Food showed up cold and under done, eggs overdone. Find a mom and pop diner to eat at instead, $5 for a side of raw potato is ridiculous.
Paid $5 for RAW potatoes that I’m now forced to cook myself. Food showed up cold and under done, eggs overdone. Find a mom and pop diner to eat at instead, $5 for a side of raw potato is ridiculous.
We (just me and my husband) went to Richmond Denny's the first time (April), we found the food (all-day breakfast) was good and seating was nice. And the server (I forgot her name) was very friendly. We liked her. Then we went second time, we...More
We (just me and my husband) went to Richmond Denny's the first time (April), we found the food (all-day breakfast) was good and seating was nice. And the server (I forgot her name) was very friendly. We liked her. Then we went second time, we...More
We (just me and my husband) went to Richmond Denny's the first time (April), we found the food (all-day breakfast) was good and seating was nice. And the server (I forgot her name) was very friendly. We liked her. Then we went second time, we...More
We stayed next door on a night when the Ferries were canceled. The next morning, we arranged with this restaurant to feed the team. They did an excellent job. Meals and service were fantastic. Good job! We will be back.
We stayed next door on a night when the Ferries were canceled. The next morning, we arranged with this restaurant to feed the team. They did an excellent job. Meals and service were fantastic. Good job! We will be back.
We stayed next door on a night when the Ferries were canceled. The next morning, we arranged with this restaurant to feed the team. They did an excellent job. Meals and service were fantastic. Good job! We will be back.
Good for a nice breakfast, its a lot its much, but it is nice and fresh., So yes we will go back, better then the hotel.
Good for a nice breakfast, its a lot its much, but it is nice and fresh., So yes we will go back, better then the hotel.
Good for a nice breakfast, its a lot its much, but it is nice and fresh., So yes we will go back, better then the hotel.
We enjoyed breakfast and suppers there. Recommend the chicken fried steak. The vanilla crepes were delish. Everything was very good. Service was excellent.
We enjoyed breakfast and suppers there. Recommend the chicken fried steak. The vanilla crepes were delish. Everything was very good. Service was excellent.
We enjoyed breakfast and suppers there. Recommend the chicken fried steak. The vanilla crepes were delish. Everything was very good. Service was excellent.
Went in & waited 10 minutes with my girlfriend without getting seated only to have someone come In behind us and be seated at table for one. They weren’t even busy. Won’t be going back
Went in & waited 10 minutes with my girlfriend without getting seated only to have someone come In behind us and be seated at table for one. They weren’t even busy. Won’t be going back
Went in & waited 10 minutes with my girlfriend without getting seated only to have someone come In behind us and be seated at table for one. They weren’t even busy. Won’t be going back
We were delighted to enjoy a very quick breakfast after our drive around Stanley ParkThe waitress was very efficient and had the food to us in a timely manner.We really enjoyed our breakfast type sandwich.
We were delighted to enjoy a very quick breakfast after our drive around Stanley ParkThe waitress was very efficient and had the food to us in a timely manner.We really enjoyed our breakfast type sandwich.
We were delighted to enjoy a very quick breakfast after our drive around Stanley ParkThe waitress was very efficient and had the food to us in a timely manner.We really enjoyed our breakfast type sandwich.",180,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4880020-Reviews-Denny_s-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Devil's Elbow Ale & Smoke House,"Delicious, nice presentation, plenty of food, nice atmosphere and right near downtown. Close to soccer game we were going to. Service was fantastic.
We ordered a BBQ platter for two for a take out supper. It was exactly what we had hoped for: sausage, beef brisket, pulled pork and ribs, with great tasting fries and coleslaw as our two sides! The restaurant itself looked very inviting and relaxed...More
Lovely wine and craft beer. We had some delicious chicken wings, the beef brisket and some tater tots. Everything was so tasty.
Being die hard Texas bbq lovers, we were skeptical about eating bbq north of the Mason-Dixon Line. It was recommended so we tried it. Well, it was fantastic. The brisket was tender and did not need any additional sauce. The beans and coleslaw were just...More
I quickly dropped by with friends for wings and a pint. Probably the worst wings I've ever had. The picture really makes it look 100 times better. There is so little meat on these wings and it's incredibly dry. I must have hit a bad...More
Great selection of food and tap beers, was very tasty. Service was efficient and friendly. Atmosphere was loud with music/sports and people chatting. Would love to go back and try one of the sharing dishes!
First visit to this restaurant. Service was very good and food was amazing. Very good BBQ style food, and large selection of craft beers. They accidentally gave us the wrong side dish for our shared main(BBQ platter for 2). We told them it was totally...More
I guess it was a mistake to come here and not get something BBQ, but i came for dinner and ordered the devil's burger w cornbread. I didn't think it was a very good burger, and I think I just didn't like the flavors of...More
Terrific ribs and bbq platters, ideal location for mass transit and sporting events, great ambience, friendly service
You won't find better smokehouse food anywhere in Vancouver. It's extremely memorable and if I could get there this evening I would go! I love the brisket quesadilla. It's mouthwatering and the portion is large so if you aren't a big eater you can take...More
So gross. We got delivery. Ordered two burgers, I asked for no tomato or mustard which was completely ignored. Meat was so salty and tasted like it was mostly bread crumbs or some other filler in it, $17 for this trash. There's more meat in...More
We had a large group(16), got a share platter and some appies couldn't finish it all. Tried to get through all the craft beer choices and just too many beers could not do it. Will definitely have to visit again next time we are in...More
Came in on a weekend with overlapping hockey fans headed to the game. The service started out great, beer selections are always solid. When the crowd started packing in we were lost in the hustle. Food was good, pub style but awesome smoked wings. Then...More
Right next to skytrain and the arena. The food is all right and the service is mediocre. We had burgers and ribs and were both tasty. Food was not hot. The service we recently was minimal and we had to get or ask for the...More
Had the share platter for two. The pulled pork was very good, the brisket is pulled and mixed with a sauce, tasted good but not what I expected (slices of smoked brisket) the sausage nice. Cajun rice was delicately seasoned and very tasty the baked...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7194804-Reviews-Devil_s_Elbow_Ale_Smoke_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Di Beppe Restaurant,"I have been meaning to write this review for a few weeks. I came to the restaurant for my 21st birthday and wow it was amazing. The food was 10/10 but the service was 1000/10. We had a waitress called Pauline and she truly went...More
Di Beppe is a cute restaurant with very good service and located in the nice area of Gastown. Food is food and ingredients taste good and they seem to be Italian original and well cooked. Pizza is definitely good and it is served ""al metro""...More
Stopped here on my walking tour of Vancouver to have a glass of wine. Also had their bread with olive oil. Very excellent service and a cozy place. Didn't have any, but their pizza looked very good.
Fantastic - great customer service fabulous food & great wine list Pasta dishes were excellent & hot olives to start so good
Came across this fabulous Italian restaurant on our walk around gaslight district at night. Only went in for dessert but was tempted by the fabulous fennel stuffed olives which were delicious. The waiter was fabulous telling us the olives were hot and they were! Had...More
I was craving pizza on my birthday so after googling, I decided to go to di beppe. The salad items and pizzas on their menu was the decisive factor. We had a buratta salad which had two types of beetroot (red and golden) with farro....More
Good quality, fresh ingredients. Great tasting food and helpful, friendly service. Would definitely recommend
Was visiting Vancouver on a solo trip and popped in as I'd seen great things on social media. They managed to fit me in at the bar. The staff were super friendly, asking how long I was visiting for and recommending me a great wine...More
Really nice place, but above all else it has really amazing staff. I would have given 5 stars, unfortunately the pasta was bit on the salty side for my taste, but that wouldn't stop me from going again, just makes me have a few more...More
I’ve enjoyed Di Beppe’s happy hour (pizza and cocktails) in past so I was feeling optimistic about its dinner service. Our server was great, as was the wine and burrata appetizer, but the lasagna was way over salted (and I love salt). Disappointing for the...More
Not really Italian food but ok for an average Italian dinner. The Prosecco was really not good and probably the bottle was opened since a long time because it was no longer sparkling. Unfortunately, one of the two pizzas was totally salty. But this interested...More
We were walking to find a place to eat and walked in here without any expectations. What a delicious meal we had! We started with the brussel sprouts and meatballs and shared the lasagne; everything was delicious! The lasagne was the best I have ever...More
Found this from reviews and decided to try it with the kids on a staycation in Vancouver. The drinks, appies, and main were fabulous. The staff seemed genuinely happy to be there and service was attentive and friendly. Will be returning soon!
If you are in Vancouver, this place is a MUST! The food quality is outstanding! We had the homemade sourdough bread, the meatballs and pasta and every single dish was delicious! You can taste the freshness of the ingredients and everything is well executed. The...More
We visited DiBeppe twice during our stay in Gastown and loved both of our visits. Their appetitivo (happy hour) negronis from 3-6 pm are a great deal and their baked goods are tasty. As part of their COVID protocols, they create more space for vaccinated...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13312131-Reviews-Di_Beppe_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Did's Pizza,"A casual search on pizza threw up this hole-in-the wall restaurant which seemingly won the best pizza in the world award back in 1988. The owner manages the place himself and is quite a character. At his peak, he had 17 pizza restaurants but has...More
Our search for calzone led us to Did’s Pizza. The owner was gregarious and welcoming. The calzone is large and plentiful with ingredient and affordably priced. We enjoyed and will go back.
Came here stoned and had some pizza. Best pizza I’ve ever had. Owner has some character. Place is nothing to brag about but it does T matter.
Did was a great guys. He was very warm and friendly. He made lots of jokes when our group were there. The atmostphere was nice and cozy. All the customers there knew Did by his name, and their casual friendship created a nice ambiance in...More
Stopped here to grab a pie to take to the hotel. Owner had just opened and was wildly accommodating. Pizza was alright, nothing special but better than most.
Grabbed a late night slice after the hockey game. Awesome pizza, the crust is amazing!! Soft and crunchy all at the same time. We will be back!
BEST PIZZA in Vancouver, hands down! The owner is a true Italian that has been making delicious pizza for decades! I ate here two days in a row... I was in NY a couple months ago and this pizza is just as good as anything...More
About three months ago one of my friends got me on to Did's. I swear I will never order delivery from another place in Vancouver. It is so good! The crust especially; it's one of the best parts. The Sicilian with added artichoke hearts is...More
If you like NY style of Pizza & you are in this part of Downtown Vancouver, than you should try this place. Good quality Pizza & staff are very friendly. Its a small place so its great for grabbing slices or whole pizza to go...More
I did not have a good experience today. Initially I decided to get lasagna at this place because of the reviews at the page, when I found the place I thought it was bigger but no. It has +- 10 seats for you to sit...More
I've lived in New York and I have to say this pizza is as close as you can get to NY style pizza without being in New York. Highly recommend the pizza!
If you are looking for a Vancouver - experience, go to this place. We got there by chance and after we tried the pizza, we were pretty impressed. We even came back the next day. The owner is really funny and passionate about his pizza....More
Quick stop for a quick bite and I will be back. You have to look for it but when you find it go in and have a slice. From what I am told they use real Alberta AAA beef for their pepperoni and the taste...More
Randomly paid a visit to Dids tonight for a pizza after seeing a leaflet in our hostel and all I can say is wow!! Possibly the most flavoursome, delicious pizza I've ever had the pleasure of eating. We went for the sicilian which had peppers,...More
I had a slice of pesto and a slice of pepperoni. The slices are big. They offer fresh cheese grated on before passing to you. They have some varieties in case ready to go... actually they put your slice(s) back in oven first so case...More
Thank you for your kind review. Chef Did",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8786576-Reviews-Did_s_Pizza-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dinesty Chinese Restaurant,"Great food that was a balance of familiar and new dishes. Chicken thigh fried rice was amazing. The only negative was no beer. Friendly staff and reasonable prices.
Went here with a friend of mine and ordered several dishes. The place is very clean, which I like and the kitchen is fully visible. This place has a great inspection history so always on the top of our list. Food is always great, the...More
Good good, good customer service, kids friendly, also found the price to be decent. Will highly recommend.
The Food tastes nice at Ackroyd location. The staff until few months ago used to be real friendly but they have moved to the new location. New staff are rude who even ask for tips after the meals. I would have given 4 stars due...More
Pros: clean, classy, modern space with a pleasing decor. Food quality is excellent with a few exceptions: xiao long bao is noticeably smaller and less juicy than at similar restaurants nearby; green onion pancake is a little more thick than I prefer. Otherwise, the selection...More
We stopped here to sample their dumplings as part of a self organised foodie tour of Richmond. We had their Xiao Long Bao in XO sauce and the chocolate and red bean dumplings. We loved both dishes and were grateful for the 'how to eat'...More
Waited for some time and when I finally got it, it was so gross..greasy, bland and the chow mein was disgusting.
First time visit to this for lunch/dim sum. Very good soup dumplings. Great eggplant with vegetables. Service was excellent. Definitely recommend !
This restaurant has a very attractive dining area and an open kitchen. It was interesting to see the food preparation area. The food was good. We ordered vegetable dumplings, chive pancake and the vegetarian spring roll. My only problem was not knowing about the serving...More
Traveling in town for business, this spot was recommended for dinner. Very busy and loud when I first arrived waiting for the rest of my party to arrive. Green served in a large teapot was lovely. The menu is very broad for choices. One group...More
A dozen of us showed up at 8.50 pm on a Tuesday night and were told right away that “last orders are at 9.30 and we close at 10”. We persevered and are glad we did since the food was excellent, from the wide range...More
My family is from Shanghai so I'm very picky about xiao long bao. I've been looking for an authentic xiao long bao place outside of Shanghai without much luck (other than Din Tai Fung in Singapore). I've been to the Metrotown location of Dinesty but...More
The food is very tasty and well prepared. busy place with good service, Really enjoyed the dumplings in particular. Will be back!
We came to this restaurant three times in our travels. Each time we had mostly good food. We like the soup dumplings but each time the only ones available were their pork ones, everything else was sold out. Also, each time the pancakes and other...More
Absolutely fantastic food for the price point. I'd say this place is a level above Din Tai Fung in Seattle. The food is just better in quality!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2216815-Reviews-Dinesty_Chinese_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Dinesty Dumpling House,"Good food at decent prices! I hadn’t been here in years. We had dine in dinner. Our rating is based on 5 stars as the highest: Food: 4/5 – decent portions with sufficient seafood. FYI- the menu said ‘prawns’ which is really shrimp for 2...More
We had a variety of dumplings and everything was delicious. A very nice and updated decor. Everything good s prepared fresh.
Great dumplings and food! Was a great atmosphere and the service was good. Lots to chose from and would definitely go again! Highly recommend.
Really enjoyed the food here. There’s even have daily specials. Portion and price were reasonable. Highly recommend this restaurant.
The soup dumplings here are amazing. Love this spot, and the staff are great too. Definitely will be back again for more soup dumplings.
This restaurant is well know for their best Dumpling ,before the Covid 19 , every tings is fantastic , I love their Beef Tendon soup noodles , last week drop in for dinner with my client ,5.30 pm , only two tablet eating dinner ,...More
horrible. the 6 of us arrived at 8:45 and ordered fried rice, 2 chicken dishes, 2 xiaolongbao and shredded pork. We come here regularly but when we came the food was unusually extremely spicy. We’re all from asian countries but we couldnt take the spice...More
We had the steam dumpling and we notice it was not good/fresh. very rare that happens. We ask the server to take it away, it was no good. She challenged us, very rude, she didn't believe that it was bad. We told her to try...More
I go there for family dinner. I specially like the dumpling, bite size and juicy. Overall is tasty. But I found that the server not that friendly and always push you even not that busy at the moment. If you don't mind the service then...More
Absolutely amazing meal. Th soup dumplings were incredible, the pan fried pot stickers were also delish, as was the beef with onions and th Shanghai noodles. We would absolutely come back.
Quick walk across the street. Very short wait. Very substantial menu with many offerings made dinner selection a bit tough, but we managed to pick a couple great entrees... Service and dinner was great. will return on our next visit to Vancouver.
This is a place I make a point of going every time my travels take me to the Vancouver area which is several times per year. Food is always excellent and service is super fast. However tonight, a single caucasian traveller was mostly ignored. Service...More
Worst. Experience. Ever.... first of all the food was worse than mediocre (reaction to service later)...The hot and sour soup was actually hot and sweet soup with zero hint of sour. We were a table of 5 and we all had the same reaction so...More
We decided to try this location after trying the Richmond place a month ago. The decor is much nicer and bigger restaurant. We were lucky to get a table because line ups were out the door. We ordered their signature dish Pork dumplings. They were...More
We , a party of 8 went to this Dinesty for dinner, it was a very busy place , but the turn over was fast The food was Ok , a bit spicy",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d10186450-Reviews-Dinesty_Dumpling_House-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Dinesty On Robson,"Checked this place out based on various great reviews on local Vancouver foodie blog sites. We ordered various dumplings- the portions were generous but the dumplings were nothing special. It’s very reasonably priced but we wouldn’t eat here again.
We wanted somewhere close to our hotel where we could stay dressed in our casual clothes while enjoying good food. This was definitely a great find. The restaurant was busy and we were lucky to get in just before a lineup started outside. The staff...More
We just got back all day out in West End , meeting my long time friend for lunch at the Dinesty on Robson , it is about 1 pm , restaurant not busy at all , Dinesty have five location in midland , all their...More
It was our first night of our vacation in Vancouver, and the restaurant we planned to go to was closed for a private party. So, we had to wing it.... and Dinesty Dumpling House on Robson was very nearby, so we gave it a try....More
It would have been a 5/5 if there hadn’t been so many menu items not available. What remained was incredibly yummy. The dumplings were plump and bursting with flavor, the noodles were al dente and dense (best I’ve ever enjoyed) and a chef-recommended speciality chicken...More
Good spot to try a bunch of dishes, dim sum or other dishes. We tried two of their steamed soup dumplings, traditional pork and then their shrimp, scallop and pork ones. The latter ones didn't hold up or seem built well. In addition we had...More
Seated immediately for lunch. Other dishes looked good, but we came for Dim Sum. Fast attentive service, and lovely decor.
Great food and authentic atmosphere. Our daughter tried soup dumplings for the first time and has not stopped talking about them since!
This restaurant is modern, clean and delicious. You can watch the dumplings being made and watch the kitchen - kind of neat. I came specifically for the soup dumplings. Excellent.
Great dim sum within walking distance of Canada Place and the Vancouver Convention Center! They even have a robot that delivers hot dishes straight to your table. Solid choice for great Chinese food without having to schlep all the way over to Richmond. I'd highly...More
Four of us came to check out their food. We came at 645pm on a Friday and there was a 15 mins wait. We ordered a variety of dishes: soup dumplings, beef wrap, spicy Wonton, seafood with vegetables, noodles with peanut sauce, green onion pancake...More
We just finished a birthday banquet in my home, keeping the numbers down to the recommended 6. The food from Dinesty on Robson was excellent and arrived nice and hot, on time. The eggplant dish remains superb as does the basil chicken and, of course,...More
We spent approx $140 for a take out and what a disappointment even my bf wouldn’t eat the leftovers and he eats everything Everything was oily too oily like it had all been smothered in fresh cooking oil No flavour not even the sweet and...More
We went to this restaurant specifically to try the dumplings, which had been highly rated by friends. The dumplings were delicious and we also ordered a noodle dish. The service was very quick and professional and the food arrived quickly and very hot. This is...More
All the reviews in Vancouver continue to point to this placing being the best for dumplings and they didn’t disappoint. We ordered the pork fried, the steamed pork buns and the steamed pork and they were all very tasty. The service was good, and we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3913603-Reviews-Dinesty_On_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Disco Cheetah Korean Grill,"The food here is unreal! The fried chicken bites and the bulgogi beef baos were so good. The korean fried chicken wrap was delicious too.
Disco Cheetah, I've missed you so badly! I was browsing places to have lunch after class last Saturday. Couldn't make up my mind on where to go. I actually walked awhile from Howe all the way to Davie to find Disco Cheetah. It WAS worth...More
Before travelling to Vancouver for the 2nd time, I always want to try out affordable but good quality food. Came across this disco cheetah on you tube as one of the must try restaurants and boy it didn't disappoint me, Had lunch, tried the wrapped...More
Korean Fried Chicken. Just tried this place in downtown Vancouver minutes ago. Truck is right beside the art museum. I heartily recommend it as this chicken was some of the best I've had and I've had alot!! It's fried boneless chicken legs over french fries...More
Amazing fried chicken and the side are fresh and so flavorful. We included all four sauces. However not sure if its just on that day or just this is how their rice is but the latter was mushy and had a particular taste. Apart from...More
Got delivery from this place. Was very happy with portion size, flavours and variety. A much needed and great addition to Davie street!
We stopped by disco cheetah at their Dave street location while wandering the Davie village looking for lunch. We'd heard about their food truck so decided to try out their store on Davie. Ordered the pulled pork and Korean fried chicken rice bowl. Big sized...More
If you love fried chicken and you are downtown then this is the place on Davie Street. Their Asian-style fried chicken is juicy, tender, tasty and crispy skin. KFC means Korean Fried Chicken and it is better than the KFC we find in North America....More
Noticed them among many other options at the food trucks fest and I’m absolutely glad that I did. Many delicious sounding options. I went with pulled pork roast rice bowl. Aroma coming from that pork is quite something, mouthwatering to say the least, and taste...More
This food truck was pretty awesome! The fried chicken was really good. we both got slightly different meals. I got the KFC and he got the rice bowl with friend chicken. They had a long line too but again it was worth it. Great for...More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15044053-Reviews-Disco_Cheetah_Korean_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Diva At The Met,"Add Diva to your list!! One of the best meals I've had. A wonderful menu that was different from the usual items offered on many dine out menus. The presentation and flavour profiles were exceptional. Will definitely be back to try their regular menu.
I went to Diva twice for breakfast during my stay. I recommend it without qualification. The room is smaller but well appointed. The service on both visits was friendly, crisp, and very welcoming. I tried pancakes and the American style breakfast. Both were hotel pricey...More
Diva at The Met has been on my “must try” list since 2008, which even I’ll admit is a little ridiculous given I’m frequently downtown – and have stayed at the Metropolitan at least a half dozen times since then. Granted, I’ve had room service...More
Came here for dinner on a Saturday. Very quiet vibe, not a large place, not fancy at all and the décor really needs updating. Service was great, our server was nice. Food was pretty good - we had the charcuterie board, I got the salmon...More
Staying at the Metropolitan Hotel, Diva at the Met is a convenient choice, and utterly delightful. First night was so delicious, the staff so welcoming and kind, the room and atmosphere so gentle and comforting, that I ate dinner here five nights in a row....More
I went there for brunch with some young investment banker/stock promoters who like great brunch and the ability to be able to converse without being overheard talking about their latest deals. The Canadian Benny was superb as was the uniquely presented hash browns. I am...More
Food was very good. Service was ok. However after the waitress dropped a red wine glass on the table, we had to ask her twice to clean the table properly so we could finish our meal on a dry table without glass shards. When the...More
Showed up as a table of 7 for lunch with no reservation and had no issues getting seated. We were on a time crunch as we had to get back to our conference, and we were in and out in a perfect amount of time....More
The food was good, signature diva burger tasty. The service was excellent as well. The only point for improvement would be the limited choice of wines and the missing coffee machine.
Arriving late in Vancouver at the hotel the staff were really helpful and managed to provide us a meal even though late. Bar staff/restaurant staff really friendly during the stay and had some great local knowledge to share when chatting.
We had tapas one evening and dinner another evening at Diva. Both times, the food was excellent. We were very impressed by the service and the attention to quality. Highly recommend this restaurant. Would definitely go again on our next stay in Vancouver.
Good strong drinks. Quiet restaurant/bar attached to the Metropolitan Hotel. It was never busy on the 4 days I was at the hotel. I went on one day and was blown away by the quality of food and drinks. Give it a try during Happy...More
Great location, near everything without the noise of too loud music and overpriced cocktails. Did I mention the house infused coctails? Yes I did. Bacon vodka, Raspberry vodka, Caroljna reaper vodka, Hops vodka on display and there's the syrups and shrubs that Thomas has on...More
We stayed at this hotel recently and found the bar staff and drinks and food to be excellent ! If you visit in the happy hour or all day Sunday there are good deals on food and drink ... food was very good and the...More
I'm staying at the Met, so this restaurant is convenient. Fortunately, it is also delicious. Two meals in, I can attest to the quality of the food, the service, and the ambience. Our first night, there were three of us, all exhausted from a day...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703797-Reviews-Diva_At_The_Met-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dixie's BBQ,"Had to stop by again prior to them closing shop. They will only be doing take out via delivery services I believe from now on, but damn how amazing it is. Ordered th briskett which is my favorite, along with fried chicken and sides. Great...More
The only reason I come here is for the brisket. I've had my fair share of southern BBQ and I still think Dixie's brisket is the best anywhere in the lower mainland. They do run out, so I always tend to go earlier. The service...More
Went with a reservation on a Friday at 7 PM. Was not busy. Festival and a couple picnic benches plus bar stools for seating in a comfortable casual room. Nice C & W music playing at a reasonable volume. Water and menus arrived immediately. Our...More
Five of us had dinner at Dixie’s on a Sunday night. Yes, the neighbourhood is very sketchy but we didn’t experience any difficulties. We ordered the Bubba meal for four. The waiter assured us that it would be plenty of food for five. Boy was...More
A hole in the wall on E Hastings, we came here for a friends birthday. The food was okay, wasn’t overall amazing or exceeding expectations. We liked our server however the guy who handle our bill was not conversation. It was awkward. It was alright...More
A group of us went to Dixie's on the recommendation of a friend who had been there for a scotch tasting. The food was excellent and lots of it. Five of us shared the Bubba. It's a selection of all of their BBQ dishes and...More
Finally I have found the best southern BBQ joint in Canada. They serve tasty, moist and tender brisket. Their ribs and cornbread are also noteworthy. Having lived in Texas for many years, I have been searching for good brisket across Canada. Dixie's is clearly better...More
My husband and I love this place! We've been here a couple of times now and the place doesn't disappoint. Portions are good and the food is amazing. My favourites are the ribs and cornbread. Atmosphere is lively and the staff are really friendly and...More
Went here with an out-of-town co-worker. He picked this place because he saw an instagram video of the brisket that looked promising. We arrived at around 7pm on a week night so it wasn’t busy at all. Place looks like a place straight out of...More
Folks, I'm a bit of a BBQ snob. I avoid 'rib-fests' like a bad smell, never order BBQ at restaurants that don't exclusively serve BBQ because I'm often disappointed by over-sauced, fall-off-the-bone ribs (say ""overcooked"" with me) and brisket that is on life support because...More
Was Jonesing for some Texas BBQ so my wife and I met here after work for a quick dinner. We had beef brisket, ribs, sausage links, beans and cheesy spinach. Every dish was fantastic - Perfect BBQ. Service was attentive and friendly. The sauce (at...More
Fun country music. Decor texas cowbow clean and really fashion. Whiskey bar. Great waiter. Tasty food.
After a lot of travelling we ordered food online from here. Can’t comment on the venue but the food was fantastic! Would definitely try their restaurant if their food was anything to go by!!
We ate here a few days ago in a large group. We made reservations ahead of time and made sure we had them note how many racks of ribs we wanted as they often sell out. Food was a hit! great decor. Wasn't a fan...More
My husband and I went to Dixie's for his birthday and we were not disappointed. We wanted to find a good bbq place other than Memphis Blues because we'd already been there several times. We were both really excited and even though it's recommended to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10607502-Reviews-Dixie_s_BBQ-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Do Chay,"All vegetarian or vegan. Enjoyed Truffle Dumplings, Uncle Hsig’s Wings (mushrooms), and Satay Noodles. The first two were excellent, the Satay Noodles were spectacular! Great service. Highly recommend.
A friend brought us a takeaway from Do Chay and everything was delicious. So much so that the other day we went to eat at the restaurant. Everything was delicious, beautiful presentation and the waiter so helpful and informative, answering all our questions. We will...More
Amazing food, attentive and friendly, service, great ambience. Best Vietnamese food we have had in Vancouver for sure!
I am pleased to live in little saigon Do chay is my favourite of several great places Staff are amazing genuinely present The food is divine The careful design and finish of the restaurant suggests it was built to be here for a hundred years
They were able to make me a wonderful and flavourful dinner with my allergy restrictions! I can not eat onion, garlic, leeks, chives. Often my food is bland but this was flavourful. I had the green papaya salad and the rice cakes! Both were so...More
I had a amazing lunch with my business partner yesterday at the Do Chay Vietnamese restaurant on Kingsway , they been in business since the 2019 , not a big place , may be 30 seats , family run , clean , menu is truly...More
This little gem of a restaurant is not to be missed. One of the best meals I’ve ever eaten. Service was excellent and followed Covid protocols. I will go back.
This was genuinely one of the best meals of my life. The menu is a perfect length, variety but not so much that it gets confusing. AMAZING food.
we were a group of 5 and we ordered 10 dishes everyone was delicious. Beautiful presentation, interesting ingredients, lots of textured and fresh ingredients. Loved it all, highly recommend the Gastown restaurant!
What can I say about Do Chay.......A LOT of interesting flavours for Vietnamese vegetarian food!! My 3 choices today: spring rolls, pan fried daikon cakes, black garlic eggplant. This is my third experience from The Yaletown location, and not my last👌
This was my first time to Do Chay. We went to the Yaletown restaurant and everything was wonderful ... the decor was stunning, the ambience was very nice, the food was delicious, and the service was excellent. The restaurant is Covid-safe with plexiglass barriers and...More
This is not my first time go there even the restaurant not big but ALL dishes are good and tasty. I will go again in near future.
What a pleasant discovery. I got a tip that there was a Vietnamese Vegan restaurant at Kingsway and Knight and I had to check it out. My partner and I were pleasantly surprised. The food was extra tasty. We were very pleased with the atmosphere....More
I reallly enjoyed their food, surprisingly! My daughter is eating more plant based foods, without sugary carby, ingredients if possible. We asked the server whom we knew from another restaurant, what he recommended the items, and wow! Only challenge is NO parking during 3- 6...More
I heard a lot of goof things about this place. I’m not vegan or a vegetarian but I don’t mind going out to a place that specializes in vegan/vegetarian occasionally. Because of the current provincial health orders during the COVID pandemic, I got takeout. I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17679606-Reviews-Do_Chay-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dock Lunch,"I don’t eat here very often, however, when I do, I am always impressed. This was formerly an apartment converted into a little cafe/restaurant, but it manages to keep its cozy living room feel. There are 1-2 options for breakfast/ brunch/lunch and both are excellent....More
I've been to DockLunch quite a few times for brunch - and I'm always happily surprised. I love it! It's unique and unlike anything else that Vancouver has to offer. This is the first place I recommend to anyone visiting, or any local in the...More
We visited Dock Lunch recently for a late lunch (1pm+/-) on a rainy day. This is a tiny restaurant setup with older, well-used furniture and a few hundred older books (""Serpico""!) in a bookcase along the wall ... I didn't count the number of seats,...More
I am not a big fan of eggs benny, but I must say that the one I had at Dock Lunch recently did not disappoint. It came with crab cakes and a side salad, and it was perfect! For dessert, we had a slice of...More
I love this place! The decoration is very particular that make me feel at home, they have just 2 options for the menu, the two times I been there my friend ask one and I have the other option, both very delicious and fresh, service...More
I have been here twice for lunch and intend to try it for the Friday night dinner soon. I love the charming, hip atmosphere and the warm friendly welcome from Elizabeth the owner. The food is delicious, there is just no way around that! As...More
How come there are only eight reviews of this place? Maybe the number doesn't matter when the ratings are so good. Visited with our daughter, who lives locally and had told us about it - you might not otherwise find or notice it. It's just...More
An interesting and tasty idea. There is no choice of menu. But homemade bread with fresh roast beef with feta and black olive butter! Yum, served with a steaming tasty bowl of parsnip, potato potage. Felt like you were visiting grandmas house, but boy can...More
My husband took me to a ""surprise"" lunch the other day to settle a tif. He said it was to a place we've never been before, and it was highly recommended by his wine buddies. No wonder. Dock Lunch is charming, and hip and delicious!...More
This place is a gem! It has a cute & cozy atmosphere with the friendliest service. Delicious home cooked meals, and different every day. Everything from creole, to mexican, to french-inspired meals. They do brunch on weekends, lunch during the week, and dinner on Fridays....More
This place rocks. Liz serves up whatever she wants, and it's different everyday. The overall food experience is fantastic, and I definitely recommend the desert. She only publishes the menu once per day on Instagram, and closes up shop when she's out of grub.
What a friendly, tasty lunch spot!! You choose from a couple of daily specials, we had chicken pot pie with vanilla nutmeg cake for dessert and it was just like Mom made. Cozy atmosphere, with bookshelves filled with old books. The owners were super friendly...More
A restaurant unlike most others, there are usually only a couple of items on the menu, which changes every day. When Elizabeth (the owner) asked me which I wanted to eat, I said I wasn't sure, and she cheerily said, ""How about some of each?""...More
Finally went for lunch after walking by several times. As noted Elizabeth is a warm friendly host in the place she previously called home for 15 years. Neat space, lovely high ceiling, eclectic seating. Started with home made lemonade and it was a fine compliment...More
I love this place! It was recommended by a friend of mine. Elizabeth has a kind soul and is incredibly friendly in trying to get to know her guests. The food is great, and the decor is inviting. It's almost as if you are walking...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7808762-Reviews-Dock_Lunch-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dockside Restaurant & Brewing Company,"The patio was great but the food was terrible. The food was tasteless and presentation was awful. The worst dinner I have had in a long time.
Beautiful spot. Food was great even for a buffet is was fantastic. Service was horrible for Mother's Day. Not worth $615 for 4 people. Still not worth it. 1. They emailed twice and called once to confirm attendance. A little annoying. 2. Cattle call for...More
We loved every meal we had; well, 90% of it anyway. The prices were on point. Unique dishes, with care to detail. Very prompt and friendly service. I got the special agnolotti at dinner and it was superb. Serving sizes were on the small side....More
RUDE! The staff upon questioning regarding the ( limited ) menu for lunch was quite rude and less than informative. When I asked about the menu , she couldn't even be bothered to answer she just said it's online, which I had already searched and...More
I was staying at the hotel and had dinner in the restaurant. It was during Dine out and I only wanted a small meal. The alternate menu they presented made no sense at all. It was as if they had just picked random food to...More
We were for a lunch and we enjoyed very much the seafood, the desserts and the perfect Service. I recommend especially the salmon and clam chowder en croûte. The Restaurant is perfectly located on Grandville Island with view on the Harbour and Skyline. Thank you...More
If you are looking to showcase Vancouver this is the place. Great fusion cuisine, microbrewery and you are right on the water, dockside so to speak. With the water, city and mountain views I could sit here all day.
My friend and I planned to have lunch for the first time at this restaurant, we selected it for its location and to be out of the downtown core, we ordered the ham croquettes, a Caesar salad, and the squid for appetizers, which we feel...More
The food at dinner was absolutely wonderful, but the service did not reflect the ambiance and the food quality. The wine was opened at the table where the server almost elbowed me in the head and simply said ‘please excuse my elbow in your face’...More
Staff is so rude! I had a really bad experience twice. If they don’t want customers around they would not act differently. Their idea of closing some parts of the restaurant cause there are not enough waiters is ridiculous. Even getting a simple drink is...More
This is the rudest employee management I ever seen in my life I was there in a date and felt a very bad energy from the restaurant The food is okay could be better
The food here has never been extraordinary but the atomosphere and location represent a perfect summer moment in Vancouver , so I’ve overlooked the food quality , but I can’t anymore . We have taken guests there three times in the last two months and...More
Fantastic location overlooking the Pelican Bay marina! We had the eggs Benedict, both classic and French onion versions. Small portion has one egg, regular is two. Very nicely done and the potatoes were browned and crispy. Excellent service!
Great experience, good food, excellent service, magnificent atmosphere! We sat in the interior lounge but we had a good view of False Creek and all of the marine activity that went on during our meal. We are from Edmonton and there is nothing to compare...More
The view is nice, terrible food. Below average food. Very disappointing and I definitely wouldn’t recommend and We definitely will not be going back. Vancouver has so many fantastic restaurants with great menus, this is not one of them.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703811-Reviews-Dockside_Restaurant_Brewing_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Domo Sushi,"Really good sushi for a good price !!! Very friendly staff! Huge selection of sushi ! Best gyosas ever ! Will definitely come back!
I ended up here by mistake. Nice and close to hotel. But not the Sushi place the concierge suggested. In any manner. I’m happy for the mistake. Just a great little place (read hole in the wall) serving up fresh and delicious sushi, Sashimi and...More
Excellent experience at Domo Sushi! Fish was fresh and the rolls were imaginative and tasty. Customer service was very good as well. Would definitely look to return on our next visit!
I'm on a diet that is supposed to have my liver heal from an auto immune situation. No red meat! Low salt!. I treat myself to Domo Sushi wild Sockeye Salmon sashimi once a week. The best in town. Giv'er!
Although this was relatively fast and friendly I cannot say I would ever dine here again. I guess it's true you get what you pay for. The box as soon as I opened it when back in my office smelled mouldy. One bite...yep. Had to...More
This place has delicious sushi gyoza spring rolls and more. The service is quick and price is right. I like the green dragon roll.
Every time I travel here for work, I hit Domo Sushi. The prices are very reasonable for what you get and the service is fast and friendly. Typically, I have stayed at the Loden Hotel which is conveniently located right across the street from Domo...More
By far the best sushi in Vancouver. Small and not fancy but amazing service and great great sushi. The person gentleman that works is very nice and makes the way you like it. Bravo.
Open mainly for lunch on weekdays, this place gives you good fact and consistant good service. Limited seating but good turnover....get there before 12 to avoid the rush. Quality varies as the week progresses so try early week for best results. Prices are getting higher...Kiku...More
Open mainly for lunch on weekdays, this place gives you good fact and consistant good service. Limited seating but rather good turnover....get there before 12 to avoid the rush.
Domo is a small family-run sushi restaurant and offers great variety of dishes for more than affordable prices. I'd recommend to eat at the premises and order at least one of the hot fresh dishes.
This is a small casual sushi joint, with few tables. The sushi and sashimi selection is quite good. There is also cooked japanese food like udon, tempura, pumpkin croquette etc. Price is ok..
Domo Sushi needs another bump up in the Trip Advisor rankings. I have been going to this place for nearly 5 years, and while on the off occasion I get sushi elsewhere in Vancouver due to friends etc., I always sit there thinking, ""why aren't...More
Always super busy but sure worth the wait! Eat in or take out. Phone ahead By far the best in Vancouver
A great place if you're looking for reasonably priced sushi with good service in a very casual, unassuming zero atmosphere. If you are looking for ambiance, this isn't the place for you. Although fit the bill for us while staying in Coal Harbour we were...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4882679-Reviews-Domo_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Donair Town Robson,"I previously went with my friends. The only one who had intended to purchase anything was myself, but after trying some of my items, they had to get their own. Really tasty, reasonably priced spicy sauce. The owner was really gracious and provided us a...More
Ordered a medium hot chicken donair with all the toppings. Flavour was extraordinary! Love the sauces! Love the way they bundle the food inside the pita pouch. SPECTACULAR!
My wife & I enjoyed an excellent donair and falafel lunch here, While we were eating at a table outside, the owner brought us two Turkish coffees (Teas?) We were amazed!
Living in the Halifax/Dartmouth area and returning whenever we can, we have had our share of donairs. We found this place after googling donairs near our hotel and picked this place because it had Halifax style donairs. They are very close in taste and are...More
Tried the house poutine. Quite tasty but just plain weird. I knew the ingredients because they were listed so I can only blame myself. Weird.
I may be slightly biased because I came here after a run around the sea wall (i.e. I was starving), but I thought it was delicious. I got the lamb donair, Hawaiian style, which includes a sweet sauce and pineapple chunks. I really liked the...More
The toughest part about Donair town is picking just one thing. The meats are delicious and the veggies super fresh. The garlic sauce should be a good group of its own. Fast, friendly service and food we come back for over and over again.
I have read that many people think highly of this place. That is not my opinion. The fellow behind the counter was pleasant and explained our options to us. My wife had a wrap with chicken and lamb, Lebanese style. I had a chicken shawarma...More
Big portions. Cooler full of drinks. Reasonable prices. I’ve eaten here before and will be back again!
I found this location while searching for halal food when I was walking to Stanley Park. I had food from this location twice on my trip and the consistency was maintained. This here my friend was one of my best experience of donair kabab in...More
This store is totally different from other Donair Town in Vancouver. He made all the sauce by himself. And the Poutine, is the best poutine I've ever had. Please visit here and try this Poutine and other food, like Donair. You'll never regret, I promise....More
Well it was the biggest portion I have ever had with a reasonable price (12$-ish)! My wife got the lamb and I got the Chicken one! Well both were very yummy with fresh veggies and house sauces! Besides, the gentlemen who took our order was...More
This is my favourite Donair place. The food is very good and the man behind the counter is always kind to my 82 year old mother who loves Donairs (and jalapenos, much to his surprise).
This place was close to our hotel and looked like a popular spot so we thought we'd try it. The Donair was great and the portions were pretty big. We didn't have a long wait but the few tables were full so we took ours...More
The chicken they serve has been one of my favourites for a long time. Recently they raised their prices quite significantly making them more expensive than others. What is most worse is that the fries cost $4 for a portion and we found like 16...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4848228-Reviews-Donair_Town_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Donnellan's Irish Pub,"It’s a rarity indeed to be sitting at a bar outside of Ireland and hear patrons and the bartender conversing with thick Irish brogues. Unfortunately, what this place makes up in authenticity, it lacks utterly in service and food portions. We tried a table but...More
We visited based on other reviews. The music was very loud! We had a couple of beers and fish and chips. The food was ok but the fish was absolutely tiny. We paid for extra fish too! This venue is best suited to groups of...More
A friend and I went on a night out in Donnellan’s and had a great time! The music and atmosphere had us up dancing and we had so much fun. Definitely recommend.
Found on our first night and went back for a second. Guinness on top and good choice of other drinks. Live musicians each night. Staff super friendly
Donnellan's is as I have always pictured an Irish pub. At least twice a year my wife and I spend time in Vancouver and always make a point of walking to this pub. We make a point of enjoying the Curry Chips which I highly...More
We so enjoyed our last experience at the Donnellan's Irish Pub, we had to come back. We are glad we did. This place has a great vibe, so enjoy! (I've included a picture of their menu if you are interested : )
My husband and I came here on a Sunday afternoon for a early supper. They only had the buffet that day so we took it. It was a delicious meal! We were stuffed by the time we finished.
I really liked the interior and atmosphere of Donnellans and the drinks were a reasonable price. Food was good but didn't blow me away. I'd still recommend popping in here for a pint of two though.
Just strolling around Vancouver downtown area, came across this pub, we always love Irish pub and it happened to be their happy hour, ordered a pound of chicken wings and 3 pints of beer. Food and service was good. The next time we visit Vancouver...More
The Guinness was grand, and only $6 a pint during happy hour (4-7pm). The service was good when we first got there too, Dernn was the servers name but she had a name badge “Petal”. We order drinks which were good, as stated previously the...More
Authentic Irish bar on Granville st. Went in with some friends after work, excellent happy hour with great prices on Irish beers. Fantastic, quick service from friendly bartender Aodon from Ireland. Heard mostly Irish accents from customers too, live music in the evenings as well
Great spot. Start your day with a full Irish breakfast or a smaller meal and start in on the Guinness or Magners. Great Happy Hour from 3pm with 6 dollar pints of Magners cider or Guinness! You can't beat that deal and the hard working...More
We found this place while looking for a place to watch the Champions League games and we've been coming back at least once every two weeks since. Love the atmosphere and the food is delicious and affordable. The staff is very friendly and the music...More
I had tried several places in the downtown area to see the Champions League Final. They were all full and I had given up and was heading for Granville Island when I spotted this place. It was very busy inside but I managed to squeeze...More
We were staying at a hotel near this pub and after we saw the great Trip Advisor reviews we thought we would check it out. It has a interesting decor and fine Irish beers. The table service was excellent too. It probably is my imagination...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13402597-Reviews-Donnellan_s_Irish_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dosa Corner,"Rosita C. Richmond, BC 2576 12/25/2020 It was our first time coming here, recommended by a friend. The restaurant observed social distancing and keeps a register book for customers to sign in. My friend ordered their fish pakora for an appetizer and Eggplant Dosa while...More
I don't eat much Indian food, but I have always liked it. A friend introduced me to Dosa Corner last weekend. It is a small family run business in an industrial area of South Vancouver. It appeared to be closed but I was surprised to...More
First time here. Highly recommended by friends to try. Run by family members and service is great. Food quality high and price is very reasonable.
Good dosa almost in a typical Indian style. The service was a little slow but steady. The dessert tasted home Made.
The place looks old and small from outside but the looks does not represent the value this place has! The food is really tasty and was served really hot and fresh. We will surely come back.
I ordered a takeout today. Among several dishes, I ordered 2 items of the chicken 65, one for my toddler son and one for my friend's. I dropped off his items first (his chicken 65) and later that night I found that there was no...More
I was on a 4 day visit to Vancouver. Searched for a good South Indian restaurant ended up in Dosa Corner. A very small restaurant but tasty food on reasonable price. Not sure how the parking availability on day time. My both visits are in...More
Just came back from lunch with friends and four kids. Very accommodating for a group of 7. The food was so good! The butter chicken was flavorful, the cheese dosa was great (good for kids) and the lamb briyani was equally as good. You can’t...More
Food is good. We came to dine here for lunch and no one else is there. I was surprised for the food i ordered, it""s great!
This place has been on my list to try ever since my friend took me for my first dosa experience in Missisauga. It was the first and best ever had and I’ve been looking for the equivalent here in Vancouver ever since. I took my...More
We enjoyed our dinner at this place few days back. Very impressed with the quality & taste of the items served. Choice was also very good.
Great place in south Van. Offering tasty dosas at a great price without sacrificing quality or quantity. Due to this, always busy! So if you come at a busy time expect to wait
I’ve had Indian cuisine a number of times but this was a 1st for Dosa’s. It was an interesting take on the usual. Nice flavours and I enjoyed the fish pikora as suggested by others Price point was good and generous portions
The Dosas were good and the idlis equally good. The chutney and Sambars tasty however the service is simply lacking. No Smile no eye contact and it almost felt like the staff were reluctant to engage in any sort of conversation let alone ask how...More
Very disappointed that we could not use our Entertainment coupon as there was a sign saying the coupon wouldn't be accepted. Will complain as this restaurant is getting free advertising with Entertainment and we won't be coming back.b",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6706260-Reviews-Dosa_Corner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dosa and Curry,"We ordered a Chicken Biryani and a Lamb Dosa, the biryani had no flavour, and the dosa was too salty. It was ""oh my god"" salty. I told the server the dosa was too salty and I cannot eat it, the manager or the chef...More
What a great experience! The chef and the attendants were so friendly and nice. The food was amazing and 'Authentically' South Indian- one could attest that they prepared their food with a lot of love and respect!
I wish I could rate this place negatively but unfortunately I can’t. Our lady server was alright, however another guy (perhaps the manager) was extremely arrogant, rude and disrespectful towards us. We were still eating when he came to our table to ask us to...More
The servings are plenty. The flavor is excellent. The cost is competitive on Davie St. The service is polite and efficient. We has a good experience!
A discovery! We went in the first time rather by chance, because we lived for two weeks just nearby. Wow, are the curries delicious! And the naan, a dream. It became our favorite place where we ate regularly. I highly recommend the Veg Samosas with...More
It is a while since my last visit for there All you can eat $19 dinner buffet ! lovely cozy restaurant , they specializing in Dosa ,and South Indian cuisine ,wonderful curry , restaurant only offer take out or delivery , it is lovely hot...More
We visited again this restaurant and reconfirmed once again the quality, variety of food and great and profesional service offered this time by Parita, who is also adorable . We had Idly, sweet corn soup, veggie lentil soup and fish, chicken and veg pakoras..... all...More
It is a hidden gem in downtown. Exquisite Indian culinary, very cozy and lovely place, generous portions, very affordable prices and the most important lovely, courteous and diligent table service offered by MANI. It was our first time visiting and for sure will not be...More
Great food, huge portion, excellent value and very friendly staff. Highly recommended! Would return again soon.
Apparently my last review didn't get submitted,so here it is again. The aroma drifting from Dosa and Curry on Davie Street close to the Sandman hotel enticed us to venture in. We were first greeted with friendly professional staff who sat us at a quiet...More
I stopped by here tonight was I was walking down Davie to so some business, intending to go to Donair Dude, but the scent from the street made me stop. There are so many Indian place in Vancouver that they kind of get un-memorable, but...More
Dosa and Curry is a small little gem I found on Davie st. I love love love this place!! The food is incredibly delicious! It’s very affordable with large portions. Best butter chicken I’ve ever had. I got the veggie pakora, medhu vada, veg. Samosas,...More
Service staff was knowledgeable on dishes and made good recommendations. We had a delicious eggplant dish and a cream corn and chicken soup. The chef and all staff were gracious and friendly.
My sister and I came to Dosa and Curry and enjoyed a delicious meal. The chef very joyfully provided me with a custom order, the server was gracious and the food the best I have eaten in the city. This meal was light and tasty,...More
Excellent food and service. Chef prepared customized order for us. Very nice family run restaurant and atmosphere.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14883888-Reviews-Dosa_and_Curry-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dosanko Restaurant,"Truly an outstanding meal! We started off with their Beef belly katsu sandwich. Super tender and juicy with their tonkatsu sauce&koji mayo + and their house made milk bread. Next up is zangi. Garlic, ginger, crispy chicken and their jalapeño mayo. Delish! Crispy cheese onigiri...More
My first time dining at Dosanko and won't be my last! Though not in the best location but the food is worth to come. It's during the pandemic and happy to see table are distanced comfortably and staff wearing mask. We came with couple for...More
We decided to visit this restaurant, we were so glad to come here. The food was awesome, staff was great no complaint from us. Everything was excellent
Excellent food, amazing restaurant, wonderful staff!!!! You must try this restaurant!!! Everything is fresh and tasty!🥘🥗
We had been meaning to try Dosanko after reading about it in the local paper a few months ago and a chance presented itself so we went for lunch. The decor is warm and inviting in a part of Vancouver which can often be challenging...More
Home cooked Japanese food in what seems to be an historic building (lovely brick interior). Surprisingly large lunch menu and with a range of favourites and perhaps some not so well known dishes. I had the tonkatsu ling cod,...beautifully done batter...my wife the regular tonkatsu...delicious...More
I noticed Dosanko had been listed as a finalist for Best Japanese in Vancouver Magazine, so I thought it would be worth trying. It was. We tried these dishes: - Tuna Tataki - Very good. In most places, the emphasis is on the Tuna, but...More
Dosanko's cuisine is described as Japanese homestyle, and indeed, most of the recipes are from co-owner's Aki's family in Hokkaido, Japan. While the dishes are simple, each one that we tried was cooked to perfection. The deep fried dishes like the kangi ( chicken appetizer)...More",8,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d19503573-Reviews-Dosanko_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Double Dd Pizza,"On a Friday night, nothing hits the spot like good pizza and Double D's hits the spot. It's more traditional- thicker crust and heaped with fresh ingredients and it tastes great. This is a popular neighborhood spot for good reason
Anything I have ever ordered has been delicious. The staff and wonderful, friendly and fun. Thank you for the amazing food!
Ordered baked lasagne and a caesar salad for delivery. Received baked spaghetti. On top of the lasagne sat the caesar salad. No one thought to separate them. As a result, the salad was warm and completely soggy and wilted. Gross. The piece of garlic bread...More
Small and cozy place, but always a good experience for dining. Been there about 4 times and stuck to the Pizza (need to try something else). good starter selection - try the calamari.
We have ordered pizza from here a few times over the years, and always enjoyed it. Recently, I was here for a work function (roughly 35 people) and I was really impressed. Having always gotten takeout, I hadn’t really spent time in the dining room....More
I didn't try the pizza, but the Greek options are fabulous. The shrimp souvlaki was out of this world !!
Nice neighbourhood casual Greek restaurant. Lots of choices of pizza, greek food and standard salads etc. We had a variety of things, moussaka, pizza, salads, pita and tzatziki, skewers. It was all delicious.
Went for for a family dinner (10 ppl). The service was very good, and the restaurant itself is really quite charming. The food is your typical Greektalian. Not great, but better than average for the type of restaurant. Pizza is well topped. The tzatziki is...More
I give this place a very good in a probably should be just average situation. I find it is very hard to find good Greek food and these guys do a good job. Great family place. We’ve been twice now, both times it was very...More
I ordered for delivery, a pizza and chicken strips, the guy on the phone was not friendly at all, gruff and abrupt. The pizza was disgusting, burnt and unable to eat it, threw right in the garbage. I emailed the restaurant to tell them about...More
My wife and I dined at this little restaurant at least a half-dozen times over 4 weeks and were never disappointed. Whilst they obviously specialised in pizzas, including takeaway, the in-house menu boasted a wide selection of dishes to cater for all tastes. On the...More
Love this family run business that consistently serves a great meal at a great price. The Roast Lamb Dinner for $17 is great value and is absolutely mouthwatering delicious. There is one thing for sure Greeks have been serving and eating lamb for as long...More
Had driven by this place on several occasions and was looking for a reasonably priced Greek restaurant. While we were there on a Monday night there was lots of empty seats in the place. We were greeted and seated immediately and you could feel a...More
Joined my husband and friend on their weekly night out of which Double Dd is a regular. Really friendly service, great value food and such a comfortable space. The Spinach pie was really good and the portions are great for the big eater or those...More
I love the service here and I love the food ... one thing that I do not like is that they charge people extra for Greek Salad ... its a Greek restaurant so as far as my thinking goes Greek salad should be priced appropriately...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971629-Reviews-Double_Dd_Pizza-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Double One Chinese Restaurant,"Poor manners. Loud and nasty. I was looking at the menu and asked about the differences in menu. I asked the owner politely. To my astonishment, he got mad and shouted at me over and over again with louder voice ""where are the differences""? ""Where...More
As usually a very exquisite culinary and great service . Dishes are with generous portions and very affordable . We had BBQ duck, Singapore noodles, corn and chicken soup and vegetables with roasted almonds . It is a place to be visited very often …...More
Excellent, cozy , friendly Chinese restaurant with great Chinese culinary and marvellous service offered by Tony and Teresa, who are very diligent and courteous. Another hidden gem in Burnaby Heights where we could order bbq duck, fresh squid with vegetables, delicious smoke pork noodle soup...More
Very nice to have a good Chinese restaurant in the neighbourhood that we can walk to. Generally go for lunch, but also for dinner sometimes. Food is consistent, portions generous, and staff friendly. Often very busy, so we tend to go at opening, or after...More
Great ""Western Style"" Chinese food. I have been going here for many years and it is consistantly good. It has become a Family Day tradition. We had six at our table. We ordered hot and sour soup, deep fried squid in spicy salt, beef with...More
Always order from Double One for our New Year's Eve dinner - been a tradition in our family for years. Always fresh, tasty, and the owners are nice. A fave in the North Burnaby area.
Dinner for 2 is a common order for us. It has a bit of everything and there is always enough leftovers for lunches the next day.
I had high hopes for this restaurant. We showed up for a late lunch, early dinner, and there were only two other tables of people. The server brought us menus, and water. My family, 3 of us, each ordered the Combination Dinner for One ($11.50)....More
I've been coming to this restaurant for 20 years. I used to work in the area and it was one of my regular lunch stops. I haven't lived or worked close to it for 15 years, but I still make the trip from downtown Vancouver...More
Hadn’t been here for a couple of years and i was craving their Eggplant Hotpot. We walked in and the place was hopping. I didn’t see the eggplant on the lunch menu and silly me, I should have asked for it. Instead I had an...More
Very nice spot. The restaurant was clean and recently renovated. We had sweets &sour , beef chop suey, spring rolls and chow Mein. All very good. Stand out for sure the sweet & sour!
Five of us dropped into this restaurant for a quick supper during a family visit in the neighbourhood. The restaurant was clean and had a family-run ambience. All of our ordered dishes were promptly prepared, and while generally unremarkable, were nicely 'wokked' of fresh ingredients,...More
All the food is pretty good, really good service. They are so friendly there. The owners, their son and the servers are really nice and always serve with a smile. I have been going to this restaurant or getting take away for many years. Nice...More
We've eaten at Double One for years in both small groups and very large groups. It's always really tasty food. Service can be a bit slow if it's a busy time, but it's always friendly service. They are careful about food allergies (my son has...More
Went there with 10 people (family) and had a very enjoyable meal. There was something for everyone. We had made Reservations which was good. The service was friendly and helpful. Good western Chinese cuisine. Seemed like a good local staple",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d971631-Reviews-Double_One_Chinese_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Douce Diner,"Came across this place by chance as we were heading through town. Their made it hard to choose what to order! I wanted something light so ordered the granola with yogurt, lemon curd and berries… It’s the simple things that can tell you a lot...More
If I could sum up, in one word, the winter season spent dining at DD, I would say CONSISTENCY: the food was always consistently delicious, hot, fresh, fun and flavourful. Always, and all winter long. The service is always consistent regardless of the weather, the...More
Breakfast was amazing!! We're here now trying the Chicken Benny for the first time! So delicious!! Flawless! Superb! So original. I love the homemade Bisquits and Hollandaise sauce - I cannot say enough. I'd come back for the biscuits alone. And the server is great!...More
OMG. Sooooo delicious! Stopped here the morning after a Cuban vacation so maybe it was extra yummy after eating at a buffet all week, but I think it would be amazing anytime (and judging by the lineup, lots of people agree). Hubby had the waffle...More
The eggs Benny was wonderful, brewed coffee nicely surprising…and bottomless. Squash soup of the day and sourdough toast were equally a hit across the table. So wanted the huge smoked meat sandwich but alas there’s always next visit!
Delicious Rueben and chicken Benny. Staff and coffee very good! Would recommend and will be back for another visit
Recommended by our Air B&B host in North Vancouver, it was a culinary experience. Fast & friendly service, Douce Diner was an amazing discovery. We had their Eggs Benedict, waffles and their incredible French toast (weekend treat). Coffee cups and water glasses were always refilled....More
The service was non existent. I had the feeling we were treated like tourist that would never come back to this restaurant. That's how I felt when the waitress asked if we were visiting from out of town. This place is definitely short staffed! It's...More
Great experience. Fantastic food. Like that small town gem only the locals know about. FYI - no reso's but they are very attentive so tables turn over quickly
We were looking for a brunch place near the Capilano Suspension Bridge. And Douce Diner was an amazingly delicious find. The food was spectacular—they even offer a pastrami Reuben for breakfast! The girls enjoyed avocado toast, waffles and other homemade specialties. The staff was so...More
Fantastic brunch spot in North Van. One of those menus that makes it hard to choose. So you go back again and again. The room is warm and bright. The food is incredible. Homemade favourites done exceptionally well. And the service is just want you...More
My freind recommended this place. it was good. i had the Ruben it was very good. the fries were very good. portions were good size not small. they used thick sliced bread. coffee was good. My freind has a latte he was was very good....More
It looks great, and always has a line. We were super keen after seeing the menu, and are certainly glad to have gone; but wouldn't go back. The food was bland and tasted of nothing.
Looks for a GREAT breakfast or Lunch.... THIS IS A MUST stop. The food is amazing and the STAFF are awesome. I onlyHeard they had some out of this world milkshakes I was stuffed so didn't get the opportunity to try. BUT I WILL BE...More
This diner is epic. It’s more than a diner really - the food is elevated to more than comfort food. It’s fresh, artfully crafted, delicious and incorporates local elements like baked goods from a nearby bakery. The atmosphere is charming, bright, energetic and feels very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d17752796-Reviews-Douce_Diner-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dragon View Chinese Cuisine,"The service was overall horrible when I called them to make a reservation the lady who picked up doesn't speak english and was very impatient.
Squab, mixed tofu hotpot, baby choy sum with beef, Taiwanese cauliflower with Chinese sausage, sweet and sour pork, curry crab with noodle, soup, almond cookie and green bean soup.
They offer no discount on Sunday. Everything is so expensive. The manner of the cashier (who brings the card machine to us) was too unacceptable. The attitude was so rude and offensive. She even did not ask us for permission before she moved a chair...More
We were a bit early for the dim sum but Rebecca (host) seated us promptly at 9:30 AM. During the course of our dim sum we noticed an adjoining table with a very nice pastry. Rebecca was very helpful in explaining that this pastry was...More
I came here once for a fancy dinner banquet and left underwhelmed mainly because Dragon View attempted to be the 5 star restaurant it wasn't and hence, I gave it 4 stars. Today, my family and I came back for a 4 star experience in...More
Very reasonably priced and ""authentic"" dim sum. We know because when we go there, we are usually the only Caucasian couple enjoying the delicious selections. The menus are in English and Chinese, and the other diners have been helpful in recommending selections to try. This...More
The sweet & sour pork is the best because it is lean pork with no fat and no dough. Food portion is pretty large, and service is good. It is a large restaurant, you probably can go there without a reservation.
There are quite a number of Chinese dimsum restaurants in Richmond BC, but this Dragon View Restaurant is one among the top notch. Price is reasonable. Lunch or dinner are good. I love the rice porridge with lobster, very unique and tasty without trace of...More
I cannot remember when the last time was when I ate at Dragon View Chinese Cuisine but I was so happy to be invited here by a friend for lunch today. The food was good but what impressed me was the service we got today...More
Dim Sum was very good. If you can go early, they give a 20% discount before noon. Staff are friendly. Enjoyable meal.
This restaurant is in the north west corner of Continental Plaza at Cambie Road and Sexsmith Road on the 2nd floor. They open at 0930 for Dim Sum and to our amazement, the doors were opened before 0930, unlike other Chinese Restaurants who open right...More
Dragon View Chinese Cuisine is located on the second floor of Continental Shopping Centre in Richmond and has a pleasant looking interior with interesting chandeliers that, to me, resembled the round leaves of a money tree (lunaria annua). There’s also a large floral mural on...More
Great for Dim Sum and their Sesame desert when they is the best anywhere.. Dinner value is good for groups too, value for money.
The menus and nearly all the patrons appeared to be Chinese. We had reservations for 6, we were seated quickly, and tea was served almost immediately. We were early on a Tuesday (about 9:45A) and the place was already quite full. The food was outstanding....More
First time and definitely won't be the last time to come here. Dim sum was good, service was excellent, and sitting spaces ok. On the table, there was a small saucer with XO sauce and it was very full. After finishing it, the waiter came...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7028381-Reviews-Dragon_View_Chinese_Cuisine-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Dublin Calling Rooftop,"Stopped in looking for a quick bite before heading to a concert. Sat upstairs,which is the better place to hang, pool tables...must,great vibe. Had seats at the bar, with excellent service. Total fluke we strolled in. Cheers
Dublin calling from when we entered the pub we were made to feel welcome, it was a pleasure to eat and drink here, plenty of choices on the menu, excellent place for a drink or two
We went here last weekend to the rooftop. It was pretty lively, drinks were decent and the service was quick. The music was decent, had a decent time out here!
Amazing customer service, Amanda is awesome ! She went above and beyond ! The games were super fun too, worth a visit !! :)
Went to the second floor of this establishment, the games bar. Not a great experience, they do not accept cash, it’s card only, except you need change to play the games. There is no change machine, so your only option is to leave the bar...More
Stumbled on this place after shopping all day. The food and the service was great. We had the nachos and they were probably the best I’ve ever had. We couldn’t stay long as we had dinner reservations later that day. We will definitely be back...More
spent a few nights here , beers were reasonable price, staff were great. Upstairs is basic but fun with a great crowd. Recommend for a tourist on the beer
It just looks like a pub. Nothing fancy or elaborate (not that that is a bad thing); a basic pub. And yet, their burger and fries are much better than expected! Come for the booze, stay for the grub!
went here to watch a footie game and it was a great vibe. cheap drink too and the food looked nice. its huge inside!
Nice spot for a drink and food.the bar has big enough windows so you can watch the world go by.barman was friendly and very good considering he was on his own.didnt get his name.my wife had a buffalo wrap and I had the fish and...More
Food was fantastic and filling, choices of beer and beverages excellent. Great place for a nice midday meal, atmosphere was very pleasant.
We were in town for during the Stanley Cup playoffs so we wanted a place to go watch for Dallas Stars play. Came across the Dublin Calling pub. Was great to watch hockey with true Canadians. We sat in the bar on the ground floor....More
The food is great!!! It's a very noisy, lively restaurant and the night we went, they had several private parties so service was a bit slow, but expeceted. Our server was great and again, the food is great quality, good pricing and delicious!! The best...More
*This review is for the downstairs pub at street level* We're walking around doing some shopping and decided to stop in for a quick lunch. Service was OK, but with only one person working it was slow. The food, however, was not good. Most of...More
I walked out of the hotel and was going to head for Gas Town. The rain got worse along with the wind. Decided to head back towards the hotel. I spotted the sign for Dublin Calling. The entrance is on a side street - not...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14150726-Reviews-Dublin_Calling_Rooftop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dublin Crossing Vancouver,"Non service or ignored for sexual orientation! Totally unfriendly and rude to all minority groups! Any disability gets ignored, veteran persons ignored! Non approachable for physical disability don’t go they don’t want you only the young and in with the staff! It’s a staff and...More
Stopped in for a snack and a drink. Very impressed by the atmosphere and the service and food. We sat at the bar where we were well looked after by the bartender. We shared a taco meal between the two of us. It was very...More
My partner and I decided to check this local pub out. He’s looking for a central location to have an afternoon meeting and this place checks a lot of boxes. So we decided to have a drink and dinner. Our waiter, a true Irish lad,...More
I have been going to this establishment for years. Handy to my home. But overtime the menu improved but the atmosphere has worsen. Its very clicky. Staff often spend most of the time lingering with their clicky homophobic friends. They are also known for repeating...More
Stopped by here for dinner. The food was fantastic as was the service. Would defineately eat here again when we are in Vancouver.
Every time it changes manager every time the food is getting worse. Good selection of beers but the food has nothing to do with Ireland. The Irish stew is a disaster. Can the cook looks for the real recipe online? That doesn't seem too difficult....More
Enjoyed an excellent dining experience at Dublin Crossing. Sat in the enclosed patio with blankets during December. Enjoyed a hot bowl of seafood stew. The menu is loaded with tasty options. I chose the schnitzel which was tender with an array of veggies, sauerkraut, and...More
Solid Dublin feel to this pub. Unfortunately a few mediocre impressions that will keep us stuck to the drinks only and probably at the bar. We arrived at happy hour, and as is usual of all Vancouver establishments that is not promoted, mentioned or encouraged....More
Checked into our accommodation and needed supplies and dinner. In the shopping mall we found the Dublin Crossing. Called in for a beer, and ended up trying the bar menu. Nice beer, reasonable food and live music most nights.
Stuffed Yorkshire puddings were delicious. Nice atmosphere and friendly service. Great place for pub food.
This pub is absolutely adorable as the decor looks so original that it is difficult to believe that it just a re-creation 6,000 miles west of Eire. I completely loved everything about the place as the service was also exceptionally great... there were just two...More
8 of us had lunch here in July. The pub itself is decorated to a high level with authentic Irish furniture and bric a brac. The menu has a lot of choice, all of our meals were excellent as was the service. If I lived...More
So so so so good. We would definitely recommend this place to anyone looking for a good hearty meal. We ordered the Yorkshire puddings , Irish Stew and the bangers and mash. Everything was absolutely divine. Even followed up with both desserts and was not...More
Wouldn't recommend this place to eat.. Cons-- The bacon cheeseburger was a total letdown, Burger was dry and overcooked and the bacon couldn't find it. Fish & Chips looked promising, but the fish had a sour taste almost like it was spoiled?? Overpriced Pros--- The...More
Good food served in a nice setting. Reasonable value price wise but as the food was good quality it moved it up to good value. Nice healpful staff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10043356-Reviews-Dublin_Crossing_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Duffin's Donuts,"Serving Vancouver since 1987, twenty-four hours a day at the current location for the past fifteen years, Duffin’s Donuts looks like a stoner’s fever-dream complete with Fritters, Crullers, Sub Sandwiches, Tortas and even Fried Chicken. The life’s work of Tony Chhuon and Paula Sim, Cambodian...More
Ordered 10 piece chicken over the phone. Drove all the way there to pick it up and staff entered the amount charging me more without telling me. Thank goodness I checked the amount before tapping my debit card and questioned about the extra charges. The...More
I've been going to Duffins for 15 years or more - the sour-cream-glazed old fashioned donut has not changed, and remains the best in the city. All of thier donuts are delicious - crispy outer edge, soft interior. Mostly old-school donuts - by which I...More
I was so pleased to finally visit Duffin’s Donuts! This “Vancouver icon” has been on my “must try” list for a few years, but it’s not on my usual route; thus, I played it smart and took advantage of the fact that my sister was...More
Finally had the chance to finally check this place out. Tons of donuts and very delicious fried chicken here at a ton of hours. The staff are very friendly and it's such a Vancouver Icon. I highly recommend checking this place out.
10/10 late night/cheap eats Absolutely recommended to anyone visiting Vancouver. Duffin’s is a Vancouver classic and a must-try. I recommend the cinnamon donut, the chicken Banh mi, and must try the fried chicken.
Popped by @duffins_donuts and boy were we surprised. Not only do they have a healthy....ok not healthy but huge selection of donuts but they also have fried chicken, fries, bubble tea, an assortment of Mexican sandwiches, like chorizo queso sandwich, Asian styled sandwiches, like teriyaki...More
Had a casual family lunch here today. It was so good. The prices are kind of amazing. The fried chicken was probably my favourite, but everything else was tasty too. Very nice fries and poutine. I will go back for sure! It was steadily busy....More
This review is mainly for their DONUTS! The name says it!! Duffin's DONUTS!! Yes, their donuts are incredible! Cuz they are busy almost all the time and their donuts are so fresh that they can keep up with the demand! Light and fluffy, these are...More
This is a 24/7 fast food joint, where good donuts and excellent sandwiches are served. (Under the name ""hot torta"")
Decided to pick up take out for dinner. We’ve had the donuts many times but have not tried the chicken or Viet subs. Donuts good but sold out on a lot of flavours at dinner time. They said more flavours ready at 11:30pm! The honey...More
Does anything say old school donuts in Vancouver more than Duffin’s Donuts? Sure, you can find lot of cool designer donuts nowadays and they’re all pretty good. But when you’ve got a craving for some doughy goodness in the middle of the night, where else...More
Located centrally at the junction of 41st and Knight this was a place we always drove by wondering what it would be like. The name is misleading as it seems they only carter to donuts but their choice of sandwiches are really limited but tastes...More
Duffin's offers off street parking however my experience is that the parking lot is generally full. It's convenient that Duffin's is open 24/7. The tables in the seating area are typically soiled as it doesn't appear that Duffin's has bus persons.
Maybe it was our expectations, so we were not surprised about the donuts nor the place. We expected a nicer experience.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4316778-Reviews-Duffin_s_Donuts-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dutch Pannekoek House,"Must try the Pannekoeken! Awesome Dutch breakfast! Excellent coffee and fresh squeezed orange juice! Great service!
I really enjoyed the blueberry pancakes (take out) from this Dutch Pannekoek House at 1634 Capilano Road North Van! Thank you!
I had breakfast here for 3 mornings, and had something different each morning. I recommend the oatmeal with fresh fruit and craisins. Very good staff, service quick and friendly.
This was so convenient being attached to the Best Western Hotel. I had breakfast here 3 mornings and tried something different each morning. Staff friendly, service quick, food was excellent.
This restaurant is on the location of the SureStay Hotel in North Vancouver. We chose this restaurant as we did not want to walk to other restaurants that can be found in this general area of North Vancouver. While the service was good, the menu...More
Stayed at the Sure Stay hotel which actually boasted this cafe within the premises. There is a great breakfast menu but it is a bit pricey. Nevertheless the quality is good and enjoyed having breakfast there.
Small, clean and very good breakfast, very large portions. Good Value. Would for sure make a trip to eat here!
I was staying at the4 attached Best Western Hotel, I went here for breakfast two mornings. Small quaint facility with great staff and the food was very good. Highly recommend. If I recall, it was not open for dinner.
Very good sized portions, served hot and made to order. Have to admit this was one of the best breakfasts I have had in a very long while. Our server was nice as well, would eat here again for sure.
I was so happy with this restaurant (on Best Western premises). They serve heavenly pancakes and other breakfast dishes.
If uou have a craving for Dutch Pannacoeks, try this spot. It is hidden in the Best Western Hotel on Capilano! Great coffee! A wide selection of the dutch pancakes and several traditional breakfast options! The eggs bennedict were very god, but ask for the...More
We were looking for gluten free pancakes while in Vancouver and found De Dutch where they serve ""pannekoeks"" which are somewhat like pancakes, but not really pancakes. The pannekoek is a Dutch version which is thinner and larger with a slightly different taste. The menu...More
Little shop. Great food. Had to stop in. It was awesome. Crepes. Omelet. So awesome. Stuffed and happy. Love it!! Certainly will return. Thank you
According to the signs, the restaurant at the BW Capilano is called “De Dutch”. We were skeptical because of the bad reviews, but decided to try it anyway since we had a long day ahead. The selection was large (even though the menus looked 20...More
We had breakfast here because it is adjacent to the Best Western Capilano. There were lots of choices on the breakfast menu, and everyone in the family was happy with what they ordered. Friendly, fast service. We were there at 7am, before the restaurant was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d5073434-Reviews-Dutch_Pannekoek_House-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dutch Wooden Shoe Cafe,"The breakfast was just average, at best. Price was fair for portion size. Interesting decor. Kind of a Dutch stereotype collection of soveniers
On my 2nd trip to Dutch Wooden Shoe, I tried the famous Breakfast Platter, opting for scrambled eggs hollandaise & Bavarian smoked sausage slices. A huge, tasty breakfast, as it also came with homemade raisin toast, hashbrowns and apple sauce, all for the low price...More
This place is fantastic. It is the perfect place for a breakfast date. The prices are reasonable. The selection is scrumptious and the service is good. I look forward to eating here whenever I can. There is definitely a much better appeal to this place...More
If you are looking for authentic Pannenkoek is Vancouver the Dutch Wooden Shoe Cafe is the best place to find them. Friendly staff offering great service and serving up all kinds of different pancake dishes, breakfast, lunch, or dinner, the Dutch Wooden Shoe has got...More
Have just moved to Vancouver from the UK so was stunned by the size of this huge breakfast plate when ordering the Dutchman Style Platter. We were walking up Cambie street when we saw this very hidden-away gem of a cafe. Bottomless coffee for $2.40...More
Brought my son here for his birthday breakfast. Could explain some Dutch culture to him since much more authentic. Yummy food, great portions, good service.
This is a great place for breakfast! Their menu is very extensive, so you'll need a lot of time to go through it and decide. They have many great options, it was hard to choose. The decor is a bit tacky, a bit of a...More
I have been coming here for over 30 years and the good food, service and atmosphere have have been consistent and spot on. Love the big combo platters where we get a bit of pannekoek, eggs and potatoes...salad too. And since it's hard to find...More
Friendly service, very pleasant/cosy restaurant. We had bacon and cheddar (could have been crispier but still delish), the fried banana one was great, the kids lived their wooden show shape pannekoek.
The atmosphere is cozy and the food comforting and portions generous. It's a very old location and at first I was a bit skeptical when I saw the exterior but all was good when I saw the expansive menu. Anything and everything you could wish...More
The outside of this can be misleading and make some people cautious. When first walking in you are a bit overwhelmed by the abundance of decorations. You feel as though you are walking into a Time Capsule. After just a few minutes you are completely...More
delicious authentic dutch food well prepared, lots of fabulous choices for sweet or savory meals, great orange juice. Very busy spot full of locals = good place to eat!
On the search for breakfast we came across this place, not the best option but reasonable if you are hungry and like Holandiase sauce, many old pictures of strangers and old beer glasses on the wall ;)...
This place has the old-school feel of Vancouver before everything start to get homogeneous and sterile. It's got the feel of a family restaurant with the quirks and personality of its Dutch founder. It has a multicultural feel, too, since the menu has items (centered...More
This somewhat quirky but great restaurant is an awesome place to eat for budget friendly folks or those who appreciate a tasty filling breakfast. Don't be fooled by the exterior, which looks a little home made and dated. The food here is so wonderful you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d783961-Reviews-Dutch_Wooden_Shoe_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Dynasty Seafood Restaurant,"What a crashing disappointment! Dinner here was laughably bad. We needed to hunt down a host to seat us. We tried to order cocktails, ended up with undrinkable highballs- imagine a gin and tonic without a lime wedge (the tonic tasted like lemon lime soda,...More
Dynasty It was a first coming early at 10 am for dim sum. That’s what time they open. There was a lineup. Da I suggest you make reservations. It’s rare you can get free parking anywhere in this area. This place offers 2 hrs free...More
High end seafood with lobsters, abalone, steamed cod, fried chicken, fish maw soup, jelly fish, fried rice and deserts. I was so full…but very happy. Service was excellent and we were the last to leave the restaurant.
We came here for dim sum, small restaurant. Have to wait around 30mins. They do provide free parking, it is on the ground floor underneath the restaurant. Their Shrimp dumplings was the best out of all the dim sum we tried.
Thank goodness we made an advance reservation for this bustling, slightly out of the way Chinese restaurant hidden in the Fairview section of Vancouver. Much of the clientele was Asian, including in a huge baptismal party. The wait staff spoke middling English but was friendly...More
Our family came for Sunday lunch as our last meal in Vancouver and the food was excellent!! Shrimp dim sum, sticky fried rice with chinese sausage and chili garlic, cod with eggplant, pea tops, eggplant and string beans were all fantastic. We ordered a lobster...More
The beef and lemon pastry pie was excellent and unique. The turnip cake and XO sauce was delicious! Super crispy crunchy toppings. The sablefish was also very tasty.
Dynasty Seaford Restaurant in Fairview Slopes, on Broadway, between Cambie & Oak, was somewhat of a disappointment the Xmas Eve afternoon I visited. It was just after 2 pm; I had just had my third dose vaccination at the wonderful Pharmasave at City Square, near...More
I called them up to place an order, she put the phone down for 5 minutes. No one answered so I hung up, and call a few minutes later, no one answered and I called a third time a few minutes later and no one...More
Our group enjoyed many wonderful items: beef & gai lan, crab, spareribs, tofu and chinese greens, and mushroom medley.  Lots of free parking if you register your plate number.  Service is always good here. 
There were 8 of us in total which when it comes to Dim Sum makes for the best experience as you can order a wider variety of dishes before you get full. Our dishes included but were not limited to shrimp, lamb and pork dumplings,...More
I cane here with my sister and brother in law during my visit to Vancouver. They come here regularly and now I know why. Service and food was excellent. Loved the taro with BBQ duck, deep fried squid tentacles and everything else. Definitely recommend.
We went to this restaurant on Sunday without a reservation. We had to wait about 15 minutes to be seated. It was worth the wait. The restaurant was a fairly fancy restaurant. You ordered from a menu. We had six items plus tea-sticky rice in...More
Our only complaint is the place is noisy. The food is excellent and the service is very good and attentive.
Great Chinese food here. Staff are nice and the prices aren't bad at all. Highly recommend this spot.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1890632-Reviews-Dynasty_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Earl's On Top,"Loud and fun car and restaurant in the city centre. Good beer and cocktails. Enjoyed the pizza. Energetic staff, good atmosphere.
Overpriced and Underserved. Used to be a regular customer at this location. The food has become average and not worth the cost. Pizza was undercooked. The service not always good.Our server dropped off our order and we did not see them again for 20 minutes....More
I had one of the best eating experiences in Vancouver. They have a nice happy hour (food and drinks!) and extensive menu with delicious food. I would recommend the street corn and avocado dip, and the salmon! To top if off, Nicky was really sweet...More
We chose this based on reviews and proximity to our hotel . We couldn’t have had a better experience!! Booked a table online for 15 mins time, walked over, seated at a beautiful 2 seater booth looking across the corner of the restaurant out the...More
Came here Tuesday evening. Not busy at all. Requested a booth by the window. DENIED. Must have been 8 open tables or more but hostess asked if we had a reservation and we did not so we were stuck at the back. With all the...More
The food was average but that is typical of bar food. We had to wait awhile for a table, but it was a crowded night, and the service was average. We will look for someplace else next time.
Easy to miss as you walk by but once there you will not be disappointed. Food was delicious and the staff were very friendly and efficient. They do a brunch menu as well as dinner. They also have a couple of new dishes that they...More
It might just be a cleanliness issue, but I watched one of my travel companions put her arms on the table and within minutes lifted them up with rashes and welts where they had contacted the table. But it got me started looking around and...More
Hi Mary, My name is Austin Axenty and I am the General manager here at Earls Robson. Thank you very much for your feedback here on your most recent visit. It has been talked about with our Service team and Leadership team for many different...More
Food was decent, service was poor, venue is a bit tired. Service spoilt what would otherwise have been a decent meal. We stopped in for something easy and convenient near our hotel after, a long day and lots of walking. The server wasn’t very welcoming...More
Thank you very much Zimmerman for your review of us. My name is Austin Axenty and I am the General manager here at Earls Robson. I am very sorry to hear about the service you experienced with us on your visit. If you would allow...More
Had the most delicious meal here- crab cakes and bbq ribs! Absolutely sensationally flavoursome! My hubby ate his salad! Would recommend this restaurant! Our waitress Elise was attentive and helpful!
Thank you very much Helen for taking the time to share your 5-star review and for the kind words for Elise. We appreciate it big time and look forward to hosting you both again. Cheers!
Food is ok at happy hour but not excellent. Normally love coming to this location. Prices have not been adjusted accordingly to happy hour prices so make sure you examine your bill. I complained to the waitress that a 5 oz red wine was $5...More
This earls location is not the best. It seems crowded and very loud. Service was mediocre- not earls standard. Menu could use jazzing up. Same old same old for a while. Wine menu tired too.More
Hey there ReggieGal, Thank you very much for taking the time to share your review with us in regards to your most recent experience. I was curious if you would be interested in discussing further with me in regards to the service, when and where...More
Went for dinner with a friend. We were seated right away and our server arrived shortly thereafter. Drinks were brought over quickly after our order was taken. We each ordered a different entrée, and we all very much enjoyed what we chose: Fettuccine Alfredo with...More
Thank you very much, Snoopy for taking the time to share your positive review of Earls Robson. We appreciate it big time and look forward to seeing you again in the future.
Consistent with most earls. Friendly staff, good food, nice atmosphere. I just wish they had more of their new menu items available.
Thanks very much, Bobbi for taking the time to share your 5-star review with us. We appreciate it big time. We soon will be getting more menu items added as our store will be undergoing some renovations soon!
There is few Earl's restaurants around the area , but my friend love this location because the cozy rooftop patio , and relax atmosphere , not as busy as the others , the decor very modern , we were here for the early Brunch to...More
Thank you very much Tony for the kind words and for sharing your review with us. We really appreciate you taking the time to share this with us. We look forward to seeing you next time!",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d684320-Reviews-Earl_s_On_Top-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Earls,"Good food and great atmosphere - with the ice hockey play offs on TV, this felt like a hybrid steak restaurant / sports bar. Great service as well.
Happily sat us as a walk in party of 4 for dinner. Great dining section. All the food was presented nicely, and tasted great. Personally loved the sushi, and the guac appetizer.
earl’s was our last stop on a tour of BC and easily the most disappointing meal. We went for a Sunday brunch and got a good table on the patio. My food was very poor - the artisan bread was a two lumps of toast...More
We stopped here for a drink and some midday snacks. The staff was lovely and friendly. The food was delicious and came out of the kitchen quickly. A good atmosphere for all ages, it was the perfect re-fueling station for our family!
We arrived in Vancouver this evening and started eating at 3am uk time! This could have been a damp quib of an evening. However the food perked us up. There is a lively vibe in the restaurant which most being under 30...not us ( two...More
Recommended by out-of-town guests. They are very familiar with this chain, and didn't want to search any further into Yaletown once they saw the ""Earls"" sign. There were six of us, and we all had something different. Everyone was very satisfied with their meal, whether...More
This earls has a great location and a great patio. The service was very good. Attentive and lovely. The food was good but the items we wanted weren’t available since unfortunately the oven was broken. It’s still a good restaurant and I wouldn’t hesitate going...More
The patio is coverd and heated, and is quite nice, much better than sitting on sidewalk for sure. Had brunch there, ordered avocado benedict but didn’t want to have potato, and they changed it to a side salad at no extra charge, I just asked...More
Earls is a chain of restaurants across mainland , last few years ,all their restaurants did a fantastic make over , more trendy , lest noisy ,creative but simply menu , I stop going to Keg for long time , Earls is the place for...More
We waited 20 minutes to even get a glass of water, never saw our server once, felt invisible and unvalued. The hostess insulted us when we came back to the front requesting a seat at the bar considering we hadn't been able to order a...More
Hi Brett. Thank you for taking the time to provide us with feedback. We are always looking to grow and improve and the gift of feedback allows us to do so. I will be reaching out via email to discuss your experience further and ensure...More
What is good of this chain restaurant is the consistency what they serve in each city is always the in total harmony everywhere, You will have no surprise at all. good products, good service, very affordable and very safe food. Excellent concept, this everyday restaurants...More
We have not gone out for dinner very often since covid hit and decided we needed a night out. We have a baby and chose Earls to go to thinking they are accommodating for families. We had made a reservation and were warmly welcomed by...More
Three of us had a pleasurable experience at Earle's. We came after 5 PM & missed out on their terrific Happy Hour menu but having looked at it, there's an amazing variety of 22 items to choose from including calamari, tacos, pizza, chicken dish, burgers,...More
Hello John, First off thank you for taking the time to leave us such a great review. My name is Kass Tucker and I am the GM of this Earls location. I want to assure you that I will be sharing this review with Christy...More
My friends and I put our name down for waitlist for a table in the patio. The host informed us that the wait was about 30 mins and that we will receive a txt when the table is ready. My friends and I left for...More
Hello Lara, I hope you are having a great day! I am sorry to hear that you had a terrible experience at Earls Yaletown. I want to assure you that we take feedback very seriously and want to be able to improve where we can....More
There are several earls in Vancouver but this Yaletown location is the best one for me. In the heart of Yaletown, classy interior, great service. Great for couples and a group of friends to enjoy drinks and casual food. It can be pretty busy on...More
Hello Kyokot505, Thank you for this great review raving about Earls Yaletown. My name is Kass Tucker and I am the GM of this location. I will be sure to pass this along to my team. It's been a pleasure hosting you and we hope...More",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3600989-Reviews-Earls-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Earls Bridge Park,"The new location is very urban and upscale. The decor is quite nice and this location will be superb in the summer when all the sliding windows and doors can be open. The team is very professional and welcoming. The food is delicious and the...More
And on this occasion, arriving at the new Earls at 1308-1425 Lougheed Hwy. Burnaby, and looking up and around one could not expect to be in Burnaby, but rather Chicago or New York City, the towering buildings enclosing the entrance are astonishing, giving a dizzying...More
We celebrated our anniversary en famille by having lunch there today. It was really, really, really busy. I’ve never seen this place so busy before, and even though our expectations were pretty low (a big party with kids is never easy to accommodate), the staff...More
There were 5 of us went to this Earle's and it started out rather slow, with the receptionist at desk outside not finding our reservation name, then found it, took us inside to get put of the heat, waited for our table to be ready,...More
As usually it is a great restaurant with lovely patio and following strictly the social distance rules. We were a party of 6, 3 couples and we enjoyed a great deal the excellent, gorgeous and professional service offered by Sawyer, who did a great job....More
Went here a few weeks ago with a friend. The waitress we had at first was great but then left. When my food arrived I could tell the bun was burnt and chicken was refried. I ordered the Nashville hot and I've had this many...More
My team came here for a meal together. I had their Salmon zen bowl and pinto grio. Because their menu is so varied, there is something for everyone. Good service and all our food came out at once and was hot.
We joined our adult children and grandchildren at Earls Kitchen & Bar (Burnaby) to celebrate our 56th wedding anniversary today. The staff didn't know our purpose but treated us as if they did! They were attentive and capable, introducing us effortlessly to (a) the fact...More
I went to Earl's with 2 friends on July 14th for dinner. My friend and A were reuniting with 1 friend and three of us met after 10 years. Great casual atmosphere for friends and Happy Hour. We went past 6 and the weather was...More
So glad they are back with their usual delicious menu and great service. Today May 24th, 2020 we visited and Tristan gave us a friendly profesional service 👍🏻👍🏻. By the way was Happy Hour and we got nice deals. We got Caesars , dry ribs,...More
On Mothers Day we orderd 6 meals for Pickup. Upon arriving for pickup there was a line up and the restaurant was running behind. It took us about half and hour before we got to the front of the line. At this time they mentioned...More
I am Celiac and I have been eating at Earl's restaurants without any problems, since I was first diagnosed 5 years ago. The Earl's Kitchen + Bar on Lougheed, in Burnaby, BC was one of my favourite restaurants and I ate their regularly and/or ordered...More
“An Absolutely Incredible Experience that provides great value” My server Josh was very knowledgeable about the test menu, and informed me about all the menu options. I particularly enjoyed the mint water. Very unique. The food was incredible and came out extremely fast, and also...More
After receiving gift certificates for Christmas we went with a group of 5 adults. Three of us had the burgers...one was fine with his hickory burger; but two of us had the bacon cheddar burgers...the bacon was obviously previously cooked as it was rock hard...More
Friendly staff advising you good on the right special beers. Typical American/Canadian restaurant with friendly good looking staff, tv screens with sports on all the walls. Liked the thick mushroom soup very much and also my combo of cajun chicken and ribs (half portion more...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d684319-Reviews-Earls_Bridge_Park-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Earls Kitchen + Bar,"Decided to visit Vancouver on a whim because I’ve never been and Earl’s was near my hotel. Stopped for lunch and the staff were the best! Paris offered great tips to make my weekend an adventure. She was amazing and SO helpful! Plus the food...More
Good Service. But OTT. But food is So-so. I had the Tropic Thunder pizza which was bland. My wife had the pasta which was Good, but not to praise about.
We were in Burnaby to visit the massive Metrotown Mall (which is just a couple of blocks over from this Earl's) and enjoyed the food and service so much that we came back 2 days in a row. Try their Kale Pizza -- It is...More
Ordered from there when I was on a business trip and it was a fantastic. The order was made exactly what I ordered and it arrived hot and fresh. Portion size was great.
We did not consider Burnaby, Vancouver, as a great eating out destination -- until we found Earls. What a great place: friendly staff, great service, a wonderful menu, and a good vibe. Love to be able to visit again.
What an incredible brunch date with my friends! Ashley took such good care of us and was so personable it made our experience. The food came out piping hot and we were happy to have received all sauce accompaniments promptly and the drinks were fabulous!...More
My mother and I had an absolutely delightful pleasure of being served by being served by Sean.  He was respectful server took the time to ensure we had an enjoyable experience. Sean made sure to check in on us to see if we needed anything...More
A couple of us came here for lunch. We started with the spinach dip. The colour of the dip didn’t seem natural. Mostly tasted like it was a basic mix. I ordered the Vegan Impossible Burger wrapped in lettuce versus a brioche bun. No charge...More
We recently came here for the first time with another couple. I hadn't been to Earl's in years. We use to go to the location on Kingsway but had been finding it too loud to visit comfortably with friends, so stopped going there. As soon...More
We enjoyed a nice meal. Very clean, good service and social distancing protocols were in place. Mid range pricing.
Seated promptly by a friendly hostess. 3 of us shared lettuce wraps and a pizza. Plenty of food. Great service. Busy place.
While I don't consider myself someone who frequents restaurants, I have been doing some considerable catching-up lately as the Covid restrictions are relaxed. Came here with friends on a sunny afternoon for a celebration. On the positive side: seated promptly, pleasant location on the patio,...More
Decided to go into this Earls for lunch after doing some last minute holiday shopping. The restaurant was bustling and had a good vibe. Outside was empty as it was rainy and cold. We were greeted promptly by the hostess, and guided to our table...More
My good friend and I came in for brunch yesterday and haven’t seen each other in months. Our server, Amy was very prompt and could tell right away we had lots to catch up on. She gave us our space, but whenever we were low...More
We came here on a rainy night and there was about a 20 minute wait to dine inside. They reserve a table for you and you’re seated ‘socially distanced’ from the next table. Service was friendly and prompt. You aren’t given a menu. Instead you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d17594598-Reviews-Earls_Kitchen_Bar-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Earls Test Kitchen,"The food at Earl’s was good. We enjoyed a variety of items, including oysters, salad, blackened chicken, parmesan chicken with mushroom risotto, poke bowl, key lime pie and crème veils. The service, however, was very slow and our server was generally inattentive. The music was...More
This one is in downtown but it’s not the only Earl’s in Vancouver. There are more. But all of them are super good, both their food and service. My son has egg allergy and they are very careful when taking my order, asked the kitchen...More
If you're in the mood for some easy-going tasty food and a chill vibe, this place is where it's at. It has got that swanky-meets-cozy thing going on. The kind of joint I love, you can kick back, relax, and have a blast with your...More
We had a very nice dinner, great tasting and very good service. Surprised to be told that all bottles of wine were half price - nice added bonus. If I had one criticism the music was a bit loud, otherwise we had a great evening...More
We had first encountered an Earl's in Jasper, so we knew we were in for a good time. This however is the ""Test Kitchen"" - just go upstairs and shee all these chefs on monitors sat in a glass room, weird. But it was good...More
It took the waitress 30 minutes to show up and ask if we wanted anything. When I finished my meal she removed the plate while I was still chewing. Horrible service. Restaurant was also deafening.
We went to this Earl's for an after show Dinner after a concert. It wasn't busy but still noisy for the sports bar. As this is a Test Kitchen the menu has more variety than the normal Earl's. We had very friendly wait staff and...More
Took us a couple tries to get to the correct Earl’s location, but it was worth it. We ordered some wine then a sparkling wine along with a hamburger and other sandwiches at the bar. Really got lucky with great bartenders again. Especially our new...More
We arrived to this huge cavernous restaurant and made our way to our reserved table booth across from the bar. First thing you notice about Earls is the nightclub vibe, the music is loud but doesn’t interfere with conversation. The tastings menu based on trial...More
Menu was ample and easy to select from. As it is a ‘test kitchen’, they do encourage feedback on some newer dishes. We went on the day with half price wine & that was a bonus, considering the expensive BC wines at restaurants. Service was...More
We visited for dinner and had the crab cakes and Bangkok bowl with steak. Both delicious, fresh and well done.
I dined in here Monday night because we were staying at the Sutton Place nearby. It was pretty slow but the service was fun and lively. Your server Steph with the tattoos is very charming and funny, she was constantly making us laugh which is...More
Went to earls for an annual Christmas trip to Vancouver and was served by Steph A. in the dining room. She made our trip! She was the absolute best! So personal, friendly, and helpful. We even asked her to join our table! Earls is the...More
Good vibes, room has a great ambiance. Food is lovely and drinks are fab. Lauren helped us out and she’s really great
Had happy hour drinks and food tonight and it was great. Our server, Philia was great tonight. I’ve had her as a server before and she’s always been great. Also the west coast prawn pizza was a great choice! Thanks again!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d703965-Reviews-Earls_Test_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
East is East,"I've been going to East is East for years and have always enjoyed the food and ambiance. Last night I went for dinner and even before the server would agree to sit us at a table she told us they now charge $3 per person...More
Delicious Indian/Afgani resto with a wide variety of vegetarian and vegan options. We chose the tasting plate which was a great way to enjoy a variety of dishes.
Recommend by a close friend, this fine restaurant with amazing decor and design will leave you hungry for more! We ate here twice in 2 days on a rather short stay in Vancouver but passed a third time and almost went in again. We will...More
Food was bland, service was non exsistant, and the flamenco dancing was so loud you couldnt talk to anyone at your table. A terrible experience, people should avoid this place.
Ordered takeout, and I got a notification from the restaurant that my order has been cancelled as I had just parked. Restaurant had 30 mins to cancel before I left the house to drive there.
I can assure everyone I will NEVER be dining here again. My partner and I live above the Main st location. They decided it would be a good idea to install new floors at 11:30pm on a Sunday night. The incessant banging, belt sanding, and...More
6 of us enjoyed a wonderful meal here. We opted for the ""feast"" option which allowed us to sample a wide variety of dishes. Everything was so delicious, especially the peas & cheese, the wild salmon and the green beans, along the boulani bread. There...More
I went for dinner with friends and forgot my umbrella and hat, then got a call from one of the staff to let me know my items were at the restaurant. I returned to pick up my hat and umbrella, and no one Could find...More
We've been long-standing diners at East is East but no longer. We recently picked up some take out: a lamb roti roll and a squash-eggplant roll. They both tasted the same --= of salt, to the exclusion of any other flavour. True of the soup...More
Highly recommend ! Food was middle eastern and Indian . We had the unlimited chai feast . The dessert was to die for . We were barely functioning after that 😂
Family meal to celebrate being together again. Friendly, warm atmosphere was enhanced by a live cello player. Service was friendly and attentive. Food was delicious. Only suggestion is to have a smaller, set version of their $40 ‘all you can eat’ special.
We made a reservation for seven people days in advance. Our table barely could accommodate five people. The food was mediocre. I don't think I am coming back.
Service was good but we were disappointed to receive our “roti” on a Dempsters wrap from Safeway. False information on the menu - this is NOT roti. The filling was good but lost its appeal in a wrap :(
Cozy ""eastern-style"" setting, excellent food, and great performance of live flamenco band! Great place to celebrate birthday or other events, it will make unforgettable memories. Two comments though : we had to wait around 30 minutes to be seated inspite we made a reservation well...More
I love this restaurant, and always ensure it's on my list of places to eat when I'm in Vancouver. It's great value, and you can beat the atmosphere.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d809126-Reviews-East_is_East-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
East is East - Chai Lounge,"Average here means ""good."" I was visiting friends for the Vancouver Fringe Theatre Festival--which by the way everyone should check out; about 70 shows are going on for the next week. And I'll also put in a plug for ""Tom Thomson is missing,"" written by...More
Delicious food and great service and ambiance. I will definitely love back and highly recommend chai feast
Warm, rustic wooden decor, nic ambiance. The stage area for live musician was nicely done up with sofas and cushions. If only the food was anything to write about. The restaurant mainly offers Afghani and Indian cuisine and its chef (from Bangladesh?) could not do...More
It was our first time going to East is East and it was quite the experience. When we first arrived, they asked if we had received a message from the restaurant explaining about our reservation. (We checked and they did send it just shortly before...More
They gave our reserved table for my brother's birthday to others and the food was awful. I will never go again.
The food was good but a bit expensive. Flavors were good. My wife and I split the Double veggie roti roll and the non veggie. For the veggie we selected Lion of the Desert and Yogi's Treat and the non veggie Afghan Nomad and Persia's...More
Amazing dinner when dining in, and awesome takeout menus. Very authentic Indian food, all you can eat!!! friendly people love this place
A coworker and I went here for lunch last week. The decor and atmosphere was very warm and inviting. We were sat by a smiling,warm hostess and we’re given waters and a sample of chai tea. Sydney, our server, was very friendly and never rushed...More
Didn’t even get to go. I made a reservation and the restaurant called me the day before to say we only had 90 minutes and then would have to leave. I picked this place from a recommendation from a friend who thought it would be...More
A couple of things I hadn't had before, Tibetan mantu is really good! Only down side is its a bit pricey and the chairs are uncomfortable.
Nice ambience with live guitar music in the background. If you don’t feel like drinking they have different chai teas to drink. Excellent variety of menu for vegetarian and meat eaters. You can order a la carte or order their tasting menu like I did...More
Silk Road Feast for lunch; Looking for wonderful vegetarian dishes; trialed Alo Gobi, Chana Masala, Mushroom & Butternut Squash & Mango & loved the Tamarind Chutney. Accompanied by a hearty flavorful soup, fresh salad, rice, roti. All very flavourful & lovely...just needed to be a...More
I love Indian cuisine and I’m not afraid of spicy food. When my wife and daughter and I decided to meet there for dinner recently we were looking forward to the food and the experience. We paid an extra cover charge for entertainment and waited...More
The menu choice is varied but the food is mediocre. Loved the selection of teas. Service is friendly and attentive. The place is a bot cramped and the chairs are extremely uncomfortable to sit on. They may be nice and rustic and fit in with...More
Musican Fee and Gratutuity Fee. I have never been at this restaurant and been to many others, but when you get hit with a 'musician fee"" which is rediculous to put this on your bill and having only 6 people and add this to the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d931673-Reviews-East_is_East_Chai_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Eat Bar & Patio Haraheri,"Come on by for rooftop patio dining @guuharden. The tables are socially distanced and the weather was perfect for dining outside in May 2021. I really liked the garden around the patio which reminds me of Japan. It's the 2nd time I've seen this system...More
Beautiful patio dining @guugarden . Couldn’t ask for better weather in May! Ordered the Royal bento box which had a great variety of their deliciousness. Fresh sashimi and my favorite were the scallops. Super fresh and delicious! Their ebi-mayo is on point with the spiciness...More
When I made the booking I did not realize this restaurant is on the 3rd floor even though their address says suite 101. I mistaken it for another restaurant on the ground level. I was pleased to walk up two sets of stairs to find...More
We were staying at the hotel across the street, and decided to come here for dinner because it was so close by. I've been to Guu Garden once before, a long time ago, but this is my first review. First thing to know that it...More
Thank you very much for your support and cooperation. We will try our best to serve you better on your next visit!! Please come again~
First visit to Guu Garden did not disappoint. Interesting take on Asian fusion, very friendly staff and the meal was excellent!
Thank you very much for your support and cooperation. We will try our best to serve better on your next visit!!
I use to have lunch at this restaurant when I worked downtown. Its been a while but have since revisted this fine establishment last week. There was a lot less patrons given the state of the universe(Covid 19) overall. The menu still offered a good...More
Enjoyed the bean fries and ribs the most, but everything was really delicious. Good service, a great intro to Vancouver.
Thank you very much for your review. We are very happy to hear that you enjoyed food we provided. We hope you enjoy your the rest of stay in Vancouver.
I came in for lunch with an associate, it took a bit to find, it is on the third level in a remarkably serene patio setting. It is a sheltered patio area with cover, it really was beautiful and serene. The service was very good...More
Thank you very much for your visit to GuuGarden! We will try our best to make your next visit even better!
I visited Guu Garden with three friends recently fairly late in the evening (around 8 pm). We were offered a seat outside at the end of the patio that is the furthest away from the entrance. The food and the service was actually quite good,...More
At first, I apologize about your experience at GuuGarden. It is very unfortunate that you had to see something you don't want to see especially when you are eating. I also would like to apologize that we didn't know what to do in these cases...More
Nice little Izakaya Jap food. Relaxing place with outdoor seatings. Lots of small plates selections like tapas to share with friends etc. Good wine / beer selections. Grilled ox tongue on rice is excellent. Sashimi is fresh with local fish selections.
Hard to find but worth the hunt. The menu is full of creative dishes and everything we tried was excellent. Cod cheeks were especially good.
Thank you very much for your great comment. We are very happy to hear that your experience at GuuGarden was enjoyable. We will try our best to surpass the experience on your next visit. Regards
The Chicken Karage was good even though the sauce seemed like just mayonnaise. The cod was okay at best and very small serving. Liked the tuna tataki. The salmon sashimi was a little off in taste. The egg plant came partially frozen? Didn’t know if...More
Visited Guu Garden for lunch in February 2019. The metal door at the stairways to the restaurant was closed/locked, and I needed to call Guu Garden to see if it's open. Restaurant was really busy and it took for a while to get the orders...More
We had a work lunch here with about 20 people, and the service was great for such a large group. Everyone enjoyed their food and drinks, I would love to come back and try their izakaya style dinner menu sometimes.
We are glad to hear you had good time at our restaurant! Accommodating large groups are tough sometimes but great reviews like this pay off all the hard work. Arigato very much and we are looking forward to serving you soon!
This izakaya eatery came highly recommended from a friend living in Vancouver and it was definitely not one to disappoint. A reasonably priced venue, armed with an outdoor and indoor seat options, and a team of friendly staff which does seem a bit short-handed during...More
Thank you very much for such a great review! We are very happy that you had enjoyed your visit to GuuGarden! Yes, we are sometimes short-handed due to difficulty of reading weather especially fall season. We will try our best to solve the problem and...More",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3321875-Reviews-Eat_Bar_Patio_Haraheri-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ebisu Japanese Restaurant,"Awesome customer service and great food for the price and certainly worth coming to visit if you are around this area but can get very busy too .
We went to Ebisu Richmond on Friday, Feb. 17th when they started with a new menu, modifying the former one and creating new dishes like Sukiyaki dish and I chose the set because I could add a side dish like Mixed Tempura and udon noodle....More
We went here for a lunch earlier today. I was debating between this and Tokyo Joe, and mistakenly thought Ebisu would better I was wrong. We ordered Sashimi Combo B ($18.50) and 2 Mega Rolls ($15.50). Food was so small, one serving looked enough for...More
It was recommended to go to Ebisu in Richmond for lunch. So glad we went. Their lunch specials are great deal. The quality of the fish was so fresh and cut so thick. Tempura and miso soup came out nice and hot! Service was so...More
We went for lunch on a weekday, it was not busy, and there is a new combo in the menu, the Black Cod combo. This grilled Sablefish was delicious and juicy! The staff was polite and the food came speedy and very hot! Recommended! The...More
Always great food, polite staff, new security protocols like partitions between tables. Try the new combo Fukuyama!
Been to this place a few times, price is reasonable, food is average, so nothing really to praise or complain in these two areas. Service is a hit or miss. Sometime we get a very nice waitress with a friendly smile, and ask us how...More
Ebisu Richmond is a chain restaurant located in the busy Richport Town Centre mini mall. I’m not sure what it is about this place but the parking lot is always super busy. We dropped by for lunch one weekend in May and were lucky enough...More
Enjoyed the Vancouver location. Past times at Richmond location was better. Food was ok but group next to us found something in their meal and service was just ok. My wife saw a rat running outside from her seat at the window and that can...More
This is always a must for me whenever I came to Richmond since Ebisu is just a 10 minutes walk away from where I stay. The Happy Hours started are 4:30-6:00pm, featuring different brands of beers and also sake. I came mainly for the fresh...More
food was average but the service terrible. we waited 45 minutes for a pork curry cutlet dish to be served because ""they made a mistake"" and served it to another table.
Extremely warm and polite service. Japanese hospitality is at its best. Great quality food at perfect price. Loved their Californian Rolls, Sashimi, and Miso Soup. Warm Osake serving was also good. Chicken tempura was delicious (totemo oishii as they call it in Japanese). Very friendly...More
All in all a great spot. I got there during happy hour which was a bonus and greeted in the traditional Japanese way with a Irasshaimase! - いらっしゃいませ！. The food was good and service was fast. The prices are great..but, weirdly a little higher than...More
Large variety of items to choose from. Quick service and excellent food. Good portion sizes. Located nearby hotels and transit.
If you are looking for a place for lunch during your work break or school break? And on the budget yet want some good quality of Japanese food with excellent customer service? This is the place to be. You know there’s some places that you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1084467-Reviews-Ebisu_Japanese_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Ebisu on Robson,"Excellent oysters - happy hour deals from 3-5pm Note - stairs to reach restaurant- not sure if there is an elevator. Very friendly staff!
Sushi is nice and they have patios which is nice in the summer. But omg! Mice were racing around us like you’ve never seen before! I was so socked and disgusted! It makes me sad because they have good service and the food is delicious...More
Sushi, oysters, deserts and cocktails were excellent and we the service was great. All prices were very reasonable. I would recommend this restaurant to anyone.
We had a great lunch here. The food was very delicious and the service was very friendly. The sushi prices were really good too! Definitely would recommend checking this spot out.
Location and upper front patio great. Food is just ok, cocktails are horrible. Service is ok but not great
My wife and I went to Ebisu on Robson recently. It's definitely not like I remember pre-pandemic working downtown. I guess a reflection of the effects on much less traffic in this difficult times. The oysters were fresh, but felt like they had been pre-schucked...More
I just re-visited Ebisu on Robson yesterday and it was nothing like the place I loved before... My last visit was in July 2020 and as you can see my previous review it was a cozy Japanese Izakaya with great service. I did not see...More
Came for lunch with girlfriend after yoga on weekend. Healthy lovely tasting sushi and good service. Definitely recommend.
Although we were very hungry, we could not eat the combo sushi plates. The cook did not have a mask.
Happy to see their reopen ,before the Covid -- 19 ,I all way drop in with my business client and partner for their happy hour !also dinner too ,lovely upscale and high celling ,very big place , the management done a excellent job with the...More
I have been there for the happy hour twice in 3 weeks. Their happy hour menu includes 99cents oyster which I totally enjoy. The manager is very friendly and Japanese staff are also very friendly and welcoming. A good cozy place to enjoy great Japanese...More
I went there twice for dinner on my own, seated at the bar both times. Had the sashimi bento box, seaweed salad, sweet potato fries, and miso soup. The sashimi was not the best cut, and the accompanying tensuki sticks were not impressive. The seaweed...More
This used to be my go-to sushi place downtown. I used to love their lunch specials and would come here all the time for years. However the last few times I’ve noticed the quality and service have really slipped. I went again today and could...More
Hi Ingri, We appreciate your feedback and take your concerns very seriously. I will bring up the issue with the front of house staff immediately to correct this situation going forward, we know the staff referred to. I did want to affirm that our food...More
One of the strangest menus I have seen at a japanese restaurant. Chicken wings, sushi, brussel sprouts, and oysters all together on one menu. But overall delicious food and great service. Would definitely go back.
Thank you for the review! We do try to be more adventurous with our menu always trying new things to make customers experience more exciting every time they dine with us!
We checked yelp for great sushi and it led us here. Was fresh, fantastic with great service. We really enjoyed the lobster ramen and smoked salmon sushi. Picture is crunch n munch sushi. All prices were very reasonable. Would highly recommend for a date night.
Thank you very much Kristen we very much appreciate you taking the time to write a review for us and we hope you get a chance to come dine with us again in the near future!",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d890350-Reviews-Ebisu_on_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Eggspectation,"Easy to find, very friendly and rapid service. IF you are looking for a quiet place this is not the one, very loud place.
Don’t waste your time or money! Service was terrible, our order was delivered to the table next to us and when we finally did get our food it tasted terrible (we ordered burgers). Take the extra steps and go to McDonald’s!
We had dinner here the night before our flight. It was in the same parking lot as our hotel. It is a very big restaurant but very quiet for 6:30pm. It was very clean. We only saw the server when we were seated, took our...More
Had dinner this evening food was good came hot however waiter seemed disinterested and could have done without the 3 mice or 1 mouse appearing 3 times while eating dinner certainly will not return
I ate in on my first night there. Had a really good burger and the were able to make it with very good gluten free bread. The next two times I ordered out and the food was fresh, tasty and average cost. I would eat...More
There were so many breakfast choices for someone with no food restrictions that we had to stop by two days in a row. Speaking of variety, there are no gluten free options when it comes to breads/pancakes/toast/etc. It was disappointing but manageable. Their fruit cup...More
Stayed in the hotel next door. This was very convenient to just walk over and have breakfast. We were greeted with a smile, service was quick and food was great. We were offered coffee refills constantly which was nice.
Based on several positive reviews, we decided on dinner at this place as staying at attached motel. This was approx 6pm on a Saturday night and on arrival there were only 2 occupied tables. There was one server and from what I learned - one...More
First time at this place with other 9 friends for lunch and we had a very good experience. The place was very busy but the staff was still able to give us a table for 10 people very quick. The place was very spacious and...More
The food, service was good restaurant was clean lots of choices on the menu. However; some food advertised on the online menu wasn't available at this particular location. Reasonably priced.
We were staying at the nearby Accent Inn and Suites and walked over for lunch here. The friendly gentleman that served us got our orders out fast and the food was really good.
Good atmosphere and friendly staff. Clean and open plan with lots of natural lighting. The classic eggs Benedict was excellent. Good presentation and flavorful. Prices are moderate for Dining Definitely recommend for a good breakfast.
We are sorry we didn't discover this gem earlier! We ate here our last morning at Accent Inn, next door, but would definitely eat here again. It was clean, fresh and good food.
We have eaten at this restaurant this year and once before when in Vancouver. The restaurant, clean, bright, excellent service with a smile and great food. We have had breakfast and Dinner and enjoyed both. Would recommend
Orange juice is freshly squeezed, menu is varied and food is delicious Servers are super friendly Bright and clean interior",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d15273592-Reviews-Eggspectation-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Eighties Restaurant,"I hadn't been here in decades. Server was a bit odd, supposedly new, but forgot certain steps of the process of serving. Food was alright. Quite large portions and very filling. Reasonably priced for the amount of food we received.
We enjoy going to the Eighties Restaurant from time to time. Great for breakfast, lunch or dinner. Generous portions served by friendly hosts. Their fried chicken is a popular item. My partner likes the liver dinner (definitely not a crowd pleaser for me lol but...More
New ownership, thought we would try the new menu. The vegetarian omelette was disappointing and about fifteen dollars. Red mush dropped on top, was told it was once a tomato. No butter on toast. Sorry, would not recommend the place. Less than half full at...More
We ordered a chicken wrap and a beef dip. The place was packed at 1 on a sunday afternoon. They were short staff and disorganized. 50 minutes after entering they finally had our food ready. Excruciating wait. Average food at best. Wont be back
After all these years in business, you might expect that a restaurant would offer an alternative to using stairs. But no, you will be sadly turned away from this establishment with no apology, if you rely on a wheeled mobility device or cannot do stairs....More
80s is consistently mediocre. I've probably been here 5 times and it's always because somewhere else is packed or closed and the food has never impressed me. It's not expensive, the people are nice, the food is not great. I cant believe anyone would give...More
I have been going to Eighties since the late 1980’s and has always had very good food at a reasonable price.
Typoical bar/burger place. Service was decent. Food was good and not too pricy....Recommened for lunch or just grabbing a bit to eat and a couple pints while you watch the people below.
Must bring a hearthy appetite in order to finish your plate. Very Generous portions and all around good value
The food was really the basic good home cooked meal. Good flavours, good pricing, and very friendly and professional staff. Looking forward to our next visit.
This is the only place on the North Shore that serves 'affordable', 'substantial', and traditional north american food without the fanciness and unnecessary extra fru fru's. Always busy, but can always get in a short period of time. Staff are exceptionally friendly and the food...More
Although we’ve frequented the 80’s diner for over 20 years it is definitely not our first or even 5th choice for breakfast as the food is consistently Meh and the service hit and miss. That being said it’s cheap eats and bacon and eggs are...More
Finally got a chance to get in to this place. I had a side salad that was watery, but generally fine. The burger and fries were good. The burger patty had a nice char, but wasn't overdone - still juicy and tender. Service was fast...More
My husband read the reviews and decided to try this place for lunch. We each got a burger and onion rings. Unfortunately, I think the burgers and onion rings were from Burger King. They were exactly the same. We didn’t try a breakfast and I...More
Nice breakfast joint in North Vancouver. Came here with family and friends for brunch. Service was fine and the restaurant had a cool 80s vibe to it. Everyone was satisfied with their entrees. My wife thought her seafood omelette was lacking flavor, but the hollandaise...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d929437-Reviews-Eighties_Restaurant-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
El Camino's,"Awful service. The server was rude, rolling her eyes, and obviously didn’t want to be there. Awful food. One of our party ate a couple bites of their meal and couldn’t continue. The bread was stale, the chips were stale, the sauce was inedible. Our...More
This is a cool place to stop in on Main Street. They have some tasty dishes, and we found the staff very friendly. Have been there twice now and will go back. Check out happy hour, not a huge menu but you find something you...More
Very good place, the carnitas were amazing. Service was just good. The pollos was also tasty. Cocktails were delicious and the beer chilled! What more do you want? We will be back!
Delicious food and great service. It was packed and loud and wonderful! Very vibrant feel with great energy, everything we ordered was amazing. A must visit in Vancouver for Latin influenced food!
Popped in after dinner for drinks and desserts. Drinks were about $10 minimum which was a bit pricey and the churro dessert was only okay. Fell apart when you tried to dip into the chocolate sauce. Okay experience. Good playlist of music.
El Camino's serves up good food and refreshments in a great spot on main. We were there for happy hour and had couple of hot dishes and cold drinks. The Papas Chorreadas (smashed creamy potatoes) were the standout. If I could buy the rich spicy...More
We dropped by for some cocktails as we were waiting for a table at Ahn & Chi up the street. The place was busy with a full patio and large bar with some seating around the far ends. They have a very large selection of...More
My wife and I went in for a lateish snack to celebrate my wife's retirement. We ordered a draft beer, marinated vegetables, Pollo tacos and the vegetarian empanada. Service was good, helpful, attentive and friendly.
Mikey the Blonde Scottish bar man was amazing. He was absolutely slammed and managed to take the time to multitask making drinks while explain the exquisite menu in detail. He helped us pick the perfect drinks. The food was beautifully plated and absolutely mouth watering,...More
I took my short stay students for brunch. They are from Japan and it was first time for them to try Mexican food. I chose Mexican, it's really popular in US and Canada. Price is reasonable in Vancouver. They liked it so food was good...More
This little spot is on my repeat list. It's close to home and a great place to meet friends for a delicious catch up. Fresh food, simple ingredients with amazing flavours, you will want to go back for more. The room is spacious, the drinks...More
Happy hour and daily specials each day. We very much enjoyed the double layer tacos served with pork, prawn or fish. A definite must have and great for sharing as comes in pairs. The beef arepas and the cheese bread balls were good. Nice casual...More
Got suggested this place through Google and was not dissapointed. Quaint little patio great for people watching and nice South american influence on their menu. Got the Columbian breakfast which is good value for the amount of food you get. Service is quick. One downside...More
This place is a hit with the locals so you know it’s good. Service is very friendly. Lots of space (although they are still awaiting their liquor permit in their recently renovated addition.) Food? Just amazing. You won’t be disappointed with their wonderful interpretations of...More
The restaurant is nice, good decoration and ambiance. However, the food is too expensive and just a little. When you finish you are still hungry but spent lots of money. The food is tasty but definitely doesn't worth the high price for almost nothing of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3684024-Reviews-El_Camino_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
El Caracol Cafe,"I have been a client for the ten years in this neighbourhood. I have NO idea who this person was who wrote such a horrible review but ive NEVER had a bad meal here, not once. Every time perfect. Can not recommend enough the fish...More
The most amazing Mexican food in Vancouver! It’s so tasty and flavourful and the prices can’t be beat. We’ve been coming here for over 10 years and never once had a bad experience. You taste the freshness in the food and I love the experience...More
Been coming here for years. Excellent food and nice people. The pupusas are a favourite but I enjoy anything I’ve tried.
Best Pupusas in town! I dont get them anywhere else. We have always gotten take out as we like to enjoy them at home or on a picnic. But the atmosphere is vibrant and authentic like a Pupuseria you would find in El Salvador. Dont...More
Ignore that review by Alex. He knows nothing about Central American food. This place serves authentic, delicious, fresh made food. I could eat there everyday. I have eaten there at least 50 times and loved it every time.
I only get the pupusas because they're so good I don't want anything else. They surpassed poutine as my favourite food. The atmosphere is lovely and warm. It feels like a family restaurant. Cash only, but there's a cash machine across the street.
Wow - we were not expecting this! After hearing about their pupusas from a coworker, we decided to check it out. We were not disappointed; they are amazing, and made fresh to order! The pickled cabbage and green hot sauce were amazing accompaniments. I would...More
Lovely little place at 36 th and Victoria NE corner. Very varied menu. I had chicken enchilada and my wife had Sopa de Mariscos. Both were large (although hers was the medium size) piping hot totally delicious.Place was full at 3:30 p.m. on a Sunday...More
I cannot even believe the 10 reviews I have just read. I hate to leave reviews like this but cannot subject anybody else to this. I cannot even remember the last time a meal so terrible was set down in front of me. It was...More
We had pupusas and a chicken tamale as starters, my wife had the chicken burrito, I had the pork al pastor tacos. Pupusas were excellent, the burrito yummy, with tons of meat in the filling, but the show stealer was the pork al pastor. The...More
Best pupusas in Vanc is their claim, I say best in Canada. Green salsa hot but manageable. The Honduran enchiladas were super tasty. Great refried beans. Too full to try the grilled plantain! Next time. Small and unpretentious. Great wee spot.
i love this place it has the best pupusas in town and their soups are great too if you want a taste of el Salvador without going there this is the place. They have great orchata and other typical drinks. Prices are fair.
We had been here once before a few years ago and we thought that it was ok at best then, but we decided to pop in (rather than subway down the road) give it a second go. AWESOME IT WAS!!! authentic as hell and portion...More
Friendly service, food comes out a little slow, but I don't mind waiting as it's piping hot and delicious! Totally authentic, reasonably priced and super tasty! I would recommend and have returned here many times. They have pupusas too! Beef enchiladas are great - the...More
more salvadorian than mexican it seems, but a good hole in the wall place with good value. Would come back any day",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4882323-Reviews-El_Caracol_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Elisa,"We had a reservation for 4:45pm for 3 of us. When we arrived we asked if we could sit out on the patio. The hostess told us that it was fully reserved. We thought this was odd as when we made the reservation online you...More
Went there on a Thursday night with my daughter . All around great experience . I loved the big spacious room . Parking nearby is convenient . Interesting menu . It stresses where the meat is from . I ordered a strip loin . My...More
Excellent spot for your steak fix tons of selections from many different areas. Service is exceptional as is the wine list
This is without doubt the best restaurant in Vancouver. We dined her when visiting our son (party of five) for our Wedding Anniversary & again before we returned home. From start to finish an absolute privilege to be dining here. A warm smile upon arrival,...More
Elisa has become our favourite, go to restaurant, for special occasions! This visit we brought our friends to celebrate my wife’s birthday. We requested to be served by Braeden, after an incredible experience for my birthday dinner last November, and this meal was even better....More
Wow ! I have nothing to say but the bed with the Greco accent the most entitled and bad attitude towards your merchants. Won’t be back. Check your attitude buddy.
Nice restaurant in the trendy Yale Town. Row of restaurants. Liked this place. My 6 oz wagyu was perfect if only it was a liitle hotter temperature wise. Carpaccio was excellent too. service was slow or else i would have enjoyed few more drinks. Thirsty
Four couples out to celebrate the festive season and this restaurant was perfect! Atmosphere, food, wine and cocktail selection along with Shawn, our attentive and informative server created a seamless and enjoyable evening. Use the valet service to park, save yourself the hassle. Would definitely...More
My friends and I were celebration that went so wrong. I have a phobia of mice and rats, and unfortunately to my demise a mouse was seen running by our table after we had our main course. This was such a disturbing experience for such...More
Elisa never fails to impress. Last night we had a ‘second to none experience’. Eduardo, our server was over and above the call of duty. The food was fabulous…no one makes a roasted chicken like the chef at Elisa-NO ONE! The gnocchi ..divine! And… our...More
We went here for an early dinner to celebrate a special occasion. We had reservations for the outdoor patio and were immediately seated on arrival. After browsing the menu, we tried the following: - Tartare tasting trio - All three were very good. The serving...More
Well for a top end restaurant, this eatery is amazing. Very busy when we arrived - reservations are advised! Service was very attentive at all levels. Advice from the sommelier was sought and it was most useful. Menu is extensive. Appetizers for us consisted of...More
Fantastic food and vine, and great service!! The most tasty steak I’ve had in many years with delicious side dishes. Thank you 🙏🏻
The front desk wouldn't seat me with a baseball cap. I have alapecia and don't care to bare my head. But they said cap off or no seat. So I left and had a wonderful dinner at Cioppino up the road.
The beef welling pastry was soggy! Definitely wouldn't recommend it. The rack of lamb was cooked to perfection. The asparagus and the Mac and cheese were both very good. The crab spring rolls had more edamame than crab. The baked Alaska was delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15189329-Reviews-Elisa-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Empire Seafood Restaurant,"The food might be good. Never got that far. Eating at a restaurant with shark fin on the menu is not an option in 2023. And never should have been. The waiter did not understand my problem and claimed that did not serve shark fin....More
Our host took us to this restaurant for dim sum in Richmond Chinatown (we last visited Vancouver 27 years ago!). The new, open environment took some getting used to. Parking was relatively easy on an early Saturday morning. Waiting was brief. We liked the bright...More
The food was good but the service was terrible. the waiters ignore you even after you have caught their eye. Trying to get the children 2 glasses of water was nearly impossible. It seems if you are not ethic Chinese you don't count. we had...More
Our family went to go and pickup food; however, we were barely acknowledged despite our food being ready.
This is my husband and my 2nd lunch at Empire. Our first experience last time ( prior to Covid ) was very good. We decided to go back. My husband's favorite was Deep Fried Shrimp Rolls. We love their Sui Mai and Beancurd Wrap with...More
It is one of the best upscale Chinese Seafood in mainland , been in Richmond for long long time , ( from the old location to the new location well over 20 years ) decor , is very elegant ,not cheap place to eat ,...More
Worth Five star for their consistency and food quality! I have been to this restaurant numerous times and have always had a satisfying meal be it dim sum or other main course items. Must order items includes: Shrimp Spring Rolls, Fried Egg Plant with Shrimp...More
We made a reservation for two last weekend (before the time change). When we got there at Noon, the maître d told us our reservation was for one pm... it wasn’t ... when I showed him the reservation online, he said we were late. After...More
Great Dim sum here. The service is quick and fast. The food was delicious and the staff was really nice too. Highly recommend checking out here for Dim Sum.
Visited Empire Seafood Restaurant in Richmond, BC for dim sum lunch in February 2020. Dim Sum is one of my favorites and looking forward to trying a new place near Richmond Town Centre. Shanghai dumpling was good, but the rest was just mediocre. Basically, lacking...More
Empire Seafood Restaurant is a wonderful Cantonese style restaurant in the Golden Village area of Richmond. It is located near Landsdowne station. There dim sum is amazing and they have a huge variety, a must try is their Wu Gok!
Park just below the shopping center; it's free. This place just jumped to number two or three on our dimsum establishment list (and it's already a pretty long list) for British Columbia. We were driving down Number 3 Road, the main drag in Richmond, and...More
We make a reservation for 9am Dim Sum. The reservation online was very easy and convenient. There is a small discount for 9-11am booking. The place is easy to find, with free parking at London Plaza. The ambient is bright and spacious. The service was...More
I've had dim sum all over the world. Empire is my favorite. The quality, variety, uniqueness, are all unbeatable. We make it a regular point to dine everytime we are in B.C. Lucky for us, our daughter attends UBC!
I took my family of 6 here for dim sum at 10:30 am. We ordered 11 or 12 dishes and we loved the following the best; baked bbq pork buns, the Chinese donut with shredded pork and the rice rolls and the sticky rice. The...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d810017-Reviews-Empire_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
End Of The Line General Store,"Didn't know that this even existed until I found it while walking a trail at Lynn Park. There were people sitting outside with dogs having coffee and a lineup inside for ice cream and drinks. It was worth the wait (wasn't long, maybe 5 minutes)....More
We stumbled across this place whilst hiking in Lynn Canyon. As well as being a lovely general store with locally made products, it makes great coffee. In two weeks in the Vancouver area we only had two truly good lattes - here and at The...More
We stopped here for lunch about halfway through our Lynn Canyon hike and it was great! This store sells pretty much everything you could think of and our lunch was delicious!
Here on vacation and was walking around Lynn Park when I got lost and was lucky enough to end up outside this shop. Only went in for a drink and noticed all the kids coming out with these amazing ice creams and got me wanting...More
We have stopped at the End Of The Line General Store several times after a hike in the Lynn Headwaters. Staff are very friendly and helpful. Coffee is gourmet and the selection of pastries, sandwiches etc are excellent. The little general store has lots of...More
Stopped on our way past to the Dempsey hill, I just have to say the 2 lovely ladies working today were just fantastic! One spotted me an Ibuprofen for a headache (remember don’t ride dehydrated!)....great store, lovely staff and very friendly riders and dog owners!...More
A fabulous addition to the Upper Lynn area featuring gourmet coffee, ice cream and a whole lot more. This lovely gem features a candy bar with some vintage offerings. The owner also features local artists, designers and jewellery. A real treasure trove of goodies! Excellent...More
Great place to stop in after a hike at Lynn canyon. Good coffee, including espresso drinks and a nice wrap and pie. Minimal seating but an interesting spot.
End of the Line doubles up as a general store and restaurant, and it was a great place to stop by before we walked up to the Lynn Canyon. We got a Latte & a Feta-Spinach Croissant, and they were both so good, we were...More
Great baked goods, coffees, ice cream - friendly staff, eclectic items for sale. lots of pooches parked outside waiting for owners.
A fantastic place for coffee, ice cream, candy, and pie, on the edge of a fine forest. A great place to rendezvous before and after a run, bike, or walk in Lynn Valley.
This is a nice little grocery/ coffee / souviner shop that is worth a quick visit if in the area, such as walking Lynn Loop or the suspension bridge. The store is a favourite stop for cyclists as well.
We found this place while hiking out of the park but decided to get the car and go back. It was harder to find by car! Worth every minute. The store is filled with terrific finds - gifts and food. Lunch sandwiches were excellent and...More
After a hike through Lynn valley this is a good place to stop and have a cup of coffee. This place has a a few groceries and a few art pieces
Rainy day soups; cuddle up coffees & tasty sandwiches; friendly faces. Lots of smiles. Nice place to cozy up with a good read, and/or take advantage of their free WIFI. I usually hike the Lynn Headwaters trail, then pop in EOTL afterwards for a cup...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d8621163-Reviews-End_Of_The_Line_General_Store-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Espana,"Great authentic Spanish restaurant. Good selection of Tapas. We had the Paella and the Chicharrones for appetizer. Both were excellent. Very knowledgeable staff, great service. Very busy as its quite popular. One of the best restaurants on the strip. Good wine pairings. Reasonably priced. Just...More
Foreigners be ware. Food and Paella, pork belly, deep fried olives were very good. Beware if you use a not Canadian credit card the restaurant adds a surcharge above the exchange rate of 4.99 percent. Beware and not discovered until you get credit card receipt.
Hi Ken, thanks for posting. This only happens if you choose $US dollars on the credit card terminal, as apposed to choosing Canadian. I've spoken to the credit card company about this as I think it's just a money grab.
We were celebrating our anniversary and had a cozy table in the back of the restaurant. Our server pared a delicious sherry with our fried olive appetizer. We also enjoyed a nice wine with the anchovy toast, chicory salad, and fish special. Another sherry pairing...More
Loved every minute of it!! Excellent wine selection and food was so tasty,I wanted more. Jessica is such a talented server!!
I love this place. Ed is an amazing host and has been since his days at Bin 941. Great wine list, great food and the service is spot on within an industry struggling to find people who know what it takes. Run, do not walk...More
Just had the most amazing evening at this lovely intimate but lively restaurant. Food was excellent, in taste and presentation. Drinks matched the food perfectly. Service was above and beyond, from the very personable wait staff to Jessica and Edward. Highly recommend for couples and...More
The food and wine were great but the fact that I arrived on a mobility scooter and entered the restaurant on a 2-wheeled walker seemed to be a problem. It was difficult to enter the restaurant without inconveniencing other diners, and at one point, the...More
Getting a table at España is tricky because it is so popular, but it was worth the wait. The atmosphere is cozy and intimate, and the staff are friendly and engaging. It was our first visit, and our server gladly helped us navigate the well-considered...More
Lovely food, good value happy hour tapas and wine in a cozy setting. Very attentive waiting staff. Had the pork belly, squid, chickpeas and eggplant. All excellent value and taste
The top Spanish restaurant in English bay. Juan served us with great care. Must go restaurant if one cured for best TAPAS dishes. Highly recommended….👌🏾🥰
This is a tasting experience. From wine to tapas to after dinner cocktail - wow. I would highly recommend speaking to Jessica or Keiran. Both are very knowledgeable with regards to pairing for both wine and port. Take the time and enjoy
We stumbled across this small authentic Spanish Tapas Bar whilst staying at the The Sylvia Hotel. I have had a lot of Tapas . This was exceptional and delicious. Quite simple the best Tapas I have eaten . Service excellent. The park belly and mushrooms...More
Because I have an extreme fish allergy, ding on the west coast can be dicey. Had a great pizza and eggs Florentine in Victoria and an awful pasta in Vancouver. Our hotel (Times Square Suites, recommended) suggested Espana. It was a great experience. The owner...More
We had an amazing experience dining here at Espana. The food here was phenomenal and the drinks were delicious. Definitely recommend checking this place out, the staff was super nice too. All the dishes we had were so good but the steak was unreal.
Stellar in every way! Spanish food was incredible! Every dish was perfect. Paella especially awesome. Ambience funky, romantic, stylish. Our server, possibly the manager, knew everything there was to know about the dishes on the large menu and carefully selected but reasonably priced wine list.",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3544723-Reviews-Espana-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fable Diner,"We dropped in Fable Diner for their all day breakfast after girlfriend # 5 after her meeting in the area , ( because I know she love good old fashion Milkshake ) the diner been in same location since 2016 across my restaurant in the...More
Great eggs benny, we enjoyed the steak special and ham bennys. Washed down with coffee and a bourbon chocolate shake. All were very good, i would have preferred a nice home style fried potatoes instead of the deep fried chunks. A very good breakfast brunch...More
Thanks for your visit. Thank you also for your feedback.
The chips, salsa and guacamole were amazing. Also had the Fable Burger, which was fantastic. Ate on the patio, but indoor seating was also available. Friendly service too!
This review must be for Fable Diner Bar downtown, since we don't have a patio! Thanks for visiting us
We had their multicourse brunch special which includes a drink, choice of main and dessert. Good value. Friendly service. Lots of seating.
Thanks for being here
Went here for Dinner after a long day on Granville Island with some family from Prince George. They had seen the place on Diners, Drive Ins and Dives. We ordered the Meatloaf and were not disappointed as it had great taste and was a good...More
Thanks for your visit and the great review
Had a very enjoyable breakfast, food was well prepared. The waitress was very pleasant and professional. My first visit and will return.
Just catching up on these reviews! Hopefully you've been back
I wouldn’t drive down here… it’s kind of a sketchy area. But if you take an Uber you can see the neighbourhood and enjoy the great vibe at Fable. Delicious farm to table in a diner style that is fun and surprisingly affordable, for Vancouver....More
On a family visit, we were taken to this diner for breakfast. On serving our breakfast, no jam, catsup or sirup was offered .. not great when you order toast and pancake!! The potatoes were so over salted they were not edible. We asked for...More
Thank you for bringing this to our attention. This certainly has never happened (that we know of), and protocols were not followed. Please email me kathy@fablediner.com and clarify when you were in (day, approximate time, number in party and some mains ordered). I will find...More
I had been to Fable Diner several times and was always impressed with the freshness & quality of the food. The portion sizes are always generous. When I was tasked with getting a roast chicken dinner for 8 people attending a birthday celebration, I let...More
Hi, Wendy! Thank you for the great, detailed review. We can’t wait to have you back at Fable Diner.
Oh my word such great food!!! The burger and fries were just as good they said it would be. So glad his place is close enough to go to! The diner is clean, the staff is awesome and the food is fantastic!
On behalf of all of us at Fable Diner, I would like to thank you for sharing this great review about our restaurant, Wendy! I’m so glad you liked our friendly service and locally sourced house-made meals. Hope to see you again soon.
If you’ve never been, you need to go here for their farm to diner fare. I have never been disappointed with their service or food. Bonus when we went was that all dad’s received a free drink. I chose their amazing peanut butter chocolate shake...More
Thanks for leaving us such an excellent review, Kelven. Look forward to seeing you again.
My wife and I stopped in on a Wednesday at noon. My burger was very good - similar to what I make at home. My wife had the Trucker's Breakfast that she said was relatively ordinary - not any better than Denny's. Overall, we would...More
Thanks for your visit to us. Look forward to having you back. We source locally and make what we can in house. This is our differentiation from most restaurants. This should come through in flavor though! Thanks again :)
The staff were top notch - similar to what one would find in an expensive restaurant. They were professional, speedy and kind. This is exactly the kind of service one wants (but does not expect) at a diner. Also, you can’t beat the duck pancake....More
Thanks for your kind review! I’m so glad you appreciated our attentive service and enjoyed house-made duck pancake. Our team will always make sure you have everything needed for an amazing visit. Looking forward to serving you again
This is not the average diner! One could call it diner chic; the menu has what can be expected, but often with a unique twist. The food was delicious. Also, the cocktails were great. As with the food, the classics, but with an innovative twist....More
Thank you for your lovely review. I’m glad to hear you like the taste of our house-made food and fresh cocktails. Look forward to seeing you here again.
First time at Fable Diner and was impressed with the variety of brunch dishes. Ordered the Roast Duck Pancake and was blown away by how good it was! Roast duck meat with Kimchi - seems like an odd pairing but it works. There were crispy...More
Thank you for the wonderful review and for taking the time to share your feedback with us. Look forward to seeing you here again.",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10519551-Reviews-Fable_Diner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fable Kitchen,"Authentic rustic ambiance with excellent pared back menu and attentive service. Cocktails to die for. Good advice on local wine!
Very excited to try the restaurant based on the reviews...which I now find confusing. As another reviewer said, it wasn't busy but the service was patchy and we found they didn't follow through as needed. Front of house host was pleasant as were some servers....More
Thank you for your visit. Sorry to hear of this extra waiting time.
Great place for Sunday brunch . Six of us meet at different places on Sundays . Today was our first time at Fable . Everyone was pleased . Great menu . Well prepared , Tasty recipes . Good service ( Sophia) . Decent prices .
Glad we were this Sundays choice! Hope to see you all again.
Nothing out of this world but definitely decent food and atmosphere. Had wings, salsa/chips and a couple of burgers before canucks game and it was a good stop to do so.
Sounds like this was at our downtown location - Fable Diner and Bar. (Not this one, Fable Kitchen in Kitsilano). Glad you came in!
Had fixed menu dinner as part of Dine Out Vancouver. A varied menu to choose from and everyone's meal was terrific. The service was very good, just the right amount of checking in on whether we needed anything. The restaurant was busy but that didn't...More
Looking forward to seeing you back.
First time to try brunch menu at the 4th Ave location was disappointing. Interior decor is less than inviting and looking very tired. Hollandaise on Eggs Benny was very vinegary . Food was delivered hot and was overall a 3.5....service was very prompt and well...More
Thanks for your visit and your feedback. Hollandaise should not be vinegary! Hopefully a checkback was done and this was mentioned. I am best reached at kathy@fablediner.com if you'd like to say more!
Happened upon this restaurant and I am so glad I did. Very delicious dinner of lingcod and octopus. My daughter had gnocchi which was very good too!
Thanks for your visit and the great review!
On 23rd spot of like.. thousands of restaurants list in the city, for a good reason! this restaurant is located at the trendy street of west 4th, not too big, but has all the goodies to offer. you got to try to believe. two of...More
Thank you for your visit and this great review!
Great food. Great service. Innovative menu. We will definitely return. Spouse had pulled pork Johnny cakes and I had the veggie burger.
Great to hear! Thanks for coming in
This reminds me of the story of the King's new clothes. The food is godawful yet it is full. This is because people have no idea what good food actually taste like. Being a person of high intelligence we left after we saw how horrible...More
Ray, I'm not sure how things went wrong. We have been running for 10 years for a reason! I am sorry to hear of your poor food experience, I can be reached at kathy@fablekitchen.ca if you want to provide any more detail.
Inconsistent operation in the summer. Tried to go for Happy Hour which is stated to run 2-5pm Monday-Friday. My partner and I decided to try it on one of our few days off together. We got there and the hostess ignored us completely. The chef...More
I apologize if you are seeing my answer for the second time. Trip Advisor has inexplicably erased some answers! I am sorry that you were treated this way. We currently don't do happy hour at all.
Friends just ordered chick pea fritters and fish cakes for a pandemic birthday outdoor small Happy Hour on my back deck. We made an error in pickup date but when we went they were very accommodating and within 15 minutes they had our order prepared...More
Amazing food! The peanut butter oatmeal is amazing! They also have the best jam! This place is so so good! Excellent food and service
We've been hesitant to dine out with visions of covidiots packed elbow to elbow at Big Bob's Beer House of Ribs so ... it was ... reassuring to see Fable Kitchen taking protecting their diners seriously. Most of the tables are closed - servers are...More
My boyfriend and I enjoyed a Valentines dinner at Fable Kitchen and experienced outstanding service. The server displayed extensive menu knowledge and recommended wine pairings with the food we ordered. I was overly impressed by the level of service, as well as the quality of...More",25,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3190288-Reviews-Fable_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Falafel King Restaurant,"Having being going to Falafel King for the past 35 years. Food is always exceptional. Portions are generous and tasty. Never been disappointed. Prices are reasonable. Would highly recommend menu selection.
My wife and I ordered Falafel King via Doordash last night and the experience could not have been worse. The main issue was allergies. My wife is allergic to sesame, so I ordered two falafel plates (one for me and one for her) and specified...More
I see that some other people are writing about a Felafel King on Robson Street in Vancouver. My visit today was to the restaurant on Denman Street in the West End. It was not good; really because of how poor the food was. There are...More
I have been frequenting this little gem for 25 years and the chicken shawarma platter is a fantastic deal and tasty as hell!! Their chicken is juicy but still crispy on the outside. Their tabbouli is top notch as well as their hummous. The owner...More
Falafel, King is just down the street from my friend's place so we eat here quite frequently. The food is always tasty and good value. The owners have followed directives for distancing and the required hand sanitizer, plastic barriers etc are all in place. There...More
Keep Gastown, its for tourists who don't know any better. Eating out anywhere in Vancouver is usually an expensive trip. So discovering the Falafel King on Robson Street was a real blessing. Best, you can eat in & sit by the window & watch the...More
delicious and vegan and cheap. its a chain so can find it in a number of places but everywhere we went the food was banging and the staff are nice and friendly. quick, yum and fresh
we were in town and in between doc appts. we finished our walk and thought we'd try this spot. so glad we did! a great meal and a big portion. small place. sat outside, which is great for people watching. a similar spot on the...More
im from the uk and have a go-to falafel place back home, and have now moved out to canada but this place has made me very very happy. the falafels were really good, crispy on the outside and soft on the inside. lots of sauce,...More
This is definitely a good option when you are craving for a falafel or a good shawarma, however there is a point that need to be improved asap: the falafel is not made to order, they use the microwave to heat it and it would...More
A little hole in the wall restaurant that has amazing food and huge portions for a great price! Food was also made well but fast!! We were walking down Denman street and stopped at this joint and I was impressed. Really enjoyed my meal here...More
I've been coming to this place for over a decade, it was closed for a few months but recently opened again due to renovations so I was super happy. They honestly make the best chicken shawarma, maybe its the chicken or the sauces that go...More
Portions are huge even for someone that eats like me lol , affordable and nice to go alone or few people, the owners super warm hearted 💜💜💜
Seriously, I can't put into words how good this place is. I'll regularly trek downtown from the north shore just to get the chicken shawarma plate--ask for extra hot sauce to really complete the dish. Huge portions that give me 1-2 days of leftovers. I'm...More
Great chicken shawarma - falafels are only ok, a little too dense. Inside is a bit rough but it's good food at a decent price.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4851751-Reviews-Falafel_King_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Famoso Neapolitan Pizzeria,"Excellent pizza. Nice variety of healthy choices. Reasonable prices. Great craft beer. We did happy hour.
Guess this is a chain. Went to Commercial Dr for a lunchtime pizza. Marcello's patio is in the shade but this one across the street was sunny and warm. Craft beer was good. Service was good. Pizza topping was excellent. Pizza crust was soggy. Maybe...More
Great food , great service , great value !!! Very happy with this place , can’t wait to come back ! Rob C
On a scale of 1-10 I would rate their pizza at a 8.0 which in my books is pretty good , but hey to each their own. I prefer a more crispy crust but that is not the style of pizza that they serve here....More
Best pizza I have had in a long time! The BBQ wings are also a must if you are coming here! Our server was so lovely and attentive. Overall great experience and will 100% be coming back here!
Where to begin? The service was terrible. Drink orders were forgotten. Service was really slow. My gluten free meal came with regular bread, which obviously cross contaminated my meal as I spent the next couple of hours really sick. Then we had to split the...More
Anyone remember back in the day when pizzas were called “pizza pies”? I mean, there’s that old Dean Martin song, That’s Amore… “When a moon hits your eye like a big pizza pie that’s amore.” In any case, we were hankering for a nice pizza...More
You always get an ok food here, but never excellent. pizza was a bit burnt otherwise good, they did not have some pasta as in the menu. Waiter was very polite and cordial. Salad was good, pasta was not so good. Overall as always an...More
Having a ""lactose culinary problem"" usually rules out Pizza... as most (99+%) Pizza restaurants do not have a good tasting, ""melt-able"" non dairy cheese. This restaurant, fortunately is different as it caters to both types of customers. The variety of the Pizza's are also quite...More
FAmily outing for pasta and pizza. PIzza very good, same with pasta. HEarty salad. children menu well received, especially the gelato. Service for group of five a bit slow, but were given a discount! Friendly and organized young servers. Felt very Italian.
Went there on Saturday, lunchtime. Terrible pizza: no base, vegetables directly on the crust. Burnt basil leaves and raw onion slices. The top of the crust was not cooked and the bottom, black. The waitress was fantastic, but the restaurant needs more staff to keep...More
Both myself and my business associate ordered off the daily specials menu and he flavoures were alright but definitely could have used more protein in each dish
This restaurant is located on “The Drive” (Commercial Drive) also known as “Little Italy”. We had just spent the better of part of 3 hours in Little Italy wandering around, watching the entertainment and tasting street food on Italian Day. Around 6:00 PM we started...More
I loved this place Good service,good food ,they have one of the best pizza and pasta in Vancouver if you don’t believe me go and try it
Thank you Geraldo for your kind words and motivating thoughts to share with our fellow pizza lovers. We look forward to having you in again soon and are thrilled you enjoyed your experience with us. Grazie!
We usually eat at the Famoso out in Abbotsford but were in the area and decided to swing by. They had lots of great specials ($5 pints and half off apps) and we tried the jerk face wheat ale to start along with the Gorgonzola...More
Thank you for taking the time to share your thoughts about your recent experience with us Esther. We appreciate the honest feedback so we may continue to build to be one of, if not the best pizzeria in town! It sounds like overall the experience...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4520648-Reviews-Famoso_Neapolitan_Pizzeria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fanny Bay Oyster Bar & Shellfish Market,"A small raw bar with oysters and Dungeness crab on display. We had lobster roll, whole crab, crab cakes, oysters and octopus at our table. All fantastic. Bar seating and high tops predominant. Lively scene.
Ate here last night because of positive TA reviews. Great place for fresh oysters. We had a dozen of 4 types of pacific northwest oysters. All fresh served with the normal accompaniment s. Split a Caesar salad which was fresh and well dressed. Wife had...More
We dined here tonight. It was my husband, me and our 20 year old son. We didn’t have a reservation. We arrived at 6pm; there was 1 open table that could fit our family and the host said “I’ll let you sit here but you...More
Another great Happy Hr with great friends, our fresh oysters, grilled ones, Brussels sprouts, Truffle fries, clams & mussels….etc..white wine….. The service is excellent….thx to Blake, Maria & all the wonderful staff…can’t wait to return again…👏👏👍👍😂😂😂!!!!!
We wanted our usual, a simple place with a pub atmosphere where we could get non-fancy food. The clerk at the hotel named a couple of pub-like places. When I mentioned that we liked fish and chips her eyes lit up and she said we...More
We have dined here several times, and the atmosphere, service and food is consistently above average. This time around the scallops and pork belly and the grilled oysters were the hits. Always lots of gluten free options available. We will be back!
The food was really good but the service was awful, I almost gave up because of the rudeness of the Host and the lack of attention from the servers. We (5 adults and my 2-year-old son ) arrived at 2:00 PM for lunch and the...More
Hello, I’m sorry you felt the service was curt, but we try and let customers in large parties know ahead of time that the bill will come with an automatic gratuity for the large party if 6 people or more. This is a common practice...More
Our group came in for Happy Hour on Thurs afternoon, and the happy hour did not disappoint. The happy hour oysters were good, during the course of the happy hour we got several rounds of a dozen oysters each round, with the Totten Pacifica oysters...More
It was my birthday. Here we were in Vancouver. Where to eat? Oysters! After a quick search we found Fanny bay. Sounded perfect. Close to our hotel perfect. We arrived without a reservation around 7:00 on a Wednesday they said an hour. No pro we...More
We had been at Fanny's some time ago, and we loved the food... so we brought some friends this time. They don't take reservations, so we arrived at 2pm (opening time) sharply to get a table for 5 people. They were almost full! The host...More
If you’re an oyster lover… you have come to the right place!!! If you’re a seafood (fresh) lover you’re at the right place!!! The good is delicious !!! Nothing fancy about the place…no fancy chandeliers … no Louis XV1 furniture!!! Just the freshest oysters and...More
My husband and I just had fantastic food here! We were there for happy hour/dinner. Started our night with 2 of each of the chef's special oysters for the night and both were just so fresh and delicious. We then had the clam chowder which...More
Words are insufficient to convey the experience my mouth had. The fact that my wife and l could talk at a normal level made the evening even better. Everything about this place makes it a hidden gem.
The service was amazing. Tuna Tartare - also amazing! We only went for happy hour so cannot comment on the dinner service, but would recommend for a happy hour stop!
Was staying at the Sandman downtown and this place is just around the corner. My last night in Vancouver- decided to check out the happy hour with a friend before we were heading out for dinner . The place was packed - but we were...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10454676-Reviews-Fanny_Bay_Oyster_Bar_Shellfish_Market-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fassil Ethiopian Restaurant,"We visited Fassil with family while visiting Vancouver. The restaurant is simply decorated. There seems to be no fuss about the establishment. The four of us opted for a vegetarian platter to share. It came on a tray with a bread base. You eat without...More
Coming from Chicago, we are not newcomers to ethnic cuisine and were interested in having one Ethiopian Restaurant meal on our trip to Vancouver. Fassil demonstrates the beauty of diversity with customers from every background coming here to have a a wonderful culinary experience. We...More
I was very impressed.The server was fast and efficient and very thorough in explaining Ethiopian cuisine in general and the dishes in particular plus the owner was friendly and personable.We shared a vegeterian combo and a sort of beef stew and everything , especially the...More
I was really looking forward to a great lunch with my god-daughter, made a confirmed reservation with the owner for a late lunch and arrived to a closed restaurant. The store next door said they have usually been closed for lunch for quite a while....More
Great Place. Our daughter, Katrina suggested this place for her going away party. Loved the food. The service was friendly and timely. Flavours were great. One of our party prefers gluten free items and we were told we could call ahead next time and they...More
We were feeling adventurous and had our god-daughter pick the restaurant. Fassil is a charming local eatery on East Broadway. Small space of about 6-8 tables and appropriately decorated with ethnic art. There is a small bar and standing area if your interested more in...More
For such a humble place, the food served is fantastic! Brought a friend for their first experience of Ethiopian food - loved it! Lunch was 3hrs, never rushed. We chatted for at least 30min first, no pushing us to order. Some wonderful suggestions: the lamb,...More
Had dinner at Fassil tonight. It was vegetarian night which meant that the combo dish was the same price as the single dishes on the menu. The combo dish is a bit of each of the vegetarian options on the whole menu. I have had...More
This is a hidden gem of Vancouver, supposedly one of the oldest Ethiopian restaurants around. The food was tasty, they do serve alcohol- they are a bit short on non-alcoholic beverages. The price cannot be beaten and the air is clean- no intense incense smoke...More
The food was fantastic. Beautiful, unbelievably flavorful, warm, and unlike anything I had tried before. I greatly appreciated the authentic feel of the restaurant. I rarely go to restaurants for any kind if experience or aura or any of that crap but this place I...More
Food here is very good. And the prices can not be beat. Two drinks, plus food for two = $30. Service was very personable and welcoming. Food was fresh and so delicious. Highly recommended!
Also probably last time trying Ethiopian. The food was exactly as pictured, it just wasn't for us. The injera bread is vinegary and filling, the meat and spinach were very flavourful. If we went back we'd try a platter with more options. Staff was friendly.
This is a quaint little restaurant that has amazing Ethiopian cuisine. Get ready to use your hands. And try the combo for 2. It’s all very good. Also had the kitfoi which was very good. And the owners are also very nice.
We went with friends for lunch to experience Ethiopian cuisine. We shared the Fassil combo and the Lamb. The combo had chicken, two lentil dishes, cabbage, Spinach and the Lamb. No all spicy but very tasty. Service was good.
The place was neat. Food was really great. My first experience with this cuisine. The owner was really helpful. Portions were quite adequate. Would visit again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971686-Reviews-Fassil_Ethiopian_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fat Mao,"Great food. Flavourful and quick service. Second time going to this place. Lots of great options to choose from. Most recommended
Tasty broth, good noodles, yummy duck, overall a good portion, good meal and lots of flavor. Vibe is normal for chinatown asian, i.e. bare bones, no fancy decor or pretentiousness. my only issue was how hot it was in there with the door closed and...More
just a few tables but very comfy. we got there about 5 pm for a early dinner. we ordered three dishes one to share. the wing bean salad was tangy, oniony and good. the wing beans were unusual but good in taste. my wife had...More
Very fun little noodle spot. I had the Spicy Boat Noodles which was good, the meat was delicious and the soup was very rich. Service was quick and friendly. Overall very pleasant experience.
Great Asian comfort food. Tried the ceviche, beef noodle soup and the duck noodle soup. Great authentic Thai and Taiwanese flavours. The dessert was interesting and tasty.
We came across this restaurant whilst on holiday and looking for a Chinese meal. The food was really tasty and value for money. Nice place and friendly staff.
It’s been awhile since we visited Fat Mao. Some of the menu items have changed but we found the food to be just as good and consistent. It’s worth a visit if you are craving delicious, flavourful noodle dishes. It’s a go to place for...More
I hear so much about these modern noodle place in China Town , very scuzzy area, we dropped in for late lunch , we all feel like noodle to day , very surprised me the restaurant very small , but clean , airy , modern...More
Not a lot of choices but it is excellent! Just soups. Located in Chinatown so not too expensive. We all were positively surprised of the food quality.
Last time I was here was pre-COVID. So happy to have the opportunity to come back. Glad to say their soup is consistently excellent each and every time! I had the hot and sour pork noodles and the flavour is beautifully vinegar-y and savoury. Love...More
I order the duck soup and it was absolutely amazing!!! $18 so a little pricy but tasted amazing Also a secret is to ask for the hot vinegar
I've been to this restaurant 5 times in the last year because they have a simple menu of no nonsense noodles that fill the belly without breaking the banks+ its cozy and staff is nice and polite. I must say that im not the biggest...More
Sister restaurant to the fabulous maenam. This place has the best soup in Vancouver. Try to roti and curry to start. Love the vegetarian soup and the duck leg soup! Yum!
If you should find your self in Chinatown - Van definitely check this place out. Really enjoyed the the simplicity of their menu (while still offering a range of flavours and tastes including noodle suggestions). The kids enjoyed it just as much as the adults!...More
My favorite is the Thai Rice Soup along with the fried egg salad. Pretty on point for a Vancouver bc restaurant Enjoy Add name to waiting list.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8548926-Reviews-Fat_Mao-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Field & Social,"We love healthy salads. We also love salads that don't leave us feeling hungry an hour later. Field and Social salads can be as simple or complex as you desire - and filling as well. The two young women who were staff the day of...More
Have been here a couple of times for lunch and this is one of my new favourite places for a healthy (but tasty) lunch. Good sized portions and like the combination of orzo and salad for some items. Have tried the Kale Caesar Salad and...More
We ordered 2 salads: the Powerhouse Bowl and The Cobb. Both were flavourful, fresh, and delicious. My only criticism would be about the chicken: it a bit dry, Overall, great meal. Thank you!
We wanted a quick and healthy lunch at we got it here! This was my 2nd time enjoying this food, and my first time ordering it. The bowls are huge, enough for two, so we shared a Macro Bowl with chicken and wheat berries. It...More
I was recommended this place several times so I decided to give a try. I opted for the Curried Cauli salad, the only vegan and gluten free salad featured on their menu. The ingredients were fresh and well paired with the light pomegranate vinaigrette. This...More
If you don’t fancy a sandwich for lunch but would like a salad instead then go here. It’s great! Clean, efficient and good food.
This is a nice room to eat in, salads tossed together in front of you, and all are quite reasonably priced. A cool Australian woman staying at our hotel, the Victorian, around the corner, told us about this place. I had the rustic orzo, and...More
Very small place on Dunsmuir not too far from Richards. A great healthy lunch destination which many good choices. In terms of costs, the salads are reasonably priced given the quality of the ingredients and the portion size. We ordered two salads and they were...More
Work across the street, so pop in when I am looking for a quick and healthy lunch or snack. Staff at the cash/payment always make me feel like they are annoyed with me or that I'm not worthy of eating their totally overpriced salads. Think...More
Crude humour aside, I stumbled upon Field & Social the other day and loved everything about it. Like many restaurants in Vancouver, F&S has a beautiful minimalist interior with their white walls and wooden tables. The menu is diverse and can be easily altered depending...More
Great options of mixed salads and topping. Great options for vegans and vegetarians. Restaurant felt a bit cold, but I'm a big fan all in all.
They have a great amount of mixed salad options and then a few that rotate in and out. Also you can mix and match select items and dressings which is great if you have dietary preferences. The lineup from 12-1 moves quick but you can...More
This is a fantastic place if you're looking for healthy good quality food. It's a salad bar that allows you to add your protein. I tried their Persian herb salad that contains mint, parsley, mixed greens, Persian bread, black sesame, radish, walnuts and feta cheese....More
Visited for a healthy lunch with a colleague. It's a modern cafeteria styled place with about 25 bench/window seats. A good selection of tasty salads, a few soups, and a small selection of juices/water. Not the cheapest around but good sized portions and if you...More
I took my son to lunch here while visiting my family in Vancouver. He ordered the Field Cobb Salad and I had the Market Bowl with chicken. Both were delightful! They were made fresh in front of us with a variety of unusual and tasty...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9800089-Reviews-Field_Social-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Finch & Barley,"Fun place, tight quarters but lots of plexiglass shields. As others have noted, it's pretty loud in there which is great if that's what you're going for, but I wouldn't aim to have a meeting or romantic evening here! Both flatbread and sandwich were really...More
A hidden gem that I’m embarrassed about not visiting earlier! My wife attended a girls night out here a couple weeks ago and that inspired a larger birthday dinner last night. Our server was incredible, she was on top of everything and couldn’t ask for...More
This unassuming eatery was professional from the start when they took my booking. There is a scarcity of good brunch spots in North Vancouver. While other places disappoint, this one exceeded expectations. Food was good. They serve a nice selection of typical brunch food with...More
We went looking for a date night out that also features live music and we succeeded! Nice atmosphere. To top it off they have an excellent menu and great drink menu. We opted to have a bunch of appies and they were really tasty. The...More
Had a great dinner with friends on a rainy Sunday night. Lots of appy choices and some Mediterranean options made for an interesting menu with lots of options. The fries were hot and crispy. Lamb burger was tasty. Really enjoyed the baba ganoush and the...More
I love Finch and Barley. Though expensive, it is really worth the money for the ambience and atmosphere. I went for the live music night a few weeks ago and it was very special. The food is AMAZING, unique, and diverse. Not like many other...More
The noise level is one suited for a night club not a restaurant! The music was so loud everyone had to shout in order to carry on a conversation. My throat was extremely soar by the end of the evening. Not enjoyable at all. Pity...More
Service and atmosphere are great. Takes reservations. It can be difficult to find first time, but it's well worth it.
Finch and Barley is a neat little place off the beaten path with some really great food. The food was tasty and the portions were pretty generous. Went on a weekend and it was pretty busy and with only one waitress working, it was a...More
We've been twice now. The best Lamb Shank in the area! The first time we went in November it was busy but we didn't have a reservation so couldn't complain. The second time was in December (with a reservation) and there was a Christmas party...More
Went with friends for a birthday. Pleasantly surprised, not in the usual restaurant area of North Van. Parking a bit tricky but within reason. Doors open at 6 pm and not before. Menu is very interesting and varied, and food well presented and delicious. House...More
The service was exceptional, attentive without being obvious or intrusive. There are good options for a varied breakfast not just eggs, eggs, eggs.One of our party is a vegetarian and they offered to either add, subtract or put items to the side to modify her...More
Written by a local.... We have been here a few times for dinner & really enjoyed it. They have some unique & delicious menu items. The cauliflower is surprisingly awesome! In winter it can be difficult getting a table without a reservation, summer is easier....More
I think this is normally a bar, but they open for breakfast/brunch on weekends. It's in an industrial type area close to Lonsdale quay. We had poached eggs on hash browns, Benedict style. It was really good. Service was great and food hit the spot....More
Out of the way location, funky interior, friendly service, diverse menu. Shared a couple of flatbreads and they were excellent (especially the chicken pesto) - lots of toppings, not greasy, flavourful. Wish they opened a bit earlier than the odd 6:00, but we can work...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4849999-Reviews-Finch_Barley-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fiore Famiglia,"This is a close to home restaurant. Every time I come here the food and service is incredible. Sometimes a little tough to get in but only reminds me again about how great rhey are. Highly recommend!
Decided to try this restaurant that we have driven by on numerous occasions. Leaving reservations to the last minute, the host very politely advised there was a time limit for our table. Not an issue as they made time for us and as noted it...More
I’ve been waiting to go to this place for years , the location is so quaint and relaxed, so I was excited to finally get a chance to try it. I was not impressed. Despite the lovely atmosphere the menu selections were underwhelming in that...More
This restaurant was recommended to me. First time I went, both food and service were good. The second time, I ordered the same dish as first time but both the quality and quantity had declined. Tonight, the third time, we sat at a patio table....More
Fiore Famiglia does everything right. Nice outdoor seating is available, the menu is light and tight and excellent (their marinated olives!). Service is friendly and patient. (No Rush Rush Rush nonsense some places inflict on diners.) Food is fabulous and plenty. Fiore Famiglia is our...More
Great service. Very good chef! Caprese salad with pistachios was our first and our favourite was braised short rib parppadelle.
In 2020 and up to now, Famiglia Fiore has been one of the bright spots. We have gone there regularly for outdoor dining, spaced indoor dining, consistent service, and good food. I don't think one can ask for more.
Lunch here this week was very disappointing. Firstly: it was cold.. we had to move tables, and I asked for some hot water to warm up. Tables well spaces. My butternut squash soup was OK, albeit rather 'thin'... it was tepid and so I asked...More
My husband and I were out for a walk and decided to stop for a light Brunch. We checked out the menu and it looked appealing. We both decided to order the Sausage Frittata. It did not disappoint. The egg dish was light and flavorful....More
This was my 3rd personal restaurant dine-in experience, and 1st full family dine-in experience, since the local COVID restrictions on restaurants were lifted. This was definitely the best of the three so far. We decided on this place purely because it was the closest restaurant...More
On a recent visit to Vancouver, I stopped off at Fiore Famiglia for lunch. Special luncheon available but I settled for the Salsiccia pizza with a glass of house red. Nice ambiance, friendly staff, and quite affordable.
Service is usually excellent. Decor is fantastic. I rate the food at 19/20. The salads are real salads with real vinaigrette (not a sweet one). Risotto is perfect, Avocado toast is a wonderful brunch. Prices are reasonable for the quality provided.
We were a large group and they catered well to us, food was family style which I loved. Salads and antipasti were delicious, the risotto, pasta were just ok. The pizza wasn’t the best especially for an Italian, was a bit disappointed in the main...More
Nice but fairly small space. A few outdoor tables. Antipasti board was fair. Pizza was good. Overall - good but not really exceptional.
This restaurant seems to be extremely popular for dinner, but I went there for Sunday brunch. I liked the ambiance and the location, which is close to a mainly residential neighbourhood of Upper Kitsilano. Decor is good. The menu is generally interesting although I would...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14721018-Reviews-Fiore_Famiglia-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Firecrust - Davie,"Our pizza was really good and we would order again. I loved that they have so many options to build your pizza.
Wow I don't even know how to explain how good this pizza was. VERY IMPRESSIVE. 100% recommend going to this pizza place.
Last night in Vancouver and what a wonderful little pizzeria! Staff are so friendly and helpful, amazing pizza and lovely atmosphere. They make the pizza as you want it and you can watch it cook in the oven. Fresh, tasty pizza. Highly recommend everyone should...More
Stopped off here on a Thursday and took advantage of the any two pizzas, garlic bread pizza and two fountain drinks for $35. If you’d prefer a beer to go with it you could upgrade for an extra $2 each. The place was clean, well...More
From a pizza enthusiast from UK, it's full marks! Easy, fast food style and choice but with authentic fired crust. Kids loved it too.
I came here for the second time only because of the milkshakes they serve. This time when I came I also ordered a meal. My friend and I got a small pizza, build your own pasta and salad with our kit-kat milkshake. All together the...More
Excellent Neapolitan pizza, similar to PiCo for Ontario people! One price, choose as many toppings as you like. Delicious pizza and courteous service. Great location near Yaletown. Would love it if they’d open a store in Toronto!
This is an amazing pizza spott downtown Vancouver, and the greatest thing is that you can choose what you want on your pizza, exactly like Subway! You can choose from so many ingredients, vegetables, sauces, cheese, add-ons! However, be aware that the spicy tomato sauce,...More
I loved the idea of this place - specifying your own pizza and having it made right in front of you. Only wish I could have visited more times and also had the caesar salad too. What an excellent idea for fast food!
It is odd, but I have never seen anywhere prosciutto sliced so thin that you could read through it. That might be okay if there was any amount of if but what was there was spread so thin that it was hardly noticeable during the...More
Pizza dough is tasteless, prosciutto hard to find, arugula obviously cheaper because there’s plenty and the base has no tomato sauce so a terrible garlic taste will make you wonder what you actually ordered. Worst part is that the pizza actually looked good when I...More
We came here twice in our visit to Vancouver, both times we had great food. I would recommend a visit
Great crust, decent value, nice room and location, but I expected more. Ordered the Siciliana. Light on toppings, cheese and sauce. Not sure how this place is rated so highly. Might give it one more chance maybe trying a different kind of pie. Service was...More
We stopped here for a quick pizza and were delighted.I like the idea of build your own pizza.They cook it in a fast cook oven that cooks the crust perfect.We had two different pizzas for four people and they were more than enough.The staff are...More
I cannot believe how highly reviewed this place is. This is one step below supermarket frozen pizza. When we arrived, there was no spot designated for pickup, so we asked an employee who either didn't understand what we were asking or couldn't answer that very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11728149-Reviews-Firecrust_Davie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fish Cafe,"Fantastic prawns, scallops, beer, wine and a Greek salad. Great meal and great service. Nice place to have a meal. 😊
We went here about a week ago and discovered the business was closed. There was a notice on the door that said they were closed for a week and they will be open for dinner on June 29. We had made the long drive as...More
The best seafood meal in Vancouver!!! Fish Cafe is owned by South African, Marcus Stiller. He has become a legend in Vancouver for the excellent food and great service at his restaurant in Kerrisdale. Plus, the only place I know of in the Lower Mainland...More
Small space with a few outdoor tables as well. What's up on the blackboard are the choices - only what's fresh. Very reasonable prices. Friendly service. So glad to see this great place survived Covid. Stop in.
Without doubt the best fish in town. I visit Vancouver about once a year, coming from the Mediterranean, we know fish. I can honestly say this place has the best fish I have ever eaten.
I go to the Fish Cafe once a week, at least. The fish is always fresh and gorgeously cooked. Today was exceptional - the chef had Dover sole on the board. Had to try it and it was AMAZING!!! I've had Dover sole at one...More
We've been here twice now in the past week and have discovered a great place to have a delicious fish meal close to us for NOT an arm and a leg. I would have given the restaurant a 5-star, however the ambiance and the seats...More
This is a regular go-to place for Vancouverites. It is a clean fish restaurant with good quality food, a nice place to stop in.
A no frills fish place. Excellent. You choose your fish and your sides from a limited menu. Simple table setting. Super delicious. We will be back.
We found the place in TripAdvisor and were fully satisfied. We had a seafood platter with halibut and Arctic char, one grilled and one blackened with calamari, prawns etc. and it was perfect. Fresh and delicious. Never tried blackened before, but that was really good!
We went here because of the reviews but it was disappointing. My husband had grilled fish with rice (no vegetables or anything); fish was tasteless. I had fish and chips—very tasteless with soggy fries.
If you're in a coastal city, you want the seafood to be great, and Fish Cafe did not disappoint. A small-ish (about a dozen tables) restaurant, it had a good range of seafood items on the menu, with the fish available grilled, deep-fried or blackened....More
We were looking for a place where we could eat a tasty fish meal, and we certainly found one. We ordered the fish platter and it was delicious. Very friendly service. Highly recommended!!
We have been here many times in recent years. It seemed to go through a bit of a dip a while back, but recently it is right back on top. Today I had trout which was perfectly cooked with a delicious lemon-butter sauce. My wife...More
Had the seafood platter and it was great. My son who didn't like seafood had the salmon burger and liked it. Crab cakes were okay. Great atmosphere and service.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3476543-Reviews-Fish_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fisherman s Terrace Seafood Restaurant,"We were told, without a doubt, Vancouver is the place to experience the richness of Asian cuisine. For some people Dim Sum may be old news, but neither of us had ever tried it! We had a business colleague (who is from Richmond) offer to...More
Great food and friendly service - great dishes, clean and good atmosphere. It was a real surprise on our departure from Vancouver, highly recommend.
This place reminds me of one of those large upscale Singapore Chinese resturant (from the 80’s) with large round tables, ladies in white/black uniforms bring food out and gentlemen in black suit with white shirt and tie serving the food and taking orders. And it...More
My friends and I heard we had to try Dim Sum while in Vancouver. We only speak English and the waitress was very patient and suggested dishes to try. Everything was delicious!!
This was one of our favourite Chinese restaurants in Richmond but not anymore. We did make our reservation for lunch ahead but end up waiting for over 50 minutes for a table. We saw no less than 5 parties of various sizes (obviously regular patrons)...More
We made reservations right after opening time, so it wasn't too busy when we got there. The place, however, did quickly fill up and I was soon able to figure out why. After ordering various dishes, the tea arrived and then within minutes the first...More
Four of us visited there and I was the only person went there before. Only the BBQ chicken feet dish was not fresh as a disappointment. I wish they will have many more selections of desserts.
Restaurant is located inside the Aberdeen Center ,very convenient around , they been in business since 1995 ,and moved to Aberdeen Center in 2014 , their specialty is luxury dim Sum and dinner banquet , invite by a business associate for dim sum lunch ,it...More
Delicious dim sum! I do like the dim sum here, like the baked BBQ pork buns, the sticky rice, the Chinese donut wrapped in noodle, the singapore noodles and the BBQ pork. The service here today was good as was the food!
Went to FT WITH A FRIEND ON A VERY BUSY DAY. Had to wait awhile, but the wait was well worth it. Excellent dim sum, excellent service and a good price. Is sure to become a favorite place to go. Highly recommend.
Oh man was recommended to come here by a friend and thank geese for them because the dim sum was off the hook. I’ve been searching for rice rolls for a long time and I finally found the perfect ones ! (They also have like...More
Excellent brunch with my parents and friends. Servers were very attentive and fluent in both Cantonese and English!
We came to Fisherman’s Terrace on a wet October Friday. We were there around 11:45 and the restaurant was busy but our party of six had a reservation. We ordered 11 dishes to share: • Shrimp dumplings (har gow) - 2 orders @ $6.35 with...More
We went there for dinner on Thursday night.It was not busy at all. They offered Cod for two dishes special.The cod was not really fresh but the cleaning of the fish has something to talk about. The chef did not clean out the fish kidney...More
When there with my mother for dim sum but the waitress didn't even let us in saying you can't order dim sum when you have only two people and gave us only regular menu. Recommend going somewhere else else.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d952532-Reviews-Fisherman_s_Terrace_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Fishworks,"Great spot! Food was very good … oysters to start (much better priced than waterfront restaurants) with a mixture of two west coast varieties to compare (east coast varieties were available but, being from Halifax, we wanted to try more west coast options). Market salad...More
Very noisy with poor acoustics. We were a group of 6 and could barely keep a conversation going. The appetizers were tasty but the main courses were almost all overcooked. The halibut and salmon dry and lobster hard.
went for dine out, my favourite seafood restaurant, but wasn't impressed with dine out. excellent tasting menu but portions too small every one left hungary.
Enjoyed the food very much and the restaurant is family friendly. Loved the atmosphere and staff very nice and polite.
Was a tad disappointed in what was promising to be a delightful birthday dinner for a friend. The restaurant staff were very friendly and the flavors of most of the dishes were generally good. Sadly, a number of the dishes were over-cooked, and the paella...More
We have eaten here many times over the years and again tonight and it never disappoints. Tonights server Chloe, was excellent and excelled in knowledge of the menu and service.
This place was soo goood. My boyfriend found it walking by earlier in the day so we decided to give it a try. Not realizing you needed a reservation we did luck out and the were happy to find us a spot. I had the...More
Fantastic seafood restaurant in our neighborhood in North Vancouver. Love the cuisine and service. Great wine selection and friendly staff.
Small restaurant with a fairly short menu that is long on taste and quality. Really great courses and salads. Nice wine list. The can accommodate allergies. Nice atmosphere, friendly service.
This is not a restaurant, it is an experience, a foodie’s paradise. The service is amazing, staff are welcoming, professional, and friendly without ever feeling intrusive. The food is absolutely amazing. The pasta carbonara with prawns was cooked perfectly, al dente with authentic guanciale. The...More
Food was excellent, service excellent. Well priced for the quality food and service, but be prepared for $80 + check. I had the scallops dish which were excellent and very rich . Husband had the salmon wellington.
We had a great dinner with salmon carpaccio and crab cakes as starter and salmon Wellington and lingcod as mains. All very tasty. The servers were very friendly and service was smooth. The restaurant has a nice atmosphere and outside patio. We will definitely visit...More
The New England clam chowder is not a New England clam chowder, it is a thick fish soup with a strange colour. The Lobster bisque was lovely as was the salmon wellington, however the meal was out of proportion with there being too much salmon...More
Our server was pleasant but a little distracted, we asked an important question that she was to get an answer for regarding a menu item and she totally forgot. The place was completely full and while lively it was loud. The food had mixed reviews...More
I've eaten here many times and always really enjoyed the food. the ambience is quite good, and the service very good. however, one little complaint...I went with a friend tonight, ordered a Caesar salad to start, and halibut poutine for the main. I asked for...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1583616-Reviews-Fishworks-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Five Sails Restaurant,"Fantastic view of the Vancouver harbor. Very good food. Top notch service from Shawn and Sara (wine sommelier).
3 of us enjoyed the Dine Out experience at the Five Sails oh Jan.30th. The food selection was very good and we all enjoyed the 3 courses. My only comment would be that one of our group is a Vegan and there was not much...More
Dear Juliet S, Thank you for taking the time to write a review! We are very glad to hear that you enjoyed all three courses of the Dine Out Menu. All feedback from our guests is greatly appreciated. Increasing our options for vegans and vegetarians...More
The views were amazing, lots of movement in the Harbour. Each dish we had from the kitchen was presented and tasted like Michelin star quality. There was a live jazz band who fit the environment just perfectly, playing a wide range of hits.
We come here somewhat regularly for special occasions and tonight we celebrated our 20th anniversary. Solid food, great wine, and wonderful view. In a long line of excellent servers here, our server tonight Jordan didn’t miss a beat. Thank you Five Sails!
This is a lovely restaurant with good service, five-star food, and a fabulous view. It's the kind of restaurant you go to for a unique experience and a very special ambiance. It's also very expensive where dinner for two and a bottle of their least...More
Taf was an amazing server for us on our 2nd anniversary. 10/10 would recommend the lobster and the venison. Soufflé was 100% worth the wait!
Great food, great service, an excellent bar and wine selection. Plus the views are unbeatable! We booked a dinner that commenced just before sunset and enjoyed watching the disappearing sun and the harbour and distant towns light up across the way. Our service team made...More
We were really looking forward to this meal for a special birthday celebration. It did not start well as we received an email cancelling our reservation for no reason. We wanted to go so much that we moved around our plans and booked for the...More
We chose Five Sails for our first dinner out after my husband's 4 month hospitalization. Excellent choice. We were seated at the windows, accommodating my husband's wheelchair without a blink. We chose the Chef’s Tasting Menu with wine pairing, every course better than the previous...More
AMAZING DINNER! I feel so happy for choosing to spend my evening herewith great food, drink and astonishing service by Michael! Thank you 🙏
We ate in five sails the first day of our stay in Vancouver and this was great right away. It is a slightly more expensive and classic restaurant, but this is well worth it. We both started with the scallops. Great how the flavors are...More
We keep returning for the great food and views. The staff are always welcoming and provide superb service. Mains were sablefish and it was excellent. The manager suggested a BC chardonnay which matched the fish perfectly. A wonderful experience as always.
We went here for a birthday dinner on a Friday night. I had high hopes for this dinner, and it just seemed to fall flat. So, maybe it was my expectation vs reality, or it was really the experience, I'm not sure. The service seemed...More
This is the best meal we have had for a long time, the mixture of great foods, excellent service, nice wine selection and great views. Our waiter Taj provided excellent service and made the experience special. The sim in the later afternoon ones streamlining in...More
My boyfriend and I came to Five Sails to celebrate his birthday and we had the loveliest experience. Our server, Taf, was very professional and made delightful conversation. He was very friendly and attentive. The view from the restaurant is absolutely gorgeous and worth the...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d690182-Reviews-Five_Sails_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Flamingo House Chinese Cuisine,"I ordered takeout and went to pick it up in May of 2022. I decided to add spareribs to the order and forgot to take them with me. I immediately called the restaurant and Ming said he would remember me for the next time. I...More
Visited this restaurant at its new location on SE Marine off Knight. It’s small and dingy. Tables are old and unadorned with table cloths. Floor was sticky. Seat cushions were stained. But that wasn’t the worst of it. The dim sum was, at best, under...More
The food was fresh, delicious, fast. We had 7-8 dishes and were pleased with all of it. Enjoyable. I liked the ginger beef the best.
This iconic Chinese Restaurant that has graced Vancouver since 1970s has recently updated itself! Very modern and clean new interior ( they have also installed partitions for each table ) with a streamed-lined menu, they still have their legendary dim sum and currently they are...More
It has been since March that we met with our friends for Dim sum at the restaurant. It was closed during the next number of months for a complete interior renovation to be able to comply with the Government Corona 19 virus safety protocols. Our...More
The last restaurant screw up our appointment so we decided to give Flamingo a try. It turn out very good. All six of us had 6 dishes. They gave us desert. We all had a good dinner.
Good food, service, friendly faces. Best hot/sour soup, which we take home. Usually easy parking. we'll keep returning.
We went here to celebrate a birthday so we were a group of 14 people. We had a typical large round table and we proceeded to order enough food to cover the table a couple of times. The food was excellent. We started with Peking...More
We've been visiting this restaurant since we immigrated to Canada in 1981 which is popular among oldtimers of Vancouver. After they moved from Cambie Street to S.E. Marine Drive, the restaurant is smaller but the food maintains its standard.
Our group of 14 arranged to eat at Flamingo for a family celebration. We left the menu in their very capable hands, and hot, delicious food kept coming from the kitchen. We felt very welcomed and valued.
We had visited the Flamingo years ago at its former and much larger location. We were excited and were not disappointed with our meal at this location. Servers are exceptional and very friendly, visiting and laughing with patrons. Our favourite pork in lettuce wrap, sour...More
I had the sweet and sour boneless pork (REALLY GOOD), mixed vegetables, almond breaded chicken, and wonton soup. Everything was really good, except for the almond chicken, it was just okay but overall good service and good food
We are here now, and no one has even offers us Tea! The food is average at best. We have lived in Vancouver for 45 years and been to a plethora of restaurants and could not recommend this restaurant to anyone? Kitchen staff are loud...More
We think we having coming to the Flamingo for over 33 years in its three different locations: first on Fraser, then Cambie and now on Marine Drive. Still owned by the same family. We came the other day for dim sum during the week and...More
This long-time restaurant in Vancouver never fails to please! Ordering is made easy even for Dim Sum! Service is prompt! The food is tasty!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10491554-Reviews-Flamingo_House_Chinese_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Floata Seafood Restaurant,"After took my aunt to see the TCM in China Town , out of the blue , she would like to go to Floata for Dim Sum , it is well over 15 years since her last visit and the restaurant located at the China...More
Haven’t been here forever and glad we came back! Dim sum was delicious and fresh! The turnip cake (Lo bak go) was soooo good! Ample free parking at the restaurant level in the parking lot. Floata also is an oceanwise approved restaurant and does not...More
Went on a Friday evening expecting outstanding dim sum according to many of the reviews. This was not a “dim sum” restaurant. Although the dim sum we ordered was good, there were only 6 dim sum items on the menu. Most items on the menu...More
Delicious freshly prepared dim sum. The 2 of us are big dim sum fans and this was among the best. Especially the sticky rice. We have to go back as 4 dishes filled us up and there’s much more to try
After 1.5 years of waiting, we finally had dim sum lunch at Floata. It's not cheap but it was worth it. Portions are huge and seafood dumplings were full of shrimp. Friendly service.
Haven't been to this restaurant for over 1 year. Been there twice last week. Lot of dim sum variety , they tasted very yummy and came with big portion. Price was reasonable. Balcony sitting was good especially during sunny days. Will definitely come back especially...More
Needless to say ,this only restaurant for dim sum in Vancouver can hold over 1,000 people and also the biggest Chines restaurants in N, America , during the 80's , waiting time in the week end well over one hours , since they change the...More
I had dim sum here while on a tour of Chinatown. It was okay. I've had a lot of dim sum, and I consider this to be pretty average.
Quick and easy to order. Lots of seating. Bring your parking ticket so they can validate it for you and your party.
Great dim sum here, really busy but super fast service. Great location. Highly recommend this spot!!
First time at Floata. I normally go to Dynasty Seafood for dim sum, but time was against us and the Dim Sum here was good. Would come back again.
I had four dishes and all four were excellent, fresh clams, fresh scallops and delicious, flavorful shrimp! The sweet and sour seafood soup was also fantastic! Prices were very reasonable. Better than most of the dim sum I've had in Manhattan's Chinatown many times... well...More
The dim sum tasted like leftover from other tables, gross, made us nearly vomit. The bill was very high —- one Singapore pan fried noodles, and two dim sums cost us nearly $50.00. It’s lunch time but the place was very empty. We hope it...More
Menu is wonderful with everything you would ever want. Price reasonable so easy to try something new. Only restaurant outside of China where we were able to order chicken feet. Fast and pleasant service.
Lunch on a Sunday equals Dim Sum....YES. Our waiter was very helpful in picking foods for us; I loved them all. Several of our members did not enjoy as much as others. 3rd floor location has elevator delivery but walking stairs is also available. The...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d684669-Reviews-Floata_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Flying Beaver Bar & Grill,"All I can say is great food and great service. Waited 30 mins to get in but worth the wait. My husband had pizza and I had the steak sandwich with a caesar salad, all arrived fairly quickly and perfectly cooked. Definitely will go back,...More
I stop here every time I have a chance. If you have a long enough layover in Vancouver, I suggest for lunch or dinner at the flying beaver They have awesome food, a great staff and excellent views of float planes taking off and landing.
Been here for lunch several times and was good. Tried it for breakfast today. Had the crab cake eggs Benny. Disappointed on the crab cakes. Tasted like fresh grass. No crab taste. Dry, overpowered by the green stuff whatever it was deep fried potatoes. Prefer...More
Have been here a few times before when in town but this was the first time for breakfast. The Flying Beaver did not disappoint. Wonderful breakfast and wonderful service. Shuttle service available from the main terminal and well worth the jump over if you have...More
The prices have escalated immensely and although the food was average to good, the increased cost decreased our overall satisfaction with our dining experience. Still a great place to watch the sea planes land and dock but sadly, we won't be frequent Flying Beaver fliers...More
Together with my friends we cycle from Finn Slough through Steveston and to the Flying Beaver for lunch several times a year. We fell in love with their Margarita pizzas a couple of years ago and now it is all we ever order. We were...More
I first came to this Bar Restaurant when it opened and for years the food was excellent and the service was very good. So it has been 5 years since my last visit and things have changed and not the the good. The food ordered...More
I feel like this place used to be better. Food was just ok. I wanted to like it more than I did. Not sure I will give it another try.
This establishment, which is attached to the Flying Beaver Seaplane service waiting area, and the planes take off and land as you munch on your omelette or West Coast Salad, is unusual and hearkens back to an earlier time. Cool view. You feel like you...More
We waited for our Harbour Air flight to Victoria by having lunch. The fish was fantastic, lots of beer choices, great staff and a great view.
We found this through maps, because we wanted something different. They seated us quickly immediately took our drink order. The food was brought out quickly and was hot and fresh. During our visit, there were several float planes that took off and landed. This is...More
We headed here soon as we arrived in Van. (I had found this place on Trip Advisor). The eggs benedict/bacon and eggs are both absolutely fantastic..coffee really good too. Great service, great food, and you can enjoy being by the water watching sea planes come...More
Lovely friendly place for dinner, cocktails and meeting family and friends. The food was amazing. It was a very busy night and the staff couldn’t be more pleasant. Sorry I live in Toronto. So will defiantly visit when I’m back in Richmond..
We dropped in after a sea plane flight over from Victoria, Vancouver Island. Not having made a reservation we didn’t expect much but were very pleasantly surprised when after a short wait, we were shown to a riverside table right next to the seaplane dock...More
Great food, service and location. Not the best place for a business meeting at supper time but other wise an awesome time.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d704301-Reviews-Flying_Beaver_Bar_Grill-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Fogg n' Suds Restaurant,"From the outside, this restaurant attached to the Holiday Inn looks ordinary and with a name like Fogg N Suds, I was expecting it to be a sad bar. There's never a lot of people in there and it's quiet, with clean tables and sports...More
Stopped by for lunch and had the most flavourful burger ever! Juicy and full of flavour, ate every morsel of burger. Staff were friendly and efficient and the local beer great
The food was okay, but the breakfast was not , the coffee isn't that good. We had dinner and found you got very little , was expensive for what you received .
We went to the Fogg n' Suds on St Edwards Drive in Richmond for a couple drinks and nice meal but ended up being sorely disappointed. Our poor experience began when the hostess took us to a two seat table that was OK for drinks...More
We visited this restaurant as we were staying in the hotel and wanted somewhere convenient to eat at. The dinner service was particularly enjoyable. There was a lively atmosphere and the food was fresh and tasty. We enjoyed the fajitas, fish and chips and burgers....More
We have eaten here many times while staying over between flights thru YVR. Always good service and always good food. Tonite was 'burgers and beer'. One heck of a good deal, price wise and taste wise. Excellent service, nice setting and good pricing!!!
We had supper here one evening and the food was good. The soup and salads where tasty and the dessert was wonderful
My husband & I had went their after a day of fun with friends so we were really hungry. My husband had their Teriyaki beef & I had their chicken finger basket with fries. We ordered from their cocktails. Their margaritas are great! Good place...More
Glad that we could satisfy your cravings after a fun filled day....
Had a late dinner and also breakfast here prior to returning to airport for Covid testing. Breakfast buffet was available as well as menu items.
Thanks for taking the time to leave comments on your visit. We hope your Covid testing was negative and your travels continued with no interruptions. Best regards.
Veru quick & easy to have dinner or breakfast without having to search for somewhere to eat. Service was good and food good
The waitstaff and manager were great with working on my dietary restrictions. I follow a carnivore diet so it can be hard trying to figure out if I can order meat ala cart. This place and manager were very understanding and helpful with navigating the...More
Thanks for the great review, as we strive to accommodate as best possible all customer requests. It was a pleasure having you stay with us and look forward to your return.
We picked up dinner and beer to eat at our nearby hotel. Tasty, reasonable, meal with good choices for all in our group of four.
Good and meaty wings! Great features. Really pleasant server. Fries are absolutely awesome! We will come back when we are in the area again.
It was easy, near the hotel, so why not. But it surprised us, the food was really nice, the service was great. The food was fresh and tasteful and we really enjoyed our visit. So yes we will come back next time.
We are glad that you enjoyed the food and the great service. Look forward to having you and your friends join us again in the future.
WE ate here after a long flight and in the morning for breakfast too. Its attached to the Holiday Inn where we stayed. WE had chicken fajitas and a vegan burger for dinner, along with a very reasonable ( as we came to find out...More
Thank you for the review. We are glad that you had a favorable experience here at the Fogg and hope the rest of our trip is just as enjoyable.",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d684695-Reviews-Fogg_n_Suds_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Forage,"Great quality food on a varied menu. Slow to get service and for food to arrive, but we were in no hurry. Enjoyed watching the world go by on the street.
Nice breakfast when staying in the hotel Listel. We recommend the espresso and pancakes and came back the next day.
Dinner was absolutely superb. Ordered oysters, seared tuna, bison carpaccio, bison steak, and for dessert the cheese puff. Each dish was well presented, fresh, and so flavourful, I would have loved to try everything on the menu. The service was great and wealso enjoyed the...More
Service was top notch. Interesting food, well presented and very local, very fresh. Would have been a five rating if Oysters were colder, fresher and larger. But still great. Wait staff was professional, and Irish, from just below Dublin.
We returned here after 7 years and though the breakfast menu items are a lot smaller the quality is as good as we remember. Guys bring back your full menu, we missed it.
We had breakfast here twice. Absolutely amazing food, loved everything we tried. The French toast was so good, loved the berries on top. 10/10
Attractive menu & tasty food so thanks to the kitchen…however we also experienced some of the most half hearted service we had over almost 3 weeks in Canada, not only from our server but the team just wasn’t pulling together to make a Sat eve...More
Wonderful spot for brunch in central Vancouver! We had two eggs benedict (bennys) - one with bacon and one with salmon. Absolutely delicious, really quick and yummy potatoes on the side! Definitely a place to stop for breakfast or brunch!
The Forage Restaurant’s patio on Robson St in Vancouver is a lovely place to dine for a special birthday. We enjoyed a glass of Niche Gewurtztraminer & a glass of the bubbly La Frenz Aster during our meal. Bison bone marrow appy, Octopus & bison”butcher’s...More
We got to Forage at the tail end of the birthday celebration of my brother-in-law and only ordered oysters, octopus and Prosecco. The octopus was the best I ever had anywhere in the world. Totally unexpected. The oysters were good, too. Best of all, the...More
We stayed at the Listel and decided to try the in house restaurant. We had such a great experience we kept going back for breakfast, drinks and dinner. The charcuterie board was our dinner favourite and the home made granola won out at breakfast.
We both ordered the smoked salmon Benny which was exactly what I wanted it to be. Very good. The smoke on the salmon was delicious. We asked, and they stated the salmon was wild not farmed which was good. Coffee was good. We did have...More
Had the Bison Ribs, 2 only for $35, but nothing else comes with it other than a tblsp of sauteed onions. Would be nice to have a carb to offset the meat's richness, which was very good.
Celebrating 10 years serving Vancouver Forage has been doing the “sustainable” thing longer than many, and although Chef Welbert Choi’s menu isn’t full of surprises the cookery is proper and flavors are bright while service walks a fine-line between formal and friendly.
If you love eggs Benedict like I do, then you need to visit this restaurant. They also have very good service.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3691624-Reviews-Forage-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fortune City,"Food was excellent, portions good and so was the service (Wed). I was expecting carts, however it was ordering off the menu, like my friend pointed out, she likes this better everthing is fresh and hot. We went for a B'day brunch (5 of us)...More
Fortune City seafood is always a reliable Cantonese restaurant. We’ve been frequenting them for many years, whether it’s for dim sum, lunch, dinner or delivery, they’re always fast, fresh and reasonable. Some of our favourite dishes includes their salt and pepper pork chops, their sautee...More
Hadn't been here for a few years. Was just as good as before. Shrimp spring rolls were tasty as was the shui mai and shrimp dumplings. Rice rolls with beef and turnip cake tasted better than other places we go to. Steamed pork buns were...More
My friend invited his family and close friends (30-36) to Fortune City for dinner after the funeral service for his mother. Very good and authentic southern chinese and seafood dishes. The dishes were brought to each of the 3 tables in rapid succession. Everything was...More
Very unique atmosphere! The shrimp dumplings were great, the shrimp with eggplant was also great, plus the peppered squid, the beef and noodles plus the rice which was wrapped in lotus leave. The only thing that was not very good was the beef balls, had...More
Your typical dim sum place that is easy to get to by public transit or car. There is a decent selection that should satisfy picky eaters.
Good solid dim sum in this Vancouver East side Chinese Restaurant. This location had seen several changes in management and name, the latest incarnation had been in business for a few years, and has always been busy and popular in the neighbourhood, for me coming...More
Back in 1987, this strip mall opened on a rainy weekend to empty fanfare. I remember it well as I was hired as part of a jazz quartet to celebrate the grand opening. It was a sad gig. Fast forward to today and 30 years...More
There has been a Chinese restaurant here for as long as I can remember. It has changed names or hands over the decades, but the food and prices have always been good. It is located at East 1st Ave and Renfrew, not your normal touristy...More
We come to this restaurant on our way in to Vancouver and every time, our kids ask... Why is it so busy? I'm sure that's a good sign. We keep coming for the dim sum. Quick and easy to order. Don't be intimidated, they are...More
This restaurant been here very long time ,it is the local favour hang out ,the neighbourhood most Asian retire people , little run down ,it is on the corner of East 1st ,10 mins from P.N.E. ,,the restaurant is so so ,the noise is very...More
Fortune City Seafood Restaurant is very busy on weekends and holidays. My recommendation is to book reservations. This restaurant caters primarily to locals and regular customers. Like most Chinese restaurants people have a habit of talking much louder than necessary. Both the food and service...More
With a group of friends, we each ordered one dish that we like and then we shared all the dishes with each other. We had a great meal and the price is about $20 each including tips. Elevators up and wheelchair access ok.
On a week day if you want the sale price dim sum (4 dishes) go early, they open at 9 am. It is located in a shopping mall on East 1st Ave. Lots of parking. Yesterday when we were there at 11:15am the place was...More
Wow! This place is outstanding. All dishes are freshly made & you can tell! The food was simply incredible. Every dish was delicious. One of the most amazing feasts we've ever enjoyed. Hope you love it as much as we did : )",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4409740-Reviews-Fortune_City-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Fortune Terrace Chinese Cuisine,"there were amazing dishes and some so so dishes. try out their many interesting dim sum but 100% avoid their Satay Cuttlefish. It tasted weird, didnt taste any satay and the cuttlefish was off. other than that, the other dish were fair and not too...More
We were invited to have a dinner banquet in this VIP restaurant, and we were dining in a reserved room, with dedicated staff. The food was exquisite, tasted awesome, the staff was exceptional attentive, and I can imagine how much the dinner cost! The venue...More
We came here for dim sum and enjoyed it very much. Very classic cantonese dim sum place, loud, crowded. You ordered on a menu and food qualities are good. Would return. Parking is covered by the restaurant in underground garage and make sure you parked...More
Was there for wedding dinner. Food was good with some great dishes with the exception of the cold chicken which was supposed to be truffle chicken but was bland. Unfortunately food was marred by the poor service. Server was rather indifferent with ensuring that we...More
Almost two years since my last visit , had a very wonderful birthday dinner with the family at the Fortune Terrace , celebrating my aunt's 99 years young ! I read and hear so many mixed reviews about these restaurants , I all ways say...More
We have been here twice in a month. Once for dinner and once for Dim Sum. I would rate the Dim Dim five star and dinner four star. The service is top notch, and very hygienic. You get sanitizer and a clean bag to put...More
Just finished skating with girlfriend#5 at the Richmond Olympic Oval for almost 2 hours , what a better place to go for Dim Sun lunch at the Fortune Terrace ,just cross the street ,but there is a lot of under ground parking ,this restaurant is...More
Fortune Terrace is one of the many Chinese restaurants that you can find in Richmond. The thing that really sticks out in my mind whenever we visit this place is the humongous digital screen which takes up a whole wall. Seriously, I need one of...More
This place offers unusual delicious dim sum. Love the steamed eel. Fried rice was huge, good for big groups of people. Overall, the customer service was good. It's a busy place, better make a reservation or be prepared for lineup. Also be prepared that the...More
Upscale dim sum restaurant. Use of quality, high end ingredients, together with creativity in presentation. You get what you paid for so this means high end prices. There are other dim sum restaurants that would satisfy my craving for dim sum and cost must less....More
this is a place for extra ordinary DIM SUM This restaurant is famous for its pricey exotic dim sum just to name a few: Crab meat and fish maw dumplings meringue durian buns of course they do serve the har gau and sew mai, but...More
I really like this place for their unique dim-sum dishes and been here at least four times for lunch but never encountered anything like what I experienced the last time. Great food as always and the service was fine. It was at the end of...More
Every so often it is nice to splurge on a nice dinner for a special occasion. The 11 of us were given our own room including a server. Probably because we had a 10 course meal which the bill amounted to the 4 figure $...More
A group of 10 of us were seated in a semi private room as there was large business dinner taking up the main part of the restaurant. Despite a very packed restaurant with all tables taken up, the kitchen ensured all the food was on...More
Delicious food at a reasonable price, good service. We went they for Chinese New Year celebration, has to say it was a wonderful night.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d10461635-Reviews-Fortune_Terrace_Chinese_Cuisine-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Four Olives Restaurant,"This restaurant is absolutely amazing. Dined there three times during a week in Vancouver and every time was superb. Highlights are the calamari, seafood feta and lamb. Everything came out super hot and perfectly seasoned. Very well priced as well.
The appetizers were good. Tasty and large portions The main food was okay. Not the best greek food you’ve ever had but still okay.
We went to Four Olives and everything was just great. I had lamb (Kleftiko) with rice and potatoes and Greek salad. It had lots of feta just how I like it. My husband had lamb shank with spinach salad, which was so good. Loved the...More
I'd like to rename the restaurant to One Olive. It doesn't deserve four.... Having a craving for souvlaki I decided to google and see what was available near me. The closet was Four Olives, so I browsed their website and menu and decided to head...More
Moussaka consists of ground meat sitting in a dry, carved out eggplant shell, with melted cheese on top. Included salad is spinach with a hint of dressing. Cauliflower & broccoli appetizer is essentially fritters. And as is usual here in Vancouver, “Greek salad” has no...More
My friend from Victoria in town for few days , she want to try the Four Oliver Restaurant , because she love and missed this restaurant when she went to UBC for her PH.D , so we dropped in for lunch , it is very...More
Excellent food - fresh and delicious. Good portions but not excessive. Nice atmoshpere. Really well set up for COVID with plastic dividers between each table. I think the Mango Mojito was the best cocktail I have ever had!
We ordered a lamb and a chicken skewer plate to go. The potato was just that one potato wedge. The rice was ample. The skewers were tasty but skimpy pieces. The rice was good. The salad however was spinach leaves not even trimmed, carrot juliened,...More
I had a wonderful valentines night in this restaurant. Great service and the food was delicious. Dark and mellow lighting sets the mood for a romantic dinner. It can be a bit pricy for students though.
Excellent service, prices and portions but the real highlight was the creative menu with dishes I haven’t seen on other Greek restaurant menus. Everything we tried was delicious, from the beetroot and arugala salad with saganaki to the must-try Navajo bread. Highly recommend!
Visited from out of town for medical care and my goodness we lucked out finding this gem near VGH! We were craving steak and a Google search came up highly recommended. The location was not far from our stay while in town. We both had...More
Renovating an Old Neighbourhood Constitution ~ Four Olives offers a safe, approved space to Dine in. Featuring the best of mediterranean mix of greek and Italian at very competitive prices. Sure fire winner for the future.
Everything we ordered was delicious -- cauliflower and broccoli grilled salad, crab cakes, lamb souvlaki. Portions ample. Will definitely get take out from here again
Beautiful restaurant, great service, excellent food! This may be out of the way for a lot of Vancouver attractions for tourists, but it is worth the detour.
We really, really wanted to love this new Greek restaurant but unfortunately the food we ordered was not good. Service was great, location is great, but the ""mousakka"" was not a mousakka at all. On what Greek planet is mousakka prepared without potatoes??? The mousakka...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17433923-Reviews-Four_Olives_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Frankie's Italian Kitchen & Bar Vancouver,"The restaurant is located in/ next to the hotel we stayed at. We arrived late and hungry and although busy they seated us promptly and we were attended to quickly and pleasantly. We all found things on the menu we were interested in trying, including...More
Fantastic meal which our entire group enjoyed. My eggplant parmigiana was superb. Philip did a great job looking after us on the evening. I’d recommend Frankie’s to anyone who enjoys Italian cuisine
We ate here because we stayed at the Georgian Court Hotel that houses this restaurant..we didn't have a car so this was easy..But it did not disappoint at all..our Italian meal at night was excellent..my friend had the house specialty Lasagne and she said it...More
We visited Vancouver and our dinner plans changed last minute. We discovered Frankie’s and took our chances without a reservation. We were so grateful they were able to seat us outside. This place is clearly popular. Sitting outside was wonderful (the air was a little...More
We had been searching far and wide for old style spanish coffees, the ones with the whipped cream and sugar on the rim. The bartender here knew exactly what we were looking for and made us excellent ones. He really made our evening out a...More
We went here based on the reviews and that it is conveniently located next to our hotel. There were four of us in our party and we were seated very quickly, the restaurant got busy quickly. Service was very good, attentive friendly waiting staff. The...More
We were seated quickly... we were served quick quickly... food was just OK... had the spaghetti the pasta was quite crunchy.. it definitely needed a few more minutes of cooking time.. the service was friendly..
As I had read in a couple of reviews, the place looks and feels very nice. But unfortunately, that is where the positive remarks stop. The waiter never came back to the table after taking the order until he was flagged down. One order was...More
The restaurant is nice and the menu is good. I opted for the VEGETARIANA pizza. The pizza was amazing. One of the best I have ever had.
Was originally impressed by the looks of this place. I was expecting some good quality food but that’s not what you get here. Pizza here was very boring, not much sauce no flavour. Appies where similar and service was just OK. Much better places to...More
It’s been exactly 2 years since I patronized Frankie’s. The biggest change in that time? COVID restrictions are essentially gone and we now pretend the pandemic is over. As such, things are back to normal – or as normal as they can be in our...More
Excellent food - big portions. Tons of seafood on the linguini. Our waiter was so friendly. It was busy but he held it together.
Excellent service, atmosphere, food and wine We went with friends for dinner and jazz in the bar. I had the polenta fries and steak salad. Both were excellent especially the steak salad. Wait staff recommended the Sangiovese for our wine and it was a great...More
Great food, great pasta & wonderful staff. Great food, great people & great environment. You won’t go wrong at Frankie’s
Our hotel was next door, so very convenient, but also VERY good. So good in fact, we went two nights in a row for happy hour food and drinks! Wait staff was attentive and atmosphere was lovely.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2307565-Reviews-Frankie_s_Italian_Kitchen_Bar_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Frankie’s Jazz Club,"This place is a true hidden gem. We went for the second time and saw Nigel Black playing. The food is GREAT, the Jazz shows are always perfect.
We arrived as the Quartet was coming on. We listened to Bill Sample and Darlene Cooper and their drummer and bass. We had a great table in the front corner. Bill and Darlene dedicated a song to us on our 49th Anniversary. The food and...More
I have not been here for awhile but came here regularly during covid. The music is always great. The calamari we always have to have. The beef dip was excellent and my lamb shank was flavorful. The service always friendly and attentive
Frankie's is the perfect size and vibe for live music - intimate, sexy and delicious! The band sounded great, the food (from appies to pasta to everything) exquisite and the service first-rate. The perfect place to launch a new radio station in Vancouver - Wave...More
Looked to try something different with a live music night and found this hidden gem. Fantastic food and service - solid Italian food and a great server. The night we were there it was a blues band, and they were really good - including the...More
Hi Kyle, Thank you for your kind review, we're happy to hear you enjoyed your experience and we thank you for coming in. We look forward to hosting you again very soon! Clarissa
This nice little Jazz club came up when I searched online. Great friendly service, very good selection of drinks, fantastic food menu. Most items authentic and made in house. Delicious pasta and pizza dishes Followed by a great blues artist Perfect night out
Hi there, Thank you for your kind review, we're happy to hear you enjoyed your experience and we thank you for coming in. We look forward to hosting you again very soon! Clarissa
We have such great local talent. This is a great restaurant venue to listen to live music. Most friendly service as well. Eat, snack or drink you have plenty of options.
We recently enjoyed a fabulous evening at Frankies Jazz Club - the music and the food and drinks were excellent - it was definitely a highlight of our trip and will be one of our top go-to places when we're next in the city. Thanks...More
We came on the first evening they reopened after the health restrictions loosened up. It was so nice to listen to live music, enjoy good food and see familiar regulars once again. We had the meatballs, fungi pizza and their beet and beef salad this...More
Hubby and I found this place and I’m so glad we decided to give it a try. The food was all really good, starting with the warm bread brought out with oil and vinaigrette. Hubby had lasagna and I had spaghetti with meatballs and both...More
We come here at least once a week since they reopened in Feb for some live music entertainment. We are working our way through their menu. Particularly stand out items: calamari, carpaccio, meatballs, frankie's pizza, beet & steak salad, seafood linguini, shrimp scampi tagliatelle, casarecce...More
Good reliable Italian food however because I am a regular I wish they changed their menu more or could add different appetizers as I may not have dinner but want to snack with drinks instead while listening to some wonderful jazz. The steak salad and...More
While the food in this restaurant is standard fare, our service last week was very attentive. My four star rating, however, is based upon the quality of the music. This is one of the few places in the city where one can listen to exceptionally...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d20259146-Reviews-Frankie_s_Jazz_Club-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Freebird Table & Bar,"We had a night cap at the bar, and the server was excellent; chatty and happy. Came back for breakfast the following day and same great service. Food was excellent and portion size was good!
Thank you kindly for taking the time to write this lovely review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to welcoming you back to Free Bird very soon. Claire
If you live in the Richmond area and are looking for a new spot to check out, you cannot miss Freebird! One visit is all it will take for this to be your crew's new hangout. Whoever designed the place is extremely in touch with...More
Thank you Alex for taking the time to write this heartfelt review. Your kind words mean the world to us and we will certainly share them with the entire team. You are a pleasure to host and we very much look forward to welcoming you...More
Simon and the team at Freebird took on our group of 60 and everything was perfect. The service team, the support team, the kitchen team, the bear staff- everyone was on their toes, friendly and professional. Our guests had a great experience and for many...More
Thank you very much for the wonderful review! You are referring to our beautiful Squamish location, Free Bird Oyster Bar. None the less, It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to welcoming you back to either Free Bird very soon. Claire
Juan and Alison were awesome. The food and atmosphere was great. They treated us like family. Highly recommend Free Bird.
Thank you very much for the wonderful review! We will certainly share your kind words with Alison and Juan Carlos. It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to welcoming you back to Freebird very soon. Claire
I was at a conference in May and the staff went out of their way to accommadate us especially Pratyush. We were a large group and they were not expecting this. I was there again this weekend for a workshop and the staff manager David...More
Sat at the bar. Nice atmosphere. Great service from the bartender. Decent selection of craft beers on tap. Food was delicious and a large portion.
Thank you for the wonderful review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we all look forward to welcoming you back to Free Bird very soon. Claire
Had an amazing time, great food and drinks, specially the excellent service from Michael, Pratyush and their manager David, they were amazing and very accommodating. The best restaurant in Richmond.
Thank you very much for the wonderful review! The team truly appreciates the kind words. It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to welcoming you back to Free Bird very soon. Claire
First time visiting and were treated to some incredible bites and friendly service. Alison and Michael both took great care of our group, and would highly recommend her watermelon refresher cocktail. Food was amazing and well priced, the environment was perfect for our group, and...More
Thank you so much for the awesome review! It was a pleasure to host you. We will certainly share your kind words with Alison and Michael and we very much look forward to welcoming you back to Free Bird very soon. Claire
Their food, service and atmosphere was really nice. We order chicken hamburger, beef hamburger and dirty fries. They are amazing. I would like to try again.
Thank you so much for the great review! Your kind words mean the world to the team. We look forward to welcoming you back very soon. Claire
Food was delicious and staff were really friendly! Music was also great. Overall an enjoyable experience, will definitely come again!
This spot was really nice! The staff was so nice, best spot in town! The food was always perfect, drinks was really nice too! Everyone in this place was really want the best for you!
Thank you for the wonderful review! We will certainly pass along your kind words to Meg. We look forward to welcoming you back very soon. Claire
Breakfast, lunch and dinner were all fabulous! Tasty well prepared food and choice of healthy salads through to southern fried chicken. Very attentive servers too.
David, Thank you so much for the wonderful review! We are so happy to hear you enjoyed our offerings! We look forward to the opportunity to welcome you back very soon. Claire
We had a large group of 25 with no prior reservations but were received quickly and happily by staff and were provided with great service. The menu was a bit small for my liking but the food was quick and good. Many thanks to both...More
Thank You very much for the lovely review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to hosting you again very soon.
Last minute reservation of 25. They rolled with the punches and not only served us efficiently they accommodated all our needs and wants. Amazing. Fantastic. Perfect.
Thank you for the great review! We were happy to be able to accommodate you. It was a pleasure to serve your group and we hope to welcome you back very soon. Claire
Went with family and ordered the fried chicken platter and the brisket platter. So much food, so good food, so much fun. It comes family style and we all dug in. We also ordered chicken sliders for the grandkids as a happy hour item and...More
Thank you very much for the wonderful review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to welcoming you back to Freebird very soon. Claire",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d21066444-Reviews-Free_Bird_Table_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Fujiya Japanese Foods,"I have been going to Fujiya since 1997. For quick snacks. Sushi. Prepared bento boxes. And my kids fave, frozen ramen. Saved my life many times when wanting sushi at a budget price. Love going late and hitting the half price time. It’s like winning...More
This authentic Japanese grocer has been around for decades. They offer everything you need from assorted takeout sushi to purchasing ingredients to create your own sushi. Everything is priced reasonably and the sushi is made fresh. Sushi is available even for vegetarians. I had the...More
We got two Bento Boxes. There were some nice sides of rice, marinated vegetables and the main. I had Black Cod and my chicken. Both were very good.
We have been to this sushi takeout and Japanese market many times. The sushi has been a bit disappointing but the prepared foods are pretty good. The Japanese market options are amazing.
The prepared foods, in our opinion are better tasting than the sushi. We have had some better sushi at other supermarkets. The Japanese items available in the store are fabulous but a bit pricey but voluminous selection from the homeland.
I used to be regular after i've figured out that they add MSG after long period tried again in august 2020 same .They've changed the food, lots of MSG makes me sick never again
Pre-packaged sushi. That's what it is. Plain and simple. Offerings are very reasonably priced. I get blown away with some of the negative reviews. Rice was not fresh...... duh! Back to the review. I'm a regular customer and I cannot recall a single bad experience....More
We went in after Tai Chi to purchase dinner and other Japanese household items. The sushi was mediocre as the rice was dried out or not fresh. The prepared foods were tasty but for the chicken. The prepared fish was good. So a bit of...More
Fujiya always serves up fresh and delicious sushi. We took out fujiya sushi to feed a group of 20+. It was ready for pickup and super fresh and tasty!
Just picked up some Chicken Karage and potato salad and both my wife and I got stomach aches leading to diarrhea. Wished I hadn’t bought it. Packaged today but somehow it wasn’t as good as the other times we’ve had it. Called them and complained....More
I have been to Fujiya many times when I am looking for some quick sushi. They are prepackaged and have many types to choose from at very good prices. They just don’t have sushi as they also have other items that you would find at...More
Well I didn't want an healthy burger so quick takeout sushi it is. I managed to get a California roll (last one of final batch at 530pm) and a box of tuna, salmon and cucumber and California maki roll combination. Filled me up and was...More
While parking is always tough and the place is small, it is worthwhile coming here for the eating-onsite-food (always fresh) and the good Japanese grocery selection.
Have been a long time customer at Fujiya, I am finally writing a review for them!! Back in the days when I don't know what to have for lunch at the office, I would go straight to their shop on Bridgeport in Richmond, and if...More
The sushi is great and I appreciate the way they have the store laid out in a way that keeps a good flow.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5078581-Reviews-Fujiya_Japanese_Foods-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
G-Men Ramen,"The broth was thick and noodles were soaking up the broth. It was flavourful and heavy. They didn’t have a lot of drink options due to Covid and there was a small wait, but worth it. Will come back again when in town. Tons of...More
Due to Covid we didn’t experience the hustle and bustle of the G-Men Ramen as it usually is BUT the cuisine was superb! Never went there when it wasn’t. The Pork Shoyu Ramen was bursting with flavour that warmed your insides and the Chicken Karaage...More
We've been fans of G-Men for years now - they have great ramen, and the vibe is pretty authentically Japanese. My kids love the karaage chicken, and my husband gets the shio ramen. I love the tantanmen. The waitstaff is great; most of them are...More
We went to Richmond one Saturday in May to stop here for lunch. The place is tiny, be prepare to wait. We were a party of five, if we wanted to sit together there would be a long wait, so we divided our party, two...More
Not the best ramen, surprisingly this is supposed to be their speciality! I find their ramen is a bit over cooked and also the soup stock is not hot enough, seems like the noodles were pre-cooked and became soggy! Topping are all very average and...More
The flavors and offerings were good. But the portions were quite large. One upside is we went to three different Ramen places in one night because the first two we tried did not accept credit cards, and if you paid cash they exchanged 1 USD...More
I find myself in a different city, states, and countries and find myself drawn to local places. If you are in Richmond and want a nice warm bowl of ramen to stop on by you should not be disappointed. The broth is the first thing...More
I've never been to a Ramen place before, but wow..... The soup was so good. I had a RCMP and it was amazing. I think I might have dreamt about it!
This ramen shop is really small; not many tables available so if you do go during peak dinner hours, be aware of that. My friend and I had to wait about 30 minutes, but the food was worth the wait because overall the meal was...More
The place is small. The ramen is good. The service is warm. Then comes it killer! It was written up by some Chinese media, it is now the place to go for Japanese ramen for the Chinese population in Richmond, which is plenty! Just another...More
Pretty typical ramen restaurant with limited seating. It's a bit dark and hard to find, but once inside, the service was good, the food arrived quickly, and it was good! We love ramen, and the shoyu was great. Chashu was very tasty, and the noodles...More
My recent visit included 3 visits to this restaurant. The shoyu ramen and sesame ramen (tan ten or something) were delicious, in addition to the gyoza. It's fast service, but get there early for lunch or dinner. It's popular and I see why!
Had a late meal here. The menu is great. Lots of suggestions plus tapas menu are all good selection. We tried the spiciest RCMP ramen and miso ramen. Takoyaki was good. They serve the soup quite fast and you can tell they take pride in...More
Limited seating so make sure you write your name on the wait list. We had some spicy peanut ramen and ""staff favourite ever"" haha you will see it... Both delicious. I add a ton of garlic and chili. Check it out!
Ramen here is super yummy! I have tried multiple items on the menu, and I haven't had any bad experience with anything. The Tan-Tan ramen is my favourite. You simply cannot go wrong with this. The restaurant also has tasty drinks and loud waiters who...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1483579-Reviews-G_Men_Ramen-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
G-men Ramen Shop,"Everytime we come to Vancouver, Gman is our first stop! This trip the staff brought us a special treat not on the menu, (but it SHOULD BE ON THE MENU!!) the kimchi fried rice was so delicious we didn’t even have room for our favourite...More
Had a great experience here at G-Men. Fast, quick service and the staff are really friendly. The food is good, it's consistent, it's what I'd expect. I thoroughly enjoyed the ramen here and definitely will be back if I'm in the area.
I love this place. It’s a little quirky... like their “No Birthday Cake” policy. There is usually a lineup waiting to come in at 5:30 Pm when they open. Their broths are either Tori (chicken) or Tonkotsu (pork)... but they seem to have a lot...More
Delicious and varied ramen menu. The Tan Tan was excellent- spicy and nutty. Service was fast and price decent.
G-men Ramen located at the fish market of Richmond. We here for a simple and quick lunch. The restaurant had a very modest setting and plain decoration. The service was quick and cordial, however. Ramen certainly were the only ones we tasted. It’s good.
Tasted just ok to me but my mom got very sick from eating the Miso Domino (miso minced pork ramen soup). The prices are NOT cheap. Maybe they’ve raised prices over the years. I don’t recommend mainly because my mom got very sick from the...More
Had a layover and decided to check out this gem. Had a bit of a wait to get in on Saturday night at 8:30pm but service was prompt and courteous. We had the Miso and Tamtam and both were delicious! Also had some of the...More
Three of us had lunch here in early February 2019. I'm not an expert but I've had ramen at more than a few restaurants. The noodles were a very good consistency, not soggy, not too hard. The soup was rich and flavourful. The pork was...More
Went here almost by accident... late at night and the restaurant I wanted to go to said they were closing (even though their sign said open until 10:00pm and it was 9:30). But their loss and my gain. Walked across the street to G-men Ramen...More
Make sure you come to this place not so hungry but almost there. Minimum wait would be 40 mins though they say 20. This place always have a long line but it’s worth the wait. Parking is quite hard to find in this area. You...More
Food is sub-standard compared to Asia. Staff is rude. They are standing around using their shop wifi but would not share the password to a customer who is traveling from overseas. Food is not that good anyways. Would NOT come back!
I know of at least two Sushi restaurant chef/owners in Seattle that make the drive to the amazing Asian Food mecca of Richmond, BC, just to have ramen and izakaya-style dishes at G-Men. We do so ourselves! It's funky, usually crowded, authentic, and has some...More
Their noodles are always consistently tasty and authentic. I recommend the tan tan noodles and Miso ramen - always a treat! Avoid lunch and dinner time as the wait can get pretty long. Always opt for booth and bar seats so you don't have to...More
Some of the best Ramen I’ve had outside of Japan. Right balance of all ingredients. Delicious pork and noodles. The pickled eggs were divine. Highly recommend this place.
One of the best Ramen shop in Greater Vancouver. I come here almost every week since coming from my vacation in Tokyo. Come early or be prepared to wait as the place is small and there is always a wait list.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d5033496-Reviews-G_men_Ramen_Shop-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
GAYA Sushi,"What a gem. I live about a 10 minute walk from here and one day my wife and I decided to go and check it out. Wow, what a surprise! You can watch the chefs preparing your food and it is so fresh! Very nice...More
A little corner in a small plaza. Only about a dozen tables. Sushi seemed fresh and arrived quickly after we ordered. Over all reasonable price for reasonable sushi.
I have took the lunch during the week. The restaurant is full and noisy. The service is sometimes bad but their meals are good and cheap.
First time trying this place and did pickup. The yakisoba was cold, gyozas were dry. The rolls were okay but not great. Won't come back or try this place again several other better Japanese restaurants
Big menu, nice decor, fast service, good prices. Sushi rice was oddly squished/mushy so that no grains were distinguishable. The rolls were definitely on the smaller side, but really tasty and good quality.
Their food has been consistently good for several years, always fresh, flavourful, hot, etc. We've ordered a lot of different items from their menu and have always been happy with it, but their service is less than to be desired. During peak times it's extremely...More
Gaya is a great spot if you're looking for consistent quality, service, and prices that beat almost 90% of other sushi restaurants. You can request real crab at a reasonable price but I suggest their different items such as the rice bowls and appetizers as...More
It is a nice neighbourhood sushi place but nothing fancy. It could be a busy place during peak hours.
Eat in or take out, we have always been happy. We choose this restaurant often when we are in the area.
Typical Lower Mainland sushi place. Seriously nothing special. The sushi is large, lots of fake crab filler, not super flavorful, not my style at all. A lot of people get take out and go. Prices are cheap. Tables and chairs look greasy. I do not...More
I always go to this restaurant. I know the service is not good but didn’t expect a rude new waitress they hired! The sushi not very fresh as usual. It make me sick after ate them. Very disappointed this time.
Delicious, quick service, friendly staff, and large variety. One of our favourite dishes is not on the menu, but the staff always deliver. Went for lunch on a Wednesday afternoon and the restaurant was full. Because the service is so quick, people moved quickly and...More
consistent, always good sushi. fresh. I always call in my order and have never had to wait. My daughter loves their yam rolls and she is a picky eater!
I think they know my order before I even sit down. Miso soup with extra green onions, spicy tuna sashimi, crazy roll and philiadephia roll. The teriyaki plates are delicious too made with bean sprouts instead o noodles. Gluts intollant and vegetarians can have an...More
Easy place to come and eat. Nice servers. Very casual place, fast serving. Lots of different options in menu",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4848146-Reviews-GAYA_Sushi-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Gain Wah Restaurant,"the food and decor provided a great experience! will go back again and again. the business has been running for over 30 years
We were hungry and looking for place that took our cards in Chinatown. This place met our needs. They had a really large menu, the food was good, and the price is definitely $.
We had a really good early evening meal here. After a busy day walking around the city we decided o eat in Chinatown before going back to our hotel. We had no idea which restaurant to choose but asked a couple of local shop staff...More
Six of us came here yesterday for a family birthday dinner after the Whitecaps game. We actually wanted an old-style experience where we could sit around a big round table and share too many dishes of assorted Chinese dishes which some of us remembered from...More
Many restaurants open at dinner time & we were so happy to find a restaurant opened. It was clean & not busy, the few patrons were Chinese. Huge menu & lots of daily specials. I chose a spicy pork & eggplant, I told the waitress...More
After 8 years living in Singapore and Shanghai, this was a home-from-home experience. If you want fancy decor, don’t go. But if you’re after great authentic food, give it a visit.
My friends and I went to Gain Wah Restaurant for dinner on the weekend. There was plenty of pay street parking in the evening or you can park at Chinatown Plaza parkade and walk a block to the restaurant which is also on Keefer Street....More
Found this restaurant in Chinatown after googling ‘best Chinese restaurant Vancouver ‘ and we were not disappointed!!! Great menu.. daily specials. The best egg fried rice I have had for a long time. Half roast duck ( delicious) for $14!!! Home cooked The bill for...More
Hyper-local restaurant in Chinatown serving up killer curry beef brisket on rice, Chinese beer, and fortune cookies. An eatery much loved by locals, one comes here for the comforts of community and Cantonese style cooking. Great value in dishes, especially to feed a large group....More
Food was not very good. Broth was bad tasting and greasy. Meat was poor tasting. Not what I expected from Chinatown.
We went for the lobster and crab, but they ran out by 5pm. The food is just okay for Cantonese food, but not really authentic. Service is very friendly. Do NOT use the restroom if you don't really need to use it. It is disgusting....More
Wanted to eat at a Chinese restaurant in Chinatown but strangely they had many stores but very few places to eat finally found Gain Wah, more like a diner but the food was good and prices were good
We went here for take out after a busy day of sightseeing. We ordered the chicken fried rice and it was the best fried rice my husband and I have ever had. All the other food we ordered was fresh and very tasty.
We were in Vancouver on holidays and had to have Chinese food at least once. We strolled the streets in Chinatown and came across Gain Wah. We were warmly greeted by the hostess and promptly seated, it was approximately 1:00 pm and the restaurant was...More
Authentic Chinese food for vegetarians and meat eaters alike. Hot and delivered fast! The spicy green beans were amazing as well as the egg fu yung. All the dishes we tried were phenomenal! Great prices too!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d683209-Reviews-Gain_Wah_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gami Sushi,"Deteriorating quality of service and food. Not what it used to be. Much higher prices above inflation
This restaurant is a excellent place if you want Japanese food as the food is fresh and service is wonderful too.Certainly recommend this restaurant if you are around this restaurant.
This is not the first time I’ve been treated badly at this restaurant. I’ve been ordering here for a few years and have had one of the waitresses, supposedly she’s a manager, speak to me like I’m dirt. She’s always been rude and aggressive towards...More
Drop in for a quick lunch after my banking , ,very causal family run restaurant , is by Williams and number three road in a strip mall, decor very cozy wooden stone environment , I love their idea of social distancing ,drop in for a...More
Located in the Broadmoor Shopping Center so very convenient re parking. Fast service, good food and fair pricing. Usually a lineup when eating in so we just order take out via their website and pick up. Very convenient and delish. Lunch Bento boxes are a...More
Gami Sushi is located in the Broadmoor Mall at No. 3 Road and Williams. We were there on a February Friday around 12:30 and had to wait about 10-15 minutes. When we left around 1:45, there was still a lineup to get in. The menu...More
I’ve been to this restaurant multitudinous times because the food is consistently good! Today was exceptional not just because I was hungry but because the Veggie Bento Box (my favorite ) seemed larger than ever! The female servers are fast but have no time to...More
I had to wait about 15 minutes but it was worth it. Very good food. The staff were friendly. Once I sat down and ordered the food came very quickly
Really enjoyed the food! Tuna avocado orange , motoyaki and tacos were great. The staff is just less than pleasant and seem like they just want you out. Food comes strangely quick. We will be back.
We were there for a family meal on a Friday night. There were six of us so we had to wait for about a half hour but the meal was well worth it. The service was quick, courteous and efficient.The atmosphere is that of a...More
Came here with 10 people, but we were lucky enough to get seating as we arrived early. Much more people started arriving later on so you should probably get a reservation. There were lots of variety and selection of sushi to choose from. Sushi was...More
This place is always packed; and it is good reason to be...this small little restaurant serves great food at a reasonable price. Service and quality is very good. No wonder this place was packed. My Aunt from Toronto was impressed.
I have been a few times to the new Gami Sushi Restaurant in Richmond BC. Really good Udon bowls and traditional Japanese menus. Sometimes a little bit of a line up, but really good service and very good food !! Recommend to check it out....More
Korean/Japanese style. They have special rolls which are good too. Reasonable pricing. The place is not very big and usually get packed at night, even on weekdays.
Having lived in Japan, I am always excited to find a true Japanese restaurant, as there are so few left in Richmond. From the great service, to the fresh ingredients and the traditional Japanese dishes, this is a great restaurant. We take our family and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d8695054-Reviews-Gami_Sushi-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Garden City Hot Pot,"Recently tried it for both nighttime hotpot and lunchtime dimsum. They have combination options which are relatively decent deals. Services were actually quite good during our visits. Food was tasty. Would go again.
One of the original ""Hot Pot"" restaurant in Richmond, before the Hot Pot craze started to spread throughout the Greater Vancouver Region! Garden City Hot Pot is Hong Kong / Cantonese Style Hot Pot that is different from the late comer to Vancouver i.e. Szechuan...More
Everything was good until ""pay-up"" time. The new cashier bent and looked over when I was entering credit particulars (passwords, tip amount etc). The previous cashier(s) would step back and intentionally look away during such time.
We go here for work a few times a year and love it every time. The portions are plentiful, and the sauce/dip cart is awesome, they have so many topping to choose! I think we usually spend ~$20-$25 a person and leave full.
Can always judge the quality of the Dim Sum by the quality of the Har Gaw, steamed shrimp dumplings. The shrimp dumpling skin was nicely cooked and the shrimp filling was firm and well seasoned. A wide selection of different dim sum dishes and also...More
We are grateful to our server, “Carol,” who patiently led us through the process of selecting ingredients for our hot pot, a first-time experience for us. The end result was a delicious mélange of seafood and dumplings and vegetables in two scrumptious broths (we picked...More
Went here for dinner. In addition to usual items such as beef, shrimp, glass noodles, etc., they had a special on live prawns, so we ordered that too. They showed us the live prawns crawling around a bucket, then a few minutes later served them...More
A few things to note about this place: 1. They serve Chinese hot pot, but a la carte, not all-you-can-eat. So be prepared to pay (somewhat) more. But you do get better quality of food. 2. They also serve Cantonese Dim Sum - and very...More
Shortly after arriving in Richmond, BC, my family and I read reviews on where the best hot pot place was. Garden City had the best reviews and the photos looked so good as well! We decided to give it a try. The location was not...More
we were here for lunch this week but had their hot pot dinner about a year ago. Lunch menu consist of Cantonese dim sum, rice, noodle and stir fired dishes. Great selections on all meat & seafood. You order your own selection of loose tea...More
As a family, we really enjoy going out for a hot pot dinner. We love coming to this place because there is a good variety of hot pot ingredients, and the meats, seafood and veggies are fresh. There is also a variety of broth to...More
Friends love this place with their fresh make dim sum or their special tea collections! And sitting comfortable, services always excellent & friendly .. love they change the menu every 3 months and their hot pot are great too
The food is really good and the soup was authentic. The service was fast and they offered us free dessert at the end which was a nice plus, however, the restaurant is pricey.
We went here for dim sum and were initially disappointed with the limited selection - about 30 items - but when the dishes arrived we understood why. This was primarily a Cantonese hot pot restaurant, but the dim sum dishes were freshly made to order...More
I hot pot a lot so it wasn't anything new to me but for those who don't do this often it is a very cool experience. Both kids and adults had a grand time just cooking their own food. They didn't have everything that we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4847597-Reviews-Garden_City_Hot_Pot-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
General Public,"I've been a customer at their original store (The Eatery) since the 1990's and recently started coming to this newer location as it's closer to home. Called in the afternoon to change our reservation time - no problem. When we showed up (10 min before...More
We went for dinner with local friends here. They highly recommended it to us. The inside decor is fun and eclectic and they had outdoor seating as well. They had a large amount of creative and delicious veggie rolls, which is not something I find...More
They try. Very hard. To present an interesting menu with (too?) many options with cute names (THE BARBIE ROLL, BOB MARLEY, CHARLIE TUNA). But in the end the sushi taste bland and weirdly flavourless. Sampling 1/2 dozen of their offerings leaves you wondering - what...More
Disappointing, to say the least. The decor is amusing, but we were looking for somewhere to eat, not an art gallery. I realize that my son and I showed up to dine on the hottest day of the year, but something was definitely wrong. The...More
We’ve driven by here a few times and it looked like a pub. What we thought was a bit weird was that there’s a sushi roll sign hanging outside of it. That struck us as very odd so we finally decided to give this a...More
Went with friends that live nearby. The decor was crazy fun. It was toys grouped together to make sculptures like a storm trooper or a Pokémon. Very cool. The venue was packed, and had great energy. There was a DJ playing some great tunes while...More
We have been twice and the food was very nice. However when we turned up this evening and asked for a table outside we got told it would be approximately 30 minutes. We were asked to be back within 20-30 minutes or they would give...More
We stayed down the road and this was recommended to us and was just fab. Really good sushi. Decent price (we experimented with the specials every night which knocked a bit off the bill). Cool atmosphere, probably too cool for us!
Really tasty, fresh sushi with great service!! They also have amazing vegetarian options which worked great for us as one of us that was visiting is a vegetarian!
Dropped in here during a eating and drinking stroll down main. Was really impressed with their sushi, some different ideas on show, and all very tasty. Nice beers also and our server was really nice. Will definitely be returning.
CAN WE BRAGGGGG ABOUT THIS PLACE FOR A SECOND. After you find parking its all uphill from there. The decor of this place is DECENT. It is unique and adds to your visit immediately. Then the servers look comfortable, they can dress their speed so...More
We were in Vancouver for a few days and our friend took us to this incredible restaurant with a terrific ambiance. The sushis were stunning.
Great sushi and reasonably priced with a handful of great craft beers on tap, I’d strongly recommend this place, it’s busy and if you are old it might get a little loud later in the night, they have a DJ!
We dined at General Public on two occasions and had takeouts on one further occasion. There is an extensive menu to choose from and we thoroughly enjoyed each occasion trying something different. The food was very good especially the sushi. Service was prompt and efficient...More
Went here two nights ago because I had heard how cool it was! Love Japanese food so thought we would give it a try. The food=terrible. We ordered scallops.. they came out a minute after ordering them. No joke, and they were still frozen in...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4787271-Reviews-General_Public-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gerard Lounge,"It took at least a full five minutes before my eyes got used to the darkness in this place. Almost eerie. Regardless, it seemed to have a really interesting and cool vibe. We enjoyed our nightcaps with a few regulars and out of country visitors....More
This is a small, dark lounge attached to Sutton Place hotel and accessed through Boulevard restaurant. Previously you could seat yourself but this has changed. We were able to get a table for 2 on a Friday night around 9 without reservations. The only unfortunate...More
It's a grand old public house, wood paneling and high-back chairs, even a fireplace. A comfortable and convivial place to meet and talk. Service was excellent, and the Happy Hour happy indeed.
Nice place for a nightcap, good service, although the repetitive techno rock on the stereo prevented us from lingering. Atmosphere is comfortable library/lounge, dark but appropriate. No loud drunks, but sports on the TV; I think the sound was off in deference to the ""music""...More
Was at Gerard Lounge recently for a few cocktails. Had a late dinner already planned at another venue and was looking to check out a place I hadn't been before that was somewhat nearby my dinner location. Was almost tempted to check out the new...More
Located in the Sutton Place Hotel on Burrard Street, this lounge is traditionally designed in the style of the early 20th Century. Dark wood paneling, large oil paintings on the wall and lots and lots of leather chairs and seating. We stopped in first at...More
This place reminds me of a hunting lodge pub. If I had ever been to a hunting lodge pub. Leather chairs and sofas, fireplace, all it needs are pictures of dogs and horses on teh walls. You can get the menu from the restaurant Boulevard...More
Great bar to stop in before heading out to dinner. The bar team is knowledgable and friendly. thank you!
Old world leather seating, good service and proper cocktails. Worth paying a bit more here for a drink to enjoy the classic cocktail vibe with proper service.
Ambience is cozy with the beautiful millwork and fireplace. Bartender Gavin is super knowledgeable, friendly and makes a mean cocktail! The candy bar is so much fun and all of the goodies are made in house 🤤Will defiantly be back!
It's a cozy little pub located in the Sutton Hotel, centrally located and close to the train station. It seems to be frequented mostly by hotel guests. We had a very good lunch--their mushroom risotto was excellent.
Excellent food menu, great burger and fries and wonderful shrimp cocktails.The staff are friendly and courteous and provide an excellent service. Nice mix of local people and tourist customers and intimate comfortable environment.
Vancouver was busting at the chops over Oct 19th, 2018, and I'm fairly sure most everyone was at Gerard's!! At least, it felt like that. Amazingly, the staff and facilities handled with finesse, fireplace ablaze and chit chat abounding ~~ Wonderful oysters, superb drinks and...More
Stopped by for a afternoon snack and tried the octopus. Good quality seafood and excellent lounge setting.
You can order from the lounge menu or from the main restaurant menu, we did both and food was excellent with very nice and fast service",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d704517-Reviews-Gerard_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Giardino Restaurant,"We dined a few weeks ago for a special Anniversary dinner and was seated by a large table. The head of that table vaped a sickenly sweet flavour and we were overwhelmed by the smell. We asked the waiter to please do something about it....More
We have been in touch with missm458 and have offered our sincere apologies. As well the person who was vaping has offered to personally apologize to missm458 but she has refused to accept the offer. I admit the law was breached and he should have...More
Remember dining at the Giardinos many years before. They were down the block then. The whole area is changed and is not recognizable. But our caby have no problem finding it. So this is a new location and a new built facility. Welcoming place. Little...More
Many locals and visitors claim this is the best Italian restaurant in Vancouver but I have to say I can't agree. The burrata was not as fresh as I have had at other places. It did not melt in your mouth and the tomatoes lacked...More
The food and the atmosphere were excellent. The staff was great as well. We ate here with friends, but it would also make an excellent choice for couples wanting a nice romantic evening.
Fine Italian dining at its best. We enjoyed the carpaccio of beef tenderloin and diced pacific ahi tuna to start. Seafood pasta and gnocchi next and finally dessert which I sadly forgot what it was. It was all delicious and fantastic service as always.
We have dined at Giardino many times, our last experience was exceptional. The food was expertly prepared and presented, full of flavor and thoroughly enjoyed. Service was attentive, without being too over bearing. It is always a treat to be in such a warm, beautiful...More
After exploring a lot of Vancouver foods, Giardino has made it to our top 5's! For Italian food which we love, this is definitely our favourite spot. The atmosphere in this restaurant is amazing. It's warm, it's cozy and beautiful. The service was impeccable. Our...More
We had a family dinner there with a small kid , restaurant service is great , accommodating for small kid and food quanlify is good too. Worth to go .
We love Giardino…Everything is superb from the first Greeting to the last Desert.I especially want to mention Trish. Trish is a Gem. She is warm, welcoming, and efficient. She has the gift of nuanced savour faire. I am always impressed and grateful ,as, these first...More
Fabulous Italian cuisine. The owner was walking the floor, introducing himself and welcoming patrons. A friend booked our group, as we learned that one must reserve a table as much as 2 months in advance.
I love this place although it is expensive and I can only justify for a celebration. It was our birthday (my husband and me both) so we figured we deserved it. Had a fabulous meal outside on their lovely very Italian feeling patio. Shared a...More
Reviews are accurate. Service is really bad here and by that I mean very little answers in the way of simple questions which to me is basic. “What’s good here?” shouldn’t be met with “all of it” and nothing else on a menu of 30+...More
If I had more information about your evening; for example, what night you were there, where were you sitting, perhaps even the server’s name. That would be helpful to zero in and correct this. We are a very busy restaurant . That’s no excuse for...More
This is probably the worst experience that we've had dining out... Started at the hostess, we came in to join our friends - the blonde middle aged hostess was incredibly cold for no apparent reason. We get it that people have off days but most...More
We went as we just moved next door to them and we wanted to support local business and we loved the place before ! BUT all I can say is that I end up disappointed …… 1 - The hostess addressed us with a cold...More
The waiter / foods was all great but the hostess has an attitude. I am not sure if anyone wants to get bad service when we pay big money. I would not recommend to go there for special occasions because she ruined our dinner and...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8492714-Reviews-Giardino_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ginger Indian Cuisine,"We were seated very quickly and the order was taken. The food arrived very shortly. We ordered Chana Masala, Aaloo Gobhi & Matar Paneer with Naan and rice. Everything was delicious. Good ambience. I would recommend this eatery.
It is the time again for our family once a month's get together Lunch /dinner , my sister's choose the Ginger Indian restaurant for dinner , and is located in Garden City shopping center , lot of free parking , the decor very classy and...More
An extremely mediocre food experience. We have ordered take out a few times and there is nothing authentic, enjoyable about the food. From the taste of their curries, it seems its mostly tailored for non East Indian people who don’t know about real taste of...More
From what I understand from all the Indian cab drivers, the best Indian food is over in Surry. This may be the case but it's not worth the $50 to $75 cab ride it would take to get there from the airport. I found Ginger...More
Have come here quite a few times for lunch and dinner. Their curries are delicious and their lunch/dinner specials are sooo worth it! Lots of food for a fantastic price. Good service and good food!
My son and I checked out this place for the first time and were impressed with the entire experience. The service was refreshingly pleasant and down-to-earth, while not a single food item disappointed.
I really enjoy their Curry and Naan, I usually order the Garlic Naan which is made fresh and with perfect balance of Garlic and herbs! Their Tandoori Chicken is also a must order, tender and succulent, again I find the spice level here to be...More
It was my wife's Birthday dinner. Some of the vegetarian dishes were specially made on our request. We could get it cooked without garlic and onion with prior request/ order. The taste was very good. The service was nice. Paneer tikka was awesome as starter.
Went there 2 weeks ago for bday dinner with friends. Palak paneer (pureed spinach with cheese) is my all time fav. This time the dish was not as spicy as the 1st time I've ordered it. Also had fish, veg and chicken pakora. Not too...More
Not so great. Below average taste and food quality for what they charge. So called Chicken in Methi leaves had no methi leaves in it. Basically was chicken masala. Portions were also little smaller when comparing to other Indian restaurants in the same price range....More
15$ avg for dish, mostly are small serving but good to feed two people. They no longer accept the entertainment book coupon. The taste of curry chicken and biriyani was good.
We returned to Ginger Indian after being away from Canada for a few weeks. This is the location at Francis and Blundell. The Beckman Place location closed some time ago, although there is still a coupon in the Entertainment Book for 2019. Our meal was...More
Stopped here after staying the night in Richmond, the food was delicious. Matter paneer was nicely spiced, butter lamb was extremely tender, and garlic naan was fresh and so tasty!! For randomly stopping here, we were very happy. Baby friendly which was nice too! Definitely...More
The food at this supberb restaurant is absolutely delicious and service was supreme the employees were so friendly and prompt and we spoke to thank the owner who was so friendly professional and willing to talk to us I love this place as does my...More
Excellent food, rich sauces, and fresh ingredients. One of my all-time favorites for Indian food. And very nice and friendly staff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d12926563-Reviews-Ginger_Indian_Cuisine-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Ginger Sushi,"We love this place! We stumbled upon this gem 2 years ago in a trip to Vancouver and were bound and determined to visit it again this time around— awesome, hole in the wall restaurant. Very minimal seating — largest table can seat 4. The...More
Just got home from an absolutely amazing meal here so had to write a review straight away!! Found this place via google and we were not disappointed, very casual dining spot with only a few tables, so worth it!! We had Takoyaki, gyoza, the dragon...More
This tiny sushi joint on Commercial Drive offers very good sushi, particularly the Under-the-Sea rolls with scallops. Highly recommended.
Ran in here on a friends recommendation. Very friendly energetic staff. Make sure to try the sauce that comes with Yam tempura. I'm pretty sure you are not supposed to make any drug related comparison on Trip Advisor but it would be appropriate to say...More
Price is right, product is delicious, restaurant is lovely and service is spot on! Will be back for sure
I came in for the affordable sushi. I was REALLY pleasantly surprised that it was so delicious at that price. The staff were so friendly and the atmosphere is relaxed. I love the Polaroids of customers on the wall. Lovely place to eat and chill.
The sushi rolls were great, decent prices. The chefs worked a bit late to prepare the rolls. Cream cheese roll was very good, as was salmon roll. Even though to go, service was very helpful.
Cozy sushi restaurant with fresh sushi. I've been here several times and this time around we ordered salmon sashimi, assorted tempura, caterpillar role, and the Mexican role. The rolls and sushi was fresh and the highlight of the dinner was the caterpillar and Mexican roles,...More
This place is amazing!! The people who work there are super friendly and really nice and the food is fantastic!! Its so fresh and delicious. We go here every week and everything weve tried has been great, although we always go back to the sushi...More
I have to say that I can eat all range of sushi varieties and they would all taste the same. However, the sushi at this place tastes genuine. The presentation of the plates is awesome and the taste is magnificent. The waiter, Chris was friendly...More
I wanted something different from the usual take out options on the drive, so I decided to try Ginger Sushi. The place was empty when I arrived. I opted for the Sashimi Sushi box for take out. The inside was very clean and cozy. After...More
With three sushi restaurants in a row it can be tough to decide but I COMPEL you to go to Ginger Sushi! A small little nook in the wall but exceptional. Service was great and the chef is super friendly and the sushi was mindblowing!...More
Ginger Sushi has friendly owners with one of the better Sushi's selections on the Drive. Good fair prices!
I have been on a mission lately: find a good, reliable sushi place on Commercial Drive. Ginger Sushi offers an intimate little space that is welcoming and interestingly decorated. The textured rice paper walls are attractive, imparting a sense of the casual, genuine exotic, rather...More
A little place, it was busy for dinner so we tried it. Nice place, clearly loved by locals (see chopsticks with names lining the wall, which is nice). Service was slow, the food was ok. Decent value but not great, focused on rolls and bento,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1082623-Reviews-Ginger_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Giovane Caffé,"Bought a couple of paninis for lunch and two drinks......apart from the fact that the sandwiches were overpriced...the sandwiches were terribly soggy...the Roast beef sandwich bread was slightly bloodied fro mther meat...the veg sandwich was mediocre at best....gotta be honest I expected more for a...More
We were staying at Fairmont during 7 days and came to Bacaro restaurant a few times ! We almost tried everything on n the menu ! Fantastic food from starters , to mains and desserts ( tiramisu and donuts (with lemon cream)) a killing !!...More
The baked goods are very fresh and I love their coffees! Make sure you take one to go. It's well worth it. Their baked scones are also wonderful
We walked into the restaurant not knowing what to expect. The food was absolutely delicious! Our favourite dish was the seafood linguine- the mussels were so flavourful! The prociutto and fig plate was a close second. The plates are small and everything is meant to...More
We stopped by Giovane around lunch time on a rainy day. The staff was good, the sandwich were good and we had a warm cosy place to figure out our next visit. Although they had run out of our first choice, the sandwich were warm...More
This may sound weird, but Giovane held a special place in my heart. I came here for coffee or breakfast almost every single day for the past 3 years, and I have nothing but praises for the quality of food, friendliness of the staff, and...More
Giovane + Eatery + Market is the only place at the Fairmont Pacific Rim still serving food, of course takeout only. It is open, serving delicious food from 6 a.m to 8 p.m., from a limited menu, which includes coffees, pastries, & a changing daily...More
We ate lunch here prior to a scenic flight on a seaplane. It was very good. We shared a fennel and sausage pizza and a spinach salad. It was great value and very fresh and tasty. Links to the Fairmont hotel so make a nice...More
Dear Jenny, We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are glad to learn that you especially enjoyed our pizza and salad. We hope we can welcome you back again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager,...More
I love this place is open, clean, I love the concept, the staff is always kind and happy to serve you, they always have fresh and natural flowers on the tables, your lattes as perfect as always and variety in their sweeteners haha it’s because...More
Dear Jonathan, We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are glad to learn that you especially enjoyed our lattes. We hope we can welcome you back again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager, giovane café...More
The best pizza, truffle mushroom was my absolute favourite!!! Went back for cappuccino and lemon meringue I would highly recommend their coffee shop also. We will definitely make this part of the routine when working at the Shaw tower.More
Dear Stacey, We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are glad to learn that you especially enjoyed our Truffle Mushroom pizza. We hope we can welcome you back again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager,...More
Best coffee we have had on our travels in Canada. Coffee was made with care, with excellent crema and perfect milk. Pizza was excellentMore
We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are glad to learn that you especially enjoyed our coffee and pizza. We hope we can welcome you back again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager, giovane café...More
Great food reasonably priced, they offer take out containers in an area close to Canada Place or my hotel room. I like they are a few steps to Pacific Rim Fairmont lobby.More
We are glad to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are delighted to learn that you especially enjoyed our menu offerings. We hope we can welcome you back again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager, giovane café + eatery...More
great selection of coffee, pressed juice, lunch and breakfast items. the curated market has very interesting and high quality items for sale. Great place to grab a quick coffee/ breakfast
Thank you for taking the time to share your experience and rate us five stars. We look forward to welcoming you back to giovane café + eatery + market again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager, giovane café + eatery + market
I had the salmon quinoa bowl, which was delicious as well as a healthy choice. The place is unostentatious with good light. Popular. Service was friendly and relatively fast, considering. Perfect for breakfast, lunch.More
Thank you for you kind compliments on TripAdvisor; we sincerely appreciate it. We are pleased to hear that you enjoyed your experience with us and we look forward to welcoming you back to giovane café + eatery + market again soon! Sincerely, Laura Benso Manager,...More
We are currently traveling through the West of Vancouver. We arrived in Vancouver the day before after a long trip from Switzerland to Canada. The time difference is 9 hours and we woke up very early. We found this place in Trip Advisor. They open...More
We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience at giovane café + eatery + market. We are glad to learn that you especially enjoyed our breakfast selections. We hope we can welcome you back again in your next trip to Vancouver! Sincerely, Laura...More",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2138858-Reviews-Giovane_Caffe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Globe@YVR,"I went with a friend for afternoon tea. The whole experience was terrible. The food obviously had been frozen and was not at the standard I would expect at a fairmont hotel. I have been before ( pre pandemic) and the standard was much better....More
We enjoyed dinner here during our night staying at the Fairmont. The menu had wonderful choices and the food was well presented and absolutely delicious. The service was amazing and the atmosphere relaxed and comfortable
Restaurant is just beside at airport,part of fairmont, lovely ambiance,excellent service and our salmon benny was to perfection.
We were expecting so much more and were disappointed. The service was very slow and the portions were small for the price. The food was good however and the setting is nice.
Our dinner at Globe was underwhelming and quite expensive. The food came out at different intervals and the kids meals took so long. Our mains were fine but I don’t feel the need to ever return. We’ll eat in the airport next time we stay...More
We are from Vancouver and drove to the airport to meet family that were on a 5 hour layover for breakfast on Saturday morning Feb 25 at 8:00. We were asked by the host for our room number. We said we were not guests of...More
The food is great but the service is so slow, it is not enjoyable. And this was on a Sunday night! Not recommended and very expensive.
Wow! Great experience…been coming here drinks it opened over a decade ago. Thank you servers Ben, Jade & Sophie , and hostess Joanna who were all friendly, fun and lovely. Order the bannock tartin…it’s great and goes to a good cause. I will be back...More
Overnighting at the Fairmont before connecting in the morning, I was looking forward to the ""fresh, seasonal"" choices. Surely, this would include some great fresh seafood! The first disappointment: the menu was very limited, six entrees in total, only three that were seafood. Halibut, trout,...More
The restaurant has a lively atmosphere with good views over the airport. The menu is reasonable though not that extensive. We found that the preparation of the food lacked understanding of how flavours blended together and as a result the meal was either tasteless or...More
We were seated promptly at our reservation time. Josh our server was fantastic, very personable and knowledgeable about menu items. We split the local Spot Prawns appetizer, amazing. We both had the Hand- Cut Pappardelle, top notch in flavour and freshness.
After a strenuous drive from Seattle to catch a flight back from Vancouver to Chicago - staff, service, and food were impeccable - it felt home away from home.
Best thing about YVR Airport is this lounge in the Fairmont Hotel. Beautiful views, outstanding service, good bar. When I am finished a business trip it’s a little slice of heaven to not have to wait in a food court and feel like I’m in...More
We made a phone reservation for an afternoon tea at the YVR Fairmont to celebrate Easter. There was a lot of excitement especially since we had a fantastic high tea experience at the Fairmont Empress just a few weeks before. I'm sad to report that...More
The service was very friendly but the meal took 2 hours to get and wasn’t even very good. Could have Uber Eats’d McDonalds and would have been better. And faster.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d17392121-Reviews-Globe_YVR-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Glowbal,"Food and atmosphere were great. Steak was very good. Martin was exceptional and made the meal and experience even beytter.
Despot is great, for, in between meals, or a full meal as you prefer. Cecilia, was incredibly gracious and helpful. She really took great care of me.
Celebrated our post wedding anniversary with their happy hour menu and we were full! Our waiter was very warm, attentive and served us with gusto! We were surprised to be given each a Prosecco bubbly for free to add to our celebration, so sweet! The...More
Best food!! We wee fully enjoying food and service. It was amazing experience. We will be back. Server was amazing too
From start to finish, a totally excellent experience. The steak tartare was a wonderful start, and both the lobster and the duck entrees were done to perfection. And as a grand finale, the chocolate cherry lava cake was a perfect ending to an exceptional meal....More
We like to eat early by European standards and took advantage of happy hour to provide starters and pre-dinner drinks. Dry-aged duck breast (described as confit which is unusual for duck breast) and sweet corn risotto were both good choices.
Though the food was overpriced and tasteless. I order the mixed seafood pasta with lobster, prawns, and shrimp. It can with a sliver of lobster, and the prawns you need a microscope to find them. The dish was bland and tasteless. the restaurant seemed more...More
We had an amazing time thanks to Adam. Our waiter was very caring and attentive. He made my husband's birthday and our 20 years wedding anniversary very special! Thank you Adam!!!🙏
Ate here as our last meal of an Alaska/Vancouver trip. Saved the best for last, perfect ending of a great trip. The atmosphere at the restaurant is very sophisticated and romantic. Ordered the red sangria which was fruity without being overly sweet. We started with...More
Fabulous night! Adam looked after us from beginning to end with wonderful attentive service and really accurate descriptions of items we needed explained. He was spot on and we enjoyed every mouthful of our three courses. What a great experience for our night out and...More
Had a fabulous dinner here. From the moment I arrived , I was greeted by name which I was very surprised. The staff was friendly and the food was all cooked to perfection. Ordered a tomahawk steak and was done to exactly the way we...More
Very convenient location for a business lunch or dinner. Great service of a high-end restaurant but found the dishes are not meeting the high-end restaurant quality. Little too pricey.
Hi Kyokot505, Thank you for taking the time to post your review. We are glad the service was on point during your visit. We will certainly address your comments with the culinary team. Thank you again for your valuable feedback, it is appreciated!
Our server tonight was Vicky. She was a big help with the wine and food selection. Best ever-she made the evening so very special for us.
I came here with my girlfriend for our 2 year anniversary, and it was such a memorable experience. Ben Marshall was our server, and he went above and beyond to make our anniversary the best that it could be. His attitude was exemplary, and his...More
The food and the service were amazing but in a lapse of 15 minutes we saw at least 3 mice running in the patio, they told us to move inside and that it’s normal to see them in the patio, it was an unpleasant experience.More
Hi 684Juanpablov, Thank you for taking the time send us your review. We are glad to see you enjoyed the food and service but were distracted by outdoor elements beyond our control. It certainly is ""not normal"" but can happen from time to time being...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8653602-Reviews-Glowbal-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gojo Cafe,"Read on trip advisor and then was in the vicinity and said let's give it a try and Boy am I glad I did. The lamb and chicken tibs (as they call it) served on a Injera (a roti type made out of special grains...More
Food is so delicious and the atmosphere is lovely. The service was very friendly and understanding of the fact that we were new to Ethiopian food. Don't be afraid to try something new! :)
I ate in many places this kind of food but this one is my favourite... I loved It thanks to ATKlLT For the great service
Gojo is one little gem of a restaurant that is well worth finding. Look for its tiny storefront along the east side of Commercial Drive, just south of 12th. A very welcoming and comfortable little place with interesting, appetizing and probably unfamiliar food. Don't let...More
First time trying Ethiopian food and wow, what a great first impression. I had the fish house special and the cubed stewed beef with spices, both were delicious! The prices are very reasonable and the portions are massive! I'll definitely be returning. The service and...More
I never feel more welcome in a restaurant in Vancouver than I do at Gojo. Food is great. Service is great. It's homey. It's awesome!
This family-run cafe serves the BEST Ethiopian food in the city. The village atmosphere is cute, the service is always personable and attentive, and I never want to stop eating because everything tastes SO GOOD, every single time. If you've never eaten Ethiopian food, the...More
Gojo is a fabulous addition to the limited number of Ethiopian and Eritrean establishments on the east side. The food is impeccable, as is the service, although it is not clear as what the establishment's prospects will be in this relatively off-beat location on the...More
Had a wonderful time and enjoyed the food. Great ethiopian taste. Try out ""lega tibs"" that was my favorite one.
Not the fanciest place, but the food was excellent. We had a combination of veggie and fish. Nice combination of spices. It was my friends first time having Ethiopoan food, and she loved it also. I will definitely return.
Four of us visited Gojo for a late dinner (about 9pm) whilst on holiday in Vancouver. We had spotted it a few days before so thought we'd give it a try. We hadn't eaten Ethiopian food before so we didn't really know what to expect...More
Did not really know what to expect, staff went above and beyond to make us feel welcome. Food was amazing will definitely go back!!
I walked past this restaurant for years always meaning to give it a try. Well I finally did and all I can say is that I wish I had gone sooner! Amazing food, so flavorful and delicious! Having never tried Ethiopian food, we asked for...More
We are four who have decided to explore the ethnic restaurants of Vancouver BC. Our first foray was a winner. I was given the honour of the first pick and I chose Gojo Cafe on Commercial Dr. It was excellent. We picked a lunchtime outing...More
We have gone to Gojo a number of times as it is one of our favourite spots. The food here is authentic, made on premise and so full of flavour. The cook uses rich spices which brings on into the exotic nature of this food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1007576-Reviews-Gojo_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Golden Paramount Seafood Restaurant,"Always nice to gather with a group of friends over a nice meal. The service and food is very good. Parking is onsite but you have to loop a few levels unless you get there early.
Excellent Chinese seafood restaurant Tasty ginger fish with the meat cooked just right. Nice steak dish and excellent papaya soup Taiwanese broccoli is cooked crunchy.
Dim sum was very good. Tried our favorites: har gow (steamed shrimp dumplings), beef cheung fun (beef in rice rolls), shrimp cheung fun (shrimp in rice rolls), bean curd wrapped beef balls, etc. I requested a pan fried crispy noodle dish with beef brisket. They...More
I was searching for the best lunch spots in Vancouver and this restaurant pulled up in an article of 38 best places for lunch. The dim sum here is so so!! I was terribly disappointed. There are so many dim sum places in Richmond to...More
I have been here several times. Reliable food. For banquet style meals and ordered a la carte. Attended with a large party so we tried many very good items. There is limited free parking otherwise on a busy night you must find pay street parking...More
My wife and I needed a quick dim sum breakfast on the way out of Vancouver on a Friday morning. Found some positive reviews and had the GPS guide us to the nondescript location of Paramount Seafood. Ordered the special crab/pork dumplings, shrimp dumplings, bbq...More
We were part of a private dinner party in one of the rooms. It was a feast of many courses. The food was fairly well done and good service considering many tables to be served basically at the same time.
We arrived for a a dim sum lunch on a Monday afternoon. You can park in the adjacent garage for free. We were offered a plate of 3 barbecued pork-filled bao as well as a plate of 4 egg tarts. Of course, we'd take them...More
Golden Paramount Seafood Restaurant (I know, the name sounds just like all of the other Chinese restaurants) recently moved from a small strip mall into a brick building next door. The layout and the building itself is a bit confusing as we had a bit...More
Richmond was a good 25mins by SkyTrain from downtown Vancouver and lucky for us, the restaurant was worth the trip. It is interesting to note that once we strike up a conversation with the manager, he was quite forthcoming to tell us that they are...More
We took a 20 minute trip on a Skytrain from downtown and we went down to the neighboring city of Richmond. We went to Golden Paramount Seafood restaurant and got treated to some of the best Asian food in the world. Here we enjoyed steamed...More
Best dimsum in North America. Featured in new York times article. Order the house special dumpling. Tea is mild. Very clean and nice decor at this location. Takes debit and credit. Ironically they won an award for best sweet and sour pork. Enjoy.
Relocated to the current address, first impression is that the interior of the restaurant is very odd and not comfortable at all, upon entrance you will find a small room with a dozen or so small tables and I thought that was it!? Then you...More
Steamed cod fish at $50/lb, lobsters on noodles was $35/lb. Lobster noodle dish was good but all the others dishes were small potions & just normal. Will not be going back for dinner again.
Great for Dim Sum. Just awaiting for their new location to open again. They have a few dishes that other restaurant do not serve. Cannot wait but ii fear parking will be a problem!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2696695-Reviews-Golden_Paramount_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Golden Swan Restaurant,"We enjoyed a broad selection of items. The service was very good. This dishes are of a good size too. We had way too much food but welcome the leftovers. Limited parking on site so just find street parking on the main or side street.
I hadn’t been here in decades until recently. We were here for a special occasion. This review is based on a pre-set luncheon. We started with a cold pate of jelly fish & BBQ pork, shark fin soup, soft tofu & mushroom dish, lobster, chicken,...More
Each piece of dim sum is fairly a good size portion. They have the push cart service which is nice to really see what you want to try.
We came here for a large gathering and ordered the 7 course set menu. Everything was really good, and the service was friendly. They do close down between lunch and dinner. Limited parking on their plaza else plenty of street parking.
We have been to the Golden Swan many times for dim sum and a few for dinner and felt a review was appropriate. During Covid they were very good about hygiene and vaccination protocols; now a bit more loose but still felt comfortable with most...More
Got seated at 12:00 noon our order was not placed until 12:25 that’s twenty five minutes after our order was given to the staff. Not to mention with COVID protocols in place they had people standing next to a table eating the food was good...More
Wow ,it is been so long since my last visit ,Father in Laws birthday , he want to go to Golden Swan for dim sum ,this restaurant been in neighbourhood well over 30 years and same owner ,they also have a second location at west...More
Glad to see the dining room has re-opened. Tables are well spaced and food quality is same as before... at a reasonable price. Really enjoyed a great dinner after staying home for the past few months.
We were looking for a little more upscale dim sum experience and remembered our earlier visits with the family to this lovely and large restaurant. The staff as ever was very nice and forthcoming and the food was out quickly. We also enjoyed to go...More
We have been here for many times since we really enjoy eating at this restaurant with family and friends. There are lots of delicious food to choose. Highly recommend !!!
This is always a go-to chinese restaurant for our family as it’s in East Vancouver near my mother’s place and offer decent traditional chinese food. It can get very busy and noisy during busy times as ceiling is low. Food dishes prices are reasonable for...More
Very good food , we had a nice time in the restaurant , i would recommended to eat delicious Asian food.
We were there for dim sum on Monday. This neighborhood restaurant still the same after more than 30 years. The dim sum were above average, but portions were large. The price is a little more than other dim sum restaurants. They have many regular customers....More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew golden swan restaurant . I tried this place for some dim sum, a recommendation from a friend. It has some really good pork dumplings, very tender with excellent texture. Shrimp dumplings are fine, as are the deep fried...More
Fairly big restaurant on Victoria street. Usually full at lunch time, which says that food is most likely good. And it is. Good Dim Sum, reasonable prices.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4854134-Reviews-Golden_Swan_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gotham Steakhouse & Cocktail Bar,"For those who know this is Comparable with Goodmans and Smith & Wollensky in London. It is a bit pricey but the food and wine was excellent. Also the sommelier advised on some really good white and red Canadian wines. The Porterhouse for two was...More
Gotham fits the bill for amazing food, a beautiful ambiance, and superb service. Though the steak is said to be the main attraction here, my husband and I chose to get the lamb and it was by far the best lamb chops we both have...More
Great atmosphere to meet up with friends. They have a nice selection of food and drink options. Better place in the summer to take advantage of their patio.
Fantastic cocktail bar. The lounge menu snacks were of fine dinning standards. We enjoyed the steak and prawn skewers, black and blue tuna and short rib sliders. The staff were super friendly, what a lovely experience. Definitely keen to come back and try the restaurant!
First time in Vancouver after a long flight from SoCal! TripAdvisor led me straight once again. Amazing meal and atmosphere ! For starters one of the best crab cakes I have ever had. East to west coast US, nothing beats is. The steak and mashed...More
Carnivores rejoice! Gotham offers a superlative dining experience in an intimate setting matched by the outstanding quality of the food. Here are my 3 rules for Gotham. 1. Start with the cheese toast - ok, it’s not gluten free (my wife is a coeliac so...More
According to the people that went there with me, they had one of the best steak of their live and I believe them. I myself not a meat eater so I chose the soup of the day (mushroom) and other non meat dishes, and I...More
When planning a special evening out, service is part of the consideration. Gotham missed on service in many ways and food in some ways as well. The restaurant was out of bone in rib-eye steak as well as porterhouse steaks and we were not told...More
Really a great spot to gather with friends to enjoy some libations and food. Several really good food offerings. This time I tried their caesar salad and also steak & prawn combo skewers which were very flavourful. Very good service too.
We had visited Gotham for cocktails several years ago, and we promised ourselves that we would dine there the next time we were in Vancouver. COVID kept us away longer than we expected, but It was well worth the wait. Our reservation was at 5:00...More
First off, server to server, James was absolutely AMAZING. He introduced my new favourite Pinot Noir to pair with our amazing Wagyu/Steak and lobster dinner. One thing I must add, I got the cheese toast as an ""easy Appy"". There's nothing easy about it... This...More
We enjoyed our experience at Gotham with a nice dining atmosphere and great service. The reason for the average review is we had a good steak but not at all matching the incredibly steep prices. We went for steak again the next night and enjoyed...More
Old steakhouse charm with classy touches. Beautiful bar area. Excellent classic guitar player with music heard throughout. We sat in a both upstairs and we felt it was a very private dining experience. We have high expectations on food and service and this is what...More
Definitely come here 3-5pm. Nice patio option or inside the lounge if no room outside. Music background was upbeat but not loud. Several happy hour food and drinks specials from their lounge menu. Great service, you felt well taken care of. I came twice with...More
Some of the finest steaks I've ever enjoyed. The bone-in Ribeye and filet were epic. If you read nothing more in this review, know that the steak was fantastic. And I LOVE steak. Ok...so the room is beautiful. Very classy and upscale without excess pretense....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d685015-Reviews-Gotham_Steakhouse_Cocktail_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Grade A Steaks & Seafoods Restaurant,"After 2.5 years of no travel (pandemic!), an opportunity presented itself to visit Vancouver for the Rugby 7’s tournament. Visited Grade A, after a recommendation from a local. Good food, hard working, cheerful staff and excellent value for money. Many regulars were greeted by first...More
There is nothing fancy about this restaurant but the food is excellent. The service is friendly and the staff hard-working. Menu ranges from breakfast to full course meals. There isn't a time cut-off for breakfast. The food is not only good but the portions are...More
That was a bit of a surprise as I was planning to use my corporate card, and no one had said anything ahead of time. There's one small sign near the register, but you can't see it until you're already inside. Get with the times!...More
When discussing the Grade A I always say I would never take my girl here on a first date. It is very old fashioned diner,,formica top tables, menu on the wall etc. However the food is good...huge portion of fish and chips for $8.50 including...More
I've known the Chow family since the mid 80's when both Gary and his brother Ken did all the cooking. Those were the days when the deal of the day was 222 (2 eggs, 2 bacon or ham or sausage) and 2 pancakes for under...More
The Chow family has established and operated this restaurant for over 3 decades. Their feature breakfast was the 2-2-2 which initially sold for under $3.00 (of course one would expect to pay more today). The premises are essentially greasy spoon (a dive) but the housekeeping...More
The food is good and everybody knows your name the breakfast is are the best and affordable so it's the wrong tone soup
Gary, Ken and Gail (siblings) have owned and operated this cafe since just before Expo 86 (1986) that I can recall. The meals always arrived hot and tasty, and the prices very reasonable. Since day one regular patrons were always treated to a meal during...More
I walked into this restaurant on a whim about 7 years ago and haven't stopped going back. The lady that runs the place knows everyone by name and if she doesn't know your name, she will by the end. A very friendly family owned establishment...More
Was staying in the Howard Johnson and needed a cup of tea upon waking. This place satisfied the need for C$1.50. Friendly service, good tea and a great price. Recommended for itinerant Brits like me.
We visited this family restaurant to enjoy breakfast and to refresh our friendship with co-owner Gary. Gary reminded me that the family has been in business for 32 years and over the 3 decades the prices have increased three fold. Even at that the price...More
While I admit it's not much to look at, we decided to give it a try for breakfast based on the mostly positive comments about the food. When we arrived at around 9:30am, there was 10-12 other quests. It was obvious that the other quests...More
By real food, of course I'm speaking of quality and quantity. They offer an all American menu with all the classics (I personally enjoyed breakfast and lunch meals at this place) as well as a Chinese food menu. Although it looks like a quaint little...More
Walk by this place a few times before I manage to try it. A old style greasy spoon for the locals. Must be one of the best kept secrets. Try their breakfast with eggs and bacon, instead of toast - had two pancakes instead -...More
I first visited this establishment about 10 years ago when I was staying in the Howard Johnson Hotel directly opposite on Granville Street. At that time I usually went for breakfast. On my recent visit to Vancouver breakfast was provided in my hotel and therefore...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2216396-Reviews-Grade_A_Steaks_Seafoods_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Grain Tasting Bar,"My friend and I always dine-in at the Grain when we stay at the Hyatt Regency. Foods’ great and refreshing drinks. Service is amazing.
Arrived to check in to hotel after a long flight and chose Grain for food and drinks and wasn't disappointed. It was busy with the Friday evening post work group but food was fantastic and the waiters know their drinks! would recommend.
Visited as we were staying at Hyatt. Nobody greeted us at the door and there was no sign so we seated ourselves. No one came to greet us us at the table or take our order and the waitresses were standing around doing nothing even...More
Domi, our waitress was exceptional and very knowledgable and friendly. The drinks were the best we had the whole night. Domi also gave us the inside scoop on what to do in Vancouver
Loved it so much we went back. The service, food and drink are great. We even pushed the boat out and had chocolate cake on day 2, dreamy ...
Great place to hang out and have a beer or a drink. We visited it a couple of times during out stay in Vancouver.
Friendly staff, good snacks and finger food, great flatbread, large selection of beers, open balcony. Recommended.
I stopped in after shopping here as I was a hotel guest. There was a mix crowd of young and older. The staff was wonderful as I was solo. As I was tired I did not want to go to a restaurant. This was perfect.
really good place to unwind after work, staff nice, they know their cocktails, comfortable seating. central location make it an easy meeting spot.
Came here for a business lunch. Lunch menu is pretty limited - choices seemed to be between a few salads and sandwiches. Also, seemed pretty expensive (~$20 for salads with a little protein). So, a good choice, but nothing special.
Great time! Watched the NFL Thursday night football game. The T.V.s are too small. We sat at a booth with our own T.V. but hard to watch. The food was good. Had the flat bread pizza. Drinks were good. Service was good. Several places for...More
The lychee martini is a beautiful vodka cocktail. This is exotic, sweet, and fruity! So refreshing on a warm summer night.
We had about an hour between when we arrived at Grain and when we had to be at our 1pm meeting. We found a seat in the semi open aired restaurant and started to think we may run out of time. Our server was busy...More
Nice spot of lobby for Happy Hour every day. Can sit by window to people watch. Big area. Reasonable drinks & beer & wine.
The Grain Tasting Bar is a good place for a business meeting or relaxing evening drink. Great drink selection and tasty bites to eat.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3574799-Reviews-Grain_Tasting_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Grapes and Soda,"Dropped into G&S one evening for pre-dinner drinks based on its rep as being named Van's favorite bar. It is small, it is loud(ish) but it is wonderfully unique in it's cocktail program and it's food offerings. We did not eat so I cannot comment...More
By far the most imaginative cocktails and best selection of spirits we experienced on our trip to Vancouver. My girlfriend and I made the mission to grapes and soda upon many recommendations and were richly rewarded by getting a seat at the bar (go early...More
My wife and I have developed a great liking of cocktails. Hong Kong, Bangkok, Taipei, we have had some well-thought well developed ones, and some very ordinary ones. Grapes and Soda certainly belongs on my well respected cocktail bar list. The space is operated by...More
The seasonal menu means fresh local ingredients and this restaurant knows how to please and tantalize my taste expectations... you only need to enter the restaurant to know you made a very good choice..the staff are so warm and friendly and the food met my...More
This is why Vancouver is starting to get onto the ""cool"" map. This place is intimate, with exceptional service, and really interesting dishes that maximize the use of local ingredients to produce really outstanding plates. I go for happy hour here at least twice a...More
Wonderful place for amazing cocktails, vast wine list, craft beer AND delicious fresh Pacific Northwest cuisine. Comfortable and cozy setting with outstanding customer service. If only happy hour started earlier....
I've had the privilege of eating here twice - one with four people and once with six. The wait was tolerable both times, but not that there isn't a lot of options of places to go or stand if your table isn't immediately available. Both...More
More on that later. The food was ok. Nothing to write home about or make an interesting IG story. Not even really tapas. The plates were almost too small to share. We sat at the back near the kitchen and washroom and my clothes and...More
New York/Paris style restaurant with ten tables and seating at the bar. Its cozy, the staff is very nice and accommodating!! The food is fabulous! Great selection of drinks...their own creations? Loved the experience!
While the service is fantastic - the hospitality is un-matched! Grapes and Soda is a true west side Vancouver treasure. The food is delicious and the cocktails are creative, balanced and immaculately executed. If you have never been before make sure you stop by for...More
We went for happy hour and the prices were amazing and you have to try the smoked olives. Absolutely the best olives I've ever had in my entire life. And the other unbelievable thing that we had was the squid. It is also to die...More
I love this place and all our friends do too! We've been going here for several months and it never ceases to amaze! The food is delicious - part of the true ""slow food"" movement. They forage and source food locally, and the chefs in...More
We arrived just before the end of Happy Hour and ordered one of each, real bargains at $10 and $12 and the best we have had for a long while, irrespective of price. The wines are a bit different but eventually got to one I...More
And when I say little, it is. 28 seats or so, but very well laid out where you aren't constantly being bumped into when seated at the bar. We only came for a couple nibbles and a glass of wine. The ambiance is cozy, kind...More
Grapes & Soda is Vancouver's first natural wine and cocktail bar. Opened by Chef David Gunawan and Dara Young at Farmer's Apprentice, Grapes and Soda which features natural, organic and biodynamic wines and artisanal cocktails paired with seasonally inspired small plates. Grapes and Soda is...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8336390-Reviews-Grapes_and_Soda-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Green Basil,"If you like salt and more salt in your food this is the place to go. I’ve burnt my palate on the vegetables dish I ordered. It was not spicy as promised but way too generous on salt. The texture and flavour were not even...More
We shared 5 dishes, all delicious! We were able to say how spicy we wanted each dish and that worked perfectly. Attentive service without being obtrusive!
This place has excellent food. We always come here for family dinners. The curries are all really delicious but the best one is the green curry. They have nice fried rice as well. My favourite dish is the Pad Se Ew. The satays are a...More
I was here on Nov 9th with M and we had a great time having Thai dinner. We had #47 Thuua Phat Phrik King (green beans $16.50) and #25 Gaeng Kari (yellow curry $17.50) they were so delicious. Our food came piping hot and fresh...More
We ordered from the lunch menu. The small soup (not sure what it was) was hot and tasteful. The spring roll was totally cold. Our dishes, pad Thai and a chicken peanut dish were both room temperature. They would have been good if they were...More
Work regularly takes me to Burnaby and this is my go-to restaurant. I arrive with an appetite and try many dishes. In particular I like their combo appetizer (great wings, delicate spring rolls and tasty satays. I also love the Pork Phat Bai Horpa (hot)...More
There are far better thai reataurants in Burnaby and the lower mainland. This was my second time here in 7 years or so. The first time was: mediocre and chemical-tasting food, and I didn't want to return. Yesterday, my friend and I were in the...More
Went to impress our Japanese friends and my Thai lady about the excellent Thai kitchen. Unfortunately this place has nothing really Thai in this restairant. Verydisappointi g to ha e taken friends out here. Will never go back
Phoned in order for pick up and it was ready right on time, The portion was generous and had plenty of flavour and seafood. Only concern is the lack of parking during the rush hours, the small parking lot is almost always full, despite the...More
Went for dinner with two co workers. I can’t say I enjoyed any of the dishes . Pad Thai was very sweet and not very Appetizing. Green curry had very little chicken and I have had much better . I found it a bit overpriced...More
Went there for lunch. Great service. Lunch special items pretty good with cheap prices. Regular menu items pricier.
Excellent Thai food just like we get back home. We tried the three course set menu at CAD 55.00 for two people which was excellent value.
Went early Saturday evening (6 p.m.) ordered drinks & dinner and were out by 7. You can choose how ""hot"" you want your meal, so makes it easy for ordering. Food was really tasty, service was great. Will go back again.
We stopped in for a meal our first day in Burnaby. My wife's plate came out she didn't like it. She explained it to the waiter he immediately knew what to change and had the kitchen make a new plate seasoned differently. She really liked...More
The food was not bad but wasnt particularly impressive either. Everything we ordered tasted the same. As if all the same ingredients were used to prepare all the dishes. Worth a try but only a try.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d807495-Reviews-Green_Basil-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Green Leaf Salad Bar,"We ate here nearly every lunchtime during our stay. We craved fresh fruit, vegetables and salad, the food here was perfect. The staff were really friendly.
We ran into this place accidentally. After a negative experience with other Vancouver restaurants (overpriced / underserviced), this place appeared as a gem - the food is VERY tasty and affordable; hospitality and service of the owners is top notch.
After a week in Vancouver we just happened upon this little restaurant and wowzers. Delicious food, great service and did I mention the great food????
Drove in from Seattle and decided for a light dîner with my wife and kids. Everyone enjoyed their chicken donair! We'll definitely be back. Note that this place closes early. They also had an impressive salad bar!
My husband introduced me to this restaurant and it’s owners. The food is fresh, flavourful and made with love. The falafel sandwich and tabuli is a must try. The luncheon features are tasty and authentic Lebanese dishes. I would recommend this lunch spot to all.
As soon as I entered the place I could feel the warmth and welcome atmosphere. The owners Wafa and Raja were sitting with a client friend chatting and enjoying the ease of lunch time rush. The lentil soup with carrots that Wafa offered was heavenly....More
Lebanese is everywhere but is it? The Green Leaf is real Lebanese. The salads are fresh, rich in Middle East Flavor. All the family pitches in as well. Like being in their home sharing a table. Excellent food. Cheerful Service. Worth repeating.
Myself and my colleagues go here for lunch at least weekly. Their salad bar is great with lots of options, as well their warm plates are not to be missed. This place is run by the kindest family who make going there an enjoyable experience....More
This is a fantastic Mediterranean cafe. A salad bar keeps the lines out the door at lunch, but the hot plates, soups, shwarma, falafel plates are huge and delicious. The hard working family brings on home made style authentic dishes. Not open late... and limited...More
Great selection, everything was fresh regardless of time of day. Eat in or take away options. Pay according to weight of your salad rather than a fixed 'smorgasbord' fee.
Healthy food and the owners are so nice!!! It is so fresh and delicious! I come here often for lunch. Best place in coal harbour!
Had a delicious salad from the salad bar. We really wanted salad because we get tired of sandwiches, etc. when traveling. Very reasonable price. Appears to be family run. Limited hours.
Love this place!! I pretty much come here for lunch everyday. It's a family business and they're very friendly
A wonderful family owns and operates this restaurant. You can satisfy your vegan and veggie cravings, or if you're like me, hit them up for Lebanese food. Diners can eat in or take out. I highly recommend their chicken schwarmas, kibbeh (mostly off menu), and...More
We were staying at the Pinnacle Hotel not far away and we walked the neighborhood looking for an evening meal. There were lots of coffee shops but this was the only restraint we saw that offered what looked like a real meal. We had a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6122846-Reviews-Green_Leaf_Salad_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Green Leaf Sushi,"This sushi place is known for Aburi (torched) sushi. We ordered one aburi spicy eel unagi. It was excellent! We love it! But we also like sashimi so we ordered the wild salmon sashimi 9 pieces. That was a BIG mistake!! I have never seen...More
This was a solid sushi experience and casual atmosphere for the entire family. All of the ingredients were fresh and prepared well.
Green Leaf Sushi provides dine in, take out and delivery options and the dine in is popular so there could be a wait time..But waiting is well worth the effort as the menu presents such a quality product...we chose to order ahead and picked up...More
Go to the BEACH with Sushi. The BEST Sushi in Vancouver. Be the envy of ALL others who show up and need to buy mystery meat off a cart. Be romantic. Be the Hero ! The best Sushi money can buy and the easiest way...More
I think they’re most well known for their battera sushi, or at least I go there because of that. The sushi is always delicious and prepared with the same standards each visit. Highly recommend getting one each of their battera. It goes well with beer....More
Great and busy spot, good sushi and service. Tight for space but sufficient for a quick visit. good selection - not as cheap as some other places. i hear not all food is made on site - so that would be the down side if...More
September 13, 2019 - 5:30pm. I almost swallowed a piece of blue plastic thread, about 2” in length, that was hidden inside my seaweed salad. They didn’t seem too worried and they did not bother taking it off the bill. I expected much more from...More
Very excellent Aburi sushi with decent price, visited Vancouver twice and had dinner here twice, just can’t miss it, highly recommended!
My friend took me here about a year ago and I’ve returned many times since. The food is always delicious and consistent. The sushi is all excellent. My favourite is the salmon aburi. The avacado salad is also one of my favourites.
Six of us were there for lunch on Friday afternoon. We waited for 20 minutes before the table was ready. We have salmon sushi, eggplant sushi, scallops sushi,etc. They were well made and very tasty, very different from just a piece fish on top of...More
Not sure why people lined up here. Had a very mediocre meal. We were in and out in 25 minutes. So not a dining experience. Very fast food experience and not cheap. And then the nausea and toilet. My wife enjoyed her meal and did...More
Place is in a corner and car park for this can be wanting as it is a popular place. Food selection is good. The dish to go for is the Omelette Rice. It is done quite differently and you should be surprised with it.
Both service and food were excellent. We were served copious amount of tea as we sat unhurried and chatted during our meal.
The sushi are amazing and great value for money. The service is also top notch. The spot is super busy on Friday afternoon so either make a reservation or order ahead of time.
Went for lunch and were told it would be a 15 minute wait, but it was barely10 minutes. A very busy place, usually a line up and a lot of take out orders. Service was very good. The aburi Oishi was so fresh - both...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3803836-Reviews-Green_Leaf_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Green Lettuce Indian Style Chinese Restaurant,"Nasty. Cheap prices, small portions & food meh. Not an Indo menu. Fight with food delivery at cash counter. Waitresses playing with cell phones at rear of restaurant with no interest in providing service. Forgotten dishes ordered. What can I say? Nasty.
This place was recommended to us by a long term resident of Vancouver as the best Indo-Chinese in the city and we were not disappointed. The chili chicken was just like what we get back home in India and the rest of the dishes didn't...More
It’s Indo Chinese cuisine so if you like Chinese and Indian food (sauces and spices) then this place is very well worth it. Delicious food. We go there quite often on weekends with family and the restaurant staff is quite friendly. We order these dishes...More
Not even close to good, food was not even mall worthy and way too salty, Soup was bland, teriyaki beef was so salty we could not finish it, ginger chicken was soggy on the outside with no flavor and again loaded with salt .. Never...More
Have visited here many times previously but recent visit was no so great. Prices have inceased (understandable) but the portion sizes have considerably shrunk. ""Fusion"" quality has also deteriorated.
Good Indian style Chinese food Very distinct flavours Great spread and menu Must visit for anyone craving Indian food (Indian Chinese specifically)
The Green Lettuce is almost like a pilgrimage whenever we come to Vancouver. The tasty indochinese food has never failed in its quality, quantity or flavor and has maintained its quality consistently over the years. Our favorites are the Chow Mein and the Fried rice....More
We eagerly anticipated our visit to Green Lettuce as we heard so many positive comments about the food. Indian - Chinese Fusion sounded more that a little tempting!!!! Well............. Not sure if we hit them on a bad night but it was a huge disappointment....More
Good evening out with friends. Chicken with Aubergine and fried rice were amazing. Mongolian beef was OK and the fried fish was disappointing. Would go back for the first two dishes. Attentive service. Very busy restaurant.
Excellent food. Was there for lunch, couldn't have gone to a better place. Hakka Chinese cuisine. We tried Chicken, tofu, fish, crispy noodles--all were mouthwatering. The decor isn't that great--but who cares if the food is super? Good service. All halal food.
Not our first time there and definitely won't be our last. The great recipes and blends of different food that they have is so good whether you take it home or eat there. If it is your first time going I would recommend eating there....More
I went to Vancouver for a business trip. Had my dinner over there. The food was very good. I was here before.
I had chinese cashew chicken that was average, not much flavors and not spicy!!! But the service was attentive.
Great food and service. Friendly and attentive staff. Parking is limited, washroom is dated and not clean.
We visited with family from out of town, and truly disappointed. Firstly the portions have significantly reduced from our past experiences have been. Secondly, we had horrible service. We were there at 5pm, ordered several dishes and 3 tables that arrived at 530-545, got their...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d810533-Reviews-Green_Lettuce_Indian_Style_Chinese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Green and Oak Malaysian Restaurant,"Excellent restaurant ….I would say a hidden gem in Burnaby Heights . The service offered by Jun was diligent, very fast and professional. It was easy to substitute some ingredients as seafood by chicken and no cilantro. The satays are delicious same as Mee Goreng...More
This little family run Malaysian restaurant open since the 2018 in Burnaby Hight , very bright with modern wood tones , around 50 seats , dropped in for later lunch with my manager after our meting in the area , it is been a while...More
I have been eating Singapore and Malaysian food for almost 30 years. This is a gem of Malaysian cooking. They don’t hold back on spices and deep flavors. The Roti and sauce was outstanding as was the Char-Guey Teow. I am big fan of Banana...More
We wanted to try another Malaysian restaurant and this place was listed near the top of the Google list in Burnaby. Decor is fairly plain nothing fancy. The tables are a bit awkward where there is a tray underneath which restricts leg movement. We ordered...More
Glad I surprised my wife with this pick! Love Malaysian/Singaporean food. Hainanese Chicken is to die for! We ended up ordering a curry dish and a Laksa Noodle Soup as well! All was so tasty and served up fast! Have to go back to try...More
It is time of the moths for our brother and sisters once a month get together , my brother choose the Green and Oak Malaysian restaurant ,they well know for their signature Hainanese Chicken ! (they sever cold ,a lot of people do not like...More
This is my second time go there to have dinner within two week. This is not a big size restaurant but still good.
What a great spot. Good food and great service. Friendly staff. Very clean and a variety of menu choices.
This is a fine Malaysian restaurant located in Burnaby, B.C. The food was more than acceptable, albeit the portions were not that generous. Haianese chicken was delicious but could have use some pickle vegetable side dishes. The roti and curry dishes were delicious. The tables...More
come eat dinner with friends , the young boy serve us , he is not polite and low voice , hard to understand his speaking . lack of knowledge in menu, none suggestions , very not heipful
Three of us were there for lunch. We enjoyed and shared: roti-canai; green beans & eggplant; the hainanese chicken with yellow rice & soup set; and, Singapore Style Vermicelli. We were seated and served by friendly and professional staff. The dishes came from the kitchen...More
Very friendly waitress. Warm place...even during winter! We ordered char que teow, chicken rice - not really Hainanese- green beans & brinjal, and beef curry. Don’t bother with the beef curry! It ain’t even curry! I would be ashamed if I was the cook! And...More
Must try the Roti-Canai, it's a cross between a naan and popped bread. It was very light and tasty. Had their Singapore style noodle, it was not as spicy or curry tasting as I expected but decent.
Had lunch there recently with my wife. Smaller, but tidy and clean establishment. Very friendly host to greet you. Had the Char Kway Teow which was done very well....my only comparison was having it the first time in Malacca Malaysia...this was quite close! Would definitely...More
My family and I ate here. Beef curry was delicious. You must order the chicken...so good. Will be coming back to try the rest of the menu.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d13327794-Reviews-Green_and_Oak_Malaysian_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Gringo,"This is Mexican food made by gringos and it shows. I ordered a quesadilla that was a soggy mess by the time I got to the second half of it. The rice was cold and flavorless. The worst part was the service. I sat right...More
This was one of the coolest spots in Vancouver. It was a destination, an experience. It was the spot that you tell your friends about, that you bring a new date. It made you feel cool knowing about it. Now, this place is nothing like...More
Stopped by for a quick drink and a few taco’s for a snack! It is in the alley so don’t give up your search and keep hunting if you are using google maps. You will be rewarded with a great margarita or beer and tasty...More
Excellent delicious tacos and quesadillas- good and spicy sauce, great service, food and drinks. Best Mexican food I have ever had. In a back street in Vancouver, who would have thought it? And ‘Blood Alley?’ Best address ever.
Great mexican food off the beaten track. Me and my partner enjoyed Tacos, Quesadillas, Nachos and beers (normal and alcohol free) here on a quiet Monday evening. The staff were friendly and we enjoyed the atmosphere with upbeat music and colourful decor in this back...More
Really unique spot. Ordered all the tacos on the menu and it was great food. Loved the Habanero sauce so much that I ended up buying a bottle for myself.
A friend of mine told me about Gringo a couple of weeks ago when he heard we were heading to Vancouver. It’s a little off the beaten path so we scouted it out in the afternoon. So glad we did. Very small cozy restaurant. Really...More
Great tiny place off the beaten path. The mega burrito Aston was delicious. The drinks were a good size and strong. Funky and cool place if you want something cheap and different.
My wife and I read that this is a good spot to go for mexican so we decided to try it out. It's kind of sketch at first because you walk down some sketch alley and there it is. But we never felt unsafe. Super...More
""Where should we go for dinner tonight, The Keg?"" Jas asked as we were winding down the working day. ""The Keg?!"" I exclaimed, shaking my head...Jas hates trying new things. ""Lets go for Tacos, I found a cool little place online I want to try""....More
Very small joint with limited seating and brief menu yet personal service Loved the food and $4 beers Must visit for beer lovers
How can you argue with cheap great draft beer, GI Joe cartoon reruns, kitten with laser eyes shooting Space Invaders, and awesome street tacos??!?!?! I love this place. We viisted twice in a 5 day trip to Vancouver. Yes it's small. Yes it is great,...More
Do NOT be put off by location, we found this little place on here and we visited twice during our 4 day stay. The food was amazing, the drinks were cold and heavenly and overall we loved it. The staff were friendly and knew us...More
Super cool & friendly service!! Tasty Mexican food and affordable prices!! Despite the fact that it's located in a dark alley, Gringo is a great spot to chow down. My boyfriend and I tried out all the tacos, and they were all tasty & authentic....More
It is a small hidden place and totally worth it. I had pork quesadilla and it was really good, my friends had dif types of tacos and they loved! Margaritas are really good too, staff is very friendly and the atmosphere is great! Will def...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8431851-Reviews-Gringo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Grub,"We've been to Grub three times and each visit was an excellent experience. So how could it go wrong with a fourth time? Well, as we found out, it could. There were four of us -- two couples. The place has a shotgun layout: it's...More
Cute little Main Street restaurant. Food presentation 10/10! Taste 12/10! We shared two small plates (tuna and the onion tart). Both were delicious! Then we each had an entree: out of this world gnocchi and a schnitzel dish. Wish I took pictures! GO!
This is a very small cafe in the trendy part of Main Street. We enjoyed an excellent meal, well-served. Very good value for the money
My wife had a scallops dish with crab fried rice, veggies and a fried Sunnyside up egg. She reported as yummy, tasty and delicious. I had the fish tacos with lung cod. Very tasty and good. Our friend had the Sable fish on a curry...More
Creative European fusion cuisine, very well cooked. Choice of meat, fish and vegetarian dishes. The place is rather bistro-like and small, the food very good.
Arrived at 7:00PM. Ordered beer, appetizer and main course. Beer arrived right away. It was now 7:30PM and still no appetizer so had complain. Appetizer arrived approx 5 minutes later. Another 30min went by and it was now 8:00PM and still waiting for the main...More
Last minute choice, great decision. Small but really stylish and interesting space (great bathrooms!). Diverse menu with something for everyone. Friendly service, tasty and well-priced food - will be back!
Had a very nice dinner I have ordered a dish of Duck. It’s very delicious, mash potatoes were very creamy. Dessert was big enough and too sweet ~~~
If there is a hidden gem in the city of Vancouver this is truly the place. The food that this amazing chef turns out of her kitchen is truly over the top. The menu has something for everyone from fish to poultry (duck) to meat...More
Another Main Street gem, Grub has been serving the neighbourhood for many years. The dining room is small and quite cramped; it was full that night, so it was loud and a little difficult to hear your table mates. But it is worth it to...More
Lovely and relaxing dinner. Host was very friendly and helpful. She makes a mean cocktail. Had the artic charm and it was very well cooked.
First experience at Grub...we have heard good things and we were not disappointed. Sunday Brunch was excellent Crepe with real apples....Grub breakfast with creamy scrambled and sausage. Grilled tomatoes and fresh salad...very well priced and the service was the best ....
We always enjoy Grub and feel comfortable taking visitors there. It can be a bit noisy inside as the room is small and a bit cramped, but the food and service is worth it. A go-to place for us.
We had a lovely family brunch here. The main room is a little narrow (cramped) but we got a very nice table in the alcove created by the door and were able to enjoy the experience. The food was excellent and the service prompt and...More
This is a Vancouverite friend's favorite place. On a busy Main Street and unimpressive storefront. However, the food was great. I had duck breast, my husband had a fish dish. Excellent, although I had to have them redo my duck because it came out medium...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1065989-Reviews-Grub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Guilt and Company,"Beautiful place and people. Quick service and high culinary dishes. I came with my wife and some friends and the patio experience was wonderful.
Can’t rave enough! Ambience cool, the food crazy good- do not leave without trying the warm olives which we asked to have with grilled sourdough . The bbque pulled pork was as delicious as the surprisingly remarkable seasonal green salad. Weak link was chocolate-dessert. Cocktails...More
Guilt was the first venue to offer live music. During the first two weeks, I think we were there more often than some of the staff worked. As several months’ past, we continue to go every couple of weeks when we see something we like....More
I love this place! Have been a couple of times. its suck a cute space with a great atmosphere! Live bands are always good. Def recommend !
Has its ups and downs, drinks were great, bartenders and live music was awesome but man the people inside were extremely pushy and rude. There’s no cover charge, just a donation to the local artist as a pay-what-you-want ($5-10).
Meat and cheese board, excellent mixed drinks, to die for truffles, and attentive wait staff. jazz band was out of this world, and played very well.
Stumbled upon this place while walking around Gastown. Very cool atmosphere. Basement bar with lots of character. Great service and good well priced drinks !
As a bartender, I was drawn to this bar just from the mixology point of view. The cocktail menu seemed interesting enough online, but bartending goes beyond mixing drinks for me, its about the whole. I actually ended up going here the very first day...More
Check out Guilt and Co to see what Vancouver can be at its best. It's always different and a complete surprise. The live music is always unique and funky. Great drinks and spectacular service with staff that are uncharacteristically polite for a Vancouver establishment. Give...More
Reminds me of the classic New York jazz clubs of years ago; however, the musicians can't compare! Very cozy/intimate vibe with great personnel. Door fee was ""pay what you can"" A dynamic band might change that policy
a hidden gem in gastown, downtown vancouver as it's situated in a cavern underneath the ground of another restaurant. It features live and very talented RnB, soul and alternative bands and has an intimate,dark, cozy setting. Enough tables and chairs to sit, play board games,...More
I was afraid of over-hyping our experience, so I waited (perhaps a bit too long!) to write this review. We went the first weekend of February, and to give some perspective, it was our first time in Vancouver (we're from New York). We were wandering...More
It is easy to miss this joint unless you remember what its website says: “DESCEND into the happy depths...” There was a long queue at 9PM although the gig was not until 10PM. You pay what you want as you enter. I paid CAD$10. The...More
Because I want to keep this place a secret. That’s how awesome it was!! We waited in line at around 9:30. We had dinner upstairs at Local and then just came down to Guilt and Co when we were done dinner and ready to dance....More
We stopped by here for evening drinks - the bar is downstairs, and they have a good selection of drinks. Although this place comes to life with the live music. We listened to an amazing artist, and the venue is perfect for a band. If...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7824468-Reviews-Guilt_and_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gurkha Himalayan Kitchen,"Rather nondescript and no store front presence . However the food is very tasty and you can get the level of spicing you want on the curries. Love all the lamb dishes and the momos are delicious too. Portions are ample as well. Definitely recommend.
Fabulous staff. It was our first time there and the staff was very friendly and helpful. Loved the food and would definitely return.
Nice little place that happened to be right across from our hotel. Good food at good value that was perfect for my girlfriend's celiac considerations.
We have been walking by the Gurkha Himalayan Kitchen for years - always thought we should give it a try. The other day we did and what a wonderful surprise. We sat out on the patio for dinner, had the heater on and with the...More
Very good meal so very tasty. Asked for hot and that’s what we got. Delicious. Really good service. Sat outside which was nice. Busy and there was a good diverse mix. Good wine
We could see this restaurant from our hotel balcony. It looked unpretentious and a little unappealing in a street of more desirable establishments. But we gave it a go. And were glad - on the whole - that we did. You walk up a short...More
Very nice surprise in Vancouver. A bit out of the way, but very much worth the walk or Uber. The ambiance isn’t the nicest or Nepalese, but with a group of friends, nice enough I highly recommend the lamb momo, the meat and sauce was...More
This is a must eat when staying in Vancouver, a real hidden gem in Davie Village. The food is delicious and flavoured with authentic spices. We had the chicken momos which are absolutely great, also the chicken bhojan was fabulous. Can fully recommend the restaurant...More
Delicious Himalayan food served by Surya and all the other friendly staff. When you look at the building as you walk down Davie, you may see just another older building serving some kind of overseas food and wonder if you should go in and check...More
I visit this restaurant last week. Their interior was amazing .The mountain paint is wonderful. Little cute dumbbell by the entrance door, the bar is I guess made with the bamboos . we ordered the Chicken Momo, Nepali traditional plate and goat curry for the...More
Came for Dine Out Vancouver. Had the lamb momo, grilled chicken and pistachio cheese lush for dessert. Really enjoyed all of it. The lentil soup that came with the chicken was really excellent and the dessert was delicious and unique. Would go back again.
Hello Cathy, thank you so much for your review. We would love to see you again🙂
We arrived early. There's only one person there. Perhaps anoyed that we woke him up, He was very rude and we decided to leave.
Hello,BP I am sorry that you had the unpleasant experience.please,let us know how we can improve.call me at 604-704-9045.
The location and the interior of this restaurant is quite unique, I would say. I have never tried Himalayan cuisine so I tried this restaurant for lunch. I chose goat curry as I have never tried goat meat. It was pleasantly tasty, goat meat was...More
Hello kyokot, I am glad you like the food at gurkha.please ,let us know how we can improve our service to get 2more little stars from you.Please,call me at 604-378-8744
We have been away for 3 years. I am glad we went back there tonight. We chose the combination dinners again, one with goat curry the other chicken. The lentil soup was a great starter, so light and tasty. The curry main courses are both...More
Hello BP, thank you so much for lovely review 🙂
We wanted to try this restaurant for the first time as this was our first time trying Nepalese cuisine so we were very excited! However, due to COVID-19, we thought it would be best to order take out and since the Dine Out Festival was...More
Hello food educator, I am extremely sorry to hear about your experience.please let us know how we can improve our service.call me at 604-378-8744",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3226253-Reviews-Gurkha_Himalayan_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Guu Original,"Super service, amazing food and the true atmosphere of a Japanese restaurant. Do not hesitate and let yourself be entertained by the cooks while you scarf down some of the amazing tasting food that Vancouver has to offer!
This place was recommended by our hotel a couple of blocks away. Their udon, grilled salmon, sardines were to die for! I was told that their menu changes everyday so the servers aren't able to say what tomorrow's menu will be. We found ourselves there...More
We thoroughly enjoyed our dinner here. The lychee cocktail was absolutely brill and wish I’d have buckets of this. We order the beef tataki and tuna sashimi. Both absolutely delicious. The best was the Japanese pancake. Totally worth the wait. This is a great restaurant...More
I went here with my friend H for lunch back in September. We ordered BBQ Beef Teishoku Combo ($12.80) and Sashi Tei ($16.80) they were tasty. I really liked Sashi Tei it came with tuna, salmon, spot prawn and scallop sashimi with Rice, soup and...More
Had an amazing lunch here at Guu. Never disappoints. The chicken rice teriyaki bowl is so good. Can't wait to come back again, the service here is always amazing.
I recently visited there twice in a few weeks as I really like their happy hour menu and chilling atmosphere in the afternoon. It does get busy and loud in the evening but happy hour time is nice and quiet to have some beer or...More
We shared Japanese and Chinese dishes and even some french fries. The sashimi, crispy tofu and spicy calamari were the highlights. Good value too
Been here a few times with work colleagues and friends. Great to share. Love almost the whole menu.Great little spot.
For less than 10 dollars, you can eat a good amount of quality Japanese food for lunch. One of the best Japanese lunch deals you can get in Vancouver.
Went out at 6 pm to have a bite at Guu. We ordinarily go to Guu w/ Garlic but went to the Original Guu. Had some Okra, Black cod, Pumpkin croquette, Chicken karagge, negitoro, prawns, rice, beer and Kimchee Hot pot which we sent back...More
Best experience at this restaurant. loved how the servers were attentive. The food was delicious and great. Make sure to try there mango and lychee beer they simply delicious. Well done!!!
This place is a tiny, local beauty. We stumbled across this place whilst walking around and had a wonderful meal. Fast, efficient and friendly service. Good prices.
Had a great evening here - the food, drink, atmosphere & service were all super. Definitely recommend.
The food was great but the atmosphere made this place. The staff were awesome The beer was flowing and everyone was having a great time. Not a single miserable person there!
Dropped in for dinner alone at the bar. As soon as I walked in I could feel the energy of the place. I asked the waiter to pretty much order for me and the food he brought as fantastic. I could watch it all being...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d805722-Reviews-Guu_Original-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Guu with Garlic,"We came for lunch the at first were taken aback by the shirt and simple menu but after trying a few things we quickly realised that everything we order is very fresh, such a scallop sashimi or eel on rice or tuna, and prepared to...More
I don’t have any experience with the other locations, but was impressed with the food at this one! Covid precautions were higher than anywhere else I’ve experienced. A/C half worked but front door was wide open- in the heatwave it was still comfortable. Would go...More
Very enjoyable without breaking the bank. Small plates at reasonable prices. flavorsome and quick service. Food tasted fresh and quality was good.
Sister in town for biz and the wife and I wanted to entertain them with an experience they may never have before. I picked 3 resto's to choose from. They would not make the decision sooooo. I choice this place as Vancouver is known for...More
Visited twice during my week long stay. Offers an array of interesting small dishes and a very large daily specials menu. Very fresh sashimi and grilled Waygu tongue. Good for solo traveller who wants to try more than one dish. Service is friendly and attentive.
We were staying in Vancouver only one night, but were lucky enough to discover this restaurant AND get in!! When we left, the wait for tables was long. All the food we had was delicious and we had major food envy, as we saw other...More
They have different menu itema for daily specials. It's fun to try different dishes every time. The price is surprisingly descent. If you wanna eat non-shushi japanese food, I recommend this restaurant!
With just 2 people plan to order at least 4 or 5 things. Food was all delicious- the wontons, the chicken wings, the saba (mackerel) and mussels. The service was a bit slow at first but picked up. Nice people-watching from the patio.
Great food, open late, busy place, good service, boisterous & fun atmosphere. If you are looking for a quiet dinner, this is not the place for you. Food tend to be small portion but it is the quality of taste... everything we ordered was good,...More
The name is funny, but the food is serious. I particularly love Asian food, and Guu serves creative dishes like tempura ice cream, and all made with quality ingredients. The Ebi Mayo is one of my fave dishes, and a must for newcomers.
Relaxed atmosphere. Friendly & efficient service. Fresh ingredients. Daily specials of sashimis are excellent--lots of local selections including tuna (albacore /skipjack), salmon, yellowtail, amberjack, scallop etc). Ox tongue is very good . Fried squid are crunchy & not chewy. Octopus carpaccio is excellent.
Every single thing I said at this restaurant was misunderstood. ""Hi, we have a reservation for 6"" *blank stare* ""What kind of tea do you have?"" ""Tea? ok."" *brings tea for everyone at the table* ""Does this come with rice?"" ""Do you want rice?"" *doesn't...More
I've been there three times and will be there again for sure. I have never been disappointing. We love to try daily specials each time when we go there. Great service, wonderful food, reasonable prices, great ambiance. definitely recommended ;)
This place had a nice feel to it on a Saturday night being busy and a little noisy but it had a nice atmosphere. The salmon hotpot was great and the udon noodles were spot on. A 15 minute wait for a table at 7pm...More
Yuzu mojitos for grown ups and peach juice for teenagers equally well received. Gorgeous calamari and tempura squid, boys loved the asparagus wrapped in bacon, noodle dish enjoyed by teenagers and divine tempura bananas with ice cream to finish. Very good value. Great buzzy atmosphere,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d785014-Reviews-Guu_with_Garlic-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Guu with Otokomae,"I hate to do this, but the food at this place is simply far below par and not what is described in the menu. We ordered the shrimp tempura, which was simply fried shrimp, coated in what appeared to be a simple and somewhat limp...More
Deep fried chicken was cooked to the second. Best I've had in a while. Noodles perfect. Portion sizes small for the price and be aware not all come with side e.g. rice or noodles.
We visited here today on a food tour and had the Fried Chicken. I don't think words can accurately describe how delicious it was. We hope to eat it again before we leave Vancouver.
Just walking around Gastown we stumbled upon this authentic Japanese restaurant ,service was great along with the food and desert can't wait to go back .
This was a thoroughly enjoyable evening. We went for my husband's 86th birthday, thought we would try something new and we were very pleased. The staff were terrific, the food was interesting and vey well presented. My husband and I don't share the same taste...More
In the heart of Gastown. Friendly staff and good food.The mini-scallops and green beans was excellent and the Brussels sprouts were extraordinary.
I thought we would have something a little different for a Japanese lunch and I found Guu Otokomae in Gastown. Be warned that this is not a sushi bar or teppanyaki den. Our group of three decided to be a bit adventurous and ordered: Miso...More
This is my go to place for lunch! Always enjoy their sashimi salad or chicken nam bam! Staff is authentic and helpful when selecting food choices. Great service especially if you sit at the bar which gives you a feeling of old Gastown.
Great experience here. The food was real good and fairly inexpensive too. Located right in Gastown, it's an amazing little spot. The staff was friendly however a bit inattentive. Definitely will return to try again soon though.
A short wait, but worth it! Food was incredible! Service was good, too. Lighting could've been better though. :)
Very enjoyable meal. Great selection of small plates to share. Very tasty and different. Decor is just OK but food is great
If you are looking for authentic Japanese food here is the right place! either the gastown location or thurlow location both are just as amazing. (gastown location is a bit hard to find) I generally Love this place , location ( so cozy, and love...More
Excellent, prompt service with food to match! Everything was tasty, but definitely recommend the pork/shrimp dumplings and grilled squid (requested hot sauce with it). The burning pudding (flambé creme brûlée) was an entertaining finish and tasted great (we ordered a second one). We would definitely...More
Very nice popular Japanese cuisine in Gastown. Mostly for drinks but decent food as well. Recommend trying when in the area.
finally seeked it out and had an awesome lunch with my wife.we were staying downtown for a week and went on trip advisor for a suggestion. found Guu Otokamae which is the only Guu I hadn't tried. we were 2 blocks away. it was mid...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12849616-Reviews-Guu_with_Otokomae-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gyo Para,"When Gyo Para first opened, I really liked it ... not any more. The ramen is delicious. The gyoza is not great. The service is terrible. I had a bad experience 3 times. I'm not going back.
Gyo Para is a small restaurant at Broadway and Arbutus in Vancouver, specializing in ramen and gyoza. The food here is amazing and the service is excellent. If you are looking for authentic Japanese ramen and gyoza (chicken karage is awesome as well) you have...More
A couple of work friends and I went to Gyo Para for lunch. I had the orignial goyza and kara-age and it was good. The fried chicken was super crispy on the outside and moist on the inside. That said, i was expecting to see...More
We went to Gyo after stopping by Ramen Danbo and seeing the line was so long. This place is such a hidden gem! Auphen, our server, was so passionate about the menu and made excellent recommendations. It was one of our friend’s birthday and they...More
Both of us had ramen soup - spicy. Excellent and service was friendly, efficient, and helpful. Great value as well.
This place has a nice, casual ambience and great cuisine in Kitsilano. The staff are very professional, too.
Do yourself a favour and order the Veggie gyoza!!! Small casual restaurant, staff are very friendly. Feels like you’re in Japan, very authentic menu and food! I can’t wait to go back!
Spacious, big table for big group. Ramen choices quite a few and gyoza. Vegetarian options too. Service was good too.
I was walking by one day and saw this restaurant and decided to give it a try. I was not disappointed. The ramen is authentic as it gets. The broth is rich and fulfilling and the noodles and ingredients makes it a wonderland of flavours....More
Good ramen. Tastes very fresh. The vegei gyoza was excellent. Good service. Clean space. Good portions. Good job. Recommended.
Phenomenal food, incredible atmosphere and great service. I had the tonkotsu ramen and it was everything I'd hoped and more.
Good service. Waited 12 minutes for the noodle, not bad for Lunch time. Will come again for sure. Enjoy.",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13287301-Reviews-Gyo_Para-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gyu Japanese Teppanyaki Restaurant,"I have had teppanyaki before in the UK and so I was very excited to have it again. This restaurant was superb in almost everyday. The food was of great quality, and the service from the team was fantastic. There was 7 of us and...More
Absolutely the best Teppanyaki in Vancouver. Fantastic food and excellent service. Nothing else really needs to be said.
From the warm greeting at the door, this dinner out with my wife was fantastic. The food was amazing , photos and my words cannot begin to share the attention and focus on our meal by Martin. Martin , you are a kind, thoughtful and...More
The restaurant is located at the second floor opposite of Tiffany & Co , ( is on the same block of Kobe ) I find the Gyu is more bright and mordant , but lacked of Teppanyaki and cooking entrainment fun and atmosphere , menu...More
Four of us gathered for a filling meal of several items. Because grouped serving the chef will only start when everyone is seated so you could be waiting on strangers who also are at your table. The food was very good. I always like to...More
Excellent choice. Service was 5/5. Always cleared our plates, topped up our drinks and very friendly. It was a bday so they cut out cake, served it and packed it up too. Great seafood and awesome Teppanyaki chef! Will be back. Thank you for a...More
I took advantage of a Groupon for 4 people so the price was pretty good. However, I won't go here without a Groupon or other type of discount because it will be too costly. Service was good. I picked the 1st seating just after it...More
I took it down one star rating because of the wait.  We had a 8pm reservation and told upon arrival the table was just finishing so please be patient.  OK, give me some tea but we didn’t get seated and have our first of eleven...More
Teppanyaki at it’s best by far. This is a local favourite and usually pretty busy especially at weekends.
We got caught up with another Groupon offer for $98 (54% off) for an 11 course meal. Our repast consisted of salads to soups to seafood to beef to rice to dessert. Granted the items were not huge but more than ample given the number...More
I love coming here for lunch, it's one of my favorite spots. Marco the owner is amazing and the food is tasty and made quickly. I always get the rib eye steak and never disappoints.
We went there to try teppanyaki and were waiting for a show (which is how it should be) but yeah after the chef cooked 2 super thinly sliced salmon 3 cray fish 4 squid heads 8 small shrimps and a wilting vegies (which all by...More
I took my wife here for a date and used a Groupon for an 11 course Teppanyaki meal. I'd never been before and it was a great experience! The seafood was amazing and the Waygu beef melted in my mouth. The servers were super attentive...More
I have been to this place a few times already. The price is reasonable and food quality is pretty good. Kids really like to see the chef lit the food on fire. Will come again.
Got 2 39.95 lunch specials for a table of four. Delicious food and professional service. The chicken they bring out is soooo tender! Meals includes salad, rice, 3 cuts of steaks mushroom and tops the meal of with ice cream - green tea is highly...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d704773-Reviews-Gyu_Japanese_Teppanyaki_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Gyu-Kaku Japanese BBQ,"Enjoyed an excellent meal in a fun environment. Attentive service and very fair prices make for a terrific value. The high rating is 100% deserved!
Enjoyed an excellent meal in a fun environment. Attentive service and very fair prices make for a terrific value. The high rating is 100% deserved!
Enjoyed an excellent meal in a fun environment. Attentive service and very fair prices make for a terrific value. The high rating is 100% deserved!
5/5 we ordered the party for 4 platter and few extra items! Absolutely delicious and tasty. All the meat was marinated in different sauces. We had a selection of condiments at our table. The sever was amazing and patient with us explaining how long to...More
5/5 we ordered the party for 4 platter and few extra items! Absolutely delicious and tasty. All the meat was marinated in different sauces. We had a selection of condiments at our table. The sever was amazing and patient with us explaining how long to...More
5/5 we ordered the party for 4 platter and few extra items! Absolutely delicious and tasty. All the meat was marinated in different sauces. We had a selection of condiments at our table. The sever was amazing and patient with us explaining how long to...More
There’s something about cooking marinated meats over a hot grill… Love this Gyu-Kaku! I know this is japanese but it reminds me of a Korean BBQ that I used to eat at in Richmond a long time ago. We had their salad… because we knew...More
There’s something about cooking marinated meats over a hot grill… Love this Gyu-Kaku! I know this is japanese but it reminds me of a Korean BBQ that I used to eat at in Richmond a long time ago. We had their salad… because we knew...More
There’s something about cooking marinated meats over a hot grill… Love this Gyu-Kaku! I know this is japanese but it reminds me of a Korean BBQ that I used to eat at in Richmond a long time ago. We had their salad… because we knew...More
We didn't want to think much as to what to order and just did their Chef's Favorite option which was plenty of food for two people. All the items came up fast for us to cook and enjoy along with a pitcher of beer of...More
We didn't want to think much as to what to order and just did their Chef's Favorite option which was plenty of food for two people. All the items came up fast for us to cook and enjoy along with a pitcher of beer of...More
We didn't want to think much as to what to order and just did their Chef's Favorite option which was plenty of food for two people. All the items came up fast for us to cook and enjoy along with a pitcher of beer of...More
Visited Gyu-Kaku on Nelson in downtown Vancouver for lunch in August 2021. All side walls at the restaurant were removed and it gave more open air set up. This was really great for COVID. I felt much more comfortable dining this way than in completely...More
Visited Gyu-Kaku on Nelson in downtown Vancouver for lunch in August 2021. All side walls at the restaurant were removed and it gave more open air set up. This was really great for COVID. I felt much more comfortable dining this way than in completely...More
Visited Gyu-Kaku on Nelson in downtown Vancouver for lunch in August 2021. All side walls at the restaurant were removed and it gave more open air set up. This was really great for COVID. I felt much more comfortable dining this way than in completely...More
What an unique experience. We had never eaten at a restaurant like this. The restaurant taking COVID precautions - taking tempature when you arrive, inform you they do not take cash, cards only. We had filet mignon, assorted veg., garlic noodles. The server advised us...More
What an unique experience. We had never eaten at a restaurant like this. The restaurant taking COVID precautions - taking tempature when you arrive, inform you they do not take cash, cards only. We had filet mignon, assorted veg., garlic noodles. The server advised us...More
What an unique experience. We had never eaten at a restaurant like this. The restaurant taking COVID precautions - taking tempature when you arrive, inform you they do not take cash, cards only. We had filet mignon, assorted veg., garlic noodles. The server advised us...More
Cool staff, super fast service and amazing food! I highly recommend it to any meat lover! *** 2020 update: Unfortunately, in our last visit, we found a hair in our dinner and then another one in the calamari! They replaced them, but two hairs in...More
Cool staff, super fast service and amazing food! I highly recommend it to any meat lover! *** 2020 update: Unfortunately, in our last visit, we found a hair in our dinner and then another one in the calamari! They replaced them, but two hairs in...More
Cool staff, super fast service and amazing food! I highly recommend it to any meat lover! *** 2020 update: Unfortunately, in our last visit, we found a hair in our dinner and then another one in the calamari! They replaced them, but two hairs in...More
Gyu-Kaku never fails to impress. It is one of our main go-to restaurants in Vancouver. Some of the selections have been dropped for the COVID-19 era (I miss you deep fried bacon pieces) but solid selections remain. The service here is always top notch -...More
Gyu-Kaku never fails to impress. It is one of our main go-to restaurants in Vancouver. Some of the selections have been dropped for the COVID-19 era (I miss you deep fried bacon pieces) but solid selections remain. The service here is always top notch -...More
Gyu-Kaku never fails to impress. It is one of our main go-to restaurants in Vancouver. Some of the selections have been dropped for the COVID-19 era (I miss you deep fried bacon pieces) but solid selections remain. The service here is always top notch -...More
I love gyukaku. I used to eat at gyukakus in Tokyo when I lived there. I am super happy that I can get to experience the authentic gyukaku flavor in Vancouver. Great service, great selection of alcohol, grea variety of food to choose from. Double...More
I love gyukaku. I used to eat at gyukakus in Tokyo when I lived there. I am super happy that I can get to experience the authentic gyukaku flavor in Vancouver. Great service, great selection of alcohol, grea variety of food to choose from. Double...More
I love gyukaku. I used to eat at gyukakus in Tokyo when I lived there. I am super happy that I can get to experience the authentic gyukaku flavor in Vancouver. Great service, great selection of alcohol, grea variety of food to choose from. Double...More
I travelled through Japan about 12 years ago, and had Japanese Barbecue several times. After seeing Gyu Kaku on a friends Instagram the craving set in. We booked a table for 4 on a Saturday night, seated right away and our server was at the...More
I travelled through Japan about 12 years ago, and had Japanese Barbecue several times. After seeing Gyu Kaku on a friends Instagram the craving set in. We booked a table for 4 on a Saturday night, seated right away and our server was at the...More
I travelled through Japan about 12 years ago, and had Japanese Barbecue several times. After seeing Gyu Kaku on a friends Instagram the craving set in. We booked a table for 4 on a Saturday night, seated right away and our server was at the...More
Pretty popular busy place. Good service. Tasty food. Meat seems to be decent quality. Mushroom platter was delicious.
Pretty popular busy place. Good service. Tasty food. Meat seems to be decent quality. Mushroom platter was delicious.
Pretty popular busy place. Good service. Tasty food. Meat seems to be decent quality. Mushroom platter was delicious.
Tasty Japanese bbq style restaurant. Good your own over table cooker with good food selected from an extensive menu or a range of sets. Casual and popular with all types of crowds, a little crowded and required a wait in the pub next door.
Tasty Japanese bbq style restaurant. Good your own over table cooker with good food selected from an extensive menu or a range of sets. Casual and popular with all types of crowds, a little crowded and required a wait in the pub next door.
Tasty Japanese bbq style restaurant. Good your own over table cooker with good food selected from an extensive menu or a range of sets. Casual and popular with all types of crowds, a little crowded and required a wait in the pub next door.
I've had my eye on this place for the last couple of months, but they've been too busy to try (I don't like waiting for anything for more than an hour, no matter how good it is). Tonight, however, was a different story (I think...More
I've had my eye on this place for the last couple of months, but they've been too busy to try (I don't like waiting for anything for more than an hour, no matter how good it is). Tonight, however, was a different story (I think...More
I've had my eye on this place for the last couple of months, but they've been too busy to try (I don't like waiting for anything for more than an hour, no matter how good it is). Tonight, however, was a different story (I think...More
I came in for lunch with an associate the other day, he highly recommended it. It was busy and we had to wait for about 20 minutes, but it was worth the wait. Our server was delightful, and the food was excellent. There is no...More
I came in for lunch with an associate the other day, he highly recommended it. It was busy and we had to wait for about 20 minutes, but it was worth the wait. Our server was delightful, and the food was excellent. There is no...More
I came in for lunch with an associate the other day, he highly recommended it. It was busy and we had to wait for about 20 minutes, but it was worth the wait. Our server was delightful, and the food was excellent. There is no...More
Being a foodie and a Vancouverite I tend to try basically every restaurant I can. And I always come back to Gyu-Kaku on Nelson. In my opinion its the best location they have in Vancouver and they always have the selection of meats that you...More
Being a foodie and a Vancouverite I tend to try basically every restaurant I can. And I always come back to Gyu-Kaku on Nelson. In my opinion its the best location they have in Vancouver and they always have the selection of meats that you...More
Being a foodie and a Vancouverite I tend to try basically every restaurant I can. And I always come back to Gyu-Kaku on Nelson. In my opinion its the best location they have in Vancouver and they always have the selection of meats that you...More
Our waitress, Sukh, was wonderful! She guided us through the process of selecting meat and veg. Really good experience!
Our waitress, Sukh, was wonderful! She guided us through the process of selecting meat and veg. Really good experience!
Our waitress, Sukh, was wonderful! She guided us through the process of selecting meat and veg. Really good experience!
The service was excellent. We got so many different meats to cook. The were all excellent. It was a fun experience to cook our own meats. Great concept for a restaurant.
The service was excellent. We got so many different meats to cook. The were all excellent. It was a fun experience to cook our own meats. Great concept for a restaurant.
The service was excellent. We got so many different meats to cook. The were all excellent. It was a fun experience to cook our own meats. Great concept for a restaurant.
Firs time here. The menu can seem a bit overwhelming. But the staff were so helpful. And from there it was all increasingly amazing. Such great food. Excellent service. Highly recommend this place. I was there with two teens and they loved it.
Firs time here. The menu can seem a bit overwhelming. But the staff were so helpful. And from there it was all increasingly amazing. Such great food. Excellent service. Highly recommend this place. I was there with two teens and they loved it.
Firs time here. The menu can seem a bit overwhelming. But the staff were so helpful. And from there it was all increasingly amazing. Such great food. Excellent service. Highly recommend this place. I was there with two teens and they loved it.
Had an amazing experience! We ordered a la carte meats individually. Excellent service and very high quality meats. I am a son of a butcher, so believe me I know ! The only thing I would suggest is that a good explanation of the menu...More
Had an amazing experience! We ordered a la carte meats individually. Excellent service and very high quality meats. I am a son of a butcher, so believe me I know ! The only thing I would suggest is that a good explanation of the menu...More
Had an amazing experience! We ordered a la carte meats individually. Excellent service and very high quality meats. I am a son of a butcher, so believe me I know ! The only thing I would suggest is that a good explanation of the menu...More
I went here for a dinner with 3 coworkers on August 4th. We all wanted BBQ so we ordered shrimp ($10), Filet Mignon ($10), Garlic Mushrooms ($4), Kalbi ($9), Kimchi ($5) and rice ($4.50) with drinks. Friends loved the Filet Mignon which I thought was...More
I went here for a dinner with 3 coworkers on August 4th. We all wanted BBQ so we ordered shrimp ($10), Filet Mignon ($10), Garlic Mushrooms ($4), Kalbi ($9), Kimchi ($5) and rice ($4.50) with drinks. Friends loved the Filet Mignon which I thought was...More
I went here for a dinner with 3 coworkers on August 4th. We all wanted BBQ so we ordered shrimp ($10), Filet Mignon ($10), Garlic Mushrooms ($4), Kalbi ($9), Kimchi ($5) and rice ($4.50) with drinks. Friends loved the Filet Mignon which I thought was...More
From 3 o’clock to 6 o'clock, there are happy hour specials available that are a pretty good value. We decided to order their Happy Hour BBQ Course ($52 for two people) which includes Seaweed salad, miso soup, steamed chili dumplings, beef sukiyaki bibimbap on rice,...More
From 3 o’clock to 6 o'clock, there are happy hour specials available that are a pretty good value. We decided to order their Happy Hour BBQ Course ($52 for two people) which includes Seaweed salad, miso soup, steamed chili dumplings, beef sukiyaki bibimbap on rice,...More
From 3 o’clock to 6 o'clock, there are happy hour specials available that are a pretty good value. We decided to order their Happy Hour BBQ Course ($52 for two people) which includes Seaweed salad, miso soup, steamed chili dumplings, beef sukiyaki bibimbap on rice,...More
Located near Oak Street on the south side of West Broadway second floor. Good luck with street parking. If you find a meter and it is south of Broadway it will be super expensive. This place offers Korean and Japanese cuisine and you can barbecue...More
Located near Oak Street on the south side of West Broadway second floor. Good luck with street parking. If you find a meter and it is south of Broadway it will be super expensive. This place offers Korean and Japanese cuisine and you can barbecue...More
Located near Oak Street on the south side of West Broadway second floor. Good luck with street parking. If you find a meter and it is south of Broadway it will be super expensive. This place offers Korean and Japanese cuisine and you can barbecue...More
Delicious Food! Great service! Friendly vibes and the grill experience is always amazing! Overall 10/10. Will be coming back!
Delicious Food! Great service! Friendly vibes and the grill experience is always amazing! Overall 10/10. Will be coming back!
Delicious Food! Great service! Friendly vibes and the grill experience is always amazing! Overall 10/10. Will be coming back!
Best Value on Happy Hour and Super Happy Hour. Went on a Tuesday night and it was not so crowded. Kyoto Sunrise cocktail was really good. Happy Hour menu is really good and a lot of choices
Best Value on Happy Hour and Super Happy Hour. Went on a Tuesday night and it was not so crowded. Kyoto Sunrise cocktail was really good. Happy Hour menu is really good and a lot of choices
Best Value on Happy Hour and Super Happy Hour. Went on a Tuesday night and it was not so crowded. Kyoto Sunrise cocktail was really good. Happy Hour menu is really good and a lot of choices
we enjoyed this Interesting and tasty cooking technique that was initially a little challenging but very enjoyable
we enjoyed this Interesting and tasty cooking technique that was initially a little challenging but very enjoyable
we enjoyed this Interesting and tasty cooking technique that was initially a little challenging but very enjoyable
I went here with my husband and we had a blast. There was a wait but we went next door to wait. Probably took 20-30 minutes. The food was yummy and came out in no time. We would recommend the fried fish ice cream. Great...More
I went here with my husband and we had a blast. There was a wait but we went next door to wait. Probably took 20-30 minutes. The food was yummy and came out in no time. We would recommend the fried fish ice cream. Great...More
I went here with my husband and we had a blast. There was a wait but we went next door to wait. Probably took 20-30 minutes. The food was yummy and came out in no time. We would recommend the fried fish ice cream. Great...More
We were interested in trying a new experience and thought based on previous reviews this seemed interesting. However, we were not quite sure what we were getting into. Didn't understand initially we were to cook and prepare our own food. Once we got into the...More
We were interested in trying a new experience and thought based on previous reviews this seemed interesting. However, we were not quite sure what we were getting into. Didn't understand initially we were to cook and prepare our own food. Once we got into the...More
We were interested in trying a new experience and thought based on previous reviews this seemed interesting. However, we were not quite sure what we were getting into. Didn't understand initially we were to cook and prepare our own food. Once we got into the...More
I love gyu kaku so much! They really have a good deal for happy hour and the service is great! All the food are delicious!
I love gyu kaku so much! They really have a good deal for happy hour and the service is great! All the food are delicious!
I love gyu kaku so much! They really have a good deal for happy hour and the service is great! All the food are delicious!
Gyukaku has very interesting concept allowing the customers to experience unique Japanese BBQ as cooking the meal by ourselves is not something that can be commonly found in most restaurants. Hence, it was a very enjoyable Japanese barbecue experience. We came here during happy hour,...More
Gyukaku has very interesting concept allowing the customers to experience unique Japanese BBQ as cooking the meal by ourselves is not something that can be commonly found in most restaurants. Hence, it was a very enjoyable Japanese barbecue experience. We came here during happy hour,...More
Gyukaku has very interesting concept allowing the customers to experience unique Japanese BBQ as cooking the meal by ourselves is not something that can be commonly found in most restaurants. Hence, it was a very enjoyable Japanese barbecue experience. We came here during happy hour,...More
Best type of place when you are hungry for Japanese. They start happy hour prices quite early. Reasonably priced and where food is fresh, service quick and drinks quite good. We went for three consecutive days!
Best type of place when you are hungry for Japanese. They start happy hour prices quite early. Reasonably priced and where food is fresh, service quick and drinks quite good. We went for three consecutive days!
Best type of place when you are hungry for Japanese. They start happy hour prices quite early. Reasonably priced and where food is fresh, service quick and drinks quite good. We went for three consecutive days!
Excellent restaurant with a grill. We loved the menu for two. Chef‘ choice. Beef vegetables and rice. Very friendly staff. Will definitely come back.
Excellent restaurant with a grill. We loved the menu for two. Chef‘ choice. Beef vegetables and rice. Very friendly staff. Will definitely come back.
Excellent restaurant with a grill. We loved the menu for two. Chef‘ choice. Beef vegetables and rice. Very friendly staff. Will definitely come back.
The food was delicious once we got a table. I would recommend making a reservation. We went on Saturday evening shortly after 6pm with no reservation and had to wait about 45minutes for a table. The place was busy. But once we got to the...More
The food was delicious once we got a table. I would recommend making a reservation. We went on Saturday evening shortly after 6pm with no reservation and had to wait about 45minutes for a table. The place was busy. But once we got to the...More
The food was delicious once we got a table. I would recommend making a reservation. We went on Saturday evening shortly after 6pm with no reservation and had to wait about 45minutes for a table. The place was busy. But once we got to the...More
Its always a pleasure dining at Gyu-Kaku, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service. Very impressed with the service and food.
Its always a pleasure dining at Gyu-Kaku, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service. Very impressed with the service and food.
Its always a pleasure dining at Gyu-Kaku, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service. Very impressed with the service and food.
A wonderful Japanese restaurant, been here many times, and always had wonderful experience. Our waitress was very accommodating with us and was very nice.
A wonderful Japanese restaurant, been here many times, and always had wonderful experience. Our waitress was very accommodating with us and was very nice.
A wonderful Japanese restaurant, been here many times, and always had wonderful experience. Our waitress was very accommodating with us and was very nice.
Food are super good. Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service, the staff was very polite.
Food are super good. Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service, the staff was very polite.
Food are super good. Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service, the staff was very polite.
For $23.95, you would expect much better than we got. Never again. I would recommend to go to one of the food court outlet to get better food quality and value.
For $23.95, you would expect much better than we got. Never again. I would recommend to go to one of the food court outlet to get better food quality and value.
For $23.95, you would expect much better than we got. Never again. I would recommend to go to one of the food court outlet to get better food quality and value.
Hi. I would like to input my disturbing interaction with one of the Richmond staff in Canada. The waitress we had was named Lucy and she looked like she was 17/18 years old, now knowing she is local to the richmond area and have discovered...More
Hi. I would like to input my disturbing interaction with one of the Richmond staff in Canada. The waitress we had was named Lucy and she looked like she was 17/18 years old, now knowing she is local to the richmond area and have discovered...More
Hi. I would like to input my disturbing interaction with one of the Richmond staff in Canada. The waitress we had was named Lucy and she looked like she was 17/18 years old, now knowing she is local to the richmond area and have discovered...More
It is Korean barbecue so you grill raw marinated plates of meat or seafood. We ordered a variety of beef dishes that were marinated and usually had only 8 thin slices - not super filling. The marinated squid was okay (8 pieces). The scallops had...More
It is Korean barbecue so you grill raw marinated plates of meat or seafood. We ordered a variety of beef dishes that were marinated and usually had only 8 thin slices - not super filling. The marinated squid was okay (8 pieces). The scallops had...More
It is Korean barbecue so you grill raw marinated plates of meat or seafood. We ordered a variety of beef dishes that were marinated and usually had only 8 thin slices - not super filling. The marinated squid was okay (8 pieces). The scallops had...More
I usually come here for their super happy hour..2-5pm. Limited selection but good enough! Service is good. Food is good!
I usually come here for their super happy hour..2-5pm. Limited selection but good enough! Service is good. Food is good!
I usually come here for their super happy hour..2-5pm. Limited selection but good enough! Service is good. Food is good!
This is one of the trendy chain japanese bbq’s popping up in the lower mainland. even on a tuesday they wouldn’t take reservations of 5 ppl between 630-800, so we ended up waiting and taking our chances. they also will not lead you in until...More
This is one of the trendy chain japanese bbq’s popping up in the lower mainland. even on a tuesday they wouldn’t take reservations of 5 ppl between 630-800, so we ended up waiting and taking our chances. they also will not lead you in until...More
This is one of the trendy chain japanese bbq’s popping up in the lower mainland. even on a tuesday they wouldn’t take reservations of 5 ppl between 630-800, so we ended up waiting and taking our chances. they also will not lead you in until...More
This restaurant needs to put two grill per table or make the grill surface BIGGER. There was only 6 of us on June 15 and only 2 people could cook their food at a time. The broccoli and mushrooms I ordered can raw in tinfoil...More
This restaurant needs to put two grill per table or make the grill surface BIGGER. There was only 6 of us on June 15 and only 2 people could cook their food at a time. The broccoli and mushrooms I ordered can raw in tinfoil...More
This restaurant needs to put two grill per table or make the grill surface BIGGER. There was only 6 of us on June 15 and only 2 people could cook their food at a time. The broccoli and mushrooms I ordered can raw in tinfoil...More
Awesome food, awesome service as always Love the vibe of the staff. That is what I call service. No matter how busy they are, they always have a smile on their face. Well done!
Awesome food, awesome service as always Love the vibe of the staff. That is what I call service. No matter how busy they are, they always have a smile on their face. Well done!
Awesome food, awesome service as always Love the vibe of the staff. That is what I call service. No matter how busy they are, they always have a smile on their face. Well done!
Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service.
Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service.
Its always a pleasure dining at the restaurant, fast and friendly service. Great food plus great service.
My family of 4 came for lunch and my son highly recommended that we try this restaurant. There was a queue but fortunately the wait was not that long. All the meat bbq were really good and were marinated well. The cuts were thin so...More
My family of 4 came for lunch and my son highly recommended that we try this restaurant. There was a queue but fortunately the wait was not that long. All the meat bbq were really good and were marinated well. The cuts were thin so...More
My family of 4 came for lunch and my son highly recommended that we try this restaurant. There was a queue but fortunately the wait was not that long. All the meat bbq were really good and were marinated well. The cuts were thin so...More
Been to this location twice for lunch during a workweek. Their lunch specials are so worth it. Both times we had the three bbq meats combo. All the meats are good quality and marinated just right. The meats were cut just right so they cook...More
Been to this location twice for lunch during a workweek. Their lunch specials are so worth it. Both times we had the three bbq meats combo. All the meats are good quality and marinated just right. The meats were cut just right so they cook...More
Been to this location twice for lunch during a workweek. Their lunch specials are so worth it. Both times we had the three bbq meats combo. All the meats are good quality and marinated just right. The meats were cut just right so they cook...More",135,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2390999-Reviews-Gyu_Kaku_Japanese_BBQ-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
H Tasting Lounge,"The menu and the food was surprisingly good. I didn’t have a lot of expectation for a restaurant lounge in a hotel, but was very good. There was 5 of us and we sat on the patio. We ordered a number of appetizers and a...More
Really beautiful space in the Westin Bayshore. Was here for a week long conference so ate and drank here a couple times. The food was straight up, just an inspiration (see my pictures and the video of the Siu Mai dumplings presentation). Later in the...More
From the moment we were seated in the pods by the H Tasting Lounge server, who was very professional, we knew this was going to be in a class by itself experience. All the food that our group ordered tasted unique in its own way....More
H Tasting Lounge has a great bar with a variety of craft cocktail options. They also have live music throughout the week making it a lively atmosphere. A great spot for hotel guests or visitors alike! Visit findyourslope.com for more local Vancouver and Whistler recommendations.
This lounge has the prices of an upscale restaurant and the personality of that great aunt whose name you can’t remember. It is a mediocre lounge at best, despite its dome feature that forces you to spend $400 on better-than-pub food but subpar resto food....More
We had dinner in the Winterlust pod, which was a unique and beautiful setting. However, for the $500 min spend, I expected better food quality. The carpaccio was just okay and the expensive steak we ordered was inedible. The steak look pretty but every single...More
Concept is exceptional but the food and wait for its arrival questionable. In a heated, well decorated with music dome, bench with pillows blankets and a view of the water/boats....magical BUT is it worth the price? This being my second visit I have to say...More
The ambiance is beautiful. The quality of the food was very poor in my opinion for the cost. Under seasoned and not very fresh. Save your money and try something better
We visited a couple times in August while were staying at the hotel. We sat both inside and outside on the patio during our stay. We really enjoyed many of the items on the small bites menu including oysters, burrata, scallop & prawn ceviche, and...More
I came for dinner with a friend. Tried the salmon and the pork belly. pork belly was great, salmon too. would recommend the food. patio outside is nice. service is great. good area to walk around in after a meal too. Only a few things...More
The first impression is always the most lasting impression. I have been in customer service in many facets my entire career (over 40 years) and have dined in all levels of restaurants, but have never encountered this type of arrogance at the hostess stand or...More
Omg! The Winterlust domes and service were amazing. The servers were attentive and knowledgeable. The menu was creative, fresh and delicious, catering for all dietary needs. The cocktail menu was inventive and fun with a few interesting twists. The H Tasting Lounge is reasonably priced...More
We made reservations for Winterlust to celebrate two of our friend's birthdays. We were initially waitlisted specifically for the Winterlust experience and were ecstatic when we received an email confirming our reservation. As we were under the impression that we were waitlisted for Winterlust as...More
Parking is across the street, the hotel front entrance appear dated, and the public washroom needs a facelift. But then there is the Domes which is situated on the ground floor. The service was very good and the food was equally good. The Dome was...More
Six friends enjoyed a great dinner inside a spacious warm, music enhanced DOME, on a rainy, chilly Vancouver evening. The food was delicious (especially the Tomahawk ribeye steak and brussels sprouts) Service from Judy was impeccable. There are only five of these unique tables. Reserve...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13164103-Reviews-H_Tasting_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
H2 Kitchen + Bar,"We had a wonderful Easter Sunday Brunch at the H2 Kitchen yesterday , located at Western Bayshore , it is our first time all the sibling have the opportunities to sit down together with our mum for Easter Sunday Brunch , way back less to...More
My wife and I stayed at the Bayshore Westin for the night before embarking on an Alaska cruise. We were beat from flying across the USA. We split 1/2 rotisserie chicken. It came with cries and cols slaw. It was good and we couldn’t finish...More
H2 Kitchen is located in the Westin Bayshore Hotel and has a delicious breakfast buffet! Highly recommend for the food and great location right on the water and close to Stanley Park!
This is going to be an uncharacteristically brief review because our experience, at H2 Kitchen + Bar, is limited to their room service menu, which is far more compact than the standard restaurant menu (viewable online). Located inside the Westin Bayshore, H2 burst onto the...More
Great food and service!! We ordered burger and pulled pork for dinner. Our waitress helped me with drinks selection. Will be back for sure
Good service. Ordered off the menu and enjoyed the food. It was a little pricey but no wait and very convenient.
We visited several times for breakfast while staying at the Westin Bayshore. We did the breakfast buffet once and ordered from the a la carte menu a couple times. The breakfast buffet was good but wasn't worth $39 per person. The a la carte items...More
Ordered the ribs and white meat chicken combo for dinner. Baked beans and cornbread for my sides. I picked the cornbread because it came with honey butter. What a great choice. The dinner also came with a tiny pitcher of chicken gravy. A savory treat...More
We ended up at the hotel restaurant at the end of the work day on Friday. Most of us ordered the roast chicken specialty. I had the New York steak. Chicken was good. Steak was good but the gravy too salty. Fries and truffle fries...More
The ambience of this lounge is fenomenal. I had the clam chowder, the octapus salad and creme brulee. 1. The Clam chowder was delicious and well presented, 2. The octapus salad had a very nice presentation however, the octapus was rubbry and hard to chew,...More
We tried H2. the day of our departure from the Westin Bayshore the restaurant is located in. I had the avocado toast, with poached eggs, and my boyfriend had the peach&mascarpone stuffed french toast with blueberry compote. Although we prefered. each others meals so decided...More
Hot food served cold on cold plates. Eggs Benedict, firm artificial tasting sauce. Omelette not cooked to order, rubbery consistency, , scraps of salmon dry, did not taste like smoked as on menu. Bacon, eggs, and just half small tomato amid masses of non crispy...More
I was staying at the Westin Bayshore with my family for a staycation. As an elite Marriot member, I was entitled to free breakfast at H2, so tried it twice. I tried the following: - Classic Old Faithful - OK. The standard Canadian/American breakfast. Decent...More
Visited a friend staying at the Bayshore with my niece and nephew. Had their DELICIOUS S'mores dessert which the kids talked about all the way home! Friendly and efficient service on a quiet Sunday. We shared their rotisserie chicken with crispy Brussels and some really...More
Hi AlexaJ1776, Thank you for choosing H2 Rotisserie & Bar and reviewing your recent experience. The delicious s'mores dessert was definitely an excellent choice! I'm happy to hear that you and your family had a wonderful time with us and that you had the opportunity...More
This restaurant was a nice discovery. I have to admit I have never noticed it before, because the entrance is inside the hotel and from the street it is only visible its sister H - Tasting Lounge. The food was very interesting, I had no...More
Hi Elisabetta V, Thank you for choosing H2 Rotisserie & Bar and reviewing your recent experience. It is a pleasure to receive your glowing review and to hear that you enjoyed the crispy Brussels sprouts and breathtaking Coal Harbour view. The signature cocktails serve as...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12498324-Reviews-H2_Kitchen_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
HK B.B.Q. Master,"We arrived 15 minutes before store open for take out. Entrance is from Parking garage. Ordered Bbq pork, Soya chicken, Roast Pork. All foods are tasty especially Soya chicken. The meat is juicy and tender. They only accept cash. Service is great and quick.
This restaurant is one of several restaurants located in the garage structure of the Real Canadian Superstore on No. 3 Road. Our group visited this place and got seated within 10 minutes (note: the crazy long line is for takeout; just go towards the door...More
Today's New Year's Eve , I lined up at ten o'clock in the morning to buy roast pork. There were around 40+ people in the lineup, I thought it was not too bad, it should be ready within an hour, but I was fooled, because...More
The first 5 mins upon getting your order, that is when the meats tasted heavenly! Roast pork, duck, chicken and especially bbq pork - all breaks up so easily in your mouth. After that initial 5 minutes though, once food has turned ‘cold’, the meats...More
This the BEST tasting BBQ you will find anywhere on this planet bar none. The service extremely quick and efficient. I travel often from Victoria, BC on Vancouver Island just for this experience. Do give this cuisine a try as you work through your bucket...More
Very tasty, very quick, and affordable. We were looking for something exactly like this, but the place we choose online, was not open for a few more hours. So we went with the next closest place that was open. We were so lucky to have...More
I can't believe how the taste of their barbecue duck has deteriorated. I used to love eating their bbq duck and roast pork. I bought a whole one last week and had it chopped up. To my disappointment, it didn't taste as good as before....More
I ordered take out food last week and I noticed that the person handling and cutting the meats were not wearing gloves. He was touching the meats with his bare hands. That was not safe handling of food, particularly in this environment of Covid 19...More
I'd come back to Vancouver just to eat here! We ate dinner around 7pm, so most things were already sold out. We got what was left: the cha siu and the soy sauce chicken over rice. Both preparations were incredibly juicy and tender! The salty...More
Amazing spot under the Superstore in Richmond. All the food looks and tastes fresh! I highly recommend checking this place out, always go early as there is always a line. Their service is fast, so lines do move quick in the take out line. They...More
This little place is usually packed and has a line going out the door. They sell various different BBQ Chinese meat products. BBQ chicken pork and other things. It is served up fast and not very expensive. The staff was very helpful and calling me...More
The restaurant in carpark below the supermarket. Their sitting area was under renovation and only 6 seats were available in the restaurant. The food is very good but the floor of the restaurant is very slippery. The roast duck was exceptionally succelent.
We went there 3 years ago on a previous visit to the area , according to my 13 year old, this place has the best cha siu on the Continent. We went back for a repeat visit and he said that the cha siu is...More
Food is overrated; the char Siew is too dry. The service is bad especially the attitude of the waitress. She needs to learn to patiently explain to customers when there is a perceived queue cutting that she initiated. The place was recommended by a local...More
First off this place serves up affine variety a chinese-style barbecued Meats. The roast duck, crispy roast pork and BBQ pork where all very tasty. I've been on the Southeast side from over brining but, hey, it's Chinese food. Two things that really put me...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1605529-Reviews-HK_B_B_Q_Master-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Hachi Hana,"Although I already have my favourite sushi restaurant in the area, a friend of ours treated us to a sushi dinner here at Hachi Hana. It was delicious! The Salmon Oshi is full of flavour and really good, quality sushi. However, this review is not...More
We found this restaurant after our outing at the Lynn canyon park. The service was great. Waiter brought us a pot of tea when he noticed we drink a lot of tea. Food are fantastic; prices are very reasonable with big portions. We ordered Uni...More
I often go for lunch, great place to meet a friend or family. Great menu, excellent food and amazing service and so friendly from the front of restaurant staff to kitchen staff. Always attentive and caring.
Great food and exceptional service. Full dining room and non stop takeout, still service was fast, food was very tasty and very nicely presented. Excellent value for the money.
As the title says, place is still great, good and cozy atmosphere, good selection of sushi/nigiri and other Japanese treats and really nice service!
Looks like this hasn't been reviewed in a while so wanted to write a short review to confirm it is still excellent! We went last night and had a variety of food from the menu, inlcuding Nigiri, Maki, Hand Rolls and Udon. Really great service...More
They opened at 11:30am. We were right on time; first to arrive. Ordered and received nicely presented meals that tasted great. Sunomono came with a heap of fresh salad veggies on top. Loved it. The restaurant filled up fast; always a good indicator. Service was...More
We had a craving for Tempura and a review of their menu indicated that they had a good selection of different Tempura dishes. We both ordered the Deluxe Seafood Tempura and it was very good. The Tempura batter was very light but we were both...More
This is a favourite place to go for sushi when we are in the area of central Lonsdale Ave. The service is quick and the sushi is fresh. Strongly recommend it!
My favourite Japanese restaurant in North Vancouver. Excellent quality salmon sashimi and the tempura prawns are always great. Service always friendly and quick.
Came here on a recommendation and I wasn’t disappointed! I only ever eat rolls but I decided to have some raw fish (smoked salmon and regular salmon) and I loved it! And the rolls are great too
Vancouverites know sushi (well as much as I'd possible outside Japan), and this place is excellent. It is owned and run by Japanese chefs and waiters, and the food is outstanding. Seriously fresh, delicious, tasty sushi treats. It's not fancy and has a relaxed atmosphere,...More
I am not a fan of Japanese food, and haven't been to a Japanese restaurant for about 6 years. This place is very nice, the staff are just lovely. I had ramen, people I was with had teriyaki and a rice bowl that they both...More
Sushi is fresh and tasty, properly prepared, service is speedy, menu extensive. Great place to go if you want quality sushi.
Walked in one chilly night without a reservation, and the delightful team here were able to accommodate us. Nice sushi, helpful staff. I recommend it.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d3385414-Reviews-Hachi_Hana-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hamaei Sushi,"Excellent sushi! We were really impressed with the sushi here. The restaurant is more of a hole in the wall in an assuming strip mall but don’t let that fool you. The dishes were incredible and very fresh. Restaurant was packed and turnover is fast...More
Bought Pickled Seaweed Salad, Gomae, Miso Soup, Agedashi Tofu, BC Roll, Dynamite Roll (not temaki style) Yam Tempura Roll (not temaki style) Rolls lacked flavour. BC Roll didn’t taste fresh. Nor did the dynamite roll. A big disappointment.
Appears to be under new management/owners. Previously very popular, almost empty on our return. Service limited, slow and apparently inexperienced, food poorly presented and most un-Japanese. After many years, this was hugely disappointing and perhaps explains the absence of customers.
Small sushi restaurant but excellent all round. Extensive sushi and sashimi menu. The fish is very fresh indeed. Very good service as good quality sake.
So happy that Hamaei has resumed serving indoors. We’ve had lunch and dinner in the past 10 days. The food quality is incredible. Service is outstanding. And it is priced correctly. What more could you ask for? You want a Japanese cuisine restaurant in the...More
This restaurant stands tested even under covid condition. Thank you for serving the community with high consistency quality food and service.
Went with wife and six year-old. Agedashi tofu, gyoza, seaweed salad, and miso for apps were great. Sushi was v. fresh and authentic with highlights being uni, ama-ebi, tobiko, and o-toro. Small charming place with atmosphere and friendly and attentive staff. 10/10.
We went there for kaiseki (Tasting menu)dinner which requires reservation. They presented each dish with creativity, and responsibility. The ingredients are fresh and delicious. Really impressed. They actually made an ice bowl for the sashimi, which you can check out in the first photo.
Here more than half of the customers are Japanese. Everything here evokes Japan: small restaurant, moderate amount of serving, rigid choice of fresh ingredients, beautiful presentation. I was there with several Japanese friends and shared many dishes to celebrate one member’s birthday. The dishes were...More
This restaurant reminds me of Japan. The sushi, dishes are authentic and excellent. Consistently the best sushi and Japanese food in the Vancouver area.
I have been a regular visitor to Hamaei years and love their assortment of sushi, sashimi, and other delicacies. Their selection is noticeably fresher than most of the other standards on the north shore and even Vancouver. Their tuna and yellowtail options are particularly wonderful...More
Wow, what a find! Especially in a busy but sedate shopping strip mall. The good is authentic and very good. The restaurant is small and fills up fast but go to lunch early and you should be fine. Definitely get the bento boxes...some of the...More
Traditional Japanese restaurant, by japanese, the quality of the food...the friendly service...and fair prices...make this restaurant a top alternative ... what ever you choose...sushi...sashimi...rolls...or else...you can't go wrong...it's all delicious...
Ive been to this wonderful restaurant about a dozen times. I keep coming back because of the high-quality sushi and great service. The reason for the “Shocked” review title is the following. One of the sushi chefs in front of me went to the sink...More
We have been going to Hamaei Sushi for many years and just want to add our comments even though many people already enjoy this great restaurant. And writing a good review is kinda like shooting yourself in the foot, as it will be more difficult...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2446852-Reviews-Hamaei_Sushi-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hapa Izakaya Yaletown,"Our last evening in Vancouver and my husband asked for sushi. We saw this restaurant when we visited Yaletown last evening and I booked via Google. We were greeted by Justin who made us feel so welcome. Explained everything and we were looked after by...More
Have been eating at Hapa for 20 years since it first opened on Robson in 2003. The staff are always awesome and the food excellent, with a great atmosphere. Justin always goes out of his way to make my family welcome and he is one...More
We visit this lovely vibe restaurant following my fellow TA advisors!! Thanks for a delicious meal and service!! Love this place and will come back!
I've been to Japan, and the food here is of equal or better quality. I was SO happy that my friend suggested this place. I will be a repeat customer, when in Vancouver.
Food was delicious but the staff is AMAZING. I was sitting at the bar and a guy bought me a drink but then started to harass me (trying to get me to kiss him). The staff IMMEDIATELY caught on and just covered my bill and...More
Very trendy Japanese tapa Style restaurant ,very relax but little dark with my liking , sidewalk patio is great and comfortable ,,menu nothing out standing , but it is tapa , lot to choose from , cold or hot , portion size little small ,but...More
this a tiny Japanese restaurant, they do serve an authentic Japanese food, very agreable and good food, good price, all in all i do recommend this place.
Really nice meal and great atmosphere. Server was very attentive and all the dishes were creative and delicious.
We ordered a variety of options for delivery and all were delivered hot and very well presented. Every item was delicious and we had a great time sharing and comparing dishes. We have just heard that Hapa has reopened for dine-in and will be booking...More
I've been going to Hapa since the original open 15 years ago or so. Justin Ault ""invented"" the Izakaya experience for Vancouver. Over the years it has been a regular dinner event, place for big family meals and to take out of town guests. Hapa...More
Beautiful restaurant, food is delicious. Came here for a romantic meal and came here with friends. Service is fantastic. I would really recommend coming here.
Love everything about Hapa. The food is delicious, the service is fantastic, and the environment in Yaletown is pretty cool!
Still the same great atmosphere here ,it’s been 5 years since my last visit.menu seems the same. Service was very good It did seem to me that the portions have changed quite a bit with much less of the protein let’s say in the rice...More
Very nice Isakaya style pub with a very good food and drinks. Enjoyed the evening with very tasty food and drinks. Great menu and able to select various dishes
I have never had a bad experience at Hapa with the food and service. Everyone I have ever interacted with here has always been friendly and service has always been great in my experience. The food has always been on point. I always make it...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1998672-Reviews-Hapa_Izakaya_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Happy Lamb Hot Pot,"I went here with a friend back in Jan 5th for lunch. We couldn’t go to Dolar Shop after having trouble finding a table. The restaurant was quite slow around 2PM because most people prefer dining at Dolar Shop I assume. We had a great...More
It is a while since my last not thrilled visit , my business partner she convincing me it is under new management , 100% different concept , well , comes to Food , I never say No ! also I have to update her about...More
The food and service were excellent. I am sure you can't find any this all you can eat hotpot anywhere. Price are reasonable and you should not have any complaints. They are using top meat and quality food. They won't give you garbage food. That...More
Nice with a bar counter to get your sauces and condiments. The restaurant was clean and followed health guidelines. We made reservations and were seated on time.
Had the AYCE of normal and spicy broth. The quantity in very generous and you will not be disappointed by the place. The meat is tender and soft (very delicious), while the veggies take on the flavor of the broth very nicely. There is free...More
Another nice hot pot meal here.  Reliable well prepared food and service. We left plenty full and satisfied.  We like having half regular and half spicy base to dip everything into.  Modern, very clean and well managed restaurant.  Free underground parking available.  Entrance off side...More
This Hot pot place were so good before it is AYCE , I hear the last year business start go down hill . poor quality ,lot of young Asian Kid hang around , one of my friend never try hot pot in her life ,...More
Over two years since our last visit ,Girl Friend #2 last week in Vancouver , she remember this place when she was here in 2017 ,the restaurant is opposite side of Metro Town in Burnaby ,lot of underground parking , is on the second floor...More
I am never hungry when I leave. Even better deal if you can get a voucher. Licensed to serve alcohol or go for the plum juice. There is limited parkade spots or there is street parking.
We were a party of 10 including 2 vegetarians. They advised they were out of their only tomato based broth. Other option offered was just give us hot water. You have got to be kidding. We said could you make some veggie broth up, too...More
Hot pots are always fun and also a wonderful way to socialize with family and friends. We've dined at all 3 locations of the Little Sheep Mongolian Hot Pot and feel that the Richmond location is the most convenient because of the generous parking facilities...More
The hot pot beef was good but lamb lacked flavour. Enjoyed the plum juice that we drank while eating
We've visited the other 2 branches of the Little Sheep Mongolian Hot Pot and we feel that the Richmond location is the most comfortable. The Burnaby unit is nice also but parking is more convenient at the Lansdowne location. In fairness to the Burnaby location...More
If you order all you can eat, and have a big appetite, you will not be disappointed. Prices are reasonable, quality of raw material is above average. If you have only a small appetite, that seems to be a waste. You then go for the...More
I have always been a huge hot pot fan but convincing my not so (food) adventurous other half to have hot pot is another story. However, we managed to convince him to come tonight and stumbled upon a deal on Groupon. If you are looking...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d8003181-Reviews-Happy_Lamb_Hot_Pot-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Harambe,"Went here for lunch with some friends as some of them wanted to try Ethiopian food. I've only tried it once before a long time ago, so was happy to join and try more! We arrived right at open for lunch. Check the restaurant website...More
I love taking friends who have never experienced Ethiopian food or restaurant before. This is my go-to place and I've been coming here for over 20 years. I love everything about it!! The owner, Daniel, does a great job of bringing gorgeous art from Ethiopia...More
Wow! What a lovely lovely place. Felt so authentic though I've not been to Ethiopia but my friend tonight has lived in Sudan. For a Monday evening it was full. Such a great sign. The waitress truly impressed me with her great service and smile...More
Amazing Ethiopian Food! Visiting Vancouver and decided to give this place a try - did not regret it! Great staff as well.
Wonderful Ethiopian dinner! Was my first time eating Ethiopian food and it was just amazing.We all loved it. Shared a platter of meat and vegetables and ate it with this Ethiopian bread , made with Tef, Injera. All very good. Friendly staff and very nice...More
My husband and I were in town visiting family for the weekend and were looking for a place to go for dinner. Our hosts suggested Harambe and we were so glad they did because it was delicious! The injera bread and and the Miser Wot...More
Went for a walk to another spot but saw the Ethiopian sign so I figured this must be the place. I found out my original destination was another block away, regardless it had a very nice menu and explained things well for those not accustomed...More
This restaurant specialises in Eithiopian cuisine so just be ready to go with the flow. Service can be slow as they get very busy very quickly so just chill and enjoy. The food is served with copious amounts of Ethiopian style bread which you can...More
A very unique dining experience in Vancouver. Good food, nice ambiance. Very popular to be sure, as restaurant was at capacity. Most of the Beef items were sold out by our arrival at 7pm, so our choices were very limited. A bit disappointing. As you...More
Girl friend #4 is leaving on the 29 th , so it is our last dinner together ,for the last 10 days ,we ate Fish & Chips , chicken Wings ,Steak , etc ,, so ,I surprise her with Africa Dinner ,"""" Harambe "" restaurant...More
Just wanted to try something different. Ethiopian restaurant. Must be good who got used to the taste. The restaurant is interesting. Nicely decorated. The waitress didn’t wanted to give forks. She said eat with hands as we do but eventually she have. Other than that...More
Vancouver has seen a significant decline in the number of Ethiopian restaurants from a high point around 10 years ago. There are still a couple on Commercial Drive, although I had never tried Harambe before. I was very pleasantly surprised with both the food and...More
Food was good. A little more expensive than other Ethiopian restaurants in the area. Tried the Tej. Very good! Service was excellent.
Had to wait for 45 minutes to get served. Not enough meat served on the platter we ordered. Given that the platter of 5 costed around 80$, it wasn't really worth it.
Looking for something online that was a bit different but still offered vegetarian options we came across Harambe. It turned out to be a great choice. The food was very filling and the method of picking up your food using the flat bread worked really...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1065683-Reviews-Harambe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hariyali Express Indian Cuisine & Bar,"I've actually never eaten in the restaurant, but we've had delivery twice. The first time, it was amazing, very delicious. The second time, just a week later, the food was very salty. I hope next time we order, the food will be less salty because...More
This place is great and stunning! Atmosphere is really amazing and cool. Very tasty and well prepared food and you can choose among many options.I love this service at the place and chef is so friendly with the guests and always take care to offer...More
This used to be the location of Siddhartha, but it has a new owner and chef. There was nothing wrong with Siddhartha, but this is better. Well worth trying if you are a fan of Indian cuisine.
Excellent food and a great service! We will recommend this restaurant totally! We tried a lot of different dishes and they was all fantastic! A great place to come again. It was a pleasure to meet the boss, who worked for many years in our...More
excellent service and the food tastes great, the atmosphere is very romantic. Mango lassi so delicious
First of all, let me say it was an unpretentious visit trying a new Indian restaurant. I’ve read the reviews on this website and decided to give it a shot. Not only it was a festival of flavours that took me and my husband straight...More
We were so impressed by this East Indian restaurant. The food was high quality and very well priced. Creative use of ingredients and spices made this a memorable meal. The staff helped us choose our dishes and everything was fresh and delicious. We will certainly...More
Cozy atmosphere Beautiful decor Tasty food Friendly service Try their chef’s Menu Vegan food menu as well
See my photos and comments. This was beautiful, multicourse. originally created dishes with flavours that leave you guessing at what were all the ingredients in the Indian meal you ate -- so different and creative.
Stumbled upon this little gem with my girlfriend. We were greeted by incredibly friendly staff who were always quick to offer assistance to cater for our needs, we were served delicious food, big portions and it had a very authentic Indian feel. I will definitely...More
Me and 2 of my friends went for dinner on a Monday night at 7pm. The restaurant was clean and quiet. Service was great from the get go, very attentive and friendly. We ordered the appetizer platter, Lamb methi, Tandoori chicken, tamarind prawns with Basmati...More
Stumbled upon this little restaurant and we’re so happy we did. Really delicious and generous portions. Prices were reasonable for the amount and quality of food. Our 3 teenagers loved it!
Food was very good and there was lots of choice, including the option of selecting mild, medium, hot and spicy. Waiters went above and beyond!
I’ve been coming to this restaurant since it opened up years ago, and to this day, it is still quality and consistent in delivering quality dishes. For the best experience go there for dinner and order a la carte. It can cost more than your...More
They serve amazing food – I really enjoyed their Shahi Paneer and Chana Masala. I now want to try everything on their menu. If you order nothing else, their pakoras are to die for. I love their chai too – spiced and sweetened just right...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3598545-Reviews-Hariyali_Express_Indian_Cuisine_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Harold's Kitchen & Bar,"I made reservations 3 days prior to the day we choose to Dine at Harold’s. I received confirmation of my reservation. The day before received another email, saying Looking Forward to your visit and confirm we were still coming. Replayed Yes. Arrived at Restaurant five...More
Had an excellent experience having lunch and dinner in there for my work layover. The food is incredible, plates look beautiful and service is amazing. Specially because of employee Jorge, amazing server!!
Had four meals there, very good food, very good service. All servers were very friendly. All the items we ate were very good.
This restaurant has been in existence for over 30 years, first as the Wayfaring Tree Restaurant and then, following a significant renovation in 2009, as Harold’s Kitchen & Bar. How this eatery got its current name is a heartwarming story: In brief, Harold Cross had...More
Came here for a dinner with friends. Appetizers were all excellent, and a great Happy Hour deal. Entrees were equally good. Service was fantastic. The only reason I did not give a 5 star rating was lack of "" ambiance"". It's pretty open to the...More
We were guests at the Sheraton Hotel adjacent to this restaurant. Being Pinnacle Elite Marriott members, we were given complimentary appetizers, drinks, and breakfast the next morning. Our food was good, portions very generous, and service impeccable. We were thrilled and highly recommend.
We stayed at the She raton Vancouver Airport for 7 nights and had breakfast and dinner here every night. The food is good, but what made this such fun was the staff. Management has gone through some difficult times with many new staff, for example...More
There was a special section within the restaurant for our tour group of 130 people. Good selection of items. As with many restaurants currently, it was short-handed, but servers did their best to keep buffet filled and beverages filled.
The food is delicious! The bartender (Jo) is outstanding. We stayed here 6 weeks ago and had dinner and drinks at the bar. When we came today he remembered us, our drink order, our food order, where we were from, and even our jobs! Perhaps...More
Harold's Kitchen & Bar is named after a frequent patron, who sadly has recently passed away. However its unique root gives it an unusual flavor. The service was excellent during my two breakfast and my Thanksgiving dinner here. For Thanksgiving (Canadian Thanksgiving is in October),...More
This was a busy place but we ended being seated at the bar which was fine with us! The service, food and ambiance was fantastic! We'd definitely return!
We live nearby and have dined here once previously so we already knew the food was good and the air conditioning would be on. We decided to return due to the heat spell since it was too hot to cook at home. Food is very...More
After a few hours at the Richmond Center mall , my sisters looking for a nice quiet place to take a break ,one of the staff in the mall told us the Sheraton Hotel ,only few mins walk from the mall, it is awhile since...More
We unexpectedly got put up in the Hilton after a flight delay and decided to eat here for supper. We were completely blown away with the service of this restaurant. All staff worked hard to deliver excellent timely service. We had drinks and appetizers along...More
We had the pleasure of meeting jimmy the first night we stayed at the Sheraton. We arrived late for dinner on Friday and he was our server. Very friendly and absolutely made our night. Imagine how lucky we felt when we arrived to dinner the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1439141-Reviews-Harold_s_Kitchen_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Hart House Restaurant,"Eating there it feels like you are at home. The staffs are very friendly they treat you well and they provide you good service and the food was delicious.
Special birthday celebration falls flat with disappointing service & very average food. Hart House used to be impeccable service & above average food worth the price. We spent almost $500 for average food & poor service. They gave us a free dessert coupon for next...More
After a fun visit at Burnaby Village Museum, we popped over the street to have an excellent meal here. My wife and I along with another couple were blown away by the relaxing ambience, the service and especially the menu items we selected. Though I...More
love this restaurant, nice location, friendly staff, and excellent service ; the food is so good. Great spot for Christmas lunch with staff.
Here for a wedding and it was an unreal time. The food was delicious and the service was great. Definitely would come back here again!
I had a lovely dinner here with friends who surprised me as part of a special occasion. The location is great nestled in a quiet area near Burnaby Lake. We were seated in a bright atrium area with lots of natural light and views out...More
We had booked a dinner for 2 person at 4:00 PM months ago to be called today and told it was cancelled due to size restrictions. The restrictions for Bc are for 6 or less so not impressed with the restaurant.
We decided to celebrate our anniversary here. Lovely place with a view of Deer Lake. Menu is limited, especially appetizers and desserts. We didn't like any of the choices for appetizers so didn't order any. Dessert choices were limited. My husband loves chocolate and the...More
What a nice surprise. We've been to the Hart House a few times over the years and found it good. Our return last night found a new Hart House with a significantly improved menu start to finish. The Mussels & Clams appie is not your...More
This is difficult to write. Everything at our lunch for 4 today was perfect. Warmly professional staff, great service, wonderful view, terrific ambience. But the food! One person said her gorgonzola hamburger was the best she’d ever eaten which is saying a lot when she’s...More
COVID dining restrictions still in place so outdoor dining only. Not a huge luncheon menu but the selection interesting including a couple of lamb dishes. Food was very tasty, service warm and attentive (can we shift the umbrella so you are not sitting directly in...More
Our family had a special memorial dinner at Hart House and we were given a private dining room with socially distanced tables, which made us feel very safe. The food was delicious - you could eat the steak with a fork, it was so tender!...More
We made reservations for a Friday night to end a busy week at work for the 2 of us. Though I have been Hart House for summer weddings by the water but I have dined once for company Christmas dinner a long time ago. We...More
Unique setting and ambiance make this a winner. Visited for the Dine out 2021 and was very happy with the overall experience. Food presentation, service were certainly a standout. Overall no complaints.
Family recently attended a small wedding dinner at Hart House. Everyone thought that it was the best wedding meal they had ever had. Would highly recommend the location for the service, quality of food and location overlooking the lake!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d704830-Reviews-Hart_House_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Haru Korean Kitchen,"We enjoyed this little Korean restaurant at the edge of Gastown. Service was friendly and efficient. The menu was inviting with traditional rice bowls etc. Mandu as an appetizer was delicious and savoury. Eight pieces was just right. In other Asian fare, we would call...More
Terrific Korean restaurant! While visiting Vancouver with kids for a week we ate at Haru twice and would have happily eaten here again had we stayed longer. Kids loved it and did I! It’s hard to find authentic Korean food and Haru didn’t disappoint! My...More
Excellent Korean food in the Gastown area. The spicy pork stir fry is outstanding and served sizzling on a hot plate with some yummy sticky rice. Great food, great service!
This was a great find.. I was craving Korean while on holidays and found this gem of a restaurant. Food came or fast and was absolutely delish.. Oh and OUTSTANDING Kim Chi
This cute restaurant stood out when I watched Deadpool whilst still living in Australia, knew it was a must-visit once moving over here! The food is deliciousss! The spicy pork dish is so so sooo bomb! And my partner loved his claypot bulgogi. This was...More
Unassuming little place that packs a lot of flavour. Inexpensive place for lunch. Quick service. Great noodles and spicy chicken. Don’t miss it.
Love this place on cold days, the Bibmbap comes in a scorching hot clay pot. Spice is just right and you can add more heat if you need it. Smalll location that offers take out if you want a seat get there early!
This is a great little gem near Gastown in Vancouver. We stopped by for dinner the other night and enjoyed stone bowl bi-bim-bap and stir fried chicken. Both were excellent and service was good and prompt. Washed down with Soju, it was hard to beat....More
I met a friend here while on vacation in Vancouver, on recommendation from my friend, and I really enjoyed it. I got the kimchi jjigae, which was good. I loved my food.
We had been talking about going to Haru for quite a while and were so happy when we finally did. The first thing you notice when you go in is that it's really cute. The second thing you notice is that it is absolutely immaculately...More
This place has a cute, simple atmosphere but wait staff v attentive. Good, fresh Korean with lots of options
I love BibimBap with fried egg on top. All the veggies in it are grown by the owner's private garden, organic and really fresh.
Like at least one prior reviewer we went based on the local newspaper critic's review. We had the kimchee and pork dumplings, stone bowl bi bim bap with beef, and bulgogi rice. The dumplings lacked any zip and the filling was almost gummy. The two...More
In the Meat and Bread are of Cambie/West Hastings you'll find this nice shop with a number of tables (20-25 seats) Friendly staff and good food. Pricing a little high at lunch time - with Rice Bowls in the $13-18 range. Chicken Noodle Soup was...More
The food here is clean and simple. The sauce is tasty and you can add it to the dishes yourself for added flavour. The decor is modern in a nice location. Definitely a place to check out.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12292538-Reviews-Haru_Korean_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Havana Vancouver,"The first clue that this has become one of the most over-rated restaurants in Vancouver is when you look at the uninspired menu items -- mostly burgers and tacos. Cheap fast food at a premium price. The snapper in my fish taco was so small...More
Hi Donald, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. Our menu is designed to be an approachable combination of Latin flavours with a Pacific Northwest twist as well as a handful of authentic Cuban dishes. I'm sorry to hear we missed...More
Best churros! Cubano sandwich also delicious (and as a side you may order chips and salat half-half which made my child - chips for her! - and me happy at the same time).
My husband and I and 2 adult children went to Havana's for brunch on Mother's Day. The restaurant was very lively and fun. The food was great. We had the Senora, the Clubhouse, and the Chorizo Hash. Very tasty. But the best part of our...More
My friend and I went for dinner there last night. I ordered ceviche which I’ve had many times in Peru or at Peruvian restaurants. For $18 I got a tiny desert cup full of something unrecognizable. I asked “what’s this ?” and was told it’s...More
We both had the Commercial Club, which is a fried chicken sandwich with bacon. It was quite good. Service good. Neighborhood atmosphere, not a special occasion destination. Limited menu was a drawback in my opinion.
We went for a drink and nachos. We ordered a bottle of wine ( Sauvignon Blanc, Dog Point NZ) , it was priced congruent with a restaurant bottle. We were given a carafe of wine. I thought they had made an error, and then the...More
I was a regular here when I used to live in Vancouver. Now that I am in Ontario, I returned as a tourist to see if it was still the same great place that I frequented several years ago. I was happy to learn that...More
Such a wonderful intimate smaller sized theatre to listen to live music and other events. During 2nd Sunday of the month they showcase jazz performers and bringing in great talent. Two ows of bistro table seating. Limited drinks and snacks menu.
Visiting family in Vancouver, they took us to Havana. It was a sunny Friday afternoon and the place was full but we managed to get a seat outside. Tacos and burgers were all good and cocktails were great. Nice relaxed and friendly atmosphere here and...More
Freshest Taco I have ever had! Delicious! Cozy restaurant with a outdoor patio. We went to check out ""Little Italy"" and were not impressed. Expected something like Little Italy in New York. None of the Italian Restaurants enticed us. We saw this restaurant when we...More
You pay for overpriced ""meals"" and get an appetizer size. Drinks are good but the food is very mediocre. Their menu recipes are a complete lie. Their ceviche is an insult, a tiny cup of ceviche served with nacho chips to fill the plate. Their...More
Hi there, Thank you for you taking the time to leave us a review. While I'm glad to hear you enjoyed our drinks, I'm sorry to hear that our food didn't meet your expectations on your visit. I would love to hear any specific feedback...More
Had a couple beers and tacos in a nice vibe. Good eats! Food was fantastic. Definitely recommend to go here..
The beach bowl 2.0 is fantastic. The base ingredients is fresh tasting and just the right combination of goodness. We both had the same but one with chicken and the other with chorizo. The restaurant slightly noisy as you can hear conversations around the room....More
Loved the food and drinks here! The tacos were so good and the staff were so nice. Definitely can't wait to come back here again soon!
Great visit overall. Minor confusion thinking we were eating in the bar when we were just waiting for a table to be cleared. Oh well no biggie, just had to ask someone n wait another minute. Terri our server was awesome!!! Great recommendations for food...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d779609-Reviews-Havana_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hawker's Delight,"We ordered the Laksa, Hainan rice, and Mee goreng. They were all delicious. We would go again to try other dishes.
I ordered a couple of dishes for take out but ate there with my friends. Very affordable prices. I ordered the vegetable curry rice and nasi goreng. Both were very good. This place has so many take out orders. Despite that we were called to...More
Ive been to a couple restaurants in Vancouver to try their Laksas but this place seems to have the best. Great price too.
Having lived in Singapore we used to come to Hawkers a lot pre pandemic. It is probably not the place to go to impress your girl on a first date - pretty basic. Our dish of choice is usually fried guay teow as it was...More
I ordered in ubereats and tried their laksa. The flavours were just right and amazing. I also had their veggie fritters with the sweet sauce and spring rolls. Would recommend this place if you want authentic Singaporean cuisine
Years ago when my mother and I had lunch at the Hawker's Delight, we found that the Singapore dishes we had (cannot remember) were disappointing. This time around after reading the excellent reviews about this tiny eatery I thought I would try it again. The...More
Great authentic, cheap and quick Singaporean food. The flavors were amazing. Great place to dine in or get a quick meal on the go. The place is on the small side and can get very cramped but it gives this place that old school Asian...More
Tried the kuey teow and laksa. Tasted pretty authentic like the ones you can have in singapore hawker centers
This is still a good place to stop by for an inexpensive meal. Prices have gone up over the years but this is closes to hawkers style food that I can find and not have to travel to Singapore of Malaysia for the experience. Small...More
After some years, we went there yesterday and had Laksa and Hainanese Chicken dishes and they were really spectacular!!! Of course reasonably priced too!! I have known the Chef and this place for about 14 years and it really is a well kept secret in...More
I really like this place. Nothing to write home about given its basic decor but the food is great. I had the mee goreng. Huge helping and really tasty. My partner had the longtong sayur. It was a bunch of vegetables and hard boiled eggs...More
Stopped in for a late afternoon snack. We shared the Migoreng - stir fried noodles with tofu, roti with curry dip, spring rolls - crispy, fried onion balls - kind of doughy and not hot enough, puff tofu stuffed with pork and veg. Great, tasty...More
Some good stabs at hawker classics from around Southeast Asia. Some of them come pretty close to the reat thing, probably constrained only by unavailability of some of the more esoteric ingredients needed to make the dishes truly accurate. You can't go wrong with the...More
It's a great little spot on Main street. The food and service are great but a little bit too oily for my taste. It's a small restaurant so it can be quite loud in there.
First time trying Singaporean and we absolutely loved it. The Laksa was just perfect. And it's just so cheap! I'm giving only 4 stars just because the cashier was very rude. But otherwise, great spot.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1067098-Reviews-Hawker_s_Delight-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hawksworth Restaurant,"Review for the bar area for this restaurant inside the Rosewood hotel: classy atmosphere with fantastic service, food, and drinks and an amazing happy hour. Food: 4.5 Service: 5 Atmosphere: 5 Cost to worth it rating: 5 (HH cocktails $7) Return worthiness: yes Eve awards:...More
The dining area has good vibe, but next door bar could be very noisy. We heard a man swearing very loudly, don't know if he was having too much alcohol or just too much fun; The halibut was very tender, yet so salty that we...More
One of the best meals I’ve ever had. The gazpacho was amazing. The pasta was delicious—so was the bread. The dessert was so tasty and even came with a candle and birthday message. The staff was friendly and helpful. Great location and very clean! I...More
Exceptional service made the gourmet fantastic food even better. We had to arrive early to accommodate a concert so we ate early (1700 hours). No issue with making an early reservation. We were greeted immediately by a lovely young lady who seated us quickly. Our...More
An excellent Happy Hour at Hawksworth Bar! The service was top-notch, with friendly staff who went above and beyond to make my experience memorable. The burger was truly excellent, packed with flavor and cooked to perfection. And let's not forget the tasty Manhattan cocktails—they were...More
Great food and service. If you’re looking for a nice meal and fine dining service this is your place.
lots of great staff,, thumping bar music to dine by,, good food but very small portions ( bit like a fat farm), left there still rather hungry ( and we don't eat big - order the $8 bread, you'll need it - smallest creme brule...More
Thank you for providing us with this feedback, we apologize that your recent dining experience did not meet your standards and would like to reassure you that we are committed to upholding the reputation for excellence that we have earned. Would you please contact ac@hawksworthgroup.com...More
Poor experience and poor meal pacing. It took quite a while to receive water and have our order taken but the kitchen denied an order request. Not impressed. Then within a few minutes the appetizers appeared but our wine order had not been served. The...More
Thank you for providing us with this feedback, we are so sorry to hear that we fell short on this occasion and that your dining experience was disappointing. Would you please contact ac@hawksworthgroup.com, so that we may gather some additional information from you, to be...More
A totally wonderful dining experience. We had their tasting menu and everything was delicious and presented beautifully. I wish they were in FL!
A great experience and good night but it felt something was just missing from other top restaurants/tasting menu’s we have experienced - and I’m not sure quite what, to be honest. Had the tasting menu with wine pairings. Great service, but a bit of personality...More
Absolutely would not recommend!! We've been to Hawksworth and Reflections and haven't had any issues in the past. We are on the mailing list for Hawksworth and had received Spring is in the air special at Hawksworth group. Welcoming Spring With a New Menu at...More
Hello, Thank you for providing us with this feedback. We apologize that your recent dining experience did not meet your expectations and that our e-newsletter was ambiguous. Our Easter prix-fixe menu featured ""brunch inspired plates"", such as classic eggs benedict and a canadian breakfast, as...More
We enjoyed gracious, warm, friendly service from the moment we walked through the door. Our appetizer (BC oysters), mains (chicken and lamb) and dessert were delicious and beautifully cooked. Our server and sommelier both deserve extra props! Thank you for making our 38th anniversary so...More
Excellent service in the bar from Joshua and Tom! They took such good care of us and make excellent wine suggestions. Thank you both!
Drinks and service were definitely the star of the show. Our waiter and the entire team made our experience great. The drinks were amazing. The menu was not that inviting for mains and everything came out room temperature which was very disappointing. I have eaten...More
We went here to surprise a friend for her birthday. The staff are incredible. We arrived early and all staff were made aware of the surprise, they disgusted it at the front desk by telling my friend and her husband it was a booking for...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2165844-Reviews-Hawksworth_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Healthy Noodle House,"The food is fresh and clean, the house made hot sauce added perfect amount of heat to the broth. It’s vegan friendly - I’m vegetarian and loved the option with all veggies and buckwheat noodles. Hubby had all veggies and added bbq pork and loved...More
Ticks all the boxes. Great price, vegan offerings, great quality. A regular for me. Will recommend highly
Fast and fresh noodles and soups. Don't blink or you'll miss it kind of a place. Local celebrity testimonials and newspaper reviews adorn the wall. Healthy and delicious. It is tough to find better value nearby.
A simple diner style soup shop. So healthy, so delicious. No MSG, the chicken dumplings are the best.
The meal was delicious and quite healthy. The owner was incredibly friendly and accommodating. Will definitely be going again.
Just eat here. Deelish. Cash only. Bring 15$ per person:) its family owned, the food is fresh and the dumplings are to die for!
We were out for a walk today and decided to try this little noodle soup restaurant. The friendly owner greeted us and explained how to order. This is a small restaurant but comfortable and pleasant. From a paper at the table, you just tick the...More
I quite enjoyed my noodle dish, all items were cooked perfectly and the broth very mild and tasty. I like you can customize your order. You pick your veggies, type of noodle, and then meat toppings. Size of bowl is reasonable but if you have...More
The vegetarian broth is light and flavorful with hints of seaweed and ginger. You can pick from a big list of fresh vegetables and various proteins. The home made hot sauce is HOT and very tasty. This tiny hole in the wall with 4 tables...More
Nestled in a small 10-15 people capacity shop, this unassuming little spot offers an excellent bowl of vegetarian ramen. Choose from a number of different noodle types (thin/thick noodle, udon, soba), which vegetables and (optionally) meat and it's served in a delicious home-made veggie broth....More
Simple. Quiet. Kind service. Unpretentious bowl of noodles. I had the chicken wonton and was quite impressed with the simple Full flavours. Variety of noodle, meat and vegetable combinations to be had and a very kind man behind the counter. Door seems to be locked...More
The soup stock is subtly flavorful and provides the perfect starting point for their amazing noodle soup. You pick the type of noodle (wheat based, rice noodles etc), loads of fresh vegetable, and either meat/fish or tofu topping. You can also add sumptuous dumplings to...More
This was just a surprise to find this little gem. Low key hole in the wall diner that we thought we'd try. WOW, everything made fresh everything tasted amazingly good and the price was very reasonable. The pleasant owner greeted us sat us down and...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10631825-Reviews-Healthy_Noodle_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Heirloom Vegetarian,"Since closing their lunch bar on Granville , I decided to go the restaurant and take out. I ordered a kale Caesar and small mushroom soup. Upon arriving home , I find I was given tomato soup. I called them-,of course they’re sorry. That doesn’t...More
Great brunch spot. We enjoyed their Heirloom salad and grilled cheese with heirloom tomatoes soup. Plentiful sized meal with great taste.
We had a really lovely vegetarian breakfast at Heirloom on Saturday, I had the Heirloom Hash and my boyfriend had the Heirloom Breakfast, and they were both lovely. Very polite and courteous service from the waitress and we were so full up after we'd eaten!...More
Great place! Went to lunch with friends, didn't knew the restaurant, but got out really satisfied. Host Heloisa was very polite and careful!
Terrible service. Took forever and made me pay for something I couldn’t eat. Every time we asked server for something she would take 10-20 minutes to come back to us, even just to get the machine to pay the bill.
Heirloom is a lovely restaurant with high ceilings and friendly staff overall. I found the food good but not amazing. Truffle fries though were delicious.
This was an excellent experience. 3 of our party had serious allergies and our server made sure to check with the kitchen to accommodate us. The food was delicious and quite filling and the service was above average. Will definitely be returning.
Once gain he food here never disappoints. We had an amazing server called Eoin. Very attentive but non intrusive and genuinely engaged with us.
Lunch with co-workers. Decided to go healthy. Plant based food very tasty. I had the Sante Fe “chicken” salad - very fresh greens and the plant based chicken pretty close to the real thing too. Tacos, falafel burger, tomato soup and cauliflower tastes very good...More
In a forest of “same old” restaurants this place is an oasis. With so many vegetarian restaurants basically offering deep fried hummus and beyond meat excuses this place nails it. Great cocktails, good wine list and tonight we had the share plate menu which was...More
I have not eaten out much since March. The restaurant came highly recommended from a vegan friend. My daughter and I enjoyed beautiful food with great service in a very safe and covid friendly environment ! Thank you.
The decor and ambiance is nice. Service is very good. Food was yummy, but not worth a 5 star review. I would go back. The table had the ninja bowl, fried cauliflower (not pictured) as well as the jack fruit and artichoke tacos. I prefer...More
Come here everytime we are in Vancouver for breakfast, the vegan pancakes and vegan eggs Benedict are AMAZINGGG. Lunch food is all super tasty too!!
THE BEST VEGETARIAN/ VEGAN food. By no means do you need to be vegetarian to enjoy their food. Delicious. Great spot for brunch. This is definitely one of my favourite spots in Vancouver.
This is a beautiful, spacious restaurant with very fresh ingredients and nice menu. My lunch was simple and delicious. My girlfriend loves this place and is a regular.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3627158-Reviews-Heirloom_Vegetarian-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Heirs Pears,"We came in here our first morning in Vancouver and had the best experience. They didn't have much on the menu for vegans, so I just asked for a bagel and avocado, the server spoke to the chef and he made me the most incredible,...More
Sam was very welcoming and friendly. The food was amazing, best gluten free pizza we’ve ever had! The broccoli squash salad was so delicious and the dessert was spot on as well. Wish I had taken a photo of the supper meal. But view the...More
Must visit! The food and service were friendly and fantastic. You will not be disappointed. I had a bagel or salmon and it was the best I’ve ever had. My wife had chicken Shawarma sandwich and loved it.
The only 100% gluten free in Vancouver. The best, jerk chicken is the best i had! You feel like familly, they are amazing
What a fantastic find in Vancouver! We went most days for brunch and my husband who is not gluten free even said it was one of the best breakfasts he's ever had! The service is great. Food is quick and convenient and most importantly -...More
Came here about 3/4 times in my week in Vancouver. The chef was absolutely fantastic. What a great person. He gave me tips on travel to whistler, greeted me every morning with a smile and asked about my girlfriend after just one conversation the day...More
At last a great gluten free breakfast, not missing out on toast, sausages etc. Really tasty breakfast with 2 poached eggs, bacon, sausages, gf sour dough toast, hash browns and hollandaise sauce. Yum! Plus all at a very fair price. Will be back later for...More
A good range of tasty food available all day. Good Americano black. Friendly staff. Gluten free is a speciality.
Excellent food (everything is gluten free), fab coffees and very friendly staff. We ate breakfast in this restaurant for a week and we would definately eat here again when we return to Vancouver.
Amazing food great atmosphere, Sam is so so fun, ask for the special ! If you’re in Vancouver come here !
My wife and I split the veggie omelette, which came with GF toast and a nice green salad with yummy honey mustard vinaigrette. It was really amazing! Nice coffees and assortment of teas, too. The surprise star was their homemade strawberry jam! You’d love this...More
Fellow GFers, you know how delightful (and relaxing?) it is to find a place where EVERYTHING is safe for you to eat? A place where ALL the pastries are for you, and your only concern is whether you can fit them all in? Heirs Pears...More
Beautiful combination of tastes, perfectly balanced plate. Amazing. A must stop every time I visit Vancouver. No Joke
We were visiting Vancouver and stayed at the Level on Seymour. Saw this little restaurant on the corner and decided to give it a try. When we walked in, at first glance the menu appeared to be for a sophisticated palette. So happy we weren’t...More
Such a fabulous breakfast, super gf everything which my non gf friends also liked and the staff were so lovely and friendly, thank you for a refreshing break from the worries of Covid with your Friendliness and kindness.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15835400-Reviews-Heirs_Pears-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Helen's Grill,"This is the perfect diner . Food , price , service , ambience , location ( Main and 25th ) . All of these factors “ hit the mark “, Fabulous for breakfast , brunch and lunch . Maybe dinner as well . Great menu...More
Great spot for my first time diner experience in Canada. Me and my partner had breakfast here on the first day of our holiday in Vancouver. We were hungry and ready for a big breakfast so Helen’s Grill did not disappoint! I had a classic...More
Great period-piece diner. Great food and service, exactly what you would expect from this type of restaurant.
This restaurant been on the same location almost a half century !it is 50/60 old style dinner decor , ,Juke Box on every booth ,and long counter ! same family run , before the Covid 19 ,this restaurant so busy from open to closed ,lot...More
This is a charming, little restaurant that has stood the test of time. I had two poached eggs, toast and hash browns. The food was good and hot. I love the quaint, historical aspect of this place. The server was nice too.
Old school. Jukeboxes. Burgers. Clubhouse sandwiches. Booths Doing it 70s style Food is pretty good. Portions are generous. I will be back!
This is a place for good old mom and pop dining experience. Booths with individual juke boxes, good old fashioned dining options. Good soups, entrees, etc. Their spaghetti is delicious, their Salisbury Steak delicious. Never been disappointed here. A loyal following eat here. This place...More
Used to eat here 50 years ago when my dad had his body shop down the street. What an experience, like going back in time, food good, service good, music from old time jukebox good, unbelievable time machine. Glad they are still there. Good hearty...More
The breakfast portions are generous. All the staff are friendly and attentive. They are patient and compassionate when they deal with my Father who has dementia and goes to the Diner on his own. The place has kept the same nostalgic ambiance from the 1970s...More
Enjoyed a late Breakfast at Helens. We had a traditional order with eggs, omelette and pancakes. Really nice and hit the spot. Service was attentive and we enjoyed the whole experience.
Sunday brunch for four in a booth. Perfect service, food and atmosphere. It simply does not get better than this. Coffee is great and unlimited. The whole place reminds me if eating dinner here in the 70's authentic nostalgia. Great menu and the food comes...More
Saw this on the net, and gave it a try. parking at the back BIG PLUS.I had the beef dip, could have been a little more meat, but the jus was good, bun was fresh and crispy, fries were good, real cut potatoes, nice 50's...More
I remember dropping in for lunch at this diner when my family had a business down on Main Street several decades ago. It served wholesome food..nothing fancy. That was before the influx of international cuisine and fusion style cooking and certainly our tastebuds evolved beyond...More
We used to come here all the time but much less so after moving. The food is always delicious, it takes a little bit longer but it’s because they are actually cooked to order. You have to get a milkshake when you’re there too.
If a diner breakfast is what you're hankering after you may have come to the right place. And maybe not... Booths, jukeboxes and retro decor are intact. Service is great - fast and friendly. My only complaint is the price for what you get. What...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3978336-Reviews-Helen_s_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hello Nori,"Stopped by for a quick dinner. The rolls take a bit to come, especially if it's busy, but they are fresh and tasty. It is supposed to be an izakaya style place, so sip your beer and drinks and chat with your companions. You will...More
Hi 298gabrielae, thank you for your glowing words. We look forward to having you back soon!
This place won’t disappoint you!! The sushi hand rolls here are fabulous and extremely fresh. They are all made in front of you, which is a cool experience! Blake was our server and he was really attentive and friendly. Thank you Blake for making it...More
Hi 995thyt, thank you for your 5 star rating! We look forward to seeing you back.
Really like the vibe of the restaurant, it’s very casual and friendly as soon as you walk in. Blake was incredibly friendly greeting us and taking our initial order. He was knowledgeable about the menu and very quick at delivering on our order. The cook...More
Thank you for your review, Dashedhopes117! We are glad to hear you enjoyed your experience, and look forward to having you back.
Amazing hand rolls, food is so fresh the seaweed is even crunchy and the rice hot when they serve it to you. Our server Laura was the BEST, incredibly attentive and solved all our questions. We ordered the 6 piece set menu and salmon Oshi,...More
Thank you for rating, Laura! We look forward to having you back.
Amazing experience and great service. Hiroki provided great service. Food was delicious and service was fast. Definitely recommended visiting this place when you are in Vancouver.
Arminee2023, thank you for your rating! We look forward to having you back!
The rolls are delicious and made right in front of you! Melanie was such a great server, and answered all of our questions happily. It was so special that her and Leo brought out mochi with a birthday candle for my friend’s birthday. Such a...More
Thank you very much for your review! We are very happy to hear that you had a great experience with us. We look forward to having you back!
Interesting and ""new to me"" options...very fresh and tasty. Also fun to have the front row seat to watch preparation. Great ambiance and staff!
julijoyeux, thank you very much for your rating! We look forward to having you back!
Excellent quality of food and services, staff are very friendly, very clean. I’m very happy to choose the right place, not only me but the whole group (9 people) are very pleased with the quality. We’ll definitely will be back if we’re in the area.
Hi 975haid, thank you very much for leaving us a review! We look forward to having you back!
I think this restaurant is seriously overpriced. Ingredients are not any better from other sushi places in downtown. They claim to have fresh ingredients, but honestly many other sushi places do just the same. I will admit that they are better than T&T sushi, but...More
89ignatiusc, we would like to learn more about your experience. Please contact us at info@hellonori.com. Thank you.
We were in Vancouver for the weekend, and someone we met, when I said we loved sushi, suggested Hello Nori for lunch. We got there around noon. Our “servers,” in quotes because it’s a sushi-bar, were Carla and Clem. They were friendly, fast, and attentive....More
Hi S304AAnicolasa, thank you very much for taking the time to share your experience with us and the community! We look forward to having you back!
Landed in Vancouver about 90 minutes before finding ourselves jn Hello Nuri. Absolutely sensational. Can’t compare it to other Vancouver options, but compared to UK options - we loved it. Great food. Really fresh. Amazing friendly and attentive service. Kyoka was amazing and helpful with...More
Hi akaZimmerman, thank you for your review! We are delighted to hear how much you enjoyed your experience with us right off the plane. We look forward to seeing you again!
Hello Nori Interesting and popular experience trend. The customer service was wonderful and the individual handroll prepared in front of you, when you are ready could not be any fresher. Fresh seafood in a crisp nori seaweed wrap. The rolls are fairly small and the...More
Hello global3adventure! Thank you for taking the time to experience Hello Nori and sharing your feedback with us and the community. We are proud to deliver fresh and sustainable seafood in our unique style of fast fine dining. For next time, try biting both ends...More
Firstly, I think the service and quality of the food is actually quite good. I was there a few months ago and really enjoyed the experience. So I went back again recently and although it is still good, the novelty has worn off. It is...More
Hi trophyfoodexperience! We truly appreciate your detailed review and are happy to hear that you enjoyed your time with us a second time. There is a technique to eating our rolls to prevent the filling from falling out: bite both ends first and then enjoy...More
Last night in Vancouver before heading away from the coast to go home and wanted sushi.... So glad we came across here, it was more than great sushi, it was an experience. We were seated fairly quickly even though it was full when we arrived,...More
Michelle, thank you so much for wonderful review! We epitomize the concept of 'Fast Fine Dining.' Our goal is to create the best possible experience for our guests through high-quality food and first-class service in a fine-dining atmosphere with a sophisticated architectural design. While you...More
The food was great and the service was even better! Quick and efficient! Thank you for the great experience Cody!
Thank you, Rachael! We truly appreciate your taking the time to experience Hello Nori and for sharing your feedback with the community and us. We look forward to having you back!",30,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21357744-Reviews-Hello_Nori-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hendricks Resto Lounge,"Fabulous meal - stumbled on by chance. The menu is set exactly right with its variety. What they make they do incredibly well. Compliments to the chef for the superb food and exquisite presentation. Warm and attentive service with recommendations. Thanks especially to our waiter...More
One of our servers/hosts was super nice, very helpful, accommodating of our needs and lovely. She was amazing! Another one of our servers was also very nice and helpful, but not all of them were as gracious or friendly. I tried the chicken schnitzel and...More
Our party of eight was too tired to want to go out to a restaurant, so we decided just to eat at the small restaurant in the Hilton Hotel. Service was very good - we were seated quickly even without a reservation, got our drinks,...More
The Hilton’s elevators took a siesta on a Friday afternoon in November, and we waited out their schnooze in the Hilton’s bar named Hendrick’s. Hendrick’s would be an average hotel bar located in a middle of the road Hilton if it wasn’t for the kind...More
We had breakfast here every day or our stay at the Hilton Vancouver Downtown. Also, when we were too tired to go out for dinner after a long day, we did mot hesitate just to stay on the property and eat here. The kitchen does...More
We were looking around for a quick bite and drinks before the hockey game and found the Hendricks inside the Hilton hotel. We were all impressed with our food, every dish was great. This will definitely be a place we slide into before games, 5...More
Staff are very friendly and attentive. Nice to get a warm welcome and chats from the waiters. The food is tasty and comforting rather than experimental. I stayed in hotel so location was convenient! Not fine dining but good food served extremely well.
Menu was good with GF options. Was a crazy busy holiday weekend but we got taken pretty quick, service was good and food was very good. We were not staying at the hotel but were treated same as guests, Server was excellent.
A hidden gem in the city. Food is amazing & excellent service.It is an excellent place for a drink and a bite.
About a 10 minute walk from Rogers Arena. Their burger was quite good and the beet salad was excellent although it would probably have been a bit small if I was eating it as a meal.
Ate here for 2 breakfasts and one lunch. Service by 3 different staff was superb. Couldn't been more helpful. The breakfast buffet has a couple choices, full and continental- eggs to order and a very nice spread with both cold meats/cheeses, hot line and plenty...More
Waiting to be seated for dinner...hostess walked by several times without even acknowledging presence...after 5 mins we left and went out to eat and had great service elsewhere...avoid this place....
We came to the lounge for a drink and found the experience off-putting. The waitress passed by our table several times but never acknowledged our presence. The bartender was so caught up in conducting a very loud conversation with two individuals at the bar that...More
I stayed at the Westin but I never ate at Hendricks. It never looked very busy. I did have drinks here one evening. The service was prompt and friendly. The cocktail was decent.
The restaurant was not crowded, yet we had to wait quite a long time to get the menus. When the server was filling the water glasses, he only had enough water for half the glasses. He said he'd be back, and took 20 minutes before...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12334663-Reviews-Hendricks_Resto_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hida Takayama Ramen,"Hida Takayama Ramen has to be one of the finest ramen houses in existence. It's not a fancy place in any way so if you only care for a certain ambiance in a restaurant, don't bother or waste their time. I don't go to a...More
The broth has deep flavor. The noodles are perfect. Overall, a great bowl of ramen for a good price. Cash only so be prepared. Plenty of parking in the underground parking...access from back alley.
Hida is located in the Robson market, which has seen better days. It is the back corner so you will need to look for it. The noodles are made on location and is one of the best in terms of firmness and texture. Once you...More
This place is a hidden gem. Located on the 2nd floor of the Robson Market. It is not as sophisticated in terms of flavours as the other ramen restaurants on Robson but nonetheless it offers great ramen bowls at a less expensive price point. I...More
Delicious ramen for about $8 - $9 a bowl. Miso ramen was outstanding, with lots of home-made noodles, pork slices and excellent broth. Good food. Good price. Location is a bit of a hole-in-the-wall in the 2nd floor food court of an aging mini-mall called...More
Delicious authentic ramen in a run-down, mostly shuttered public market. (Bonus: FREE underground parking - note that it's in the alley behind the building) The soup was delicious. Also note that it's cash or Canadian debit only; if you're visiting from the States, hit the...More
But if you are a ramen lover, you will be blown away! Perfect spot for a lunch, plenty of tables, no line-ups, I have even walked by this place in the past and figured it was not worth trying due to appearance, how wrong I...More
Very few know this place exists. The ramen was quite good but not quite the caliber of a kin taro ramen. However I would go back. The shiro ramen had more pork than the other ramen houses. I would suggest that you upgrade the pork...More
This is a very unlikely spot - inside a rather disorganized mall in Robson St. the ground floor comprises a market, (meat, vegetables, fish etc) and the upstairs floor is a food court.....except that this is only 1 of about 3 places to eat! The...More
Free from lining up, Hida Ramen is located at the second floor of Robson Public Market. Hida Ramen provides rich collagen soup, 33% more noodles, lots of meat and no MSG. You can visit Hida facebook, then ""like"", and you can get extra Chasu! Since...More
I Highly Highly Highly recommend this place. Its the best Ramen in Vancouver, i usually get the spicy. Its cheap, a good sized large portion and particularly tasty.
I found this place on a winter visit to Vancouver. It was so good and hot I went back three days in a row on that trip. I've recommended it to loads of Vancouverites. I went back on my last trip to Vancouver in the...More
There seem to be many ramen restaurants in the Vancouver area. I had not idea this was such a trend as we don't have any where we live. My girls, however, love ramen. It seemed a little expensive to pay upwards of $10 for one...More
Tried this ramen restaurant because it makes the lists of best ramen in Vancouver. Had the miso ramen. The broth is excellent and is the stand out component, the dish overall is good. However, I found the noodles on the bland side. I also think...More
But since I am not, I can certainly say that the chicken and beef broth is sans MSG. Nothing exciting to report on that. The noodle was over cooked just a bit and clumpy. The chashu was flavorful. The gyozas were standard. Now that I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3814777-Reviews-Hida_Takayama_Ramen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hime Sushi,"The sushi here is always right. I had the sashimi bento, good portions of all and tempura was tasty and cleanly cooked. I enjoyed the meal with a spucy choppped scallop roll. I arrived first as an appy..i liked that. The miso i like it...More
Delishious sushi during lunch hour at this Japanese restaurant in Vancouver. Service was fast and servers were polite and helpful.
I ordered a sushi roll and a Teriyaki chicken takeout- The food was adequate but the portions were miniscule. The rice was in a very small bowl and the sushi roll just way too small. The place itself is almost a hole in the wall....More
This has been my ""go to"" neighborhood sushi place for ten years. Fresh ingredients and responsive service at a fair price are its hallmark. It is small, and there can be a line up at dinner time. Alcohol is limited to beer or sake. Try...More
Love this little hole in the wall sushi place. My favorite is the chirashi. Sushi is fresh. The ramen and udon are delicious too, served in beautiful big bowls.
We ran into this little gem on our way out from UBC — the food was good for lunch and service was standard, ran by a Korean team. I had the yakitori fried udong with beeb and kimchi (had to add CAN2.50 for an extra...More
Wow. Between the rudeness and incompetence I'm not sure how they stay in business. The food is standard non-Japanese (Korean) sushi place quality, so don't expect a good kitchen either.
This tiny sushi bar was packed, yet we were seated and served quickly. The sushi was delicious as was the salmon teriyaki. They also do quick take out which makes it a perfect spot to pop in to pick up food for an al fresco...More
Don't get me wrong I like the food. I'm sure I'll eat it again at some point. But honestly the service is just terrible. I've essentially been ordering the same 3 things for years. It's to the point where they fill in the blank when...More
We happened to be staying close to Hime Sushi and our host recommended we go there for dinner. What a treat it was. Service was quick, food was wonderful and very fresh and great prices, great find.
We love this restaurant. The atmosphere is like you are in the centre of Tokyo, Japan. The selection of dishes is great, and it is delicious. The service is great, though the servers are a bit slow. Overalll, it should be your top sushi restaurant...More
This restaurant is located at 315 East Broadway in Vancouver. The food is fresh and the price is reasonable. We ordered scallop battera, crispy California roll, gold dragon roll, fire dragon roll, hamachi sashimi, hotate (scallops), ama ebi (sweet prawns), nabeyaki udon and yaki-udon Fire...More
Don't leave unnoticed that little place on the 10th; run by a Korean team. I could have eaten there every day; in fact in 2 week stay in VC we were there every other day for sure! Great food, attentive smiling service (don't have to...More
Had a great lunch yesterday at Hime. Two of us. We had one sushi plate, one donburi, and one udon. All were excellent and filling. Small place. Good service. Very authentic. Highly recommended.
I have been a few times to this popular neighbourhood sushi restaurant and it's just ok. We were there with a group of friends, some had a chicken Teri don and one had the chicken Teri meal. The chicken was very dry and had little...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4684730-Reviews-Hime_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hitoe Sushi Japanese Restaurant,"Best sushi I've found in Kitsilano & one of the best in Vancouver! The sushi is very fresh, prepared with great ingredients. Excellent menu with lots of variety, including an entire, separate gluten-free menu. Super friendly service with very kind staff. The restaurant is very...More
Hitoe might not be big, but it is mighty. The owner/operator takes every care to ensure that every dish that leaves his kitchen is impeccable. The fish is super fresh as are the other ingredients he uses. Portions are exceptional for sushi and the service...More
Popped in for a light meal and were bowled over by the quantity of food brought to our table. We ordered the #6 Dinner Box combo and the miso soup, seaweed salad, teriyaki chicken and California rolls were perfectly prepared. What a treat!
A local eat in or take out place, very fresh and tasty. Staff conversed with many in Japanese. Quick efficient service too and yummy food. We tried the sashimi, udon, and tempura and were happy with all of them.
Small and very neighbourhood place. Would not ever go there if not for a friend's recommendation . Truly pleasant experience including funky feel, fresh food, good choices, easy going staff. Better than many trendy Japanese places.
Staff is friendly and flexible. We had children and were seated to a bigger table when it became available. We ordered tempura soup and different sushi rolls. I liked the cod fish and the California roll. The place is quiet and has a good ambience....More
We are there 2 nights in a row. Others commenting on the freshness and taste are right on. Good service and an appreciative owner make this one of our favourite restaurants on 4th. Try the Tuna Kama. Good people who treat you very well.
Everything's so fresh, the place is cozy. You can go with friends and have a relaxing meeting. It fills up at dinner time.
Great sushi, very fresh and yummy. Also does take out if you don't want to eat in. Staff very helpful and friendly. Mid range when it comes to price.
Authentic delicious sushi with fresh ingredients. Very friendly service. They also have a large gluten free menu and gluten free soy sauce available which is so appreciated by us celiacs! I crave this sushi often and go to Hitoe any time I am in Vancouver.
The place is decent, don't expect anything fancy or cozy, it is very easy going. Booking is a requirement cause there are few tables. The food was good, fish was fresh and portions are ok. We have salad, a miso soup, nighiri, and some rolls....More
I've been here many times and never been let down. The fish is always fresh, in fact it's one of the few places where I prefer to get Nigiri because the flavour and freshness of the fish does so incredibly well on its own. Don't...More
Great rolls great sushi and sashimi some hard to find delicacies -Tajo yaki it's a small no nonsense kind of place with charming staff no beer or wine but good tea
The toro is fresh and delicious. The sushi rice is perfect. The bbq eel is superb. The chopped scallop cone was mostly rice. The place was clean. Staff friendly. Highly recommended.
I was invited here by some people in the know. When we arrived here it was empty, and we seated ourselves at one of the small tables. But it filled up very quickly. The food was simply incredible. I had the Sushi Combo C -...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2357901-Reviews-Hitoe_Sushi_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ho Yuen Kee Restaurant,"Plates r small. Prices mid 25 and up. Their specialty dish. Lobster with sticky rice isn’t that special. Sauté lobster in sauce with rice n corn. Any Richmond food court can make . 38$/lb for lobster this.. 75$ dish not worth imo.
The four of us ate so good. The lobster was had by many tables, we preferred ours with egg noodles. We also enjoyed a fresh clam, gai lan with beef slices, snow pea shoots, wonton soup, and shredded chicken. Very good service. Lots of plexiglass.
The food was so great, everything was fresh and delicious. Service was quick and the pace of the food was perfect. Highly recommend this place.
It has been a while since we visited and for some reason I had in my mind that it was quite expensive - not so. The prices for the huge range of lunch dishes (mainly rice and noodle) are very reasonable. Good sized portions expertly...More
We stopped in for a quick bite. The food is consistently very good. Fast, friendly service. We had the wonton soup, house special chow mein and congee. Pay street parking in front or side streets.
We had to squeeze in one more dinner while we could before the restrictions kicked in at midnight which temporarily bans dining in. The restaurant was packed at the prime dinner hour. We had 4 dishes: hand shredded chicken with jellyfish and pickled vegetables which...More
Took my aunt for late lunch after her Acupuncture , we end up in Ho Yuen Kee restaurant ,,they been in business for 23 years , it is not your fancy 4 stars place , a family run , drcor need a maker over ,again...More
We came here for lunch and enjoyed spot prawns, pot stickers soup and 3 types friend lai fun. Their takeout business is doing very well. Tables are spaced out good also for physical distancing. About a week back for dinner and we had king soya...More
This restaurant makes a killer lobster or crab dish served with sticky rice on a bamboo steamer. Our typical order for casual family gatherings includes Peking duck and lettuce wraps on the side. Their set menu for 10 is also a good choice when you...More
We came here for mid autumn festival dinner with my Husband and mom & brothers. We made reservations 1 week in advance as we knew it was going to be busy. The ambiance: high energy throughout the restaurant with guests talking over each other. We...More
A trusted place for very good cantonese food. The seafood is excellent especially their specialty - lobster dish over sticky rice. The restaurant atmosphere is typical for a Chinese restaurant - It's a little bit crowded and busy which make its loud at times.
I've been to this place a few times over the years. It has had a bit of an update inside, which is nice, but the food and service hasn't changed a bit. Always was, and continues to be excellent. Noodle dishes are good, and decent...More
The restaurant is very busy so remember to make a reservation before getting there. If you want to order winter melon soup, which is very sweet, you should order it beforehand as well. The rice in the lobster rice is mixed with corn and crab...More
This is a typical Cantonese lunch -congee , won ton noodles ,seafood chow mien ,very busy place , but fast turn over
Nothing left we had one of the Best Chinese meal in Vancouver we started with the shrimp balls you have to order it in advance and a fry squab The king crab 3 ways it’s outstanding service we serve you the crab legs and steamed...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4852059-Reviews-Ho_Yuen_Kee_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hokkaido Ramen Santouka,"Craving for some ramen on our trip and we saw Ramen Santouka near our hotel! Perfect serving, the noodles are all home made. Servers are nice too!
Delicious, flavor filled treat for eyes/nose/mouth Colorful! Worth the wait! Busy place with friendly helpful staff👍
Came here for a small bowl of ramen. It came very quickly & was enjoyable. No competition for Danbo just up the street but a good option with out the huge line.
What else do you need, really? We love reliably good ramen, and this place ticks that box. The food only takes a few minutes, and the service is fast and friendly. They bring you the bill as soon as you're done. You can be in...More
The service was great and very friendly. I had the Kara Miso. Taste was great but a little light on ingredients other than the thin noodles. Next time I would have paid an extra dollar for larger portion.
Comfort foor ramen craving satisfied!! Tried coming in late 930 pm and was so surprise there were still customers like me. I only need to try this place and definitely not disappointed. I just ordered a small chasu ramen, and was just enough for me....More
We sought out this place because it was highly rated and only two blocks from the Westin Bayshore . This is the best Ramen I have ever had in Canada . The flavor is amazing and portions are huge! Its slightly more expensive then other...More
Another great Ramen restaurant in Vancouver as it seems to be a trend. The soups have a full rich broth and the wait time is short. There apparently is always a lineup, which is a good sign. This one isn’t my favourite Ramen restaurant but...More
Ramen is always good late at night. But I’m Vancouver, most restaurants close at 11:00pm. We got there 45 minutes to closing time and they still took us in. Some restaurants won’t accept you if you arrive on their last hour. So happy to have...More
Visited on a rainy weekend day, and there was a lineup probably half an hour long. I was excited to try this place, as there was a lot about the menu that seem authentic and tasty. When we were finally seated and received our food,...More
By far, the best ramen I have had in Vancouver. I would definitely return the next time I`m in Vancouver.
With love for ramen slowly turning into an addiction, here’s yet another ramen place on our list. Very well reviewed, it was expected that this joint would be busy on Saturday around 3 pm, which is okay. The staff was amiable, and food arrived quickly....More
You really can't go wrong. The basic soup contains noodles, broth (you pick your broth -- the shoyu was fantastic), some pork and bamboo shoots. You can add extras. I also tried the pork rice (SO GOOD) available for a small extra charge as well...More
This place has the best ramen in Vancouver. The place is really nice, the service is fast and friendly and the ramen is great. Totally recommended!
My hubby and I visited recently due to the good reviews... And we were certainly not disappointed! I had the spicy Raman version which was very tasty, and we shared gyoza which were delicious too. It gets very busy so suggest heading in before the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12410944-Reviews-Hokkaido_Ramen_Santouka-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hokkaido Ramen Santouka - Robson St,"I just had lunch here. I have been eating here forever. Miss the older staff before pandemic. My bill came to 25.50. I used a 100 dollar note. The waitress who is tall and slim, asked me if I needed change. I looked at her...More
First time - nice happy hour deal weekdays between 3-6pm that includes ramen, 3 gyoza and an egg. Good flavorful shio broth. Authentic ramen. Attentive service, food came quickly. Not very many tables as the restaurant is quite small.
Full disclosure, I have not been ti a lot of Ramen places. What I can say is this one “blows the socks” off the others I’ve experienced Feels authentic with excellent flavours and prompt service I had the Taniko Shio Ramen which was amazing
I’ve tried all the other top rated ramen places in Van and this is hands down THE BEST. Rich, silky smooth broth, amazing handmade noodles and the perfect portion size (I go the large). Pair that with the best gyoza in town and you have...More
We’ve tried most of the ramen restaurants in the West End. Santouka offers a more diverse and interesting menu than the standard pot. Attractive ambience and good service. Don’t join the lemmings lined up at the usual joints.
Fast service, but not particularly friendly. Good ramen with generous serving size and selection of side dishes. Very tasty food.
On a Friday night when most other ramen places on Robson had long line ups, we stopped here and we enjoy a combo of a miso ramen with a side of grilled salmon. While the salmon was a bit dry, the ramen was excellent ....More
Fast, very tasty ramen. We had read up before we went and we walked in, we felt we were transported back to Japan. Whilst we were their, all the diners were Japanese, so that already give us an indication the food would be good and...More
What a wonderful place. Small in size, but just right. Hotel recommended it so we had our doubts. Very friendly service. The food was really good. We really enjoyed the ramen. There were a lot of Japanese clients in the restaurant who had obviously been...More
Food is so nice here, good portion size and service is great. Recommend to anyone visiting Vancouver if they’re craving ramen!
Brought out of town guests for ramen. One of the best restaurants on Robson Street. Located farther West than the shopping area, but well worth the walk. This is a small restaurant and extraordinarily busy. Hope shared dining and pre-ordering doesn't upset you. The staff...More
I had asked the server for some hot tea, which I know is complimentary of the house. When my order came, it was green tea bag and hot water. I had told the server at the time that this was incorrect but could not get...More
My intro to ramen couldn’t have a better start. Fantastic pork ramen and great green tea. Apples one of the very top places to have ramen in Vancouver and in North America. Reasonable prices great service.
I have spent a lot of time working in Japan and developed a love of ramen - Tantanmen Ramen in particular. I have been to many Ramen Restaurants outside of Japan trying to find good tantanmen. At last I have found the best at Santouka....More
Our family really enjoys Ramen and Santouka doesn’t disappoint. We love the atmosphere at Santouka. It’s a small restaurant that has around the table seating, bar seating and tables. The Ramen is always consistently delicious. We eat the Spicy Kara Miso which has great depth...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2242258-Reviews-Hokkaido_Ramen_Santouka_Robson_St-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Holiday Inn,"One of the best ones so far. Got great value and great service from the staff. Super polite and they took their time to ensure everything was to my liking . 5 star experience I’d say. The hotel management even upgraded my room! Food and...More
Happy hour 4-6 worth it. Draft beer or house wine. We got in about 8:30 and was told if we wanted food we had to order within 5 minutes. We order a cheese quesadilla. accompanying salsa good. Not near enough cheese. More like a veggie...More
We had several meals here while staying at the hotel. The food was fine but not outstanding and a bit pricy since part of the hotel. The staff was very friendly.
We were part of a tour group but extended our stay 2nights. The first two days of our stay one of the elevators in the main lobby was out of service. There is another just up some steps from the lobby but it was difficult...More
Staff were very helpful and the hotel is in a good location too. Room was clean and the air con was very good. The hotel felt very friendly, the people who worked at the breakfast area were particularly friendly. Only problem I found was the...More
A very comfortable Hotel, with all that you need. Very clean and courteous staff that are very helpful without been intrusive. Have stayed there twice and would go back again
At least I was by this elegant Holiday Inn. Well located in downtown, this is a lovely place to stay.
The discripion of the ""suite"" was a little extreme. It was a two-full size bed hotel room. The staff, particularly Dennis, at the checkin, were great. Though there was ample parking, the underground parking lot was extremely tight for even the mid-size car we had....More
Acceptable selection. On the weekends, you need to go eat breakfast earlier (before 7 am) or later (after 830 am) because the waiters have to attend to Chinese tour groups. I waited almost 15 minutes to get my order in, about 30 minutes for the...More
First time staying at this hotel and although the check in, service and staff were kind, friendly and helpful the rooms/hallways definitely need an upgrade. The elevators from the parkade to the rooms were out of service so a bit of a hike to get...More
Ended up here by fluke. Nothing bad about the hotel or staffs. My bone of contention is that city government should do something about the surrounding of this hotel. I should not have to close his eyes whilst taking a stroll around this nice hotel....More
Ate breakfast here 6 times, mostly did not was to go out in rain, and food was very good very fairly priced for hotel. I judge all breakfast spots by their Eggs Benedict, I’d give them 4 out of 5 and on the low price...More
After disembarking from our cruise we were happy to arrive at our Holiday Inn stay over for two nights in Vancouver before we got on the Rocky Mountaineer. Holiday Inn is well situated in Granville Street Vancouver. Just around the corner from our previous stay...More
We ate breakfast and evening meal here as we were staying her ... it was all very good and reasonably priced. Cocktails were good too. Although the bar manager had to make ours as the lady in the restaurant didn't know how to make them....More
If you are looking at staying at downtown Vancouver, then Holiday Inn is the best. Centrally located, the rooms are spacious, beds very comfortable. The room also has a fridge and tea and coffee making facilities. The lounge and coffee table, balcony is also a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7997662-Reviews-Holiday_Inn-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Holy Guacamole,"When we looked up eating places in Vancouver, and selected Holy Guacamole, a reasonable walking distance from our hotel. They served good Mexican food in somewhat nicer atmosphere than a fast food place. They had indoor and outdoor seating, as well as take out. The...More
Excellent food. Great people run this place. You won't find better Mexican food in Vancouver, at this price. OMG it's good.
Delicious, fast, cheap…what more can you ask for? The staff was super friendly and great. Bathroom was clean. Highly recommend.
Amazing chicken flautas!! After bike riding in Stanley Park we needed food! Found this gem near the bike rental place on Denman street. The chicken flautas on a salad was just amazing. We came back later for happy hour and got the chips and guacamole…very...More
This restaurant is very basic but don't let that put you off. Very friendly service, excellent food including vegan options. Better food than we have had at fancier places.
Food did not disappoint. Good space for couples or small groups, not a huge restaurant. Heads up you pay upfront at the cashier. Lots of substitutions for dietary restrictions and good vegetarian options.
Really amazing authentic food service waa good and the food came real quick. Also it ia vqlue for money compared to other places.
I came with my family, we ordered and the food came fast, when it came I couldn’t even hear my sister complaining about how there wasn’t a playground at our hotel because I was inhaling my tacos. If your in the area stop it, 5/5...More
We went there with the family to give it a try and they didn’t disappoint us. Truly authentic Mexican food and amazing service. I recommend to try chilaquiles for breakfast, tacos all day and nachos plate. Definitely coming back!
Recently had taco dinner and it was pretty good, filling, and came out quickly. The service was friendly and i would return to try some other items like the churros. A nice addition to the westend.
The staff are amazing, really chatty and friendly. The place is buzzing on the weekends. Great for small groups and couples. The best tacos outside of Mexico I have had.... Baja tacos absolute must-have. Simply delicious. Will be back when I get my taco craving.
Excellent food and very fast service, if you crave any Mexican food or drink this is the place to get it.
We tried the guacamole and chips at Holy Guacamole on Denman Street and were disappointed. Both the guacamole and chips were bland and didn't appear to have been made fresh in-store. We didn't eat our serving. I hope the quality of food improves as the...More
We were disappointed in our experience at Holy Guacamole. The guacamole and chips (both items) were bland and we didn't eat our serving. Hopefully the quality of food will improve.",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21306487-Reviews-Holy_Guacamole-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Homer St. Cafe and Bar,"Lively fun spot for brunch with an amazing french toast. 3.5 stars Food: 3.5 Service: 5 Atmosphere: 5 Cost to worth it rating: 3 Opentableable: yes Return worthiness: maybe Eve awards: best french toast with whipped ricotta Highlights: - French toast: star of meal, 3...More
We went with another couple for dinner. The positives - drinks are good, appetizers are good. Nice menu for Happy Hour. Patio was nice. Service was fine. The negatives - not much selection for dinner and many of their menu items require sides to be...More
For our first Vancouver dinner, we walked. from our hotel in West Vancouver to the Homet Street Café. We were lucky enough to get a table on their terrace. We had the crisp potato salad and the Homer cobb salad that were both very good...More
A perfect lunch spot. Bright and cheerful, terrific staff and delicious lunch with wine. Can’t wait to go back. Several sections, we sat near the bar, but there was outdoor seating and a larger dining area. My ham and creamy cheese came with pickles and...More
Way overpriced for the portion size $115 !!! THE FULL MONTY | $115 (SERVES 2-4 PEOPLE) Half Rotisserie Chicken, Half Rack of Ribs, 6 oz Slow Cooked Brisket, 2 Biscuits, Coleslaw, Broccoli & Cheddar, Crispy Potato Salad, Ranch, Gravy, HSCB Hot Sauce (Bottle to Take...More
What a fun spot for lunch! This is a very busy Yaletown eatery, that offers some gluten free options and some delicious looking desserts. Service from Maddy B. was attentive and professional. There is an inviting looking patio (weather permitting) so we will be back!
We’ve been going to The Homer St Cafe for many years. We especially like their happy hour & the HSCB Burger & Fries. Delicious burger & fabulous value. The service is always prompt & friendly, very accommodating. It’s a great place to relax on warm...More
We dropped in for quick cocktail, they were very welcoming, no order seemed too small. Friendly staff and pleasant atmosphere.
Dropped in as my flight was canceled and I was staying at a nearby hotel. Not knowing anything about the restaurant I had no preconceptions. I was greeted nicely and service throughout was very good. I noticed they are a great team. Everyone works well...More
We decided to finally try their chicken which is noticeable which you can't help to see when you walk pass their restaurant. We did the half order of chicken and ribs with fries, biscuits and creamy potato salad and also ordered an additional salad. That...More
The wait staff were very friendly, the environment is cool and it was a nice experience (mainly due to the wait staff). I had the mussels and clams which were nice but not outstanding, my husband had the lamb shank which he really enjoyed. It’s...More
Very popular noisy bar/restaurant. Wish our table was in the lower, what appeared to be quieter part. But in top bar drinkers at the bar and those eating are trying to make themselves heard about the loud music. Whilst the food was tasty it, like...More
Came for dinner on LDW and got a nice table on the patio. Love the vibe here, very casual, low lighting, nice bar, seems like a fun place to have a date or meet some friends for drinks. The Steak was good. My companion's Caesar...More
Super welcoming staff and amazing food. Wish there was a place like this back home cause would be so nice catching up with friends in this type of environment.
We went on a rainy Sunday arriving just as it opened and it quickly filled up - good job we booked. I had French Toast and the other had various egg based breakfasts. All delicious. Very enjoyable.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4371458-Reviews-Homer_St_Cafe_and_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Honey Salt,"Wonderful lunch / brunch spot. Fresh-tasting dishes that burst with flavor. Delicious, crunchy veggies. Juicy, well prepared fish. Yummy moctails. All beautifully served, with outdoor seating and friendly wait staff. The Honey Salt restaurant is located inside the JW Marriott hotel. While the hotel itself...More
We stayed one night at the hotel and visited Honey Salt 3 times. During Happy Hour, after the hockey game, and for breakfast before we left. The prices are really reasonable for being such a beautiful location and in a hotel, and the food is...More
Had dinner here twice and the food and service was very good. Our waiter/ waitress were very patient and helpful. Good selection of wines.
We were in a bit of a rush as were the many people who had come in (and left) before us but the staff remained calm and simply ran! Good job!
We stopped here to have a couple of cocktails before we went for dinner down the street. This is a very nice bar / lounge. Very busy and a tad noisy but the service was great and the beer was ice cold.
Went here for a dual birthday 40th & 30th party. They Forgot about us, we had reservations, but no one approached us for 20mins even to offer water. Still no one offered drinks or took our orders after we waved down staff. Approached manager and...More
We went for brunch on a Saturday. Drinks took way too long. The Caesar’s were not garnished as described which was a disappointment. The food was bland, my hash browns were burnt, the server was no where to be found. My plate was never taken...More
Meeting a old business friend for brunch at the Honey Salt , restaurant is next to the Casino , very upscale , relaxing ambiance , brunch menu very average , nothing spectacular , took well over 5 mins before our sever show up , but...More
We were flip flopping what to have as the menu was not clear if came with any sides which my smoked salmon benedict did with these crunchy small potatoes that were so tasty. The breakfast gazette was also good. We made a reservation but there...More
Horribly loud atmosphere with a vapid and superficial crowd. Place is set up to appeal to the Instagram bunch who have no sense of style nor the understanding that other people exist in this shared universe. Made worse since the restaurant is a glorified dining...More
Worse part of Honey Salt is their hours are irregular and based on how much they want to stay open not on when you want to dine or drink.
We came for a birthday reservation, which the server knew, and it was like we were forgotten. It took us almost an hour to get our drinks. We had another event to go to after our brunch so we made it known that we had...More
food good service good music so loud you can't talk to friends. Music was blasting away. don't know why they think this adds to the ambience very annoying
We booked this menu to conclude our Canada trip (from UK). It was thanksgiving weekend and we booked for the special menu. When we were arrived, the welcome was frosty. We booked in advance and requested a table in the dining room. On arrival we...More
Just one of an array of eateries found at the Parq Vancouver, the Honey Salt restaurant is farm-to-table motivated with a comprehensive menu. Located in the lobby of the JW Marriott, this restaurant features a front lounge as well as a dining room in the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12938981-Reviews-Honey_Salt-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hook Restaurant,"We were looking for a lunch spot with a view and good food, and we were not disappointed! But we were not expecting such good service from the host and the servers! Super nice people. Our server advised us that the lobster roll was too...More
I had the burger with green salad. Both were bland. Thin beef patty that didn't taste homemade. Very little salad dressing on the greens. I expect better from just about any restaurant. My wife had fish and chips. She indicated it was OK, but the...More
Went for dinner with my wife on our last night in Vancouver. Only 3 minutes walk from our hotel. We had book a table inside overlooking the bay and people passing by. Not too crowded and room enough between the tables. Very friendly and service...More
If they cared half as much about service as opposed to staff standing around talking- then maybe we would've stayed. But they didn't seem to care whether they seated tables or not. An otherwise average bar across from the beach. Suggest you try Craft or...More
They installed a bunch of TVs inside which I think killed the vibe of this great little places across from English Bay. We do go there every so often to meet friends in the area. It was a particularly sunny day so we decided to...More
Their everyday happy hour has limited but nice choices. Drinks are discounted too and they make a good Bloody Cesar.
Had the fish and chips. No overly excited. Coleslaw was on the acidy side for me. Fish was slightly overcooked. However sister had the Chorizo Mussels and she was delighted. Best Ever she stated. So? Worth a try....
First of all…the owner Mike made our experience great. We had a great relaxing time. The fresh oysters were very fresh and tasty. The mussels with chorizo were good and large portions. A very relaxing place for food with friends. The only downside was a...More
We walked here from our hotel and were so glad to discover this place! Happy Hour had some excellent food and drink choices (loved the fish tacos!) and you can't beat the view. Great service and a perfect location with a view of the ocean....More
Unable to get into our planned dining venue; we happened upon Hook.. So glad we did — the service was excellent; friendly but not intrusive, and the food was delicious. Highly recommend the oysters and the crab clubhouse. And our view of English Bay was...More
Came by for Happy Hour drinks as it was by the seaside. I’m sometimes skeptical of seaside restaurants as often they’re not the greatest since the beach brings in their clientele not necessarily their food. However, the service from our waitress was great — there...More
Had an amazing time dining here at Hook. The service was great, and the food was delicious. We definitely will be back soon again!
I tried the dine out menu 2021 this passed weekend. It was a three course menu and I must say the food was lovely. We also took the wine pairings, our table had mixed views on them but they were generally good. From outside I...More
This review is strictly based on how the restaurant handled Covid. I was absolutely stunned when the hostess was denying people to the restaurant if they wished to wear a mask. None of the staff members wore a mask, and there were no measures visual...More
The food was good, but the service was absolutely frosty and uncomfortable. We knew it wouldn’t be a normal experience considering Covid restrictions, which we were perfectly fine with. We appreciated the measures. However, our family’s server (male, strawberry blonde hair, scruff) was inhospitable and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12664177-Reviews-Hook_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Horin Ramen + Sake,"I had seared pork ramen with medium pork broth at Horin-Tonkatsu. The pork broth was fantastic, very rich, and the seared pork added a nice flavour. This also came with beansprouts in the broth, a nice extra touch. The next night I thought I would...More
As a ramen lover I am very satisfied with the flavors and presentation of the dish. The portions are huge and the taste is hard to describe, you just have to try it. Almost always you have to waite for a table to be released,...More
I had the house special noodles. The house-made ramen was cooked just right, the broth was rich without being excessively oily, and the atburi chashu was tasty. Perfect for a quick lunch.
Went on the referral of a friend, and we we not disappointed. The gyoza app was fantastic and the 3 different ramen bowls are group had were all great. 'Hot' had a nice heat. The takoyaki octopus was just ok. Nice cold beer and only...More
It was a blast! Very friendly people and the menu awesome. I recommand this restaurant. I will come back again.
Small restaurant but the line moves quickly. Best tonkotsu rame we have eaten outside of Japan. The house sake is noteworthy. We will come again.
Honestly we were going to Ramen Danbo but it was packed. So we decided to give this place a try. We ordered the original and it was great. Service was also efficient. Fancy presentation. We would go back.
This restaurant is well know for their Ramen since they open in 2018 , it is in the hart of West End on Robson St , there is so many Ramen restaurants in the area , me and my friends do eat here a lot...More
We had the hot vegetable version! Flavours were delicate and beautifully balanced. Verrry interesting washrooms too. Yes, a highly recommended experience!
There is hardly anything more satisfying among the simpler Japanese dishes than a steaming hot bowl of Ramen noodles and a bottle of sake. Both of these are served here by a 100% Japanese staff (I suppose hat includes the cook(s) in the kitchen as...More
We gotten some positive recommendations from friends about this place, so the wife and I decided to drop in. The place is modern, clean and staff seem attentive. We ordered “The One” which is their house special and wife ordered one with mushrooms. Side of...More
We enjoyed this small restaurant that serves mostly ramen and a few other classics including gyoza. The gyoza was nice, lightly pan fried. The skin was thin, tasty and chewy. The ramen broth I chose was light and flavorful, perhaps a bit too salty. However...More
My son dragged me here....I reluctantly went because I have had only mediocre experience with ramen eating. I rolled my eyes and agreed to try it. Was I pleased I did!,! The service was great and the food was fantastic. The noodles were perfect and...More
There are so many noodle joints on Robson that you can easily call it Ramen Avenue. Horin certainly holds a steady position in that lineup. Even though their menu is very limited, mainly highlighting one type of broth only varying in few toppings addition, but...More
Anytime I see a new Ramen restaurant in Vancouver I am there. This is one of the best I have tried, and I have tried many. Comfortable seats, cheerful serving staff, and you can watch the noodles being made at the front. The gyozas were...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15223119-Reviews-Horin_Ramen_Sake-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Horn of Plenty Cafe,"We live conveniently close to HOP and eat there often, mostly for breakfast. Their corned beef hash is made from scratch cooked to perfection every time. The serving size is somewhat large for the normal person but I'm A big guy and a big eater....More
We had missed lunch and were hungry. When we went in they said they were just closing but could make us a hamburger. We were a bit embarrassed by keeping them but they were so gracious, and the burger was SO GOOD! It was just...More
Food was excellent. Coffee was strong. Pancakes were spot on. I’d eat there again in a heartbeat. The rest of this is filler because I have to write a minimum. It’s a great little diner.
8-table cozy cafe located beside the Esso station. Service is quick with a smile. Huge portions done well: bacon & eggs + hash browns + toast ($11.95) + tea ($2.65). A great no-nonsense, convenient place in Agassiz to fill up after you check-out of your...More
We were out in Harrison Hot Spring he other day and decided we needed lunch. Horn of plenty was close by and on our way home. we both had Kangaroo burger and fries. It was very good. i would order it again . but i...More
Three of us had breakfast during the week, not a lot of patrons so we had a choose of tables. Server was pleasant, took the order quickly and brought the drinks. The meals arrived hot, the flavour was good, the only negative was the amount...More
Excellent breakfast place excellent service from start to finish the food was your typical small diner that you would hope would have that type of breakfast I would have given this place a 5 star but but they only looked at my passport they did...More
Great spot for breakfast or lunch. Nice family run Cafe right on highway 7 at Harrison Hot Springs exit. Breakfast is served till 11am, food portions are large, I had a delicious farmers omlet and my wife had the bacon and eggs. 4 strips of...More
The Horn of Plenty Cafe is a hidden gem at the corner of Hwy 7 & 9 in Agassiz. I love going on Fridays because I know that Friday is mulligatawny soup day. Charleton’s mulligatawny soup is a work of art. So delicious! Combine it...More
We enjoyed a warm friendly birthday bruncheon for our brother’s buddy Chaaz best birthday ever. The Roo burger beat our expectations. Don’t miss the patio !!!
Food was great, service was also very good, that home cooked feeling, pie was delicious. Although it was busy and had to wait a while it was well worth it
Good place for breakfast. The bacon was crispy and the scrambled eggs were the best I have had in a long time. The steak and eggs were a huge surprise. It was a real piece of steak and prepared perfectly.
...4 of us stopped in for breakfast on the way to Harrison Hotsprings. Even though the lunch time was starting, they still served us breakfast which was nice. Decent food and VERY good service from the young server who told us she had just gotten...More
While I Harrison hot springs we decided to try the Horn of Plenty for breakfast. The place is rather small but cosy. It was fairly early and empty. We were greeted by a fellow who said sit anywhere. Turns out he was a regular customer....More
Great place to go for a real down home cooking . Breakfasts are always good , service excellent, friendly.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g616301-d3737371-Reviews-Horn_of_Plenty_Cafe-Agassiz_British_Columbia.html
House Special Modern Vietnamese,"As a frequent visitor to Vietnam who travels there monthly for business,I am very aware that there is more to Vietnamese then just Pho and Bahn Mi.Modern Vietnam has evolved a more sophisticated style of Vietnamese food I am happy to say that this place...More
We pitched up for supper the day we arrived in Vancouver so it was 0300 our time and were efficiently and friendly served the most delicious food. I had chicken salad with shredded cabbage and crispy skin which was so tasty and refreshing. The chicken...More
My friend, Mari H. and I are visiting Vancouver so of course we are going to check out the local eats. We settled on Vietnamese and searched for some restaurants. My criteria for Vietnamese food is fairly high so we scoured the reviews and menus....More
i was craving a pho and this was delicious! there were lots of strange mushrooms in there i have never tried before and one of them was such a meaty texture! it was so delicious. and very filling, massive portion, fresh, and the lady who...More
We chose this restaurant with no expectations others than there were good reviews written about it on Trip Advisor. It was quite a surprise from both the price and quality of food perspective. We invited my brother-in-law and his wife up from Seattle for a...More
The place has very good food and at a very good price for Yaletown. The spring rolls are top and the rest of the food is good. The service was friendly and casual.
Good cocktails. Amazing papaya salad. Pho very tasty and filling. Good service. Happy hour. Spring rolls little greasy but tasty.
Excellent food. The rolls and fry bread were excellent. Filet Mignon on rice was very tasty and the duck entrée was especially delicious. Service was good. It may not look as fancy or trendy as some other restaurants in Yaletown but the place is definitely...More
What a great place to have Vietnamese food. Everything on the menu was tasty. I’m a pescatarian who doesn’t eat egg. So it’s hard to find a place that does vegan option. Their menu has vegan option for almost all of their dishes. There were...More
Some of the usuals you see in every Vietnamese restaurant but with a fusion modern twist. Some dishes were almost Thai inspired. We did wait a bit for some of our dishes to arrive. The couple next to us ordered the simple pho and their...More
On a visit to Vancouver we met up with friends for dinner at House Special. The Yaletown location is fun and was within walking distance of our hotel. The food is very good - the spring rolls, shaken beef and lemongrass Brussels sprouts in particular...More
Located on the edge of Yaletown, this place was exceptionally good. Cool and funky decor, modern and good music. We ordered a house pho to share. The broth was hot, and very tasty. The beef slices were thin and the meat balls all look made...More
I've tried most of the many Vietnamese restaurants in Yaletown and this one has the best pho! Service was friendly and pleasant.
The food was tasty enough, though the menu was rather limited. But the service was decidedly sub-par. Enough to make the whole experience sour for my wife and I. My entree was delivered a long time before my wife's. Not a minute or two. Many...More
We were pleasantly surprised at finding this little restaurant on a street off the busy section in Yaletown. It had great food and reasonable prices. We will definitely eat here again when we come back to Vancouver. The daily frybread was delicious. We had to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10468801-Reviews-House_Special_Modern_Vietnamese-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
House of Dosas,"A great place to dine with friends and family. Had a great experience the last time I visited here with my lil sister. I can recommend this place to anyone.
My girlfriends got together post Xmas at House of Dosa. I’ve always wanted to try but never got around to going. Happy I now have and will definitely return! The place is on the corner of Knight and Kingsway. It is not that big but...More
Went there on a Monday night - special Dosa night. Place was crowded outside and inside. No social distancing. Same door for entry and exit meant rubbing shoulders with others. Food was excellent but the restaurant required a lot of attention to sanitation specially during...More
The food here is tasty and definitely good value for money. However, service is very poor. We had to repeat our order a few times, because the waitress didn’t bother to note it down at first go. We ordered two dosas, a medu vadai, bhindi...More
It's hard to find a decent South Indian restaurant in Vancouver, but I think I have found one that will become one of my regulars. While the service is a little slow based on the number of occupied tables, the 1 or 2 waiters I...More
Couldn’t eat it all it was so big! Service was excellent and the waiter really helpful with suggestions. I went for the veggie dosa minus the potatoe, it was delicious. Do yourself a favour and try this one out! You won’t be disappointed.
Highly recommended for some great South Indian food. Good and fast service. A clean, neat and tidy place with great ambience. A must is the Ghee Roast Paper Dosa!
Had a family get together amd chose to visit this establishment. The taste is authentic and variety is huge.
I didn't know what Dosas were but my friend recommended it to me so I tried. It's like a crape with dry-ish curry inside. It's very tasty! I wish there's more Sri Lankan food restaurants in Vancouver.
We visited House of Dosas for lunch during our recent visit to Vancouver. 1) Good tasty/crispy/fresh dosas - they have a ton of varieties and we tried a few and loved them 2) Service is good - food was served piping hot within a reasonable...More
We came here for an early dinner. Street parking can be challenging due to time restrictions so just build in extra time. We enjoyedb dhal and spinach vadai to start, prawn dosa, and a chicken dish.
Order a lamb dosa. You get a huge flat crispy crepe and a large spoonful of lamb with potato. We got two apps, donut and lentils. Both were ok. Fennel seeds inside the donut with 3 sauces, lentil patty was as expected. Used a coupon...More
Great Dosas with many varieties for both vegetarian & non-vegetarian. They have a special on Monday night . All dosas is $5.99! Your opportunity to try other dosas that you want. They have variations of spicy that you can choose from. Service is good &...More
A friend recommended this place. It is a bit out of the usual tourist place but is not difficult to find. The ambient is relaxed and friendly. The service was fast and efficient. The price is very reasonable and portion. biggish. We have been eating...More
Came recommended by our friends who also joined us for dinner. Found their dahl a little liquidity for my preference or experience. Good portions and reasonable prices, but service was a bit challenging with some language barriers. Was good, but not racing to come back,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d779587-Reviews-House_of_Dosas-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hungry Guys Kitchen,"I ordered a burrito and I couldn’t finish half of it. This place is less of a restaurant and more a bar to hang out with friends. The food is not great. My friend ordered a chorizo taco and there was no chorizo and just...More
Excellent food, we all loved it, the chicken chipotle soup was amazing. We were looking for a bite later after the Chilli Peppers concert and this place fit the bill perfectly. The servers were incredibly friendly! Thank you Frida, Luis, and Cami, it’s so refreshing...More
I came here for dinner looking for something healthy and fast to eat. I got a salad and soup. The salad was okay, to be honest, I didn't really enjoy it because it was drenched in salad dressing. Next time I will be aware of...More
We have gone to Hungry Guys Kitchen. It never disappoints. Fresh, flavourful. I usually have a salad, but this time I had a burrito. Took half home for supper.
The first burrito of my life was here and I went again the next day to try a variant. Staff is nice and place feels clean. No reason to complain.
We had our first visit here and we were amazed with the choice and the size of the portions for a great price. Everything seemed to be fresh and you walk down the line and pick what you would like to add. A burrito and...More
First went here for a salad which was absolutely delicious, lots of choice of fresh ingredients all in front of you. Loved it so much I went back the next day and tried the tofu burrito which was equally as tasty! Staff are warming and...More
Came here for a Burrito so can't comment on Salads which also looked like a popular option. Was very busy so worth coming a bit early to avoid 12 noon rush. As others have stated, ingredients are very fresh and high quality and burrito was...More
High quality ingredients and great tasting food. I created my own salad, although the ones on the menu did sound good. My friend got the burrito bowl which they said was very good. Quick and easy food with nice interior!
First time here on recommendation from coworkers. Apparently, the $10.75 avocado taco salad is the most popular salad. My buddy says more than half the people order this salad. The salad kind of reminds me of a chicken version of poke. Pretty decent for the...More
If going there for lunch, arrive 11:45am or after 12:30pm or be prepared for a long line-up. (The line moves fairly quickly though.) And it's very popular for a good reason!
I passed by this place and seeing that their interior looked inviting, I was encouraged to try it. I arrived early so there were only a few people inside. The place was clean, airy and had plenty of seating. The food was tasty and the...More
I don't come by salads and salad dinners easily; I blame my wife for luring me to the Dark Side but I have to say she's absolutely right when it comes to Hungry Guys and salads. They give you a VERY fair meal for the...More
I’ve only been here once but oh what an experience !! I ordered a burrito + I even got to assemble it myself just like subway but with better ingredients!!! Such fresh greens + delicious chicken hah the chips were really nice with I too
I love being able to pick and choose what I want in my salad but don't really like places like the salad loop where everyone picks their own...eeew germs...and you have to put your salad dressing on top:( This place has lots of salad toppings...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9800087-Reviews-Hungry_Guys_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hy's Steakhouse & Cocktail Bar Vancouver,"During or holiday we had a Dinner. Services was good we had full attention. Like you are home. Quality dinner was good.
Attended this establishment to celebrate a family birthday. From the onset, service was 5* all the way. Everyone enjoyed their steaks and spot prawns' prepared perfectly. Hats off to Justin for a wonderful evening.
Excellent food! Amazing porter house and salad, onion soup!!! Super wine ! Super athmosphere, nice service!
There is so many Steak House / Restaurants in Vancouver , But I all way enjoyed HY's from West Coast to East Coast , special the whistler location ! not a cheap place for dinning , but it is 100% traditional old fashioned steak restaurant...More
This used to be a favourite spot for us and a go-to place for steak urges. Hy's still have great service, great wines, great vegetable dishes, great cheese bread,...but for a steak house we received a very much below average steak. It seems the restaurant...More
Good afternoon, Thank you for taking the time to leave us your feedback on our steaks. We are so sorry to hear that they were not up to standard and we would love to speak with you about this further. We can be reached at...More
Came to Vancouver the Super Bowl weekend - my last night was the Monday . The 3 of us decided to go out for a nice fancy meal - so I booked a table at Hys. I kept hearing great things about the cheese toast...More
Don't order the hamburger, it is over cooked and very dry. The patty, I'm not really sure it was meat, was grey throughout .More
Good afternoon, I'm so sorry to hear that your hamburger was not enjoyable however we are very grateful for you taking the time to let us know. We would appreciate the chance to speak with you further and can be reached at (604) 683 7671....More
Group of 4 ordered t-bone, porter house and new york there were cooked to our expectations and tastes however, the baked side potatoe was Thurley cooked. $$$$$ restaurant.
I ordered 1 negroni and 1 beef wellington in this steakhouse. The cocktail tastes great. The beef, however, is way lower than I expected. I ordered a medium-cooked steak, and the puff pastry is overcooked and some part of it gets burnt. What's more, the...More
Good afternoon Stan, I am so sorry to hear that you did not enjoy your beef wellington and would love to speak with you further about this. We can be reached at (604) 683 7671. Kind regards, Emily Grayson
We went to h’s restaurant for my boyfriend’s birthday and sent a birthday request to make some special when I made a reservation, but they didn’t do anything for us. And the meals were disappointed. The main dishes looked so simple and messed on the...More
Good morning, We are so sorry to hear that you and your boyfriend did not enjoy your recent dinner with us, however we are very grateful to have your feedback. We would love to discuss this with you further and can be reached at (604)...More
Such. Classic steak house. Beautiful interiors. Have enjoyed the dinner here and decided to try the upstairs bar and happy hour menu of drinks and food. The bartender was great and made some unique cocktails from the happy hour specials. Happy hour food and drinks...More
The cheese bread here was the main attraction. It was so good we ordered it a second time. Beef carpacio was delicious as well. For our mains we ordered the 22oz porter house steak. It was cooked medium rare like we ordered but the crust...More
Delicious steak, in a classic setting. A must when in Vancouver. And don't forget the cheese bread! Excellent service as well. Love, love, love.
Came here with my girlfriends for my birthday weekend. The food was so good complimented by great friendly service. This was my first time there but definitely won’t be the last.
Got a poterhous it was thin and vainly. The potatoes was on the same plate. Manager came by and apologize by saying they used to cut the meat at the Resturant but no longer. It’s pricy and I don’t mind the over $100 but it...More
Good afternoon, Thank you for taking the time to let us know about your recent dinner with us. We are so sorry to hear that you did not enjoy your steak and we would love to speak to you about this further. We can be...More",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705035-Reviews-Hy_s_Steakhouse_Cocktail_Bar_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Hydra Estiatorio Mediterranean,"Wonderful fresh exotic Greek food that is delicious! Celebrating our 26th anniversary it was an absolute pleasure!
Food was delicious, packed full of flavors. The hummus and pita were tasty and the chicken very moist. We didn’t get the lamb but saw a lot of tables did and it looked amazing. Next time we will have to try it. Service was some...More
Hello, We would like to say thank you for the wonderful 5 star review. We’re very happy you enjoyed your dining experience with us at Hydra as well as the service from Lisa. We will be sure to pass along the complement to her regarding...More
Happy hour was amazing. Buck a shuck oysters and yummy sharing plates. Best of all, the service was top tier; Roman was excellent!
Roman was the best waiter! he checked up on us and always made sure we had enough oysters during their happy hour! best place for buck a shuck! would come again
Roman was super attentive and had great recommendations! I also loved the buck a shuck, hope it never goes away!
Rowan served our group of four during happy hour today. He was very nice and made great suggestions. Oysters were delicious.
The oysters are amazing and cost only $ 1 per one and love their happy hours a lot. Lamb and wine are good choose. The atmosphere is great and you can enjoy with your friends and family.
Excellent Dinner, lovely environment. We had lamb chops and fish - family style. Was so fun, the food was excellent, the service was excellent. Go! You won’t be disappointed.More
Hello Wanda, We would like to thank you for the outstanding review of your dining experience with us at Hydra. We’re very happy that you enjoyed both the lamb chops and whole fish served family style. Our staff take pride in the service they provide...More
Best Greek restaurant and experience in Vancouver hands down, and maybe in North America. The decor is modern Mediterranean. Erenne is the best server around and was lovely to our group. Thank youMore
Hello Colea, We would like to thank you for the glowing review and taking the time to share it with us. We’re very happy that you enjoyed your dining experience with us as well as the decor of Hydra and service from Erenee. We look...More
We booked Hydra late afternoon and managed to get a table for 7pm. The staff were so friendly and really helpful, the atmosphere was great and the food was outstanding - we shared octopus and calamari then both had the tuna - highly recommend it...More
Hello Duncan, We would like to thank you for choosing Hydra to celebrate your anniversary while on holiday. We take great pride in creating memorable experiences for our guests and are so pleased that you both enjoyed the evening. We look forward to hosting you...More
Erenee was our server and we absolutely had a great night. The drinks were great and the food was delicious! Really nice atmosphere, we would definitely come back the next time we are visiting Vancouver.More
Hello Ceeline, We would like to thank you for the lovely review of your dining experience with us at Hydra. We’re thrilled that you enjoyed the atmosphere of our restaurant and the service from Erenee. We very much look forward to hosting you again on...More
Had a lovely dinner at Hydra tonight and our server Erenee made it extra special! Delicious food &drinks and great service !More
Hello Teresa, We would like to say thank you for taking the time to write such a lovely review of your time with us at Hydra. We’re very happy you enjoyed both the food and service from Erenee. We look forward to hosting you again...More
Showed up without a reservation on a Tuesday night, the restaurant was packed. I asked for a seat at the bar and was accommodated. The staff are very friendly and attentive. The food was great, I had the grilled octopus and the tomatoe and feta...More
Hello, We would like to thank you for the fantastic review! We’re very happy that you enjoyed both the tomato salad and the grilled octopus as well as the service. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Brittany Marcq
Bravo! My husband and I had an excellent meal at Hydra. This the best meal we have had in BC so far. Best deal is the happy hour oysters! Baked salt encrusted fish is a must try - beautifully presented and delicious! This is also...More
Hello, We would like to thank you for taking the time to write such a lovely review of your time at Hydra. We take great pride in providing memorable experiences for our guests and are so pleased that you enjoyed your selves and also the...More
There is no question why this restaurant is #1 in Vancouver! Ascend the staircase to see to the beauty of this dining room. The food is delicious, the service is friendly, and the wine list and ambience are nothing short of a good time.More
Hello Sean, We would like to thank you for the glowing review of your time with us at Hydra. We take great pride in our food and beverage offerings as well as creating memorable experiences for our guests. We’re very happy you enjoyed the friendly...More",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15695553-Reviews-Hydra_Estiatorio_Mediterranean-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
I Cafe,"For the past little while I have been on a Mission! My mission is to re-discover the remaining HK Style Cafes in the Greater Vancouver area. Once a popular genre ( or variation of Chinese cuisine in Vancouver ), it has its golden days when...More
This restaurant has been located here for years You have to be competitive and have good quality food to survive along this strip where there are lots of fast food chain and good eatery places to choose from This is our first time here as...More
If you’re seeking a Hong Kong style cafe, this is it. A weird combo of Chinese food and Asian served on one plate. One of us had the cod special with a choice of white rice or spaghetti. Also came with a soup (borscht)dinner roll,...More
went with friends again for lunch. the menu is limited to typical HK style cafes and there is lunch menu which is slightly higher than other HK cafes. Quality is not bad but portions are slightly smaller. if you want parking, make sure you go...More
friends recommended this place so we’d thought we’d try it out... pretty good food, but prices are slightly higher than typical HK cafe... portions are decent and have some special dishes. Worth a try... seating is comfortable with booths and tables and have a nice...More
It has been many years since we have gone to I Cafe, last time was when they were on 8th Ave. We had the Singapore noodles. It was decent, not too spicy or oily. A bit smaller portion though for the price. Their deep fried...More
Lunch n Dinner specials every day, busy lunches every day. Meter parking on Broadway or Heather Street. They have one of the best Hong Kong cafe' style restaurants, spaghetti or rice options with pork chops, chicken, beef, or whatever, includes soup, dinner bun, and a...More
After a late meeting ended around 9:15 PM, we were looking for a late sit down dinner venue. I Cafe is around the corner of where we were. We were greeted reluctantly received by a manager who was not enthusiastic about seeing us. We inquired...More
I first went to I Cafe when it first opened, and was blown away by the vibe and setting, and the cool and unique menu offerings. It was Asian-Fusion-With-A-Twist. Alas, apparently it has changed.... The Cambie/Broadway area is hardly an epicurean destination...a vast plethora of...More
I was in the neighborhood and still having time on my parking meter I decided to grab a quick lunch at the I Cafe. My lunch consisted of the curry beef brisket on spaghetti which as expected arrived prompted. It was a very enjoyable lunch
A fairly good Hong Kong style restaurant, offering lunch/dinner combos, consisting of food items from around the world, e.g. pastas, Japanese teppan noodles, curries, Thai/Singapore and Chinese specialties. The Singapore laksa is the best I've tried, especially love the sliced fish cake they put inside...More
We have been going to i Café for the last 14 years . I never thought of reviewing it ,because it's pretty much part of our life . Even now we don't live in Vancouver anymore . We live in richmond ,where is surrounded by...More
Patrons should be aware that the I cafe is located on the second floor (formerly occupied years ago by Juke Box Johnny's diner. I was in the neighborhood and wanted a quick lunch and parking was handy so I opted for curried beef brisket on...More
Just happen in the area ,I noticed this restaurant on the second floor with a lot of big window around , I remember I read a lot of good review of this place ,so ,I am hungry ,so I like to try it out ,...More
This is HK style fast food with a twist: the variety is amazing and it will satisfy all taste from veggie to serious meat eater and in between..... Basically high end western coffee shop with huge menu but no liquor license. Recommended for quick lunch.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1220887-Reviews-I_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
IThai,"Pad Thai & Red Curry (Panang Curry) were delicious. Came in for pick up & needed a snack to kill some time so had the spring rolls. Very good too. Staff was very gracious.
Has been undergoing renovation for severl months put not the windows are covered with paper and the ""Reno"" sign is gone. Oh the phone number is not working.
Food was great, atmosphere was unique, staff and service very friendly, nice place The best spring rolls I had in a long time, hot and sour soup to die for plus the green curry pork - left stuffed
The Red Curry was a seven out of ten, not awesome but almost very good. I will try this place again. I always order the Red Curry and Rice the first time at any Thai restaurant. BTW there was no basil fresh or otherwise in...More
You know, I have been to so many Thai restaurants that my taste-buds have developed something analogous to an ennui around this cuisine at times. Most of them have been OK, but nothing memorable so to speak. Well, I went to IThai a couple of...More
Always enjoy this place just for a quick meal or reasonably priced lunch. I also have a great take out menu. I would recommend this to anyone.
We love going to IThai, their food is delicious! They give excellent service to their customers. It feels home in IThai. Thank you so much for what you offer! Teza
Have been here a couple of times. The food is amazing!! Just when I thought the flavors can't get better I was proved wrong. The flavors super exceeded my expectations. Great job. The staff is amazing!!
I've been visiting this restaurant since 2013 with my coworkers as it's within a walking distance from my office. The quality of food has improved significantly over the last year or so. It was good Thai from the start but now I can tell you...More
We visited for the 1st time from my google search. Both of us were satisfied with their food, price, and environment! We definitely will visit there again!!!
Ordered take out Service was fast and hot Many vegetarian dishes and willing to accomodate dietary requirements Vegetarian pad thai was excellent White rice was not well cooked Option for brown rice
The food was AMAZING!!! Very flavorful. I am from Kelowna. There's no comparison to any Thai restaurant in the Okanagan. Fresh natural flavors.
This restaurant is family owned, thai to its roots. Having been in thailand, I must say this restaurant is exactly what thai food should be. Flavors are on point and not to hot. All curry based cuisine are tasty!
We popped in for lunch which is served from 12 - 2:30.The food was fresh and served fast. We had the garlic and peppered pork, chicken pad Thai and the chicken fried rice all the meals were good and the price was right. We arrived...More
We drove 30 minutes to this restaurant because of the good reviews on TripAdvisor only to be told they are closed even though the time of closing is clearly stated on the door as 45 minutes later. Not impressed at all. Will not be returning.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4274971-Reviews-IThai-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Ignite Pizzeria Mount Pleasant,"Unfortunately pizza did not meet our expectations, the taste was rather flat, not enough salt, poor quality mozzarella. Looked way better than it tasted.
The best pizza in town! Excelente service, price and pizza of course. Try spinach pancetta, fresh ricotta or pesto chicken Staff amazing, great music selection, clean ambient, fresh pizza for slice all the time They have delivery also accept SkipTheDishes
This restaurant has the very best pizza. Excellent pizza crust and wonderful toppings. You might think you were in Italy!
I love this place! The service is great for a ""fast-pizza"", great modern decor. Never disappointed with this place.
Pizzas are very good, either ready cooked slices or your own individual pizza. Found this because nearby italian restaurant under our hotel was rubbish. Seats are a bit hard but place is clean and bright. So....Craft beer for 5 dollars, good fresh pizza for a...More
We were disappointed with our go to pizzeria, Lombardo’s. We tried Ignite and have made this our favorite pizzeria since. We have 3 well known pizzeria in our neighborhood but will travel to get a good pizza at Ignite.
Great pizzeria with great staff. The food is so good. Highly recommend it. Tons of options on the menu!
Stopped here for dinner as I was just walking by. Interesting selections for $3.50 CD a slice. Stone fired and delicious!
Wow nice surprise! Great pleasant service and very nice minimal interior . I really recommend this place if you like thin crust stone fired baked pizza with excellent service and clean interior. Such resonable prices. Love it. Will return for sure.
We were shopping and doing errand on Main St. As we were in traffic and saw a parking spot in front of Ignite we pulled in. My wife has been to the location in Gastown and said the pizza was good. We ordered 3 different...More
We stopped here and picked up a few slices of pizza to take back to our hotel! Loved the various selections (would not have thought of some of the mixtures - all that we tried were yummy!). Love thin crust pizza....Wood fired pizza! Service was...More
My spouse loves loves loves pizza, and our daughter is a very much loving thin crust pizzas - and all 3 of us didn't love their pizza. Customer service was average but the pizza was really disappointing. With so many pizzerias close by (Carano, Don't...More
We loved our lunch of gourmet wood fired pizza. Possibly the best value in town for quality food in a nice clean environment. It was a good meal and a relaxing escape from the hustle on main.
my work place is located nearby and we buy pizzas from this place for team lunches quite often. I would highly recommend.
Ignite sets the standard of what good pizza should look and taste like. You'll never be satisfied with regular pizza again after eating here. the pricing per slice was really reasonable. As a fan of good pizza, this rates really high.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13548669-Reviews-Ignite_Pizzeria_Mount_Pleasant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Iki Japanese GF Restaurant,"This is the only FULLY gluten-free sushi restaurant I have found anywhere in my travels, and has been consistently delicious and healthy whether we've eaten in or done take-out. Yes, the prices are higher, but it reflects quality and health-consciousness. My 5 & 6 year...More
IKI Japanese Bistro is a find, and dedicated to being gluten-free. The sushi is very good, fresh and well prepared. Plenty of vegan options!!!The sushi rice is excellent and they offer brown sushi rice that is very good (no up-charge). My favorites are; yam fries,...More
Great spot for gluten free sushi and teriyaki. Everything is gluten free at this restaurant making it a good option for celiacs. Even the soy sauce at the table is GF! Definitely a spot to visit if you're gluten free/sensitive and miss good GF sushi.
Everything on the menu is GF. So nice to be able to eat everything at a Japanese Restaurant again! Like that there is wild salmon options. Wish they wouldn't serve farmed salmon at all though.
With its unassuming interior, quiet, polite staff, and extensive menu- we were excited. With my gluten-avoiding lifestyle, it’s been years since I’ve had more than five options. Everything there is gluten free and they have a Celiac Association approval. Had tempura, and spider rolls, and...More
Wonderful to be able to eat everything here with no worries about cross contamination for those with Celiac disease. All the food is freshly made and delicious. The yam fries in tempura are amazingly delectable! Wide menu with various saki and other alcohol including gluten...More
LOVE that this restaurant is 100% gluten-free. It was so nice to be able to eat anything from the menu that I wanted; I haven’t had tempura in 10 years! It was so excited to be able to have many of my Japanese favourites again....More
I had a great time with family and friends. I was able to easy everything in the menu and for a celiac, that is a dream come true!!! Tempura and agadeshi tofu, I haven't had that for years. Quality pretty good, prices a bit higher...More
Highly recommend this restaurant to both gluten- free/celiacs and everyone else! The food was delicious. I am not veggie but my daughter is and her tofu teriyaki box was one of the best bento boxes I have seen in Vancouver. Only downside is that we...More
I can't stop going to Iki! Their yam roll is one of my favourite things ever. Staff are always nice and the decor is lovely. Highly recommend this sushi joint!
Found out about this place quite by accident and went there the other night with a couple of friends. It was absolutely wonderful to be able to have Japanese food without having to worry about gluten in anything!!! The food was fabulous...love that the teriyaki...More
This place is AMAZING! It has everything that you can usually get at a sushi place, but it's all gluten free! You can get gluten free gyoza, tempura and special roles. It is no nice not to have to worry about cross-contamination, as the entire...More
Gluten free everything. Have tried the tempura, teriyaki, miso, ... It is all delicious. Such a treat to be able to eat anything on the menu. Thank you!
This place is AMAZING!! It's completely gluten free and coeliac friendly, there's even a sign on the door asking customers not to bring any wheat products in! Even if you can eat gluten, it won't be missed. The food was delicious and servers friendly. Local...More
Iki's menu is entirely gluten-free! Everything we ate was delicious and the staff is extremely kind and attentive. Highly recommend.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1013194-Reviews-Iki_Japanese_GF_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
India Bistro Vancouver,"Before the Covid , this restaurant offer the best cheap Buffet lunch in the neighbourhood , I heard it though the gapevine , they change new management in 2020 , dropped in for quiet lunch , only few patron , so quiet atmosphere , price...More
My go to neighbourhood Indian restaurant. Decent portions and not expensive. Delivery options always a plus in my books.
I ordered for pick up using the Uber eats app. I arrived to pick up the food at the specified time and India bistro claim they did not receive the order. They started prepping my order on arrival, so I waited another 20 min until...More
We came in late around 9pm and basically had the restaurant to ourselves. We ordered the Chicken Marsala (extra hot) rice and Garlic Nanbread. All of the food was delicious but after delivery we were ignored. I got up and poured myself some more ice...More
Went here order chicken methi and butter chicken and 2 naan and boiled rice. The food was bland did not taste any good the naan came out and was half a naan was cut into 6 pieces. And I paid for 2 naan If you...More
I and my brother went along with our family for the penultimate dinner in Vancouver. By the way I’m from UK and my Brother from USA and we are Indian by birth. I can’t muster enough words to describe the feeling and horrid experience we...More
It was my first time experience at India Bistro and i must say the hospitality and the food was mind blowing. I will visit this place again and again. Keep up the good work guys.
We are Indian cuisine lovers. Our taxi driver upon arrival told us about this restaurant and went for an early dinner. The experience was fabulous. Authentic Indian cuisine, great quality and kind service. We had the chance to talk to the owner and congratulate her...More
The 6 of us enjoyed a delicious Vegetarian Indian dinner here, with Onion Bhajia, Papri Chaat, Aloo Gobi, Veggie Kofta, Veggie Biryani, Okra curry, Dahl Bukhara, Malai Kofta and Garlic Naan. Service was a bit slow after the meal was served but we all left...More
We always visit India Bistro when we come to Vancouver, it is one of the highlights. The restaurant has a nice warm ambiance and the food is always excellent. Can't recommend enough.We have tried other recommended Indian restaurants in Vancouver but have not find any...More
Poor quality. This is a chicken tikka masala. Hygienic consideration very suspect. They place the packages on the floor mat. Everyone walks over. Pricey. Picture of meal given below. Not again.
Ordered take away - service was a little slow. Waited over 20 minutes for meal to be ready. But it was worth the wait! Yummiest butter chicken, and a huge serve, we got 2 meals out of it!
Haven't been in a couple of years, but we went India Bistro on Davie based on our last great experience. They've only gotten better! The lamb rogan josh is amazing melt in your mouth wonderfullness. Our server was great, if a little bit curt due...More
Amazing food, 14 dishes to choose from. All made fresh, kept lovely and warm! Staff are helpful friendly and on the ball. 10/10 would recommend. Definitely coming back.
Well appointed interiors with dim lighting and cosy atmosphere. Friendly and informative staff with excellent service. Our table of 7 people, some with lactose and nut intolerances, were well catered for. Our entree and main dishes were promptly delivered and hot. It had been some...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5098008-Reviews-India_Bistro_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Bombay Bistro,"One of my great neighbor want to take me out for dinner at the Indian Bombay for dinner , first time visit , very impressed with the decor very moderate and relaxing atmosphere , happy to see all the booths have plex glass separate them...More
I don't go anywhere else after trying this place. Co-workers and I always look forward to ordering lunch there. To the guy who waited for 20 mins while their computer was down, try speaking up. It's a life skill.
Excellent and authentic Indian food. Friendly service and staff. Excellent pandemic protocol. Will certainly be returning
Won’t let a delivery driver pee in their washroom. Don’t eat here there’s pee on the side of their wall
I’ve ordered here multiple times and they are super consistent! I always get the butter chicken and vegetable korma and it is exceptional. It’s the only Indian food I crave!!
Just ordered goat biryani and chicken biryani. This is just a pulao it is no where close to biryani. The biryani with Indian bay leaf if way better than this one. I regret ordering it from this Indian Bombay bistro. I need my money back....More
Not only was the food great but their hospitality was outstanding. I had left my car to have a windshield replaced in a service shop a short distance away. I had a fair bit of time to kill so had a great lunch and then...More
Decent Indian food, was happy with all the dishes! They also have the authentic Bombay beer, which we enjoyed a lot, very good flavor.
Ordered takeout which was ready for pickup at agreed time. At home food was poor in taste and quality , Aloo Paratha was burnt and dry and had very little filling. and the other vegetarian orders were lacking seasoning and any discernible flavor. For starters...More
This was my first time trying this restaurant. The food was very good - the mango butter chicken was particularly good. The service was good for the most part - the waiter was attentive, and provided good attention. However, at the end of the meal,...More
Went there with my parents - who're vegetarian. Ordered the Mango Butter Paneer (cottage cheese curry), and a Vegetable Korma. To our horror, instead of the paneer in the dish - they had put CHICKEN in our curry. We had a bite before figuring out...More
We ate here this month - February 2019 for dinner. A group of 4 friends on a week night and it was very quiet when we arrived - we were early (5:30 pm), but was full and bustling by the time we left around 7:30pm....More
I found some of the dishes to be delicious , the others average. To be fair, this is similar to all other places. The food tastes like authentic Indian and I would definitely visit again.
We'd always gotten this food as takeout and it had always been consistently good. However, this evening we had friends in town, so we decided to take them to the restaurant for dinner. As usual, the food was great, but the service was not. When...More
Went with My family. Had a fairly good experience. Variety Indian Veg and Non Veg is good. Service is reasonably good. Food quality is reasonably good. No complaints. Not much of ambiance. Pricing is reasonable. Courteous Staff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d6384387-Reviews-Indian_Bombay_Bistro-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Indian Delicacy,"Hidden gem with a secluded location and a 'Mom's Trendy Indian Kitchen' vibe. Good size portions, prompt service, tasty. Pakoras are to die for. Try the mixed platter is our recommendation
Please visit this restaurant. Its at the back of the main road but its safe and so worth a visit. The food was the best indian i have ever had and we have had many as we eat in England. Staff friendly and kind.
we were in Marriott and found this place within walking distance. the food was fantastic. loved the palak chicken the most. also liked his andhra fish .and the prawns side. everyone in our party loved this food. Vancouver is supposed to have great Indian food...More
This is 10/10. Flawless. The staff a super lovely, and recognised me on my second visit in two days. I am an Aussie traveller and this is one of the best veggie kormas! I always got takeaway, but they seemed pretty busy for dine in...More
Tasty, fresh and authentic Indian food in a good location in downtown Vancouver. Reasonably priced. Chicken tikka really good.
our family group had 3 meals here during our 7 night stay in Vancouver. we would heartily recommend this restaurant. the quality of the food was possibly the best we have ever enjoyed in an indian restaurant. with a very good choice of vegan and...More
I wanted a meal near my hotel and visited at 6pm. I was placed at a table by the door to be entertained (?) by the passage of multiple couriers collecting orders. i ordered a starter and main course and was ""persuaded"" that, in addition...More
I came yesterday for my birthday and the food was very delicious. The service and ambience was top notch. Must visit!! The best Indian restaurant in Vancouver.
We dropped in on a quiet Saturday night. Not many customers yet the staff seemed incapable of getting food to the table. We were there for almost 90 minutes. They took our order — three times. Yet no food or drinks ever arrived. No apologies...More
This restaurant is tucked away a bit but was worth the visit. The food was delicious especially the Butter Chicken. Food was well priced and service was great.
Perfect vindaloo If you love vindaloo as much as I do look no further I’ll never be able to have it anywhere else again in Vancouver
Great food and service! Food cane out quick and very authentic- loved the aloo gobi, spinach curry, Tikka masala, garlic naan! Thank you and will return! My second visit!
Went here for dinner in early December. I planned to visit my usual Indian restaurant but they were closed for a private function. I found this gem online and stumbled into an evening of deliciousness. It’s located in a small back alley and a bit...More
Food was alright. Portion sizes were very large. For example, Onion Bhaji starter consisted of approximately 10 pieces. The choices for rice were limited. The staff were friendly. The price for the food was reasonable.
The Mali Kofta was a revelation! Literally the best we have ever had (anywhere). I wish I could take it back with me to the US. The rest of the food was so wonderful ...",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15322654-Reviews-Indian_Delicacy-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Fusion,"I used to love this restaurant, especially for its Lamb korma. Then one time I got pretty bad food poisoning. ""No worries"", I thought, ""maybe it was something I ate earlier in the day"". About two weeks later, same dish: Lamb korma, same outcome: a...More
We have been residents of North Vancouver for more than 25 years and have eaten at Indian Fusion since it opened and always loved it... However, last night we ordered take out. It took 90 minutes to get our meal. The eggplant dish was mushy...More
Went in last week with my family for dinner over the weekend; loved the dine in experience it’s cozy place and servers offered fabulous service. We ordered couple of dishes for the table must say food was10/10. I would highly recommend this place for Indian...More
Indian Fusion Restaurant for lunch with my wife on a cold and rainy day. Chicken korma, lamb palak, pulau rice (basmati rice with green peas, cumin & spices), and spinach-stuffed naan. The korma and palak were thick, flavourful and perfectly spiced. The rice and naan...More
The service was friendly and inviting, the food was delicious and generous portions- what more could you ask for. I will be back!
This was our favourite Indian restaurant whenever we were around Lonsdale. Their food is very good but since the pandemic, the take out quality is notable... in a negative way. The take out containers are deceitful with some raised levels so you actually get less...More
The experience starts on the sidewalk where you can begin to smell the delicious food being prepared. We do have our regular favourites. However, every time we stray away to try another dish, we love that one too. I can hold my chin high and...More
Always ""delivered"" and always enjoy to be there dine in or take out. Good service, comfy environment. Nice place to hang out and enjoy a meal. Especially refreshing experience after some ""horror"" dining experience in some self-styled ""cultured"" eatery.
Enjoyed our meal here. Servers covered each other so you didn't wait long for anything, and they were so helpful in guiding you towards ordering something that would appeal. At their suggestion I moved away from a too-spicy item and instead had the Rogan Josh...More
Great lunch offers for only $10 - lots of food. Efficient service. Basic decor but look past that to enjoy the food.
Absolutely fantastic food. I have not tried anything yet that I don't like. They always ask what level of spice you want and it's always bang on. Highly recommend chicken korma.
This is the second time we have gone to Indian Fusion with friends, and both times the food has been very tasty, with lots of options. It is a relatively small and busy place, but it does take reservations. With the help of the server,...More
We met for dinner for a quick business discussion before attending the ABBA concert at the venue close by. The waitress promised to get us out quick. We ordered 1 appetizer paneer pakora which came in 15 min but it was very dry and the...More
My husband and I went to Indian Fusion for lunch on a Thursday. When we got there around 1:00, the restaurant was pretty busy, but we didn’t have to wait for a table. We tried their lunch special for $9.95, and liked it very much....More
A very nice restaurant with friendly staff and excellent food. A lot of value for our money! Definitely recommendable.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d3248954-Reviews-Indian_Fusion-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Junction Bar & Grill,"We had heard about the restaurant and popped in for one of their signature luncheon specials...dishes are about $12,$13 and include meat, rice, salad, pakora and naan. Good sized portions (I had the lamb curry, my wife the butter chicken). Food was nicely spiced and...More
A restaurant in my own neighbourhood, we ate here once before COVID. Food was great (5 stars); ambience: OK (3 stars max.). Since COVID, we've ordered from here about 1/2 a dozen times. It's always very good! I'm a vegetarian and my personal fave is...More
I have sampled many different dishes from their menu, and all have been of high quality. Their flavors are equal to what I found at high end restaurants when visiting India. Conveniently located in my neighborhood for frequent take-out service.
No need to go on Fraser or Main Street for great Indian food . Cambie Street has this place. Excellent quality and wonderful flavours. They just started dine in as well
Consistently excellent Indian food from this great neighbourhood hidden gem. Takeout and delivery options available through several apps, and always super fast. Not at all greasy or oily like some places.
Such a great spot. The staff are so friendly and super accommodating. My partner has a fish & but allergy and they were more than accommodating. Everything is prepared fresh so they can change ingredients (for example leave out the nuts). The food was so...More
I live in the neighbourhood and am sorry that I have not eaten at Indian Junction until this week -- it would have been my neighbourhood favourite much sooner. The service is friendly and helpful and the food is really fabulous -- the best Indian...More
Went with a friend for dinner early before heading to a movie. We had driven by and decided we'd give it a try. And we are so very glad we did! The staff and owner were friendly, helpful and attentive even though they were busy...More
I LOVE Indian Junction on Cambie. The food is so clean (not greasy) and delicious. There's so many delicious vegetarian options and I'm not even Vegetarian! I highly recommend Vegetable Pakoras and Vegetable Butter Masala (mild is very mild). If you're craving Indian food, you...More
Came for lunch as a friend recommended it. Had the luncheon special ($11.95) And it was delicious. More than enough along with the delicious Naan bread. Server was SO polite. Curry was so delicious.
I haven’t actually eaten at the restaurant but I have ordered from there on Skip the Dishes Food Delivery. It really is tasty. Their Bhindi Do Piazza is my favourite though I have tried other dishes and enjoyed them as well (Makai Kofta, pakoras, yellow...More
Food was super delicious. Friendly people. Also great for a vegetarian and gluten-free diet. One of my favorites, highly recommended :).
I am a curry snob. But I had lamb Palak at this restaurant today and I was blown away. I was in a party of 3 and we all ordered different dishes to share. The spices were fresh, well balanced and the food was absolutely...More
We went here recently and the choice was extensive, particularly for vegetarians. The restaurant is nicely decorated and large enough to accommodate multiple groups. The service was a little slow but I believe the restaurant has only recently opened. The food was very good, I...More
Excellent food, especially the Fish Coconut Curry and Tandoori Chicken. Friendly, efficient service. Pleasant ambience.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15088604-Reviews-Indian_Junction_Bar_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Oven,"Takeout - Cold Rice. I’ve given this place a few goes and each time the rice is cold when I get home. (I live one block away) this shouldn’t be for a take out.
I can not tell you how delicious this restaurants food is. I have never had any Indian food this good. We had the butter chicken (out of this world), the Chicken Saag, and the appetizer chicken pieces (which were just delicious). The sauces are so...More
Five of us. Appetizers, main course and dessert with drinks. What a feast. Sublime curries. Great beer and exquisite mango ice cream. This place is our local go to restaurant for a great evening. The service was impeccable. Our server wrote nothing down and got...More
4 of us with very different tastes and levels of spice had a superb evening here. The food is unquestionably some of the best Indian food in town. The beer at $4 a pint is a steal and much appreciated. I had the first of...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew indian oven . I tried this place on a quiet Wednesday evening. The restaurant was pretty much empty, but a friend recommended this place. I got the butter chicken meal set, it comes with rice and naan. The...More
Was craving Indian, and saw this location as I cruised down 4th Ave. They had parking in the back and a nice ambiance inside. I ordered Palak Paneer with a side of Paratha bread. As he picked up my order he asked if I wanted...More
Meat, fish or vegetarian (23 choices alone) this restaurant never fails to please. The food is consistently superb, service friendly and excellent and the beet the cheapest in town.,I recommend the chef special chicken dish and any vegetarian dish. Mango ice cream is to die...More
Authentic tandor cooking and some of the best sag paneer I've had (very delicate and the cheese was 'just right'), this upstairs restaurant allows you to sit outside in the treetops overlooking 4th Ave or inside with air conditioning and large tables that can accommodate...More
We went to Indian Oven around 2.00pm, Food tasted fresh, excellent vegetarian fare.Water was refilled as soon as the glass was empty unlike other restaurants where you have to wait for your table to be served. In short, a very pleasant visit.
Amazing experience!!! Special menus are a great deal! Food is super tasty, could be spicy or not, lots of vegetarian options... and quantity more than enough! Super friendly staff!
Great menu, lots of choice. The food is fantastic, wonderful flavours, good prices. Alcohol is reasonably priced
The service was awful, they took forever for even tea. The waiters were very mean for no reason, and the food is gross ended not even having most of it.
Veg. Pakoras are crispy and spicy; Veg korma to die for; eggplant is always on our list....may be too spicy for some? Another of our faves is a chicken dish with mango in the sauce. Service is always friendly and efficient. We have never had...More
I love Indian food!!! The flavours are amazing. And so many of the dishes at the Indian Oven are so good!! The biggest problem you'll have here is choosing what to eat! And of course order the naan bread... lol! The naan bread is big...More
The diningroom which is up a flight of stairs is large and airy. There are plenty of tables and a bar for cocktails. We ordered Tandori chicken and it came sizzling hot, with a couple of side dipping sauces. Delicous. The naan was fluffy and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705138-Reviews-Indian_Oven-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Roti Kitchen,"Yummy! This is the best roti ever! I didn't start going here until after COVID began, but I don't think I'd say the in-restaurant experience would be a Friday night thing. Very clean and nice, but not big on atmosphere. However, the take-out is tops!!!!...More
I stopped here to pick up dinner after a busy day. I wasn’t sure what to expect, because I’ve never had roti before but saw this place had great reviews on TripAdvisor and Yelp. We looked at the menu and ordered the Chicken Vindaloo Roti...More
Tried this new place with new concept in Indian Food..both Veg and Non Veg..Roti's are stuffed with choice of your veg or non veg even with gravy..portion are more than filling and quite tasty..absolute stunner..they have rice preparations too..must try at lease once.. one can...More
We stopped off to eat dinner at the Indian Roti kitchen. This restaurant is based around take away rather than eat in but we chose to eat in. When ordering, the server warned us that they make their food a bit spicier than most, so...More
Fantastic taste excellent portions and amazing service.....But be aware the spice scale here is ramped up one example: mild=medium and so on.....still fantastic
I would give Indian Roti Kitchen 6 stars if I could. It’s by far our favourite take out restaurant. The portions are enormous and great value for the money. My favourite is the eggplant & potato roti, but my husband likes the lamb vindaloo or...More
Loved the concept of Roti wrapped with your choice of filling. I chose Shahi Paneer Roti at spice level 5 out of 6 and loved it. Spice level was little hot for me but enjoyed the extra kick. Do be aware that place is really...More
Eat in or takeaway. Lovely food. Close to Douglas house b & b on Cambie and 13 th. Highly recommend it.
my family and I ate here earlier this week for dinner after seeing great reviews. the food itself (channa masala with rice, saag paneer roti, chicken tikka roti) was delicious and portions were very large for the price. the restaurant was very busy but primarily...More
The ""chicken korma"" roti I had for dinner was delicious! It was very filling, nice and rich with the taste of curry and was enough for 2 people to share if wanted. We our roti for take out and it was still very hot about...More
Haven't been able to get currys in roti outside of canada was lucky enough to get it again here while visiting Vancouver. Love the levels of spice as it allows me to make it really spiced. The food is very quick and tastes awesome roti...More
I have been to Indian Roti Kitchen a dozen times already and the food has been consistently DELICIOUS every time. Love it, love it, love it. The portions are large, so I can look forward to eating the leftovers the next day. The kitchen looks...More
This tiny little place has the best Indian food we've every had. There are only 4 2-person tables but they do an incredible take out business. They provide a range of spice (heat) from a 1-6 scale, and I found 3 hot enough. Most meals...More
Tiny location best for takeout but absolutely phenomenal! Portions are large. One roti is enough to feed two. The flavours are exceptional. Definitely don't miss this place if you like roti. Worth a trip just for it.
Eaten food from here 12-15 times, had 5-6 different dishes (all stuffed Roti) and loved them all. Small restaurant with 3-4 tables as take out is most popular. Reasonably price and generous portions. Highly recommend the lamb korma!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6949170-Reviews-Indian_Roti_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Indian Wok,"I was shocked to see this place has any bad reviews then I realized not everyone enjoys spicy food with blasts of flavour. I go there as much as I can - just wish they were open during the day so we could go there...More
Overall food is delicious but very oily. They are also very kids unfriendly. We had to order a full size fried rice plate that got wasted eventually as our toddler only ate a small portion of it. The owner said they couldn’t do a kids...More
Adorable, sweet family owned. We were curious about this place by the line up out side. Otherwise likely would have never gone. The food is amazing. Delicious fusion. The line up is legit!
By far the best halal Chinese I have had in Canada. Owner confirmed that her meat is all halal. There was a waiting when we entered the restaurant as it was a sunday night. I highly recommend reserving a table. Do try the Hakka Chowmein....More
We've been driving by for a long time now and finally, went in. Why did we keep driving by for so long? Very pleasantly surprised. The menu is quite extensive with plenty of choices plus a lot of things I've never seen or heard of...More
We try to go here at least once a month because we love the food. The staff and owners are friendly. The food is excellent and flavorful. The portions are large and excellent value. We try different dishes each time and are always good. Two...More
We've been there twice so far; once dine in and last one take away (you'll get 15% discount for take away :D). We liked it overall. All meats are halal. Its not a very big restaurant, seating arrangement is about 30 people. Adequately decorated and...More
Of course its a fusion food, and the taste is good. The only problem I find is that the meat quality is not good. The meat is heavily covered with flour. I guess this is to save money. Other than that the taste of the...More
The owner is a darling, lunch specials are so affordable, located centrally at the corner of Kingsway and Royal Oak this is a must try cute little restaurant! I would recommend this to all.
We simply love this place for the best blend of Indian and Chinese food. Amazing taste and great value!!
In the mood to try out a new restaurant, we went to the Indian Wok in Burnaby three days ago, but only after we had read all the rave reviews about it and were convinced that with so many people vouching for it, the food...More
the food was pretty ordinary and every noodles item tasted the same. The service wasa swift and courteous. The staff was quite accommodating even when we had a screaming baby in the group.
My friend is a regular here because of their selection of vegetarian dishes. We recently had India Wok cook up 3 dishes in bulk: noodles, green beans, and pakoras. The fave was the veggies, which was a much needed as our potluck was lacking in...More
Was expecting good things with the other reviews, it was bland, made us feel unwell, we couldn't believe how gooey and tasteless it was. The chilli chicken wasn't too chilli, the ginger beef wasn't in any way crisp, the Szechuan chicken was bland. All dishes...More
My second visit here & I will go back. It falls just a hair short of a very good rating for me. The bias is more Chinese than Indian, even with the overtly Indian dishes. I'm guessing that the quicker wok cooking process doesn't allow...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7213779-Reviews-Indian_Wok-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Indigo Age,"I love this cafe. I've been coming here for years and it's never failed to disappoint. Today my partner and I visited and had an appy and the Ukranian combo. We were very pleased and amazed at how delicious it all was. I love the...More
We visited Indigo Age Cafe on the second day as we landed in Vancouver. When you walk in it give a cozy vibe, with cheddar tables, nice music, and very kind staff. Such a rich selection of artisan, all 100% natural & plant-based (cooked or...More
Good vegan lunch cafe! I liked that it was specialised on Ukrainian food and also had a wide variety of salads, soups, protein smoothies, cakes and more heavy food. I tried one of the soups that came with either bread or crackers with cashew butter...More
The whole family loved their meals! Ukrainian vegan pierogies, gazpacho, creamy mushroom soup and the mini burgers with eggplant bacon. Great blend of flavors to make a delicious meal. Very responsive service. Highly recommend.
The Indigo Age is a very good Vegan, raw and gluten free Cafe in Central Vancouver. Access - central location near Transit stops, SkyTrain and Sea bus. Parking is available in the area. No disabled access though as the cafe is at the bottom of...More
Stopped in at this tiny, basement level cafe for breakfast on a Saturday (they open at 9:00 am on the weekends) and they had the full menu available. Got the mushroom soup and perogies. Perogies were great and couldn't believe the gravy sauce on top...More
Yes, Ukrainian vegan options! It isn't often you find restaurants offering vegan food from this region. I'm in Vancouver on business, and I had to try it. I ordered the Ukrainian Pirogies and the Tiramisu. Very happy! I ordered the pirogies with sauerkraut. They were...More
Nice place worth trying out. The baked Indian wrap was really good. The rest of the family enjoyed the cabbage rolls.
Stopped for a quick bite and had a great morning snack. Indigo Age has a enticing variety of plant based food and drinks. My tea and pie were very tasty. The cafe is a bit quirky which I like and made the place feel unique...More
Cozy & grungy little place popular with locals... i had mushroom tacos and a smoothie, both of which were very good. Friendly and efficient staff, good WiFi.
This restaurant has changed its menu relatively recently. Its previous emphasis on raw food has largely gone. The Ukrainian dishes are still there and it has great perogies, cabbage rolls, sauerkraut and borscht. The vegan cheese platter is still excellent. There is more emphasis on...More
The food was good - we went for the high tea service. Don't get me wrong the food is great, its a small cute little place, but the high tea was more of an appetizer, you'd have to get an additional meal to feel full....More
Enjoyed our food very much, nicely flavoured and fresh. Steep steps to enter the restaurant so difficult for unsteady feet. Well worth the stop. The cabbage rolls are amazing!
We went for High Tea. The variety of tea was great. Teas and food were beautiful and delicious. Excellent service
This was my first raw food experience eating out. The various items for their high tea were delicious. The meal itself I felt was very light afterwards so that is good for a mid afternoon meal. It didn't feel as heavy as normal traditional high...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8732648-Reviews-Indigo_Age-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ingrain Pastificio,"I had insect and sand in my salad. Contacted restaurant via email with no response. Pretty disgusting.
InGrain pasta cooked at home was by far the best tasting pasta I have ever had. No more big company pasta for me.
The pasta is the best I have ever tasted. Full bodied and not filling. I will always endeavour to use Ingrain pasta.
Great people, great food....Only problem was a concern that our cashier wasn't wearing a mask....Kind of scarie!....when all this covid is going on....Please consider this issue!. Other than that. looks like all safety protocols were being observed. Thanx for being there for us.....We look forward...More
What a find. This place is unique in its authenticity. A lovely experience and something to discover!
Delicious food and I love that they support other local businesses for their food sourcing! Went with the kids and we all found food we loved. Thank you!
Great small restaurant vibe. Very friendly staff. Lots of easy parking. Have both eat in and take out
Did not expect to find this quaint pasta eatery in a strip mall - but there you have it. Really good pasta options, simple fare, nothing too complicated in a casual family style setting. They have backgammon boards with cards on the tables to while...More
Ingrain was a nice stopover after a few hours of paddling in deep cove. A nice selection of pastas to choose from- you cant go wrong as all pastas are fresh and made in house. Better than your average store bought dry noodles by far!!...More
Went there without reservation and they were busy booked and came back in 1/2 hour. We all had pasta dishes which were great. Would recommend to anyone looking for excellent fresh pasta.
First time there tonight, the food was very tasty, interesting atmosphere, casual and friendly. The ingredients are sourced from Canada and pasta made in house. Also has wine and beer available for with your meal. We really liked the dessert we shared, cheesecake mousse. I...More
Excellent place for lunch or Dinner. Friendly staff and wonderful taste. If you like fresh pasta it's your place. We really liked it.
Great find in Parkgate Mall North Vancouver....from the minute you walk in the door friendly staff great you and the aromas of the fine comfort food lure you to a table. GREAT 4 cheese sandwich w soup a MUST try delish..Great pasta dishes and the...More
(could not find an email address online to address this directly to the company) We love your pasta. It's delicious! We eat it about 2 times/week at home. But we've noticed that there is no recycle symbol on your packaging. Is your packaging not recyclable?...More
In-house made pasta, with everything from the wheat to the die to the drying process signifying quality. Our bowls of pasta were totally full of flavours and absolutely yummy. Looking forward to our next exploration of the menu. Drinks are a little limited, with only...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d8003059-Reviews-Ingrain_Pastificio-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ipoh Malay Cuisine,"We finally tried this place - excellent food although apps are on the small side. We had the roti, chicken wings and satay - all good. Laksa was very filling and tasty. We will be back soon
Had been recommended by my Malaysian and Singaporean friends for the Laksa there but I ordered Hainan chicken with rice instead, didn’t want to eat something too hot and spicy on a hot summer day. Went for lunch, didn’t have to wait to be seated...More
We ordered a dish that had a crab which costs $85. The waitress said it would be almost three pounds but it looked only under two pounds, it overprice a lot. Please don't order seafood in this restaurant.
Great little find after flying in from Montreal and picking up a rental car on SW Marine Drive. Extensive menu, though a majority of what’s on offer has at least some sort of fish or seafood in it (neither of which I eat). Service was...More
This place has an extensive traditional Malaysian menu. Particularly liked the mee goring. Satay was okay but not the best I’ve had. Fried bananas and ice cream were fantastic.
Having lived in Singapore and Brunei and travelled regularly to Malaysia we know the food. You will not be disappointed with Ipoh offerings...their char kuay teow is as good as I have had at hawkers stalls in Kuala Lumpur. Laksa also great. And Hokkien Prawn...More
Always our favourite! They have the best noodles and fried rice and vegetable spring rolls. Great service and ambience. We always look forward to come and try new dishes whenever we are in the area (which is once every month). The best south East Asian...More
Our friends introduced us to this Malaysian restaurant hidden away on 70th and Granville. The food and service are excellent! We tried a lot of their dishes. Hainanese chicken with the oily rice, deep fried crab, crispy noodles covered in a seafood sauce, laksa, roti,...More
The servers were rude and disrespectful. They barely spoke to us and when they did it was with a tone of irritation. We felt as though we were unwanted patrons in the restaurant. They served us tea in a tea pot that had orange coloured...More
Place is clean. Presentation is nice. Taste....salty. Portion small. Price... overpriced for the overall quality and taste. Roti chani- nice and pluffy but the curry sauce to dip if in was watery and salty. Curry platter- chicken/ lamb/ beef... the lamb was best. Again, curry...More
I tried this place because it is near where I was staying and the menu sounded interesting. I am very familiar with Asian food but not so much with Malay food. The food I had was excellent, the service prompt and attentive. The decor is...More
This restaurant is located in a little mall in Marpole, Vancouver. It was heaving with people all evening on a Sunday (always a good sign). As I was solo, I decided on a takeaway Char Kway Teow. It was ready in 10 minutes and was...More
prices are reasonable, dishes are good portions. although the Nazi Goreng is a bit underwhelming and taste like generic fried rice. was told it’s very busy for dinner and hard to find parking, but for lunch enough parking in the lot if you go early...More
My wife and I tried Penang Delight in Marpole for the first time. Overall, the food was very good. We prefer better than John 3:16, not as good as Banana Leaf Broadway. Hainanese chicken was deboned chicken drumsticks. Actually, out of the 3 restaurants, John...More
We were celebrating an event with 10 people. Food was tasty and good service. it's tucked inside a residential neighbourhood off the main road but don't let that discourage you. If anything, it's a hidden treasure of good eats!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2552806-Reviews-Ipoh_Malay_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Isami Sushi,"I don't like pseudo Japanese food because it scares me. This is a family run business with good authentic food. Everyone is greeted promptly by pleasant staff. We were served immediately even though it was fairly busy. Orders were taken and we didn't have to...More
I went there to have dinner with friends and so disappointed exhausted our food got mixed up. The waiter didn’t say what plate was he serving then my friend had my food and I don’t get to eat. It should say what is the plate...More
The food I thought I was ordering in the picture vs what I actually got. Great disappointment in looks and taste. Generally all the rolls are over priced for what they are. I thought I would give a new sushi restaurant a try, will not...More
I love sushi... I feel I know a thing or two about it and I have to say that this place serves fresh food and at great value. The servers were totally on my husbands food allergy concerns and were very professional.
Service is great. Fast and efficient but very friendly. And the sushi, really really good. I’ve enjoyed this so much and I’m writing this during dinner. Everything was delicious. I had a combo plate. Lot’s of locals, which is a good sign. The restaurant itself...More
We were staying in Metrotown, not exactly know as the culinary center of Vancouver. Not wanting to venture out of the area, we decided to try Isami. And boy am I happy we did. This is a small neighborhood place that oozes authenticity. Nothing fancy...More
They must be doing something right no? Looks like a family operated joint; the sushi chef and waitresses speak Japanese. Torn with the rating as the nigiri was really good but the tempura was a bit on the slim cut side and hence my waist...More
This is some of the best sushi in Burnaby. Such good food. The chefs are Japanese and Produce Foods authentically. Moderately priced but worth every penny. If you get a chance sit at the sushi bar and you’ll have a good conversation with the owner...More
It’s been a while since I last visited Isami Sushi but I had made a special trip to the Metrotown area so I could try the new Soft Peaks location and figured it’d be a good idea to stop off for some sushi while I...More
Wanted to try a new place instead if the usual. A Google search later and saw this on yelp as top 3 in the area so I thought I'd try. Ordered a few dishes and it was pretty good. Sashimi tasted fresh and portions of...More
Isami Sushi is a small Japanese Sushi Restaurant located on Kingsway, Burnaby. The location is easy to find, but it’s no parking beside. A few weeks ago, my boyfriend and I had a dinner at this place. We arrived at the Isami Sushi around 6...More
I have visited this restaurant first time in 2010 and the quality hasn’t changed ever since (the prices did go up, but I still have this as not-to-miss spot whenever I’m in Vancouver). The staff is very nice and if it is not too busy,...More
If you measure a restaurant's success by how busy it is - Isami is successful indeed. Their menu is reasonably big (no salads really, though), and the service efficient and friendly.
First time to Isami and much enjoyed the experience. Simple decor but great food selection including non-mainstream items, great food quality and good service - all for a very reasonable price. Will definitely go there again.
I’ve been looking forward to revisitng Isami Sushi after previously trying their sashimi and nigiri sushi in mid-2016. This time, however, I wanted to try some of their other dishes to see how they compare. Here we have the Appetizer Tempura with prawn, carrot and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d705172-Reviews-Isami_Sushi-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Italia Bella Bar & Grill Restaurant,"This small Italian restaurant is a true gem. Authentic flavors, impeccable service, and a cozy atmosphere make it a must-visit. From homemade pasta to divine tiramisu, every dish is a delight. Whether you're an Italian cuisine lover or seeking a memorable dining experience, this restaurant...More
The linguine vongole were perfection! Real fresh clams in the shell. The aromas in here are fantastic.
Wow ! So happy that after 1 1/2 years after they shut down that Italia Bella has reopened with their new beautiful location. The food is amazing and so delicious just like it used to be. We came in with a few friends and got...More
my favourite local restaurant - so glad they have reopened - wonderful food at reasonable prices - fantastic service. Free parking at the back.
They finally opened their new restaurant location... after 2 years since they closed April 11. 2021... from Kingsway and now on 53 West Broadway, Vancouver BC... I finally got to taste a very delicious meal, one of my favorite dish, grilled wild salmon penna... awesome...
I made a request to eat at home, and everything arrived very good! Very hot and tasty, the pesto comes with very tasty pinoli ... This garlic bread in the photo is simply wonderful haha I wanted more. The size of the plate is quite...More
Consistent, generous portions, zesty sauce, perfectly cooked pasta! The salads use super fresh ingredients. My go to for delivery pasta! Highly recommend!
This place has the best pasta! I always come here with my friend on weekends. Never had a bad service so far!
We ordered take out from this restaurant and found the food to be far, far above average, especially for take out. We had Caesar salad which was just fine, nothing to write home about, but the calamari, the vegetable fettuccini Alfredo and the chicken penne...More
Their service and food are fantastic he is trying his best to make us satisfied I visited here two time and will come back again definitely Highly recommended
I dont usually give reviews but feel like this great little restaurant deserves one. I'm staying at the hotel next door so I thought I'd give Italia Bella a try on the recommendation of the hotel staff. I'm so glad I did. The staff was...More
After visited to my friend in the hospital there family invited me for dinner at the Italia Bella Bar at Kingsway next to the Best Wester Plus hotel , I was surprised the outside looks unassuming but inside the restaurant ,wow ,the atmosphere ,ambiance ,very...More
Italia Bella has great, fresh Italian food and Kam, the owner, goes above and beyond with the service and quality. I order the gnocchi once a month and it is consistently fantastic. Nice romantic setting for date nights as well. Very reasonable prices with generous...More
We’ve been here twice and each time we’ve had an amazing meal. Colleen is one of the best servers we’ve ever had! It is a small,cozy restaurant and the food is outstanding! The bruschetta, fettuccini, gnocchi and pesto linguini are fantastic! Our 10 year old...More
The best restaurant i have ever been in my life, love their food quality and their hospitality, if you wanna try italian food, this is the place, totally incredible",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7622040-Reviews-Italia_Bella_Bar_Grill_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Italian Kitchen,"We came to this restaurant as a last minute dinner and honestly, I underestimated it at first since I had never heard of it. To my surprise, everything we ordered was delightful accompanied by the service! The food came out quickly, hot and beautifully served...More
Found this restaurant on social media, their pasta seemed to be worth a visit. The expectations weren’t too high but this restaurant blew it out of the water! The atmosphere within the restaurant is a more elegant/fancy one, which was unexpected. My girlfriend and I...More
Dear Alex, Thank you so much for your review. I’m so happy to hear that you and your girlfriend enjoyed your dining experience with us. We look forward to hosting you again in the future. Sincerely, Shaneece Guest Services Supervisor
We were looking for a last minute booking for 20 people in Vancouver - not an easy task. Our hotel Concierge was able to make arrangements with the Italian Kitchen and we were so glad that he did. The experience with Italian Kitchen was very...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave such a glowing review! It was our pleasure to host your group and make this happen for you. I will be sure to pass along all of your kind words to the team! For any other bookings...More
I ordered the Veal Saltimbocca and my husband had the Carbonara. My veal was thick and tough; it was difficult to cut with a knife. I'm quite certain it was pork and not veal. The Carbonara came with 4 thinly sliced pieces of bacon on...More
Hello Susan, I am sorry you did not get the experience you were looking for. We value all of our guests feedback and I have passed along your comments to our Executive Chef. We are constantly trying to source the highest quality product to give...More
As a coeliac I felt 100% confident eating at Italian Kitchen. Great GF options. Feels genuinely Italian with amazing service, food and wine.
This was a disappointment for us. The food was not up to taste. The fish I received was not seasoned and tasted bland. I would not recommend going here. Not worth the money.More
I'm sorry to hear that you didn't have a 5-star experience. Here at Italian Kitchen, we are consistently striving to be better! As our valued guests, we thank you for your detailed review on your evening visit. I have also passed along your feedback to...More
I hosted a business lunch here on Monday and the service and food were good however my guest who has a severe gluten allergy became very unwell. Throwing up right after our lunch until the evening. This was not a great experience and hoping the...More
I'm sorry to hear that you didn't have a 5-star experience. Here at Italian Kitchen, we are consistently striving to be better! As our valued guests, we thank you for your detailed review on your lunch visit. I can assure you that we take allergies...More
Wonderful pasta and friendly service. We came in as a family party of 12 without a reservation. Brad was kind enough to find us a semi private area. He was the manager or maitre’d but ended up being our personal waiter and made everyone feel...More
This gem of a restaurant was on our hotel list of nearby dinner spots. We felt like Italian after a long day of touring. Popped in right around 5 pm for an early dinner and boy were glad we did. Delighful and Delicious describe our...More
Not coming back there was a mice inside the restaurant area. I notified both manager & waiter and they did nothing about it. Sad for a dinner of 50$+ per person.
Great location near Fairmont Vancouver. Friendly service and good menu selections. Little bit pricey but food was delicious.
Called in on Monday and have the happy hour post lunch deal. Food was really good and service from Tolga was excellent, professional and friendly. Really enjoyed the full experience.
This place has excellent Italian food. It is definitely an upper tier restaurant. The atmosphere was very classy with white table cloths and the staff wore black pants and white shirts. It is expensive but the food was the best. The staff were friendly and...More
Great weather, so we asked for a seat on the outside patio. Our server was extremely helpful, honest. Started with a great bottle of wine, shared a mushroom risotto as an appetizer, then each had the halibut special. All were delicious! Server surprised us with...More
Italian Kitchen has high customer rating and this is for a reason. It could be described as high end italian restaurant with white table cloths and sophisticated service. The personnel is very friendly and professional and service runs smooth and efficient. The menu is wide...More",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d799375-Reviews-Italian_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Italian Tomato,"Great experience. The food was delicious and portions are massive (literally served on platters) . Great service, no complaints. If you don't want pizza or pasta there are some limited options, but that is definitely the majority of the menu.
We had a lovely dinner at this restaurant. Our waiter was really good. He was attentive and the food came out really fast. Our Caesar salad was so good and the pizza was thin crust and lots of toppings. We both would highly recommend this...More
Had a great dinner with my family when we visited Vancouver. It was right next to our hotel and we were craving some Italian food so we thought why not. Great food and even greater portions!
This is pasta any way you like it. Choose your pasta and then choose your sauce. Large variety to chose from. I had the olive oil based anchovy and black olive with tomato sauce over rotini. It was fabulous. The portions are very large. I...More
This was a great local spot to dine-in, within walking distance of our hotel at Hampton. They treated us well - when i asked the waitress about a sweeter wine (similar to moscato/pink moscato), she spoke to the owner to ask, and the owner actually...More
Excellent food. The lasagna was huge. There was enough leftover for lunch for two the next day. The seafood linguini was also delicious. We started off with a good Caesar salad . The meal also comes with good French bread which meant we didn’t have...More
Went to Italian Tomato with a few friends this past weekend and was pleasantly surprised by the big portions each pasta dish had. My spaghetti with meatballs was tasty and filling. I had to pack home and will be eating it as leftovers for dinner...More
Friend recommend me to try Italian Tomato as I was staying in Richmond. Portions are BIG and I had to take back to my hotel and it made for a easy dinner. Conveniently located close to the sky train.
We found this restaurant close to our airport hotel. We were seated quickly, waited on quickly and the food didn't take too long. I had the spaghetti and didn't listen to the waitress who told me the ""full"" portion was very large. It was delicious,...More
We walked here from the Days Inn near Vancouver airport. This area is under urban renewal and not a very nice looking neighborhood. But when we entered the Italian Tomato we were very pleasantly surprised. We were greeted by a very nice hostess and led...More
Lovely and busy but found us space, unlike other half empty restaurants that couldn’t fit us in. The food was the best of our trip, great bread, freshly cooked food that tasted fabulous. Service was superb all round a great night out.
We had a chicken parmigiana and it was avery nice dish with ravioli aside. Highly recomended for people staying near airport. We had excellent service by Jillian
It’s a safe bet if you are staying at an airport hotel - 5 minutes walk from Days Inn, for example. It’s a standard large restaurant. Clean and the staff were friendly and helpful. Food was average and they had a couple of decent beers...More
We visited Italian Tomato with our two adult sons and had a thoroughly enjoyable dinner. We ordered faccacia bread as an appetizer and enjoyed it very much. We did not realize that we would also receive a complimentary basket of sliced bread with butter. The...More
Looking for something close to our hotel and found Italian Tomato across the street. As others have stated, portions are large! But not only quantity, you also get quality. My wife and I shared the flatbread pizza - excellent with plenty of smoked salmon, and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d810069-Reviews-Italian_Tomato-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
JINYA Ramen Bar - Vancouver,"Headed to Jinya for the first time with a couple of friends who had been there before. I will start by saying that the ramen was absolutely wonderful and the restaurant itself was clean and beautiful. A couple of things, the service was sub par....More
I'm half +Japanese half Canadian, been back and forth Canada to Japan many times. I know my ramen. Second time here within a month to give it another chance. Same outcome. Great welcoming from the host, clean restaurant, staff was accommodating and professional, while maintaining...More
Our server was amazing. Friendly, gave helpful suggestions and checked on us often. We thoroughly enjoyed the food and drinks!
This place literally blew me away . The food was a 10/10 and service and atmosphere was so good. Quite literally the best ramen place I have ever eater in So recommend
best ramen I‘ve ever had afpr appetizer I‘ve ordered a vegi bao bun, it was rella nice but for the main dish the vegan ramen was amazing many differnet vegetables are in there, tofu, nice noodles we had some nice wine from okanagan valley as...More
This is the best ramen I have eaten in Vancouver. House-made noodles. I keep going back whenever I’m in town. Can be busy though.
I had to throw u* and they didn’t give me a refund back. They asked me to go to hospital. I am on my off day, and i don’t want to go to a hospital, sitting next to people who have covid and all kind...More
Saw Jinya listed on a top 10 to Die For Ramen in Vancouver so we decided to give it a try on our 1 night in Vancouver and we were not disappointed. The server was great at explaining their menu (but maybe over warned us...More
As someone who cooks and eats Asian food often, I can honestly say this was one of the tastiest ramen bowls I've ever had. Francis was a fantastic host and explained the spice level very clearly. I hope to visit again should I come back...More
The service is really fast, good option for lunch or dinner. I think is one of the best ramen restaurants in the city, the pork chashu bowl is incredible.
Unfortunately, we have nothing positive to say about our family experience here. Although they position themselves as a premier ramen bar, there was nothing premier about it. The food was barely edible, the service was lacking and the concern for the health of customers was...More
We were lucky to have dinner here on our last night in Vancouver. We couldn’t have found a better place! The restaurant was very busy but had room for us at the bar. We started with drinks; Sapporo for me and cider for my wife....More
This is one of my must-eat-at Ramen spots in Vancouver. The best Ramen town in Canada this spot is upscale and has a fabulous bar too (if you’re solo, ask for a spot at the bar). Bottom line, some of the best broth, unique add-ons...More
My wife had tried this place a few years back while she was here on business. We were in Vancouver for several days so ended up here one night. The place was very busy with line ups but they seemed to move quit quickly. When...More
In the dying days of October, my partner and I decided to patronize JINYA on Robson. This California-based ramen chain had been on our “must try” list for a while and, since we happened to be strolling by the large, shiny, Telus Garden we thought,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3202878-Reviews-JINYA_Ramen_Bar_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
JJ's Restaurant @ Vancouver Community College,"Our neighbours at home suggested trying this restaurant as they had been a few years ago and enjoyed it. We had a lunch there for a special birthday and the food is wonderful. The students were brilliant and the service great. Such good value for...More
JJ's Restaurant is located in the Vancouver Community College downtown campus at Cambie & Hamilton Streets & operated by VCC students in the culinary program! It is very rewarding to see these talented students taking pride in creating so many delicious dishes! We booked online...More
Really pleased we tried JJ’s for lunch as part of a day trip into town for the theatre. Call or book online as there are not a lot of tables and you need a reservation. As others have said this is part of the college’s...More
All the dishes were prepared meticulously with excellent presentation. Food cook to perfection. We can taste the effort and exquisite ingredients in the food. Obviously done with lots of attention and care. Wonderful dining experience. Actual location on 3rd floor of VCC. Not easy to...More
Located in the City Collège it is operated by students in the well respected culinary program. Good quality ingredients and innovative food, attractively presented. The food is first rate most of the time but can sometimes be inconsistent. The food can be over-salted so a...More
We make a point of dining at JJ’s at least once per school year. The VCC downtown dining room has nicely configured comfortable seating. The culinary arts students waiting tables are a treat to interface with as they are all trying their best to please....More
Wonderful 5+ course prepared by the students who are close to graduating their culinary arts program. Each dish is explained by Chef Hamid Salimian. Many layers of taste and visual stimulation. So worth it to attend to enjoy and support. Wine pairing was ok. Limit...More
Its a teaching school dining room so keep your biases in check, everything may not be excellent but its fun to watch the students learn their trade in a nice environment and to a person, every time we have gone for lunch, the students have...More
It is a collage students' cooking and serving so it is open only for very short time (sometimes at lunch and other time may at dinner). You should make a reservation! You will enjoy peace and quiet in the restaurant because their are only few...More
The food was superb and so reasonable. The students cooked better than most high end restaurants. I had the scallop appetizer and it was tasty and presented well. The veal was done to perfection and the sauce to die for. My bread pudding was delicious...More
When you come in, you forget that you're in VCC. It feels like you just entered a fine dining French restaurant. Food is very high quality and very well plated. Serving staff is efficient and friendly. Reservations recommended as it can get busy.
A must go place at the edge of downtown Vancouver, BC, hidden inside Vancouver Community College. Creative cooking and excellent service by the students of the college program.
3 for lunch on a reservation (recommended to ensure they are open and have space). Being part of culinary training courses please keep that in mind when reacting to the staff as they may be still on a learning curve for table service. The food...More
I had lunch with my mum there yesterday and yes the food and the price are both great but the maitre d' should maybe have be reminded that the customer comes first : we had booked a table for 2 and a friend of mine...More
We have wanted to go here for a long time and we finally did. Everything about the experience was very good. We made a reservation and they were friendly and efficient when they took it - confirming the day and time at the end of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705335-Reviews-JJ_s_Restaurant_Vancouver_Community_College-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
JOYE,"There apparently are two Joey restaurants on Burrard. Joey Burrard is at 820 Burrard. We had reservations and we’re glad we did because the outdoor patio seating area was quite full at 6pm. We started with the chicken lettuce wraps, which was so different from...More
Hi Betsyco, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're always happy to hear positive feedback from our guests and we can't wait to have you back in again soon. Thank you, Melissa Bliss Assistant General Manager
The food was very tasty and the service good not great had a new waitresses who was not familiar with the menu and could not answer questions as she simply did not have any knowledge of what she was serving. Ordered the ravioli with prawns...More
Hi Ivar, Thank you for visiting JOEY and taking the time to leave your review. We would love to discuss your experience further in order to provide a better experience for your next visit and see where we can improve our service standards. If you...More
We loved this restaurant so much we went back three times ! Also on last visit had taken colleagues there. The service was great. Lovely choice of wine and cocktails and we went on wine Wednesday even better 1/2 price wine. The food was excellent...More
Hi Amanda, Thank you so much for this amazing review! We are thrilled you had a great time here and hope to see you again in the near future. I'll be sure to share this review with the team! Melissa Bliss Guest Service Manager JOEY...More
We ordered Sangria. According to the menu list it should be a mix of red and white wine, bourbon, fruit juice and fresh fruit. The only fresh fruit in the glass was a single slice of an orange. The kind you also get if you...More
Hi Voyager44795580272, Thank you for visiting JOEY and taking the time to leave your review. We would love to discuss your experience further in order to provide a better experience for your next visit and see where we can improve our service standards. If you...More
Max was such a great waiter. He laughed at my daughters jokes, took us through the whole menu and recommended some great meals. Thanks Max for making our one dinner in Vancouver memorable! Tim, Elliana, Cam & Ellyse
Hi Maps218202 ! Thank you for the review! We are happy to hear we hit the mark for you. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
Food was amazing, got the tuna club and new York steak! ,Our server Brooke D was fantastic, she was funny, entertaining, and provided great service! Definitely coming back and asking for her.More
Hi FarAway We're so thrilled to hear that you had such a wonderful experience with us. Ensuring that every guest has a great experience is one of the things we take a lot of pride in, and I'm very happy to hear that we were...More
Great food but most impressively, phenomenal service from Brooke. Made our night and will certainly be coming back.
Hello Ali ! Wow, 5 stars! We are so happy that you enjoyed your experience with us. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
We wanted to taste several local BC wines and luckily our server was Cam, clearly expertly passionate about wine as he is ( or training to be ) a sommelier. This really made our evening and many thanks to him for that. Management - he...More
Hi Charlie, I appreciate your positive words! Thank you so much for taking the time to share your experience with us. We’re very grateful for customers like you and your review reaffirms the hard work we put in every day. We look forward to seeing...More
Great patio seating and equally great service. Quality of the food was excellent, served hot and quickly. Our server, Xenia, made our visit even more enjoyable, very informative and not intrusive. Would definitely return to this location!
Hi Surrey, Thank you for joining us and taking the time to leave a review! We're thrilled to hear about your experience. We hope to see you again soon at JOEY Burrard! Melissa Bliss Assistant General Manager
Great choice of dishes. Food was delicious and service was exceptional. Thank you Fiona for doing an amazing job and being so professional and freindly
Hi Happiness, Thank you for the 5 stars! We appreciate your support. Melissa Bliss Guest Service Manager JOEY Burrard
The food and beer were very good. The lava cake dessert was excellent as was the outdoor patio but it was the staff that made it. The hostess was helpful and our server, Xenia K was really friendly and efficient.More
Hi Barbara, I appreciate your positive words! Thank you so much for taking the time to share your experience with us. We’re very grateful for customers like you and your review reaffirms the hard work we put in every day. We look forward to seeing...More
Just arrived in Vancouver. The restaurant is nicely understated yet inviting. Excellent range of meals available at a reasonable price. My hand pressed burger and fries was excellent as was my wife's oven baked cod. Great range of drinks including local breweries. Mark, our waiter,...More
Hi Andy, We are so happy you enjoyed your experience with us! We look forward to seeing you again soon. Melissa Guest Service Manager JOEY Burrard
Had dinner, made reservations for 6:15pm as we expected it to be busy, it wasn’t until around 7pm. Restaurant has a large outdoor eating area as well as ample space indoors. Food was good and service was quick, about 1 hr total. Would recommend.
Hi Darren, Thank you for the 5 stars! We appreciate your support. If you should ever like to make a future reservation please don't hesitate to reach out to me at mbliss@joeyrestaurants.com Melissa Bliss Guest Service Manager JOEY Burrard
The outdoor seating is perfect for this week's weather, and everything about the experience was amazing. From the decor to the staff, the service to the food, you really get what you pay for at Joey's properties. This is the second location I've eaten at,...More
Hi Fearless, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're always happy to hear positive feedback from our guests and we can't wait to have you back in again soon. Thank you, Melissa Bliss Assistant General Manager
Great restaurant to try for our first night in Vancouver! I understand this is a very popular chain restaurant in Canada and I can see why. Food was excellent and the service top notch. Our waitress had so many suggestions regarding what to see and...More
Hi Mom230, Wow, what a fantastic review! We're so happy to hear we provided an exceptional experience for you. We're looking forward to hosting you again soon! Melissa Bliss Assistant General Manager
Extremely disappointing. We were welcomed and shown to our table. About a minute after our starters arrived, our main course was brought to the table! Naturally we sent it back expecting it would be kept on heat. Less than 5 minutes later another waiter brought...More
Hello Steve, Thank you for bringing this to our attention. We apologize for the subpar experience you had at JOEY Bentall One. We understand your frustration with the quality of service and food you received. Your feedback will be taken seriously and we will take...More
This restaurant is still the best in Vancouver. If you are looking for a restaurant that provides excellent food, drinks, and service….this is the restaurant for you.More
Hi Mark, Thank you for taking the time to leave such a wonderful review about your experience at JOEY Bentall One. We are thrilled to hear that our restaurant provided you with excellent food, drinks, and service. We take pride in offering the best dining...More
Fantastic restaurant, Kevin V. our server was exceptional, he answered all our questions and was very helpful. We choose the Mediterranean Bowl and the Crab Cake with Asparagus. Atmosphere was great on a Saturday night. Highly recommended this restaurant to my friends. (4/22/23).More
Hi Paul, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're always happy to hear positive feedback from our guests and we can't wait to have you back in again soon. I will be sure to share your compliments with Kevin! Thank you, Sophie Jessel Assistant...More
I’ve wanted to re-visit JOEY ever since my partner and I had an exceptional experience with them in 2021 at their Kelowna location (see my review on this site). It was our first time dining at JOEY and we declared it the “best” meal of...More
Hi PookyCake, We're so thrilled to hear that you had such a wonderful experience with us. Ensuring that every guest has a great experience is one of the things we take a lot of pride in, and I'm very happy to hear that we were...More
You walk in for your reservation and they ask if you would like a glass of champagne as you are seated. Nice touch. Our server Joaquin was terrific. So kind. Very attentive. We have been looking for some new wine glasses for quite some time....More
Hi Jrwingfield, Thank you for leaving us a review! We're always happy to hear positive feedback from our guests and we can't wait to have you back in again soon. I will be sure to share your compliments with Joaquin and are so glad you...More
Our 2nd to last night in Vancouver, found joeys, food super. Hubby is a chef 👨‍🍳 and we really appreciated our dinners. Waiter charming (felix) Quick service, great gin and tonic.
Stopped by for a drink (Joey near Canada Place) to find it was Happy Hour…Stella for him and a Double Raspberry Vodka Super Nova for her, with Fries at the bar. We then came back later for dinner and both had the Bombay Chicken curry...More
Hi micheletate21, Thank you for taking the time to leave us such an amazing review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience with us and look forward to having you back in as our guest if you are ever back in Vancouver! Kindly,...More
A very good restaurant with good music the staff was very nice and waitresses very professional the food was sooo good the steak was cook to Perfection the music was awsome it his a restaurant if you are ypu d and want to go eat...More
Hi Peggy, Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us a review! We're thrilled to hear about the experience you had with us, and we can't wait to welcome you back in again soon. Thanks, JOEY Restaurant Group
There was a vibrant scene at JOEY during our recent weekday lunch visit as the place was packed with both office workers and tourists alike - and no wonder, the food was amazing. We were lucky enough to sit at the bar where our bartender/server...More
Hi G3nLondon, Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us a review! We're thrilled to hear about the experience you had with us, and we can't wait to welcome you back in again soon. If there is any additional feedback you could...More
What an amazing dinner.!!! Love the ambiance at this location We started with superb appetizers then fabulous entrees steaks, salads and salmon. We ended with shared desserts. Service by our waitress was friendly and attentive. Nothing was a problem. The food was top notch. Highly...More
Hi E608ZVnataliem, Thank you for taking the time to leave us such an detailed review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed your experience with us and look forward to having you back in as our guest soon. Kindly, Chelsea Kohlruss General Manager
The service was above and beyond and the food was exceptional! Our waiter, Taylor was very accommodating and the manager made sure we were happy all around as visitors to Vancouver!
Hi Jodie, Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us a review! We're thrilled to hear about the experience you had with Taylor and our team, and we can't wait to welcome you back in again soon. Thanks, Chelsea Kohlruss General Manager
Food was exceptional. Service was beyond exceptional. What a great find on our Vancouver vacation! It’s not always easy to please discriminating foodie New Yorkers - outstanding experience. Thank you to our fabulous waiter Taylor. The entire staff was amazing!!More
Hi Beverly, Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us a review! We're thrilled to hear about the experience you had with Taylor and our team, and we hope to welcome you back in if/when you come back to Vancouver! Thanks, Chelsea...More
Enjoyed our lunch on the patio. Kids menu with 5-6 items was nice. Excellent tuna sushi, good burgers and fish tacos. Not our favorite crab cake but salad with it was good.
Hello Laura553, Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
We went to Joeys and there was a wait for a table. The host offered us a glass of fizz whilst we waited in the foyer, he was so nice and welcoming. Our table was available fairly quickly and we ordered a salad and a...More
Hi happytraveller097, Thank you so much for the 5 Stars! This review is such a treat to read and I am thrilled to hear that Nour and our team hit the mark for you. We will be sure to acknowledge the team for their great...More
We came late at about 11pm. We were tired, John and Olivia helped us to choose the right food - and it was perfect!!
Hi DovRochman, Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us a review! We're thrilled to hear about the experience you had with John & Olivia, and we can't wait to welcome you back in again soon. Thanks, Chelsea Kohlruss General Manager
Food was excellent and well presented.Waitress - Andrea Eppich was awesome! She made excellent suggestions of what not to miss and was extremely pleasant. We went for lunch and had an appetizer, sushi, and split a salad. It was perfect.
You can not reach a human on the phone to book a large party reservation. I submitted a reservation request as per their phone link system, no response. So then I tried to contact them through their “contact them shortly” link system, no response, and...More
Hello, Thank you for taking the time to write us your feedback. I do apologize about the inconvenience this has cause in booking with us. I thank you for the feedback on our system. We take guest feedback very serious, and I will make sure...More
Terrible experience. No communication at all between the hostess in the main floor and the hostess in the upper floor. We were 3 and we were asked to go upstairs to wait for our table to be ready, and to sit at the bar in...More
Hello, Thank you for taking the time to share your feedback about your recent visit to JOEY Shipyards. I apologize for the experience you had. Your feedback is important to us, and we would like to address your concerns directly. I would love to chat...More
Definitely one of my favorite spots in North Vancouver. Great food and good variety for a reasonable price. My favorite dish of all … Blackened Chicken. 🤤
Hello ! Thank you for the review! We are happy to hear we hit the mark for you. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Best, Chelsea Forbes Night Manager
Overall service and food are good! But if we have a special purpose to there, at least give us a small treat for my friend's birthday!More
Hello ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Feel free to contact me at cforbes@joeyrestaurants.com at your convenience to chat...More
Thank you Olli W for great service with me and the girls last week. Good food tasty good times!! I recommend the crab ravioli it is aldentieMore
Greetings , Thank you for leaving a positive review for JOEY Shipyards! We're thrilled to hear that you and your friends had a great time and enjoyed our food. Ollie W will be happy to hear that they provided great service. We appreciate your recommendation...More
We reviewed this restaurant just after it opened and rated it highly. Since then we have returned many times and have never had a bad experience. We dined there last night and as always, the food was very good. Prices since the end of the...More
Hello, Wow, 5 Stars! Thank you so much for taking the time to leave your review. We look forward to hosting you again soon at JOEY Shipyards! I will he sure to acknowledge Megan for her great service. Best, Chelsea Forbes Night Manager
Nice place with good ambience and extensive menu . Great service - shout out to Claire B, our server who was phenomenal.More
Greetings, Thank you for taking the time to share your review about JOEY Shipyards. We are thrilled to hear that you enjoyed our warm and inviting service, extensive menu, and great ambience. We are also glad to know that Claire delivered phenomenal service to you....More
This is our first time in this location; we have been to Joey's on Burrard and have always enjoyed the service and the meal(s). Sushi and Yam fries starters were fine. Main course of the Mediterranean Bowl for my partner was good; my Ravioli Bianco...More
Greetings Matty, We are sorry to hear about your disappointing experience at JOEY Shipyards. We take all feedback seriously and strive to provide our customers with the best possible experience. We appreciate your feedback and hope to have the opportunity to provide you with a...More
The free bubbly when we walked in the door was nice. However the crazy loudness of the place (is there music? I have no idea!! ) the 75$ striploin that was all grizzel, not medium as ordered, paper napkins, insanely loud environment, ...the 75$ striploin...More
Hello, Thank you for sharing this feedback with us. I am very sorry to hear about you experience and would love if you could email me at bgallagher@joeyrestaurants.com to ensure this is rectified for you. I look forward to speaking soon. Thank you, Brendan Gallagher
Always enjoy the staff view and food. Except my last visit. My friend and I both ordered the Cobb Salad, absolutely delicious flavourful and fresh except one ingredient sadly missing the grilled chicken. Being in the upscale Industry myself. I would doubt there was 2...More
Hi Stephen, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a rating! If there is anything we can do to make your experience a 5-star one, please feel free to reach out to us at cforbes@joeyrestaurants.com. Hope to have you back soon! Chelsea Forbes...More
The food is good and the servers are very friendly . We go there to celebrated my friend's birthday. If they can have a treat for her will be much better. And also I like the environment too!
Hello ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
A popular place, for sure (MAKE RESERVATIONS!), and once you're inside you'll see why. I was very impressed with the architecture, and the dim lighting was a great touch as well. The music was somewhat loud (kind of like being in a club, maybe a...More
Hi, Thank you for the 5 stars! I'm glad to hear we hit the mark for you. We hope to have you back in soon! Chelsea Forbes Hospitality Manager
Stopped in for ‘taps and apps’ and enjoyed a decent beer selection for a place specializing in cocktails and wine. The appetizers though were pretty disappointing. I especially won’t recommend the Korean Fried Cauliflower which tasted like fresh cauliflower doused in a spicy sauce, put...More
Hi Spades440 , Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. We would love the opportunity to provide a better experience for your next visit. If you could email us at shalayna.kannan@joeyrestaurants.com at your convenience, we would greatly appreciate your feedback. We look...More
The food was great and full of flavour. The service was quick but not hurried. Great menu and lots of choice. Restaurant was busy so good idea to book. They also do take out which we did on another day and it was just as...More
Hi, Thank you for taking the time to leave your review! We rely on reviews like yours to keep raising our standards. If there is any other feedback you are able to provide, please email me at cforbes@joeyrestaurants.com. We would love the opportunity to turn...More
A pre-birthday dinner for 6 and Joeys was kind of in the middle location. Easy to park underground, we found a way to the entrance and got in immediately. Initial table location was too noisy but they easily repositioned us in a sizeable booth in...More
A few of us ordered from their Burnaby location our dinner. I went the healthier route this time and had their beach salad and tuna poke cone. The food was very good.More
Hi! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review! We'd love the opportunity to turn this 4-star review into a 5-star experience. If you have any additional feedback, please email me at msutor@joeyrestaurants.com I hope to hear from you soon! Maddison Sutor Guest...More
Today May 20, 2023 , we went back to this Joey location …. It was remarkable delicious and we received a great professional service offered by Teanna J. We do love this restaurant with exquisite culinary!!!!
What a perfect spot to celebrate my friend's birthday lunch! Bianca, our server, could not have done a better job - so professional, yet so friendly and helpful. She made sure we had a birthday glass of champagne each, on the house, as well as...More
Hi Peter, Wow, what a fantastic review! We're so happy to hear we provided an exceptional experience for you. We're looking forward to hosting you again soon! Maddison Sutor Guest Service Manager
I've ordered peanut prawn curry and got butter chicken curry, and both steaks were looking bad. The plastic boxes are totally inefficient compared to other restaurants- KEG by the way and for sure I'll never go back.
Attended a corporate party at Joeys. Decided to get some pretty fancy tequila. The sipping tequila was served in a shot glass and the bartender offered me a lime wedge (that’s incredibly disrespectful to the tequila). The shot was $30. I paid by tap; the...More
Hi Elena, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a rating. We take feedback very seriously and want to know where we missed the mark to ensure an outstanding experience for your next visit. We will be coaching our team on this matter....More
We had a fantastic night. Came in around 7pm we decided not to wait for a table and sit at bar upstairs. While there they had a small table for 2 and the night Manager MacKenzie made it possible for us to enjoy dinner at...More
Hello Corinne ! Wow, 5 stars! We are so happy that you enjoyed your experience with us. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
Always accommodating and pleasant service. The food is delicious especially the steaks, always cooked to your request. Good ambiance and good drinks.
Hi Mikeo502 ! Thank you for the review! We are happy to hear we hit the mark for you. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Best, Dominique Pomeroy
I'll start out with the bad and why I only rated 4 out of 5. The margarita my wife ordered was so small. She had one a few weeks before this that was 10 times the size for the same price at Jack Astor's. Also...More
Hello Grayghost21 ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
Not everyone has those youthful and delightful looks that get attention and one's foot in the door, and although us older folks feel as young as our eyes tend to envision, we accept being ignored for our wrinkles and just take it as it comes...More
Hello Africanadab ! Wow, 5 stars! We are so happy that you enjoyed your experience with us. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
My great-niece chose this restaurant as walking distance from her apartment. We were visiting from Vancouver Island so relied on her to choose where we would meet for lunch. This location is in a small mall, so easy/free parking for us. We were staying at...More
Hello Snoopy647 ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
The staff - Jackson and Danielle - were very pleasant and welcoming. The food was the best we had during our stay in Vancouver and we will Definitely be back again. Start with the Sushi cones or you will be missing out...
Hi Michelle ! Thank you for the review! We are happy to hear we hit the mark for you. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Best, Dominique Pomeroy
It is my first visit in Burnaby location , restaurant is located in Madison Centre along Lougheed Hwy , very upscale causal chain restaurant also is umbrella to Earls , with direct access from the underground parking , very spacious , mordant cozy place with...More
Hello Tony ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
Our neighbors gave us a Tasting Dinner our at Joey for the holidays and the 4 of us used it to celebrate my birthday. Fortunately, Joey put it on for us even tho they had put the program on hold during Covid. Our waiting crew...More
Hello Trico5 ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, JOEY Restaurant Group
Good food good service friendly staff! Good location to approach.so many interesting menu and the most wonderful things I love sweet so good!
Gessirinm Wow, 5 Stars! Thank you so much for taking the time to leave your review. We look forward to hosting you again soon at JOEY Burnaby ! Best, Dominique Pomeroy General Manager",115,
Jade Dynasty Restaurant,"Really good food, nice atmosphere in a very questionable area of town. Service was not very good, had to seek out a server after a 15 minute wait at the table.
I am allergic to MSG. The waitperson was very knowledgeable and suggested rice or noodles. I chose the egg rice which was fantastic. My five companions loved every bit of their dim sum.
Great dim sum served here along with many tasty Chinese plates. We stuck with dim sum as we don't get good dim sum in Arizona! I ordered a halibut collar that was fried in chunks in a tasty sauce. Wasn't expecting the plate served that...More
Wandering around Chinatown & decided to have a very late lunch, ordered the steamed pork buns, they were delicious! Hubby had the beef & Chinese broccoli it was enormous! Excellent prompt service
Firstly, the JD has been here for many decades and the food is very good and fresh. They have all the usual dim sum fare you’d expect although it’s somewhat expensive. The food is very good however and we had what must be the world’s...More
Excellent Dim Sum !! We had some time before our flight out of Vancouver so we decided to get some Dim Sum. Jade Dynasty was open early (9;00am) on Saturday so we dec8ded to give it a try. Service was prompt and the Dim Sum...More
Such a good find we had all the dim sum chow main and sweet and sour pork All very good Service was quick Would recommend to those looking for a less tourist trap ans great quality food
Great Dim Sum for the downtown / chinatown area. The food I would say is standard or above average for flavours and the service was quick. Prices are pretty cheap too, definitely would come back again.
My significant other is so into dim sum that her group of high school girlfriends are known as the ""Dim Sum Girls"". We were traveling through Vancouver and making a visit to their Chinatown. We found the restaurant via Google Maps with a high rating....More
We haven't been here for over 6 months and enjoyed a delicious multi course meal in a private room with many friends bot seen in a long time. The food is always very good. Excellent service.
The pork was tough, chewy, leathery. I suspect it was cooked early today and reheated several times. The sauce made it tasty. The spring rolls were excellent and very fresh. Portions were too large for one person. Order one item and share. Maybe stay away...More
Have been here twice with a big group of friends. I LOVE the food here. We ordered a bunch of plates, got stuffed and had left overs. Divided the bill between the 7 of us and it was NOT an expensive night out. We all...More
Food is really good, just portions are really big, so don’t order more than 3 things if you go with your partner. One of the waitress was rude, the other one was nicer. Food is worth the visit.
8 of us at a family reunion dinner. When I first looked at the menu, I thought it was a bit pricey, have not gone out for Chinese food in years. Both the food and service were truly fantastic. My only negative comment would be...More
The dim sum here is terrific. I especially like the deep fried squid with chillies and garlic. It was delectable. Everything else was good as well. Service is a bit slow but it was incredibly busy so not surprising.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1015146-Reviews-Jade_Dynasty_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jade Garden Kitchen,"My wife and I tried this restaurant because we read good reviews about them. Yes not bad. We ordered 3 items from the menu…pomfret in maggi sauce (good), braised tofu with mushrooms (good), halnanese chicken (not recommended-cold). They tried to heat up the chicken because...More
The dim sum was really bad. Not sure about the other dishes, but avoid the dum sum. It was not fresh. Store-bought, I think. Couldn't chew the steamed pork. Dumpling smelled burned. We eat dim sum every time we go to town and this is...More
This is my family’s favourite Asian restaurant on the Shore when they don’t want to cross any bridges. Our mom being Asian is picky when it comes to authentic Cantonese food, she gives them a thumbs up! Our family have eaten here so many times...More
I ordered 2dinners on Skip the dishes and included specific requests/directions for the dishes and neither was provided. A red curry was requested and a yellow curry was delivered, and it was weird to say the least! The Pad Thai dish was spicy as opposed...More
Wife and I visited restaurant for dinner. Ordered the Fillet of Sole with Seasonal Vegetables, Chinese Mushroom Over Vegetables and Shrimp Fried Rice. The food was plentiful and very flavourful. We had to take almost half of it home. The price was very reasonable. Would...More
I strongly disagree with the reviewer who said to avoid this place because his meal had too much sauce. I've ordered from Jade Garden for years and find it to be one of the best Chinese Food Restaurants around.
We entered the busy dine in restaurant at 6:30 pm last night to celebrate a friend’s retirement. Two hours later no patrons including our group were asked to show vaccine passports. Avoid Jade Garden if proof of fellow diners vaccinated is important to you.
My husband & I like good food at a reasonable price. Jade Kitchen Garden more than qualifies. The food is authentically Chinese. It is the best Chinese restaurant on the North Shore, and we've been eating at Chinese restaurants here and elsewhere for the past...More
We usually go to another well known Chinese restaurant on the North Shore and just discovered this one. Almost everything at this restaurant was excellent, especially the garlic squid. My son, a lover of pork buns, was not so impressed with theirs and I prefer...More
This neighborhood restaurant is perfect for those living in the North Shore who crave for Chinese cuisine. Be it a simple meal or a celebration dinner, it works best for our family every time, no need to drive across the bridge to get good Chinese...More
Ordered delivery on a Friday night in Aug. Our order was large and arrived quickly. Large portions but taste wise, food was so so. Would not order again.
Hubby and I ate dinner last night at the Jade Garden. Authentic Chinese food and a huge menu. We ordered Dungeness crab in a ginger garlic sauce and fried squid in ma la sauce. Absolutely delicious food and very attentive service. Highly recommend.
Small restaurant along busy Marine Drive in North Vancouver. Nothing special but more than adequate food at affordable prices. Seems like a local favorite.
It’s not complicated- the quality and portion size of their dishes is excellent. Service is great as well other than one staff that is not overly friendly. I just hope they maintain this standard, especially the variety of options they have at lunch. As for...More
Had dim sum at this restaurant. They have dim sum everyday and and we ordered chicken feet (to die for), shrimp and pork dumplings, sticky rice, noodles and gailan vegetable.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4816042-Reviews-Jade_Garden_Kitchen-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jade Seafood Restaurant,"The Jade Seafood Restaurant has been a Richmond mainstay for well over a decade. Originally located on Alexandra Road, this establishment moved to Number 3 Road – a smaller space – about 4 years ago, in 2018. For much of its existence, Jade Seafood gained...More
I think this restaurant is racist. We arrive a family of 5, the restaurant was empty. When we arrive and requested a table. The keep is waiting for 5 minutes to tell us that they are all reserved. For me a racist restaurant is not...More
Jade is a great place for Cantonese dishes and dimsum, definitely meeting the high standard of Cantonese cuisine around the Richmond area. However, Jade gets 5 stars from me because I love a specific dish they do so well… their Sakura Pork Patties with Fried...More
Six of us had an amazing special arranged dinner in one of their private rooms. Crispy Duck, razor clams, abalone, budda jump the wall soup, fresh fish, seafood snow peas, and 8 treasure duck. The food and service were excellent.
Not too bad. If you’re staying in hotel I highly recommend making reservations. We had to do take out at another entrance. Funny enough we where offered seating at the takeout entrance. So very confusing
This is on of the top ten authentic Chinese restaurant in Richmond ,(special for Dinner and Banquet ) not a cheap place ,before the Covid _ 19 ,it is more busy and crazy after they moved away from Alexandra rd ,,average waiting time for Dim...More
This restaurant offers weekly and weekend specials along with discounts if you dine before a certain time. There are many different dim sum dishes which are a refreshing change from the standard dim sum dishes I see elsewhere. The food was fresh and tasty. My...More
This was our first stop following the Richmond Dumpling Trail. It is a short walk from Bridgeport Station and there's also plenty of car parking available. From 9am-11am there is a 20% discount. We came just before 10am and could hear the chatter of happy...More
Good upscale dining atmosphere. Price and portions not great compared to other options. Probably combo specials or going early for discount would be better deals.
The restaurant has moved to this location on No. 3 Road near Bridgeport Road with the entrance and parking spaces on the back of the building. If you drive north on No. 3 Road, turn left after Bridgeport Road and the building is on the...More
The new Jade Seafood is about 1/2 the size of its former location, up No. 3 road. Plenty of parking for new facility. Thankfully, the food is still pretty good, like their truffled mushroom dumpling and crab dumpling. Those were great. However, some of the...More
Went there for dim sum one morning, we just missed the early specials. The food was fine. The service was on par with other restaurants we went to in the area.
Ten of us shared a most wonderful multi course meal in a private room. Hours of enjoyment. The hosts made all the guests enjoy so many, well prepared and delicious dishes you felt spoiled. Seafood, meat, vegetables, rice and noodle dishes you name it. Excellent...More
We went to Jade mid-week at lunchtime. We saw mostly greatly reviews online so our expectations were high. No carts - dim sum only available via order. This is a fatal flaw for us so stop reading if not so for you. Food was okay,...More
We invited a group of friends, some from HK, who are very experienced diners in Chinese cuisine. They were all very impressed with the quality and presentation of the dishes, and above all, value. We had the Alsakan King Crab - 3 dishes. One was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d810074-Reviews-Jade_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Jagerhof,"A very cozy little family German restaurant in N. Vancouver , been in North Short since 2014 , it is the place you can find regional German , Swiss , Austrian Tyrol cousin and menu have so many choices , average price , my son...More
Authentic German and Swiss food. Many variations on schnitzel, raclette, roesti, etc. Extensive menu for both food and drinks (especially beer). Ambience makes you feel like you are in Germany! Service was excellent. Don’t start your diet today though!
We were walking up Lonsdale to go to a Greek restaurant and passed by Jägerhof. The menu looked good so we decided to try it. Best decision ever! The food delicious, the service was perfect, the wine was great, the atmosphere was perfect and the...More
This is a local restaurant for us, here in North Vancouver. We have been visiting with frequency over the last several years. Service has always been excellent and the food is fabulous. We especially have enjoyed the different schnitzels on the menu - crispy on...More
I made reservation well in advance from home in Toronto for another dinner get together with my travelling companion at table #12 under the Warsteiner beer sign. Was on site earlier and met Christopher outside busy writing the evening specials on the blackboard outside. It...More
We loved our evening at Jagerhof with friends! Five of us on the 1st night out without masks. The place was hopping, the piano player so entertaining. the food so European! If you want to have good food as well as an experience, go to...More
It was our first time there and we loved it. My daughter especially, and she's fussy with food. they had a pianist there on the Friday night and really livened up the place. Our wait staff obviously enjoy working there, she was very animated. For...More
Lightning strikes twice: After my first visit to Jagerhof on November 11th, I decided to go back with my friend Ditmar, born in Bavaria. I made reservation for 6pm and asked for a specific table this time (as you enter, on the right along the...More
I used to live in Vancouver till 2003 and knew about this place but never went. Now back for a 10 days visit, I decided to visit with my close friend Claude on my first night. Made reservation with Christopher 2 weeks before. He is...More
This place is a hidden gem. It has great ambience on weekends with live music. The owner seems to really take care of his customers. It's well decorate and it feels like a restaurant in Germany, Switzerland or Austria. We had sausages and various schnitzel...More
First time here. Ambience warm and welcoming. Starters delicious (sausages, beet salad, charcuterie board). Schnitzel with 3 mushroom sauce perfect, smoked pork hock flavorful, spetzle authentic and German chocolate mousse to die for. They were short-staffed as unexpectedly busy for a Thursday, but waitress was...More
Been here many times, always a real treat. The sausages are a knock out - do not eat before you come! Great place.
truly delicious German food, good wine list, friendly service . We have been a group of 8 and tried several different dishes, everything was perfect. Don't miss out on the ""Spaetzle"" (German pasta) they are authentic and the very best. Desserts are delicious with a...More
We made a reservation for Friday night (glad we did, was fairly busy and we wouldn’t have gotten a table) the food was outstanding! We ordered the trio of sausage to start. Soft juicy and the sauerkraut was super yummy. I ordered the Jager schnitzel...More
Little taste of home...Just like my mom used to make... we had take out it was very good, Im sure much better served hot at the restaurant!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d705237-Reviews-Jagerhof-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jam Cafe,"Not worth lining up for. My breakfast was cold (benny), potatoes were greasy and soggy. Also, overheard the staff talking about customers (how tacky). Expensive and disappointing.
There are plenty of reviews, so I'll just do some highlights. The portions are huge. You may be able to finish their chicken waffle if you are really hungry. I don't think there's a person in their right mind that can finish the pancakes alone....More
Daughter and I had breakfast on a holiday during a YVR layover. We saw the que and decided that if the wait was too long, we'd plan to eat at Sophie's right next door. A wait was expected and happily accepted bar seating to bypass...More
I went here after a recommendation and never been anywhere like it. The menu is incredible and can see why the queues are so long. You can't book, so just get there early! We weren't queuing too long on a Thursday. I ordered the cinnamon...More
Came here with a family of four and got one of the last tables at 8:30 in the morning. The service was great and the food was good. Huge portions.
Came for breakfast on Thursday before 9am. The music was blasting to the point that conversation was difficult. We were seated at the community table, even though there were tables available and we were obviously a family. Hot water we ordered was never delivered, cold...More
We had a very brunch here last weekend. The food here was absolutely delicious and the staff are super nice. Definitely recommend coming early as the line gets long! The service was amazing and the fried chicken Benedict was my favourite. Can't wait to come...More
I was surprised only a 15 minutes wait when we got there 12:45pm on Monday. I was prepared to wait longer. Once in the food comes out quick. We enjoyed the Buffalo blue benny and the pulled pork Later Gator bowl. The portions are a...More
We waited for close to 30 mins but the food, service staff and ambiance inside made it all worth while. Ordered veggie bowl, too much for me and i had to bring it back to the hotel.
The food was good and we were having a nice time up until we paid. We sat at our table a few minutes after paid, (there were also empty tables available), and were told by a staff member that we had been there too long...More
Jam Café first established itself as a breakfast heavyweight in Victoria (2012). Following a segment on the popular Food Network series “You Gotta Eat Here,” the line-ups increased tenfold and have yet to subside nearly a decade later. Indeed, given the success of Jam Café,...More
After reading the YVR dining reviews, we were curious about the Jam Cafe. Sure glad we did, what a wonderful way to start yr day!!! We were seated promptly, the service was friendly, a great selection of breakfast items. We highly recommend the Blackstone Benny...More
The food was pretty good but I am just upset at these restaurants that demand an 18% auto gratuity for groups of 6 or more. First of all, why are you penalizizing people for being a group of 6 or more? And how can you...More
Very busy with long line ups for lunch. We had small side orders at the counter, which were okay but nothing extraordinary.. Very popular and chic. Don’t quite understand what the hype is about.
I’d heard about Jam and did intend to go the the Beatty street location but had chance to head out to Kitsilano so made sense to go there. short wait but it was Monday at 1pm. great service and food was something else. As i’m...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15760160-Reviews-Jam_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jam Cafe YVR,"This is an awesome spot to come for breakfast if you live or you are visiting like us. Portions are large so consider sharing. Service is amazing and food is top tier . Everyone is super welcoming which was nice for us since we are...More
Everything about our visit was an enjoyable experience even the wait in the queue where everybody was happily anticipating the fare ahead, a friendly Asian ( Chinese?, she also prepared tables for incoming diners) member of staff continually briefed those in the queue on the...More
Go with knowledge you will have to queue, but it’s worth the wait We sat at the bar, great staff, coffee followed by omelette and French toast big portions, staff kindly tell you that in advance !
Never queued before for breakfast but it was worth it. Great staff, food and atmosphere. Recommend follow the staff’s advice when it comes to the pancakes, my wife couldn’t finish all of hers. I went for the Frittata, both dishes were delicious
Had to try since there was always a line up to get in. Very good fresh ingredients and from scratch breakfast spot service was very warm.
Visited twice with by husband and kids. Worth the wait! Quality ingredients cooked beautifully. Everything was amazing!
It is worth the wait!! Can get very busy. The breakfast was so good and the service was even better.. we were a party of six, and nobody could find fault with anything... well done, Jam Cafe!
Unbelievably good breakfast. I had the vegetarian bowl and my daughter had one of the options of eggs Benedict. Simply to die for breakfast. And I usually don’t eat a lot of breakfast. Service is excellent. Staff really care for making sure you are enjoying...More
I came to the Jam Cafe for Brunch, both my partner and I had the 3 pancakes and they were unbelievably good! Don’t overestimate your appetite as it is A LOT of food but they are to die for! Bit of a queue to get...More
Sunday morning, had to line up for around 50 mins, no street cover. Might not be easy with hungry children, but well worth the wait. .Good food, large portions, organised staff.
Seen this place when visiting Vancouver for a short trip from USA via United Kingdom , the food was amazing and was worth the short wait outside, friendly staff and service, defiantly worth trying, A+++++
Great friendly service, food was fantastic. I loved my order and everyone else's I saw looked wonderfully generous as well.
Seriously!! This restaurant has the absolute BEST breakfast and brunch food in the city. As you may or may not know. You can’t make reservations,and when ever I go there there’s always a super long line. Which can look pretty intimidating but rest assure !!!...More
Finally got the opportunity and time to spend waiting in the queue for Jam Cafe! Went there on a Saturday morning. Reached at 9.43am and got a table at 11am. Had to wait around 15 minutes for my order to arrive. I would suggest going...More
This small restaurant does not take reservations and the wait can be quite long, but the service and food are well worth the wait. Everything was homemade and delicious. My only criticism would have been we found the waffles a bit dense and dry but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10224421-Reviews-Jam_Cafe_YVR-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jam Jar,"I was in the neighbourhood for a doctors appt and saw this restaurant as I passed. The lady in the bookstore up the street said it was good, and I had never been before, so I decided to take a friend out for dinner. The...More
Excellent food at a good price. Service was excellent. My wife had the falafel bowl and I had had the makanik bowl. Both were excellent and full of flavour. Well worth the visit and trip to Commercial Drive
My husband and I visited Jam Jar for happy hour! We enjoyed discounted appetizers and drinks. The hummus’ were the best I have ever had! Drinks were good too! We sat outside. The patio was cute and our server was attentive.
JamJar did an amazing job organizing and setting up my cocktail party and dinner. We had 35 guests, with 21 different plates that we had chosen. Everyone absolutely loved the food, we even had vegans at the party. Quality of food was fresh and tasty,...More
I like how they converted a former Gourmet Burger joint in the Drive to a hip and stylish Lebanese Restaurant. The food here is fresh, tasty and delicious from the Tawouk ( marinated chicken thighs ) to the Makali ( deep fried cauliflower) which is...More
My order included baclava. I ordered through Door Dash and the Baclava did not arrive. When this was reported to them, I was only told that I could have it added free to my next order. There won't be a next order! For the price...More
This is the second time in going and first time in the new location. Food was as good as ever, the deep fried cauliflower is a must! The new digs is much bigger so it didn't feel as cramped as the other place. Is a...More
We went for a family birthday dinner and we all loved every dish we tried. We are great lovers of Lebanese food, but until Jam Jar, we hadn't found really good Lebanese fare. We were very happy with our visit. The atmosphere is nice and...More
My daughter and I came here for lunch and were very happy with the service, we found the food quality to be very high, the flavours delicious, and the general ambiance very nice. HOWEVER, the washroom doors need to have a partition placed in front...More
We were here for a late dinner. We chose a few dishes to share: an excellent hummus, batata harra (cubed seasoned potatoes), falafel, malaki (deep fried cauliflower with pomegranate molasses). Dishes came to the table one by one which was a perfect way to be...More
The lively atmosphere was interesting without being distracting. Seating was comfortable. Modern yet warm and inviting interior. Food was colorful with a wide variety of flavors. Some unusual (for Vancouver) ingredients made it quite refreshing.
Amazing restaurant that is perfect for a family with young kids. Great healthy food and amazing friendly service on The Drive... nothing beats that! Recommend the falafel and cauliflower dishes... delicious!
Brings out the best of middl-eastern cuisine. A short menu of fairly simple things that they do really well. A few nice value wines. Great atmosphere in the new location. Light and airy with lots of space and kid friendly too. I'll be back to...More
Reserved a table for their Friday tasting menu. Had the vegetarian tasting. Absolutely amazing and our Shadi was so knowledgeable and helpful. Don’t hesitate. Just go!
We went to the South Granville branch of JAM JAR restaurant, foods were great, tasty and delicious, the staffs were really kind and caring, especially Elizabeth, she was really nice and served us everything. They also bring me a dessert free for my birthday without...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7197705-Reviews-Jam_Jar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jambo Grill & Paan House,"Cheap paper bags charged $1 without asking the customer. They claim it is legal. Be warned. Customer should have the option to bring in their own bag like most reputable restaurants do. Check your take out orders before you leave.
Somehow they always screw up my take out order. I ordered medium spicy and end up with mild. Prawn masala tasted bitter. I was also charged $0.75 for a $0.25 take out bag.
Paper Bag was .25c Cloth bag $1.00 we only charged you 00.75c. Regarding bag charges is city by law.
Back in Kenya there was a restaurant called Stavros that made the best Poussin Chicken. I was excited to try the poussin chicken only to be disappointed. The chicken was dried and hard. The poussin sauce was served on the side rather than marinaded with...More
Hi, The reason Sauce was given on the side on all take out is so the chicken would not get soggy and you can always warm up the sauce in case your late getting home.
I live in Seattle and I used to go to Jambo grill a few years ago everytime I visited friends in Vancouver. This time around, we ordered a variety of different dishes delivered to our airbnb and shared it among friends. The taste is just...More
We asked a taxi driver for restaurant recommendations and his description of Jambo Grill as both African and Asian intrigued us. There are few places you can get this kind of food! We went with friends, so there were four of us who had all...More
Jambo Grill is owned by a Ugandan, and it has a great range of Indian-East African food, including matoke (a staple Ugandan food). The food is delicious, and it the restaurant is very family friendly - they have a children's menu, and provided crayons and...More
Had a wonderful meal and enjoyed the options to try African as well as Indian food. I appreciated the relaxed and generous service, continually replenishing our pots of tea and allowing us to linger over long conversations.
Great food and service. Highly recommend the masala potatoes. Bottomless chai tea. Only down part was they made us wait 10 mins even though we made a reservation.
Jambo Grill situated on Kingsway is definitely a restaurant to visit if your either a resident of Vancouver or visitor. East African and indian dishes are served and you won’t find this anywhere else in Vancouver. Treat your taste buds I can promise you will...More
This is a really hidden gem on Kingsway near Joyce Streets!!! Great ambience and service. We were a party of 10 and the service was impecable from the beginning to the end thanks to Karan and his great skills of profesional customer service. The place...More
Once you walk in you are greeted with beautiful murals and a gourgeous layout. We were seated without hesitation and met with only smiles. The wait staff are very knowledgable about their own dishes and wine pairing. The food arrived on our table within a...More
You can totally taste the spices and the care they bring to every dish.One of my favs was the Madras beer too!
I went here with friends for an impromptu dinner. It was a great choice. We shared the chorma platter, which had spicy ribs, chicken, kebabs, etc. With East African and Indian spices - none of which were mouth burning! The vegetable curry was decent too....More
Went for my husbands birthday family get together yesterday. The food is always fresh and consistent with great flavors. So tasty. We had Bhel, chicken and beef samosas and boneless ribs for appetizers. Then we had,within our group, lamb biryani,chicken poussin, kuku choma and ribs...More
Food and mango lassi are good but their service is really slow. Also they have a strange system. We wanted to change the table but this eas not possible because it was not the same servers area. We couldn't understand their strategy at all as...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d967708-Reviews-Jambo_Grill_Paan_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
James Street Cafe & Grill,"Seven of us came here for dinner. The service was super friendly and they can easily accommodate bigger groups as it is a larger restaurant. Everyone seemed to enjoyed their meal and I had the butter chicken.
Great spot for East African snacks and food just outside Vancouver. Consistent food and great service.
Have been visiting this restaurant every time we visit Vancouver for its famous East African dishes and East African style Indian dishes( less spicy). The appetizer plater consisting black kababs, fried cassava, daal friters and potato friters was mouthwatering delicious. The chicken, goat and okra...More
James Street Cafe has always been a bit of a mystery to me. The restaurant doesn’t actually sit on James Street and seems far from a typical cafe. We visited early one February morning for breakfast… something that they are supposedly well known for. Walking...More
We went on a friday karaoke night. The place felt quite noisy, possibly due to the lower ceiling. The server forgot that he had to bring in tea too! The vegi pakaros were partially uncooked. When we were ready to pay, we were told at...More
We loved the environment, the food and the fast service from Gagan. The kebabs and yama Choma ( Barbecued meat) was delicious 😋
We ordered from James Street for our baby boys baptism and they out did themselves. The portions were huge, the taste was so good and they were so easy to work with. Highly recommend this place for dine in or to cater your next event.
Been going there for years. Never had a bad experience. Always gotten great service too. Huge fan of the Biryani.
We ordered wings pili pili and Machi Bhaat we enjoyed both those dishes. Machi Bhaat serving is very generous, 3 people can eat from it. The ladies bathroom was very dirty. Overal good food, Friday night entertainment is great. I would recommend this restaurant.
Late on Sunday family decided to go for brunch. While driving around we came across James street cafe. Looked good from outside so we decided to give it a try and we were happy we did. The restaurant offers nix of Indian and African food...More
Pulled in thinking (based on the name and outside appearance) that this was a standard Canadian style generic restaurant. What a lovely surprise when we walked in and smelled delicious Indian spices! We shared the vegetable samosas - highly recommend - completely delicious. I got...More
Dropped into this restaurant on Sunday It was not very busy the service was very slow. When we got our order taken it took over 40 minutes for the 2 egg breakfast special. Once it arrived the food was good but not worth the wait....More
Was in Vancouver on business and decided to have dinner here with a colleague. Ordered shrimp masala that came with rice and naan. The shrimps were jumbo and probably more than ten. Buddy ordered chicken curry with rice and naan. Great service by Bisus.
Well located on Canada Way in Burnaby, this is a very nice venue with good parking facilities. Unfortunately the food is good but not the best I have tasted in the area. The deal was a little bland, the chicken tikka was alright although the...More
The name and outer signage promoted USDA ( what about Canada A Grade Angus Beef) beef steak and while they had Continental style steak and chicken meals and even Dutch breakfast the dinner was primarily a mine Odd South Asian food which I do like...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2005075-Reviews-James_Street_Cafe_Grill-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Jang Mo Jib Korean Restaurant,"Excellent food, good price and friendly service. Authentic Korean food and experience. The staff were helpful and sweet and the food was served quickly. Would recommend.
Amazing Korean restaurant. I recommend for the quality and the taste the Doe jee Bo Ssahm and Dduk Bok gee. Is a restaurant to go and share with all your friends. The service is fast and the final price is affordable.
Three of us enjoyed the Jap Cha noodle dish, iron wok chicken and seafood medley soft tofu soup. The latter dish I asked for their recommendation which type was the most popular. We had enough leftovers for 2 more people! Larger restaurant on the second...More
This restaurant just opened up, but they have EVERYTHING done right. The food is excellent and is traditional Korean food. This is from someone who spent years working in Korea. The service was fast and professional. There is a convenient call button on the table...More
They serve the most authentic Korean dishes than any other places where I've been so far downtown Vancouver. Their fresh kimchi, cold noodles & SunDae were really tasty.
Seems to specialise in hearty Korean stews - we were looking for a very late lunch in the area, and found the JMJ. Just what we needed - filling, spicy and favourably priced.
Visited on a Thursday night at around 9 pm and it was busy and quite noisy. Lots of menu choices but prices are a bit high. Ordered shortribs - La Gahl Bee and the potato specialty soup - Sahl Go Gee Dahng Myun. Both were...More
We ended up here after our aborted trip to the derelict China town - it was the only thing open at 8.30 pm on Sunday night The place was empty so it was with some trepidation and desperation that we went inside The young man...More
Our family came here on a cold and rainy night for dinner. They offer a combo of both Asian and Korean food. Prices were reasonable and food was decent. It used to be the old Hon’s noodle restaurant which they still sell some noodles and...More
I m no Anthony Bourdain but this place is reallly good koean BBQ. Looks like a locals place. Very causal. Friendly stafff, generous portions and tasty. Kid friendly lots of families. They dont take AMEX so bad if you are on corp Amex traveling like...More
We were here before. Nice people working, fast good service. The waiter was very helpful to pick a dish we would like. Good experience again
Three of us non-Koreans had lunch. They have a couple of interesting lunch specials at very reasonable prices. Bill came to under $50.00. Typical authentic Korean food....I liked the fried pork. Fast service. Lots of seating.
Since Vancouver has a large Chinatown, we decided to see what we could find. We took the bus from our hotel and just walked around until we saw something that looked interesting. We shared a Korean BBQ pork dish and some fried dumplings. Both dishes...More
We were very impressed by the quality of food at this casual restaurant. Great prices too. We bought one appy and 2 main dishes to share for the two of us, and there was easily enough food for 4! Fresh, yummy, incredible.
Had lunch at the Robson Street Branch and rather enjoyed it. We had Pajong, Sundae (sausage/black pudding), spicy cold noodles and Bi Bim Bap, plus all the side dishes. It was rather a lot for two, to be honest. Everything was tasty, especially the pajong....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d800302-Reviews-Jang_Mo_Jib_Korean_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Japadog,"I was so pleased to see that, after a 2-year hiatus, the original JAPADOG food cart has re-opened at Burrard and Smithe (across from Scotiabank Theatre). Dubbed an “iconic part of Vancouver’s food scene” by the DailyHive, this modest JAPADOG cart is the one that...More
I was so pleased to see that, after a 2-year hiatus, the original JAPADOG food cart has re-opened at Burrard and Smithe (across from Scotiabank Theatre). Dubbed an “iconic part of Vancouver’s food scene” by the DailyHive, this modest JAPADOG cart is the one that...More
Japanese mayo is legit. These dogs bark HARD! Great ingredients and very cool to watch them created in front of you. Just get it!
Japanese mayo is legit. These dogs bark HARD! Great ingredients and very cool to watch them created in front of you. Just get it!
I was staying at the Sheraton Wall Centre and there was a Japa Dog food truck across the street and my friends begged me to try it. It was great! I'll definitely be stopping by again!
I was staying at the Sheraton Wall Centre and there was a Japa Dog food truck across the street and my friends begged me to try it. It was great! I'll definitely be stopping by again!
We tried the chilli hotdog. It was spicy and so delicious. They have many unique hotdogs with unusual combinations and flavours. Must try!
We tried the chilli hotdog. It was spicy and so delicious. They have many unique hotdogs with unusual combinations and flavours. Must try!
Had I realized there was an actual storefront, we probably would've gone there but there is a charm of ordering from the stand and eating it street-side. We shared the Terimayo Hot Dog and WHOA, that kurobata pork is straight up juicy and snappy. Along...More
Had I realized there was an actual storefront, we probably would've gone there but there is a charm of ordering from the stand and eating it street-side. We shared the Terimayo Hot Dog and WHOA, that kurobata pork is straight up juicy and snappy. Along...More
If you are looking for something different with hotdogs then this is the place to come to as they have Japanese ingredients in the the hotdog. Try the kurbato teriyaki hotdog as it is a bit different but it is quite delicious at $8.95 CAD....More
If you are looking for something different with hotdogs then this is the place to come to as they have Japanese ingredients in the the hotdog. Try the kurbato teriyaki hotdog as it is a bit different but it is quite delicious at $8.95 CAD....More
This is not fancy food, but if you want a great fast meal this is the place. Stopped by for lunch. Got a number 1 combo. Probably the best hotdog I have ever eaten. Love the twist with a great hotdog and the Japanese flavors....More
This is not fancy food, but if you want a great fast meal this is the place. Stopped by for lunch. Got a number 1 combo. Probably the best hotdog I have ever eaten. Love the twist with a great hotdog and the Japanese flavors....More
The hot dogs are famous and for good reason - they just taste delicious. Get your fav Japanese flavours in line and be happy.
The hot dogs are famous and for good reason - they just taste delicious. Get your fav Japanese flavours in line and be happy.
I selected the Spicy Dog from this cart as I really can't get my head around adding seaweed to a hot dog as in everything else on the menu, and I was not disappointed at all. The sauce is fiery, the lettuce is cool and...More
I selected the Spicy Dog from this cart as I really can't get my head around adding seaweed to a hot dog as in everything else on the menu, and I was not disappointed at all. The sauce is fiery, the lettuce is cool and...More
Japanese hotdogs with mayonnaise? Yes, and it's totally a good combo! And what you've heard about kewpie mayo is truth. Not sure what they do with it, but it's superior!
Japanese hotdogs with mayonnaise? Yes, and it's totally a good combo! And what you've heard about kewpie mayo is truth. Not sure what they do with it, but it's superior!
We were recommended to try this by our friends in Vancouver. It’s very an interesting idea, with Asian flavor in a hot dog. Worth a try!
We were recommended to try this by our friends in Vancouver. It’s very an interesting idea, with Asian flavor in a hot dog. Worth a try!
We saw the stand while waiting for a taxi at the airport and were intrigued, but didn't have time to stop. We chatted with the taxi driver, a life long Vancouver resident, and he highly recommended eating a Japadog. He directed us to a stand...More
We saw the stand while waiting for a taxi at the airport and were intrigued, but didn't have time to stop. We chatted with the taxi driver, a life long Vancouver resident, and he highly recommended eating a Japadog. He directed us to a stand...More
Found out about Japadog while researching good eats in Van, and put it on my must eats list. Then coincidently it was just outside my hotel! Got the number 1 as it’s the classic seaweed sprinkled, mayo & teriyaki sauce hot dog pick, and it...More
Found out about Japadog while researching good eats in Van, and put it on my must eats list. Then coincidently it was just outside my hotel! Got the number 1 as it’s the classic seaweed sprinkled, mayo & teriyaki sauce hot dog pick, and it...More
I had my first hotdog from Japadog It was OK I wasn’t completely wowed, but I was more impressed With how proudly the staff were selling and promoting their products which got me to like it more than I did! I bought this from a...More
I had my first hotdog from Japadog It was OK I wasn’t completely wowed, but I was more impressed With how proudly the staff were selling and promoting their products which got me to like it more than I did! I bought this from a...More
After seeing Japadog on one of Anthony Bourdain's travel shows I had to have one when I visited Vancouver. I ordered the classic kurabato terimayo dog, I found the sauce quite sweet but with a bite of nori it balanced out nicely and the sausage...More
After seeing Japadog on one of Anthony Bourdain's travel shows I had to have one when I visited Vancouver. I ordered the classic kurabato terimayo dog, I found the sauce quite sweet but with a bite of nori it balanced out nicely and the sausage...More
I ordered the beef curry and while I very much enjoyed the taste there was no beef it in. Literally two tiny pieces. I was advised by my coworkers that there was no meat given in the beef and chicken curry dishes but I wanted...More
I ordered the beef curry and while I very much enjoyed the taste there was no beef it in. Literally two tiny pieces. I was advised by my coworkers that there was no meat given in the beef and chicken curry dishes but I wanted...More
If you are a hotdog connoisseur like me, DO NOT PASS THESE GUYS UP! I could never have imagined this was possible! You take a good old fashioned hotdog, invented in Europe, maybe by the Germans, who knows for sure, but go with it! You...More
If you are a hotdog connoisseur like me, DO NOT PASS THESE GUYS UP! I could never have imagined this was possible! You take a good old fashioned hotdog, invented in Europe, maybe by the Germans, who knows for sure, but go with it! You...More
While JAPADOG had a food cart outside YVR near the international arrivals area (2012-2020), this new unit – in the domestic terminal food court, pre-security – represents a permanent home for the brand. Taking over the space formerly occupied by Pizza Hut Express (until 2017),...More
While JAPADOG had a food cart outside YVR near the international arrivals area (2012-2020), this new unit – in the domestic terminal food court, pre-security – represents a permanent home for the brand. Taking over the space formerly occupied by Pizza Hut Express (until 2017),...More
Great lunch! A good amount of plastic . No recycling option for waste. Had a hard time finding recycling in the whole of Griffith outlet mall.
Great lunch! A good amount of plastic . No recycling option for waste. Had a hard time finding recycling in the whole of Griffith outlet mall.
We went here to get a quick bite before checking in for our flight. When we arrived, they were already busy with two customers ahead of us in line. I suspect this branch of JAPADOG is always busy given that it is located adjacent to...More
We went here to get a quick bite before checking in for our flight. When we arrived, they were already busy with two customers ahead of us in line. I suspect this branch of JAPADOG is always busy given that it is located adjacent to...More
Good choices of hotdogs with combos. They serve beer too..they could certainly do better on service, quality of beer and upkeep of the restaurant. It's annoyingly crowded for its price and favorite for Asians but doesn't seem to do well on space upkeep and cleanliness
Good choices of hotdogs with combos. They serve beer too..they could certainly do better on service, quality of beer and upkeep of the restaurant. It's annoyingly crowded for its price and favorite for Asians but doesn't seem to do well on space upkeep and cleanliness
The lady at the cart was so friendly and efficient that I wondered how it was possible that this person was exposed to the elements every day for her job and kept that marvelously positive attitude. I had learned my palate-searing lesson from the spicy...More
The lady at the cart was so friendly and efficient that I wondered how it was possible that this person was exposed to the elements every day for her job and kept that marvelously positive attitude. I had learned my palate-searing lesson from the spicy...More
We were picking up my daughter from her international flight. We had her pick up 3 dogs for us to try. We got the Kurobuta Terimayo billed as most popular and is Kurobuta pork dog, teriyaki sauce, seaweed, fried onions and japanese mayo. Okonomi, 2nd...More
We were picking up my daughter from her international flight. We had her pick up 3 dogs for us to try. We got the Kurobuta Terimayo billed as most popular and is Kurobuta pork dog, teriyaki sauce, seaweed, fried onions and japanese mayo. Okonomi, 2nd...More
A fastfood hotdog with Asian influence.Various hotdogs and asian ingredients make it unique in a way, like a street food vendor. We've tried it and it was something we may do again. We had the kimchee dog,
A fastfood hotdog with Asian influence.Various hotdogs and asian ingredients make it unique in a way, like a street food vendor. We've tried it and it was something we may do again. We had the kimchee dog,
Nothing so great about the Japadog and the hype is quite misleading. I found it to be just ok for its taste and the price is not worth spending on it. I expected more from this place, looking at the crowd and the long waiting...More
Nothing so great about the Japadog and the hype is quite misleading. I found it to be just ok for its taste and the price is not worth spending on it. I expected more from this place, looking at the crowd and the long waiting...More
Had japadogs at YVR on the way in and on the way out of Vancouver. Tried terimayo, okonomi and wagyu dogs. All 3 were excellent. Preferred the kurobota sausages. Would have liked to try their other varieties too. Too bad they don’t have Japadogs in...More
Had japadogs at YVR on the way in and on the way out of Vancouver. Tried terimayo, okonomi and wagyu dogs. All 3 were excellent. Preferred the kurobota sausages. Would have liked to try their other varieties too. Too bad they don’t have Japadogs in...More
Arrived just before lunch hour on a Tuesday and advised they were out of several popular items, as well as beer ! First experience with one of the storefronts after years of enjoying the street cart. Inventory managment can be tricky but special style requires...More
Arrived just before lunch hour on a Tuesday and advised they were out of several popular items, as well as beer ! First experience with one of the storefronts after years of enjoying the street cart. Inventory managment can be tricky but special style requires...More
I heard so many people rave about how good Japadog is I wanted to try it for myself. I got the original. It is slightly larger than the American hd. Crisp outer skin that pops wgen you bite into it. It's a beef dog and...More
I heard so many people rave about how good Japadog is I wanted to try it for myself. I got the original. It is slightly larger than the American hd. Crisp outer skin that pops wgen you bite into it. It's a beef dog and...More
I grabbed a Japadog outside the airport during a trip to Vancouver. I am a big fan of Japanese flavors an like to try new things when I get a chance. I tried the Terimayo dog and would have to say the meat and toppings...More
I grabbed a Japadog outside the airport during a trip to Vancouver. I am a big fan of Japanese flavors an like to try new things when I get a chance. I tried the Terimayo dog and would have to say the meat and toppings...More
I always get a veggie Terimayo dog with extra peppers and relish. Xue was working the kiosk this time and he is a polite, accommodating server, very friendly.
I always get a veggie Terimayo dog with extra peppers and relish. Xue was working the kiosk this time and he is a polite, accommodating server, very friendly.",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8837158-Reviews-Japadog-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jetside Lounge,"We had evening drinks here and enjoyed the experience. The service from the staff was prompt and engaging and the live music added to a relax atmosphere
The Jetside Lounge at the Fairmont hotel, attached to the Vancouver Airport, is a fantastic spot to relax before or after a flight. The lounge is spacious and comfortable, and the food and drink options are plentiful and delicious. The staff is attentive and friendly,...More
We are always pleased with food and service. Started slow but was great soon. Had the calamari which was tender and not rubbery. Caesar salad was great. Turkey club was great and a fair size portion. Went to the bar to get ice for my...More
We had a very nice dinner and an amazing breakfast here! Dining atmosphere was relaxed, with excellent live music. Food was tasty, the cheesecake to die for! Breakfast was very copious, service top notch. Definitely recommended
I eat and the Jetside every time I stay at the Fairmont. Its great to see some smaller options on the menu. I ordered the Turkey Clubhouse. It was excellent and not that small.
Nice hotel bar. Nice range of beers and wines Food is the same menu as The Globe restaurant at the Fairmont which was good.
We had lunch here during our stay at the Fairmont Vancouver Airport. Beautiful setting and great views of the airport. Comfortable seating. Food is excellent and service is good.
Had the opportunity to utilize this restaurant on both ends of our trip. The food, drinks and service was excellent both times. Great live music and a super awesome atmosphere. We will definitely be back in the future.
We stopped by for drinks and snacks while staying at the Fairmont, the bar is centrally located with a view of the tarrmack and airport grounds. The service is slow and drinks expensive,
Had light meal the pear salad was excellent lots of candied pecan, goat cheese, and pears nice portion size. The chili chicken was tasty, a little sip but not to much. Great server.More
Dear Guest, Thank you for taking time to provide your valuable feedback on your most recent dining experience. We are pleased to hear you enjoy your time at Jetside Lounge and, we look forward to welcoming you back in the near future. With best regards,...More
The food was pretty good, the menu is varied enough. The drinks are quite expensive and they charge for bread both of which knocked my rating down a bit. Having said that, there's no question it's the best non-secure side place to eat at the...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for taking the time to provide your valuable feedback on your recent dining experience at Globe@YVR. I am sorry that your experience did not meet your expectations; please allow me to express my sincerest apologies. If you would like to provide...More
You can’t beat well-mixed cocktails or quality local wines, with easy-listening listening music being played in the background, seated at the bar or in comfortable chairs, overlooking the busy airport outside through the floor to ceiling windows on the entire North side of the room....More
Dear BruceL, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review on your most recent dining experience at Jetside Lounge. We are pleased to hear you enjoyed your dining experience and, I assure you I will be sharing your comments with our...More
I had an extended layover and jetside bar delivered. Staff was great. View was spectacular. Good was superb and I really enjoyed treatment of steelhead salmon, yum. Full bar, they'll mix you whatever, in addition to house cocktails.More
Dear Guest, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review, we greatly appreciate it. We are pleased to hear you enjoyed your dining experience at Jetside Lounge. We look forward to welcoming you back in the near future. With best regards,...More
The Jet Side Bar is our spot to collect that ""free"" that you receive after check in. The service is friendly, the view in the distance excellent, and the musicians performing outstanding. We were fortunate to have Olaf Deshield performing Soul, Rhythm & Blues, Jazz,...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review. We are pleased to hear you enjoyed the entertainment in Jetside Lounge. We look forward to welcoming you back in the near future. With best regards, Farrah Landert Assistant Outlet Manager
After a cancelled flight I ended up at the Fairmont. I had been to this Fairmont previously and to the Jetside Bar previously. Firstly the view from the bar is spectacular. If you can, get a table by the windows. The bar looks out over...More
Dear Randy S, Thank you for taking the time to write us a review, we greatly appreciate it. We are pleased to hear you enjoyed your dining experience in Jetside Bar. We look forward to welcoming you back in the near future. With best regards,...More",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d6725866-Reviews-Jetside_Lounge-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Jin Jiang Shanghai Restaurant,"The food is absolutely delicious. The staffs are attentive and friendly. The shanghai fried noodles and the chinese donut are my favourite.
The four of us shared several nice dishes: cold braised special beef slices, spicy green bean with ground pork, milk bread, shrimp and vegetables stirfry and seafood vermicelli soup.
I was here once previously. The four of us shared several items which were fairly good. On-site free parking. Very good service. Nice option in Burnaby.
I was introduced to this place by a foodie friend who visited previously. A great choice! I was surprised to see that it’s located inside the Best Western Hotel on Kingsway. (A bonus – free parking). We arrived at 2 pm and was advised to...More
this place rivals shanghai river in terms of food quality. (maybe slightly below). the pork thigh was very very good. soup dumpling was great, we also ordered a crab which was also quite good. it's just that the atmosphere is so terrible. the AC was...More
Jin Jiang is one of the best Shanghai Cuisine not just in Burnaby ,it is in the midland , it is so busy for lunch and dinner ,Quality and quantity ,service is excellent , I was invited for dinner for my friends dad birthday ,the...More
Just ok now. Went there for lunch and a little disappointing. We usually order the smoky tea duck. Used to be quite lean and crispy but less so now. Xiao long bao ok. Would not recommend smoked fish appetizer which is quite bony and served...More
I was staying in the hotel next to this restaurant and call in for take out. Picked up my food at the expected time. Food was excellent so as the service at the moment of the call and pick-up. Great typical asian food.
This is what we had for 12 pp in a set menu for 10 -assorted appetizer - crab with sticky noodle in the bottom - Squirrel fish with sweet sour sauce - Bokchoy in creamy sauce - dry scallop fried rice - Xiang king bao...More
One of the other diners commented that it was hard to get a portion for one, and that's correct: this is not that kind of cuisine. It's best if you have a group of four, as in two couples, or something similar. We were a...More
The menu and most of the tables are set for groups of 8-10. Tried to get a cup of soup but the minimum size served four. The tables were generally setup for large groups. Didn't stay. Did not get to try the food.
While I'm not familiar with all the foods on the menu, and I didn't eat there this time, I have eaten here several times before and the food I ordered was absolutely delicious!
Very yummy Shanghai cuisine , small place , about 20 tables of 10 people each.We just ordered food for take out
We have not been here for years. They keep the place very clean. Service is polite and fast. Food is very good quality and reasonable in price. Will go back for dinner some day.
This is a big place. The dim sum food is OK to good. We went for the friends more than the food. We had many diverse dishes ordered by our Chinese friends. They ordered some good things but some of the food was just bland...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4852834-Reviews-Jin_Jiang_Shanghai_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Jingle Bao,"Wow, I was impressed with this place. But my journey to actually eating here has been a rocky experience. Two attempts and got ignored both times after a 10 minute wait. Strange. Any way, bottom line, the food is tasty and well prepared, and you...More
Yummy dumplings & lovely restaurant. It‘s even fun if you are eating on your own because you can watch the chefs preparing the dumplings while you wait.
First time visit in Vancouver wanted a place to eat. I read some reviews and they were accurate. This place had the best soup dumplings everything was made fresh as you ordered.
We strolled down Denman today then along the seawall till we were hungry enough for lunch. Got seated at this charming restaurant on stools at a bar that looked out on Denman so we could watch the world go by. Server was lovely; very apologetic...More
My wife and I happened upon this place while on our way to another restaurant. Definitely made the right choice! We ordered the Ha Gow, Crystal Mushroom & Veggie Dumplings, Beancurd Rolls, and Shrimp & Egg Fried Rice. All of the dishes were excellent. All...More
We stopped here after riding bikes in Stanley Park. The Fun Sun was excellent and we sat right in front of the person who was making them. Really fun to see how it's done and how quickly and expertly she made them. I'd come back.
My daughter, who does not have a very diverse palate, wanted to try this restaurant. We ordered a bit of everything and had it delivered to try he hotel. It could not have been better. Everything was hot and delicious. My only regret was that...More
This small casual restaurant prepares very good dumplings. The Magnificent Seven, the house special, was very flavorful. The pork soup dumplings were good, but we've had better. The shrimp spring rolls are top notch. The pork fried fice was too greasy and it lacked flavor.
Great food, friendly service and a nice, casual atmosphere. We were in Vancouver just a few days and came here for lunch twice.
The food was all excellent! First time trying soup dumplings and was not disappointed! The service could use a bit of work. We waited a long time between dishes and when we waited for the cheque we eventually had to get up and just ask...More
It's a Tuesday evening before Remembrance Day and hubby made reservations for 2 to try them out. Didn't realize they have parking in the back until we got there. It was a quiet evening. We had to write down 1 contact info (name and phone...More
I’ve seen Instagram posts for this place for about 9 months, so decided to give it a try. I made a reservation through OpenTable so we were immediately seated upon arrival. It was clear to see they marked off which tables could be used to...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21251501-Reviews-Jingle_Bao-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jitlada Thai Restaurant,"We visited the Jitlada restaurant and were treated to great food and a great time. Our server Pam (nothing sticks to me) made our dinner most enjoyable. We were treated to a scrumptious array of Thai food including a Papaya salad, the best Pad Thai...More
We were looking for a good Thai restaurant while visiting Vancouver and found Jitlada on the tripadvisor website. The spring rolls were different than the average, run of the mill. They are delicious and uniquely presented. We shared the garlic prawns and stir fry chicken...More
One of the best Thai Restaurants in Vancouver. Great food, friendly thoughtful service and reasonable prices make this a must-visit. We will go again and again...
I am a fan of Thai food and have tried restaurants across the country. Far and away Jitlada is the best I've had anywhere. The spring rolls were out of this world, and the chicken panang was totally dreamy. So flavourful, yet elegant and balanced....More
Thai is one of my favourite cuisines. Definitely recommend the spring rolls here. The pad thai was good too. Service was excellent and very friendly. Would definitely recommend.
I was impressed by their service - warm and courteous. The food was delicious and the serving sizes were perfect. I suggest having the Pad Thai noodles and the sweet and sour soup. Jitlada is a small family owned restaurant THAT I WILL visit again.
Our experience at Jitlada was excellent. It is a beautiful family run restaurant with very nice decor. The service was absolutely amazing! We have only received service like this in a few places. The food was stunning and the Pad Thai is recommended. The food...More
What a great lunch. You do not have to worry about the ""spice"" factor as Pam will make sure the food is not too hot for your tastes. Great atmosphere and location. (Granville & Broadway area). We had starters, salad and main course for lunch....More
Absolutely 110% authentic Thai cuisines of all the 10+ dishes that we ordered in celebration of a birthday in the family. Service and level of attention to details from the staff, in particular the owner/operator, was excellent. Prices are very reasonable for the high quality...More
I’ve walked by Jitlada many many times and always wondered about it. Tonight we wanted Thai food and just looked up nearby restaurants. We found this and were not disappointed. As expected we were greeted by Pam, the owner, host, server etc. She’s funny! She...More
Out for lunch with friends from work. Decided on Thai. The restaurant is small but nice. The owner is very lovely and friendly. We had the green curry - very tasty, shrimp curry pad Thai - ok and drunken noodles - good. The salad was...More
I went for the Pad Thai of which I'm a BIG FAN and given the hype, I was really looking forward to it! The meal was presented very nicely (pretty salad) and the egg roll was good, but I was very disappointed in the Pad...More
We met our son and partner at Jitlada last night before going to a play at the Arts Club in south Granville. This is a classy little place with an attractive decor and a generous menu. The owner seemed to be the hostess, welcoming us...More
We thoroughly enjoyed our first visit to Jitlada. Simply delicious appetizers and mains. The owner is friendly, engaging and genuinely cares about her customers. Nice vibe in the restaurant as we enjoyed conversing with the couple next to us who are regulars. We will be...More
From the US --in Vancouver for the umpteenth time. Done Maenam and Montri""s , wanted something else. Read up on the 2017 restaurant awards from Vancouver Magazine and this unknown quantity got the honorable mention award! Decided to give it a try Wednesday evening 7...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3692336-Reviews-Jitlada_Thai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Joe Fortes Seafood & Chop House,"Wow! Great food great decor. Hoping we get a chance to go back before our trip ends. Hostess was able to get us a last minute reservation. Thanks!
Came here for my birthday. From decor to service to food , everything was amazing . Delicious food and a lot of variety. Server was very friendly and knowledgeable . Recommend this place for sure.
We had our table on the roof terrace which was a fantastic setting, the food and ambience were excellent, I would definitely recommend anyone to visit.
We visited during a honeymoon stay in Vancouver. The food was brilliant, we ordered several fish dishes and all of which were amazing. Our server was excellent and very knowledgeable of all menu items. They were very accommodating, separating our dishes in the kitchen so...More
Excellent service, busy place, amazing oysters and salmon cakes. The clam chowder was average, expensive 1st day lunch 80$ in Vancouver!
First time at Joe Fortes, although we had heard great things about it. Food and service did not disappoint. Dinner was awesome. Highly recommend having reservations, it gets very busy.
We had our best dinner at Joe Fortes. The food is amazing the Lobster oil with the bread is amazing. We purchased some to bring home. The service was outstanding 5 star all the way. Book an reservation it was a full house; you will...More
Only one word Fabulous!!! We have a Wonderfull time!!! The food and the service was perfect. We really had a good time with our friends…thanks for that wonderfull dinner!!!
I asked for a half order of seafood linguine so that I wouldn't have to waste any of the dish. Not only was that done but for half the price. It was excellent. My husband's filet was so good, he ate all of it. Not...More
Excellent Food and very professional and friendly staff...one of the Best Happy Hour in Vancouver with a variety of affordable snacks and great wines... Under the Sun, open air terrace ...it is lovely to be here...
Pre cruise stay in Vancouver, and saw Joe Forte’s was highly recommended. It did not disappoint - great ambience, service and most importantly food. Checking the online dinner menu I was surprised to see limited sea food options, but when we arrived we were presented...More
We enjoyed our wedding anniversary with good food and friendly service. Our server was knowledgeable, friendly and attentive. The food was cooked to perfection and beautifully plated. We enjoyed our tasty appetizers, sophisticated entrees, fine wine and comforting dessert served with americanos. We will remember...More
Best fresh seafood I have ever eaten! And I’m from Hawaii…. Everything melted in your mouth like Black Cod! Will be back next time… 🥰🥰🥰🥰 😍😍😍😍
mediocre at best. the food and drinks are over priced for what they are. Mussels to start were particularly dull. Mains came while we were still eating our starter, (much to our servers dismay) and we're not slow eaters either. Chairs were being placed on...More
This place never fails, excellent food, excellent service, my favourite Vancouver restaurant . Have never been disappointed",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705344-Reviews-Joe_Fortes_Seafood_Chop_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
John3:16 Malaysian Delights,"John 3:16 has a full range of Malaysian and Chinese dishes-all available for take-out, as well as dine in-with the latter involving being on a waiting list. I chose the former option, taking my meal back to Panda Pod Hotel. The portions of Kam Hiong...More
Very good Malaysian food. Enjoyed their Beef rendang, Hainanese Chicken Rice & Egg plan. Great blend of spices in al the dishes - each one had its uniqueness. Parking is at the back & I don't like this - does not feel safe. Seating is...More
As this was our first time at the restaurant we followed the server’s suggestions and ordered the popular dishes: Satay chicken skewers, Nasi Lamak, and Kari Laksa Vermicelli. Every dish was delicious. Service was great. Because the restaurant is not very big, even at 8...More
I had an amazing lunch here at John 3:16, got take out and the food was so good. Definitely will be back again soon! Highly recommend the Hainanese Chicken Rice
Since we were in Richmond that day, we decided to try this restaurant as my son recommended it. It was closed for break between 3:30pm-5pm. We arrived at the back of the restaurant where the parking lot is at 4:50pm and saw they had 2...More
John 3:16 is well know for their Malaysian Cuisine , it is the local's flavour restaurant , it s a while since my last visit , with the new Covid 19 guidelines till April 19 ,only patio dinning ,take out or delivery available , all...More
Our first visit. We had the Hainanese Chicken and Char Koay Teow noodle, both were flavourful and delicious. My only comment, I’ve had Hainanese Chicken multiple times including overseas, and never had it with sweet chilli sauce that John 3:16 serves. I could do without...More
My mother's side of the family is from Singapore & loves coming here for some authentic Malaysian food! It is also entirely MSG-free! Some recommendations: -roti canai (classic) -lamb kapitan -hokkien char mee -nasi goreng
i have been to this restaurant twice in one month, and the food quality is quite good and tasty, but the portions are quite small. i am not a big ester by any means but i can only imagine most people would have to order...More
We've been to this restaurant a couple of times for dinner, and both times it did not disappoint. The food is very authentic Malaysian; of particular note are the Roti Canai (fluffy and warm) - possibly the best we've ever had in Canada. Other dishes...More
Our son treated us to this restaurant last weekend. The location is great with a bus stop right in front of the restaurant and parking at the back. You can phone in to reserve a table otherwise you will wait for a while, the place...More
This has to be one of my favorite Richmond, British Columbia restaurants. Casual, yet very clean and neat. The staff is so kind and always very welcoming. The food is always served fresh, fast, hot and very tasty. We have ordered practically everything off of...More
food was good but the portions were quite small. prices were reasonable since i guess the portions size make up for that. we had the kari laksa with egg noodle and it was very tasty, but again the portion was quite small and only a...More
Based on an extensive review from another review from TripAdvisor (thanks fearjac), my wife and I along with friends had an incredible meal adventure awaiting us. Again, the sign of any good restaurant is when you arrive and it is full and by the time...More
My wife and I love SE Asia cuisine. In the past our go-to spots were Tropika or Thai House. We never strayed too far from these 2 as they were consistent and reasonably priced. A few years ago we added Penang Delight to the list....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d6986337-Reviews-John3_16_Malaysian_Delights-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Johnnie Fox's Irish Pub,"I go often, they are close to my home. Never again! Food was so bad I ate nothing. Thank goodness the waitress understood, and did nothing. Frozen spinach dip, still frozen when it got to my table. Pickled onions on everything. Charged for extras not...More
Friends and I decided to meet at this bar for some drinks and food before we attended another event. We overall felt the service was sub par, our waitress lacked any service skills as we had to ask multiple times for cutlery and water. We...More
We had a great time here having a few drinks and some food before a hockey game. Good vibes, the Guinness is proper and the fish and chips were great. Our server Keanna was super nice too. Definitely would come back again!
Did a little tour of the Irish Bars in Vancouver last week while I was in town for work and Johnny Fox's was easily the best. Fantastic Fish and Chips, delicious Guiness and a really cool authentic Irish atmosphere. I went back twice!
Interesting dollar bills on the wall no doubt. Some offensive. Staff was friendly until they disagreed with beliefs. Gnats are swarming in bathroom next to kitchen. Our “standards” for an Irish Pub are not high and we frequent them often. This one has no standards.
Two of us stopped in for a quick drink and some dinner. Service was good and drinks were OK. Live Irish music was nice. We had bangers & mash and it was delicious. Cozy place with friendly people.
Lots of great choices for drinks and beers. Cosy atmosphere and attentive staff. We didn't eat but the food items that came out looked good. Very busy for a Tuesday night. We chatted with a few Irish folks and had lots of laughs. A great...More
Rustic, plenty of memorabilia, rough looking, however, the service was very good, nice eats. Small local bar & grill usually busy. I'd hang out here again.
Nice and cosy and friendly for a quick drink and bite. I had the stickly honey/garlic wings which were real tasty.
We had been to Johnny fox’s in Dublin so decided to check out Vancouver version. Great pic did not disappoint we had Brian O’Brien playing guitar. He was fantastic. Service was great with couple of lads from limerick great atmosphere enjoyed immensely
It is small and you have to make sure that you don't pass it up but once you find it, you'll be glad you did. The décor is very Irish and it looks like it has been around for 100 years. The night that I...More
We stopped in at happy hour, ordered the fish and chips and the yorkies, all of it was very fresh and perfectly cooked and super tasty. Friendly staff too, I'd go back.
This spot has absolutely awesome Irish food, I had a twist on the Canadian poutine- bangers and Guinness gravy!!! So amazing. Best poutine ever! To order a Guinness just hold up how many fingers you need. The entire staff is native to Ireland and very...More
My son got married in Canada and kept talking about a place they got the best fish he has ever had. Fast forward five years and I had to ask where this place was as we decided, we too, wanted to try the best fish...More
A comfortable Irish pub that was packed on a sunday afternoon with Irish Millenials. To hear the North Side Dub accents warmed me heart. The pint is fresh and tasty, the food hand made. I had the Double burger w/fries and had trouble finishing it....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1090989-Reviews-Johnnie_Fox_s_Irish_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Johnny’s On Oak,"Decided to try for their 2for1 dinner last Tuesday. Made reservation Sunday, stating the 2 of us were coming for the 2for1 dinner. Arrived to a pleasant surprise - said to the waitress we were happy wine bottles were 1/2 price along with 2for1 dinner....More
Great place for singles/couples/family or a party. Food was unbelievable everytime.. fair prices great service. we look forward to returning .
Johnny's on Oak is our go-to Friday night restaurant. Friendly staff, great food and beer, and large portions. You'll love it.
We have been going to Johnny's On Oak for over 10 years (when it was still called Best Neighbors). The pizza is the best I have ever eaten, if you like traditional crust, but it is not overly bready. Generous and high quality toppings. Also...More
I’ve been going here for years as I lived really close and always loved the food. I moved away a year ago and last month new I’d be close so I ordered my favorite pizza to go. The name has changed but the service and...More
My husband and I had an enjoyable dinner here. We appreciate an owner operated restaurant and liked how enthusiastic the owner is about making his restaurant even better. We'd been here before and now there are different chairs and tables, the washrooms have been updated...More
It was my family's first time here. We wanted food in the area and thought we would like Greek. The décor is plain and the restaurant has no authentic feel to it. The service was terrible. Once we sat down and ordered, it took almost...More
Good food and service! The decor is a bit dark but otherwise a good place to eat. The staff were very friendly and accommodating. The price is good for good quality food.
Dark greys walls, black furniture, dubious decor: ugly paintings, all of the same nature. But was the food good? No. Zucchini wedges dripped in oily, thick batter. I had to dig them out. Pita bread dry, thick and tasteless. Costco tzatziki sauce? Thick crusted greasy...More
Stopped in for a quick dinner and was craving pizza...not take out pizza but in house pizza...did not disappoint our pizza was delicious lots of toppings and the crust was crispy...our waitress was attentive but not hovering and the restaurant has a nice small place...More
We visited the neighbours for our daughters birthday. 12 people. We made them aware of the size of our party 5 days in advance. We ordered our meals at 6:45. Did not receive the starter salad until 7:50. Waitress never came to our table to...More
I know Neapolitan style pizza is thin crust, I’ve even been to Naples and had one. But I was brought up on thick crust and I prefer it hot, chewy, lots of sauce & cheese. That’s how Best Neighbours serves it, on a raised tray....More
I hate to publish a negative review and hope they were on an off night. I'd heard good things about this place, and brought friends. The server was inexperienced, bringing only some of the meals, explaining at time of serving everyone else, that they'd run...More
Best neighbors is one of our favorite casual restaurants in Vancouver. The lamb and mousaka Are fantastic and the pizza is old school . We’ve never had a meal we didn’t enjoy and their pizzas are always fresh if we order delivery. Kudos to the...More
The staff were friendly and provided efficient service. The food was tasty and the restaurant was clearly popular in the neighbourhood with an additional outdoor eating area.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5068568-Reviews-Johnny_s_On_Oak-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jolly's Indian Bistro,"Jolly's in Kitsilano was great. We all enjoyed our meals. My meal was like a sampling and it included a beer. One friend ordered the vegetarian sampling. We all loved our meal in this small restaurant. Saw lots of take out and delivery customers. Very...More
Jolly’s is a smallish cozy with an equally smallish menu. What it isn’t is your standard cook-by-numbers East Indian restaurant. The butter chicken is superb. Almost a Korma chicken. Naan bread is huge and fresh. Actually, everything tasted fresh. Service is friendly and unobtrusive but...More
The correct phone number is: 604-734-9110 or 604-730-6929. Tripadvisor has the wrong number The food is excellent and Jolly has a new menu, His take out equally resplendent..
this restaurant has been one of favorite restaurant for the last 6 years. The food is always fresh, tasty, and presented very well. Need I say more?
We've been coming to Jolly's for 15 years. Jolly is a lovely man, lovely host. The food is always good, great, and at times exceptional taste. Jolly and the food keep us coming back. Even having moved out of Vancouver, we keep visiting whenever we're...More
Not sure what to order so decided on the meat thali which comes with large veg samosa, 3 meats, rice, poppadum, naan and salad. All very tasty and enough left over to take home. Service was quick and very pleasant, food great - could taste...More
Jolly's is in our neighbourhood so we've visited a few times. Winter nights call for comfort food and Jolly's fits the bill! We chose take out this time, but have dined in as well - the restaurant is cozy and well-decorated. Fragrant odors from the...More
We love Jollys although we always seem to gravitate towards having our 2 favourite dishes - Eggplants & Butter chicken. Yes, its only Butter Chicken, such a common dish. But Jollys is special, one taste and WOW! Is that Cardomom? And then theres ginger? Delicious!!
Ordered take out - 4 main dishes. Small portions compared to our regular “go to”Indian restaurant. Tough when you have a guest and barely enough to feed. I had to find some food to supplement what I thought would be more than enough. Butter chicken...More
In these times of uncertainly & anxiety, it is reassuring for Jolly’s Indian Bistro customers & those wanting the comfort of a good curry, to know they are able to order dinner all 7 days of the week, either for pick up or delivery from...More
Jolly's is always a good standby for consistent quality in East Indian cuisine. Our experience is that one should arrive prior to 6:30 PM to ensure you become seated before the rush. Tuesdays are a good day of the week because of the curry specials....More
For years Jolly's has remained consistent with both the level of food and service. Our last visit will encourage us to visit again whenever we're close to the neighborhood. A word of advice, try to attend prior to 6:30 PM if you wish to be...More
One of my favourite places in Kitsilano, Jolly’s has been around for years. Friendly talented Chef/Owner serving flavourful Indian offerings in a warm, cosy environment. Very reasonable prices with many vegetarian options but seafood and chicken dishes are first class as well.
Jolly's is always a reliable bistro for East Indian fare. If you arrive at 5:00 PM when they open be aware that it will take on the average of 30+ minutes for you to receive your repast. Be aware also that where there used to...More
Naresh (Jolly) has consistently provided the freshest and tastiest dinners ever, for as long as we can remember. We always look forward to his salads which puts other dining establishments to shame (never brown or wilted edges). Look for the sandwich board by the front...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d790351-Reviews-Jolly_s_Indian_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jos,"Oh, where to begin. From start to finish this was a disaster. The waitress was clearly not trained whatsoever. The drinks took absolutely ages to arrive. Then the food turned up piecemeal. The owner came over and when I tried to explain that we had...More
Really rude: we arrived at 2010 they close at 2100 but for them it was obviously too late. More than 10 minutes waiting and they purposely ignored us, when we asked they didn't answer.
Excellent pizza and salad. Service slow. We wanted to share pizza and salad but salad appeared and VERY long wait for Pizza.
Simply outstanding! Have to love an independent where the owner is onsite to ensure standards are met. Very limited menu a great indication that excellence is the desired goal. The charcuterie board alone is going to require another visit. One of the best ever simply...More
We were in town for only one night and wanted a pizza. This place had great pizza. The salads were also very good! We enjoyed the beer and our waiter couldn’t have been better!
Not quite what I expected. Small pizza place only open in the evenings from 5 until 9. We had an excellent salad followed by a pizza with genoa salami. The salami made it quite greasy. Probably should have gotten the marguerita pizza instead. Service was...More
Food is excellent, as well as the German beers. Owner is a perfectionist, which reflects in high-end quality of the dishes. Place deserves Michelin stars for standing out within their target-group. Beers are a selection of best German beers, mostly Bavarian brands. A wow factor...More
Just had a great raclette wood fired pizza. Restaurant was busy but it was worth the wait. I don’t normally order dessert but the fresh blueberries ricotta was a great ending to a fantastic meal.
ok then,last saturday,go to jos restaurant for order 2 pizza to go like last summer, the main door was wide open.go inside and wait at the counter was nobody .then the owner show asking me what I am doing inside then call the security followng...More
This place is outstanding! Awesome thin crust wood fired pizza's and great imported beers on tap. Owner Bob is a great guy and will be back soon. Found our new local gem.
Staying in a hotel around the corner, dropped in for supper, I'm a sucker for wood fired pizza, not dissapointed, great pizza, simple honest fare, great beer recommendation, fantastic service, chef came out to see how I liked it, proper service, made me feel welcome,...More
Stopped in on a Saturday evening and enjoyed a pizza. Thin crusted wood fired pizza was a hit. Lots of patio seating good for enjoying their food during the pandemic. Of note a mask in the pocket of the staff is no better than the...More
We had a light late dinner in the lobby bar of our hotel - the only venue that was open there - and that was a sushi place. That was definitely not enough and kids wanted something from their priority lists. This way we ended...More
Food was good but no masks -- neither by cook, owner nor waitress. Place was not busy and they could say they were keeping their distance but we feel ALL restaurant staff owe it to respect us as customers and wear masks 100% of time.
Coal Harbour, yay! Fantastic location by the park and harbour. Lovely, cozy, modern décor - so comfy! Food super yummy. Owner really nice. A neighbourhood favourite!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14196525-Reviews-Jos-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Joyeaux Cafe & Restaurant,"Very friendly and helpful staff, fresh hot noodle soup with heaps of flavour and a great price. Also have beer and wine which wasn’t in the menu but they had a selection.
Delicious small restaurant with fresh Vietnamese Pho. The owner is very caring and makes sure that everyone is attended to. I found this restaurant from TripAdvisor and so glad I came in. I didn’t think I enjoyed Pho, but the broth and noodles were so...More
Had breakfast and the returned for dinner!! Everything was outstanding. Wonton Soup, grilled pork with spring rolls and vermicelli,gyoza, Vietnamese crepe, pineapple and mango milkshakes equals gustatory heaven. The American breakfasts with fresh fruit looked great too. What a find.
I have been coming here since 2014 and I have always had good food. I usually get a pho or a vermicelli, and always the Vietnamese dumplings. I also love their shakes and think they are the best I've had in Vancouver. This time I...More
I've been eating there for several years, many breakfasts and lunches. It is an oasis in the downtown core: the food is warming and the veggies are fresh and carefully selected. It's near the YW, very central. In the midst of the pandemic, it's a...More
We are leaving Vancouver in a day and was craving for a Vietnamese lunch since our first few choices was not open for dine in due to the lockdown from the Covid 19 and found this on google search. It was a big mistake to...More
We had a banh mi (Vietnamese sub) each and split a mango-basil salad roll. Both were excellent. Nice room, good prices, friendly service. We'll go back, and I expect to give a five when we're tried more of the menu.
It was one of the few breakfast places open downtown on Sunday, and I had a great breakfast and a delicious Vietnamese coffee.
This place has good vegetarian options. I had the hot and sour soup with tofu and veggies. It was packed with veggies and such great flavour. It was very busy at lunch. Obviously a local favourite spot.
We had breakfast here twice and it was very good value. Served promptly and plenty of choice too. A little bit unusual inside but really nice atmosphere.
Good food at a very reasonable price for being right in the city. Highly recommend the lemon grass chicken and steamed rice!
A very small place, but lots of character. People very friendly. My husband and I had breakfast there and one evening meal which was Vietnamese. Both were reasonable in price - the best mug of tea in town,
Stumbled on to Joyeaux Cafe by accident. Saw Trip Advisor sign on door and decided to give it a try. This was one of the best breakfasts I've had when traveling! The prife if ownership is obvious as it is meticulously clean, food fresh (fruit...More
WOW.. the coffee was great and the breakfast was yummy and they have free wifi that is fast... the breakfast comes with FRESH fruit and she cut it before bringing it to our table that's how fresh it was... strawberry..2 types of cantaloupe.. pineapple.. and...More
For a place in the heart of the city the Pho ain’t half bad. I would go back again for this alone. The drinks are a little average but if you’re hankering for Pho this will do pretty well.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d981339-Reviews-Joyeaux_Cafe_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jugo Juice,"I only patronize Jugo Juice very sporadically. While they have a plethora of unique smoothies on their permanent menu (all loaded with luscious antioxidants), and those smoothies are usually pretty tasty, I’ve always disliked their weak construction. What I mean by that is how quickly...More
I have allergies so was looking for a healthy snack whilst exploring the city today! So glad I found this place in the mall. Had a juice and avocado on toast. Speedy service and good value for money plus it always makes me so happy...More
Quick healthy food for those on the go. Loved the Philly Steak sandwich. Fair prices. Fast and efficient service. Just a pity they don’t stock sparkling water.
Used to hit this place for a smoothie on the go. Friendly staff and loved the Peanut Butter Protein Smoothie. Passed by it yesterday in Vancouver only to find that it's closed!!!! I know there are other locations, but this was my go to -...More
Freshly made juices or smothies. With lots of add ons like protein, wheat grass, maca etc. Many locatios all over.
Have a shot of energy while shopping at Robson... Delicious and fresh juices. The rest like many ""healthy bites"" are more spicy than tasty. The juices are great
What a great selection of smoothies. Our favorite one was the green smoothie, which was our reason to go back three times in a week.
Jugo Juice is sort of a meal replacement. Especially on a hot day. We stopped here to grab a ""juice"" on the fly while we were walking Robson! Service was excellent and there was basically no wait. Thanks!
For $13, i sat at the corner of Robson and Thurlow on an outside patio and enjoyed a healthy wrap and kale smoothie from Jugo Juice. You can't beat it! Well done Jugo Juice! And thanks for arranging the sunshine and warm weather too!
If you are thirsting for fresh juice concoctions, Jugo is the place to stop by. This is the best on Robson!
This Jugo Juice is located in a neighborhood commonly known as Rodeo Drive North. Street parking is always at a premium. It was a warm spring day so I had a strawberry smoothie to quench my thirst.",11,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10256800-Reviews-Jugo_Juice-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Juke,"Great chicken and ribs. Super crispy chicken with a delectable crunchy batter. The ribs are fall off the bone and juicy. Small but interesting drink selection in the restaurant but a full bar next door. Services is knowledgeable, friendly and efficient. Great place for family...More
One thing to say...negroni slush. It was a revelation! We had a chicken sandwich with fries and popcorn chicken with honey beer and spicy boy dipping sauces. Everything was delicious! The staff was very friendly also :)
Wow. These guys are incredible. We were looking for a Sunday afternoon lunch from a place that made great chicken. We collectively ordered their Fried Chicken, Chicken Sandwiches and a bunch of sides. I ordered the roasted Brussels Sprouts as my side. Before COVID I...More
good value for product, the chicken sandwich is nice and small and makes for a good quick lunch. Their fries are awesome.
I want this place to be successful and I believe we need businesses like this here in Vancouver, so here it is! My partner and I ordered take-out last night. It was our very first time trying Juke. We got their's spicy fried chicken and...More
I'm not big into fried chicken, so I came here with no real expectations. I tried both the leg and the breast, and the breast was definitely juicier and more delicious. I was hungry when I tried the chicken, so it's totally possible that my...More
Pass by notice the Southern Fried style chicken , it is so tough to resist ,I am a chicken wing junker ,the place very clean and mordant ,the din in is on your left hand side , I just want it to take out ,staff...More
It was my fist time ordering and it was horrible. The Ribs were dry and practically raw. Waffles were Small and soft. The messy clay fries were mushy and tasteless. The friend chicken was decent, no grease. Frankly, The best thing about my order was...More
We had heard about the fabulous food at Juke and were a little cautious of it being too hyped up. We finally made it over to the city to try it for ourselves and it was all simply delicious. An added bonus was that everything...More
I was shopping around chinatown and decided to check out Juke. Ordered 2 crispy chicken sandwiches for $12 bucks. The sandwiches were smaller than expected, but had a nice taste, soft bun, crispy skinned chicken thigh, with mild spicy bbq sauce, and crunchy slaw for...More
Used foodora promo 50%. 2$ per pc of chicken after promo leg and thigh is still pricey. It was warm when I picked it up. I guess they don’t care that people/ customer want hot chicken not chicken that was cooked 30-45 min old and...More
A couple of us ordered ribs, chicken, fries and fried Brussels sprouts as takeout for 7 people. I recommend you skip takeout if you like eating your food hot. This review is based on everyone’s input. The ribs themselves were meaty but lacked wowing flavour....More
Wow. Just wow. Although we ordered a meal via skip the dishes, it was absolutely fantastic. So moist and juicy and skin so crispy. Will definitely order from here again.
Very great late afternoon snack with friends. Place is quiet , great ambiance. Fried chicken is delicious. Different choice for deinks, must be a pumping place at night. Homemade sauces are very good too! Tried a few sides everything was good.
We came here just after opening as we’ve seen it pretty busy and didn’t want to wait in line. I’m a sucker for chicken and waffles so I ordered that... with the extra piece for only $2 extra. The chicken was seasoned well and flavorful....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10767389-Reviews-Juke-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Jules Casual French Bistro,"We spontaneously booked Jules for dinner whilst visiting Vancouver. We loved it. Good steak frites, onion soup, and other classics, but also newer dishes. No issue to take two starters instead of full menu for part of the party. Served in a very positive manner....More
Surprised to find such a high quality French restaurant so far from the French areas in Canada. We had an early dinner and were able to have some glasses of French wine during the Happy Hour. My Nephew had researched restaurants for an early dinner...More
It was a very rainy Christmas Eve day and we were walking in Gastown and stumbled on this lovely French Bistro. The luncheon menu is small, as you would expect in a French Bistro, but all the items were tempting. We had French Onion Soup...More
Simply mesmerizing ! The food was yumm ! The service was prompt and they made sure we were very comfortable ! We were two couples with two dogs so we’re a handful !
Our 11 year old decided to stay at hotel watching TV and have us bring back something, so we had a choice of options. We started with a great French Onion soup, and a set of oysters. My dining companion was q bit disappointed with...More
Gastown is a fun location, outside dining on a perfect evening certainly helps any critique. Our waiter Peter was charming and professional. I picked a very good Rose, highly overpriced wine as are all Canadian wines which enhanced our meal. Oysters were good, the flounder...More
Great atmosphere in this restaurant. All had a great meal and it was good value. Wine selection really good and great to see BC wines. Only complaint was insufficient amount of rigatoni !!
We dined here in early June — excellent menu, staff and atmosphere. The food was top class and reasonably priced by “ Vancouver” standards. Well worth a visit if you are in town.
Relaxed, delicious, service casual but well appointed (thank you Elodie), making you feel right at home, in Paris! Amazing ambience, so comfortable, and staff had a gentle casual sense of humour, and had amazing recommendations of food and wine! The duck confit was perfection, the...More
One of the best meals we've had in a while. Staff were very pleasant and attentive. Nice little patio on a side street, so quieter than many in Gastown. Food was excellent. Had lobster bisque, boeuf bourginon(almost as good as my mother's!) and creme brulee....More
I am not a regular of this establishment only because it is not in the city I live in. That being said I have not missed the occasion to dine there every time I am in Vancouver. In good faith I have not missed the...More
This French Bistro which is located in the wrong place near Hasting still a good place, if you want to have a decent French basic cuisine.
Jules always delivers a wonderful meal and dining experience. The food is casual french bistro style never too fussy but always delicious.
We have just enjoyed yet another delicious dinner at this charming little Bistro in the heart of Gastown. The portions are quite generous and everything tastes amazing. We are very pleased that we have discovered a spot in Vancouver where we can relax and enjoy...More
A third visit to this hidden in plain sight gem that is Jules Bistot was again a delight. A window table with faux oriental screens added to the ambience a'la the Hanoi French Quarter. What stole the show was the effervescent septagenarian Lorraine tinkling the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d966953-Reviews-Jules_Casual_French_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Just Waffles,"Everything was delicious and prepared to perfection. I ordered the blueberry waffles with walnuts and it was so yummy! I wished I lived closer so I can enjoy weekly! Plus the owner was very friendly!
Thanks to a traffic jam... We noticed this Very Little ""Hole-in-the-Wall"", Mom 'n Pop Shop just east of the PNE grounds in east Vancouver, BC A Must Visit for All Foodies! The attached photos show the Entire place! Maybe 5 or 6 tables. . ....More
I would actually give this small eatery 4.5/5 ...the waffles are delicious, they have a unique taste, in a positive way. My partner had the Smores strawberry waffle which she loved. I had the Gator and Bacon Benny. The cajun sauce was not spicy at...More
Kathy and Calvin were wonderful hosts, they were extremely kind and friendly. The food was amazing and came quickly. Overall we had a very pleasant and wonderful meal. Highly recommend!
Food is wonderful (fresh, hot, delicious) and service was gracious - I'd go back EXCEPT No covid check. Server wearing only a plastic shield (no face mask) they've done a lot right with plastic barriers and an effort to distance but a place that isn't...More
We just had the best waffle ever tasted!!! This small family place gave us the most welcoming and delicious experience. It’s not a waffle, it’s the best version of it. Excellent waffles, excellent coffee, excellent service!
Great menu, excellent and personal service and really great food. The waffles are baked fresh on site everyday. Really good unlimited coffee.
Walked to this place for breakfast and it was the best decision of the day. They have a simple menu; sweet waffles, sweet/savory waffles, and savory waffles. I got one of the sweet and savory waffles and it was really really good. I forget the...More
The waffles are cooked to perfection: chewy yet crispy, sweet and flavourful, and topped with the best toppings I've ever tasted. It is run by a wonderful couple, and I am a semi-regular customer. My favourites are the pizza waffles, the bacon benny waffle, and...More
Very small place. Nothing lavish about the decor, but the food is to die for. Was a bit skeptical going, but very pleasantly surprised. Small mom/pop place and very family friendly. You will have to wait for the food, but once it comes you will...More
Run by a lovely friendly couple. The waffles are great. So many options and you can choose your own toppings. Kids went with sweet and I chose savory. All excellent. Make sure you tell the owners where you are from and see if you can...More
Very tasty waffles in a variety of flavours. We had a great time talking with the proprietors as well. I had the bacon benny waffle and my wife had the cajun crocodile benny waffle.
We tried the Bruchetta eggs benedict and a strawberry waffle with cream and they were both very delicious. They make a different kind of waffle, kind of more of a bread texture but really good. Next time I will try the Nutella waffle. The owners...More
It was really tasty. We really liked waffles with crocodile sausage and eggs as well as sweet waffles. Nice and comfortable place with kind and friendly staff.
Very welcoming - we were thoroughly talked through the menu and service was exceptional. Waffles were delicious - Benny with bacon is highly recommended! Obviously the waffles were outstanding but we were mostly blown away by the super friendly service, they chatted to us for...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7284443-Reviews-Just_Waffles-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kadoya Japanese Restaurant,"If you're looking for a sushi restaurant with good quality sushi and balanced portions, this is not the place for you. It left me feeling extremely disappointed and unsatisfied.The restaurant had an excessive amount of rice in the sushi rolls. The rice completely overwhelmed the...More
Excellent food. As with many sushi places the interior belies the quality of the food. You don’t go for the decor. Sashimi is wonderful. The gyoza was the best I’ve had - light paper thin wrapping and crispy. Overall? Try it. Simply fantastic.
Didn’t get to eat here. Posted hours said 10pm closing time. Arrived at 9:10 and were told to “not sit down” since they were closing at 9:30. Very rude. Don’t even care how the food would have been at this point.
We highly recommend ordering sushis from the specialty section of the menu, they are very tasty! Attentive and courteous service. Highly recommended restaurant!
We found the staff to be very friendly. Service was very fast (not a place for a quiet romantic meal) , the first course arriving just a few minutes after we ordered. The Crazy Girl Roll (fried cheese) was tasty. Mains was Chicken Teriyaki and...More
Overall a nice visit! We were seated quickly, there was a bit of a mix up between 2 of the servers which lead to a delay in taking our order but once this was resolved we were served and didn't have too long of a...More
Was optimistic, but this is what I found in my chicken 5min ago... There should be far more care than missing 1) the sticker while you're prepping the raw veggies and 2) the sticker being cooked on
This is an average Sushi restaurant, limited seating area. Hubby had the King Dragon Roll, I had seafood teriyaki. Nothing exceptional about these dishes.
Love this little place. Food is great as are the ever friendly staff. Can't stay away even though we drive miles out of our way just to visit. Victoria rolls and Lady Mango rolls...mmmmmmm. Not fancy but fantastic.
The food was amazing, cheap and we had such great service!! The waiter was so nice and even the owner came to see us. I really recommend this place. We had our food in about 7 minutes after ordering. There's a lot of japenese dishes...More
Literally looked and tasted like it was picked up from a convenient store. Overwhelming taste of mayo, overly packed with old dry sticky rice.
Wanting to patronize a local restaurant during the pandemic, I ordered a bento dinner, which they told me to pick up at 7pm. I arrived on time, so the food should'e been freshly made. However, the sushi rice was cold, dry, and rock hard--totally inedible....More
Every year when I visit Vancouver I try a different sushi restaurant. This place did not disappoint. Portions were good but the avocado was a little soft. I prefer it not so ripe. Sashimi was fresh and the rolls were well done. Service could have...More
We has some tempura and some rolls and everything was very good The sashimi came near frozen still on the inside -not fully thawed yet -- if opened new flash frozen tuna -- then it would be the next closest to fresh as you can...More
They have two location ,one in West End on Denman St ,and one at David St closed by ST >Paul Hospital , after visit a friend at the Hospital , it is rush hours , stumbled on this small Japanese restaurant perfect ,I just happen...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d819662-Reviews-Kadoya_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kaide Sushi,"It’s been awhile since we have been here for sushi and it was good as we remembered it. The place is small, looks a bit run down but it’s been in the same spot on the south end of downtown for years. They make up...More
Small place with friendly staff and good atmosphere. Amazing taste...different...special...delicious! Was so good that we even order to go lol I will definitely come back again!
The atmosphere was clean and organized, the service was fast and the food was good. The price is corresponding to the quality of the meals.
A small Japanese sushi place offers authentic fresh sushi. Chef are Japanese. They also offers vegetarian sushi. There were wide varieties of fish to choose. Price was very reasonable. Service was excellent. Highly recommended people to check if they can make reservations. We were told...More
Stopped in for a late dinner at the recommendation of a local. Small place but cute, very friendly staff. Our rolls were all so fresh and delicious. I just had a veggie one one but the flavors so fresh, crunchy and yummy. The family had...More
A friend and I ate here today and we had a very good meal at a good price. The food was very good, a special mention to the miso soup which was delicious. The staff were friendly and the service was quick. I can thoroughly...More
Based on comments on the TA Vancouver Forum by a local expert we tried Kaide for dinner as we were in the area. It is an unprepossessing place on Richards St but very friendly and nice atmosphere. The sushi was absolutely outstanding (2 specialty rolls,...More
Cheap, fast and comprehensive menu, the nigiri sashimi particularly low cost. If the decor is a bit run down, don’t let that put you off...worth a trip.
Kaide sushi offers a truly authentic Japanese experience. The service is excellent, the food is fresh, perfectly prepared and i can say in a simple word, amazing.
Really one of the best sushi restaurants I’ve been too. Cuts of fish are very generous and nicely cut. Excellent taste. I recommend to spend around $50/pp on sushi, start with sashimi and end with nigiri - and make sure you order what u like...More
Stopped in for a late lunch meeting. They weren't very busy but very friendly reception, and quick friendly service. The sushi was very fresh and tasty. Good place to return to.
I was a little disappointed to discover cornflakes on my sushi - an odd combination in . my opinion, and seemed a little cheap and downmarket, particularly with the sushi competition in Vancouver.
This is a small casual friendly place suitable for a really tasty sushi experience. Nothing fancy just really great sushi. Price wise is also a real gem in a city that generally over charges for simple food. Try it out you won't regret.
We wanted a place close to where we were staying in Vancouver and luckily this place was a short 5 minute walk! We picked it based on internet reviews and they didn't steer us wrong. The staff was very friendly and the food was delicious.
They came three times before we were finally ready, and this was after we ordered a bottle of sake. The fish was really fresh, and nicely served. The egg was really good.... Not the typical supplier sourced stuff. Would go back. Near Yaletown station.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2351345-Reviews-Kaide_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kaisereck Deli,"Decent selection of beers including local breweries. The food was really fresh and tasty. Service was very fast and friendly. Great place for lunch.
We so wanted to like this place. The beers were authentic but the Schnitzel was not. My wife is from Bavaria in Germany where Schnitzel reins supreme. We’ve had very style and variety and it’s such an easy thing to make at home which we...More
Granville Island and the market can feel overwhelmingly crowded in tourist season. Attached to the market, but with an outside patio is Kaisereck, where you can relax with a beer + food, while watching the action.
Granville Island was very busy on the Sunday we visited, despite the changeable weather. Queue for this place was long, but did go down quickly. I chose the maplewood smoked turkey and my husband had the spicy bratwurst. Very lucky to get a seat on...More
Lots of menu options so there’s definitely something for everyone. We ordered the spicy bratwurst and perogies. Bratwurst would have been amazing had the bun been softer and sausage a bit bigger. It’s not spicy at all. Despite this, we’d order it again Perogies were...More
Lineup is huge during weekends but it deserves. Right and left lineup depending on what you want to buy. They have great fresh hotdog with different varieties all beef, turkey , and polish. After choosing yours , you can choose your condiments and then you...More
One of the few places in Granville Island with a patio to enjoy food AND alcohol. If you sit in the patio, then you don’t have to line up in the market. Service was super fast and friendly, and food was delish. The servings were...More
After our whale watching adventure, my mom and I searched google for a good sandwich. We found Kaisereck was a quick 1 minute walk from where we were parked; thank goodness considering the heat wave. We ordered the mini perogies, deep fried pickles, a pastrami...More
Wandering around Granville Island we peeked into a couple spots but somehow Kaisereck's little impromptu patio off their back was beckoning. Right now (May 2021) there is an enclosed half and an open half: we got a table on the open side, ordered a couple...More
My friend and I after a small meal at a restaurant came her for a smokie and bratwurst. She says each time she comes she must have one regardless if not hungry. LOL! I like how they serve with a handful of potato chips. We...More
There were a lot of food option available in the building and I decided to choose the more expensive option (the rest of the group had pizza from across the hallway that they said was good). I went for the schnitzel sandwich since I generally...More
Good thing we only ordered 1. Bratwurst was cold and undercooked. Bun was stale. Mustard was watery. Ate one bite and had to throw it away. Even the onions were cold.
Strolling through the public market, we got a brat here. The onions and sauerkraut with some mustard made it fantastic!
I had the Schnitzel sandwich for $11 - it was very poor. First, the schnitzel is already cooked, so they just grab a patty off a stack and put it in a panini press to heat it. The schnitzel was dry, stale and tough -...More
Many choices but my preference is the bratwurst in a toasted bun. Everything prepared in front of you and staff are helpful with suggestions if you ask.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3600770-Reviews-Kaisereck_Deli-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kamamarui,"We decided to warm up on a rainy Sunday afternoon with a bowl of ramen. Tonkatsu, miso, black garlic and chicken broths to choose from either regular or rich. Comes topped with bean sprouts, green onion, half a ramen egg and 2 pieces of char...More
We had been craving a Ramen meal when we were down to the coast recently and decided to pick a place in Burnaby close to where we are staying that had good ratings and was reasonably priced. We like Chashu Ramen, I went with extra...More
Actually, i quite like the tasty Chashu Ramen with cri spy Chicken kaarage. But the best is the chicken soup base. It gave the Ramen that extra punch needed to give it that great taste. However, the thing that gives the Ramen the extra star...More
We came here on a weekend at around 11:30 am and already there was a lineup. There’s a clip board outside where you’re to put your name down along with how many people in your party. Based on our observations, don’t count on finding a...More
Somehow this ramen joint stayed off our radar for too long. But make no mistake about it, Kamamarui is a strong runner on Burnaby’s ramen scene. Maybe they need some sort of more noticeable advertisement or better advertisement campaign in general, but it certainly deserves...More
Reg tasting ramen. Rich broth was ok. Noodle tasted like every ramen bowl you order so I’m guessing it wasn’t hand made. Avg Bowl is 10-12$. Wanted to try this since near my house. Small place. Gets busy. People like the ramen snack I guess.
One of my relatives mentioned about this Ramen house so we decided to have ramen for dinner. We decided to order almost all ramen dish on the menu. Being a ramen fanatic i find it very ordinary nothing special. Pricing is good, service is fast...More
It's a very small restaurant but standards are very high. They service their customers very well and the food is fantastic. Our 1 year old loved it too!
Good ramen in Burnaby. It is run by Korean which makes it better. Even though the places closes at 10 pm, they will take last order at 10pm. Although I would advise you to call to ask. They would ask whether you like regular or...More
Went to the branch along Hastings St. Ordered Charsu ramen, beef Don and gyoza. Very good food. Very affordable. Wished the broth was hotter for the ramen.
Decided to try as a friend was surprised that I had not been here. The broth was very tasty and noodles were great. I had a large soup and it filled me completely and I found the price to be fair for what I had....More
The service was okay and the food is good. However, the quantity was kind of small so that I did not feel enough. I would not want to visit there again!
Ate there three times since Christmas...never disappointed - always delicious. I truly enjoyed the Pesto Ramen and the Rice Bombs. Quick friendly service and a gem for a casual meal.
Someone told us this was a good ramen noodle place so we wanted to give it a try. Well, it’s a small place so that’s why they don’t take reservations. We got there at opening to avoid any waiting. Service good but ramen was ok....More
No line up so we decided to give it a try. Read a lot of good reviews and most are correct. The Chashu Ramen is awesome. Must try it with the BOMB. These rice balls with seaweed and teriyaki sauce is the BOMB. The staff...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d6916250-Reviews-Kamamarui-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Kamei Royale,"One of the best Japanese restaurants I have ever been to. Food and service are wonderful. The atmosphere as well . There is also a nice karaoke.
Great spot for a casual early dinner. We had their special early dinner including a glass of wine. Great food! Good price.
Went here with a bunch of friends. Next door to our hotel Ordered a bunch of Rolls, Some tempura, and beef udon. The food lacked freshness and the bouquet wasnt pleasent. restaurant itself looked tacky. Not impressed at all.
Our first visit, from the moment of arrival to departure we found staff unfailingly courteous. Combined with a really excellent meal in pleasant surroundings. We picked the section of the restaurant without the televisions and mercifully they accommodated us. would totally recommend and we will...More
We left Chewies (better known for pet food) because we couldn't get service. We ended up having a great meal at Kamei. I especially like the black cod miso. I'll definitely be back and recommend to friends.
3 for dinner after finishing a convention in downtown Vancouver. Short walk from the Pinnacle hotel. 2 pitchers of beer some apps and a sushi tray for $200 CND. Good food, not great but no complaints.
Kamei Royale is within easy walking distance of the Pinnacle Harbor Front Hotel and Canada Place. It is located away from the street, down several stairs, and surrounded by office buildings. There are welcoming neon signs, and the waitstaff wear traditional Japanese clothing. There was...More
Recommended by the congiere at our hotel. Highly agree with him that this is a top notch Sushi restaurant. Enjoyed the orange blossom the most.
Great food! Great service! Our family highly recommends it if you love sushi. The only negative was that it’s a little slow, but it was busy and considering the food was so good, we let the slowness slide.
One of the few restaurants in the area open at the weekend. We had an excellent meal served by traditionally dressed waiting staff who were extremely friendly and helpful. Very reasonably priced for such a high quality meal. Definitely recommend this restaurant
This used to be my go to Japanese restaurant in Vancouver Nothing to fault The fish is fresh and the selection sufficiently varied But the new locale has lost a bit of its charm and the competition has gotten stiffer. To be fair there are...More
Best sushi we ever had. The fish was so fresh and melt in your mouth tender. We had sashimi, paradise roll, real crab roll, blossom roll, avocado roll. My husband liked the real crab roll so much, he ordered a second. Servers were so nice....More
Been visiting this spot for a decade and it’s truly one of the country’s best most creative sushi spots. Sure they have Karaoke and a big skilled bar but the star of the show is sushi. If you LOVE sushi (not California rolls with cream...More
Kamei Royale was recently recommended to me by a friend. He described it as one of his personal favourites and reminisced about some of his “go to” sushi rolls. I was intrigued and so decided to look up this establishment because, surprisingly, I hadn’t heard...More
We have not had Japanese food for a long time. I remembered Kamei Royale from when they used to be on Burrard Street and it used to be very good. We are not fans of sushi or sashimi so we were looking for a restaurant...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10807317-Reviews-Kamei_Royale-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kamei on Broadway,"Service, food and vibe was really good. Asahi beer was light and tasty. We tried the All Star sushi plate as well as the tempura and the pork gyuzo along with some other appetizers. All the food was good.
I came to Kamei (formerly Ebisu) for lunch and had a great time. We tried a range of things, both curry and rolls, and I thought the food was fantastic. The service was excellent, and very friendly. Additionally the interior is quite attractive. This was...More
We wanted real Japanese food; not what is offered along much of West Broadway in Vancouver. I wouldn't dare eat sushi there. We were greeted warmly and served immediately upon arrival. It was wet and cool out so we opted for hot dishes. We ordered...More
They been in business well over thirty years , during those good old day , I am regular come for for my lunch less 3 times a week , restaurant in a secluded area , very cozy casual dinning room , with very comfortable booths...More
I visited this little gem twice in two days while staying near VGH. The lunch menu is extensive and so well priced. I popped in after 8:30pm and they had many late night specials to choose from. Keep in mind they are closed on Sundays.
Well located small restaurant on Broadway, near Cambie Station. Fresh delicious sushi. Good price. Fast and friendly service. Tables arranged around open kitchen. Take table on the inner loop and admire chef at work, or table by the window and enjoy great views over Vancouver...More
Ebisu (and their sister Kamei restaurants) has been around Vancouver for quite some time and this particular location, despite being tucked away from the bustling Broadway corridor, is still quite busy. The interior is fairly large but the tables are arranged in a cozy layout...More
A local recommended that we have dinner here whilst visiting from the UK. We all enjoyed trying wonderful freshly prepared hot dishes. Would recommend the Chilli Tofu and the friend chicken balls. Good efficient service too.
I'm surprised the reviews aren't better. I was just in Vancouver on vacation 8/2018 and ate here and it was fantastic food and our waiter was great. We had shrimp and vegetable tempura, California roll, and the chicken teriyaki bento box. Highly recommend the Lychee...More
Being Gluten Free I know what I can and can not eat...and can eat a California roll made with REAL crab, not the imitation crap. The waiter didn't seem to know what I was talking about 'real crab', but eventually I was able to order...More
Tried to have a quick lunch. Got seated quickly, tea poured instantly. We ordered within minutes and then waited...waited...and waited. Bento box in 40 minutes? Really? Food was good, priced reasonably. It’s a busy place. So high noise level didn’t surprise. We ate hastily and...More
I used to like this place but lately feel it has gone downhill. The quality of the food is now very hit or miss (seared fish that tastes of lighter fluid recently) and last week they completely forgot my order (nothing complicated, just a bento...More
A good sushis place which I will return to with pleasure. Nice decor, professional service and tasty sushis. A varied menu selection. Reasonably priced. With a view on downtown Vancouver.
Just about every seat in Ebisu is well lit and most have a good view, especially the booths and tables on the north side facing the mountains. There some well-priced combos and portions are generous. Service was quirky but caring. Goma-ae sauce was rich and...More
I used to have lunch here at least once a week. In early spring I was in for lunch with a friend, and swallowed a bit of bone in my negitoro (tuna) roll, and I found another piece of bone in the roll. I let...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5109218-Reviews-Kamei_on_Broadway-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kaya Malay Bistro,"I gave this restaurant a Very Good rating, however I was torn between average/very good. i've been wanting to try this restaurant for a couple years & finally got the chance. perfect opportunity as the restaurant was advertising a Christmas set menu - 8 course...More
I was invited to a small family dinner party tonight, held in the said restaurant. Upon arrival, the party of 7 adults and 3 children were met by a young friendly waitress. We ordered our first round of drinks (we we’re happy to learn about...More
Situated across the road from the Park Inn Radisson where we were staying Had decent reviews on TA so gave it a go Ordered a bottle of house red at $30 CAD, and a pint of lager $6.50, my partner wanted a pint of the...More
We enjoyed our dinner last night ( May 10th, 2019). My family members especially like the Roti Canai. The texture was outstanding, it's somewhat between crispy sensation and a t chewy sensation. It was not greasy yet favorable, like phyllo pastry yet thicker. The bolus...More
Had a very nice dinner at this venue with two friends and the Hainan chicken was outstanding, so were the lamb and chicken kabobs. Very delicious.
We were a group of 8 for lunch on Sunday. We were given menus for some individual lunches, at their selection, ( set lunches), but not the lunch menus.We asked for lunch menus and eventually got them. We got our food at different times, so...More
Myself and my coworkers visited this restaurant for several celebrations at lunch time. They accept preorders, the service is fast and great. The food was tasty and well presented.
Went to this restaurant with a Malaysian friend who recommended it, and was not disappointed. She recommended the soft shell crabs and it was my favorite dish. It was prepared with cracked black peppercorns, which added an unexpected and well-balanced addition of just the right...More
Bought Groupon for 4ppl that is with $40 for $20. We ordered Tofu Goreng, Soft Shell Crab, Rendang Beef & Kimchi Nasi Goreng. With Groupon they took $40 off the total bill which came to $68. Basically, you can order anything on the menu. My...More
This restaurant is a very interesting place to dine. The meals are light and refreshing. We ordered the hot and sour soup together with the black cod and asparagas and the coconut prawn and the jumbo king prawn. we both opted for the black rice...More
Tried this restaurant for dinner and was very pleased. We had a Groupon that could not be used towards Happy Hour Menu but we managed to order some very tasty food. Try the Green Beans off the regular menu...fantastic!
I had an appointment with my doctor in the 900 block of Broadway and I still had time on my parking meter so I decided to enjoy my lunch at the Kaya Malay Bistro. I opted for the pad Thai which was very flavorful and...More
For what seems like ages friends have encouraged me to enjoy a repast at the Kaya Malay Bistro. I was only a 1/2 block away and still had time on my parking meter so I decided upon lunch at the Kaya Malay Bistro. The Singapore...More
We purchased an ""All You Can Eat"" coupon deal and had a wonderful lunch yesterday. $15 per person includes GST. There are lots of choices of very genuine Malay food. They offer small dishes which are really good so that we can try more different...More
Made reservations at 8 pm for dine out 2018. Upon arrival, we see a huge line up of people waiting to be seated. Turns out, everybody in that line up had reservations and some people had already been waiting 40 minutes. We called the restaurant...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3512497-Reviews-Kaya_Malay_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kazu Japanese Restaurant,"waste ur time to save on their labour also showing is busy ! which is not time is money but for them not me - people wait so they dont have slow ours u eat ur dinner 1 hour late but store is steady all...More
tasted delicious everything was great except it was so expensive! I thought the chirashidon was 15.99 but turns out with taxes it cost me 22.00 and with tip 25.00. I dont think i will be back for awhile even though it is one of my...More
What an incredible experience! I have no choice but to score Kazu Japanese Restaurant above all the restaurants that I had dined at in the Metro Vancouver area ! This is the first time in over 20 years that I have dined in a Japanese...More
Pretty good Japanese restaurant run by Japanese staff and chef. The fish is not as fresh as our favourite joints like Tairyou or Kishimoto, but definitely better than those run by Chinese or Korean. If you in the area give this place a try, definately...More
Kazu Japanese Restaurant is a small but busy restaurant located on the Hastings corridor in Burnaby. The interior isn’t much to look at and the walls are plastered with various special menu items but you shouldn’t let that detract you from visiting. While looking for...More
Very good food here. It’s a small little restaurant that gets busy, but usually not too long of a wait, or you can sit at the sushi bar and watch the chefs make your dinner. They usually have a today’s special that’s something different to...More
The restaurant is run by Japanese. There could be a small issue when ordering because the servers may not understand what you want. The sushi is good. The appy is good as well. On the other hand, the noodle dish is not that great and...More
Go here because you love Japanese food. It's the perfect spot to sit down in front of Kazu, at the little bar, and watch him so skillfully and so lovingly prepare the dishes you've ordered. The fish is some of the freshest I've had in...More
Walked in at 6pm on a Friday night and this place gets filled up in a moment! For appetizers, you can’t say no to delicious Takowasa ($3.95) and chicken karaage ($5.85) 😍. We will be back!
Based on recomendation from one of our friends who used to live in Vancouver, we came to this nice little Japanese restaurant for lunch. Good that we arrived @ 12:05pm (they open for lunch at 12pm). We ordered two Bento boxes plus a unagi sushi...More
they have yummy teriyaki sushi as i'm not a seafood eater so this is a great alternative for me service was ok as they seemed to like our little girl
Burnaby’s Kazu Japanese Restaurant is a tiny little joint that you might miss if you’re speeding eastbound along Hastings Street. It’s right next door to Rocky’s Meats (another long time neighbourhood business) and it’s definitely worth pulling over, park the car and head in for...More
One of the best places in Vancouver serving real Japanese food. It is Japanese owned so that's a plus. Great fresh sushi; sashimi is delicious and the chicken karaage is tasty. Unlike other Japanese restaurants around town they use fresh wasabi. Reasonable prices.
I don't know much about Japanese food, and as am gluten free, that makes it even more difficult. Was here for dinner with out of town friends a couple of weeks back and we all enjoyed a lovely meal. I was able to have a...More
This restaurant was recommended by a friend of ours. It is a smaller place, so get there early. We went around 6pm on Thursday and it was almost full. We were lucky to get a table for 4. The sashimi and nigiri were fresh and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7226362-Reviews-Kazu_Japanese_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Kent's Kitchen,"Not fancy but authentic. Ambiance gives way to a multitude of food choices that are reminiscent of classic Cantonese Style Cooking. Eat in or Take Out
We usually go to the Kent’s kitchen on Victoria Street, but because we were in the Vancouver area, we decided to visit Kent’s kitchen on Keefer Street. The food was different from what we have at Kent’s kitchen on Victoria Street, but very delicious as...More
Everyday they cook-up a wide range of dishes that stay hot in chafers. You will not find a larger variety of dishes anywhere else, and certainly not at this price. Kent’s kitchen may only have 46 reviews and 3.5 stars (at the time of writing)...More
Who goes to Kent's? Locals. Why? Good old fashion buffet of Chinese dishes. Mostly rice with a free soup thrown in but the interesting toppings should keep your interest. Hot. Right out of the wok. A number of choices and you can order what you...More
Lunch special with noodles is the way to go! Service is always good and the food is always fresh because the place is always so busy.
Quick chinese take out - there are tables but it is not the cleanest place; always a line so food is always fresh Huge volume for the price I often get 3-4 meals out of an 8.50 order
Kent's has been here for decades. It still hangs on and keeps serving food while many better places have closed down or moved out of old Chinatown. Old local Chinese still form long line-ups to eat in or take out. If you are a tourist,...More
Reading some of the reviews, I just have to shake my head. Bring Canadian currency? Well, duh... this is Canada. Amazing as it may seem, we do not use any other currency except Canadian dollars. A real Chinese experience? Hardly. This is not real Chinese...More
real Chinatown atmosphere...lots of good choices and very delicious choices...great spot for a quick lunch break or picking up dinner on the way home...
Kent's Kitchen has been in Chinatown for a long time, lunch boxes for $ 4.25 was the deal back in the day. Today you can get two toppings over steamed rice for about $7. If you want to change to noodles or fried rice that...More
At the time of my visit 4.10.2017 currency exchange rate was $1 US dollar =$1.3 Canadian dollar I purchased $20 Canadian dollars worth of foods. Ran out of Canadian currency. One of the clerks that was helping me said ""we take US dollars "". Gave...More
Fabulous food, a touch greasy, but it's just right to fill you up! Fast service. Wide choice from menu.
This place is good for quick fill of chinese comfort food. Don't expect too much in the way of friendliness or atmosphere, it's more or less a whole in the wall with a long steam table on one side where they serve up the food...More
Very fast and huge menu able to feed an entire family for less than $35! Crazy cheap and tasty, really fast and fresh. Still had leftovers despite how cheap it was. Not much ambiance but you can't beat the price.
At the recommendation of my cousin, we came to this Chinese restaurant. A good variety of food and economical to feed five people. Very good food and people. We came from Nanaimo just to eat and head back.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2365939-Reviews-Kent_s_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kerrisdale Nakamura,"I'm no local sushi expert, but my son is, and he swears by this place. He and my dad are there maybe a little too often. Great service, great food. The more places I try, the greater my appreciation for Nakamura.
Always the freshest fish, served perfectly, with grace and the charm of true Kyoto natives. Vancouver is very lucky that this wonderful family are here to set the highest standards of Japanese cuisine.
Nakamura has been on my list for some time now. This cozy little spot has been a mainstay in Kerrisdale for several years. I arrived for dinner shortly after opening. One of the few spots available for dine in. I ordered the assorted sashimi, ankimo...More
Way overpriced for the quality of the food. I have been to at least twenty other Japanese restaurants in Vancouver and this one is the worst. I would never go there again.
Always so welcoming and peaceful, incredibly authentic food. Best spot in Kerrisdale for Japanese! Family owned, very sweet people.
This restaurant is run by a lovely Japanese couple. Food is always fresh and delicious. The restaurant is clean and cozy. Service is prompt and attentive. Our favourite Japanese restaurant for authentic Japanese food!
They are located at W 41st and E Blvd where full of restaurants. This is a very small place operated by a couple. The place is clean and service is excellent. Last night after drinking at a pub and full of greasy food, Japanese food...More
I was walking out of the London Drugs across the street when Kerrisdale Nakamura caught my eye. The restaurant is owned by a husband and wife team. The service is impeccable and the food even better. I started with an order of homemade gyoza, they...More
Excellent services, excellent food, excelled prices. The products are well made, with the right amount of flavor. We have been coming here for over a year.
I love going to Kerrisdale Nakamura for lunch and dinner. At lunch, I always have the udon set, which has a bowl of udon in soup and a mini chirashi, with a side salad. It's my favourite. It's not on the dinner menu, though, so...More
Just had a group dinner at this wonderful place. Very authentic Japanese food. Love tempura(not soggy at all)! very delicious appetizer, also love the rice and soup. Overall very happy experience and thank you so much for taking a large group reservation!!
This is a fresh change in this otherwise blah neighborhood. Simple, sophisticated (one of previous reviews nailed it with this term), modest, fresh- very Japanese. Every dish was served carefully and was fresh and tasty. We were seated outside on the patio facing the street....More
This is one of the gems in Vancouver. Mr & Mrs. Nakamura work hard to present the freshest and sophisticated Japanese that is great value in Sushi/Sashimi and other Izakaya. The Chicken Ponkara (Deep Fried/Breaded) is fabulous and the fish is extremely fresh. Daily specials...More
I saw the front of Nakamura and thought it could be an authentic Japanese Resto with A Japanese chef/owner. The logo etc.. A hunch of a Japanese national. Today I finally had a chance to have lunch there. Took me awhile to decide as real...More
My wife and I recently had a wonderful lunch at this small, family-owned and operated Japanese restaurant in Kerrisdale in Vancouver. We both ordered the kaiseki lunch and were delighted with the quality and variety of what was put down in front of us. This...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3514804-Reviews-Kerrisdale_Nakamura-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kevin and Kevin Juice Bar & Cocktail Lounge,"Great food and good atmosphere !!! Will go again for the Thai bowl dish. Staff was friendly. Enjoyed it
Loved the environment! Lots of room for friends and family! Amazing food as well, get the breakfast sandwich I would highly recommend!
The staff are amazing! Really friendly and the sassy spuds are the best thing here. The decoration and vibe is amazing. Love this place
Great food, adorable atmosphere and great service! What more do you want?! Also a go to spot for just a casual coffee pickup
Ten/ten would recommend. Uhhhh yeah it was good. Good. Good stuff. Yup. The eggs Benedict was delish (with that smoked salmon action ya know). Ah. Feel full rn. That’s nice
Got the vegan flatbread and it was delicious!! Loved the micro greens and flowers and pickled onions on top. Also reasonably priced beer. Would come again!
The cafe has an amazing atmosphere! The egg chairs are an amazing touch! Will for sure be back next time I’m in town!
Really good food, great atmosphere, and good service! I would recommend going to this place if you’re in town.
Great staff, vibe and specialty events !! The food was amazing and the rosé I had was also very good and reasonably priced :)
Been here a few times and it’s been great every time! All the food and drinks have been good (especially the espresso martini, gyoza and mushroom pate). Good vibes and good service. Definitely will be back :)
The food, the ambiance, the drinks, the staff - all amazing! And for an incredible value. Will definitely be coming back.
The vibes immaculate The Benny even better The juice a step above the rest We love Kevin and Kevin! The service amazing as well! I love the overall ambiance!
This is my second review in a few days. Had a business lunch here earlier in the week and decided to try their brunch as it came highly recommended. Smart and scrumptious move! Party of 3 and each had different meals: Shakshuka / Omelette Provencal...More
Hi there! Thank you so much for your positive review. We really appreciate your support and we are so happy to hear that you had a great experience. We hope that you will be back soon!
We had a great time here at Kevin & Kevin. The double cheese burger was amazing. The cocktails here are so good too. The service was great, we definitely will be back again!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d24114273-Reviews-Kevin_and_Kevin_Juice_Bar_Cocktail_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ki-Isu Japanese Restaurant,"First time here. Food was amazing. Super delicious. Staff was friendly and patient... not rushed All covid precautions in place. Have a very pleasant lunch
Have been here many times. Love their lunches. We came yesterday with a friend. Had the spicy roll combo, the roll combo, the tempura and the dynamite roll. All the food was wonderful, nicely prepared and presented. The service was attentive and helpful. My only...More
Been here twice in the past few weeks. Enjoyed similar dishes both times. The food was very good, and the sashimi was fresh. The miso soup was the typical product found in all Japanese locations, but the various rolls we had and the combo we...More
I'm always on the hunt for some good Ramen and Gyoza. I'm not much of a sushi fan so can't really comment on that. This place was tidy and clean, and the food was as good as you get anywhere in Vancouver. Recommended.
Staying at the Opus and this restaurant was recommended by the staff. Ate 2 lunch specials. Fast service, fresh sushi, great pricing. Very busy little neighborhood spot. If you are nearby, it’s a great choice.
The food quality was not good. I ordered an aburi sushi and it was pre-made and cold. My wife had beef udon and the beef was not fresh and smelled bad. They were friendly and welcoming but the food is our priority so we’ll defiantly...More
This is my favorite local Japanese restaurant. The selection is consistently excellent and I always have enough to take home afterwards. It is a cosy place with a few tables outside on the sidewalk.
I've been a frequent customer of Ki-Isu for a long time. The price and quality match up with the menu items and when I was still living in Vancouver, it was nice that it wasn't too far of a walk for me to carry it...More
Great food , service good, prices reasonable. My Daughter & granddaughter had dinner just before going to Rogers Arena for Stars on Ice. Very near by.
This restaurant is near the Opus hotel and I had a pretty good combination meal of tempura shrimp, teriyaki beef, rice, salad , pickles, miso soup and two types of sushi. They were all good but none of them were great. For the same money...More
We had a regular sushi place that we frequented on Davie, but, since the ownership changed it went downhill so we tried Ki-Isu and we're very happy with the food. We had gomae, a California roll topped with spicy tuna, salmon and Tuna sashimi and...More
Omg... SO good... You have to come here at least once... And the service is quick too.. Ate here 3 times in one week lol.
Their menu is one of the best in town. We always go there as a family. They are so flexible that they can take custom order. Their Crunch Crunch roll is a MUST! Also, my favorite one is Ki-Isu special roll which comes with a...More
I always forget about this little shop! It is right on pacific and the sushi is always yummy! I will be back! The sashimi is fresh and decent sized portions!
Inexpensive Japanese food right on Pacific blvd at Yaletown if you are looking for a quick lunch/dinner. The crunch roll is a must order! I did not give it a five star though because it was not that special.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4852961-Reviews-Ki_Isu_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kibune Sushi Restaurant,"Freshest delicious sushi and sashimi artfully prepared are featured at this neighborhood restaurant just up from Kitsilano Beach on Yew Street. Our birthday celebrant was delighted to find a beautiful salmon sashimi rose decorating her lovely sushi platter. In addition to our chef-selected sushi and...More
Kibune Sushi in Kitsilano, just off the corner of Cornwall and Yew, is now into its 41st year, still going strong, and attracting customers, many regulars. I am a regular but had not been since last October, as I was away visiting my family in...More
Kibune Sushi, now 40 years old, just off Cornwall on Yew, can close some nights during the hockey season when it caters to those attending a Vancouver Canucks game. It has long had this arrangement with the Canucks organization, but now that the hockey season...More
Kibune Sushi on Yew — just up from Kits Beach in Vancouver — is the perfect place to eat in this hot weather. The sushi & sashimi is cool & the beer nicely cold in chilled glasses. I always get the Orion beer in a...More
July 2022 marks the 40th birthday of this Vancouver, Kitsilano, Japanese eatery, nestled on Yew Street — just off Cornwall — in the location it began its life in July 1982. Endosan & his partner Yuree opened Kibune Sushi not long after arriving in Vancouver,...More
Kibune Sushi in Kits, just off the corner of Cornwall & Yew, now just weeks away from turning 40 this July, is still in it prime, serving good fresh sushi & sashimi with grace. Feeling like Japanese food, as I often do, I went in...More
Kibune Sushi will soon have been open 40 years, establishing its Japanese restaurant on the corner, off Yew and just off Cornwall, in July 1982. I have mostly enjoyed my visits and the food and service but it can be unexpectedly closed, even above those...More
I live steps away from Kitsilano’s Sushi Cornwall cluster, on which three sushi restaurants are located. This past week I decided to visit all on proximate days in one week. I have been to all three many times but wanted to visit one after another,...More
The Kitsilano Cornwall area’s sushi-lovers are in very safe & competent hands when they dine out locally. Between Cypress & Yew there are three committed & inspired sushi owner/chefs looking out for them, making sure they receive fresh & enticing dishes, & that they are...More
Kibune Sushi this past week joined fellow Yew Street eateries by opening an additional patio on the street. It has long had a small one, just off its location building but clearly needed more seats, given current restrictions, which only allows outside patio dinning and...More
Kibune Sushi shows no signs of letting up in 2021, as it enters its 39th year. It is as favored now as when it opened its doors in July 1982. I go to the iconic Japanese eatery for many reasons, and for different types of...More
Kibune has had its doors open for dine-in for 38 years for all but the months from March to October 2020. Happily, it reopened in October & has had regulars flocking back to enjoy its fine Japanese fare & great service. I am one of...More
Kibune Sushi celebrated its 38th birthday July 1 by doing what it usually does, working mindfully & diligently to produce good Japanese food for its appreciative customers, as it has been doing daily— except for Mondays — for the past some 12,000 days it has...More
Good Japanese food fare, from sushi to other Japanese dishes. Didn't score a 5 as the karaage Chicken lacked the exact seasoning, so a bit disappointing. That said the rest the meal that evening was good and service second to none.
Kibune Sushi Restaurant has stayed the course for 38 years. It has not moved its location in all those years but then why would it, given its prime location, just off the corner of Cornwall & Yew,, just up from Kitsilano Beach. It was still...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d799020-Reviews-Kibune_Sushi_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kin Kao,"Good, authentic Thai food. The place is small, so its often hard to find seating, and the service could be improved a tad, That said, the staff are very friendly and the quality of the food is worth any awkward discomfort.
Had a great Tai dinner with my girlfriend #1 last night at Kin Kao , picked her up around Commercial at First Ave after her meeting , I know she love Tai Street food and Pad Thai , it is a while since my last...More
I saw all the fancy cocktails flowing. Despite getting their first booking and noticing 15 minutes staggered tables, all the food came out together so we waited a long time before our first dish started and receiving our last dish. Beautiful presentation and very tasty....More
I was on Commercial Drive and I needed to find some takeout for dinner. I checked what was well rated on Yelp and found Kin Kao. I placed an order by phone and was told it would be about 20 min. I parked right it...More
A quality Thai meal. Love the yellow curry and ground pork dishes. Bursting with flavour and good prices. Tiny place on commercial drive, but we did pick up. Service was friendly and food packed well.
AMAZING FOOD TASTE QUALITY AND SERVICE. We have toured the world and spent a month in Thailand. This is absolutley the same food taste as the real thing with a twist of fusion. Service was o point, friendly atmosphere. It is small but intimate. Has...More
Tom yum is crazy good, very unique and delicious flavour, fresh and yummy. Curries are also quite unique - this is not your typical mom and pop thai place - it offers a definite twist, which we liked. Lots of meat in the curries too...More
We popped in to Kin Kao after a hockey game as our daughter lives in the area and raved about it. Justifiably so! The food is excellent, and we chose medium spicy which was perfect for us, though a little spicier (as we were warned)...More
A couple of friends from work and I went for lunch on a work day. Good thing is that it was speedy and easy so it can actually fit for a work lunch. The food was good. It’s not the best Thai I’ve ever had...More
This was the closest Thai from our hotel so we decided to check them out, first impressions were not so good, it’s a small takeout type joint with a couple of tables to eat in, we didn’t have any energy left to search for another...More
Kin Kao is simply some of the best food on the drive. This is Thai food at its finest. Like other reviewers have mentioned, be careful about the level of heat you ask for. Other than that, once this restaurant showed up in the neighborhood...More
Wow! Great food well spiced, knowledgeable staff and fast service. Don’t overestimate your sense of heat - err on the low side. Pad Thai is great and three levels of curry.
Small restaurant in Commercial Drive, really clean and with kind service. We had Pad thai and green curry rice. Everything was tasty. Price ok. Absolutely to recommend.
I had saved a Restaurant Review from the Vancouver Sun for 3 YEARS! We live in the Valley, so this was our opportunity to finally try Kin Kao. We told the Server that we wanted Spice...about the higher end of Mild. Well, it could not...More
We were wandering Commercial looking for a lunch spot and the menu appealed to us so we tried it and we were not disappointed! Our food was outstanding and the service was very good too. We also found it to be quite reasonable. We will...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8595890-Reviews-Kin_Kao-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kinara Indian Cuisine,"Definitely a quiet gem of a restaurant. I bumped into it while ambling along David St and ducked in for an early dinner. It was absolutely delicious!! I chose the aloo chat for an appetizer, followed by a mango curry dish. Highly recommended!
Kinara is a neighborhood gem located in a quiet area on Davie Street. It's just a bit away from the busier streets often filled with tourists as well as locals. The indoor dining atmosphere is very nice, and the restaurant staff are kind and professional....More
We have been married a long time, and only until 2019 never had Indian food, but now we love it. At Kinara we Had tandoori meat and paneer Mahkani
BAD QUALITY FOOD, DO NOT GO HERE. I ordered Biryani and the vegetables were UNDERCOOKED and had no FLAVOR. When I called to get a refund I was told that they use FROZEN VEGETABLES and that's why the vegetables weren't cooked properly and had the...More
Food was delivered - I had mentioned it was my wife's birthday - they included (free) a delicious rice pudding and a chocolate rose!!! we were both surprised and delighted. Someone took the time to draw a happy face on the rice pudding dish cover...More
I just finished the most flavourful and lovely lunch at Kinara. If you love all the flavours and spices showcased in Indian cuisine you will have to give this place a try. Takeout is also available.
Take-out right now, but we ate there many times before the Corona Virus quarantine period of 2020, but even through this period we ordered for take-out and walked over to pick up the food. Although they do a lot of delivery orders too. All we...More
A bit off the tourist areas, in the middle of Davie Street between Stanley Park and Yaletown. Delicious food, excellent service. Items for sharing, and for hoarding all to yourself. Excellent for take out too. Sit at the bar and have some snacks, or grab...More
Kinara Indian Cuisine on Davie Street, Vancouver is a good Indian restaurant offering reasonably tasty and varied spread. The seating is sufficient to meet rush hour crowd. The food is served hot and with a pleasant smile by the staff. There appears to be live...More
Went with four friends and we all enjoyed our meals. I'd say it was even better than Tasty's Indian and so far the best I've had in the city. Will definitely be heading back again soon.
We had a wonderful meal at Kinara Indian Cuisine. The staff were attentive and polite and the food was served steaming hot on hot plates and tasted amazing, we will definitely go back for more!
This small 22 seat, unprepossessing place should not be overlooked. It is on a dark section of the street, next to a hardware store, and you might be inclined to pass by. But, don't be fooled. The staff are friendly and helpful. And the food...More
To the owners of Kinara Indian Cuisine thank you for such an amazing mouth watering culinary experience. Pre main meal drinks and noshing on papaddoms and dipping sauce was the begging of our dinner experience. I ordered Saag Paneer although on the menu there was...More
Visited with my partner on holiday and the waiter Scotty as we know him is very accommodating. Such a laugh and great personality! The food was amazing and I would recommend 100 percent! If it wasn’t for this man especially and great food we wouldn’t...More
New Indian jewel in the West End. We ate vegetarian - Veggie Sizzler and Paneer Makhani with rice and naan. Everything was excellent - had to order more naan as it superb. Our server was great, his thick Scottish accent a surprise. Prices were good....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15347690-Reviews-Kinara_Indian_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kingyo,"Dropped in just after opening on a weekday and the place was already filling up. Started with the tofu appetizer which was super flavorful. The balance of the tofu, seaweed and mushrooms was perfect. Next went with the pressed ahi sushi. While the presentation was...More
Excellent food. Prompt and polite service. Energetic but civil atmosphere. We especially appreciated the live performance from the chefs, and the enthusiastic chants of all staff.
I came to this restaurant for dinner with my family and honestly, I find it quite over rated regarding its reviews. Of all the things I ordered, only the plain white rice tasted amazing. The rest of the food had a pleasant taste and only...More
We just happened upon Kingyo whilst scouting for a lunch restaurant. We had Sashimi Salad followed by tan tan noodle soup and beef udon noodles. The entire meal was delicious at every turn. The Sashimi was freshly prepared and served with very fresh salad, a...More
Busy but we managed to get a table at the counter area as a walk-in without booking or queuing. The service is very swift and friendly and the food is excellent. Can highly recommend Kobe beef on hot stone, grilled duck, tempura prawns & mayo,...More
Warm welcome and very special service on our wedding anniversary. Fabulous food! Don’t miss the corn, tiger prawns and tan tan noodles. Beautiful room with central bamboo garden. Yum!
Great atmosphere, authentic japanese food and amazing quality. This is the best izakaya in Vancouver.
Was recommended by a friend to try Kingyo and was not disappointed. They serve excellent japanese tapas and service was great. The venue is small so be prepared for a wait. Located in a busy section of downtown so parking may also be an issue....More
C! Is simple always perfection whatever the chef or the month of the year it's THe IZAKAWA from Vancouver and his other little brothers like RAISU
Very friendly staff and delicious sushi. Mostly pressed sushi instead of rolls, very well presented. Recommend stopping in!
Food was average only. Certainly not as amazing as the high rating here would suggest. Perhaps our expectations were a bit too high due to the high rating.
During our visit to Vancouver, we tried two popular Japanese restaurants and Kingyo did not disappoint. Most of the area is permit only, cross your fingers for a parking spot. We showed up without making a reservation, but highly recommend making one, as the place...More
We happened across this restaurant after visiting Stanley Park and had some lunch here. We were really impressed with the authentic Japanese food, it was all really tasty and full of flavour. The waitress was also so helpful and friendly - we had a great...More
Excellent ramen and service. We enjoyed 3 bowls of ramen and a California bowl the last night of our vacation post cruise. Our server was knowledgeable and gave us great service. Highly recommend.
Dropped in here with the family, staff was super accommodating & friendly. The ramen is as good as it gets, & sushi plates were perfect.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d787450-Reviews-Kingyo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kinkura Sushi,"This was one of the best sushi we ever had. We like to go out and try different and new sushi places. So when we were on vacation in Vancouver we exidently found this place. And men were we glad we did! So good! It...More
We eat very often sushi in the Netherlands and were/are on a trip in Canada and by accident we came to eat at this place. We were surprised with the freshness and taste of this sushi. Probably one of the best we have ever eaten....More
Found this place after wandering around downtown. For us, perfect for a bite to eat without going in some place for the big meal. I wish had more time, as the menu was most interesing. Service was great, food was good.
Cute little restaurant with great service and fresh delicious maki rolls. We tried the summer roll, kinkura roll, and teriyaki chicken roll. Would recommend this place!
Unexpected Treasure in Vancouver. Fresh, innovative, delicious and beautifully presented. Complimentary green tea was a nice gesture and bonus. The chef does not disappoint!!!
We were directed here for dine-in by their co-owned Yamato Sushi, that was open for takeaway only. Kinkura has a nice atmosphere, the staff very friendly and great food. The prices are reasonable and there is currently a promotion on draught beer. Some of the...More
Fantastic staff, fantastic food, great service, very hospitable, the salmon sashimis tasted better than my childhood memories. Definitely coming here everytime I'm in Vancouver.",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23977538-Reviews-Kinkura_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kintaro Ramen,"Excellent ramen prepared in front of you. Experience made me feel like I was back in Tokyo. Pork is outstanding. One bowl would probably feed 2. But, you may not want to share.
Unpretentious atmosphere. Choice of light, medium or rich broth & fatty or lean meat. Large portions. Delicious and flavourful. Miso Ramen with added egg is a favourite.
one of Vancouver's iconic, original ramen restaurants. It's convenient to have a choice of meat and soup. The broth has a wonderful flavour. The costs are lower than other shops and the portions are enormous. 
With its black awning now tinged with green mold and lichen, Kintaro doesn’t look like the most inviting of Vancouver’s ramen establishments; however, despite outward appearances, this “Iconic Ramen House” still commands lengthy lines at peak hours. I’m sure part of this has to do...More
Great ramen experience here. I got take out here but it was still just as delicious, definitely would recommend checking out this amazing spot. Hope to dine in next time!
Delivery order: I got the Miso Ramen, and i chose: Rich Soup, Fatty Pork, Add Wakame Seaweed, Add Dried Seaweed, Add Boiled Egg. Obviously over priced due to delivery. Was crap. Flavorless broth, flavorless noodles, pork was falling apart in tiny pieces - not appetizing,...More
Amazing cheap ramen with a good atmosphere to go with it, service was good and fast. I highly recommend this place.
Great ramen, great service, quick and easy. Had the spicy garlic ramen and the shio ramen, both were great
Crazy good ramen!! Although the rich broth is very fatty!! Gyoza was very good too. A very plain atmosphere, the service was excellent!
We were craving ramen after a morning in Stanley Park,and Kintaro is conveniently close. Maybe the tourists have hardened the staff somewhat, as they seemed faintly disinterested. Luckily their delicious food more than compensated. Great prices, great taste, and a quick experience. Will be back.
Sitting in the hub of the Ramen choices in Van, this is one of the first, and in my opinion the best. If you don't like line-ups...too bad buttercup...it's worth the wait.
Got to try 3 of the 4 ramen they offer. All has a nice broth and you really taste the soy, miso and pork broth. Ramen noodle was nice and firm and chewy. Pork fatty chasu was good. HUGE serving for 10.50$ probably the best...More
One of the best ramen restaurants in Vancouver that I tried. Excellent quality for the low price. Nice authentic environment and super warm inside to keep you going during those cold Vancouver nights.
We arrived at Kintaro a little before 6pm to beat the line as we know the ramen restaurants downtown Vancouver has lineups. I heard about Kintaro back from a former co-worker from Seattle ~2004. He is American Japanese and would always come here as he...More
We came to Kintaro Ramen as our friend recommended that place. The portions are huge so make sure you are not already full. Great value for money. It's open kitchen there so all ramen-magic is happening in front of your eyes. It's all about ramen:...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d809431-Reviews-Kintaro_Ramen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kirin Restaurant,"Highly recommended for authentic Cantonese Dimsum. Order the classics: prawn dumplings, bbq pork buns, sticky rice in lotus leaf, spring rolls. The original restaurant is in Richmond, but the Alberni St one is where we went.
Foods were ok but Staff Service was unacceptable. We were treated as if we were begging them for foods. They literally give you a long / black face if you do not order expensive seafood dishes. It's a shame that they represent one of the...More
We had our business lunch yesterday. Food was reasonable but the wait staff was quite abrupt and made you feel they didn't have time for you. As we asked for our bill, the manager brought it to us and said ' Don't forget to tip'....More
Food was ok, nothing special, service was awful, don’t go there! I don’t understand that a first class hotel like the Fairmont can suggest a place like that. Vancouver definitely has better Chinese restaurants!
We arrived to Kirin with a reservation for 1 and had to wait 30 minutes for our table to be ready. Bella at the front desk was rude and didn’t have any care to honor our reservation. When we tried asking about our reservation she...More
I read the reviews on Trip Advisor and it was recommended by one of the staff at the Pan Pacific Hotel in Vancouver. This is a strange location, as it seem like it's located in the lobby of a building. You have climb steep stairs...More
Dim sum was excellent in this beautiful restaurant. Service was attentive. The black gold bao with liquid yolk was very impressive!
Nice place. Menu could have been a little more varied, but the food was pretty good, although not outstanding.
Service staff, place and food were all great but the price is just too high. Peking duck two ways were mouth watering though.
Meeting few friends asian origin and they chose this place. It was close to my hotel too. Its hidden from the street so hard to find but very spacious inside. We ordered a whole bunch of dishes and shared. Loved it. Love their vegetables gailan...More
Great restaurant for Dim Sum. Though we prefer Dim Sum restaurants with carts going to each table, this was very good. They keep their tea on a burner so it stays warm! The waitress asked if we needed help with ordering. Great customer service! We...More
My friend and I were looking for some place to eat dinner while we were perusing the souvenir shops in Vancouver. We stumbled upon this place. It didn't look like much from the outside, but once we stepped in and were seated, we found out...More
The Chinese Chef make good Hong Kong Cantonese Chinese style dishes, similar to the taste of Hong Kong Chinese restaurant. We like their dim sum lunch which they are freshly make daily and traditional style Cantonese dim sum.
We had a very nice restaurant at Kirin. We stayed at the Pinnacle Marriott and were able to walk. The service was excellent and I was pleased to find a Chinese restaurant that offered gluten free options.
We came here on a food tour and tried some of the dim sum. It was delicious and very well made. You can tell the dim sum is hand made the in the authentic way. Make reservation but beware, they only serve dim sum during...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5097900-Reviews-Kirin_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kirin Seafood Restaurant,"Very impressed with their professional service! Attentive in refilling tea and taking away empty/dirty plates with new one. Cozy environment and spacious, suitable for family or large group. Food can be pricey, considering the size of the dish, but the Kirin Special Fried Rice was...More
Very impressed with their professional service! Attentive in refilling tea and taking away empty/dirty plates with new one. Cozy environment and spacious, suitable for family or large group. Food can be pricey, considering the size of the dish, but the Kirin Special Fried Rice was...More
The restaurant is recommended by a picky friend of mine. We were a group of 4 and had sinner there. The food and service both exceeded our expectations. We have never experienced something like this in Toronto. I would for sure go back whenever I...More
The restaurant is recommended by a picky friend of mine. We were a group of 4 and had sinner there. The food and service both exceeded our expectations. We have never experienced something like this in Toronto. I would for sure go back whenever I...More
This review is more about the service than the food. The last time we visited Kirin in Richmond BC for dim-sum was Sept 2015, and even back then we felt the food quality and service was poor. Back then pre-covid the dim sum was nothing...More
This review is more about the service than the food. The last time we visited Kirin in Richmond BC for dim-sum was Sept 2015, and even back then we felt the food quality and service was poor. Back then pre-covid the dim sum was nothing...More
Had dim sum lunch here on Saturday. The dim sum offerings are more upscale and different than the usual dim sum restaurants. Food and service were excellent. Reservations required and only allows 90 min to eat, regardless of your group size. Food came out piping...More
Had dim sum lunch here on Saturday. The dim sum offerings are more upscale and different than the usual dim sum restaurants. Food and service were excellent. Reservations required and only allows 90 min to eat, regardless of your group size. Food came out piping...More
Restaurant opens at 10 am. We called and try to make a reservation. Our drive to restaurant is about 1 hour. During that time, we kept calling every 10 minutes. When we got there, waitress said the restaurant is completely full (on Monday!) and no...More
Restaurant opens at 10 am. We called and try to make a reservation. Our drive to restaurant is about 1 hour. During that time, we kept calling every 10 minutes. When we got there, waitress said the restaurant is completely full (on Monday!) and no...More
Delicious food and great service. My only complaint was the price of one dish of pea tips which was delicious but waaaaaay overpriced. Plan to spend some money here but you will be happy with the food.
Delicious food and great service. My only complaint was the price of one dish of pea tips which was delicious but waaaaaay overpriced. Plan to spend some money here but you will be happy with the food.
Reservation for 4 (Dim Sum). We got there and there were only 2 places set. The waiter came by and basically chucked the extra places settings on the table and walked away. The service staff didn't engage us at all. I don't mean chit chat...More
Reservation for 4 (Dim Sum). We got there and there were only 2 places set. The waiter came by and basically chucked the extra places settings on the table and walked away. The service staff didn't engage us at all. I don't mean chit chat...More
Ordered the king crab from the live tank, spicy Szechuan style...it was out of this world!! Definitely recommend! Thoroughly enjoyed by my family of 4. Spring rolls were delicious, we also enjoyed the sizzling prawns, and a chicken with cashew nuts as well. Portion sizes...More
Ordered the king crab from the live tank, spicy Szechuan style...it was out of this world!! Definitely recommend! Thoroughly enjoyed by my family of 4. Spring rolls were delicious, we also enjoyed the sizzling prawns, and a chicken with cashew nuts as well. Portion sizes...More
We attended Kirin Seafood Restaurant on the 23rd to celebrate a friend's birthday. I had preordered their 2 course Peking Duck and reserved 2 orders of their Durian Mochi. In addition to these, I added their special chowmein, special fried rice, deep fried tofu and...More
We attended Kirin Seafood Restaurant on the 23rd to celebrate a friend's birthday. I had preordered their 2 course Peking Duck and reserved 2 orders of their Durian Mochi. In addition to these, I added their special chowmein, special fried rice, deep fried tofu and...More
Kirin restaurants has been around for long time ,now only have three locations in midland ,they all very upscale and elegant ambiance , very popular with business meeting and banquet ,restaurant is on the second floor ,lot of parking on the 4 floors ,due to...More
Kirin restaurants has been around for long time ,now only have three locations in midland ,they all very upscale and elegant ambiance , very popular with business meeting and banquet ,restaurant is on the second floor ,lot of parking on the 4 floors ,due to...More
8 of us enjoyed many delightful items. King crab, and we used the sauce to make lo mein, crispy chicken, stewed short ribs, soup, steamed fish, deep fried fish, snow pea shoots, and baked seafood rice. Great service. Free parking but make sure to register...More
8 of us enjoyed many delightful items. King crab, and we used the sauce to make lo mein, crispy chicken, stewed short ribs, soup, steamed fish, deep fried fish, snow pea shoots, and baked seafood rice. Great service. Free parking but make sure to register...More
Go early and make a reservation to beat the crowd! This is a popular dim sum restaurant in the area so there's always a wait starting around 11 am. You will want to arrive early and make a reservation just to be safe. There's free...More
Go early and make a reservation to beat the crowd! This is a popular dim sum restaurant in the area so there's always a wait starting around 11 am. You will want to arrive early and make a reservation just to be safe. There's free...More
Stopped to get some authentic dim sum Chinese food before flying out of town. Large room with numerous staff. Didn’t have a clue as to what to order so I left it up to the waiter...”enough food for three please”. Got a variety of dishes...More
Stopped to get some authentic dim sum Chinese food before flying out of town. Large room with numerous staff. Didn’t have a clue as to what to order so I left it up to the waiter...”enough food for three please”. Got a variety of dishes...More
For our annual New Year Dim Sum lunch, we usually go to the City Square location; however, they are now closed. We relocated here and the food is consistently good. Each dish was great! I tried to take more photos but the food was getting...More
For our annual New Year Dim Sum lunch, we usually go to the City Square location; however, they are now closed. We relocated here and the food is consistently good. Each dish was great! I tried to take more photos but the food was getting...More
I was in Richmond on business and had clients who wanted to go for ""authentic"" Chinese food. I did my homework researching the top 10 in Richmond, spoke to several people from the hotel and finally chose the Kirin. Could not have been happier. I...More
I was in Richmond on business and had clients who wanted to go for ""authentic"" Chinese food. I did my homework researching the top 10 in Richmond, spoke to several people from the hotel and finally chose the Kirin. Could not have been happier. I...More
Twenty of us went there for a set menu dinner. An older waiter with short white hair and a younger lady with pony tail served us. Even though they kept changing the plates, their attitude was not good. If we ask for something, they would...More
Twenty of us went there for a set menu dinner. An older waiter with short white hair and a younger lady with pony tail served us. Even though they kept changing the plates, their attitude was not good. If we ask for something, they would...More
I was so impressed to hear the table server ask if any allergies or dietary restrictions in a Chinese restaurant. The multi course meal to celebrate a wedding was really good. Service was attentive. Lots of parking.
I was so impressed to hear the table server ask if any allergies or dietary restrictions in a Chinese restaurant. The multi course meal to celebrate a wedding was really good. Service was attentive. Lots of parking.
I brought a couple of out of town friends here based on a friend’s recommendation. If you’re looking for the same old, same old dim sum dishes, you won’t find it here. Our hopes were set high for the sesame seed deep fried balls and...More
I brought a couple of out of town friends here based on a friend’s recommendation. If you’re looking for the same old, same old dim sum dishes, you won’t find it here. Our hopes were set high for the sesame seed deep fried balls and...More
The food was very different. Good food and excellent service. Liked the fact they check everyone vaccine passport at the door.
The food was very different. Good food and excellent service. Liked the fact they check everyone vaccine passport at the door.
My freind lives in Delta so we needed a place half way between us. we picked the Kirin for dim sum. all the food was good, I really like the Jasmin tea. Little pricey for lunch. I guess it for high rollers at casino.
My freind lives in Delta so we needed a place half way between us. we picked the Kirin for dim sum. all the food was good, I really like the Jasmin tea. Little pricey for lunch. I guess it for high rollers at casino.
Food is generally good. Kirin has a good reputation of quality food and service. However, today was unfortunately not so. We ordered the usual steam rock cod, supposedly live from the tank. It was not fresh at all. The fish was tough, and didn't taste...More
Food is generally good. Kirin has a good reputation of quality food and service. However, today was unfortunately not so. We ordered the usual steam rock cod, supposedly live from the tank. It was not fresh at all. The fish was tough, and didn't taste...More
It is been very difficult and tough mentally years for all the restaurants , Kirin is one of the best exquisite Chines Seafood restaurants in midland ,since they reopen for dinning last year , this location significantly gone down hill every day !! ,the quality...More
It is been very difficult and tough mentally years for all the restaurants , Kirin is one of the best exquisite Chines Seafood restaurants in midland ,since they reopen for dinning last year , this location significantly gone down hill every day !! ,the quality...More
Almost missed to find restaurant as the casino lights not turned on because of covid-19 restrictions. The food we think was better before.  It was good but not great.  We ordered the peking duck in two courses, crab meat with fish maw & bird nest...More
Almost missed to find restaurant as the casino lights not turned on because of covid-19 restrictions. The food we think was better before.  It was good but not great.  We ordered the peking duck in two courses, crab meat with fish maw & bird nest...More
It saddens me greatly that the Kirin name is being tarnished by the New Westminster location! The service was poor and my order was wrong. I understand the stress that Covid -19 is putting on the restaurant industry but that is still not acceptable to...More
It saddens me greatly that the Kirin name is being tarnished by the New Westminster location! The service was poor and my order was wrong. I understand the stress that Covid -19 is putting on the restaurant industry but that is still not acceptable to...More
Very happy to find out Kirin restaurant still offer their delicious Dim Sum for take out or delivery ,during the Covid -- 19 , I surprise my Mum and my sisters and brother for early Mothers Lunch at my home (5 of us ! )...More
Very happy to find out Kirin restaurant still offer their delicious Dim Sum for take out or delivery ,during the Covid -- 19 , I surprise my Mum and my sisters and brother for early Mothers Lunch at my home (5 of us ! )...More
A popular place especially on weekends. We arrived right at 5 pm when they opened but had to wait a few minutes for them to setup. I would recommend reservations. We ordered 4 dishes along with a soup. The waiter came back advising they ran...More
A popular place especially on weekends. We arrived right at 5 pm when they opened but had to wait a few minutes for them to setup. I would recommend reservations. We ordered 4 dishes along with a soup. The waiter came back advising they ran...More
Out of all the different Kirin locations, I still like this one the best! It is a bit of a drive, when you have a Kirin right in downtown Richmond, ( as I live in Richmond), I still come here for dim sum or dinner....More
Out of all the different Kirin locations, I still like this one the best! It is a bit of a drive, when you have a Kirin right in downtown Richmond, ( as I live in Richmond), I still come here for dim sum or dinner....More
Great Chinese food with great service, it does get very busy so make sure you either come early or make a reservation!
Great Chinese food with great service, it does get very busy so make sure you either come early or make a reservation!
I came here today for my Mom’s birthday dinner.This place has wonderful food and great service and would recommend this place to eat if you are around this area.
I came here today for my Mom’s birthday dinner.This place has wonderful food and great service and would recommend this place to eat if you are around this area.
The staff, food and professionalism was amazing. I visited here 3 years ago with my family and the standard is still incredibly high. The best dim sum I have ever had. When back in Vancouver this will be my first stop.
The staff, food and professionalism was amazing. I visited here 3 years ago with my family and the standard is still incredibly high. The best dim sum I have ever had. When back in Vancouver this will be my first stop.",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d810030-Reviews-Kirin_Seafood_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Kishimoto Japanese Kitchen,"The food is so good it keeps you coming back. Book a reservation 3-4 weeks advance to get a more desirable seating time. Just get a variety of things to enjoy with others.
If I could give more than 5 stars, I would!! This restaurant was unpretentious, with fast service. Each dish had a gorgeous, artistic presentation. The Dragon Roll and seasonal tempura had subtle and delicate flavours. Melt-in-your mouth sashimi topped off our evening. Unbelievable value for...More
Outstanding food with artistic presentation. The smoked oshi was a show-stopper appetizer. So cool and tasty to have the sushi under a glass dome filled with smoke! The restaurant is tiny, so book well in advance to secure a seating. Well worth a visit!!
Overall we had a lovely meal here. Some bits were outstanding including the smoked salmon thing which came with a bit of theatre. The blackened cod was really lovely too. The sashimi was a bit disappointing though which is why I’m not giving the highest...More
We always enjoy the food here and rotate bringing friends to introduce this restaurant. Fresh fish, beautiful presentation and a la carte.
Four of us enjoyed a great evening of hot sake and a variety of dishes: hamachi & salmon, caterpillar roll, Bluefin negitoro roll, salmon oshi, smoked oshi, wagyu tataki, prawn tempura and Beet salad. Food top notch and nice presentation. Make sure to make a...More
Hard to get a reservation on the weekend. And with reason. This is good. Better than good. And the presentation is very nice. And prices are not outrageous. Simply put, excellent sushi for a reasonable price. Full stop.
It has been a long time since I was here last. Because of Covid-19 they are down to only four tables if dining in and choice of 3 seating times so make sure to call ahead to reserve a table. Tables are spaced more than...More
Came here on a Thursday evening right at 5 pm. There was no line and we were seated right at the window to people watch and nom nom. You have to check this place out! What a gem. Notable items on the menu: Hamachili roll,...More
During this time with restaurants only providing takeout/delivery service, I wanted to make sure we frequent the places I hope that will survive. I called in my order at 4:15pm for a 5:00pm pickup on a weekday. I arrived right at 5pm and food was...More
I decided on Kishimoto for dinner while in Vancouver on business. I was going to the theater and thought this would be a great pre-theater dinner. They had good ratings on Trip Advisor and I love sashimi. While I did not have a reservation (they...More
After several nights of Italian or French cuisines, we would like to change our taste buds to something else. We did a brief google search and found Kishimoto. The restaurant does not accept reservation and we waited for about 45 mins to be seated. We...More
We visited this place based on high ratings, and I should say I think it's overrated. It seems like they are struggling with their identity. You can tell they are trying to position themselves as above the average Japanese restaurant with slightly higher than average...More
it is always great to find a new restaurants especially for sushi. This place was a great find fast staff, great food the setting was okay not great but I would still go back for the food.
Was in the area, saw the high rating and decided to give Kishimoto a try. Slightly more expensive than ""average"", moderately extensive menu with a few (oishi) specialties but definitely not high prices for excellent quality sushi. Not a large premises with only a couple...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2486359-Reviews-Kishimoto_Japanese_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kissa Tanto,"Went for the tasting menu. Great fun and imaginative courses. Wasn't so sure about an Italian/Japanese fusion but it worked. My (Italian) wife said the pasta we had was incredible so that's a definite compliment! Reasonable value for money I thought even though the UK...More
I’ll start my review by stating that I’m not a chef, so I don’t have the culinary skills to make dishes at this level, and I also would never consider myself a foodie with impeccable taste. Saying that, I do enjoy cooking and traveling, and...More
I don't usually leave reviews, but this one requires it. I recently visited Kissa Tanto with 5 friends for dinner. As you may know, the restaurant likes to keep groups small and so all their tables are 2-4 seaters. They do, however, have one big...More
Our waitress and all the staff was amazing, well versed, personable and the food was amazing. We ordered a la carte. All dishes were amazing. crudo, pasta with wagyu ragu, duck and truffle japanese omelet were unbelievable.
We told our waiter to think of a nice menu and wow us. Well, he did! The price is steep, no doubt, but the food and amazing ambience made it worth it for us. The only slight negative note is that that when you give...More
I have been to Kissa Tanto many times and eaten almost all of the items on their menu. They are a very unique restaurant and in all my travels around the world, I have not seen another restaurant that provides this type of food. They...More
We decided to go with the ""chef's tasting menu"" which was the best decision we could have made. Every dish was amazing and left is wanting more. As an added bonus, the cocktails were incredible creations. Definitely worth searching this place out! If I could...More
Great service with Christian, ambience and food but small portions. Located in Chinatown where its quiet and there are homeless people around. Arrived at 4:30 pm for a 5:30 pm reservation and couldn't find a place to go for a drink. Restaurant door was locked...More
Greeting and service were excellent. The staff is very attentive and well trained. Prices, though are exorbitant, servings small, and wine & beer pricing is outrageous. Of the six dishes we shared, one was terrific, two were ok and one was poor - over seasoned,...More
I had a big expectation from visiting this place. But... The recipes are very simple for the price they are asking. The music is extremely loud and nothing special in the food presentation. When you are paying 50 $ for the small plate of the...More
We come to Vancouver a few times a year and Kissa Tanto is always top of our list. We visited again this month on our honeymoon and everything was wonderful, as always. We arrived late with no reservation, we were greeted warmly and sat at...More
Another Vancouver venue where you don't really have a dinner, just small plates of overpriced tid-bits. The food is quite nicely prepared and the service is attentive. Other than that - overpriced and not very satisfying. We paid $600 for 4 people and I came...More
My girlfriend felt sick after eating their moldy tomatoes, so we decided to not continue with the rest of the tasting menu. After this, they wanted to charge us the full $270...I said no. Manager came and said ""this isnt cactus club"" (my gf works...More
First time at this place, and I went with hight hopes. I had heard the food was good but pricey, which is understandable. If you are after quality, you should pay for it accordingly. Upon arrival, we were greeted pleasantly and explained how the ordering...More
Had an absolute blast here, we've been meaning to try this place for a while. The food is amazing and the staff are great. The drinks here are unreal too. Definitely will be back soon!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10480142-Reviews-Kissa_Tanto-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kita no Donburi,"Amazing meal, super fast service, generous portions for the price. Julie was a very accommodating waitress. We would definitely come back!
Very popular place in downtown area during lunch. Place ordered first and then grab a seat to enjoy your food. Very satisfied with the food
Wow - is this Osaka??? Super authentic busy and ery friendly place. Frequented by lots of Eastt Asian people and tourists. Had a lunch combo plus some Agadeshi Tofu there awesome! Despite being full they where so organized that waiting didnt take long. Food super...More
Lots of good things on the menu here including rice bowls , Sushi and some Korean dishes. 90% of the clientele here is Asian so I suppose the food is reasonably authentic. Food is a bit pricey but the staff is extremely polite and the...More
My son loves this place! He bought the Katsu Don with egg. According to my husband, the Aburi Set Sushi he got was very good. Their assorted tempura was tasty too. The miso soup was one of the best if not the best I've tasted....More
another one of the regular lunch takeaway. I go there atleast once a week and I am never disappointed. The price is quite reasonable and food always delicious
If I could give -5 I would! Giving your order first and other people after you come and gone and they have you still waiting! Unacceptable service! Go there only if you have all the time in the world and you're not on lunch time....More
Perfect lunch deals. Great variety of sushi and donburi and perfect sizes. If it wasn't for the huge line down the street, we'd probaply overlooked this place. So luckily we passed Seymour during lunch time.
Great place to eat fast service and good food to eat I ate beef dish (Beef Teriyaki Don) plus it comes with nice warm cup of Miso Soup. The meal was nice size and price was fairly cheap only $9.50. I will return for more...More
We stayed across the road at the delta suites. We asked the front desk about the best sushi restaurant. They pointed us straight across the road to Kita No Donburi. The food was beautiful the staff were great. And it was pretty cheap.
For some reason I was really excited to eat here. it had been on my list for a long time. Maybe that's why I was a bit disappointed. The service was good and quite friendly. The prices were reasonable, but the food was just fine...More
I ate and had a well portioned katsu curry and some tuna sushi and it was absolutely delicious and very well priced. The chefs specially prepared sause for the sushi was HEAVENLY, i cant wait to go back! Also the staff were very friendly and...More
I'm trying to become a Chirashi-don expert. I can tell you this one is so far the worst I've tried, why: - Chirashi-don had a layer of mixed salad (the type sold prepackaged in your grocery store) between the rice and the goodies. This to...More
One of the best Japanese restaurants we have ever been, delicious food, great taste, use of ingredients and extraordinary attention from the personnel. You must try it!!!
ordered chicken teriyaki don, was NOT good. too many onion & less teriyaki flavor & less chicken. cute decorations good service & fast. but the portion is TOO small & not tasty.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4023061-Reviews-Kita_no_Donburi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kiyo Sushi,"My husband, son and I went to this small Japanese restaurant during our summer trip. The restaurant has been there over 20 years and my husband used to dine there when he was still a student in Vancouver. Although the restaurant is small but we...More
First time trying Kiyo for dinner since the sushi chefs are Japanese. Many of the items we ordered were over priced for what was offered. The yakitori (chicken) skewers were bland and lacking in flavor and the meat was dry...2 skewers for $7.50. The most...More
We enjoyed our meal here, and would go again. I ordered the Chicken Teriyaki and for the most part, it was tasty, although it was covered by skin, which was not crispy and felt soggy, so I scraped it off. Other than that it was...More
Kiyo Sushi is tucked away in the Cambie Plaza mini mall in Richmond. We came for a visit in early November because I was intrigued by their menu (I’m tired of “Japanese” restaurants that only serve sushi rolls). The interior is somewhat small with various...More
We have fresh oyster, beef sashimi, bbq whole squid, spicy octopus, clam in wine sauce and last to mention is the bbq duck liver sushi which is very impressive.
I have not been to the Kiyo Sushi, Japanese Restaurant, Cambie, Richmond for sometime but last wednesday to decided to check it out. The Kiyo Sushi is still neat tidy and friendly - greeted by the Chefs as we enter the restaurant. The food is...More
Based on TA community and recommendation of staff at nearby hotel, we went here for lunch. it was busy but we were seated very quickly. Menu is very large with lots of options. We had spicy trio. Rolls were sloppy and some fell apart when...More
This used to be a top Japanese restaurant in Richmond that offers authentic Japanese cuisine. But as time passes, the quality and the service is seeing a gradual decline, as more and more competitor are opening shops in Richmond, and Vancouver, it is high time...More
We were a group of eight enjoying a nice meal.  It has been a few years when here last.  Best to book a reservation if you can to avoid any wait.  Lots of parking in their lot.  We had many, many very good items such...More
Came here on a recommendation. It was dinner time and it was busy, but the service was good and friendly. We ordered a spicy tuna roll to share, had some prawn tempura and shrimp sunomono, and yam tempura roll. The tempura was not a stand...More
It’s been awhile since I have been to Kiyo. Met a few people for a business lunch here and sat in a tatami room style table... not a real one. The deluxe sushi combo is good but a bit on the more expansive side compared...More
All Our friends known we visited this restaurant often n love to join with us! They’re very happy and love all the foods we ordered, they said many of dishes they won’t try by themselves .. sashimi always fresh, foods are great and services excellent,...More
I’ve been going to Kiyo for more than a decade now, and for every visit, you are guaranteed friendly and prompt service, fresh ingredients, and darned good Japanese food!
We brought our friends two years ago during their visited and they love to have dinner here again and no doubt everyone are very happy and full with all the delicious foods and excellent services
I went there to grab a party tray to go, they got it ready in less than 15min. The party tray is a nice panel of different kinds of sushis, it's always nice to enjoy different types of sushis when you don't wanna choose ...",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2419904-Reviews-Kiyo_Sushi-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Kobe Japanese Steakhouse,"If you're a fan of this style of dining it's hard to have a bad time here and overall we enjoyed our visit. With that said, our night at Kobe fell far short of most other meals I've had at places like this. All the...More
My friends and I visited Kobes restaurant during a visit to Vancouver from the UK. I would say that the food we ate in this restaurant was the nicest we had eaten throughout our whole 10 day trip. The staff were very welcoming! Our chef...More
I've been to a bunch of hibachi/teppanyaki restaurants in my lifetime. It's one of my favorite dinner experiences. This experience was such a let down however. I'll start by saying that we had dinner reservations at 8pm. We were not seated until probably 8:30 and...More
Ah, Kobe Japanese Steakhouse! This restaurant has been a Vancouver staple since 1968. I’ve had many work colleagues – past and present – talk about this place, with some even noting it as their “favourite.” Yet, despite the accolades and the hype, Kobe didn’t hit...More
We went to Kobe's for a 50th Birthday and University graduation. This is our third time at this restaurant and our last. We were told that we would have our own table since there were 9 of us but we were squished into a corner...More
Waste of money and time! It was my 2nd time to Kobe's and I must say how deeply disappointed I am by the experience I've had tonight. I've never written a review before but I feel after tonight people should know that how I felt...More
The service and food was excellent and the way dinner was presented was so fun! Benny was an excellent chef and I had a lovely dining experience there.
We went here for appies on a date night. We love the atmosphere of the lounge and the drinks are amazing. Their service is impeccable - they really make you feel special. Even though they were fully booked upstairs that evening, they were able to...More
Got invited for my long time friend's 70 years birthday dinner at Kobe , it is one of top entertaining for Teppanyaki restaurant down town , I never get tired of this place , for years and I've been coming here for dinners , since...More
Great Restaurant, atmosphere and drinks. Mai Tai is fantastic. Steak and Prawns, delish. Magic mushrooms, fantastic.
We are long, long time Kobe patrons and have only had one poor meal (early on during Covid) in the course of 30+ years. Our meals on the weekend were excellent and the service was very good - all as expected. We were three couples,...More
We had it all and were entertained throughout! The prawns, steak, chicken and wagyu were all delicious. I’ve never seen my boys eat zucchini or mushrooms, but they inhaled them here! The fried rice was also a hit. I had the 4oz wagyu which was...More
This was an amazing experience, the seafood the rice the steak was amazing including the vegetables. An awesome relaxing time I fully recommend this restaurant
I have been to Kobe many many times. I can say that I have never had anything but a magnificent meal there nor do I know anyone who hasn’t. However on a recent dinner there we were seated directly beside people we did not know...More
We love the food choices, the ""cook"" the feeling of fun . great, Our grand daughter loves chicken !!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705687-Reviews-Kobe_Japanese_Steakhouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Koko Japanese Restaurant,"I've been coming here for years. Excellent, fresh food (you often see local fisherman coming in), wonderful service, great comfortable booths, the real thing. No pretension, just quality. Absolutely fantastic unagi. Top ingredients. The nabeyaki udon is great comfort food.
Don't be fooled by the bare bones restaurant style - - this is the best sushi I've had in awhile! Although not on the menu, the chefs made me some unagi sushi! My partner enjoyed a delicious bowl of udon and loved it. The best...More
I am from the east coast. This Vancouver restaurant has very fresh sushi compare to all of the east coast sushi restaurants I have been. Perhaps the fish is fresher in the west coast. We ordered a bunch of sushi and a few side dishes....More
I've been going to this restaurant for years. Born and raised in Vancouver and I've never had better sushi, if you love sushi you must give this one a try!
Swing by many many times, never know this restaurant since they don't have anything to draw people's attention. Place is clean, big private sitting room. Old construction, no mildew odor. Service is fast and friendly. Sashimi are really fresh, but tuna had no flavor. Ramen...More
We are relatively new to Koko as we only discovered it 3 years ago but now it's hard to go anywhere else. Even after our recent trip to Japan we came back and were so impressed by the freshness and flavour at Koko. Our favourite...More
Has been around long before sushi was trendy-family owned. My uncle who was a longshoremen used to eat here and brought my mom here many decades ago. Fantastic food, and the private rooms. I am not very adventurous but I have chatted with many people...More
We went for a farewell dinner for four of us. We had 3 different kinds of sushi, teriyaki chicken and rice, vegan gyoza and vegetable tempura. The portion sizes were perfect and the service was impeccable. The decor is a little tired but the place...More
We have been coming to KOKO quite regularly since we moved to this side of city. They have been in business for over 20 years. Sushi is always of very good quality. Our favorite is Battera Saba and Unagi. Chefs and staff are friendly. There...More
Is it fancy...no Is it pretty...no Is it in the best location in town...NO Is it grubby...yes Have I eaten sushi everywhere else in the world...yes Is it the best I have ever eaten...absolutely!!! When ever I want sushi...I get in my car and drive...More
Quite anonymous sushi place far away from downtown. But what fantastic sushi! Recommended to us by friends who have been visiting this place for the last 30 years.
Coming from the prairies, I was excited to try out west coast sushi again for the first time in quite a few years, and tried this restaurant as a recommendation from friends, but was disappointed. Sushi was affordable, but sashimi and California rolls were average....More
My family was brought here for lunch by a Canadian friend. We had bento box sets. Some had tuna sashimi. Service was excellent. The food were fresh & tasty. The bill for the lunch was reasonable. We had to make a reservation before coming. Parking...More
Ate here a lot years ago. Finally back in town and decided to take a chance to see if it was still around. Not just around but over the top great. Keep on slicing dicing and wrapping. Your formula works.
I hadn't been to Koko for a long time. I wanted to go to a more traditional Japanese Restaurant with tatami rooms. So I went back to my long time favorite Koko. Well the place could use some updating but keeping with the traditional look...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705691-Reviews-Koko_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kokoro Tokyo Mazesoba,"First time that I’ve tried mazesoba and it was amazing! I exepected “soupless ramen”, but actually, it’s closer to “super noodles”. Tasty ingredients and perfect technical execution make this one of the best noodle dishes I’ve tried. Chicken karage and gyoza were also top notch....More
I was looking forward to trying this new restaurant in Kitsilano (not downtown), but I was very disappointed. The staff could not explain what the food was. I asked for a bowl with udon, and he said that they didn't have udon. I pointed to...More
Apparently the specialty is ""soupless ramen"" Mazesoba. So maybe better to order that. Every variety, however, featured ""runny egg"" and/ or ground saba (mackeral) and/ or one or more forms of seaweed. I don't like those, especially not in combination. Rather than ask for a...More
OMG!! So delicious! Just happened onto this Soba shop in Vancouver and so happy I did! First time having Mazesoba and it was a treat! It was great they provided a job aid on how to eat the soba. It was so flavorful and beautiful...More
We got as entry Kara Karaage chicken, the best seller Mazesoba, I think named Niku, and the spicy ramen. Everything was excellent, very tasteful, and at a great price. Congrats to the chef!
This is for the Kerrisdale location…I Always heard about the place so popped in during a quiet time between Xmas and new years ( as this place is always busy with a line up). I had their classic chicken karaage, a Tokyo milk tea and...More
Very good traditional mazesobas and dons. We liked it very much. My daughter who lives in Japan for 6 months liked it so much.
We wanted to enjoy a relaxing hotel evening with our toddler so ordered from this restaurant via the SkipTheDishes app. We enjoyed two Komodo ramen creamy tonkotsu bowls, ebi mayo and calamari. Thoughtfully packaged noodle soups so all the ingredients would not get soft and...More
Bright friendly varied Japanese menu with soba and ramen noodle dishes, vegan options. Delicious ice cream cones delightfully presented. Warm and attentive service. Setting is casual but food outstanding.
This place is so amazing. It goes from the amazing staff, to the delicious food, to the fantastic aura of this restaurant. When you walk into the restaurant everyone welcomes you, by saying welcome in Japanese. They make all of their soba noodles on site,...More
I went here with my sister after the vaccine appointment on July 16th. So glad we visited here since we always wanted to try Mazesoba. We spent time looking at the menu until deciding to get Zenbu Mazesoba ($17.99), Tokyo Milk Tea ($3.99) and Kara...More
I love mazesoba, had it for the first time when I was in japan and I was very excited that Vancouver opened up a mazesoba restaurant. Highly recommend the zenbu mazesoba which includes a bit of everything in it. I recommend keeping the raw egg...More
On this visit I had the tori ramen. Nice broth, great noodles. Service is quite good, staff are friendly, had to wait a while before getting the bill though.
Had amazing ramen here. I didn't get to try the soup-less but the soup ramen is amazing. The spicy ramen is so good and the spicy chicken karaage is great. The service is quick, and the restaurant itself was super nice. Highly recommend coming here...More
Unique and delicious take on the soba noodle. Looking for something Japanese but not ramen, sushi or poke? This is a great place in the heart of downtown. It’s popular so be prepared to take a seat on a stool in the waiting area.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16809432-Reviews-Kokoro_Tokyo_Mazesoba-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kongee Dinesty,"We drop in for a quick Chinese breakfast ,before my friend fly back to Toronto , she love congee ,it is good idea in the morning ,,not very heavy on the stomach , I am not much congee guy , so it is my first...More
Didn't order too much at first and waitress was surprised (Cantonese style :-)). When we decided to order more, another waitress recommended the set meal with our congee. The century and salted lean meat congee was quite good and the fried beehoon is also worth...More
Went with friends for a big luch. Ordered 2 congees, XO turnip cakes, fried rice and fried noodles. Food was OK, except for the highly recommended XO turnip cakes, which were terrible ( mostly flour, very little turnip or shrimp, barely any XO sauce flavor)....More
great place to have traditional hong kong style breakfast. delicious congee with fresh ingredients. must try its crispy chinese fried donut. radish cake is loaded with fresh radish...yummy comfort food. highly recommend.
We went for lunch on a weekday.No problem getting a table.We ordered custom-congee where we choose our choice of ingredients ( pork,mushrooms,preserved eggs & clams). pan fried turnip cake with XO sauce and braised beef brisket .Congee was excellent.The turnip cake was very good.Beef was...More
Recently visited Richmond in search of good HK style food.....we found a good one for sure. We went there for dinner on our first night in Richmond, ordered some simple dishes and they were all excellent. The chinese tea they they have was so good...More
This is my go to congee spot! I love that you can customize your congee a number of different ways from the base of the congee (pepper, seasoned or plain) to a variety of garnish and toppings. My favourite is the seasoned congee with fish...More
We came to this restaurant at lunch time, specifically to try the congee. We ordered one bowl of congee with fish fillet & lettuce, and a second bowl with chicken & Chinese mushroom, along the a dish of Chinese donuts to go with the congee....More
Surprising on dishes... Over price about 20% Comparing with similar restaurants. I will not recommend and revisit. Not good for casual dining.
They don't want to speak English if they don't have to, that said great big rice soup bowl, creamy, full.of clams and pei tan. Look fun do soft, donuts crisp and too much for one. Great breakfast. Got there before 11am. Crowded afterwards or did...More
We ordered a bowl (big) of congee with selected ingredients and bitter gourd with beef. Smooth congee with lots of selected items. The beef plate was good size and tasty. The two of us could hardly finish the food. Dessert was complimentary and was slow...More
Food always good especially congee, salty chicken is my favourite. Make sure you make reservation and be there early, parking lot always full after 7.
Last week I went with my friend, his family and friends to the “Kongee Dinesty” in Richmond. Despite it was just 20 minutes before afternoon closing time, we could still go in and order, although at that time several items were not available anymore. We...More
If you like congee (a very traditional Chinese rice porridge) go to Kongee Dinesty. They serve the best quality and you can customize the congee and select size, ingredients by checking off these items on a paper and make sure u try the other dishes...More
For Cantonese cuisine, there is much specialization. For example, wonton noodles, roasted meat, seafood, abalone, etc, etc; and especially congee. Congee needs 4 to 5 hours preparation before they can serve the first customer, so if the restaurant opens at 8 (since congee is a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d8279854-Reviews-Kongee_Dinesty-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Kosoo,"We happened to walk past this restaurant, in search of a late lunch ( and an escape from torrential rain) and could see it was quite busy so thought we would give it a try.I’m not very familiar with Korean food ( not so many...More
Traveling with our family which includes three twenty something boys and we were hungry! This absolutely satisfied our hunger and our tastebuds. We ordered too much shareable food but we normally do just in case and it makes for great leftovers. We had the garlic...More
Amazing Korean Restaurant. Food was so good and different from the usual korean bbq. I liked it so much I came back again.
Real Korean meal. We ordered one of the shareable plates and it would have been enough for four person (we were two)! It was very good, and the menu had a lot of choice.
Had to try KFC while in Vancouver as it seems quite popular. Other items on menu but the fried chicken appears to be the main attraction. The chicken was quite tasty and crunchy. Great with a cold beer. Very young crowd here. Seems like it...More
Amazing golden crispy fried chicken and soy garlic chicken. We dined in and everything was fresh, crispy, and delicious.
This was an excellent experience, even though we had a really long wait to get in. The food was exceptional - we loved it. The soju also helped :-)
We have eaten only at the Kosoo on Robson so cannot comment on the one at Cardero. We have so far eaten there 3 times and every time we have been impressed by the quality of the chicken and soup dishes. The portions are a...More
Had some great take out here. The kimchi fried rice and the boneless fried chicken was amazing. I definitely would recommend checking out this place out. I'm looking forward to dining in here soon.
Food was good, spices appropriate and quantity ample. We had a lot left over to take home. Rated four stars because of service. We waited more than half hour to get a table. Stayed because the restaurant smelled so good. And weren’t disappointed with food....More
Poor service, extra charge for everything. Not worth the money. The serving staff didn’t bring the right items with the dishes and didn’t seem to know what they were doing. When we asked for lettuce for the large pork belly dish, they said $4 extra....More
Had dinner with a friend there. Each table is seperated by plexi glass which is great during this covid time. We order a full size chicken, and chose half oder of original flavour and half spicky, baked not fried. I was really happy that they...More
I went to Kosoo Restaurant the other day with my friend for dinner. It was great! The food was amazing and service was attentive. We had the Kal bi and they had these wraps as part of it. Amazing taste. They cut down the amout...More
Small restaurant with friendly service. Great place for hangout. Open until late. Always pack with customers.
Enjoyed this new dining experience. First time trying Korean and truly enjoyed. Service attentive and helpful. Nice atmosphere. Food excellent and seemed to be a popular choice with local crowd. Visiting Vancouver and was so happy to find this place a walk away from our...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8041391-Reviews-Kosoo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Koyuki Sapporo Ramen,"Spicy ramen was outstanding. Others less so. Tight space but overall a decent experience. Servers were a bit overwhelmed it seemed. We went at 2:30. They closed at 3pm. Almost turned us away. A bit hot and stuffy in there. I would recommend.
Don’t come here unless you have time to wait. We should have just waited in line for Ramen Danbo. My water didn’t get refilled, it took a long time to get our green tea/Coca Cola order, and I’m sure they went out back and slaughtered...More
We went to this place twice over 4 days, and dont understand why it wasnt as popular as it should be. A nearby ramen restaurant had long lines both time we came here, and Koyuki had no lines at all. Robson Street has many ramen...More
We had initially started lining up for a different ramen restaurant, but it was taking ages so we decided to leave and stumbled across this place and went in. Wow, the food was amazing and we were so glad that we found this place. Beer...More
Small but nice location near downtown Vancouver. Our family of 5 went there around 6:00pm on a Monday and had no wait for a table. Not quite the same as the quality in Hokkaido but the closest to it we've found so far. The butter...More
Came in with my wife and 2 teenage daughters. Had the spicy pork ramen and Gyozas, as a between-meal snack at 3 Everything was great tasting. Service was friendly. We recommend this place!
We ordered goma-ae and butter and corn miso ramen, they’re delicious. Good and quick service from the staff, reasonable prices.
CHICKEN RAMEN!!! I don’t eat pork, and I know that most ramen bases and meat are pork based so I was hoping to find chicken based ramen while traveling in Vancouver, as I know there a TON of ramen places to choose from. We just...More
We went for Ramen and were not disappointed. Quick service. Our order was taken quickly and the food came out very quickly as well. The restaurant is a little tight like many restaurants along Robson St (it's just off of Robson)
Great restaurant for ramen tucked away on a side street near Robson. The broth for the ramen is really rich and flavorful - definitely authentic ramen. There's a lot of different options for ramen, as well as non-ramen dishes. The prices are also very affordable...More
Fast, value priced, great service. Broth wasn't as rich as I had hoped (Vancouver is spoiled for choice) but deeply flavourful. Noodles didn't stand out and wasn't a big portion of pork. But their egg was so perfect I had to order another, this is...More
I can’t find adequate words to fully express how good the broth is here. Made with 3 types of miso. The chashu is fine but I could eat this broth and noodles every day and never get tired. Maybe fat.
By far the best Ramen we had in Vancouver during a week long trip. We had great service, and the food was delicious. We've traveled around Japan and had ramen in many different places - this place makes very good ramen!
There are plenty of authentic Japanese restaurants in Vancouver, and here is one for Ramen lover. I liked the spicy tasty soup Ramen.👍👍
Rushed in on a busy Friday right at 11:30 when they open and orfered the Number 1 ramen. It was less than 10 minutes and in the time i had been seated, there were 4 other tables filled. The broth had that great miso flavor...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10593725-Reviews-Koyuki_Sapporo_Ramen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kozak Ukrainian Eatery,"We ordered a Tato combo so that we could taste some of the menu items. Our set consisted of a traditional soup ( pork flavor) , pirogi, cabbage rolls with mushrooms and crepes .The soup ( goulyash) came with a small piece of grain toasted...More
Fabulous ambience and food. Incredible baking—bread, savoury and sweets. Friendly service. Great combos.
Tasty cuisine, great atmosphere, professional service! Loved it! Thank you to our waitress Margarita, she was very attentive and friendly! Would love to come back! Taste of food is very authentic, especially Lviv cheesecake, as a person who been to Lviv 100500 times I know...More
A huge selection of absolutely delicious baked goods. I had the The Momma plate with a variety of authentic Ukrainian food (borscht, cabbage rolls, pirogies, Ukrainian sausage) covered with gently sautéed onions and with this yummy beet/horseradish condiment and sour cream on the side. Heaven!
Delicious variety of Ukrainian meals and baking! We had “Mama’s Combo” meal with cherry strudel & big chocolate bun! The service was quick & professional with big easy smiles. Plus we took baking with us naturally. We’ll be back with family & friends.🇺🇦🇨🇦⭐️
I went in for a bread and ordered a Buckwheat and we really enjoyed it's earthiness, grains, and taste. I also got a sour cherry sweet roll for dessert and it was quite good.
I've visited here once for the bakery and this recent visit was for the Ukranian food. Cabbage Rolls and Borsht looked super yummy so I got the Hungry Tato Combo ($17.90) for lunch. I prepaid for my food, took the number sign and then waited...More
A friend suggested we meet there for lunch, as he had been there a few times prior. On a rainy afternoon, it was the exact place for us to catch up socially, and to eat comfort food. Latkes, Borscht, Rugelach, bread and other pastries filled...More
We've been trying to give this place a chance for quite awhile after we spent ALOT when it was decent over a year ago. But honestly we have only been repeatedly disappointed. It's sadly been a hit & miss the last year as there’s no...More
We were told about this place by a friend who has been getting takeout from them during the pandemic. We were in the area so made a reservation (which was not really needed) and had dinner on a rainy Saturday night. Borscht was excellent, cabbage...More
I went here on Easter Monday (its been a late post) had nothing better to do , but felt curious of Kozak on Victoria. I know nothing of Ukranian food /pastry and Yelp brought me here. Interior was clean and decor paintings were cute. I've...More
Those of you who have been paying attention to social media over the last year have probably seen the pictures of chocolate babka slices from Kozak Ukrainian Eatery located in New Westminster. Well, their much awaited shop in Vancouver finally opened earlier this year (after...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d20259095-Reviews-Kozak_Ukrainian_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kozak Ukrainian Restaurant,"Great food! Borscht and pirogies to die for. Nice people, good value. If you like Eastern European food go for it
When we found out we could get some gluten free options at a Ukrainian restaurant we had to check it out. Everything we ordered was extremely tasty, service from Vlodymyr very attentive despite a large group he was also serving, and the atmosphere fun. Local...More
I have been to Kozak for lunch, baked goods and I went with a friend. The food was excellent and the service was friendly and efficient. I also took a friend to Kozak and she really enjoyed her dinner. I plan to visit Kozak again...More
This restaurant is an absolute delight. The food is delicious and true to its origins. Portion sizes are very good. The atmosphere is charming and very comfortable. Definitely worth a try.
We really enjoyed our visit to Kozak. We ordered all sorts of things that we had never heard of and enjoyed all of it. They've got a really good thing going here. Check it out! Special touch was the photo in the men's urinal !
I didn't take a photo of the food menu, but there was a good variety of traditional Ukrainian dishes and desserts. The food was delicious. I felt the portion was somewhat small, but I wasn't sure if it was a typical Canadian portion size or...More
We had a nice dinner here this week. Food delivery was a little spotty; my wife's starter arrived about five minutes before mine. That said, service otherwise was friendly and professional, and the main courses, when served, were served together. I enjoyed my starter, the...More
Absolutely the worse experience in Vancouver. My friend and I decided to give Kozak Ukrainian Resturant a try and it is really unfortunate for us, we had order a few appetizers and each a main course waited for about 20 minutes and my friend received...More
This was a fantastic find... I love nothing more than trying out different dishes so together supporting Ukraine and to try a different meal I wondered in and it was devine.. Propped up at the bar, solo! The barman assisted me in trying a few...More
Traditional dishes, a modern environment, a quick and friendly service. There’s something more: with a drink you can help Ukrainian people. The drink is appropriately named Slava Ukraini (Glory to Ukraine)
Friendly service and good atmosphere. Loved their Borsch and Perogies 👍 Chicken Kiev is top-notch. Was very pleasantly surprised to see big variety of natural vines. They have cute small deli on a side of the restaurant with good variety of grab&go food and pastries....More",11,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d24140289-Reviews-Kozak_Ukrainian_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Kypriaki Mediterranean Grill,"From the time you are welcomed in to the time you say goodbye, your dining experience here will be delightful. The staff was friendly and efficient. It took some time to get our meal even though there were not too many people but that is...More
They called us on Mother’s Day an hour after we ordered to ask if we wanted to cancel our order as the “kitchen is slammed”. We said no and asked how much longer it would be and she said she wasn’t sure maybe another hour...More
I have enjoyed eating at Kypriaki for years. Easy parking in the back. Delicious Greek food. Friendly staff. I am a loyal fan of this restaurant. However, what prompts this particular review is tonight when we came in — we were dazzled by the fairyland...More
We catered my mother-in-law's 90th birthday from Kypriaki and everything was wonderful. Dave provided quick and easy communication and the food was amazing. Huge portions and everyone loved their choice. Thank you!
Friendly service and very good food. There is also a patio but as it was facing the street we decided to eat inside. We enjoyed the calamari as appetizer, chicken soulvaki, lamb chops and roast lamb. Dessert we had their specials.
Great food and service. We had their special of the day and seafood risotto.Too bad we didn't save room for dessert as everything was delicious!
We were between lunch and dinner but they welcomed us easily. The staff was SO friendly and accommodating! The food, especially the roast lamb, was to die for!
Went to this restaurant for the first time with indoor sitting only just coming into fruition recently. Obviously the ambience was a bit strange given the forced spacing of all occupied tables, but on the whole it was quite acceptable. We had moussaka (beef) and...More
This restaurant has been around for a very long time, after moving to new location has some “growing” pains, but it’s back to great Greek food. Totally worth a visit!
Went for dinner with a friend, luckily, there was a table. She and her family always love it - and I was just hopeful about some gluten free options. While the garlic shrimp were delicious - I should have asked about the dairy. I enjoyed...More
The service was appalling. We had to ask 4 times for water and 3 times to pay our bill. Our friends' main course arrived 10 minutes before ours. Our waitress kept disappearing, she didn't listen, didn't respond to requests and was completely inattentive. Had no...More
Hi Gilliancarole, I am the owner of Kypriaki and have been for the past 20 years. My apologies for the ball being dropped on you and your group that evening as it is definitely not our intention or what we endorse. With only a few...More
My wife and I stopped and ate at the Kypriaki Grill on Thanksgiving Day. We were not disappointed. We experienced wonderful service and great Greek food. This restaurant is family friendly, and we have no hesitation in recommending this restaurant.
This was our first visit since they moved into their new premises. My wife and I both enjoy Greek food, except for the over abundance of rice and potatoes. As a result, we ordered a Greek salad and shared three appetizers. The Greek salad was...More
My dad and I are big fans of greek food, and we have a tradition to go out for Greek Lamb Roast every year on his birthday. This year, specifically, he was sick and could not get to the restaurant so I ordered in. Normally,...More
Thank you for sharing your beautiful comments Patricia. It absolutely made my heart sing to know that everyone liked the food and you were happy with your experience. And thank you for giving us a chance to help make an already special day even better....More
I have been going to Kypriaki for years and this last visit was disappointing. The food was undercooked and the calamari was mush. The place was loud because they were hosting a bad comedy night, so bad that it was funny. When I made my...More
Hi Brian, I am the owner and have been since 2000 so let me start off by sincerely apologizing for the poor food you received on Saturday evening. I am not one for excuses but when you should have 4 cooks on the line during...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d705745-Reviews-Kypriaki_Mediterranean_Grill-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
L'Abattoir Restaurant,"Everything you would expect from a top 100 Canadian restaurant and more. The Gastown setting gives it the chic ambience. The service is unique in that the people are all happy. Not just formal and proper but ‘happy’. Nice. We were here for the food...More
Went here with a group of about 14 people after our annual sales and marketing meeting. We had a private room on a separate building from the main restaurant We did the chefs menu so we all shared the appetizers and mains , Oysters, Tuna,...More
I visited L'Abbotoir on my recent business trip to Vancouver, I had the smoked salmon and the Steak Diane, both were amazing. The food was accompanied by a selection of drinks recommended by their excellent sommelier. The only thing more remarkable then the food was...More
Excellent service, very good food, ridiculously small portions, outrageous prices. Would be a 5 with reasonable portions and prices.
It was hard to choose what to order as everything on the menu looked beautiful and I am a visual person so I like to see it presented to other tables before I choose. It only made sense to order the tasting menu as it...More
We came back to L'abattoir a few years after having the best meal in Vancouver. This time we went for the full tasting menu with pairing of local wines. The meal was fantastic and we discovered many amazing and unusual wines.
Our first restaurant in vancouver and one that was hard to beat. You could tell how kuch effort, care and dedication went into every dish. Absolutely wonderful food. Our server matt was brilliant and was very knowledgeable about the food and his reccomendations were spot...More
Exceptional service, matched only by the food. Best dining out experience in last 10 years. The staff was a skilled team. We counted 9 individuals that assisted with some portion of our service. Each was a skilled professional. From our principle waiter, to the sommelier...More
We stopped into the L’Abattoir bar twice so far on this trip to Vancouver and have adopted it as our local. Of course, L’Abattoir is a serious restaurant, but the bar has an identity of its own. Beautifully designed, with an elegant vibe, L’Abattoir stands...More
Everyone - locals and tourists alike - must go to this restaurant. Food was prepared well and tasted great. Service was excellent too. We would go back if we lived closer. In the meantime, we would recommend to everyone we know.
A perfect balance of service, food portions and amazing flavors. We started with the scallops with ginger chili's, pineapple, delicious! Mains were, duck and arctic char, BC wine topped off by Millefeuille pastry and Amaro. Excellent dinner and commendable service. The staff described with great...More
Outstanding evening. Service was exceptional, food was amazing and the sommelier chose wonderful wines
They have private rooms in a separate building around the corner - who knew! Excellent venues and outstanding meals. Can’t wait to go back.
No snootiness here! We're casual eaters who like the fine things once in a while, and our server Mark happily answered our questions about how things were prepared, like ""saddled"" (it means served in sausage form). They LOVE to explain their stuff so let them!...More
This was our first time at this restaurant and we were not disappointed. The atmosphere is very cozy, and felt lively and fun, like the old days. The food from beginning to end was fabulous. The oysters were some of the best I've had, the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2000086-Reviews-L_Abattoir_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
L'Epicerie Rotisserie and Gourmet Shop,"Definitely recommend this spot. I had the shaved lamb sandwich and it was delicious. Must try if you’re in the public market. I’ll be back for more!
Sandwiches were very good and the staff are friendly, but the preparation is very slow. If you have some time to loiter nearby it’s worth trying out. Price point is decent.
This years take home thanksgiving dinner was absolutely wonderful. It was a very generous sized serving of the best tasting rolled turkey I have ever had, equally as good as the turkey cooked the traditional way. The vegetable ,Brussel sprouts, Mashed potatoes, winter squash and...More
We grabbed a couple of very tasty sandwiches from here, while visiting Granville Market. The sandwiches were very good, if a bit pricey. They tried to charge more for one of the sandwiches, different to the price clearly displayed but obviously did refund the difference...More
We had a difficult time deciding what to order--they had so many tempting dishes. We finally settled on Moussaka. I fancy myself a good Greek chef and it was ALMOST as good as my homemade (just a little more cinnamon would have made it perfect)....More
I was staying at a friend’s place while in town, they are away so wanted a couple of home made meals to heat up there. I got a couple of beauties at L’Epicerie. 1 dinner of a goat cheese & caramelized onion quiche, another of...More
L'Epicerie has the best food at Granville Island Market. Their soups, such as their Onion Soup and Butternut Squash with Spinach, are superb. So is their chicken with mushrooms and, for that matter, all their other dishes. They make holiday special dinners for Valentine's Day...More
The Vendors are great so many choices great to grab some food frint or a deserrt . check it out soon !
If you cannot find that special and delicious (rare!) spicy, you will here. It has a bit of everything, form all parts of the world, from East Indian cousin to Mexican and Brazilian 'pimentas'. The staff is knowledge and friendly.
Me and my husband visited Granville island, we decided we would have l Lunch at the market as all the food looks so good, the food looked good at L'epicure so we decided to order , I decided on the lamb mousakka (10.95) and my...More
Nice place on Granville Island for roasted chickens and meats. Large selection of infused vinegar and olive oil, though the prices seemed high. Also make sandwiches. Staff a bit brusque bordering on rude at time of our visit. Thankfully, it was a brief encounter to...More
We bought our lunch to eat in the market. Both the chicken and the sides (try the vegetables) were great! Superb place to have lunch in the market, much better than the food court
My daughter loves mac and cheese with a bread crumb crust, and when she saw that in the window of this place, she was ready for lunch. It also had chicken in it, and they heat up a nice big serving. We all enjoyed it...More
Granville Island was our first stop on our trip from Seattle. Naturally, food was our first priority. After passing this place up in our scouting, we came back and ordered... not disappointed at all. I had roasted lamb with squash....tres delicieux!! Yes they do not...More
You're already in the Granville Island Market- and naturally, you're looking for something to eat. As a Vancouver resident who has tried just about everything at the Market- I'd say this is top- of- the- line. Varies daily; always yummy. They didn't get full marks...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7117073-Reviews-L_Epicerie_Rotisserie_and_Gourmet_Shop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
L'artista Italian Restaurant,"This is a tiny restaurant located at the corner of E Hasting & Boundary within City of Burnaby The decoration is traditional with European cabinets, usually crowded on the weekends with family members having diner together On the weekend from nine o'clock onward they have...More
Such a beautiful spot! Rare find! Great prices, ambiance and the most pleasant staff! Food Definitely a GO TO!!!!
Have passed this restaurant thousands of times living in North Burnaby but can't recall ever dinning here, so the other night, my wife and I decided to, on the whim...and we were not disappointed. Arrived without reservations which wasn't a problem early one Wednesday evening....More
Have been going to this restaurant forever, has been a favourite. 5 of us for dinner and we've all been before. No calamari piquanti, pasta dish with prawns, the prawns over cooked and rubbery. Veal saltimbucca extremely salty. Bread skimpy.
Ordered takeout and was greeted warmly into the cozy comfortable restaurant environment. We were absolutely delighted by the food at L'artista, especially for a takeout meal. We ate until we were stuffed, couldn't get enough of the delicious sauces and perfectly prepared ingredients. I'm looking...More
New Year’s Eve 2020 - annual traditional dinner (this year take out) from this great family run restaurant in North Burnaby. Francesco et al another outstanding dinner with all our favourites: gamberoni piccante, caprese salads, Vitello Saltimboca, Vitello Parmigiana and Tiramisu... awesome as usual. Highly...More
I’ve been to this restaurant before (using the entertainment coupons) and while I’ve never been overly crazy about their food, this last meal (on my birthday, no less) was an incredible disappointment start to finish. When we arrived, I discovered that I was the only...More
My wife and I use to love this restaurant but since ownership changed so has the food...it is still good, above average for the price point but not nearly as good as it use to be. Seafood antipasto is still excellent as is the clams...More
We had not been to L'artista for many many years.. Well, we won't repeat that mistake. The setting is warm, pleasant, you can have a conversation, the service is great and the food is delicious. Two of us had to bring left-overs home (which were...More
We have been going here for 20 years. The food is always well prepared and served in generous portions. The nice staff genuinely appreciates our custom. Nothing fancy but feels like home.
Outstanding food and friendly service. Generous portions of home style cooking. Can’t recommend enough.
Great evening with friends in this cozy restaurant. Lots to choose from on the menu, plus several daily specials. Chicken parmigiana was perfectly prepared, and Penne Alla Pescatore was so tasty with tender squid. Looking forward to our next visit. (note that the restaurant website...More
Our veal parmigiana was the best We ever had. Recommend this restaurant as the go to spot in North Burnaby. Jerry M
Great service, excellent food, can't ask for much more! Our server was awesome, very friendly, great sense of humour and not shy to make good recommendations! Honey!! Several excellent applies, the garlic prawns, calimarri, steamed clams and the best...the Italian sausage and artichokes! Yum!! As...More
Our second visit here for a birthday dinner , this is a great neighbourhood restaurant with good friendly service , meals cooked with fresh ingredients , my veal parmigiana special was excellent , as was the mussels appetizer, other guests had various salads and pasta...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d705759-Reviews-L_artista_Italian_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
L. A. Grill and Bistro,"My new favorite hang out! They have lunch and late dinner deals that you just can’t stay away from! I had a lunch special of a Cheeseburger with Caesar salad for just 8 bucks! Then I had a New York Steak with Prawns on a...More
Food and service was great. Would tell everyone to go there.. very reasonable portions and prices. Enjoy something good for great meal out
We were seated promptly, and our server was there almost immediately. We ordered drinks, and an appetizer, which also arrived promptly. Our appy, potato skins, was served piping hot, and we feel they are some of the best we have ever eaten. When we ordered...More
Just happened finished my meeting next door ,it is rush hours , drop in to L.A Grill for a quite snacks ,I remember i did hear and read a lot of bad reviews about this restaurant , so ,perfect opportunity to check it out ,...More
The lunch specials is really a good deal but carefully choose souvlaki rather than the chicken wrap. The reason is that the wrap comes with more rice which is a lot of carbs. Avoid the caesar salad as one of their major weaknesses.
Rude, defiant, obnoxious server called Felicity. We had her on previous occasions when she was slow to comprehend orders and forgetful, but we carried on citing she may be having a bad day or a long day, But last night was different. We flagged her...More
It’s such a small restaurant and I don’t understand how the service is absolutely terrible 100% of the time. It takes nothing to greet a table within a couple minutes. It shouldn’t be 15 minutes. I made my food order and she didn’t understand so...More
The restaurant offers a certain good selection of fine dining. However, it may be slightly more expensive than expected.
My family and went to the LA grill in Richmond while we were there visiting some family, as it was central to where they lived. The location is good, and the ambience inside is really neat and inviting. That’s about where the good qualities end....More
There is more than ample off street parking. Our server (Marina) was very pleasant and helpful in navigating us though the menu, Be aware that most specials require the purchase of a beverage. I would stay away from the Caesar salad.
LA Grill offers a reasonably nice meal at a very modest price. True the portions are a bit smaller but what does one expect for a meal that doesn't break the bank. My experience is that the specials that require you to purchase a drink...More
Our family got together this evening for dinner to celebrate my sons 14th birthday. Very reasonable prices . Simply tasty meals ! Monday night special Is a 6oz stake for $8.95!!! Great deal! Cozy and comfortable dinning experience. Will 100% return for a cozy comfy...More
The price is reasonable and the food and service are fine too! The location has a lot of parking space available.
Admittedly LA Grill serves meals at moderate prices. Staff members are always polite and courteous. My complaints are only two, to avail yourself to the specials one is required to purchase a beverage and secondly it would appear that the pasta is heated in a...More
A friend of mine recommended this place for the great specials. Thought i’d give it a try... They have the $5.95 lunch specials and $8.95 dinner specials, but you do have to buy a drink. Not a bad deal, non alcoholic drinks are $2 so...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d3773557-Reviews-L_A_Grill_and_Bistro-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
LIFT Bar Grill View,"If you are in Vancouver and want an amazing dining experience, we highly recommend Lift Bar and Grill. We dined here for supper on June 3, 2023, and absolutely loved the atmosphere as well as the food! Waterfront dining (they provide indoor/outdoor and roof top...More
An amazing view and waterfront experience if you sit outside. You have a pier-like seat almost right on the water. The halibut main course was excellent. Great service.
We loved the place and the dinner. A very good friend recommended the place to us. We sat on the terrace, in front of the sunset… amazing. We had fried prawns to share (really good) and then I had the Signature Salad. I really enjoyed...More
Best ever prawn cocktail! Tender large prawns cooked to perfection. Pages of specialty cocktails. Friendly and attentive staff.
An absolutely awesome place! We loved every minute Visited with some friends and everything was fabulous The location is gorgeous with lovely views across the marina The staff were excellent and so helpful Food was to die for. We had prawns and beef carpaccio to...More
Excellent views of the harbour. Great ambience and very tasty halibut and fries. We ate upstairs in the shade under an umbrella. Shade mandatory on a sunny day if you want to be comfortable
Amazing view, excellent burger, and tempura prawns, one of the waterfront place in Vancouver, loud American crowd debarking from cruise ships.
We had an amazing Mother's Day brunch here! The view was breathtaking, the service was impeccable and the food options were diverse and delicious! Would highly recommend this place to anyone looking to dine for a special occasion!
We were visiting Vancouver and was looking for a fun place to dine while overlooking the marina. As we walked in, we found that we could sit at the bar and still have a great view of the Harbour. We soon found that Chef Chris...More
Outstanding birthday dinner. The service was impeccable and the food was delicious. So grateful we chose this restaurant!
Lift is one of the few exceptions I've found to the rule that a great location means mediocre food and service. Built out over the water in Vancouver's Coal Harbour, the views out the floor to ceiling windows are spectacular from virtually every seat in...More
We walked from our hotel to this nearby restaurant and wow, we are so glad we did. We knew it would have nice entrees to choose from but the ambiance was nicer than I expected and the service was absolutely amazing. The server asked if...More
Every nonoccupied table covered in dirty dishes Literally 12 people in the restaurant with 12 lined up waiting to be seated - because 80% of tables not bussed Got an order in 30 minutes after being seated Food arrived cold 30 minutes after ordering Had...More
Was there last night for Happy Hour! Ref truck lager was fine! It’s just price! But the Halbut and Chips was a joke, there was 3-4 oz of fish. I know it was a 1 piece fisH FOR $20 less 20% but the the portion...More
An awful matridee who didn’t seat us for 10 mins, whilst she set a table in an empty restaurant. She slammed the please wait here sign down in front of us, when we were sick of waiting and went to the bar to order a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d686665-Reviews-LIFT_Bar_Grill_View-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Buca,"Really enjoyed our dinner at this small restaurant. Doesn't look like much from the outside, but the interior is charming. Our server was fantastic, really helpful on guiding through the menu options (changes daily) and wine list (will be changed soon from the current Italian...More
Went in for dinner with my girlfriend a couple nights ago. We had stuffed zucchini flowers, home made ravioli and striploin. Beautiful flavours, good service. Would highly recommend. You can tell they are all working hard to deliver a peak experience in spite of current...More
Never fails this restaurant. Consistency is the key. Fresh, well prepared food. Good wine list as well. Great service. Small and cozy. I recommend for any occasion. Fab desserts as well. All in house.
We were looking for a place near out B&B and found this little place. Nice homey atmosphere and not too terribly loud. The service was excellent, friendly and knowledgeable, and the food was great. I had ling cod on small pearl pasta with clams in...More
Enjoyed a wonderful dinner with friends. Small tables, casual atmosphere and a very creative approach. This was an opportunity to try some interesting riffs on traditional Italian food. Everything was beautifully prepared. Fresh pasta was excellent. Rabbit Ragu was tasty. The scallops were beautiful and...More
I went with a couple of friends and really enjoyed it. The staff were friendly, the food was incredible and I love that you can bring your own wine. The corkage fee was $30 so a great bonus! We did family style, shared stuffed figs...More
Food is excellent and service fantastic. A great evening celebrating our 12th wedding anniversary. Highly recommend the 5 course or family tasting menu!
I've had pretty well everything on the regular menu (try beef cheeks, short ribs, the fish, pasta dishes) so tried a halibut off the daily board. Perfectly done, never overcooked like most restaurants. Also, it's the sauces here. The Caesar salad is something to try...More
Very nice neighborhood restaurant with interesting , tasty food and cocktails. Could have made payment simpler by separating bills for group of 7 individuals.
The atmosphere is great, the service is great, the food is good, but I was disappointed by the tiny portions, given the prices. I know all food prices have gone up in local restaurants, but I expected more food for my money.
In our view this is one of the best restaurants in Vancouver. Small, excellent service and wonderful food with many daily specials and a fantastic regular menu. Great wine list and wonderful environment. Make a reservation.
My family's favourite spot to celebrate special occasions, or just to have a phenomenal meal and spend time together. The service and quality is unparalleled. After spending a delicious week in Italy it was easier to fly home knowing I can have the same quality...More
I'm a foodie and now I'm able to recommend the best Italian restaurant in Vancouver. Daily specials are delicious and creative. Stuffed zucchini flowers stole the day but then there was the halibut with clams and the artichoke ravioli.. Yummo.. deelish...
Located near Macdonald St and Alamein St. a lovely small restaurant. We made a reservation for early on a Saturday and it filled up quickly. Make sure you do make a reservation if you can, especially on weekends. We had two Aperol spritz $11 each)...More
This tiny restaurant is close to home and a respite for discerning people. Exquisite food, a little noisy... but forgiveable. Service is fine; attention to details is spot on; and is beautiful to the eye, a veritable sensory delight with portions to please. Love the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d788713-Reviews-La_Buca-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Casita Mexican Restaurant,"A lot of restaurants around gastown closed early so ended up at La Casita but was not dissapointed with the food. We did have to wait a bit to get a table and for the food however food was all really good and good portion...More
Wasn’t our first choice but so glad we ended up here. It was wonderful. The decor and music were delightful. The menu was varied, authentic and very reasonably priced. The food was cooked to perfection and the portion large. The absolute best thing about La...More
We were in Vancouver for a few days and walking around Gas Town area and seen this place on the corner.....decided to give it a shot as we both enjoy Mexican. Nice atmosphere inside - typical Mexican decor and feel. Service was o.k. - very...More
The food and drinks are Ok but be warned go at your own risk as they do not follow any PHO, people walking around with no masks, guests arriving with no masks. The tables are so close together that we rushed our dinner to leave...More
Some of us liked our food, others didn't. The chicken tacos were not very good - dry. Beef enchiladas - pretty good. Chimichangas, good. We liked the mango margaritas.
Customer service good. The food really bad. Food was over price, the plates presentation poor, food was salty and over seasoned. We ordered chips, tortilla soup, chicken fajitas and ceviche. Not recommended.
I had the baja fish tacos 🌮, and everything on the plate was bland. The fish was overly battered and likely was pre frozen, with the taco lacking any zip or flavour. I had to douse them with the salsa they served (with the requisite...More
The food was so bad, the chicken was over cooked The taste was like artificial flavours Just the owner was so kind
Came here for lunch on a rainy cold Monday. Ordered the enchiladas chicken suiza. It was very good and not too spicy. i asked specifically for the least spicy flavor. Really liked the sauce on the enchiladas. Hot food, average portion. Sort of on the...More
We went to La Casita last night for dinner and enjoyed the food and ambience. But it became apparent they are not following the Covid safety regulations which was a shock to us. The staff wore masks and there was sanitizer on the tables, but...More
There were 4 of us and all our meals were plentiful, delicious and authentic. The margaritas were great also. Service was very good. We will definitely be back!
Fantastic fresh mexican food! Very fresh and Flavorful. Great service and open late. Well with a visit!
Friendly place. The attention was great and then food an A+. Don’t miss out on this place If you visit Vancouver
Came here with friends with a reservation. Excellent prices and portion sizes, cheesy dip appetizer, fuantas were bomb. Margaritas were just right and they do a JUMBO sized drink, which we got of course. Prompt table service, very friendly place with great vibes.
Took my family here for dinner and we had a great time. The drink specials were great, the food was tasty and the service was efficient. We will be back.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d802609-Reviews-La_Casita_Mexican_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Forchetta,"Two visits in one to this restaurant. Our first and last. If you want bad food and noisy ambience this place is for you. This is probably the worst dining experience we've had in many years. How could an Italian restaurant make a bad pizza?...More
Thought the worst could happen to yet another restaurant having to close its doors. Saw no activity there when passing by numerous times...so I had to stop to see what was going on.... Turns out...with a sigh of relief....that they have closed for Summer Vacations...More
We were 5 people and had the best, light pizza! The owners were on the premises and very cordial and welcoming.
On Tuesday April 12th, we have had a wonderful dinner at La Forchetta. We were pleasantly surprised to see this true gem in North Burnaby. The restaurant has a pleasant vibe the moment you go in. It is very clean, modern and welcoming. There is...More
Going through the busy Hastings street almost every day I have never noticed this gem of a restaurant before. My friends and I were looking for something in this area we hadn´t tried before and decided to go for it as the menue looked interesting....More
Another wonderful dinner at LaForchetta, this time we brought our best friends to celebrate my birthday..keeping with C19 protocols. Service was great..all entres were fabulous, tasted great and prepared to perfection. Loved it all...
I've had dinner at La Forchetta on three occasions over the last year and every time, it has been a wonderful experience. Their Pasta Carbonara is absolutely delicious. The service is always friendly, gracious, helpful, and knowledgeable. The restaurant is well decorated, comfortable, and has...More
It is one of the best home made pasta dishes in Vancouver , ,Unassuming entrance not the most well come sign ,but inside the decor very spacious and bright very relax atmosphere , menu not too over size , lot of selections , safety guidelines...More
I came in during the week, came in waited for someone to come out and never happened. I decided to try it again, I order Burrata and it has 6 pieces in half of the small tomatoes. Then I asked for the Lamb Chops and...More
We dined here on Thursday night. The place was busy even during Covid which was nice to see. I’d also like to add that the staff did a great job of handling Covid procedures while still making us feel very comfortable. We’ve dined out at...More
La Forchetta was a happy discovery in North Burnaby. Easy parking, stylish and bright decor. Our server was a really helpful guide to navigating the menu options. We had the calamari in tomato sauce special appetizer, which was amazing - unbelievably tender, delicious sauce. Pastas...More
Cute modern but cosy restaurant. Friendly people. Been wanting to go for a long time but due to Covid-19 we had to postpone our dinner. Finally managed to try it out and we had a lovely time. Not rushed in any way so it was...More
This neighborhood restaurant is a hidden gem in Burnaby. The atmosphere is lively but professional. Clean, bright, modern, and comfortable. The service is friendly and attentive but a bit rushed to turn the table. Understandable on a busy Saturday night. The food, especially the pastas,...More
Saw this 'new' place opened a while ago, from what once another restaurant and decided to give them a try. Well,.. we were not disappointed. Made reservations in advance which was a good idea on a Saturday nite. Warm reception and 'fairly' cozy environment. The...More",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d19339195-Reviews-La_Forchetta-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
La Galleria Delicatessen,"I've been buying a delicious sandwich from this deli for twenty years now and it's still as good as ever. Fresh bread, fresh roasted chicken, roasted red peppers...etc. Can't beat it. And I think that the line of people every day must agree with me....More
I've visited La Galleria on and off since childhood, and they've not disappointed with their sandwiches. It's definitely on the pricey side, but the value and taste you get in return makes up for it! Chicken and vegetarian are popular choices, and you can also...More
Wonderful small sandwich shop in Edgewood village ... Selection of 10 sandwiches freshly made on their awesome baguettes .. A little pricey but worth it
This is simply the best little sandwich deli on the North Shore! As there is always a long line up, I usually order by phone and then just pop in for pick up. I have tried most of the selections on their sandwich board with...More
Certainly not a fine dining experience, but when you see the lineup out the door at lunch time, you know that there must be something interesting inside! There is small menu of a handful of sandwiches, (my favorite is prosciutto with roasted red paper and...More
This little place is tucked away on a side street and the store front is away from the street...so easy to miss. However, ask any locals and they'll tell you this is probably the best place to get a sandwich. So, off I trod soaking...More
The only compliant I have about Galleria is that they're not open on Sunday's. There is always a line up because all of their sandwiches are amazing. The baguettes are perfect and their secret sauce which I suspect is really just a combination of mayo...More
La Galleria is most famous with the locals for their sandwiches. SImply made but absolutely delicious, I recommend the roasted chicken. I often bring friends and family here for a quick lunch, they are always unimpressed when I suggest sandwiches but blown away once they...More
Nice place for a quick sandwich with limited seating outside. Sandwiches were freshly made to order and all good. Not really a Deli in the European sense....quite a few large cans of Italian Tomatoes etc seem more like shop dressing than items for sale.
Bustling lunch service. Expect to wait, but if local, you'll likely meet friends in line to talk to. I have eaten every sandwich they make; all good. Large portions. 2 can easily split a sandwich. No seating!
The long lines at lunchtime tell you the story before you dine. You are in for a delightful sandwich! Prepared to order on freshly baked mini baguettes these sandwiches are superb and always satisfy. They are always plump and made with high quality deli meats....More
This sandwich shop in Edgemont Village is a treat, and worth visiting for lunch if you are in the area. The vegetarian sandwich is absolutely delicious, and I'd recommend combining it with chicken as well. My only concern is that the sandwiches can be pricey,...More
I went here with a friend as he swears by the sandwiches here. I ordered a chicken Sandwich. It was very good but nothing overly specials. Chicken tasted like a rotisserie chicken you would get from Costco. Bread was delicious and crunchy. Good place to...More
This place is extremely busy at lunch time, and there is a reason for that. The sandwiches are fantastic and very reasonably priced. Don't go into the Subway just down the street in Edgemont Village, step into La Galleria and you will thoroughly enjoy one...More
This deli is lined up - always. And, for good reason. The food is superb and fresh and the cost is minimal for the quality ingredients you receive.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d5068332-Reviews-La_Galleria_Delicatessen-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Glace,"We came to take out sushi next door and decided to get ice cream here for dessert. We chose a raspberry and a vanilla. Both were delicious and rich. Like the decor. I recommend this place.
This was the best ice cream I’ve ever had in Vancouver. The flavour selection was exquisite, and it tasted great. They also had great meringues available for purchase, which were also delicious. The decor inside was very nice and fancy. I will definitely come back!
This was hands down the very worst ice cream I have ever tried to eat. I did NOT eat it. I ordered coffee toffee and a second flavor of their choice. What I received was 2 scoops of some other kind of coffee ice cream...More
We tried La Glace out after seeing them on Facebook, and we loved our visit. the ice cream flavours are really different and I am looking forward to trying out more of them. This time, I tried the carrot cake flavour, which was delicious and...More
La Glace is exquisite...beautiful décor and delicious ice cream, with not your usual flavours. This time had a rose flavored sorbet and well as the strawberry pink peppercorn ice cream. Next time will have their 'flight' of flavours. The only thing that I would change...More
May be the best ice cream I have ever had. Had black forest and creme caramel and they were awesome. Highly recommended.
Went to this lovely little shop with my wife in July , didn’t have room for too much but had a few samples thought they were good. Bought some pints when we were there had the mocha a couple weeks ago and the chocolate tonight....More
Absolutely delicious ice cream, unique flavours that you don’t normally find in Vancouver ice cream stores. We tried coco pandan gelato (very light and refreshing), rose lychee and leche flan (caramel lime) - all fantastic! Will definitely go back to try their other artisinal offerings....More
We saw the owner interviewed in BCTV a local News Station where La Glace is participating the 2019 Chocolate Festival and the place looks very inviting, We were not disappointed. Enjoy.
An elegant little gem hidden away in a residential neighborhood. Love their containers and their color scheme. And of course, the ice cream which is some of the best I have ever tasted. Vancouver is full of great places to visit and this is one...More
My son had a birthday while we were visiting family in Vancouver. He requested an ice cream cake and at the last minute, we reached out to La Glace. Turns out that ice cream cakes are a planned addition to their menu and they agreed...More
Ice-cream should be fun. That’s my working thesis. In la glacé the product is sophisticated - it’s top quality actually. The decor might have worked beautifully for a Parisian style salon de thé but it’s wasted on ice-cream. When children are being marshalllee around delicate...More
What a lovely place La Glace is...one is transported to Paris! It has a wonderful décor, crisp and fresh. Limited flavours, but wow, what unique ones they have. Also lovely that they will allow you to have one scoop of ice cream, but have two...More
Folk tend to be pretty routinized about where they go for ice cream and such. Many sleepwalk to the well-established eastside places that have been around for a long time and offer a zillion flavours of this and that. If you are on of those...More
This place has been on my list of places that I want to check out in Vancouver for a long time, and I only wish I had come earlier! It's in the Kits area/on the way to UBC, but well worth the trip. The inside...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12674798-Reviews-La_Glace-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Mezcaleria,"We went for the mezcal, as the selection is impressive compared to most restaurants. The initial impression is quite favourable, friendly staff and a hip place. After a few moments, the reality sets in- cheap interior in need of a good scrub with pinesol, space...More
I had seen this restaurant recommended in the Sunday Telegraph newspaper in the UK and as I was visiting Vancouver , I made a reservation several weeks before. I have a serious dairy allergy and I can be very ill if i eat anything containing...More
It was about 2:30pm on a Saturday and we were hungry. Walking down Commercial we decided to try La Mezcaleria, having read great reviews on it. It did NOT disappoint! Hibiscus infused gin & tonic was refreshing, and the rib steak tacos were so flavourful...More
I went for lunch with 2 friends. We each had a fish taco which was very good. We shared churros for desert. The staff is good although it always seem to take some time for them to take your order. One staff member, that looked...More
I made a reservation by mistake and cancelled the same day, so I could make my reservation for the next week. They charged $50 on my credit card because I cancelled the same day of that reservation. When I asked for a refund they put...More
A hip Mexican eatery. We enjoyed it. A little on the expensive side for some of the dishes and portions are not big, but overall a great atmosphere. Would definitely go back next trip to Vancouver.
We’ve been a group of 8 and one child for dinner. For the price what we paid we didn’t received anything special. The food was average and cold, and portions small compared with the prices. We paid 125$ for two people and we eat 1...More
The food was good, nothing spectacular even if the bill was $300 for four. The service was stretched during happy hour, just great after that. The mixed drinks were great, the guacamole superb. Mains were just good. Avoid happy hour, the place will be in...More
Fast seating was followed by fast service from a friendly and knowledgeable server. Had the pork crackling chichirraron which was amazing: two huge pieces served with a trio of salsas and a bowl of pico da gallo. My main was the lamb shank, accompanied by...More
We were a large group of friends and family that went for dinner. The service was great and all staff were very friendly. This added to a wonderful atmosphere and enjoyment for all of us. The advice given on the menu was really helpful. We...More
This is a very cool place. The service was good. The drinks were very good and worth the price. The steak tacos were my favorite. But standard tacos. I would definitely go back for their cocktails!!!!!
I have been dining sporadically at Mezcal since day 1, I cannot believe I haven't done a review on here. It's my go-to on ""the Drive"" when I feel like some tacos or melted cheese. It's a cozy, stylish joint. Happy hour is great if...More
This used to be my favourite restaurant but I find that it has gone downhill. It is not as clean feeling and the food sometimes comes on the cool side, and it just has lost its spark. Too bad cause it was really good but...More
Enchiladas, disgusting. No way like a couple of years ago. Rice old. Tacos, cold, obviously one day old or more. Dessert, Three Leches, bad. I’m not going back at all to this place. Shade.
We recently came here one night whilst staying in Vancouver. It was rammed but they managed to squeeze us in at the end of the bar. This place has such an amazing atmosphere, its cozy, warm, welcoming and just sitting at the bar to have...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4272949-Reviews-La_Mezcaleria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Notte Restaurant,"Very quaint and the live piano music made it a perfect evening out. The young staff was so friendly and quite efficient. The meal serving was generous and tasty.
Last Saturday we returned to La Notte for another tasty dinner before heading on to the VSO. We discovered La Notte relatively recently, (about 3-4 years ago), and have enjoyed their meals immensely. The atmosphere is casual; there is a weekend piano player and the...More
W are new to this neighborhood. Happy to have discovered this Italian restaurant. Good food, good service , excellent choice of wine. Nice atmosphere.
My first night and first meal in Vancouver. We all enjoyed our meals 2 pizzas and 3 pasta dishes. Our deserts chocolate cake and cheesecake were not bad. The ladies had wine and the gents had beer. Service friendly and efficiant. Price reasonable. Piano player...More
Me and my sister took our dad and her father in law for a Father’s Day dinner last night. This place has been around for decades and is a friendly local Italian neighbourhood restaurant that I have passed by everyday while taking the bus to...More
Apologies if I messed that up (Delicious! Loved the ambience!); got the translation from google. Figured it'd have more dramatic effect doing it in Italian. It's true though - the veritable feast the three of us shared: the two insalata's: cesare and della casa, their...More
Pasta is of course the house specialty with generous servings, however there are other great dishes of veal as well, friendly servers and nice casual atmosphere, it won't dissapoint
wonderful service and delicious food and they went out of their way to get me fruit for dessert when i couldnt have the sweet desserts.
This restaurant has been around for decades and I frequently drive by wondering if it is any good. Recently I had tickets to see a show on the UBC campus so I was looking for somewhere for an early dinner in the vicinity. Seemed like...More
La Notte is a casual family restaurant offering delicious Italian food which is reasonably priced. They have cheap pasta every Tuesday and a 3 course set menu every Thursday if you want. As an added bonus there is a piano player every weekend which really...More
Friendly staff and clearly the restaurant is a popular spot. Mostly Italian cuisine. Limited offer of gluten free options doesnt make this an exciting place to visit if you are celiac. The plating is a bit boring, and the decor is quite bland. Staff is...More
This was a great surprise find in the neighbourhood where I was staying. Had a delicious meal of veal scallopini in a lemon wine sauce with great vegetables. Cooked perfectly......had some tiramisu and a glass of port to finish. All was fantastic and the atmosphere...More
A great restaurant with lovely touches such as live music and lovely decor. The restaurant is spacious and the tables large so you don’t feel crammed in, like most restaurants when you have more than two people. The staff were friendly and food was delicious....More
Whenever the parents are in town, we love to go with them to this restaurant. The food is very good and the staff always attentive and helpful. Would definitely recommend keeping this on your list of options if your looking for Italian food in the...More
This restaurant is a rare gem in Vancouver in that staff & owners take a personal interest in their customers, even remembering our names. Consistently great food and a real feel of community. We’ve been coming here for 7 years and have always come away...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2483458-Reviews-La_Notte_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Piazza Dario Ristorante Italiano,"I frankly do not understand the last three reviews of this restaurant. My partner and I dined with our nephew and his wife yesterday evening, and had a wonderful time. The service was superb; three servers took good care of us. Our main waiter was...More
I live in the neighborhood and this place has gone down hill service wise. 100% would not recommend. The food quality has gotten better, and I’d like to be supportive of a local restaurant but the service has been consistently bad that I now feel...More
We were excited to eat as a family of 4 with an infant yesterday at Dario's. We specifically went early at 5pm knowing that the restaurant would not be busy at that time and was thoroughly disappointed with their service. We were greeted by an...More
Thanks for taking the time to review. It seems like you have lots of it. Reviewing your evening with staff and our cameras that we have on site your arrival was earlier than 5pm. We open for service then. As you were a walk-in, we...More
Attended this restaurant on Sat Nov 19/22 to celebrate my husbands birthday. This was the first time 8 of us attended this restaurant.. this restaurant has always been on our bucket list ....we were all looking very forward to this dining out experience but our...More
The title says it all. We like to come here to celebrate a special occasion and have never been disappointed. We were welcomed in and served well even though it was a very busy Saturday night. The servings were delicious and beautifully presented. And the...More
This restaurant, La Piazza Dario in the Italian Cultural Centre is owned by Chef Claudio Ranallo. Their website expansively emphasizes his history of having started working there in 1979 and soon rising to become Head Chef Claudio and now celebrating his 42nd year. Well I...More
Small group of us had dinner. Food good but not spectacular. I liked the ambiance...comfortable upscale restaurant. Service very good even though a busy evening. I thought the dishes a little on the expensive side although it has been a while since we have been...More
The smell brought me here. Walked in the place, my first reaction was ""intresting full of personalty decore, I felt like I was in Italy"" , cozy, perfect temprtuer and super clean. That's including the washroom cleaner than some five stars hotels. I ordered an...More
Tiny portions, terrible table and service and when we asked if they have a child’s portion cheesy pasta they said yes, the bill they charged us 23 dollars for a tiny bowl of noodles! Arrogant waitress/owner. Never returning
La Piazza Dario Ristorante, Vancouver, B.C. Arrogant, callous, off-hand, unthoughtful and COVID-19 unsafe • I made this reservation many days ago and confirmed the booking yesterday. • The reservation was for my wife, our daughter, her two sons (aged 7 & 3) and myself. •...More
We were a group of sixteen seated at two long tables. We were able to order individually off the menu and at the end of a very good and leisurely evening to pay individually as well. The staff were attentive without hovering, ample bread baskets...More
The staff at La Piazza Dario served our large party of 16 efficiently and attentively. Our water glasses were filled many times, extra sauce brought out quickly and enough bread for everyone. The pasta portions were large and several people had to take part of...More
Server overcharged us for wine. He tried to upsell us to 6 oz. glass to 9oz. When we refused he was not happy. He had already been rude because he felt we were too slow in ordering. My first time here I probably won’t be...More
We walked in and immediately the hostess asked for our Covid Vaccination Records, which we were happy to provide. We were seated at a very nice table and our server came over advised us of the specials and took our drink orders. The food was...More
Is your review about the covid regulations or about how you meal was? Your title is very confusing. Not once did you state in your review that your meal was highly priced. It’s just there to give people the wrong impression. As for the vaccine...More
The veal with lemon and wine sauce is mediocre as not tasty and very small portion of mashed potatoes. This dish did cost 28$ so pass on that one dish. Probably luckier in choosing a pasta dish! Our table did not have a white cloth...More
Hello, I'm sorry you didn't enjoy your meal but you did eat all of the dish and never said anything when I asked how everything was. As for the tablecloth, I did not answer you that"" I don't have a proper tablecloth for that table""....More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707939-Reviews-La_Piazza_Dario_Ristorante_Italiano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Quercia,"As former Vancouverites who have traveled extensively around the world, have lived outside of North America, and eaten a broad range of food, my sister and I were looking forward to dinner at an upscale authentic Italian restaurant. Sadly, we left with less $$ in...More
Each dish was simply great, we enjoyed the entire meal from antipasti to cheese and dessert. Definitely, it’s hard to find a better place in Canada. ago. Warm, welcoming service and detailed explanation of the Authentic Italian excellent food, well prepared using good local ingredients,...More
We live in Europe, we know Italian food very well, and it was an amazing surprise to experience such great food and the atmosphere in Vancouver. From starters to desserts, everything was delicious. I had the best “Tirami su” in my whole life! Couldn't believe...More
Very good food but our mid-week dining experience felt rushed. Server seemed impatient and just wanted us to order, eat and leave. Total time in the restaurant after ordering was 65 minutes. It was our anniversary but no recognition of the occasion. Since covid, the...More
So I end up in this little neighbourhood Italian restaurant that one could easily miss if you blinked at the wrong time - thankfully my partner knew about it and said I couldn't miss trying it out. She was VERY correct. We decided to get...More
Thank you for the review. We are really pleased to hear that you enjoyed your dining experience and we hope to see you soon.
The various courses we shared were absolutely delicious, accompanied by knowledgeable service. The cocktails and wine were pretty fine too. I thought the wine prices were a tad over the top as even fairly standard (albeit good) wines wee expensive. Everyone really enjoyed our dinner...More
Absolutely the best food we've experienced for a long time. Not only in Canada. Would love to try the other restaurant in Sunshine Coast.
Thank you for the review. We are really pleased to hear that you enjoyed your dining experience. We are looking forward to see you at the Upper Deck on the Sunshine Coast.
What a great dinner we had! The family style menu was perfect. Thank you for having us, all my team loved it. The private room for 10 people is a good option for private event. I can wait to go back.
Thank you for your review. We are really pleased to hear that you and your guests enjoyed your dining experience. We hope to see you soon
A colleague who teaches at UBC recommended this small quaint restaurant when we visited from California. We ordered the chefs menu for 2 and decided to be surprised with whatever was placed before us. We were delighted with the tasting menu. We had 5 courses...More
I was reminded recently of just how good the food is at La Quercia. As far as I'm concerned, all other Italian restaurants are second place to this restaurant. Constantly, we find ourselves back. Why? Because the menu is constantly changing, to different regions of...More
Went for a special birthday dinner. Had called and asked twice before we went if there were vegetarian options and was told yes. When we arrived, only one vegetarian dish was available on the menu and it wasn't something I wanted. I asked if they...More
For a special birthday dinner this was a disappointment. None of the staff wore masks. They’re now “optional”, but this was well below our comfort zone. Staff was in close proximity at various points through dinner...ordering, serving. Food was below expectations, especially the suckling pig...More
Thank you for your review.We are sorry to hear that you did not feel comfortable during your dinner we wish you mentioned that when you were there. We did not have any other negative feedback from any of our customer,masks are not mandatory and since...More
My wife and I were delighted when we discovered many years ago La Quercia. Since then we've had fond memories on a few visits. In many ways we liked to call it our favorite restaurant. Recently, we visited and the experience was underwhelming. The service...More
We made a dinner reservation at this restaurant because we were fully aware of their attention to the Covid Requirements..we were fully at ease upon our arrival.. the evening was a grand success as our food was very top quality..we started with a pre-dinner drink...More
Thank you for the review. We are really pleased to hear that you enjoyed your dining experience and felt safe.
I knew I would like La Quercia before I even tasted a delicious morsel from its kitchen. Watching co-owners & partners, Lucais Smye & Adam Pegg work on getting the space ready to open was enough to know what was likely in store. The two...More
Thank you for taking the time to write a review during this challenging time. We hope to see you soon for some food to go",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1390791-Reviews-La_Quercia-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Taqueria,"The flavours in the Burrito Asada were very good. I found that it could have used a bit of sauce or something, personally, as I did find it a tiny bit dry. The Churros were excellent. This is a small restaurant.
Overall pretty bad experience unfortunately. Cheap ingredients and very overpriced. Took a long time for our food to come with only 2 other people in the restaurant and when it did, they served me a meat dish when I ordered and specified that I was...More
We went for their happy hour and had super delicious margaritas. The food was phenomenal. The fish tacos are amongst the best we’ve had. Would 100% come back.
3 tacos each and a small soft drink came to over $50 for 2, without tips in a run down area of Hastings st. For a basic eatery this was too much. The place is designed for a quick meal/ turnaround with bar stool chairs...More
We had them cater our sons wedding of 150 people and everything was amazing. The chips and salsa appetizer and the delicious variety of tacos. Many of our guests commented on how delicious their food was and the staff was so friendly and worked so...More
I stopped by here quickly for lunch. Not the fastest place for a lunch break but the food was amazing. I will definitely be going back!
The restaurant is small, but very cozy. Food is not too expensive and very tasty. Also, they have margaritas on tap that is a must try if you visit. Highly recommend this place!
Cool water bottle at the table, great atmosphere, knowledgeable & friendly staff, delicious & well-priced food and interesting options for spirits. Highly recommended!
My friend and I were in town for a music festival, and desperately needed a full meal. The place was hopping! The food was very good and service was as well.
This is my go to taco place, absolutely love it. If you are in the area it is a definitely a must stop.
This place is going downhill. Table service is horrid. We waited 20 minutes for a rude waiter to take our order. They no longer offer the nice little pickled veggies or other salsas, so you are left with your tacos as is. The wait staff...More
Big menu. Tacos are ""tapas"" size and priced/taco. We tried 4 different tacos, 1 quesadilla and chips and pico de gallo. Everything was very good. Freshly prepared. We had one classic margarita and one mezcal? margarita. The classic was better imo. Everything was reasonably priced....More
I was meeting up with a group before a show an we decided to go here. I love La Taqueria I have been to other locations but, the first time here. First off make a reservation as this is a cozy little location. Service was...More
Pleasant surprise to find La Taqueria's food so tasty and enjoyable! Glad I didn't let previous not-so-good Mex experiences stop me eat here, had a great taco meal! The variety and tastiness makes for a great experience!
Came here during happy hour and was not disappointed! The tacos were delicious, flavorful and surprisingly cheap. Would recommend the tuna taco and the guacamole which is probably the best we had ever had! The local beer and margarita are definitely worth a try as...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2461209-Reviews-La_Taqueria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Taqueria Pinche Taco Shop,"The tacos are good but the restaurant owners have to be joking with the prices for what is basically a stand up taco joint in an industrial area. $4 plus for each taco is insane when the taco lasts two bites. Maybe the instagram crowd...More
We had take-out Mexican food from La Taqueria. The fish taco is huge and very good. Highly recommended if you are looking for good Mexican food in Vancouver.
The food was fantastic! The restaurant was a fun atmosphere. The happy hour menu was delicious - and the churros were the best! A fun family night out!
We've been to La Taqueria in Victoria and we looking forward to taking my in-laws to the location in North Vancouver. I'll admit, upon arriving it wasn't what I'd expected. The restaurant is in an industrial area and there is limited seating. While the food...More
I had two burritos in Vancouver just a little over 12 hours apart and they couldn't have been more different. The first one was from a little tiny hole in the wall in a nondescript small strip mall. This place is called Vallarta's and it's...More
Great casual restaurant for real Mexican Food. Everything is truly delicious, service is quick and friendly!
Friendly advice and the burritos are terrific I love the prawn burrito good prices and delicious food. However they should have more accessible washrooms though especially for the handicapped you have to walk around the entire building to get into the washroom
It’s good to know people. Good people share great ideas. It’s important to have friends and to be good friends to people who eat out, often. In general, you should always be kind to others as you would want to be treated kindly. Like, Karma....More
My wife had heard this place was good so we popped in with the kids. FANTASTIC tacos. With taste and seasoning. We’ve eaten lots of tacos in lots of places and these are definitely some of the best we’ve had. For those with less adventurous...More
The baja and the Cabo were our fav. Asada was very good as well and I loved the lengua ones with the green sauce, they did quite a good job on that green sauce compared to the original lengua tacos in Guadalajara. We didn’t try...More
Get there early or else you’ll be drooling in the lineup as other people’s yummy orders passes by. I came here with my coworkers who raved about this hidden gem. And they were right! It was hopping busy at lunchtime so we had to wait...More
I stumbled across this little spot while in North Vancouver. It's in an industrial area, so I didn't even realize it was there. It is nothing fancy, just a few stand up type tables, and the food prep area, but boy, the food is delicious....More
We had several tacos for lunch here and they were absolutely amazing! We were impressed with the flavours, spices and texture of the various tacos we had. I recall the Cabo taco being the standout for me but they were all really good. La Taqueria...More
You can tell that this is real mexican food. The tacos are to die for, and the homemade horchata is amazing. 100% recommend this place to anyone looking for quality food.",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7958039-Reviews-La_Taqueria_Pinche_Taco_Shop-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Terrazza,"Excellent birthday celebration at La Terazza this weekend! I highly recommend this family owned and run restaurant! I felt like I was in Italy! The owners visited the table and offered great recommendations. everyone in our party of 8 loved their meal, Sommelier on hand...More
Food excellent, great server and very elegant setting. What is there not to like. We were very pleased to find this place serving such delicious food on our way to the Round House Skytrain stop after visiting the BC Home Show.
This place is little off the main stream location for eateries in Vancouver. This was one of the favorite places of our host so ended up here. Good food, Professional service and great ambience. Excellent selection of wines. Loved it
Each time you visit, from the first minute you walk in, until the second you walk out, this Vancouver staple makes you feel welcome and like part of their family. The food (get the rack of lamb!) and wine list are second to none. The...More
The Bolognese is the best we've ever had - world wide! It's thick and tasty, like a Sicilian sauce. Every dish is good to great. No bad tastes or sloppy cooking. It's uniformly good. Wine selection is massive. You can get almost any wine at...More
We have dined at La Terazza twice now. The food is amazing and the staff are friendly and attentive. Happy hour is great too!
The best Italian restaurant in z Vancouver. Just had the meatballs. Lasagne and bolegnese and eggplant parm. Each was one of the best anywhere. Chefs bolognese is the best in ether world. Excellent service. Old world atmosphere. Most important is everything is consistently great. Super...More
VERY DISAPPOINTED. My girlfriend and I came here pre Covid and had a wonderful time so we decided that this year to celebrate my birthday we would dine here again. We were really looking forward to dinner. However, I ended up sick and tested positive...More
If you want a classy restaurant for a special occasion, come here. If you want really tasty Italian food, come here. If you want great friendly service, come here. If you want something cheap and nasty, with loud music and bright lights, don’t come here....More
We had a fabulous experience during happy hour in the lounge. The meatballs were divine so we had to have 2 orders of those. The caprese salad was excellent and so was the pasta. All washed down with a great bottle of red. What really...More
Everything is consistently excellent. The Bolognese is the best we've ever had anywhere in the world! Osso Bucco is wonderful. Halibut tasty and flaky. Meatballs are amazing. Salads are crisp and tasty. Whatever you order here will be good. Wine list is so vas it's...More
Wonderful location, great food, beautiful atmosphere … but AWFUL service. I’m a server myself and I would never treat a guest the way my family was treated this evening. We took full advantage of the menu, ordering everything from cocktails, to a bottle of wine,...More
La Terrazza was rated one of Vancouver’s top ten Italian restaurants on a recent search. I was in the neighborhood and thought I’d try some light fare. Just happened to hit the “Happy Hour” between 5&7! I had two servings of the “Carpacio” which comes...More
We have been here quiet a while back and I remember it was very good then. Location is little off and good we tried. Very professionally run place. The drinks, food and service were all amazing. Good martinis and an amazing selection of wines. The...More
Came for dinner on a Wednesday night. They took our temperature at the door. The bar area was full but the dining room was basically empty. Their patio is still open in October which is nice. We ordered the carpaccio and oysters for appies, the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705958-Reviews-La_Terrazza-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
La Villetta Ristorante,"Non assuming location in Burnaby Heights, service is 11/10 and food 10/10 been here a few times now and they never disappoint, fresh and well made food , the fresh made bread is AMAZING, great comfy atmosphere, fair price, look forward to another visist soon
We (party of 4) visited this restaurant last evening. The service was great and servers were very attentive. We did not have reservations but we seated immediately even with the restaurant being fairly busy. This cozy, clean and comfortable restaurant was welcoming. The food was...More
Very overpriced for mediocre food. We both had beef lasagne which was very poor quality. Quite drab interior. Don't bother going!!
At La villetta we feel like at home, even the bread tastes like homemade. Teo and his team do a great job. I have organized family and work functions here and often have family dinners. This is our favourite Italian restaurant in Burnaby.
Food is always fabulous, big portions, delicious bread and dip. The Veal Scaloppini is the best! Mussels in white wine are fabulous! Been coming here for over 30 years and will continue to do so.
Went there over the weekend and caught it when it was a bit busy. Nothing fancy but has nice ambiance. They have outdoor seating (can be noisy with the traffic), the courtyard adds flavour. Different rooms (areas) to the restaurant so you can have privacy...More
My family has been coming here for years. It's a charming place. Been here for anniversaries, weddings, birthdays...larger than average dinner gatherings. Been here for small lunch dates. Either way the food has been quite good. The service has been very good as well. Seriously.....a...More
You walk through a small courtyard dining area, which can be used for outside dining in warmer weather. There is a small dining area with a bar as you walk in. Around the corner is their main dining area. The restaurant has a very authentic...More
Been coming here for years, shame on me for only writing a review now. Best Greek salad in lower mainland. You can never go wrong with any of the Chef's specials. The brandy mushroom sauce is to die for. Prawns Villetta served in rich creamy...More
I celebrated my youngest daughter's engagement by taking her and her beau to a restaurant of their choice so here we were and I was a bit uneasy as I have eaten in real italian ristorantes in Italy and they all had one thing in...More
Though we did not have a reservation we were seated and served promptly. My sister and I had a glass of wine each, shared a salad and each of us had an entree. The bill was less than $60. The food was good and the...More
We had a reservation for 7:30. Arrived on time and were seated and no one came near our table again. No water , no drinks, no menu. I tried to catch the servers eye but was totally ignored. After 25 min we got up and...More
They accommodated over 40 people for a surprise Birthday party and did not disappoint. Both the food and service were excellent. I would certainly recommend this restaurant. They did an incredible job.
We have been going to La Villetta for many years, and it the only restaurant I can say is down to earth with real good Italian food. It is small but with a real trattoria feel. The service is fantastic and the food is just...More
Whenever I want pasta I go here because it is consistently good. Nice quite restaurant and it easily accommodates just a few friends hanging out, or a large group. Authentic dishes from antipasto to mains, and bottles of wine are reasonably priced. Of course than...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d973204-Reviews-La_Villetta_Ristorante-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Lamajoun,"Went for lunch on a week day. A unique outlet at an industrial estate.You place your orders at the ground floor and your food would be sent upstairs by a pulley.You would be given a buzzer which sounds when the food is sent up. You...More
Lamajoun is located in this non descript industrial mall. The last place you would expect a restaurant. They serve fresh, homemade food to loyal customers who recognize the value. You can get a really nice meal here for under $15 for sure. Nice they also...More
Awesom place with amazing food and staff!!! It is just out of this world!!! 100% recommend🍖🍗🍩 Such a fun atmosphere. All kinds of yummy meditation food on the menu. Just the best!!!!!
We had know idea what to expect, this was our first visit. We picked a random place to have lunch and are BLOWN away. I had the bbq chicken and hubbie had the lamb. Absolutely amazing flavour and honestly were left speechless. Best food 😀...More
I had a very interesting lunch with my business associate to day , after a meeting with her , she offer me a lunch at The Lamajoun , it is Armenian food , ( I never hear this place ) but we at the area...More
I went there for the first time, the owner is very nice, I ordered lam soup, lam was cooked very well, but no test at all like puring hot water on meat,the chicken tigh bbq was ok ,but hard, also I found out the menu...More
Hole in the wall but ample parking in their plaza. Excellent service during a hectic lunch rush. Pide is the MUST and the beef kebabs were very filling. Everything made with love and the baklava is A+
We thought we might be in the wrong place when walking through the industrial area to find this place (I know most people don't usually walk here- we are new!) but it was a great little spot. We had a lamajoun and a kebab wrap...More
We searched for this place online. Found it in the middle of an industrial area. Went there to try a couple of never tried before dishes, but ended up trying everything. We enjoyed all the food so much. Too full to walk. Great food made...More
I keep going back to Lamajoun and order delicious meet and sweets to go, when I want to impress my friends and guests. And even to spoil myself.
We came with our 2 school-aged kids and enjoyed excellent service and a delicious dinner. The restaurant is located in an industrial business park and had a line out the door of people waiting for their take out orders. Very authentic dishes!
Thank you very much Dear Natalya for your awesome feedback and 5-start review. We hope to see you again soon. All the best wishes to you and your loved ones! ~ Serge
A small little restaurant with 4 tables, it gets very buys here so come early if you want to have a sit down meal. I think they mainly do catering but do offer hot food and coffee. It is located in an industrial complex along...More
Thank you so much, my friend, for the amazing feedback and review! All the best wishes to you and your loved ones. We hope to see you again soon. ~ Serge
The food is delicious! The interior is not fancy at all, but you forget about walls as soon as as you taste any dish here. The owners are so friendly, that I feel every time like I am visiting my family. And one more....the price...More
Thank you very much Dear Natalie! We are so thrilled to read such heart warming feedback! All the best wishes to you and your loved ones on behalf of Team Lamajoun! ~ Serge
We visited this place twice in a few months when in Vancouver. The food was delicious and affordable, both my 3 year old and 1 year old loved the food as did we. The owners are lovely too. I would definitely recommend this place.
Thank you so much for your amazing review and feedback! It is so nice to hear such nice comments. All the best wishes to you and your loved ones on behalf of Team Lamajoun. ~ Serge
If you looked up the term “Hidden Gem” you should see a picture of Lamajoun! I first discovered this place last year after a newspaper article featured them. And since my office is in the general vicinity, I decided to check it out. Ever since...More
Thank you so much! You have made our day. It is so great to read such amazing feedback over and over. That means our hard work is appreciated. All the best wishes to you and your loved ones. ~ Serge",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d12655891-Reviews-Lamajoun-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Landmark Hotpot House,"This place was incredibly busy. Packed with Chinese people which is always a good sign. I think we were the only white people in there although we were there with my Chinese daughter in law and her parents so maybe we don't really count. They...More
When we arrived we must have looked a little lost. Right away they showed us the menu and indicated what kind of restaurant it was! Pretty funny really. We told our waiter it was our first experience and asked for his assistance. He was great....More
Been here 3 or 4 times, and the dinner is always delicious! You must make a reservation or you won't get inside to eat. The flavour, freshness, and service is always great. Had the Japanese Wagyu, Kobe American beef, ribeye, prawn wonton, the meat ball...More
They been in the Business since later 80 ""s ,and I believe it is first hot pot restaurant open in Vancouver ,and in same location !! and still is the local number one choice for good quality and freshness hot pot ,special you have out...More
A good selection of fresh seafood on the menu. The beef was fatty, tender, and cut just right for thickness. Everything tasted fresh and clean. Server was very helpful and discouraged my attempt to over order as apparently 3 lbs of geoduck (smallest they had)...More
I have been coming to Landmark for decades and have always come back. I will admit that the interior can use a modern touch but quality of seafood, meat, and soup base remained excellent. Since I was hosting for some overseas friends, we went all...More
A popular Hong Kong style hot pot place, Landmark serves live lobsters, crabs, geoduck and BC spot prawns, among others for dipping into Hot Pot broth. It also offers a variety of sliced meat dishes, freshly minced meat balls and vegetables for a hearty meal....More
We got the live geoduck (at a reasonable price). I can see some unusual seafood in the tank as well, but our party is small so we have to refrain ourselves. Anyway, we ordered too much food. There are quite some soup base to choose...More
Hong Kong style hot pot. Very fresh beef, ox tongue and scallop. They were so good we had this three times when we were in Vancouver. This is my go-to hot pot place. A bit expensive, but I think worth every penny. My wife said...More
Very good reputation for lovers of hot pot but is quite expensive and nothing special. The really interesting item is fish ball mixed with egg white ( I think? ) and this is very difficult to make.... How about the other items: rather limited menu...More
Honestly, if you have 3/4 of the table with loud and rude tourists, why bother open the rest to normal guests. They are drunk & rude to people who are just having normal meal. Service is bad and impatience! I love the food but i...More
The Landmark Hotpot House on Cambie Street has an awesome reputation. We visited many years ago and took our friends there for a celebration dinner, taking care to book well in advance. Even so we had to wait for nearly half an hour for our...More
Could have received a better score if they didn't run out of ice cream for dessert. No substitute was even offered.
I've been enjoying this restaurant since the late 1980s, and continue to have the same great enjoyment till now. I usually come for the late night supper after dancing. The late night menu consists of a good varieties of small dishes, noodle and rice. The...More
It has been quite some time I have not visited this restaurant since they are always busy; not easy to get a seat. Finally found a table at a time surprised to me last night; perhaps due to long weekend when most people were out....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d706000-Reviews-Landmark_Hotpot_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Las Margaritas,"Our server was awesome. Didn’t catch his name but glad he was there :) Food quick, hot and quality. First time we visited. Thanks for a great experience!
Food was fantastic, service was excellent and the overall experience was well worth the visit. GF options are a plenty and the drink specials were worth the $7.
Another Ace restaurant of Vancouver. Had fond memories of visiting this place before pandemic. didnt disappoint at all. Frendly service, good food and nice ambience and very under priced. Tacos and taquitos wer excellent. Sirloin Fajitas were very tasty. Classic Margarita superb. I want to...More
Called ahead and was told they have no reservations available. Walked in around 8 and half the place was empty. We ordered food which was great, drinks were also really good. Server told us 30 mins after ordering that they’re doing last call, we checked...More
We had a few problems at the restaurant. The customer service from our female server was just mediocre. She wasn't very genuine and you could tell that for sure. Once we got our food, we were all happy, it tasted nice. What put a damper...More
We used to love coming to Las Margaritas. The food and service were always stellar, but we've noticed a marked decline in the customer service since the son took over. We tried to order take-out, including an item off the kids menu and we were...More
Have been going to las margaritas for the past 20 years - my sister and husband from out of town - its their go to place - however - we went there a few days ago.. the service was fine - the food was the...More
My friends and I went to Las Margaritas for my birthday and we had an amazing time! The hostess was very friendly and made sure to accommodate our two separate tables. We arrived just in time for happy hour. The classic margaritas were delicious. I...More
This is my partner's favourite spot in the city and he took me here for the first time back in June. Since then I have told all of my friends to check this place out. The outdoor patio is beautiful. Our waitress was incredible and...More
After trying watermelon and smokey margaritas, we may have been biased, but the cauliflower tacos, carnitas tacos, and pico de gallo (which I heard described as ""sex in a cup"") were all great.
We loved this place. Food was excellent and portions were very generous. Prices were reasonable. The overall atmosphere was fun, lively and the servers were all so sweet. The was our farewell dinner before flying home to Toronto. We sat out on the patio and...More
Las Margaritas has been around for a long time and you don’t survive in the restaurant business that long without being good. Had not been here for quite some time and was not disappointed with our lunch with friends here. Good Covid protocols in place...More
The food here was excellent just as it was as far as I can remember 39 years ago when we were last there. During these trying times they handled the Covid-19 the way it is supposed to be handled to protect the patrons and staff....More
Preface by saying we love this restaurant . But I ordered thru door dash on sincodemio. My order sent thru.. said to pick up at 4:55-505. Went inside . And it was utter chaos. Under staffed , lineup of people. My order said it was...More
We went in for a early dinner late lunch after doing a bit of window shopping on 4th. I had the Tacos Pescado - marinated and grilled salmon with all of the mexican fixins and my wife had the Asada Burrito - beef and all...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d706011-Reviews-Las_Margaritas-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Las Tortas,"I was visiting a friend who lives in the neighborhood and we were craving Mexican food. After reading the reviews online we tried this place. We walked the 10 minutes to get there and weren’t disappointed for a second! The small restaurant is incredibly quaint...More
This is a great hole in the wall with great Tortas. A little spicey and very tasty. We were also pleased to see they serve Pesole soup which we have always wanted to try. this is not close to fine dining but it has heart.
Great food, well priced and super tasty! Big portions, great atmosphere really enjoyed our experience.
I had a takeaway meal of Arrachera Tampiquena from here and it exceeded my expectations. It was not only tasty but had various textures and was of sufficient quantity. I hope to return.
We moved here three years ago and meant to go to Las Tortas. Instead, my husband kept dropping into Subway when he wanted a sandwich to bring home. What a mistake. It should be a crime in this neighbourhood when the owner of Las Tortas...More
Came in just before they closed and grabbed three sandwiches to go- they were delicious. Got back to our lodging, had a beer on the deck and enjoyed our sandwiches.
Fast service, very tasty Mexican with nice combination of herbs on salad; great tacos and cheap; had vegetarian quesadillas (4 of them) that came with good portions of salad, rice, guacamole all for 7.95! Deal! Have tried lots of Mex around town but the food...More
Understated and very very very good food. Fish Tacos and Quesadilla - fish well cooked, cabbage, guacamole - superb. Quesadilla with Oaxacan string cheese, and grilled zucchini/mushrooms (with rice and ensalada, sour cream) was out of this world. Sauces, cheeses, fresh cilantro, all abundant. Good...More
Stopped here for lunch with the kids as we were the in area. We had: - the Mexican Club Torta - very good - lots of flavor, well cooked, and quite filling. - Chips and Salsa - nicely warmed, and kids were happy - Churro...More
Excellent Tortas! the owner is a very friendly host, excellent cook and accommodating. We got a free slice of an amazing cake for my friend's birthday, will definitely come back
Incredible Mexican food would challenge or beat that served in the home country. Fantástico! We have seen this place for awhile and made a point of going. Especially after walking past the other day and staring at the person’s meal of one fantastic looking burrito....More
I can't attest for their whole menu and to be honest wasn't too keen on Mexican sandwiches but the fish burrito is delicious! The place is cute and authentic feeling. I went back for a second one this week it was so good. The only...More
There is no decor to speak of. I had the Pollo Parilla it was good with a kick of heat. It had good flavor and the price was 10.50 ...average for a lunch. The service was okay and seemed like a family run business as...More
We wanted Mexican food and Las Tortas popped up. Pleasantly surprised at the authentic menu selection. We had Tortas with chorizo and el pastor. I actually found these better than Tortas I've tried in Mexico as I found them less greasy. Great place - will...More
This spot has delicious sandwiches that are about as authentic as you can find in Vancouver. The shop makes their own habanero hot sauce which is very hot and extremely delicious. I basically go there just to have a sandwich drenched in this salsa.
Hi Jeremy Thank a lot for your review, Have you tried the Torta Ahogada? Is a pulled pork sandwich drowned in red salsa and even if you wish you can substitute the red salsa for habanero.",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1892409-Reviews-Las_Tortas-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Le Crocodile,"Hands down, one of the most superb meals I've ever had. The room was lively but not overbearing. Our server was sophisticated but not at all snooty, responsive but not intrusive. And the food -- oh my. Our halibut and tiger prawns were cooked to...More
Le Crocodile was recommended to us by a trusted friend who knew that my time in Vancouver was rather limited and that, for this reason alone, I had no time to experiment and test the culinary waters of the city. So he recommended the very...More
Finding a restaurant with good food is fairly easy. To find a restaurant that has the combination of excellent food served by an amazing wait staff is like finding a rare gem. Le Crocodile is a perfect diamond. From the moment we were seated, our...More
1. We waited approx 30 for our 8 pm reservation. Why have reservations if they are not honoured in a timely fashion. 2 The noise level was like we were sitting in the kitchen. Could not hear our conversations across the table nor could we...More
This was a real treat to be able to walk in and have the most fabulous dinner. Food was delicious, the service first class and the entire evening was one in a million. I rate this restaurant most highly, in fact my wife said it...More
We chose this restaurant to celebrate our son's graduation. We were not disappointed. A party of five, we all had appetizers ranging from escargot to vichyssoise (divine!) to bone marrow, though with with three bones the latter was really too large for one person--especially when...More
The mains were sole, scallops and lamb shank. The seafood is always cooked perfectly and so tasty. The lamb was so tasty and flavourful. Service was wonderful. The sommelier was outstanding. They recommended a superb French wine to match the seafood. Same for the lamb....More
Excellent food , excellent service. Hard pressed to find a better restaurant in vancouver, highly recommend.
We had heard good things and ventured in for a light dinner. We share two appetizers and one main course. The food was outstanding. The lobster bisque and escargot were perfectly prepared. We ordered the chicken and risotto for the main and it was more...More
The restaurant has lost its way. Even though we arrived on time, we were told to wait for 30 minutes. No offer of a drink. The food was very disappointing compared to previous visits. Stodgy accompaniments with the lamb. The sauce had a funny taste....More
We followed the suggestion of the Gold Floor concierge at the Fairmont Hotel Vancouver and asked them to book us in at this restaurant. It was interesting getting a reservation, we had to place a deposit which was promptly returned to us once we arrived...More
I had almost forgotten that a perfect restaurant experience can exist. Our evening at Le Crocodile was simply perfect from start to finish. We would like to particularly mention Miles, who was expertly knowledgeable, always near when needed and took care of us with kindness....More
I was here for an international wine and food event. The chef-owner, Michel Jacob, was incredible! He made sure that every dish was perfect. The food was spectacular (understatement), the service was excellent, and the ambience was perfect. This was a big group and every...More
Le Crocodile continues to amaze even after 40 years in Vancouver. Chef Michel Jacob and his team of professionals are amazing. Every step in the process was executed to perfection: the food was perfectly cooked, seasoned and delivered to the table at the perfect temperature...More
Perfection. best french restaurant in town. SOOooo unfair that it was not even quoted among the Michelin star restaurant in the city !",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d706088-Reviews-Le_Crocodile-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Le Marche St. George,"Good coffee, delicious baked goods, breakfast and lunch items. Also sweet gift store/esque items, delicatessen goods. Absolutely lovely, lovely staff, patroned 3 times, during a 3.5 day stay in Vancouver.
Unexpected location in the middle of a quiet residential area. No eat-in - just order and pickup at the door. Croissant sandwich was sold out (they really should note that on their menu board) so we got quiches. No sides, but quite tasty fillings with...More
So popular it is hard to get a table! Yet worth the wait, too many lap top time waister. Great food, crepes and all. Even the curated condiments and gifts including Aleppo soap made with Laurel and Olive for your Cleopatra skin. (Guys can use...More
Savoury and Sweet Crepes on offer, as well as soups and sandwiches. Lovely little space with outside seating. They also sell product.
Very highly recommended based on the quality of the food they serve. The cortado was smooth and great, and I must say that as a spanish it is the first real cortado I've tried in Canada, which I really appreciate. Though, I must say the...More
Love this hidden coffee and pastry shop! Great hidden neighborhood gem. Quite a few choices of coffee, pastries, crepes and vegan frozen products in their small store. Great spot to come to with friendly service to go along with the visit. Have come several times...More
Loved this neighborhood treasure. Great coffees, crepes (savory or sweet), quiche, croissant, cinnamon rolls. Earnest Ice Cream by the pint, teas, etc., etc. etc. Quaint old building, staff friendly and wonderful food. Good for breakfast, lunch or light dinner. We were in this neighborhood for...More
Highly recommend hitting this little gem of a resto for breakfast and a great coffee. Beautiful people. Xx
In the area for a couple of days and went to this place for a coffee. Easy to locate and seem to be in an area where the community is sharing responsibilities and trying to make things better. The service was good and the waitresses...More
This is definitely a hidden gem that is slightly off the main path driven by it's well deserved reputation for great food. The atmosphere is very French laid back, there is limited seating outside only and many customers pickup food to eat elsewhere. I was...More
Went to see what the hype was about this place in Fraserhood. Room was small, crowded and full of junk. Only counter service. Coffee was okay but nearby is Bows and Arrows if you are looking for good coffee. Had crepes. Much too thick. A...More
Cutey little joint, the treats are yummy. Stumbled on this little joint while working in the neighborhood and it was love at first site! Will be back for sure! Gotta try the crepes they looked lovely and yummy. They have real silver!
This is a great place to see how the buildings stood at the turn of the century. Renovated store front when corner stores were how families bought their goods. Its now a trendy little coffee shop with lovely outside seating and baked goods.
Had coffee here with a friend, on her recommendation. Brought my 6 year old kid too. Quaint but very welcoming. Interesting setting being in the middle of a residential neighbourhood, but makes for sitting on their outside tables much more peaceful and enjoyable. Kid friendly,...More
Every time I tell people about Le Marche they have to pause and figure out where I am talking about. Used to the regular hub bub of main thoroughfares it is rare to hear of a place nestled in the midst of a neighbourhood that...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4224826-Reviews-Le_Marche_St_George-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Le Petit Cafe,"Dropped in for a warm drink, and ended up trying the most delicious lavender tea latte, ever! The wonderful and caring server, took my newly diagnosed diabetes into account, and helped me to enjoy a lovely, sugar free lavender latte (sweetened with sugar free vanilla...More
Walked over for lunch to check this place out and we were both blown away by this charming bistro. Had a very tasty salad on the courtyard patio. The staff were wonderful and the prices very reasonable.
Friendly staff, great range of drinks and food. Whilst visiting family we found this place walking in the woods on a wet Saturday morning. It is a real little gem. Turmeric lattes and carrot cake...amazing.
We really enjoyed this little cafe. In fact, during our two week stay we were there six times👍😁. The staff are very friendly. The cappuccinos are tasty and hot. There is is good selection of lunches and snacks.
A wonderful gem tucked away in an unassuming strip mall in North Van, Le Petit Cafe is a great place for home made soup, sandwiches, and (especially) their Macaron. I come often and it's always a treat;-)
Tucked away in a secluded North Vancouver neighborhood, this hidden gem will not disappoint you. Whole and healthy foods, attractively presented. A diverse bouquet of delightful flavors. Far away from the crowds on Lonsdale or at the slopes.
feels French looks French tastes French warm cosy and friendly I went in for an iced coffee and was delighted to find many yummy items to both much on in the cafe , sip while reading the paper on the lovely outside patio and to...More
This area definitely needed a fabulous hang out... And now but it does have a first class one. Being ba resident of this area I hope that this Café will stick around. The food is excellent... The blueberry scone is the best choice on the...More
I recently read a review in our local paper about the Le Petit cafe. I was meeting a friend so we decided to try this place. They offer lots of bake goods and lunch options. They also carry gluten free items which we both enjoyed....More
Hubby and I stopped in for coffee. I had the Italian wedding soup and a latte. The soup was yummy!! The coffee was delicious using Blume
Cosy little coffee shop on Delbrook avenue halfway up from Queens Ave has the best coffee (Mojo)and tasty scones and good soup. The staff is very friendly and lots of parking in the plaza.
I live in North Van, but only found out about this place through a friend who suggested we meet here for coffee. It is a cute spot tucked in a sleepy strip mall in the Delbrook area. We arrived around 9, and fresh baked goods...More
A lovely little neighbourhood shop - just as you'd expect. Nice coffee, some sweets and a few characters of the older, silver set.
My wife and I discovered this little gem whilst shopping at the produce store next door. Do you ever get tired of the corporate franchise name brand restaurants with the blaring music and the so called chic menu?. Well folks this is the place. The...More
Found this great cafe for a lunch stop with family after visiting capilano suspension park. Such a pleasure after struggling to find food like this on our stay in Vancouver. Soups and sandwiches delicious. Warm, welcoming and cosy. Highly recommend!!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7985286-Reviews-Le_Petit_Cafe-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Le Petit Saigon Restaurant Ltd,"We ordered take-out food from Le Petit Saigon. The food comes with big portion and are pretty good. It is good value for money spent.
We ordered spring rolls for take out and found a toothpick buried deep in it. We couldn’t take a bite out of any of the food after because of how disgusted we were. This place have no regards for food safety. Based on low rated...More
We came here for a quick bite before our evening event. We ordered the #54 beef, BBQ pork and spring roll vermicelli and the chicken and pork with rice. Fast made and tasted really good for casual eats.
Our quick dinner stop before the pne. Nice little spot on Hastings street. The food is always good and reliable. Good service.
We ate at Le Petit Saigon 2 years ago and had lunch before heading to the annual Pacific National Exhibition (“PNE”). This time around we came here for dinner after visiting the PNE. See my review from 2017. We were there around 8:00 on a...More
Went there for lunch and we were able to get seated right away. In a few minutes, the server came by and asked for our order. The service was very fast. We ordered the rare steak and beef ball rice noodle soup, grilled chicken noodle...More
A couple of family members introduced this place where the food was above average, great value and new decor which the decor was a step up from their last visit. (Beautiful glass chandeliers). Good selection of food. There’s pho, noodles, appies, specialty drinks, & vermicelli....More
Really good spring rolls! We also liked the platter dish, it included a meat cake that reminded me of meatloaf and the soup was good.
Was a really decent meal, with a different but tasty twist to thier version of Bun bo hue soup. Average price but our server was awesome...
We found parking a few blocks from the PNE and while walking to the fair we discovered Le Petit Saigon so decided it would be better value to dine before we entered the fair gates. We ordered the minced pork over vermicelli and the beef/ham...More
Their pho is not the best, but their fried spring rolls are delicious, crisp and tasty. Their service is friendly, and the prices are decent. good place for lunch, not sure about dinner.
Typical Pho restaurant and menu but the prices and service are great. The spring rolls are great, the pho is good, and the lemon grass chicken was flavourful. Good food, good price, good service for a quick, no hassle meal.
It doesn't look like much from the outside, but this modest restaurant serves some pretty boastful food. The spring roll is hands-down the best and most interesting I've ever had, and the beef pho is to die for. The staff people are really nice and...More
Went there recently with my wife and young son, as we are avid pho lovers, at least normally. We had originally planned to goto our normal pho place next door, but they were closed so we decided to try this place close by. In summary,...More
We were on our way to the annual Pacific National Exhibition (PNE) and rather than head into the PNE for lunch, I decided to find a place to eat on Hastings Street. I originally planned to grab a quick bite at McDonald’s or Burger King...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5110258-Reviews-Le_Petit_Saigon_Restaurant_Ltd-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Legendary Noodle House,"My son and I decided to give this place a try in a quick trip to Vancouver. It was amazing! Super fresh. We loved the location, and loved getting to watch the noodles being made by hand right in front of us.
Exceptional Tasty Fresh Noodles, Soups, Dumplings and More. We had Several Dishes and Everyone Loved their Meal. I Keep Going Back as the Food is So Good Every Time. Fun to go to English Bay and Denman and Grab a Fabulous Meal for a Decent...More
We ordered two vegetarian noodle soups. Noodles were hand made. All tasted good, not too salty and the price is reasonable.
We ate at that very but all the food was without any flavour. The dim-sum was made from frozen and we had industrial frozen ones at home which were much better than these.
The food is Amazing. The noodles are made fresh in house. You can watch them make them in the kitchen. The stir fried thick noodles were amazing and the noodles in the beef broth has tremendous flavour. This will be my first visit when I...More
We shared curry chicken wok fried noodles and pan fried pork dumplings. Both were amazing, the hand pulled noodles were exceptional with a nice chew to them. The service was fast and very friendly. This was one of the best things we ate on this...More
Not only was the food amazing but the staff was nice and we got our food 5 minutes after ordering. Highly recommend the beef wok noodles.
As soon as you enter, you feel like you have stepped into a restaurant in China. The decor, smell of the food, the energy of the place - they all add to the feeling. It feels like an efficient family run restaurant. It felt like...More
Tiny restaurant with heavy chinese style furniture and wonderful house blend tea. At the back you can see the cooks making/stretching and then cooking the noodles you just ordered. The dishes are nicely portioned so that you can safely order one or two per person...More
Not much for decor, tables are very small, I'm 6'5 and it's a tight fit. That being said, we have eaten there 4 times, each time was excellent! It is also fun to watch the chef form the noodles.
We loved the food, service and atmosphere of this little noodle house. It felt like we were in a traditional noodle house in northern China. The cumin lamb with cutting noodles and the green beans with xo sauce were perfect. Plus we ordered hot tea,...More
It is one of the best "" Home Made Cut Noodle in Vancouver , it is a small Husband & wife run restaurant ,due to the Covid 19 , pick up and delivery only , , (12noon till 9pm ,closed on Tuesday ) we order...More
This is for Broadway location The noodles and broth where ok.. Lanzhou beef noodle in west blvd, to me taste better. They have more selection on the menu though. The xiao long pao didn’t have much broth at all. Guess today wasn’t that good for...More
A tiny place on a lively street that is easy to miss if you don’t know. But we knew. I looked at TA and Google maps to make sure we don’t ruin our meal experience during this short visit to Vancouver. Great variety of traditional...More
Legendary is an understatement on how good this place is. Probably the best Asian Noodles I've ever had, their handmade cut Noodles were exceptional, as were their dumplings. This place has made it on to my ""must visit"" list for future trips to Vancouver",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d937117-Reviews-Legendary_Noodle_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Legends Pub & Sports Bar,"A very typical sports bar with multiple TV's so no sports events are missed. Good food and beer selection and good service.
We are from out of town so we had to Google sports bars so we can go watch football somewhere other than our hotel so this bar was one that popped up. Great vibe all around... the bartenders and manager were super nice and tons...More
Don't get down to Richmond often, but when I do, I like to stop here. Patio service only, but the weather was such that a patio presence was de rigueur. But, what about hockey on the wide screen, you ask? No problem - tv's on...More
Had some business to discuss, and needed a (relatively) quiet place to do so. Also, inexpensive beer, clean restroom, and Covid concerns covered were all important criteria. This pub, with good parking and close to transit with a great patio, met all these requirements. If...More
Met up with family members at Legends and got a seat in front of one of the many TV’s and it had the ball game on. Most others were showing hockey. Good service and food was good. Good selection of beers. Nice local pub, recommend
I have to set the scene for this review as I think its important. We have been travelling for over a week and live about 1500 kms north of Vancouver. We stopped over in Vancouver to do some shopping and eating as there is not...More
Come during game time and you will enjoy a very fun night with locals and also make a few new friends! Their appetizer are above average, I really like their wings, especially the Salt & Pepper ones!! Ask for special beer on tap!
We regularly on Friday meet several friends at the Pub. Food is above average, the service is awesome and the many TVès allow any sports person to enjoy thier game.
Every long weekend Legends has a great Jam Night. If you play or enjoy live music this is the place to be.
Service has improved there lately, didn't get the girls name, tall blond, very good at her job. Nice improvement!
Richmond is beginning to sound like what they used to say about the City of Victoria (where the residents are newly wed or newly dead). Pubs that offer good service and good food are now almost non-existent. I found that the 2 piece fish &...More
Was there with friends, staff was great and the food was excellent and priced well! Awesome sports bar, they have like over 40 TVs. Nice pool table, they have daily and monthly food specials and great drink specials that change everyday. They also have a...More
Had to spend quite many hours here waiting and my stay was nice. The server was super nice with a smile and positive attitude. There is a lot of space and a lot of TVs. Also a pool table. Overall a nice place for beers...More
Have been going to Legends for last 8 months, week, with a group of friends. Menu is good with weekly specials and gluten free items. Cerise is what makes this location. The people working here are friendly and work hard to make your experience a...More
One of the best places in Richmond to watch sport, always come for the soccer tournaments. Dozens of screens and always good value daily specials. Extensive menu, very reasonably priced. Not the most gourmet food in town, but pretty decent. Mike the bartender is a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7134118-Reviews-Legends_Pub_Sports_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Les Faux Bourgeois,"I would say that all the dishes were good but nothing blew my mind. Parking is hard.. Service is good.
Parking can be a challenge. There are number of restaurants on this street and parking is somewhat limited in the evening. We parked 1 ½ blocks away on Kingsway beside the park. We had a lovely evening at Les Faux bourgeois. The tables are nicely...More
Arrived for the Birthday 🎂 Celebration for our Niece’s 31st and the Bistro was packed except for the Reserved Tables. As it was our first time at the Bistro, we were greeted warmly by the Server. The Menu held a variety of interesting choices… We...More
Restaurant was recommended to us by friends. We were taken aback by the location and the outside appearance of the restaurant: not what we had expected. There were no snooty French waiters which was only slightly disappointing. The service staff was courteous and attentive. The...More
Food and service were amazing. So good I'd consider moving closer just so I could visit this restaurant more often.
We had not been to LFB since the pandemic started, mostly because of the small space between tables when we visited previously....a concern I know others shared. That said, with new restrictions on being vaccinated we went a couple of days ago and were, as...More
Good food and nice place, but be warned. We called at 5:30 (very hungry) on a Saturday night during COVID (so the restaurant can't be fully booked) and were told any take-out we wanted could not be ready before 7:15. It takes an hour and...More
First time visited, at short notice in an area we did not know. Unassuming restaurant which totally impressed us. The food was excellent - Pate - the Duck was exceptional and desert as well. Totally recommend as the service was great and for what we...More
After visited a great friend at the hospital ,,their family want to take me out for dinner to catch up the good old day !! , (the family from Quebec City ) they choose the Faux Bourgeois , they told me it is the one...More
We were welcomed at the door. Service was quick friendly and non pressured. We were a couple on a slower Monday night. The restaurant was about 3/4 of its capacity. We ordered 3 dishes to Share. The Mussels, Cassoulet and Hanger Steak. All of the...More
Great menu and wine selection with prompt service, however we did not feel rushed. We all felt very safe with the adherence to public health guidelines regarding distancing - plexiglass shields have been placed between tables and background music etc. allowed for normal conversation. A...More
We ended in the area by fluke during one of our random evening walks. We then remembered that The Faux Bourgeois was near by and decided to try our luck. When we found out that they could accommodate 3 of us, we called a friend...More
Sat at the bar, low key yet still lively evening. The staff were very good as was the food and reasonably priced.
Celebrating our anniversary with daughter. She is vegan, so she had a green salad followed by risotto. Our choice was steak frittes. Outstanding tender steak cooked to perfection. Fries were very hot and fresh. We had great service. Desserts looked great but we were feeling...More
This is a very good French bistro. The wines by the glass are reasonably priced and good! We each ordered the mussels and french fries, which were large and very tasty. The service was excellent. The restaurant is dimly lit but adequate for dining. There...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1551386-Reviews-Les_Faux_Bourgeois-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lhy Thai Restaurant,"I've ate at many thai restaurants in the GVRD and I was quite surprised when coming here and trying this place out for the first time - negatively speaking. I should have read all the reviews, in particular within the past 2 years, before coming...More
The food is acceptable but heaven forbid, ask for hot sauce and you are greeted with a scowl and a tiniest bit of chilies...I feel sorry for his poor wife who works really hard in a small kitchen as I assume.
Lhy Thai is consistent with it's flavours. One of my go to's for lunch take out at least once a month. Like the #1 medium to hot spice. Price $7.95 very good value.
We have been coming here for over 19 years. We love this couple who run it they are very special to our family. My kids our adults and they still request to come here for family occasions. The lunch specials are really good. Our favorite...More
We have eaten at many Thai restaurants in British Columbia, and none come close to the food at Lhy Thai. Each dish is consistently prepared well, with good balance of flavours that tease your palate. You can get tofu substitutions for meats/fish/shellfish. The tofu is...More
The service and the freshly prepared food is delicious. Menu is extensive and very reasonable. Very good service and even the owner waits tables. We usually go there for lunch. Always a good choice!
Been going to Lhy Thai since the 90's . Had Great food then and Still does now !! Hands down the Best Thai Food in Burnaby !!!
The food is good and service is quite good as well. Looks like it's run by a family who is very passionate and serious about serving great Thai food. Looks about the place can be deceiving and it is very small inside. In fact, very...More
Had dinner there the other night and the food was excellent with prompt service. The prices are very reasonable and the food is authentic Thai not like so many of the Thai restaurant with Chinese owners. This place has been here since 1990 and is...More
This restaurant's hours are a bit strange and, at times, inconvenient. Open for lunch and dinner - closed between and not open Sundays. However, if you visit during the lunch hour, the menu is quite reasonably priced. The dinner menu, similarly so. We had lunch....More
wonderful fresh ingredients...everything was so tasty with a lot of variety. Had their take out before and this was the first time to the restaurant. Will be back!
Went because of the reviews and were pleased with the experience. Modest decor with service and food at the forefront! Spring rolls were excellent as were the fish cakes. Her fish in red curry was amazing. My sweet and sour chicken (I have no idea...More
I woke up craving Thai food today, so off I went to the Lhy Thai restaurant. The Lhy Thai is my very favourite Thai restaurant. I have been coming here for lunch whenever possibly for nearly 15 years. I usually order the lunch Combo number...More
We work in the neighbourhood and always say there is no place for lunch. Someone mentioned Lhy Thai so we checked it out. Delicious. I cannot compliment the food enough. We had Pad Thai, red curry, mixed veggies with oyster sauce. The portion size was...More
Been going there on a off for more than fifteen years and is still one of the favourite spots. The place feels more like a small Thai home instead of a restaurant and may give first timers, the wrong impression, but once settled down, you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d775777-Reviews-Lhy_Thai_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Lift Breakfast Bakery,"Good breakfast spot with plenty of options. I liked that they have the choice of doing a half size breakfast. I had the French toast with caramelised bananas which was very tasty but the toast was under soaked. The atmosphere of the place was great...More
This is a small and very popular establishment. Expect longer wait time for food to come to your table. With that said, the staff let's you know how long it will take, making the wait more comfortable. The food was very tasty and well prepared....More
First, let me start by saying that lift breakfast bakery has always been my go to place coming to the north shore, and I have recommend it to many others That has quickly all changed due to the terrible service from the manager at this...More
Good brunch menu and also breakfasts. Busy with a fast flow of customers. Food was not quick but very good and tasty. staff not overly friendly but pleasant. We had a good meal and not overly expensive.
Stopped off here randomly whilst walking around on way to Grouse Mountain - small inside and with covered area to sit outside - nice atmosphere. Busy at 10 o'clock but managed to get the last table for 4 people and had great friendly service from...More
Went to this Coffee Shop this morning at 10.30. People waiting in large numbers to be served. But the arrogance of the Store Employees takes the cake. Nobody’s in charge or even willing to talk to a customer, although there were large numbers of employees...More
This place consistently delivers quality breakfast food! It is my weekly treat, to come enjoy some eggs and bacon, generous filter coffee pours and a friendly, chill and happy vibe. On that note, I met some German travellers awhile back, who were enjoying breakfast beside...More
We have been coming here since day 1 and used to absolutely love this place but since the hostess which really ran the place has left on maternity it has gone down hill . Today was the last straw . I asked to replace the...More
Went for a Sunday brunch after hearing great things. Was not at all disappointed - fantastic vibe and friendly staff and the food was amazing. I had the Lonsdale Fog (one of the better versions of London Fog I've had) and had the maple bacon...More
Staff was so friendly and accommodating, it’s a small space and we had our 2 week old with us in the stroller, was challenging to find is a table that we could pull the stroller up beside. After a short wait, they were able to...More
the server was so friendly and lovely! the cafe is beautiful inside! also the food was delish and the coffee was some of the best ♥️
Met with some out of town friends for breakfast and I recommended the bennies and my friend and I both loved them and declared them the best ever. My husband doesn't eat eggs but devoured the french toast. Coffee was excellent too.
Cosy atmosphere, comfortable seating and DELICIOUS breakfast! The perfect spot for brunch on a rainy morning. Small wait due to popularity but comfort out of the rain and under some radiant warmers made it easy to pass the time.
Excellent food , service , ambience and price. Highly recommend it . Food is delicious made from scratch on the premises. Will be back for sure .
5/5 stars or more! Great experience , service, place and brunch. Yummy mimosas, fresh brewed coffee, amazing bennies and the best: their french toast dish MUST TRY!! My boyfriend and I wanted to try this place for so long, we live really close but it...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d12337210-Reviews-Lift_Breakfast_Bakery-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lin Chinese Cuisine,"We ordered the Veggie Buns, 4 giant ones. We took 2 of these tasty buns home. We also had the PF Cake with Beef and other fillings. Yummy and delicious and full of beef and tastiness. The last was the Peking Duck two ways. One...More
This restaurant has a canteeny feel to it. The food was nothing special and the toilets were miles away out the back. We were visiting relatives in Vancouver and were not impressed. I can't understand why this place is rated so highly on TripAdvisor
We ordered a diverse selection of foods for dinner. Sesame chicken, lamb cilantro, soy rice cakes, honey prawns, pan fried chicken dumplings, and more. Tasty, and good. The only problem we had was that our takeout order got taken by another customer and we had...More
We ordered Szechuan Beef, Honey Prawns, Vegetable Psn Fried Dumplings and Smoked Tea Duck with buns. We were pleased with the flavors, preparation and quantities.
King Pao Chicken 4/5 spicy, loads of peanuts Xiang bao buns 4.5/5 soup inside buns Ginger Beef 3.8/5 Hot/Sour Soup 3.8/5
Big menu. Service is fairly quick. Food is strip mall quality. General Tsos Chicken tastes more like an ultra-sweet ketchup than a spicy paste. Seafood dumplings are bland. Absolutely huge portions (like 2-3 meals worth), but that doesn't overcome quality issues. No dim sum at...More
We ordered a number of items and were impressed by how fresh and hot they were despite being delivered. They use high quality ingredients (as reflected in the price point) and it showed. We had three kinds of dumplings, plus a fried rice and sweet...More
This is amongst the best Cantonese food available locally. I see it is advertised as ""Northern"", but as a Vancouver veteran, this food brings back memories of Vancouver's Chinatown of old, circa 1960. We experienced the food recently, and have not been to the restaurant...More
We often passed this place but were never enticed to pop in. Until we finally tried upon a family suggestion. It was 5 of us. Boy we were wrong all these times. Their xlb was delicious and mouth watering. Their pork buns were scrumptious too....More
We went here for the juicy dumplings as they say. XLB! They did not disappoint. They came out fresh and juicy bursting with extremely rich broth. We also had pan fried pork buns which were a little dry for my taste but a delicious texture....More
My god this place is good. We ordered the Shanghai pork dumplings, Pork buns, Tea Smoked duck and the salt and pepper spare ribs. The dumplings and buns were full of juice and were very filling. I have never seen the Tea Smoked duck on...More
I place a delivery order this evening from Lin Chinese. I took a bite of my spring roll and started to chew. There was a ½ piece of broken plate in the spring roll. I called to ensure that they were aware and could check...More
Was advised this was a good chinese option in Vancouver. Neatly located in a building on Broadway, the reception by the host(s) was pleasant and smooth. We took time to peruse the menu and we were told that their wonton soup was recommended we had...More
A bit of a wait after lin's two week closure. We had the Szechuan Chicken and the Orange Beef with hot and sour soup. Nice prep, flavourful, and wow. We also had the vegetable dumplings. Yum yum. Service was slow.
A reminder that the Lin Chinese Cuisine is closed on Tuesdays. Today's visit to Lin's was not as enjoyable because the green beans in the minced pork and green beans were withered and old. We remainder of the dishes were enjoyable though. This is the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2084654-Reviews-Lin_Chinese_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Linh Cafe,"Arrived just at closing time and past the last order time. Manager was very nice, seeing that we were visitors, got the kitchen to reopen their pho pots :) The Vietnamese Pho (beef, white noodles, soup) was excellent, just as our local friend promised. Didn’t...More
Surprised to every one , Mum like her Mother's Day dinner after the 14 , less crowed and hustle free , no Chinese food or fancy restaurants , so I choice the Linh Cafe and it is mum's flavour restaurant , she's regular at their...More
Food was very good had beet salad and duck breast both very nicely prepared and place was tons of potential however basic wine list untrained servers and lights turned up all the way makes doesn’t match the upscale food
I have been seeing things going downhill in this once-beloved spot for a while, but I didn't expect to be screamed at and verbally abused. The host, Don or Dan? curtly directed us to a table; so curtly that when our server came over, she...More
Vietnamese cuisine is already outstanding, so with the French influence, a superb version. Sweetbreads, frog legs, escargots and terrines, I'm a captive and extremely satisfied. Nuances of Vietnamese flavours is so fabulous. The pho is also very good, with bone marrow as an optional extra,...More
We got there when it opened and it soon filled up. We had spicy baguette stick, some pho and regular egg breakfast too. Some pretty spicy stuff in there! good service too.
First time been there , the stuff was nice , and very friendly, the food was nice , just the noodles is bit soft that all , overall it’s nice !
we have been here a few times. Defintely one of the best vietnamese food in vancouver, although no special decor. Come for the genuine taste or have a fun time with a group of friends casually. You will not be disappointment. Friendly sevice and satisfactory...More
These review is for their new location at the Vancouver House at Granville at Pacific , the W.4 location is excellent in food and services , I hear so much and read so many mixed reviews about this location , finally a great friend of...More
Super tasty food! The PHO 🍜 soup is the best I’ve ever tried in Canada 🇨🇦! Extremely clean place and the kitchen is super clean, keep it in mind.
Had an amazing lunch here! I've heard amazing things about Linh Cafe and I'm so glad I've finally gotten a chance to eat here. Definitely can't wait to come back again, the pho was unreal!
I heard about this amazing pho and finally got a chance to try. We added additional rare beef too and shared a salad roll, plus house white and draft beer. The broth was so flavourful!
I came here for dinner with a friend on a Thursday night without a reservation. We were seated right away, and the restaurant was quite busy. Food: overall, pretty good. We ordered the mussels, the Red Shrimps, and Spicy Baguette Sticks. Came with fries and...More
The food is good no doubt. The service is good too. But the price/value is off. For example, the braised short ribs were $33 and it included one very small piece with a couple pieces of carrot. Good sauce though. The Bun Cha was kind...More
Vietnamese Cuisine with a French Twist! Cannot get better than this! Must Must Try! You will not be disappointed. No research unless more than 6 ppl? My favorites, there: 1 Lb. Red Tiger Prawns, , comes with unlimited Homemade Fresh Bread,for dipping this awesome sauce...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7129872-Reviews-Linh_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lions Pub,"We enjoyed a lazy afternoon today. We had mini yorkies and fish tacos for appetizers. The waitress Lorea was exceptional.
Was staying at the Auberge Hotel which has its room service and guest dinning options provided for by this establishment. First night was great, Haley our server was awesome then it all went south from there. Second night was told by the hotel staff that...More
This place was amazing. Not only was it an authentic menu, but it was the best British fare I've eaten outside of England. I had the pie of the month, which was a divine lamb stew with a flaky crust. Lots of huge, tender chunks...More
My wife and I both chose fish dishes. The salmon dish and classic cod fish & chips. Both types of fish were perfectly cooked. The salmon was full of flavour and lightly cooked, remaining moist and delicious. Mash was chosen instead of chips and this...More
This is a great spot for views of the harbor and Canada Place. It has good atmosphere and service. We enjoyed having drinks there.
A must do for anyone visiting Vancouver central. Central location near the docks, ferry station and convention centre. Great atmosphere with huge drink range and fantastic food at good prices. For those that have not had it before - try the Poutine 😊
The appetizers are all good and they have a very good selection of beers! Good service and good people made this a great spot for some pregaming before finding something fancy for dinner. I'll have to try the dinner here next time as I hear...More
Service was prompt and our dinner was excellent. The portions were big. The beer was cold. A nice, casual atmosphere. We look forward to dining here on our next visit.
This was one of our go to places on previous visits to Vancouver. Only one visit this time for dinner. Service a little slow despite it not being too busy. Sat outside on the patio and the food was as good as ever. I had...More
Met friends in the city for dinner. Three of us got the fish and chips and we all loved it. Great portion and taste. Very good service and nice surroundings in restaurant.
Stanley Park draft beer, Shepherd's Pie, cool outdoor seating, convenient location, and an efficient and pleasant server (Thanks Paige!), who could ask for more to celebrate a birthday! Can't wait to go back in cold weather to experience the pub indoors!!
Stopped in for drinks it's location near the convention center is perfect for post meeting drinks. Service was very good and the beers were cold. $8-$9CDN for a beer is little pricey but it is downtown Vancouver.
We managed to get a seat on the patio and it was a lovely place to sit and watch the world go by. It is only 1 street away from Canada Place so very central. Service was really good and we ordered a drink before...More
Wow, what a beautiful location. Found just random as we were driving. There is underground parking literally beside this place (which is why we went). Fantastic location, and great food. We had the cranberry clubhouse I believe it was called. The fries are the absolute...More
Fun indoor/outdoor eatery with good beer choices, and other types of drinks. We had a duck spring roll appetizer that was ok but not great. The Yorker appetizer with prime rib in a pastry was really good however. Good people watching and friendly staff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709566-Reviews-Lions_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Little Billy's Steakhouse,"I will never go near this place. Bad food, super overpriced, slow service, unfriendly waiters. I can't believe they are are still open.
We have been going to LB for many years and had the best meals and service - we attended on Valentines day and they overbooked, did not provide customer service nor was the food good - will not be going back - the new owners...More
When Harry and his staff managed the kitchen and his wife Irma and her staff managed the restaurant and bar it was a smooth flawless 5 out of 5 star operation of skill and dedication. The customers visiting Little Billy's were happy and glad to...More
My wife and I finally had a night to ourselves to have a date night. We usually would go to the Keg but thought we would try something different for a change. My wife and I always drive by Little Billy’s steakhouse and it looked...More
Not only did they manage to squeeze us in at a lovely table on mothers day with no reservation, but the food and service are excellent. One of the best steaks i have ever had, and the baklava is a must try!
It is not easy to find a family run restaurant that absolutely delivers in this age of chain restaurants . We had been referred to this place by friends and we were not disappointed in fact thrilled! Great hosts and servers, every dish felt like...More
A very friendly family run restaurant situated on Hastings street. Over all the atmosphere is family oriented, good for group dinners. The food was very solid, although can benefit from a menu revamp. Everyone at our table agreed that the chicken livers were a bit...More
This N. Burnaby restaurant is well know in the neighbourhood ,with the Greek fare , lot of street parking ,the decor is very cozy ,and the place is not that big ,happy to see the safety plan and social distancing well follow , the menu...More
Me and hubby just finished our four course meal for $25 at Little Billy's and it was wonderful! Good quality ingredients freshly prepared! Meals included : bread, soup, saled, main course and dessert, and all were fantastic! We ordered Steak & shrimp and Pork schnitzel...More
We went for a later dinner and had a reservation so we were seated right away. Our server was great and provided excellent service the entire time we were there. We ordered the Greek platter and the food was pretty decent, but left something to...More
In the hot summer days this restaurant is air conditioned and in the cold winter days nice and warm, a warm atmosphere in the restaurant with friendly and professional staff. The Master Chef and his team cannot be beat and offer consistently great dishes at...More
Our reservation was for 6:30 for a birthday dinner. We were seated when we walked in no waiting, water and drinks were ordered and on the table within five minutes. The menu is varied and would satisfy every taste even those with discerning tastes. The...More
Went to little Billy’s for my wife’s birthday...excellent food and service...mash potatoes were excellent...I had the steak and it was done to perfection....would highly recommend this place...
First time there with a group of friends and family. Services are great and ribs are so good. Will come back again to try Greek platter
Service was outstanding, very attentive, quick to take our orders and served up hot in a short period of time. Owners are great people, very personable. Had the Greek Ribs, as usual, really, really tasty. Wife and another had Chicken souvlaki, was average. Buddy had...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3692436-Reviews-Little_Billy_s_Steakhouse-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Little Ongpin,"I always come here for comfort food for the soup and quick lunch break during weekdays. the staff and owner very friendly./the food and prices are good compared to other same place in Vancouver or surrey bc.this is better than kumares or pin pin in...More
My husband and I discovered this restaurant years ago. From then on, we just kept coming back. The menu is superb, clean, tasty and very much Filipino in taste and presentation. We come here also to take our son who has Autism The owners reserve...More
The premises are clean. the owners super friendly-servings are small but authentic dishes.parking is good.fruiticana grocer beside the place and a filipino store across
We drive away from downtown Vancouver to get the best Kare Kare in town. This place will not disappoint you. We had sinigang na tiyan ng Bangus and our favourite Kare Kare. It’s worth a long drive to Richmond. Been here many times but I...More
Per recommendation by a friend, had dinner with another 4 friends with this restaurant and we’re not happy with our experienced. The staff are friendly and accommodating and their service is good. We’re dissatisfied with some of our orders especially the Beef Caldereta as it...More
First timer to try Filipino food, so didn't really know what to expect. Luckily we had an expert with us and so we managed to try a good cross section of their specialties. We tried the pata tim which is pork hock, chicken adobo, shrimp...More
Found this restaurant which was recommended by a gal friend. Choose this one because it had adobo pusit, and pinakbet, both are my favorite foods. Pinakbet portion was too small to share, but very tasty, and I liked its presentation of vegetables cut smaller than...More
crowded, noisy, not the best décor - but for a true Filipino experience come here. food is well priced, good portions, and cooked by people who love their food as much as you do. enjoy the people, the noise and atmosphere, its all fun and...More
Delicious ethnic food at reasonable prices. Not much atmosphere but local Filipino crowd is friendly. Very busy at 2 pm on Saturday afternoon. Color pictures on menu help those not familiar with Filipino food. Definitely try the Halo Halo dessert!
We made the mistake of visiting the Little Ongpin during the noon hour, a very serious mistake because one cannot not enter the parking lot.......we got into the driveway and were locked in by the drivers of other vehicles and their incredible maneuvers. After a...More
I have a very satisfied dinner yesterday which is simply awesome! Frankly I wouldn't come here if it was not my gf's recommendation because her Filipino colleagues ordered port-luck from LO the other day... It is located in a strip mall on No.5 Rd and...More
Went there for lunch with my wife and her sister. Ordered the papaitan, sinigang na baka and the chargrilled platter. I loved the papaitan - I think it's one of the best I've ever had. The sinigang was ok. The platter had fried Pompano instead...More
Little Ongpin is the place if your looking for the best and original Filipino dishes. Theres no words to express how nice the place and how good the foods they have in their menu. Highly recommended.
Came in for a dinner with the family, portions are big and prices are decent. We had the crispy pata, 2 thumbs up! Pork sisig, mixed veggies and karekare. Overall, one of the decent places to eat Filipino food in the mainland. Service is good...More
My family showed up for halo halo 10 minutes before closing. We were turned away even after explaining we were just there for dessert. We won't be back!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1148169-Reviews-Little_Ongpin-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Livia,"We went for brunch and it was delicious. You order at the counter and then you get a table which on a weekend can be problematic as it is so busy. We ordered coffees and had them at the bar and when a table became...More
We had brunch on a Saturday. The service is great, I loved the food, and the interior design is nice. However the acoustics are awful; I could barely hear my friend talking.
Friendly staff, trendy interior and outstanding food and pastry makes this restaurant a must-visit if you are in the area. Highly recommend Livia Classico for breakfast or brunch.
Livia offers excellent bread and bake goods plus I heard from my son the cafe has really good food too. Highly recommended fi you are visiting Commercial Drive in East Vancouver.
Nice interior design and lovely food to eat in or take out make this place a great location for locals and tourists alike. Situated on Commercial Drive in the fashionable East Van neighbourhood, this is a must visit experience.
Had breakfast here with friends. Busy place! Coffee is excellent. No table service so you order from cashier using large boards as menus. Great atmosphere and friendly staff made this a welcome experience
I was lucky enough to visit Livia's on a number of mornings during my recent stay in East Vancouver... I cannot recommend it enough! The staff are fantastically friendly and the quality of the bread and coffee was first class... A great place to spend...More
We were lucky enough to get a reservation last Aug 8, 2019 when Livia offered a Popup Pasta Night. WOW, the food and atmosphere were amazing. Apparently, it was the first time they turned their bakery into a one-night-only pasta resto. We waited for a...More
Lunch was great. I had kale and spelt salad with olives and almonds and cheese. It was a bit pricey but delicious. We had already decided we would return but once I tried one of their cinnamon buns I was hooked on this lovely little...More
There many coffee houses on commercial with good coffee. What makes Livia stand out is the style of delivery and presentation; most notably is Jazz who adds flare to the moment.
Dropped by to have a latte and cinnamon danish pastry. Absolutely delicious. Very crowded and the line-up is non-stop. The sourdough bread and baguette for sale look wonderful. Everything freshly made. My friend ordered the breakfast sandwich and said it was delicious and we agreed...More
Nice addition to The Drive! Classy room with nice food. My only issue is the wait. Always long lineups to order and if you just want to pop in a grab a baguette or loaf of bread the wait is painful. Perhaps a separate till...More
The breakfast sandwich with egg & mortadella on a potato bun was delicious and satisfying and will leave you wanting to eat another one . The rose shortbread and leek sourdough all dynamite. Tried the Scandinavian bun and just sweet enough. Big thumbs up. Inviting...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16674721-Reviews-Livia-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Local Gastown,"I recommend this place for a lunch in the area. The burgers are great, service is quick and courteous! We were glad we stumbled upon this LPE Gastown.
Hello Sunshine827087 ! Wow, 5 stars! We are so happy that you enjoyed your experience with us. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, Jaime Livingston Assistant General Manager
Recently came here for supper. Great staff service, great portions, fresh hot food. Facilities were very clean and welcoming. Highly recommended!More
Hi Jean-Francois, WOW 5 stars! Thank you so much for taking the time to write in. We are thrilled to see you enjoyed your time with us. Make sure you say hi on your next visit - first round of Crushes on me! We also...More
Met up with my son and his partner for dinner. We had a great 2 hours here. The servers were friendly and the food was so good. Two highlights were the fish tacos and the nachos. You're thinking, ""Nachos? Well, they are fine, I guess...""...More
Hi Stefan, WOW 5 stars! Thank you so much for taking the time to write in. We are thrilled to see you enjoyed your time with us. Make sure you say hi on your next visit - first round of Drinks on me! Let me...More
We had a great time having some drinks and lunch here. The food was delicious and the cocktails were really good. The service was friendly and the atmosphere is great. Definitely recommend checking this pub out, it is a great location in Gastown.
Hi Wilson, Thank you so much for the kind review! We're glad we were able to accommodate a great experience for you and cant wait to serve you again soon! Please say hi next time you are in! Konrad Fawkes Assistant General Manager
The first problem with this place is the location. We had to dodge a series of bums and druggies and vagrants just to walk to this place. Where are the Vancouver cops? Certainly they aren't doing their job. The place is reasonably nice and the...More
Robert S , We take feedback very seriously and genuinely want to thank you for bringing this to our attention. We are so sorry that we fell short on an exceptional experience for you. Our team works hard to uphold the highest standards and this...More
This is a fun historical place with lot's of restaurants. We visited with a tour guide and hiring the guide was really worth the money. The steam clock is pretty cool.
Nice ambiance inside, well suited terrasse outside. More than a tourist spot, food was excellent, service good with good humour. All in all a good experience worth the value.
One of Vancouver’s landmark restaurants in Vancouver”s Gastown. Very popular spot in Vancouver. You may recognize the signage in many movies and commercials. Classy place with a modern menu. Very International variety, great food and bar selections. Breakfast menu at midnight Rocks. Manager Brody and...More
Slickdog! What a name! Thank you so much for taking the time to write in this review, we are grateful to hear from our guests. We are thrilled to hear how you enjoyed your experience with us and can not wait to host you again...More
Lovely local place. We got a good place on the patio to watch people and gastown! Good drinks. Good service. Nothing spectacular about the food thoughMore
Hi Pka3300 , Thank you for taking the time to leave us a rating! We appreciate your feedback and will ensure we directly impact our Kitchen team. We would love to host you again soon, feel free to reach out to me and I will...More
Out and about and wanted to stop for a drink. We were able to get a spot on the patio. Nice option on a beautiful sunny day. Unimpressed with the canned white wine. Didn’t actually realize that is what we ordered until too late. Not...More
Springof69 , I'm disappointed to hear that your experience was not as great as we would have liked. I would love the opportunity to connect with you further. We are grateful for your feedback and are ready to jump into action to ensure this type...More
Fun place to go for a casual dinner. Had some relatives in town with two teenage boys, so this was a good restaurant to take them to. The restaurant was busy with a fun vibe.More
What an amazing review Stephen, we are thrilled to hear about your experience. We pride ourselves on creating a vibe left to be desired and its exciting that we nailed that for your visit. Please feel free to reach out with any feedback or if...More
Stopped in for lunch and we all enjoyed really nice, simple, meals. Service was courteous and quick. Food came out in pretty good time and staff checked in every once and a while to make sure all was ok. It was a Sunday afternoon and...More
What an amazing review! Thank you so much for taking the time to write in about your experience. We love to hear feedback from our guests and we are thrilled to hear how you enjoyed your service and food with us this Sunday. We would...More
Its a cool place to hang out with friends but nothing special. Keep going back because its in Gastown and my friends like it.
bfreitas19, Thank you for your feedback. We strive to provide the best service. We'll be taking your experience into consideration as we work to improve. If there’s anything more you’d like to share with us, please contact me at kharley@localpubliceatery.com Thank you. Kyra Harley-AGM
First off, I asked the server if they made decent margaritas, she said YES! It was 99% bottled mixer which was awful and sweet, and the glass was FILLED with ice - it was undrinkable! My friends drinks were equally filled with ice - we...More
Morning Daisy, I would like to start off by personally thanking you for writing in this review. We take feedback extremely seriously and we are embarrassed that you did not enjoy your time with us. I would love to touch base further about you feedback...More
Their open Beef Tacos (3 appetizer is sufficient for lunch when your appetite isn’t big and is an interesting mixture of tastes. The Crispy Chicken Sandwich with tomato soup was a fine meal. It has a big piece of chicken breast with cole slaw. Filling....More
ElsaCL, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review. We are happy to hear that you enjoyed your time at LOCAL Gastown. Please let us know what we can do to make it even better on your next visit. We look forward...More",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13223723-Reviews-Local_Gastown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Local Public Eatery,"incredible food, sever was brilliant, didn’t get her name but a lady with short dark hair. the perfect place to eat with a view of the sea.
Our dinning experience was great! We were seated right away! We had ordered a variety of dishes and was not disappointed. Every one of them were delicious! Tasty, portions and presentations were outstanding! Our server (Anica) did a wonderful job making us feel welcomed. Not...More
Waited 30 minutes to place my order. Bartender with dred locks infinites me. Male Bar back with long hair and glasses finally served me. He works hard actually.
The Local in Kits — on Cornwall and Yew — comes into its own in the summer months. It has a good number of seats outside and customer flock to take them up on a sunny day. Inside it also has a nice indoor/outdoor bar...More
Spacious outdoor terrasse at the centre of Gastown. Delectable innovative cocktails such as “Sassy Sangria Crush” or the zero-alcohol “Spritzing Image.” Casual international street food, attractively presented,and served in generous portions. Service is welcoming, swift and highly customer responsive.
Had the worst experience ever at a restaurant. Ignored by our server the whole time because we weren’t drinking. I was amazed on how good she was at avoiding and ignoring our table. Constantly pleasing her bigger parties that we’re drinking. Will never come back....More
The Local in Kits, corner Yew & Cornwall, overlooking Kits Beach, has some good dishes on offer, as the pics, which accompany this reviews, show. In addition, it has introduced a nice place for canine companion to wait while one refuels with food & beverages....More
The Local in Kits, on the corner of Yew & Cornwall, has a lot going for it from the start with it great location overlooking Kits Beach. Stepping inside one then finds good service. This happens across the board from its GM, Konrad Fawkes down....More
The Local in Kits may be gearing up for a very busy Super Bowl Sunday, and it will be filled to the rafters but that said, it is far more than just a sports bar. It has many groups which come for myriad reasons, also...More
The Local in Kits, just across from Kits Beach, serves craft brews through the day but sadly it has ended its early evening Happy Hour, now only offering a late night HH. It has also ended its daily drink specials. Service is still good all...More
The Local Public Eatery in Kitsilano offers extensive hours to suit all meetings —- family, friends & business. Hours ranges from brunch serving over weekends at opening, at 10 am, to late-night weekend sipping & snacking til closing at 2am. Weekdays it opens at 11...More
Cheerful, polite and helpful staff in this restaurant. All made an effort to make sure you were served promptly and professionally. We ate a Malaysian curry bowl and enchiladas. Both were well prepared, spicy and very tasty. Well worth a visit if you are in...More
Hello 943rhonac ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If there is any additional feedback you can provide, please let us know at kfawkes@localpubliceatery.com! We look forward to hosting you again soon. Best, Local Kits
Amazing Service & Food We were served by Lorraine who was so attentive & friendly. We had a lovely breakfast sandwich with English tea & coffee. Highly recommend for a quick bite. Very reasonable too Thank you Lorraine ! So lovely to meet you xxMore
Hi Julia, Thank you so much for the kind review! We're glad we were able to accommodate a great experience for you and cant wait to serve you again soon! We also think Lorrain is fantastic and we are happy you got to meet her....More
The Local Public Eatery in Kitsilano is a good place to bid farewell to summer & today the Queen, as well. Service is good, as is welcome to the property, nicely located across from Kits Beach on the corner of Cornwall & Yew. GM Conrad...More
Came for a business lunch with my coworkers. We ordered many drinks to pair with our mains. Majority of my coworkers ordered the local burger, fish & chips, and I ordered the Calabrian caeser salad with blackened chicken. For dessert I tried the ice cream...More
Hi Mediterraneanmami ! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. If you’d like to chat further about your experience, please feel free to reach out. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Best, Konrad Fawkes",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1734345-Reviews-Local_Public_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Long's Noodle House,"The food always come out fast and is always so good. Lots of wonderful dishes to choose from to satisfy your craving for shanghainese food to keep you coming back for more.
My friend craved to try soup dumplings after watching food network and I thought of this place. Exceptionally, the service was great and we arrived just as they opened on a Saturday. The food was great! We ordered 2 orders of the soup dumplings, wine...More
The food never disappoints. As long as no lineup, you can get in and out fairly quickly as the food comes out promptly. Everything we have had so far has been great. Seaweed salad, drunken chicken, stewed beef noodle, wonton in spicy sauce, and must...More
This hidden gem gas been a neighborhood institution for years. Just 7-9 tables depending on how they configure their small tables. I think it’s usually a good sign in a Chinese restaurant when most of the other customers are speaking Chinese and the specials are...More
We went to Long Noodles (a well established tiny eatery in Vancouver's Main Street) for our favourite drunken chicken, Shanghai noodles, Siu Lung Bao (pork dumpling) and also shredded pickled jelly fish. Siu Lung Bao is my favourite. The dough is so soft and tender...More
Probably one of the best Shanghai Restaurants in Greater Vancouver. The famous Xiao Long Bao was moist and tasty. Everybody was ordering it. Also the other favourite was the Beef Rolls which was crispy and tasty too. Finally, we had to finish it off with...More
We’ve tried XLB in a few places around town Long’s Noodle House has the freshest, best tasting Soup dumplings in the city Staff is friendly, service was great. GH
We basically keep ordering the same thing and never disappointed. The food comes out so fast once you are seated. You could be sharing a table or may have to wait if you want your own table. We had the xiao long bao, seaweed salad,...More
Need to book ahead of time both for table and food - especially for chicken wonton soup. So many outstanding dishes - need to try everything. Despite it being very very busy, service is fast and attentive. Owner lady can take orders without writing it...More
We came for an early dinner and finished up multiple dishes in no time. We very much enjoyed the drunken chicken, seaweed, snow pea shoots, chilli wontons, salted pork and chinese veggie rice bowl, Xiao Long Bao aka juicy steam pork dumplings and salty soya...More
Food is served in 5 mins literally, must order chili wonton, not spicy because it's not Sichuan nor northern Chinese food. Authentic shanghainese cuisine is not spicy! Please don't mistaken this. Shanghainese infamous dishes are their wine chicken, beef rolls, chili wonton or chicken wonton...More
XLB are awesome here, only 6 in a basket but it is freshly made and very plump and juicy inside. Ask for more sliced garlic so you can savour these delectable dumpling. Also excellent beef rolls and celery soup! Fast service.
Video review on my youtube channel: vancity food crew long's noodle house . This place is a lesser known cash only place that serves up Shanghainese food. I have a friend who frequents this place so she knows what is the best. We got the...More
The only way to have such exception Siu Long Bao texture and broth holding strength is to make the skin fresh. We non-stop ordered it till we dropped. It's Wednesday and this place is bursting. All Asian customers, loud Chinese server, can it get anymore...More
Two of my friends recommended me to this restaurant. Tried and got he above impression. XLB really not bad if especially you like meat has texture rather than complete mince. Beef bread wrap has special favour as they have in put Chinese cilantro. A bit...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4802539-Reviews-Long_s_Noodle_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lonsdale Quay Market,"We possibly came a bit too early for the market, as not all of the stalls were open. There were, however, a decent number of vegan options. It's still a cute place to visit; the Seabus is a fun ride and the view of the...More
Unfortunately, this area pails in comparison to Granville Island. I enjoyed riding the water ferry and meeting nice people along the way, however, there wasn't much to do, buy or enjoy at the Lonsdale Quay Market.
If you are looking for a variety of special foods, coffee, soups, kitchen items, trinkets, leather goods artisan vendors and more. Outside, there are a selection of view and lounge points looking across Vancouver. Harbour. You can also find an assortment of good restaurants in...More
Given the hype, we were expecting something spectacular but what we found was a rather ordinary market. As Dr. Johnson remarked - ""Worth seeing, but not worth going to see"". Plenty of food stalls and we had a nice lunch at the Cheshire Cheese restaurant....More
Had a great visit here in January and loved it some great shops and places to eat Definitely visit I loved the fruit and vegetables and the wine shop and lovely places selling delicious food
Not nearly as nice as it could be (and was years back). Needs more shopping and less food stalls. The 2nd floor is a waste of space as the shops that are opened there aren't worth a look. Could use a few good shops in...More
Everyone can get whatever they want. Bubble tea. Yes. Mexican food. Yes. Sushi. Yes. And more...nice place to get lunch and sit back and take in the market atmosphere.
The Lonsdale Quay Market was the most visited place in North Vancouver for us as tourists. Staying at an Air-B&B in North Van we would have to pass through the market to and from Vancouver Downtown. The SeaBus terminal is located at Lonsdale Quay and...More
Market and outdoor panoramic area overlooking the bay right next to the seabus station for Downtown and the bus terminal. Two floors with shops and restaurants for every taste and every pocket. Excellent solution for breakfast, lunch and dinner or just contemplating skyline and local...More
The Lonsdale Quay Market is a fun place to go to to spend a couple hours. I think of the Lonsdale Quay Market as a mini Granville Island. It has a number of local shops for you to browse or to buy some trinkets. It...More
Ideally placed for commuters, it's got pretty much everything food-wise including eateries. Great atmosphere
Stopped by just to browse around. This enclosed market at the foot of Lonsdale Street in North Vancouver does have some of the most unique shops. Always an interesting visit. If you are looking to purchase fresh seafood, this is the place for you.
We enjoyed the ""local"" flavor of the food market. So many choices, we tasted goodies from four places: The Coffee House, a poke place, curry and croissants. Yum!
Just love the quay. Many food options. Lots of neat little stores for shopping. And the city skyline is a gorgeous view while eating outside. Love the quay! Smells incredible too.
Tons of shops and places to snack on .excellent green grocer to enjoy ,bought some yellow Hawaiian papayas .liked the card shop.its a mini Granville market.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4727847-Reviews-Lonsdale_Quay_Market-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Los Amigos Taqueria,"Staff was great, service was fast, food was delicious. The kids enjoyed the cheese quesadilla (it was huge). We all devoured our tacos. The lengua (beef tongue) was my favourite, it was so flavourful. My husbands favourite was the Chicken Pastor, the onions, cilantro and...More
We didnt have to wait long for our tasty tacos at this cute little taco shop. We had the chicken, beef and refried bean tacos. The bean taco was a little bland but the others very flavourful and fresh. Average priced food for the city.
Wow. You want real authentic, delicious, amazing Mexican food? This is the spot. So much flavour. Took a couple of my friends there and they loved it. Said it tasted like when they were in Mexico. Highly recommend
The tacos here are delicious! The service is fast and great, and a great variety of tacos. Definitely would recommend this spot for some quick, delicious tacos!
All I have to say ....AMAZING. No other words needed ! Again ...amazing! Okay I have to write more in order to submit....so go to Los Amigos Taqueria. Food is authentic. Service is fast and friendly .
there are a huge number of great choices n this fabulous street and this is one of them. 4 tacos for $10 was a perfect sized meal for each of us and we enjoyed the fresh and somewhat unusual (for us) flavours. We sat in...More
Tacos and soup is always very very good. Having a Mexican husband that cooks at home this food is very comparable to his. The pazole is always yummy
Stopped by this place for an evening snack - loved their deal of 4 tacos for $10!! There was a good selection of fresh and authentic tacos, but they were a little on the smaller side. Overall I would go back for their great deal...More
Omg. The tacos are fresh and bursting with flavour. Came across this place as a tourist just walking by. Was hungry later so went back and so glad I did. Service was excellent. Very friendly. Food was excellente. Highly recommended.
Was recommended this by many people and was gassed to learn they serve halal meat. The place transports you to somewhere in Mexico like Oaxaca. Great colours inside. Ordered the carne adobada, chicken mole, bisteca, al pastor and quesadillas. The tacos were really fresh and...More
Minimalist decor (like none) and could use a paint job - who cares??? Fresh fresh fresh delicious tacos, savory and thick pozole (soup), friendly people - definitely on my list. Oh, did I mention cheap?
Great selection of tasty soft tacos. For $10 you get 4 fresh tacos done beautifully with veggies and you choice of fish (highly recommended), chicken, beef and vegan with various degrees of spice. Three of us were served quickly by the friendly people here.
You cannot go wrong here! Four beautiful tacos for $9.99, Vegan/Vegetarian for $7.99. Gluten-free options available. Very tasty fillings and choices. Make fresh and hot to order. Lovely homemade sauces to put on top. We were there on a nice day, so the front windows...More
It's a bargain. Nice choice of Spanish fast food, fresh ingredients, hot and fast. We had take-away to enjoy on English Bay. Don't forget to load up on sauces before you walk away. Friendly service. During the good days, the huge paneled doors are wide...More
Well I love this place and posted a review of 5 stars not long ago but when I went today there was a mouse running around the restaurant I told the server/cashier and she didn't care at all. This is a health code issue but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7258707-Reviews-Los_Amigos_Taqueria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Los Cuervos Taqueria Y Cantina,"We went with friends after Tai Chi and had brunch. The small menu and special were just great options. My wife had the Chilaquiles Verdes Brunch special and I had the Huevos Mexicana. Both tasty, delicious and flavorful. Service was good, helpful, attentive and friendly...More
Really enjoyed the atmosphere, service (typically friendly Latinos) and food. Great selection of tacos catering to all our dietary preferences, including two gluten-free and five vegans among our group of eight. All the tacos, whether meat or vegan, were delicious. As was the horchata. It...More
Or upgrade to margarita for $13 Your receipt also gives you 50% off brunch in October...probably a temporary promotion.
We had wanted to visit for a while and today was the day. No chips and salsa were offered for free, we received a meager portion of chips and salsa for $3.50 plus a meager amount of guacamole for an additional $2. For 2 small...More
Was not sure of what to expect when I came in but was pleasantly surprised. The Aguacate Taco (tempura avocado, coleslaw, corn and bean salsa is amazing) and the chicken tostada was also delicious. Amazing service as well. Will come back.
We got back to what we think are some great tacos. My wife had the Birria, Alam re and Camaron. All good and tasty. I had the Atun, Hongos, and Pescado. Very good, fresh ingredients and tasty. Service was good, and friendly.
Los Cuervos does not take reservations, so we showed up at 5:30 pm. It was already full and there were two groups ahead of us. The waitress said we would have to wait outside because of the fire code. We asked if we could wait...More
Video review on my youtube channel: vancity food crew los cuervos taqueria & cantina . I tried out this place with some friends. We got all of the meat tacos except for the tuna one. The pork and beef brisket tacos were the best in...More
Hands down the best taqueria in town. You might be able to miss the line if you arrive at 5:30pm or 8:00pm.
How can this much goodness be packed into a taco ? The creations here are astounding.meat great and nice choices for vegetarians. The chefs were so into the food; passionate and eager- quite touching to watch. The margs and micheladas were a great start (...More
As a family we love Mexican, healthy alternative, simple and flavourful. We live near by and the Mexican restaurant we frequent down the block was lined up out the door. This was an excellent opportunity to try Los Cuervos, which we had been planning to...More
We popped in for a drink and a snack, looking for a light evening meal. This was a great choice. There were two taco options for me (vegan) and with a slight adjustment to one (which they were absolutely open to) also gluten friendly.
Had to be in Vancouver for a family thing so started looking for places nearby. We lucked out happy hour menu was great value and excellent choices. It's a busy place but we never felt rushed. My wife had the pescadon Baja fish taco and...More
Great place to have the most authentic Mexican tacos (I think) that you can get in this city. Also great selection of drinks. I've been here a few times and really like the atmosphere and once again the food has always been really good.
We were at this place last night - a client of mine mentioned this place to me last summer and it took me a while to pay it a visit. We had the pork shoulder, chorizo, lamb and beef - all were good but the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5400266-Reviews-Los_Cuervos_Taqueria_Y_Cantina-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lotus The Place for Pho Lovers,"Have not been back well over 2 years or more , surprised restaurant still doing great , dropped for quick lunch , very spacious dinning room , need a little update , some area not very clean , not busy at all , menu is...More
I order the pho with soup including all kinds of beef and vegetable salad roll. The pho is delicious especially the beef but the roll is fair only, not my dish.
Wonderful quality and value with authentic tastes and mostly local clientele. Service was both helpful and quick. Well worth a visit.
A simple working business lunch transformed into a culinary adventure - as it is clear that Lotus knows exactly what they were doing. I've been to many Vietnamese noodle houses, but Lotus is, by far, the best I have ever had. The noodles were perfect...More
We were looking for a Pho place while in Richmond and following the reviews chose Lotus. The meals were huge, had to take away the leftovers for later. The taste was as expected and would return if in that part of Richmond in the future.
I went for a business lunch with an associate and ordered Pho Bo Kho. I love Vietnamese and Cambodian stew with soup and noodles. It was simply put--Fantastic! The meat was succulent, slightly chewy in a very satisfying way, and delicious. The portion was so...More
This was our first time to Lotus. We found it by chance, driving around looking for a restaurant mid afternoon. It still had a good number of people eating and it looked promising. The service was prompt and very friendly! Unfortunately we were disappointed with...More
tried several dishes. Pho, noodle, sides, freshness size = 5stars Beef over cooked and soup taste could improve so over all just 3stars Seafood hot&sour, very good = 4 stars Spring roll chicken noodle, very good super fresh vege, fish source great spring roll good...More
Haven't been back for a while, way before I was on Yelp; I used to come here with my co-workers for quick lunches when they are relatively new and the parking at the mall where the restaurant is in was not that crazy. But as...More
If you’re looking for a comforting, steamy bowl of pho - look no further. Located in a busy strip mall with a daunting parking lot lies the best pho restaurant in Vancouver. My go to is always the chicken pho with extra basil. The broth...More
My spouse and I haven’t been back to this pho restaurant since the summer of 2015. After doing a wine tasting at the Lulu Island Winery, we decided to come here for lunch around 12:45 on a Saturday afternoon. Less than 5 minutes after our...More
I used Tripadvisor to try this place. What a great find! It was backed for lunch on a Sunday. The special/Lotus spring rolls were outstanding! If you want good Vietnamese food...This is the place.
If you’re looking for quick service, followed by amazing food - this is your place! Always so nice to come here as I’ve never been disappointed. The restaurant is clean and the waiters are very friendly and sociable. Will always recommend Lotus, as it’s the...More
Been about 10x's Pho is great, lots of options. Parking is ok, not great. Waiting to be seated happens once in while. Staff is good. Sometimes for get items, but bring them rightaway. Tables a little close together. The building atmosphere is kinda boring, has...More
I stopped for lunch at this place which I am well acquainted. The food as usual is very good. On a wonderful summer's day out on the deck I enjoyed the house special vermicelli (B9). That included the Lotus special fried rolls, grilled shrimp paste...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2389825-Reviews-Lotus_The_Place_for_Pho_Lovers-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Lucky Taco,"This place was so cute and cozy and the hostess and waitress was so friendly to me. The food was delicious loved the fish and barbacoa tacos. I can’t wait to come back. The parking in the area sucks because so little of it but...More
We met some friends in Kits and wanted an easy option for food. We decided to do take out from Lucky. It’s a small restaurant with limited seating inside but have a great deck and they also have patio built on to the street. The...More
Went for happy hour after the beach, good price for food and drinks and everything tasted great. Large happy hour list of options. Would recommend going 2-6 people due to smaller tables on patio. We will be back
Wow!! We got fish tacos, cauliflower tacos and barbacoa tacos. They were to die for!! The cauliflower taco was one of the best tacos I've ever had!! I would have tried the sweet corn but they were sold out so it must have been good!...More
The food is good and I love the Bellinis. The tacos are all so full of flavour. At first I thought the tortillas were a bit greasy but after a few bites I think I prefer them that way now. Can't go wrong here.
We had a lovely night in Lucky Taco last night. The food and drinks were really good. Staff were very professional and friendly. Looking forward to going back again.
We live nearby and been there twice. Both times we didn't enjoy it. Sangria is just a wine with water and ice. Tacos are not tasty, one particular waitress was rude, she mixed up our order and asked her helper to bring it. poor girl...More
We had nachos to share then a taco each. The food was quite spicy, even without the Jalapeños!! The pink flamingo margarita was delicious, although small.
Overall I enjoyed my experience at Lucky Taco but I guess based on what other friends told me, I was expecting more. Food and service were ok. Not bad but amazing either.
Came here on a Tuesday afternoon for lunch. I ordered the 4 tacos - baja pescado, grilled corn and 2 crispy cauliflower during Taco Tuesday ($1 off each taco) and it was so filling! They are pretty big and I was really stuffed by the...More
I ended up here with a good friend - we were on our way to a place up the street but they decided to close early that night and were locking up the doors when we arrived. They suggested Lucky Taco - and we were...More
Finally tried this place and can’t wait to go again! Classic street tacos with a few twists, reasonably priced, especially for happy hour. Dave the bartender is fantastic and makes a mean margarita.
Wandering through Kits at midnight, we came across Lucky Taco and were pleasantly surprised. The appies we had were delicious and reasonably priced. We had just missed happy hour, so payed a little more but will definitely coming back to sample more from the menu.
This is a self-admitted semi authentic taqueria. They use well raised meat, sustainable seafood and local produce. Their tortillas are corn so gluten free. I had the Baja Pescado, Crispy Cauliflower, and Spicy Chorizo tacos which were all very flavourful. I ended up eating them...More
I Wanted badly to try this place.. I went by myself in the rain! Let me start with the decor, the interior is fun in that it resembles a small little taco joint in California and the ones in MEXICO. The colors, the use of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12387136-Reviews-Lucky_Taco-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lucy's Eastside Diner,"Small diner with 50s vibe, good basic food and friendly service, enjoyed my bacon and French toast with homemade berry topping
A great little diner with friendly service and a wide ranging menu. Lot's of options for vegetarians and the portion sizes were great.m Nothing mind-blowing but also not bad either, I would recommend if you're in the area but perhaps don't travel to get here.
Stopped in for a early breakfast this morning , not many coffee shop open early around this area , it is a vintage neghbourhood old diner , for sure it will bring you back to the good old 50's/ 60's . stool by the counter...More
Fantastic authentic 1950s American Diner. Great welcome & top notch service from friendly team A bit of a taxi ride from downtown but we’ll worth it Home style meatloaf 5/5 Proper sour buttermilk pancakes - loads of syrup! Left feeling I’d had by long overdue...More
Classic retro (except for the music) and comfortably so! Booths, stools and a great table. Fabulous large real ice cream milk shakes. Raspberry went down very well. Passed on the burgers as already had two on previous nights of this week, but otherwise would have...More
Classic dinner food. Coffee was fantastic. Our server was lovely and provided great service. The other server may need some more training as she was delivering drinks by holding the rims of cups. Very unsanitary.
I love diner food but my food was really not that great. Toast was dried out. Sparsly buttered - although they did provide me with butter when asked. Poached eggs and bacon were good - I guess its the day old bread that did me...More
Great service! The staff are always friendly, the food is always good. It was really cold when we visited but still Highly recommend it.
I was there with family and friends and the burgers were very tasty. The onion rings are to die for. Very small easily accessible friendly restaurant
I’ve driven by the place on my way to work many times and it always looked like a great place to try. We decided to head there for a quick lunch. Checked out the menu and the Grant Marshall burger looked like the one for...More
It was crowded when I went there but the food had no ""WOW!"" factor. Very average food. Fairly quick service but the grub is as ordinary as wallpaper. There is nothing to make one come back again and again. My opinion is -been there, done...More
we went in for the first time in a long while to this local diner on main street. service was not great until we finally able to order. the food was OK, not great. my wife had the BLT and I had the grilled cheese...More
Very cute and very good service! recommend to any family looking for a bite to eat! affordable for a family and very friendly staff
We enjoyed the atmosphere of this diner, the very hospitable service that even included tips on what and where to go in Vancouver - the casual diner brunch was great :)
The server was very good. Even though it is small, they let us stay and visit for as long as we wanted. There is only street parking. We had the Benny - Double. You have a choice of ham, avocado and tomato, smoked salmon and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2230787-Reviews-Lucy_s_Eastside_Diner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ludica Pizzeria,"What a fun place to eat! Pizza was excellent and they had 1000+ games to play while you eat. Staff was friendly and service very good.
A great pizzeria to visit for beer & pizza for a game night either here or at BC Place or Rogers Arena. They have a wall of various board games to play. There’s a nice variety of pizza alternatives for everyone including vegans & vegetarian...More
Had amazing pizza to go from Pizzeria Ludica. We had the cauliflower crust Vul-Kar pizza! It is SO good, the crust is amazing and the Vul Kar had such tasty toppings. Definitely would get pizza from here again!
The offerings are very diverse and interesting. Our Carcassonne pizza with chicken and feta was very delicious. Take out requires 20-25 minutes prep time, so everything is made to order. Very enjoyable.
I went there last night for my son's birthday dinner. This place is really cool. Very bright, which is great for playing games, and they do have a great variety of board games and lots of it!! The Pizza was also great. The guy who...More
I loved this place! Super friendly staff, beautiful decoration, and good lighting made this place feel like home. You can play board games for hours, enjoy the amazing food and have a wonderful time. It was my birthday and the lovely waitress made a quick...More
Decided to do pizza one night while in a condo in Vancouver, and this place was literally a stones throw away. The pizza is good, and very well made. Selection of beers was a little weak (we had one at the bar while we waited...More
It was nice to have a huge selection of games to play while we waited for our order. I'm not even sure how long we waited, but playing a card game while we waited was fun for our family. The food was tasty, wood fired...More
Second night in our Airbnb at Keefer Place and second night eating take out from this restaurant. Both nights we have been very under whelmed. Tonight we waited an hour for 2 Spaghetti Bol and 1 order of garlic bread. When we first ordered we...More
We loved this resutrant. The food was delicious and the variety of board games was great. We ate here twice and never felt that we were rushed to finish our game or food. Definitely recommend.
I love support any local business , Pizzeria Ludica is a new kid on the block ! after the X,mas holiday hustle and bustle ,mum left back to U.K ,girl friend #2 will stay with me till Feb ,(we are going to Hong Kong for...More
Finally found the chance to try Pizzeria Ludica. Really liked the great atmosphere, most patrons seemed to be really pleased playing board games. I didn’t have the time to play any of the games but maybe next time. The food was very good. I had...More
This is my default restaurant for boardgames. The staff are friendly. The pasta and stone oven pizza are great. Prices are reasonable. You have to respect your time limit though. Reservations as highly recommended.
Dinner and board games what a great concept. They had a huge wall filled with board games and a game hostess that literally new the rules to all the games. She hand selected games based on our interest and then taught us the games so...More
Perfect service, free water, delicious pizza, great games! We felt very welcome, after our meal we played a few games without being hurried to leave. Wish we have something like this at home!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11742282-Reviews-Ludica_Pizzeria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lunch Lady,"We got a great table on the ""extended patio"" on the side street, which was perfect. The service was exceptional, and the manager was happy to make change so we could plug the parking meter. The parking cost $10 for two hours, but the meal...More
Fantastic dining experience. Our favourite dish that evening was the lobster and pomelo dish. Succulently delicious. Server Marco, was the perfect balance of cheerful, helpful and mindful. A highlight was meeting executive chef Ben who was personable and welcoming, answering our questions and giving our...More
Booked a table for lunch and really enjoyed our time here. We were advised the table was available for one hour but we didn’t feel rushed. Our server, Alex, was absolutely lovely. She was friendly, genuine and really made our experience. The food and cocktails...More
We went right after a yoga class one evening and it was PHENOMENAL. I couldn’t finish my bowl of beef pho but the cocktails were superb and spot on! Gloria is one of the best with the amount of people coming in and out of...More
Very good meal at this trendy restaurant. We started with the Chag Goi Chay, vegetable spring rolls. Yummy. We shared Rau Xao (stir fry vegetables). Really tasty. Cha CA Thang Long (Ice Cod) that was terrific and tasty. My wife had the Com Chien Cua...More
As there were no reservations available for two weeks out, we opted to try our luck with walk-in for lunch. We were told it was a 20-30minute wait, which turned out to be so well worth it. Everyone in the group loved their dish, and...More
We were driving by and decided to try this place by chance. Had no idea it would be so good. Ordered the carpaccio, clams in coconut curry, steak luc lac and pandan coconut milk tea. All so good! Carpaccio was very tasty and the asian...More
We ate on the patio. The restaurant even has the small tables with plastic 4 legged stools to sit on like in Vietnam. Many memories of sitting on those in so many restaurants in Vietnam and the far east. We ordered four different dishes. Rau...More
WOW!! We had a fabulous meal and the serve was exceptional. Local Scallops were the feature beautifully present and so tasty. My son had the Vegan Pho, it was over the top good. My sister and I shared the Special Fried Rice, Pacific Ling Cod...More
Bustling, hip, Vietnamese restaurant with good service and delicious beef pho. My daughter, who recommended this place has visited numerous times and has always had a good meal here. She wasn't wrong. I will definitely return !
I had an amazing lunch here at Lunch Lady. The food was delicious and the service was great. The pho and the steak was so good. The drinks were amazing too. Definitely would recommend checking this place out and I can't wait to come back...More
What a treat. I stopped in for lunch and enjoyed the lunch special—a chicken and noodle soup. My server and all staff were friendly and helpful and made my afternoon really memorable. Thank you!
Absolutely fantastic. We have tried many times to get in with no luck but today we were determined. We had about a 20 minute wait so we went for a walk and they texted when our table was ready. After eating, I will now wait...More
Like most people we heard about the connection with Anthony Bourdain and had seen the Vietnam episodes. We were curious about the quality of food and service and it did not disappoint. You cannot make reservations so be prepared to wait for a table. Lots...More
Not only is this the best Vietnamese Food I have ever eaten, but some of the best food. I went with my Vietnamese born friend. We shared three small plates - pork belly skewers, veg spring rolls and the special of the day. Fresh and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21171793-Reviews-Lunch_Lady-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lupo Restaurant,"Food was outstanding and the service was second to none. Left restaurant very full and satisfied. Highly recommend this restaurant. You won’t leave hungry.
Very good Italian food excellent ingredients and menu items. Wine list is extensive with some excellent labels however service was a off putting but will return
We walked in off the street after a long flight and day. We were lucky and found a table. The service was excellent; helpful and attentive without being obtrusive. The food was fanstatic. For mains we had steak and veal . The wine selection was...More
This was the first time back to Lupo in over 6 years, and we were not disappointed. Service from Jeff was very attentive, in fact when a very large and rowdy group were seated next to us, he took the liberty of moving us to...More
If you're not on a budget, this place is great! And it's not really a place you ask what the prices are (for specials not on the menu). We were greeted by someone that looked like the owner/manager and he sat us at a table...More
First visit to Lupo and was very impressed. Old house had a quiet and comfortable feel to it. Professional, friendly and attentive service throughout. The caprese salad starter was to die for, beautiful presentation and taste. The sablefish special was also a brilliant choice. I...More
We stumbled upon Lupo after an exceptionally long week of intensive work meetings and long haul travel. It was the perfect wind down experience with excellent ambience and service. The food was delicious and impressive.
We had dinner here and it did not disappoint! The food was absolutely delicious and the service was also amazing. A must-do in Vancouver.
This was our first time back to Vancouver from the U.S. after 3 years of Covid restrictions. We were happy that Lupo survived but worried that its quality might have suffered. We're happy to report that our worries were unfounded. We were thrilled to see...More
I felt like I was dining in Italy. The food was exquiste I ordered the burrata which was the most delcious burrata with local tomatoes I have ever tasted!! The carpaccio was outstanding. The wild mushroom pasta was also incredible as was the fettucine with...More
It was so good the first time that we went again. Food is tremendous from salads to pasta to specials to dessert. Over two visits, had a salad, a special appetizer, a special seafood with pasta, roasted vegetables, spaghettini amitriciana, 2 kinds of wine, and...More
We had exceptional service from every person we encountered. We shared the burrata salad special & focaccia bread; they were both phenomenal. Our main dishes were also excellent and one of the best tiramisus we have had along with a perfectly hot espresso. They acknowledged...More
Walked in as a solo and despite the restaurant being absolutely packed they immediately sat me and were very gracious! All of the staff are very professional and each member of staff was non stop working and moving . Seamlessly. None acted burned out or...More
We have eaten here several time pre-pandemic and recently had a cance to visit them again. It is a good restaurant, the staff are very good but the itchen is slipping. It could be the staffing issues that all service industry is experiencing but next...More
We have been to this restaurant under various names over the last 3 decades but not for a couple of years at least. Went for a birthday dinner for 2 friends; interestingly booking required a phone call rather than online but this seems to be...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710524-Reviews-Lupo_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Lynn Canyon Cafe,"I’m happy that this place is existing at the Lynn Canyon Park. Their menu is just perfect for everyone. So nice to have food and beverages immediately after a hike. The place is very nice and staff are friendly. It’s very busy day so we...More
Please serve your coffee without plastic mugs. It‘s not green. Coffee is good....... Bagels are tasty
This café is at the end/beginning of the trail system for Lynn Canyon and the suspension bridge. It isn’t high-end but it is perfect for a quick lunch after hiking. The teenage staff members were friendly and service was prompt. My BLT was hot and...More
This little cafe was a surprise on our way to the suspension bridge. Although they were out of my first two choices for lunch (busy day, small business), I got a delicious florentine panini and others in my party got burgers or chicken sandwiches, and...More
We dropped into the Lynn Canyon cafe while looking around the park. Staff were friendly and service was quick. The food here was of reasonable price and very tasty.
The panini was excellent. Bread that is crispy on the outside and soft in the middle. Good flavor. Added a cup of Americano on this chilly day after a 10 mile hike. Hit the spot 👍.
Came for a hike and was actually surprised to find a little cafe and coffee shop....pleasantly surprised for I grabbed a cup of Joe and just rested my bones a bit after the hike. There is also food available. All a bit more expensive than...More
The Café is very small, and limited items. Of course it is in a beautiful setting but not too many tables. Prices I found quite high, but I guess you can expect that as there is nothing around there for snacks for a mile or...More
I was surprised how nice the café was. We spent a few hours hiking some of the trails in the park and it felt good to get a cool drink. Nice chairs and small table to chill for a bit.
The location, service and building are good but the food is average at inflated tourist prices. We had Florentine panini (bland) with uncooked chips and our friends had Tuna Melt which they said was good.
We went for a hike. After hike we stopped at lynn valley cafe. The server who took my order was very rude to me . He was friendly to the man before me. I had a very disappointing experience. Not a friendly place towards foreigners....More
We went at about midday expecting it to be really busy however there was no problems getting a table. We ordered a breakfast wrap and a garden burger and both were very tasty and served quickly.
My wife and I visited Lynn Canyon, and after hiking for several hours, we stopped off at the Lynn Canyon Cafe to get a bite. We assumed it would be cheap, low-quality food and were pleasantly surprised to find out how wrong we were. My...More
This restaurant is located at the entrance of the park and is an ideal spot to refresh yourself after you have been hiking. I had a Mountain Climber Burger with bacon. It is like a small oases. After a long hike this is a great...More
Good to have snacks after hiking and with in the forest cafe. Food was nice. There is one cafe at the start of the hike and this is the second one inside the trail.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1573168-Reviews-Lynn_Canyon_Cafe-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MASA Japanese restaurant,"It is a late owl's hang out , they open till 1.30 am restaurant is locater on the second floor on Broadway , very spacious and bright , no problem with the Covid 19 guidelines , took a friend for later dinner , about 8.30...More
Masa Japanese Restaurant is located on the corner of Hemlock and West Broadway on the 2nd floor, overlooking the small mini mall below. I fondly remember having our first Japanese restaurant date at a now defunct Japanese restaurant in the same location many moons ago....More
Just had lunch at Masa with workmates. I enjoyed my meal: assorted katsu curry (Japanese curry with tonkasu, Ebi fry aka fried prawns, goroke and rice). It was like home cooked food - flavourful and yummy. We were also impressed with the speed and type...More
Like the title says, this is some of my favorite sushi ever! Food and prices are great, service is good (a bit slow but fine). I'll be back!
Friendly servers, nice private booth areas and great food! This is a fun place for sushi, udon and other items. Great beer specials too.
Great all around. Quality of food, service, casual decor and price. Good quality sashimi. I would definitely recommend for lunch.
Went there for the Udon (soup and fried) and found the food to be very tasty. The service was a bit slow and to be honest they servers didn't really seem bothered whethere we were there or not. The portions were normal - the ingridients...More
We visited for a convenient girls' night out dinner - lots of food options for all palates. Veggies, protein, bait or sashimi, and other carbs of course. Nice portions for small appetites so order a few dishes if you're a big eater. Service is not...More
Located on the second floor so not sure if any elevator access. The service was good and attentive. I had a miso ramen and spinach gomae to squeeze a vegetable in. Both items were good and I was done within an hour on a Thursday...More
I am a professional chef with years of cooking experience, and I think Masa is a true gem. Born and raised in Vancouver (the birthplace of the BC roll and California roll), I've been quite spoiled when it comes to Japanese cuisine, and if I...More
We ordered two vegetarian meals. After waiting quite a while we were finally served a chicken dish and a beef dish. Server took the meals back and we were eventually served the meals we ordered. Food was tasty but certainly not the best Japanese I...More
My wife and I dropped by for lunch. She had the Tonkatsu Curry with rice dish and I had the Tonkotsu Ramen noodle soup. That’s not a typo. TonkAtsu means pork cutlet while TonkOtsu means pork bones. My soup broth is prepared by boiling pork...More
This was recommended by a friend and business colleague for a girls' night out for sushi. Other friends came in from the West Side and Victoria. Best to share a bunch of dishes family style. That way you can enjoy more of the menu. The...More
A group of four of us decided to try out this restaurant which is located on the second story in a reasonable venue. The Chicken Katsu was excellent and a filling meal. The beef Yaki Soba was considered to be reasonable but the beef Yaki...More
My friend is of Japanese origins. We lunch here on an average of once every two weeks. He is very fussy when it comes to Japanese cuisine. His main complaint is that often cheap rice is substituted for real Japanese rice. The batter on the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8514194-Reviews-MASA_Japanese_restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MDG Ma Dang Goul,"Tasty food hardly any wait times for take out and reasonably priced what more could you ask for staff was friendly. Enjoy
I ordered take out from this place while I was staying nearby. My order was prepared quickly, and it was ready when I arrived for pickup. This dish was supposed to have pork belly in it, but there was barely any. There was maybe a...More
If to order only two things, we share the stone rice bowl and japchae noodle dish. Food is consistent and comes out fairly quick. Lots of pay street parking.
We came here ten minutes before they closed and they let us in. We ordered the stone bowl Beef Dolsot Bibimbap, one of our favorite dishes because of the variety of ingredients and we decided to try the Beef Daenjang Jjigae soup too. On a...More
Good service and generous portion on top of great variety but food was poor, especially the overcooked seafood omelette. Fair prices.
After 2-3 months not dining out due to COVID, this was our first place we dined in. Us and another table were the only ones eating which was perfect to keep physically distant from others. We very much enjoyed the seafood pancake, beef bibimbap and...More
One of our staples in the west end to come for Korean. We came here about an hour before close for a late dinner. Good service, great food every time.
On the recommendation of a tour guide, we checked out several restaurants on Denman Street and chose this one based on previous reviews. We were not disappointed! My husband ordered the ""regular"" Bi Bim Bop. The portion was huge with lots of meat and vegetables....More
Delicious authentic Korean, great service, great prices. Boom 💥 I like the spicy pork with rice and soup on the side.
We came by here a couple times for dinner while visiting. It's good food, but nothing sensational. Standard dishes prepared well, but no finesse. My Singaporean girlfriend (who particularly likes Korean Food) liked their soups but thought their egg was really plain. They are quick...More
This place reminds me of the amazing cuisine I had in Korea. The Bi bim bap is especially yum. They have pictures of most every dish so if you are not sure of what something is it will give you an idea.
This time we went for lunch on a Sunday on a rainy Vancouver day. It was fairly easy to get a table. We had the beef bibimbap and spicy chicken thigh combo with tofu soup and sides. Delicious!
Kind od a hole in the wall place with fantastic food! I had seafood and my husband had ribs. We were both happy!!!
Went with my girlfriend, we shared the Hot Pot with pork and it was very tasty. Huge size!!!! A little small location so not very romantic because you are almost sitting with other people (common thing in Vancouver).
MDG is our go-to Korean restaurant. The service is good, and the food is even better. Last time we went we had the seafood pancake (haemul pajeon), jap chae noodles, spicy tofu soup (beef soondubu), and spicy grilled chicken (dakgalbi). There were also mini dishes...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d800311-Reviews-MDG_Ma_Dang_Goul-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Madras Spice,"I’m a regular customer of this restaurant. But my today’s visit was totally beyond my expectations - There were no hair nets and face covering which are considered as one of the most basic requirements for the kitchen staff especially, when the pandemic is still...More
Reasonably good food, well priced too. Nothing extraordinary about this place or its menu Good Indian comfort food like it is.
Awesome and very tasty food. Very Nice and pleasant Decor. Exceptional and fast service. Very good and large portions, serving authentic South-Indian food. Highly recommend this place.
This is a very small restaurant close to the Punjabi Market area of Vancouver, but very definitely southern Indian cuisine with an emphasis on dhosa. I enjoyed the Andhra mirchi bhajji which is a common street food in India but quite unusual in Vancouver. Since...More
Took home for dinner , Chicken Chettinadu & Madras Spice Chicken Curry .My selection was for spicy . Had both this dishes simulteneously for comparing. Both were outstanding and had freshness of spices .Whole family enjoyed throughly.I will be visiting more.
This is probably the only place in all of Vancouver / lower mainland that serves a wide variety of authentic South Indian specialities. This place has a good variety of dosas of course, but you're truly missing out of you don't try the other items...More
If you are craving south indian food then you can give it a try but if you are craving authentic south indian food then you can give it a miss. This is certainly not the best south indian restaurant in Vancouver but it is amongst...More
Nice. A must try place in Vancouver. Staffs are very friendly and attentive. Still have the flavor of bryani in my mouth.
Average Indian food. South Indian to be exact. The curried chicken was Ok, but the naan was previously frozen and not fresh
We had lunch here on the way to Vancouver. We liked it so much that we went there again a couple of days later when driving back to Seattle. We started with pepper style baby corn, was very good. Dosa, vada, kesari mini tiffin was...More
Good menu, Well prepared food, nice selection of dishes, when your palate gets jaded with local food make a visit to this indian restaurant.
I finally visited this restaurant for lunch and was looking forward to the thali. I have had thali in many parts of the world, and this was, not bad, but not great. I found the portions very small. I like spicy food, and I found...More
This cozy restaurant is located on Fraser just above 49th Ave. The restaurant is spotlessly clean with their own logo-inspired art works on the wall. I had the goat (boneless) vindaloo and it was unbelievably good! I will be dreaming of this meal for months....More
Our good friend Vineeta who lives in the neighborhood insisted that we try the Madras Spice for dinner. Of course she did the ordering so I wasn't too familiar with the various dishes but to say that with the exception of one dish our dinner...More
Good Time at Madras spice Vancouver has slowly been gaining a reputation as a bastion of food innovation. And I don't doubt that for a bit. I have been dining in some of Vancouver’s best-kept secrets for many years now, and I must say it's...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10168074-Reviews-Madras_Spice-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Maenam,"We enjoyed the tasting menu food. The reason for three stars was ambience and management. The restaurant sat 5 loud people in a table for 4 since they brought an extra person. They came into our space pushing my wife into a corner. The people...More
~~~ Dine out Vancouver 2023 #2 ~~~ Maenam is very modern Tai restaurant located between Cypress St and Maple St in Kitsilano , not a big place but cozy with top authentic Tai cuisine , the Dine out Vancouver 2023 very creative well planned not...More
This is one of 2 upscale Thai restaurants in the Lower Mainland (Baan Lao in Richmond is the other). I think the atmosphere here has a more modern vibe than Baan Lao, much more casual and definitely not as pricey. I like this as a...More
Satisfactory, based exclusively on my own experience, and from the vegetarian point of view. The place is small and nicely designed. The service was very good. There are a few vegetarian options, not many though, in the Main Course dishes, and a few - in...More
We loved every aspect of this restaurant!! The thai food was innovative and unexpected, the best meal of our stay - even with a selective (picky) daughter and two teen boys! The pad thai was my favorite, non-traditional and superb. The sticky rice with crunchies...More
Family outing, group of five, we tried most/many items on the menu. Everything was impressive from the mussels to the sausage and fried rice appie, the Pad Thai, the beef, eggplant and deep fried cod. Wonderful meal, great service. Highly recommended!!
Maenam’s Owner/Chef, Angus An, is no culinary slouch, & that is to understate it. He has formally trained at one of the most prestigious schools — NYC’’s French Culinary Institute — apprenticed at some of the finest restaurants; worked at the best in Montreal &...More
I arrived in Vancouver and went here the first night of my trip. Big mistake as after that I didn't want to eat anywhere else. The food was so delicious! The hot and sour soup with halibut was one of the best soups I have...More
This place was recommended to us from three different sources and they were right. We love Thai food and this place confirmed it even more. It was busy on a Tuesday summer night but we put our names down and walked around until it was...More
We had the chef's tasting menu, and I highly recommend it. The dishes were diverse, delicious, and complemented each other. The atmosphere was intimate and friendly, and we had a lively time. Make sure to try the cocktails too, since they are especially creative and...More
Did takeout from them this weekend, I've been eating Thai food for 30 years and I'd say it was the worst I've eaten. It was over $100 for 4 dishes and they were all bad. Pad Thai was greasy and tasteless , chicken curry was...More
this restaurant features a very quality and well thought out interior structure that invites the customer into an atmosphere where dining and ease of comfort makes the entire evening a special event..the Thai cuisine offers very distinct flavours and blends traditional with a contemporary touch..the...More
The chicken wings remained scrawny but tasty. We won't have those again. Hardly any chicken. The papaya salad was a small portion for alot of money but tasty. Not a great value. The 2 mains we ordered were duck and the veggie eggplant. Sorry but...More
Technology may be good but sometimes the old fashion way of calling the restaurant may also work, this is how we got our table! Nowadays, using APPs to book a table is almost the norm, but in my attempt to do this at Maenam, I...More
We ordered both wings the original and the black pepper. The wings were very scrawny. The original were a bit tasty with the tamaring sauce (not enough) and the black pepper were kicky. The half chicken with soup and jasmine rice was good but not...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1809922-Reviews-Maenam-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Malone's Taphouse,"Called in here on Sunday 23rd for drinks and pizza, food was ok, but not very warm...everything was fine until i saw mice running around. Pointed this out to the server, she said oh no...and walked off, obviously she knew they have a problem. Get...More
Very comfortable brewpub, the food was filling and the atmosphere was very fun and social lots of younger people having a good time at big tables
Stumbled upon this fab bar our first night in Vancouver! Loved the relaxed and friendly atmosphere. Staff so helpful and attentive, especially the girl who’s first shift it was! Sampled a few flights and cocktails which were fab, and food was just what we wanted,...More
We dont want to give a review cause we dont want to not be able to reserve a table....BUT we cannot do any less! This bar, staff chefs etc are the best...absolutely the best. The food is the best weve ever had in a pub...its...More
We hadn't been to Malone's for years and weren't sure what to expect. Pleasantly surprised! The place is actually quite large and well-maintained. Not busy at all on a Sunday night. The food was excellent and certainly priced better than most of the restaurants in...More
we sat at the bar late one evening and just loved our bartender The beer list is great and the cheery woman that looked after us made us want to return. thanks for the hospitality
Love the old school cozy comfort of the place. Good selection of beers and pub grub. We enjoyed the prosciutto pizza. It was quite nice to see a prosciutto topped mozzarella cheese pizza.
Sat at the bar and realized I am a bit old for this crowd. But I figured it is a big enough place it should not matter. Bartender refused to acknowledge me, while others came and went. FInally I get a drink, order the wings....More
My spouse and I chose this restaurant due to the interesting Dine Out menu (only available for Dine Out). Overall we were quite disappointed. The appetizers were quite overcooked and mediocre flavors at best. The main entrees were much better, not amazing but very reasonable....More
Last time I visited Malone’s, it was an indifferent experience on account of the service. Very much a case of, you need us more than I needed them. Four years on, I decided to give Malone’s another chance. Business must clearly be booming for them...More
There is nothing special about the pub. Good atmosphere and a good location. In the summer when warm they open up all the windows on to the street. Food is okay, not outstanding, service was good. Have nice comfy booths that seat 5 or 6...More
I was travelling alone so rather than taking up a table, I sat at the bar and waited a long time before one of the three bartenders that were behind the bar actually dealt with me (I was sitting right by the register which they...More
Checked in after late night arrival in Vancouver. Good music, wide variety of beers and many young people.
We ate here before heading back to our hotel due to its proximity. The food was good (I had shrimp tacos) and there were plenty of local beers to choose from. Service was a bit slow, but we weren't in any hurry.
Been there to celebrate my birthday. It took ages to get the server to come to my table and take our order. After a while, she wanted to take one of the tables booked for my party, because some of my friends weren’t there yet....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d706543-Reviews-Malone_s_Taphouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mamie Taylor's,"Rudely asked to leave by the host for next party after we paid bill and we were STILL eating! Pretty unbelievable.
This place is the absolute worst. Value for food or drink is rock bottom. Staff sat around talking to each other rather than checking in with the 3 tables that were present. Food was bland and presentation was awful - though I believe that was...More
Amazing atmosphere and really good staff, best burger in town and plenty of hip healthy options. Will be coming back once a week
I highly recommended the pan seared steel head. It was soooo good. We were a group of 6 who made a reservation for dinner here. Everything was easy dealing with the restaurant and the table was ready for us when we all arrived on time....More
It was supposed to be a decent trip to Vancouver this weekend and decided to join few friends at this place 'Mamie Taylor' off Georgia street until they missed my order, and the waitress did not have the decency to approach me to let me...More
We went to this establishment expecting to have good service and food, especially from reading the reviews. However our experience was not that! Our friends were ignored to the point they had to leave, when we complained the ""manager"" he was so passive aggressive/sarcastic that...More
At first glance, my friend and I were a little skeptical as to what we had gotten ourselves into, being thrown off by the taxidermy on the walls. But the burger and fries are one to remember ! The fries were crisp in all the...More
I come for the kale + mushroom salad, and the Mamie Taylor cocktail. The staff has been consistently amazing, just raw chill and unpretentious. The atmosphere is very welcoming. The heavy wood and brick tones, taxidermy and American-inspired meals set it apart from other hipster...More
Hate to be negative but this place deserves to be taken down a notch. The service was friendly but incompetent. The menu reflected what lumbersexuals and their ilk think is great food - southern fried chicken, Belgian waffles and gravy. Personally I hate taxidermy and...More
This place is an actual, real life experience in 'above and beyond'. The food, the atmosphere, and the people are just top notch. 😍😚
We loved the biscuits. Menu suited meat eaters and vegetarians Found the place quiet in the day time and lively during the evening. A plus for drink selection. This will become a go to place when I am visiting family in Vancouver.
It was a dark and narrow venue with the bustle of a popular restaurant/bar. We booked ahead for a group of 5 and got a comfy booth at the back. Our server was really friendly and attentive. The menu was interesting and I enjoyed my...More
Place was very quiet on a sunday morning. TVs on NFL which i liked. Staff was friendly. I ordered the chicken and waffles which were average. The chicken was pretty good, not the best I've had but it was good. The waffles however were disappointing,...More
I have stopped in to eat here many times and at various times of the day (brunch - dinner) and absolutely every time I have been thoroughly satisfied with the dining experience. I am surprised it is not as popular as it deserves to be....More
We were lucky to get a reserve for five on a Saturday night with only a couple of days notice but a table for five was in fact for four with another squeezed in along the banquette. We managed but we realized as we left...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4848966-Reviews-Mamie_Taylor_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mangia E Bevi,"I live on Vancouver Island and was looking for a venue in West Vancouver for my mother’s 90th birthday dinner celebration for 14 or 15 people at the end of June. I had heard good things about Mangia E Bevi and they had good reviews...More
The rack of lamb with the Dijon-rosemary crust was deeeeeeelicious. No room for dessert, but my tastebuds were left totally satisfied.
Mangia E Bevi is a bit of Italian magic in the heart of West Vancouver. The food is authentic, adventurous, and delicious. The wine list is well-considered, and the service is impeccable. Try going midweek, so you have room and time to explore all their...More
As good as ever. The short rib special was superb and so were the Vesuvio and Roberto. Excellent cocktails. The service was efficient. Three cocktails and a bottle of Antinori Vie Cave Malbec, the total cost was Can$279 for four people. That’s Can$70 a head...More
Menu is simple and well organized, service was good, and food was great. Price was a tad on the expensive side but this is West Van after all!
Got invited for my partner's Sapphire anniversary dinner , It is very romantic authentic upscale Italian restaurant in North Short , we have reservation for six , menu is very classic Italian cuisine , lot to choose from , and good wine selection too ,...More
My favourite restaurant in the Vancouver greater area. Haven’t been there since January 2020 and I was not surprised at all that it continues to be as good as it was back then. The pastas are simply superb as is the service. Shall be returning...More
My wife and I are recent residents to West Vancouver. A friend recommended Mangia E Bevi for dinner. We were not dissapointed. The service was excellent from our warm receiption by the host to the attentive service by our waiter Ken. Although we had reserved...More
This was one of our favorite restaurants and during virus restrictions we often had takeout which was excellent. Our recent return to in-person was shockingly disappointing. There was only one waiter for the large number of tables and the bus-persons who tried hard were inexperienced...More
My husband and I came here for dinner last night for the first time, but it was the third time for our friends who were with us. The restaurant had a nice atmosphere and offers dine in, outside and take out. It was a chilly...More
We have frequently dined at Mangia E Bevi and have introduced many family members and friends to this fine restaurant. In all the years that we have dined here we have never been disappointed. Last evening was no exception. We had a lovely table on...More
Have ordered twice during the virus. Food packeged to keep warm and service was excellent. Have set-up outside to pick up food and pay with a tap of the credit card. Good discount on food and also from the extensive wine list. And, of course...More
I have started out by giving this restaurant 5 stars because I truly think it is an excellent restaurant. However, we called last night to order pick up and was flabbergasted by the treatment we got over the phone. The gentleman was abrupt, rude and...More
This is one of my favorites on the North Shore. The staff are always friendly and inviting. I just feel special from the moment we come in the door. The menu is full of delicious options. They have a great wine list too! If you...More
Enjoyed our B.A.C.I.O. dinner here - amazing value, with $ going to hospitals so it's for a great cause. Portions were very generous and food was very good and reliable, though not to the level of innovative or unusual. Service was a bit uneven but...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d1340716-Reviews-Mangia_E_Bevi-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mangos Kitchen Bar,"We found this restaurant while driving to the airport. And, what a find! We were very lucky because that day there was a visiting chef from Chile. We had wonderful ceviche and a great causa. Service was attentive, friendly, and professional. Just a great experience....More
Mangos is my favorite Latin place I love the food, the environment and the people are very nice. Party is very good at this people everyone is dancing and having fun. I love it!
Thanks for your review
We waited an hour and a half and didn’t receive our food. Worst experience being from out of town. I won’t recommend. Then they wanted is to pay for our drinks. Don’t go!! To add insult to injury…3 of us left due to the horrendous...More
We've been here a few times now and the drinks are always amazing. The atmosphere in here is super lively and fun, the music is great and the staff are really nice. We sat at the bar both times and Esteban who was our bartender...More
It has a great staff, excelent service , good BABY MANGOS ! and of course a tasty latin cousine 👌 you should try the baby mango’s. It is a family place, good music and an enjoyable place to chill ☺️
I had a great night with my friends enjoying the Latin cuisine, the arroz chaufa is so tasty, birria tacos and some nachos to share, perfect combo with some mangonadas and pasión fruit margaritas! Staff was very friendly.
Decided to go to have a girl’s night at Mangos!! We ordered their delicious chicken burritos and decided to try their arroz chaufa ( Peruvian Chinese rice) for the first time as well!! Everything was to die for... we will definitely be back!!
We Are happy to hear that.! Thanks
My kids enjoyed with the really food ""lomo saltado"", and this time I tried ""ceviche"" and ""Pisco sour"", my wife ate ""rib-eye al tequila"" and was bigger than I thought, the best place to come with the entire family!
Thanks !
We enjoyed their delicious snacks... nachos, wings, empanadas, tacos, arepas, alfajores while sitting in their refreshing patio with a nice cold drink. Pleasant music & very friendly and attentive service. We will definitely come again! 😋 Thank you 😊
Happy to hear that..
I finally found it “The Peruvian Ceviche”. Delicious.! Plus my Wife ordered couple of Mexican dishes Tacos and Pozole Amazing!
It Is a really good place for dinner, the food is really tasty. And the prices are reasonable. People there is really friendly. I spend a good time there.
Thanks. Hope to see ya again
First time I tried the Peruvian dishes and i love the Ceviche highly recommended , i really like the mango michelada.
We are happy to hear that..
Great place if you like Latin Salsa Music, they have lessons for the ones willing to learn, the place is always packed on the weekend so is better to arrive early to avoid paying the cover or making the line, if not, it is a...More",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15001938-Reviews-Mangos_Kitchen_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Manoush'eh,"I have eaten several times at Manoush'eh in Vancouver downtown and each time I'm amazed at how delicious, fresh and good the food is there. Meat pies, cheese pies, veggie pies, desserts, hummus, etc...all so tasty and ready in minutes. The customer service is excellent...More
You feel like you are at home at Manoush'eh. The owner greets you in such a welcoming way. The place has 3 tables and 6 to 8 chairs. The pita is made fresh every minute of the day that this place is open. so beyond...More
Small and can be busy so try for off hours — or takeout. The owner is actually behind the counter as he’s always been. The food is wonderful. And there are a couple of tables by open window that lets you watch the street scene...More
The place is so good! I took the falafel and it's served on an handmade dough and comes with a tasty lentil soup, 100% recommend!
We went in after we volunteered at Vancity. We had a delicious falafel sandwich and the backed Kanafeh. Both were perfect. A little pricey-ish, but good. Service at the counter. The owner is very hands on and a nice guy. Limited # of tables.
This is a very small Lebanese restaurant in downtown Vancouver. We went for lunch. They only had about 3 inside tables and all were taken. The owner kindly invited us to sit outside and said he would set up a table there. He was very...More
Friendly efficient service and very good value for money. The Kafta - ground beef, onion & parsley pie at $8.50 was excellent. I plan to be more adventurous next time. Tiny premises - more takeaway than eat in.
Delicious Lebanese style flatbread made hot and fresh. I had the Falafel flatbread but I’m going to work my way through the menu. The food was delicious and the couple(?) that have the place were very friendly. The food came quickly but I felt comfortable...More
Love this place. Veggie options are delicious. There's a very small (but very cute) area for seating. We love watching the chef prepare the food, very mesmerizing. The food quantity is a little smaller than I expected for the price, but the quality is great....More
This is a small place on Davies street that you can easily miss, but I am so glad we didn't! We had the Soujouk and Falafel, with Jebneh for the kids. It was unique, and unbelievably delicious. We have eaten all over the world, and...More
my wife and i stopped in, for the first time, after a movie at Vancity Theater to this small but yummy and cozy eatery on Davie. we ordered the falafel and the zaatar and lebneh flat breads. both were tasty, flavorful, and unique and yummy....More
Holy cow!!! Three of us went. We were asked what we want. We said we didn’t know. He said, “I’ll bring you two... or do you want three?” We said three. Holy cow!!! The first was (vegan) falafel but falafel like we’d never had— the...More
Very nice rearaurant/ Bakery . I didn’t no anything about food from Lebanon. The chef told me that he should make something good for me and my husband, he sure did 😋 and the coffee was strong and the chef made also very nice desserts...More
Visited this warm and cozy place on Davie street with friends from different parts of the world. A super friendly ""flat bread bakery"" that left us all with exceptional memories. Highly recommended for casual dining. Look no further if interested in a quick bite with...More
I am thrilled that this excellent Lebanese restaurant has opened on Davie St. My parents have lived in Lebanon, and I've been there so while I'm not an expert, I do have some familiarity with Lebanese food. So far, I've only tried their za'atar flatbread,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13185926-Reviews-Manoush_eh-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Maple Grill Restaurant,"It’s recently re-opened and we found the food to be great! For hours and menu, go to the vancouver Kollel website. I had the classic burger with fries. The hand cut fries were amazing! My wife had the brisket sandwich. Huge! She had to take...More
We attended a reception/dinner there last night and the variety of offerings was amazing and all were simply delicious. The staff were very courteous & helpful and the atmosphere was welcoming and nice.
We had arrived in Vancouver and fancied a kosher meal. We took a taxi from our city centre hotel. The menu looked great and we ordered hummus and meat balled filled mushrooms to start, and then chicken penne pasta and schnitzel for our main meals....More
After a week eating fish and dairy, having a ""fleishig"" meal was a treat. Truth be told, we had ordered in a Shabbat meal from Maple Grill and that was great, so we decided to go to the restaurant. We had two appetizers, two main...More
Coming from the bustling East Coast, I was pleasantly surprised at the warmth and friendliness of Maple Grill's staff. They were professional, accommodating of my dietary needs, and provided sumptuous food. Beautiful place!
We enjoyed the food at this restaurant. We were there twice during our trip and both times the place was full, which slowed service somewhat. The brisket , shnitzel, and the burgers were delicious. So were the sliders and sweet potato fries.
We had some of the best Kosher food we have ever tasted at Maple Grill. Make sure to try the braised lamb shank! Was very busy both times we went. They could have done with a couple more servers to ease the pressure. However, despite...More
We booked a table on-line for 8pm. We arrived on time to find five or six groups of other people in front of us who had also booked. There were no spare tables, and the hostess who was also serving, just ignored all those in...More
The Maple Grill kosher restaurant could be reached with ease by public transportation from Downtown Vancouver and from Richmond. The food was great: had a kale salad and a chicken breast. The only problem was the amount of people. They said it is bp only...More
We visited Vancouver from LA, this restaurant has absolutely amazing food and great service! Highly recommend it!!! We ate the Chipotle Burgers, Steak, Matzoh Ball Soup, Mushroom soup, and dessert!!!
Visited the restaurant 3 times during our visit to Vancouver. Great food excellent service Surley recomend
For the Kosher traveler, this was great! We really enjoyed this restaurant and had great meals. The food was very tasty, the service great, nice restaurant, really nice staff. The presentation of the food was also very good, which is not always typical in a...More
We were shocked to find this restaurant empty (but one table). Although food was served quickly (the starter was okay), none of our mains were good. It was 30 min. to kitchen closing (9pm), so that might have been the reason, however it is not...More
We were very pleased, Delicious food and quite a nice menu. This is the only proper Kosher restaurant in Vancouver.
This remains the fanciest kosher restaurant in Vancouver. The staff are attentive and knowledgeable and accommodating. The food quality is good. The best place in town to eat.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1990374-Reviews-Maple_Grill_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Marcello Pizzeria,"We went here for a birthday dinner and left very satisfied and full. From being greeted immediately at the door and seated, to getting our food this place takes the cake. We had the fried Calamari and Caesar salad to start with a great bottle...More
Thank you for your review
We stopped in for lunch and had a great meal. Service was fast and friendly. The pizza oven is very cool. Even better was the taste of the pizza that came out. It is true to its Neapolitan roots. The pasta special was also very...More
Very nice performance and taste of dishes. Environment was warm, and the the area so clean. That's all.
We had pizzas from here me and a few of my work mates and I have to say one of the best pizza I had in B.C I will definitely be back on my return to vancover highly recommend 👌
We did not have a reso and came at about 8pm on a Friday night. The only table they had was in a tiny space right next to the bathrooms, all the way at the back of the restaurant. The long walk there was difficult...More
Great Italian restaurant in Little Italy Vancouver. Service was good, food was very rich and full of flavour. Large portions and inexpensive
A friend and I went for lunch today to Marcello's Restaurant. I have had good pizza there before but today I thought I would try their Clams in white wine sauce with a touch of tomatoes. I was very surprised and disappointed when the order...More
The foods and services were really great. All were Italian style. I will definitely go there again. Everybody was satisfied with the food both Pizza and Lasagna. The server was really professional and informative behavior.
Very expensive for so so food that took forever to arrive. The restaurant was nice inside but sooo noisy and cramped. I wouldn’t go back
Best carbonara & pizza , we went 2 times during our visit and tried quite a few dishes and all were great
I ordered the carbonara and the pasticciati which were both phenomenal! 5/5. In their pasta section, they have 20 different kinds to choose from so youre bound to find something you like. I ordered for take out so im rating them solely on the food,...More
Good reception, excellent service, good food, nice place to be in. Bravo Marcello reign on this place with a high professional ideal. the satisfaction here of the clients is the noble concern of Mr. Marcello the sole owner.
Had an amazing time here, the staff were amazing and the food was incredible. Definitely recommend checking this place out, and we will back again soon!
The food and service are exceptional. The salads are large and the pizza is delicious. This restaurant is a staple on Commercial Drive.
i love this place, excellent food & service. the staff was very friendly and kind.Very good and quality food for breakfast",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d783778-Reviews-Marcello_Pizzeria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Maria's Taverna,"Authentic and delicious Greek cuisine! The service was prompt and pleasant. Food arrived quickly and was freshly cooked. A definite must-go!
Food taste there about average, nothing special or spectacular. Place itself is a bit cozy and nice. Staff is mostly knowledgeable about food and drink.
Walking along west 4th looking for lunch I see Maria’s across the street and say to my wife I could really go for avagolemono soup and spanicopita,so we went in and saw a nice cozy taverna. I really felt we were in the right place...More
Maria's has long been a favorite Vancouver restaurant. Last Sunday afternoon we hosted a post-COVID wedding celebration there with 23 guests from four countries. The food was great, the staff were attentive and super flexible and the few patrons also in attendance were friendly in...More
Maria’s Taverna on 4th in Kits is good for desserts too. Yes Greek eateries are commonly associated with Lamb dishes and other meat dishes like moussaka but Greek cuisine offers great desserts as well. Having had a main meal, I fancied a Greek dessert and...More
Great find. We truly appreciated our meal. They went out of there way to accommodate our family of 6 for a late lunch. The platters were delicious, especially the lamb.
Great place for dinner. Food was amazing fresh well priced. Spoke with Javid the owner great service terrific food.
Maria’s Taverna, a long-established Greek restaurant on Kitsilano well-populated 4th Ave restaurant strip, just off Vine, makes diners feel welcome the moment they step in. J, its welcoming host, asks for one’s vaccine card most graciously, then seating patrons with the same grace in their...More
Great pizza as I ordered Pepperoni Mushroom with onions & pineapple. I also the lamb shoulder and it is super good and moist. Very generous serving.
2/25/2021 I would never order from them again. I ordered delivery they buzzed me to come down to receive my order. My food was left unattended on a bench in the lobby where people sit on. The driver must have got in the building and...More
We ordered 2 soups, 2 hummus, 2 Lamb and 2 Baklava. The food was abundant, tasty and good. It was very hot temperature.
Maria’sTaverna opened on Kitsilano’s 4th Ave in 1987, and this small Greek restaurant is still popular with regulars and passerbys. I was welcome by the wonderful sever, called Ester, who looked after me attentively, making sure I had all I needed. I started with the...More
Loved this place!!! As you walk in, the authenticity of the restaurant makes you feel happy. The staff are so lovely and patient with all our questions. The lady helped us with our order perfectly. The food? It was amaaaazing! I, personally, did not like...More
As a long time customer of this establishment up until recent months was always consistently delicious . But this past weekend's dinner delivery came both late and cold . Calamari no longer swimming in seawater but an Olympic pool of grease . Obviously immersed in...More
good food. Service a little slow. Greek people eat here so what does that tell you! Easy parking. Nice greek background music.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5087149-Reviews-Maria_s_Taverna-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Maruhachi Ra-men,"My partner and I were staying at the nearby Westin Bayshore on business. Because I’m not too fond of the catered lunches at these conferences, we looked up a couple of nearby options. Sura Korean Royal Cuisine initially caught our eye, but then we noticed...More
My partner and I were staying at the nearby Westin Bayshore on business. Because I’m not too fond of the catered lunches at these conferences, we looked up a couple of nearby options. Sura Korean Royal Cuisine initially caught our eye, but then we noticed...More
The first times I went (2021) it was really very good, now it has lost quality, they rush you to eat, they no longer put the spices as before and they no longer bring you drinks before the meal... I think fame has won
The first times I went (2021) it was really very good, now it has lost quality, they rush you to eat, they no longer put the spices as before and they no longer bring you drinks before the meal... I think fame has won
We stopped by the Marutama Ramen in Richmond before heading to the airport. The food was delivered in under 5 minutes and it was excellent. Just what we were looking for!
We stopped by the Marutama Ramen in Richmond before heading to the airport. The food was delivered in under 5 minutes and it was excellent. Just what we were looking for!
Love the flavorful of their ramen and their egg is amazing. I always get the regular order and add another egg. This is totally comfort food. Now, one problem though…. since I’m very lactose intolerant, I know for a fact that there is some form...More
Love the flavorful of their ramen and their egg is amazing. I always get the regular order and add another egg. This is totally comfort food. Now, one problem though…. since I’m very lactose intolerant, I know for a fact that there is some form...More
The ramen was really good and would recommend if you’re in the mood for ramen. The service was friendly, however could’ve been a bit more responsive (such as refilling water). Overall though it was a good experience.
The ramen was really good and would recommend if you’re in the mood for ramen. The service was friendly, however could’ve been a bit more responsive (such as refilling water). Overall though it was a good experience.
We ordered 2 ramen and 3 appetizers for 2 adults and 2 small kids. Wow the food is as so good! Also the service was amazing. Highly recommend this place!
We ordered 2 ramen and 3 appetizers for 2 adults and 2 small kids. Wow the food is as so good! Also the service was amazing. Highly recommend this place!
I’ve had Ramen probably two other times so I’m no Ramen expert but MARUTAMA RA-MEN’s signature creamy chicken broth - Tamago Ramen - is scrumptious! Good to the last drop. We also got the original that came with seaweed, pork and green onions. We got...More
I’ve had Ramen probably two other times so I’m no Ramen expert but MARUTAMA RA-MEN’s signature creamy chicken broth - Tamago Ramen - is scrumptious! Good to the last drop. We also got the original that came with seaweed, pork and green onions. We got...More
Craved for hot soup due to rainy and cold weather and our experienced was very good. This branch is always consistent with their broth and the tastes of the authentic Japanese Ramen. This is my all time favorite Ramen in Vancouver and will definitely recommend...More
Craved for hot soup due to rainy and cold weather and our experienced was very good. This branch is always consistent with their broth and the tastes of the authentic Japanese Ramen. This is my all time favorite Ramen in Vancouver and will definitely recommend...More
Flawless and deliciously unbelievable - I can’t describe the food here any other way. The tori Paitan broth is a welcome Change and makes for an amazing meal you’ll never want to end. Also enjoyed the braised pork belly which was equally delicious and I’m...More
Flawless and deliciously unbelievable - I can’t describe the food here any other way. The tori Paitan broth is a welcome Change and makes for an amazing meal you’ll never want to end. Also enjoyed the braised pork belly which was equally delicious and I’m...More
We came in for a late lunch here and were the only non-asian folks in the place. (that means it is good and authentic) The broth was so rich and flavorful.. I have never had ramen this good anywhere. It was so fun to add...More
We came in for a late lunch here and were the only non-asian folks in the place. (that means it is good and authentic) The broth was so rich and flavorful.. I have never had ramen this good anywhere. It was so fun to add...More
Okay ramen with little flavor or seasoning. I have far better veggie ramen at multiple other places. Too bad, as I was really looking forward to the fresh noodles. Service, however, was attentive and super friendly.
Okay ramen with little flavor or seasoning. I have far better veggie ramen at multiple other places. Too bad, as I was really looking forward to the fresh noodles. Service, however, was attentive and super friendly.
Visited during weekday evening. Beautiful ramen with chicken based broth. Very busy with a queue outside.
Visited during weekday evening. Beautiful ramen with chicken based broth. Very busy with a queue outside.
Don't get me wrong, by no means a lousy bowl of ramen. Just that the combination of flavours was average and forgettable, there are other places I fancy in Vancouver.
Don't get me wrong, by no means a lousy bowl of ramen. Just that the combination of flavours was average and forgettable, there are other places I fancy in Vancouver.
This is the best Ramen in Vancouver. Period!! I come here every week. The service is fast and you're out in 30 minutes.
This is the best Ramen in Vancouver. Period!! I come here every week. The service is fast and you're out in 30 minutes.
Unlike other ramen bars, you fill in the reservation sheet. The clipboard is hanging outside. The hostess comes out to checkout it. It looks like people are in a queue, but they are not and they don’t tell people to sign the sheet- rather rude...More
Unlike other ramen bars, you fill in the reservation sheet. The clipboard is hanging outside. The hostess comes out to checkout it. It looks like people are in a queue, but they are not and they don’t tell people to sign the sheet- rather rude...More
Marutama Ra-men was an excellent find. My partner and I were strolling from our hotel this past December – en route to do some shopping on Robson and Granville – when we spied this small ramen house along Robson Street. We’re always on the lookout...More
Marutama Ra-men was an excellent find. My partner and I were strolling from our hotel this past December – en route to do some shopping on Robson and Granville – when we spied this small ramen house along Robson Street. We’re always on the lookout...More
Totally and utterly overrated. First time in Vancouver and wanted to check out one of the tastiest Ramen - living in one of the biggest cities, I've had some of the best so was ready to enjoy this based on the amazing reviews. The broth...More
Totally and utterly overrated. First time in Vancouver and wanted to check out one of the tastiest Ramen - living in one of the biggest cities, I've had some of the best so was ready to enjoy this based on the amazing reviews. The broth...More
Went on a rainy Monday afternoon around 2pm. Waited about 15 min before seated. Food came out quickly after ordering. Servers were nice and quick on their feet. The noodles were perfect in texture, egg was perfectly runny and soup base was yummy. Price was...More
Went on a rainy Monday afternoon around 2pm. Waited about 15 min before seated. Food came out quickly after ordering. Servers were nice and quick on their feet. The noodles were perfect in texture, egg was perfectly runny and soup base was yummy. Price was...More
Had a quick lunch for 2 with both of us ordering different Ramen which were ok but not great. The broth was not very hot & lacked in flavor but everything else was standard fare.
Had a quick lunch for 2 with both of us ordering different Ramen which were ok but not great. The broth was not very hot & lacked in flavor but everything else was standard fare.
Went for lunch and ordered a collection of dishes, too much but we enjoyed them and came out full. It is a very popular place so get there early. Ordered gyoza , yaki cha-shu (pork belly), and aka ramen (pork). The flavors were enjoyable and...More
Went for lunch and ordered a collection of dishes, too much but we enjoyed them and came out full. It is a very popular place so get there early. Ordered gyoza , yaki cha-shu (pork belly), and aka ramen (pork). The flavors were enjoyable and...More
Decent place. Had their signature ramen , which is chicken based. Was pretty good, although a little bland and could have used some more add-ins. Draft beer was very good. Don't offer a kids-sized bowl.
Decent place. Had their signature ramen , which is chicken based. Was pretty good, although a little bland and could have used some more add-ins. Draft beer was very good. Don't offer a kids-sized bowl.
I’m not a ramen connoisseur mostly because of availability at where I live but I love ramen. This place was recommended to us by a server at a nearby restaurant. It’s not a fancy place and the menu is limited but the ramen was so...More
I’m not a ramen connoisseur mostly because of availability at where I live but I love ramen. This place was recommended to us by a server at a nearby restaurant. It’s not a fancy place and the menu is limited but the ramen was so...More
Very very Disappointed!!!! The portion is unbelievably small for online takeout. This is the first time I ordered takeout from this location. Everything was downsized. The pork the seaweed and the soup too. 2 very thin slides of porks...is that a joke?😂😂😂 unbelievable thin... it...More
Very very Disappointed!!!! The portion is unbelievably small for online takeout. This is the first time I ordered takeout from this location. Everything was downsized. The pork the seaweed and the soup too. 2 very thin slides of porks...is that a joke?😂😂😂 unbelievable thin... it...More
Very busy place with nice, rich ramen (I ordered Tamago Ramen). You can choose it mild or spicy. I've chosen mild and it was at first too mild for me. But when you add some garlic chips (it's complimentary, on the tables), ramen gets great...More
Very busy place with nice, rich ramen (I ordered Tamago Ramen). You can choose it mild or spicy. I've chosen mild and it was at first too mild for me. But when you add some garlic chips (it's complimentary, on the tables), ramen gets great...More
So tasty! Lovely broth: very flavourful and creamy. Service was friendly and fast. Clearly a favourite with locals. Busy spot for very good reasons!
So tasty! Lovely broth: very flavourful and creamy. Service was friendly and fast. Clearly a favourite with locals. Busy spot for very good reasons!
I have spent a fair amount of time in Japan over the years and enjoy ramen. I’m wary about ‘American’ ramen shops as many simply do not live up to my expectations. Craving some ramen on a cool, rainy day, I decided to give Marutama...More
I have spent a fair amount of time in Japan over the years and enjoy ramen. I’m wary about ‘American’ ramen shops as many simply do not live up to my expectations. Craving some ramen on a cool, rainy day, I decided to give Marutama...More
Great Ramen. They are fast. Food is great. Always a wait. They don’t take cash, which is fine with me.
Great Ramen. They are fast. Food is great. Always a wait. They don’t take cash, which is fine with me.
Marutama is currently the best ramen shop in Vancouver. And always consistent. I go there every week.
Marutama is currently the best ramen shop in Vancouver. And always consistent. I go there every week.
The chicken broth is very tasty and the noodles just the right consistency. The service is excellent
The chicken broth is very tasty and the noodles just the right consistency. The service is excellent
What a surprise, I was walking by and I saw a big bunch of people waiting for a table. It must be a good spot! Yes, I discovered a very special ramen. They cooked the chicken broth a special way that it makes it creamy....More
What a surprise, I was walking by and I saw a big bunch of people waiting for a table. It must be a good spot! Yes, I discovered a very special ramen. They cooked the chicken broth a special way that it makes it creamy....More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4467800-Reviews-Maruhachi_Ra_men-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mary's On Davie,"wonderful hamburger and fries-great informal and friendly service. Fresh, hand formed, 6 oz patty and hand cut fries. Our server was warm and helpful.
We had two great meals (dinner and lunch) at this restaurant. Both sets of meals were hot, good in portion size and tasty. Staff are very friendly and nothing is too much trouble. Facilities are spotless and good atmosphere. Thanks guys for the experience.
We had a great breakfast here. Hubs had a hash that he says was really good. I ventured out and had a waffle eggs Bennie, which was really, really tasty. The waffles were a bit unusual in that the texture was denser and they were...More
On immigrating as a family to Vancouver towards the end of the 1980s we were surprised to find Vancouver then had restaurants that mostly closed early. Mary’s on Davie was one of the few exceptions. As we lived in the west end near Davie then...More
Stopped off in the morning and we were seated pretty quickly after a short queue. The portions were very generous and the food was excellent! Between us we had granola, breakfast poutine and french toast all of which was incredible! Great service from the team...More
We went to this diner, failing to check trip advisor first. The service was ok, but we saw our server run into the bathroom and heard her barf right after she checked on us. My son had made it halfway through his waffle, and found...More
We ate here during Dine Out Vancouver - three courses for $29 and it was great. Large portions, nice food and friendly service. Would definitely go again.
Horrible. Used to eat there years ago. Waited ten mins to be sat due to coronavirus. Waited another fifteen minutes before getting to place order. Food arrived 45 mins later..eggs cold and congealed..waffle was dried out and the waitress banged everything down and rushed off...More
We had such a great dinner here last night. The food is delicious and the milkshakes were amazing. The poutine and Mary Club Sandwich was unreal. The deep fried pickle and cauliflowers were so good too, definitely would recommend it!
I’m so glad this place is still here! Mary’s on Davie (previously Hamburger Mary’s) is a little slice of heaven in Davie Village. Everything from the music to the decor is delightful, and the food is amazing. Isaiah was our server and I don’t think...More
Happy with COVID-19 protocols plus Great service Great food Cute atmosphere, fifties diner Very clean Stopped in for a late lunch and Had strawberry lemonade and berry salad
Food is very tasty and good portions. The staff are very friendly and accommodating as well as knowledgeable of the menu. Love the Chili Omelette for breakfast and the sliders are some of the best I have ever had. The Chicken Sandwich is to die...More
Mary's has been nicely renovated. The food isn't impressive. The service was excellent. They are taking Covid precautions.
The last time I was there, it was known as Hamburger Marys. Now it's known as Mary's. Yes they did some reno over two years ago and it is a neat concept of a 50's diner. I had brunch with some friends and it wasn't...More
Even if we were just a bit disappointed in the food itself, the exceptionally good service along with the quips and fun attitude of our server more than made up for anything that could have been wrong! We stopped for breakfast on a Saturday morning...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15116672-Reviews-Mary_s_On_Davie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Masayoshi,"Probably the best Japanese meal I have ever tasted outside Japan. In an inconspicuous area, the restaurant opens up to a unique experience on all counts. We were lucky to get seats at the bar and were treated to sublime dishes with innovative combinations of...More
When the whole coronapocaplyse shut down dine-in eating at restaurants, it was a bit of an inconvenience at first… then I started to realize just how often I ate at restaurants – turns out we’re saving a lot of money by me not eating out....More
Visited Masayoshi for dinner in February 2019. We sat at sushi bar counter and went for 16 piece omakase. Everything was fresh, tasty, and well prepared. If you are not that hungry, 14 piece omakase option is also available - this does not come with...More
We ordered the 14 pieces omakase sushi dinner. Overall each piece was fresh and good. Our only issue was the head sushi chef have to do everything serving us at the counter, and also making dishes for all the customers in dining room that ordered...More
Visited Masayoshi for dinner in October 2018. In my opinion, currently this is the most authentic Japanese sushi restaurant in Vancouver. I chose Omakase (chef's choice), smaller selection, and it was plenty. You need to be really hungry to go for larger selection. Price was...More
It's our first time visiting this restaurant on our wedding anniversary. Read a lot of reviews about this place. We ordered the 14-piece omakase for $80pp. Most of the sushi were fish, nothing really special, not even uni. We felt the size of the sushi...More
We had the full tasting menu and enjoyed about 10 courses, which we paired with a bottle of sake. Everything was tasty & lovingly created, and service was great. On the pricey side especially for this part of the city, but worth it as a...More
Walked into this small restaurant on a Saturday night and it smelled fishy. Reminded me of the first and last time I went to Tojo in the old location. We ordered the sushi special made the the chef and it was extremely dis-appointing. The rice...More
Had the extended sushi omakase (16 pieces + appetizer, miso & dessert) tonight and it was really fantastic. The three types of tuna nigiri were especially great, tasty, fatty, delicious. I also really enjoyed the unagi nigiri and and for the first time in my...More
For years, Masayoshi worked side by side with Hidekazu Tojo at Tojo's Restaurant. He was the go-to sushi guy, a shy, gentle, incredibly skilled hand at fish flesh and blades. For years I said that he, (and several others at Tojo's) could easily head their...More
I haven't been here for awhile and tried their omakase. Wow, 16 items of delight. We started with a chopped raw oyster with frois gras, many pieces of fresh sushi, a beautiful fish soup, and finished off with a tea infused pudding. My favorite was...More
The staff and service was great however the food was lacking. Had the $80 omakase which came with 14 pieces and the type of fish served wasn't impressive. I expect a bit more than salmon, tai and ebi when I'm paying on average $6/piece. The...More
Tried omakase in various restaurants in Vancouver. This one so far was the best: dishes were creative & tasted good. Will def go back again!
We were fortunate to drop by without a reservation and they seated us with choices of the Sushi Omakase menu (14 pieces for $80 or 16 for $110). The higher end having Geoduck and Hokkaido Uni. Plating is pretty and rice is excellent. Tomo and...More
The food has some interesting combinations and the place has the makings of something fresh and interesting in Vancouver... BUT we had the Original Omakase and I just felt like there was a lack of passion in the food. The dishes came out in a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10250905-Reviews-Masayoshi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Match Eatery & Public House,"It is one of the best Sports Pub around midland , it is a chain Eatery Public house from B.C , A.B , Ontario operated by Gateway Casino Entertainment and so happy to say this location is one of the best above all with amazing...More
We arrived at 5 pm, so enjoyed drinks at Happy Hour prices. Their Happy Hour food menu had very few items to choose from , so we order wings off the regular menu. Our server was very friendly.
We had our company Holiday Party at Match in the Private Budweiser Room this week. Dealing with Chef Chris for menu selection and Host Jillian for the dates and times was very easy. all my staff were pleased with the food selection, including Carnivor, Vegitarian...More
Hi Russel, Thank you for your continued patronage! We love hosting your team's annual event in the Budweiser Room and we hope you enjoyed the 1/2 off wine on Wednesday! Reviews from great guests such as yourself will really help others feel confident about choosing...More
Surprise 60th for wife! We contacted Anika Nguyen with a short 4 day reservation. She was awesome! For 32 people. We all had an amazing time! A few people have never been there, they will be back and huge football fans. They were delighted! Food...More
Hi Sonny, Thank you for taking the time to write us a review. We made sure to share this with the team, especially Anika and your server Veronica. We hope you enjoyed the half-off wine during happy hour and the $10 pizzas on Sunday! It...More
First time visiting Match Eatery and we were looking forward to enjoying some of the brunch menu items. Was not overly busy, and while we knew that it was a sport's bar, we were glad that it wasn't too loud. When my friend went to...More
Hi JuliammX7464QS, Thank you for taking the time to leave us your feedback. We strive to ensure that our guests have the best experience and we're disappointed to hear that we did not meet that. Please email me at elizabeth.lim@starlightcasino.ca , we’d greatly appreciate the...More
Having been here a few times now this is my face place for a good meal with excellent staff and service. Plenty of parking, large seating area, good selection of food and drinks. Very good size meals fairly priced, tasty ribs, chicken, salads, dessert items...More
Hi 551lavernep, We really appreciate you taking the time to share your experience. We look forward to seeing you again soon. Please feel free to send me an email upon your next visit at elizabeth.lim@starlightcasino.ca, I'd love to thank you in person.
I was very pleased with the service and the food. We have a very pleasant experience. It was nice to be out in restaurants again.
Hello Wendy! Thank you so much for your review! We are happy you enjoyed your experience with us at Match Eatery & Public House New Westminster! We look forward to seeing you again in the future!
We came in for a quick drink and bite in the afternoon of July 26 We were greeted by the hostess and sat at the bar. The bar was clean and you can tell it was recently sanitized. We were served by Jatin, who was...More
Hello S5940OCdavidp! Thank you so much for your review! We take pride in offering our guests the best experience possible!
Match eatery is a awesome place for everyone including kids. I have gone there many times and receive excellent service. The food is delicious but I do miss the mussels from the menu! I have found a waiter named Sam always providing top notch service....More
Hello Farah! Thank you so much for taking the time to write us a review! Your patronage is very important to us and we take pride in providing the best experience possible! We look forward to seeing you at our establishment again soon!
With Covid opening up restaurants I have gone to Match Eatery in New West and found the food to be delicious and the service is amazing. We had a great server named Sam who was just awesome. He was very attentive and had a great...More
Booked the privafe Smirnoff soundproof room for Feb 29,2020 at Match Eatery. It was an amazing experience. Elizabeth, Service Manager, was so easy to work with and she really went out of her way to make sure our event went off without a hitch. They...More
Hi Amanda, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review of your experience. I am pleased to hear that our team made your experience pleasant and we look forward to seeing you again soon!
After a long absence we decided to give it another try. Our group consisted of 4 adults and two children and were looking for a Saturday brunch in our neighborhood. Restaurant was virtually empty with one waitress. I ordered fish and chip, everyone else ordered...More
Hi Larry, We are sorry that you are disappointed but appreciate your feedback. We are committed to providing you with a great experience and hope you give us another chance in the future.
We have been hosting our annual staff party in the Smirnoff room for the past 2 years now and both times have been amazing! Elizabeth, Jarvis and the rest of the staff were accommodating, attentive and awesome! Thank you again!
Hi, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review of your experience. I am pleased to hear that our team made your experience pleasant and we look forward to seeing you and your party again!
We booked the Budweiser Room, which provided us with more then enough space for our team members, photo booth, and pool table. This year they provided lower tables with backed chairs which was a huge improvement. They had the necessary amount of servers staffed and...More
Hello, Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review of your experience. I am pleased to hear that our team made your experience pleasant and we look forward to seeing you again soon!
I have to say the food, the service and the atmosphere was amazing. I had the ""flash in the pan"" - blackened chicken dinner and my friend had the ""bang band shrimp"". I can't express how good both meals were. We asked our server if...More
Hi Cessy , Thank you for taking the time to provide us with a review of your experience. I am pleased to hear that our team made your experience pleasant and we look forward to seeing you again soon!",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154936-d7887149-Reviews-Match_Eatery_Public_House-New_Westminster_British_Columbia.html
Matsuyama Japanese Restaurant,"The staff was awesome! We were a group of at least 40 and they served us with a smile and tons of patience. The food was delicious, fresh and the prices made our meal a steal! We will return!
Drop in for dinner with my aunt and uncle from L.A , there hotel only 5 mins walk from the hotel , they do not want any fancy expensive diner , just clos by , and I read very good reviews in TripAdvisor , restaurants...More
I have lived in the lower mainland for 35 years, and have eaten at probably 75 sushi restaurants. Matsuyama Japanese Restaurant is second only to Miku. Enough said.
We thought on average Japnaese restaurants in Richmond must be good enough to compete in this city. We were wrong. We came here for dinner and expected a quality meal as we saw the restaurant was almost full. We ordered the bento box and tempura/chicken...More
We went with friends for the first time to this restaurant in Richmond! The ambiance was great, the staff was polite, the diversity of choices were huge, the hot plates which are must coveted by us were excellent! Piping hot iron plates serving delicious dishes!...More
Had a lunch special and food was okay. A pot of tea taken to the table was a nice touch. Service was excellent and server was helpful.
Was acceptable but nothing out of the ordinary. Standard fare with acceptable pricing. Service was overall pretty good. We were looking for a quick meal and they delivered. There are better places but this served our purpose, as they were fairly quick in serving us.
We go to this restaurant about 6 times a year and we enjoy eating here because the service is great, the food is good and the staff are friendly!
We were looking for a vegetarian/vegan restaurant near La Quinta Inn, and we found this very nice and clean restaurant. The foods were fresh, hot, and delicious. The service was excellent and the staff were very polite and useful. The prices were very reasonable. We...More
In an area of Vancouver that already shines when it comes to Asian foods, Matsuyama is a great find for sushi lovers. With friendly, helpful staff and beautifully presented food, this is our ""go to"" restaurant when we have an overnight before or after flights...More
He rushed to take our order. Looked like he didn't even want to explain the dishes to us. I asked him how many Inare is there with each order. He could have told me one per order, didn't need to point to the menu like...More
Went there for late night food...food came real quick and service was good. The Drinks were reasonable and the sushi was very good quality.
The first place after I land in Vancouver and the last place before departing -thats how ill summarise this Richmond based Japanese restaurant. They have one of the freshest and mouthwatering Sushis. Its a very down to earth traditional place and let that not fool...More
We go to this restaurant often before because the food is good and fairly priced. Happy hour is half the price but the food serving is also cut in half. This is a business strategy that most people do not notice. We went one day...More
Very cheap. Happy hour after 9pm. They get so busy though, line ups right at the door. Food is good.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1220597-Reviews-Matsuyama_Japanese_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Maxine's Cafe And Bar,"Walked in to the restaurant as it looked like it had a good vibe. Interesting food menu, and drinks menu. Prices were all reasonable. Quality of our food was first class. Service was a little slow but it was a Friday night and they were...More
Called on 13th June for both inch and whole experience from start to finish was excellent. Friendly welcome, excellent server, Nicole and management checking in that we were happy with experience. Food was really good, generous portions, excellent coffee and water topped up throughout. Cannot...More
This is a lovely little cafe/bar that was 5 minutes from our Airbnb. The staff are attentive and friendly. The menu is full of unusual and creative dishes. We selected this cafe as it is recommended on the gluten-free app. I chose the smoked brisket...More
The food was okay, I swallowed it without discomfort. What stuck in my gullet was the charge for coffee--$9 for a cup and a refill of decaf Americano. No food could make up for that, so definitely a one-off for me.
Invited to join some friends, I found Maxine’s the perfect city bistro, with a feeling of a stylish hidden locale. We had great service, enjoyable cocktails and delish, original appetizers. Well done!
Five of us dined at Maxine's one evening during a trip to The Emerald City. We ordered a little bit of everything: Summer Corn Chicken Liver Parfait (a very creamy consistency) Moules Frites Agnoloti pasta Kale salad Creme Brulee We were so pleased with all...More
From start to finish service was impeccable from everyone we interacted with. Arti, our server, was outstanding, and the manager Alan was very present making sure everything went well. Best tartar I have had in years and our mains were both innovative and delicious. Highly...More
Had the roesti with eggs and salmon. I wish the roesti were made fresh, but overall it was quite good. Coffee is nice as well. Definitely worth a stop.
Fantastic gem of a restaurant. We had eggs cocette and beef hash, it was delicious! The service was the best we’ve had in Canada. Perfect for Sunday brunch, highly recommend!
We were looking for a simple, comfortable place for dinner and discovered Maxine’s. We were extremely pleased with the timely and friendly service, and were absolutely delighted with the food. We had their kale salad, slow cooked pork collar and the risotto. What a wonderful...More
Excellent breakfast spot and a must while visiting Vancouver, an outstanding brisket hash! Service was prompt and the servers were friendly and personable.
Went here for breakfast and lunch (separate occasions!) Lovely double aspect restaurant with outside and inside seating. Opening times on the web are wrong and it is open in the evenings for dinner. Good people watching sitting at the bench at the front! The food...More
Wow! What a place. Stunning inside and amazing food. We went for breakfast and weren’t disappointed with our server’s recommendation for the Smoked Salmon Rosti. Incredible! Beautiful coffee and great cocktails too. The staff were SO friendly, and gave us recommendations for things to do...More
Happened to walk past this Bistro and came back with family/ friends for breakfast/ brunch. Staff were so friendly and helpful. Nice outdoor eating area. Good menu and food was excellent!
I ordered the pork chop and it was one of the best I have ever eaten. It came in a hot skillet , perfectly seasoned and prepared with Brussel sprouts and roasted apple. The atmosphere is great and the service team were friendly and welcoming.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23660823-Reviews-Maxine_s_Cafe_And_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mazahr Lebanese Kitchen,"We got take out while staying with a friend in the area. We had hoped to go out to dinner, but everyone was tired from cycling around Stanley Park all day. Instead we got take out after reading some good google reviews. The food was...More
We don't know a lot about Lebanese food and didn't know what to expect, but we so enjoyed everything we had. We asked the server to recommend which dishes we should order and he suggested just the right amount. We left with full tummies and...More
This restaurant was on my list for a long time and I regret that it took me so long to get there! Good location, excellent food with flavours that burst in your mouth, and helpful and attentive staff. Generous portions for sharing and just an...More
What a great spot near the theatre. Food is served mezza/tapas style, as it is ready, and shared by the table. Three or four dishes for two people is plenty. One salad, one cold mezza (dip with naan), one hot mezza and one grilled mezza...More
The food was very good and service was also good. The only negative was that they didn’t check our vaccination passport. Would of felt safer eating there if they did.
The meal was fantastic, flavourful & fresh. The fried cauliflower was amazing. But, all the dishes were wonderful. The service was friendly & attentive. You could tell the staff (owners?) are passionate about the food & ensuring a good experience for customers. It was all...More
Yummy food and very friendly service. So far I've scored a patio seat every time I stopped by. So many vegan options with Lebanese food and all of them have been delicious.
Stumbled on to this little place and was really happy we did. Food was amazing, service was friendly and prompt. And the prices are reasonable. We ordered several small dishes to share. All vegetarian and all outstanding! The small eggplant stuffed with walnuts and peppers...More
Mazahr just opened, replacing a different Lebanese restaurant in the same location. Wow, am I glad we found this place -- it is a gem. Excellent Lebanese food, terrific service (attentive without being in the way), very reasonable, and a lovely ambience. The fried cauliflower...More",9,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21333570-Reviews-Mazahr_Lebanese_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Me-N-Ed's Pizza Parlor,"Was here about a year ago, thoroughly enjoyed it. So, when the missus said pizza, I knew where to take her. Timed it for a late lunch, to beat the dinner rush. It worked - got seated promptly, got menus right away. Jane managed to...More
I still incredibly exhausted since I got back from Amsterdam on Thursday , maybe it was "" Jet Leg "" surprised my sisters and brother dropped in for a visit , I turn down go out for dinner , I had a craving for Pizza...More
Can't believe it's been two years since I've been here. Dropped by for a Father's Day treat after a long walk. Seated right away, ordered right away. No hard sell on alcohol: said no, asked for water; left alone after that. Had the special: WOW!...More
Got take out pizza for the first time in the new Maple Ridge location. Pizza was the most disgusting I've ever had. It had a weird dried up cracker like crust, practically no cheese and a repulsive floral flavor. Will never order again.
Meet up long time friend in the area , planning go to MC Donald's for a quick bite , but end up in Me -Ed's , this place been in same location well over 40 years , also I hear and read a lot mixed...More
My husband and I we always see Me-N-Ed's pizza and heard decent reviews from people. We finally ordered it cause they offered a fundraiser where a portion of the money will go to the PAC at our son's school. We got our order from Coquitlam...More
Atmosphere was nice. We sat outside patio during the nice weather. Our waitress was very polite and helpful. Their pizza price is ridiculous. I would never order from them. You are better off with Pizza Hut or any local pizza around the block.
Due to Covid-19, took the delivery option. Two great medium pizzas enjoyed by all four of us. Delivered quickly, still warm. Enjoyed the thin crusts, allows the topping taste to come through. Been enjoying this place for years. Hope you will too.
My daughter and I had a great meal at Me & Ed’s Pizza this week. Fun evening and very tasty pizza as we did a half & half on a medium. Had to bring some home! Pleasant server and we did not wait long. We...More
Heading home from the Fraser Valley, I called in my order on the way - a medium Sicilian Sausage pizza. A thin crust pizza that includes their double spiced sausage on garlic & herb sauce with seasoned button mushrooms, caramelized onions, sweet cherry peppers and...More
so professional pizza and service, fireplace is so nice in the winter season. my favorite is greek salad and me and ed's combo pizza. size is perfect and very fresh ingredients.
Good Pizza and possibly Pasta too. Highly recommended here too. There's another Franchise in Coquitlam.
6 of us met at this location. 5 had the pizza and 1 the lasagne (which came with garlic bread). Food and service were great. Not many leftovers for lunch the next day! Photos ate one of the pizzas and the lasagne.
I am a longtime diner of this Pizza Parlor. I was there on opening day and still go at least 3 times a month. Food is always hot and fresh. The staff is friendly and will do there best to help you out. You can...More
This is a well-established pizzeria, so our expectations were low. Were we surprised! Three of us ordered 2 pizzas, the other a salad. It was all good, and we were discerning about pizza. The smoked salmon was lovely, the Margharita great. The service was good...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d972288-Reviews-Me_N_Ed_s_Pizza_Parlor-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Meat at O'Neills,"A fantastic spot on the north shore. Run by a local family, the atmosphere, and service is amazing. The food is outstanding and I have never found any sandwich shop that services up the delicacies time after time like Martin does. The pork sandwich and...More
Meat @ O’Neills is a warm, friendly, fun place to have a beer, wine & yummy sandwich. They are all delicious meals. I return there as much as I can!Ruth
oneills have the homemade best sandwiches and very friendly staff. i highly recommend it to everyone
Small charming hole in the wall sandwich shop! The owner Martin understands genuine customer service. Great beer, sandwiches, and wonderful people where everyone knows your name! Of you want a real experience where u will keep coming back try O‘Neills !!
Closest to an English pub atmosphere I've come across in my 12 years in Canada... and it's not really a pub. In addition to regular daytime hours, they remain open Thursdays and Fridays until 10, with an always eclectic, friendly and entertaining crowd. There might...More
I’ve been frequenting this establishment for quite some time, and it’s become a local favorite. Every item on the menu never fails to impress, with carefully selected ingredients and passionate assembly. The owners make everyone feel welcome and always deliver more than expected. Great atmosphere,...More
Very happy friendly pub style cafe tiny in size Big in Heart in welcoming ppl in to this family establishment. The meat loaf sandwich was made fresh by hand (no drones) with care and more heart.HEARTY and delish!! Lovely Lovely little place and lovely lovely...More
This small but friendly lower Lonsdale eatery is worth a visit. The excellent breakfast sandwiches and Thursday and Friday night dinner specials are worth a try. You won't be disappointed.
We were a group of 8 who recently enjoyed Martin's fabulous Beef Madras and a few pints of the Bourbon Blood Orange Wheat Beer from the local Bridge Brewery - what a great place! Family owned and operated, this type of establishment is exactly what...More
Eight of us filled this tiny restaurant on Lonsdale so it felt like the proprietors had come to cook for us at home. Delicious craft beer on tap and tasty, chilled white wine on a warm Summer's evening. The Special was a delicious Madras beef...More
Walked by here many times and finally were able to give it a try. Wish we could say we loved it, but it was a real letdown. Cute and bright interior with eclectic furnishings. But the breakfast sandwich with bacon/sausage was greasy and really light...More",11,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d12610797-Reviews-Meat_at_O_Neills-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MeeT in Gastown,"Good food, good service. Nice for us vegetarians. The staff were also friendly and we would recommend this place
Exceptional food and drinks in a cute fun environment. The location has a hidden European courtyard vibe. Staff is engaged and friendly.
Had a phenomenal meal here; every course was great. The service was awesome and the setting and décor were very cool. We also went to the one in Yaletown because we loved it so much.
We found this gem while wandering around the shops at Gas Town. First day in Vancouver and what a treat. The service was excellent and the environment was super charged with positivity. The food was also amazing.
We really enjoyed all the food, though we are not vegan. There were very creative and tasty combinations, in some cases mimicking meat. We ordered the Mediterranean burger, made of black beans and topped with a variety of veggies, and the gnocchi. One note: they...More
I give Meet in Gastown a 5 out of 5! I went with my sister, who is not a vegan, and she enjoyed the food also. The ambiance was quaint, the food was delicious, and the service was great. I highly recommend this restaurant! 🤩
Amazing Vegan comfort food, from bowls to burgers and crafted alcoholic/non drinks. Great staff and safe atmosphere.
We had no idea it was a vegan restaurant until I decided to inquire about chicken wings as I was craving for some, and of course out of the menu, lol. We tried their Artichoke Spinach Dip and we really liked it, it was good.
One of the few vegan friendly restaurants in Vancouver. The food was good, the service was okay but basic. I have been frustrated by the lack of vegan friendly restaurants here so it was great to find one that sells decent food. Just don’t buy...More
Visited mid week , very tasty food and great 'spot on' friendly genuinely smiley service , Highly recommended!
Really nice food and a good option for veggies or a hone with gluten requirements (my girlfriend is celiac / coeliac and she had no issues at all. Beer I was served was flat but I won’t hold that against them, that can happen anywhere...More
Had a sample taster on a Food tour, which was great, so returned for a lunch a couple of days later. Fantastic! Had Tempura cauliflower in a sticky & sesame sauce, Osyter mushroom tempura salad and home made fries. Was very filling and all delicious....More
The hot tea was a generous sized pot and the pineapple mimosa was lovely. The service was very underwhelming. We asked for the bill and waited for so long that we literally could have walked out and nobody would’ve noticed. My beet salad was average....More
whilst none of ours are vegetarian one has gluten intolerant so decided on meet. never eaten in vegetarian restaurant before and 3/4 of us pleasantly surprised at the quality and taste of our food. poutine was fab. strict carnivore among us was not impressed
well I have to say that this is a fabulous place to eat. The food was incredible and the staff top notch. If you are in the area you have to make it a point to eat here!!!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10063920-Reviews-MeeT_in_Gastown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MeeT in Yaletown,"Service was slow and defiantly the worst burger I’ve ever eaten in my life. What made it even worse was the mousetrap I spotted under a table inside with a dead mouse crushed to death. Defiantly won’t be visiting againMore
Hi Gareth, Firstly, thank you for taking the time to leave a review that provides us with feedback that can better help us improve our guest experience. We pride ourselves on our attentive service and delicious burgers. Clearly we missed the mark on both and...More
While walking around Yaletown we wanted to stop for a quick dinner so decided on this place, as there were some free seats on the patio, and the menu on the sidewalk looked pretty good and not too pricey. I ordered the Mac & Cheese,...More
Hi there, Firstly, thank you so much for taking the time to leave a review. Our goal is to make delicious plant-based dishes for our guests and clearly we missed the mark here. We never want our guests leaving feeling misled or unsatisfied, and for...More
Absolutely amazing! Had the Mac n cheese burger with fries and it was delicious! Would love if they would bring this restaurant to Calgary!!
Hi Kiera, Thank you so much for the great review! We're thrilled to hear you enjoyed The Mighty Mac Burger. Looking forward to having you back next time you're in Vancouver! Cheers, Mel
Best vegans burger I ate in a long time! Eventually I was happy to bring my veggie girlfriend to try these highly reputed burgers and we were not disappointed! Honorable mention for the vegan mayo. Service was over the top. Definitely recommended
Hi Paolo, I am so thrilled to hear you enjoyed your meal and overall experience with us! We appreciate you taking the time to leave us a kind review and we can't wait to see you back again soon! Have a lovely night. -Melissa
We were tourists in Vancouver. Spent the day on water taxis on False Creek. Told to stop at Yaletown for lunch. It was getting a bit late for lunch and we were hungry. We were walking around and my wife mentioned a good hamburger would...More
Nice Canadian food, very clean place and excellent service. the price are well thought and it is in and on good place.
Hi ffgabel :) Thank you so much for sharing your experience at MeeT! If there’s any feedback you have on how we could have earned a five star review please let us know at Katalenaeatsmeet@gmail.com as we would love to her. Cheers!
The patio was open with heaters. The waitress was efficient and friendly. We ordered the spinach artichoke dip with nachos as an appetizer which was great. Then we order hamburgers one with butter chicken poutine and the other came with salad and fries. There was...More
Thank you so much for sharing your experience with us, 199Lubav! We really loved reading your review. You chose some amazing dishes and so glad you upgraded to the poutine! It upgrades the whole experience. We’re looking forward to your next visit!
Ordered in advance for take out and it was ready on time. I had the Mex burger and husband had a bowl. So good. Nice staff. Looks like a great place to eat inside too.
Thanks for your review, travelling55! So glad you and your husband enjoyed your takeout order and had a good experience with us. We'd love to have you back again soon!
Whilst visiting Vancouver a friend recommended MeeT to us, and honestly we are so glad he did! This place served us possibly the best vegan food ever - myself and my boyfriend were absolutely amazed at all the flavours that were delivered! We tried the...More
Thank you so much for sharing your experience, hancha92! Hopefully you and your boyfriend can make it back for another visit soon to try more dishes!
love eating at Meet but this particular visit was awful...the food was very tasty; the burger was missing pickles and the server never did a quality check so we couldn't have the mistake rectified. The bartender was quote awkward and pretentious. The food is so...More
Hi Rhonda, I'm really sorry we let you down with poor service. That's not okay with us and it's clear we need to do better. Quality checks are imperative and pretentious isn't at all a proper representation of who we are and what we do....More
Such a disappointment Asked server for a straw (that they offer for purchase). Didn’t bring it. Our food took way way too long to come and when it did it was stone cold. The burger also not edible. Cold and just awful. Had to ask...More
Hi Bonnietheb, I'm really sorry that we didn't provide you with a proper dining experience. It's clear that we need to do better! Thank you for bringing these issues to our attention so we can work to solve them. I totally understand your disappointment and...More
Stopped by today for an early lunch, not really knowing much about the restaurant or it's food. We had a really nice vegetarian lunch. Their version of Calamari made with oyster mushrooms, a Meatless bowl and Crispy Chicken Sandwich (deep fried oyster mushroom) the food...More
Thanks for your lovely review, RogerinYVR! Glad you enjoyed your visit. We look forward to having you back again to try more dishes!
Amazing restaurant serving large portions of tasty vegan food in one of the city’s best neighbourhoods for tourists to check out. Try the organic steamed kale and upgrade your fries to poutine.
I went to Meet in Yaletown to celebrate my daughter's birthday. My other daughter, my sister and my Mom were surprised by the beautiful flavours on each meal. Service was nice and fast. The freshness and the selection was very nice. The ambiance was cozy,...More
This great spot was recently mentioned as one of the tops in the world for vegan eats! The flavor explosion is undeniable! My favorite picks are 1. SWEET-CHILI CAULIFLOWER house beer-battered with tamarind chili-ginger glaze finished with scallions & sesame seeds *warning: these are super-addictiv...More
Thanks for sharing your review and favourite picks, Madalena! We appreciate your support and look forward to having you back again for another visit!",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13550048-Reviews-MeeT_in_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MeeT on Main,"This vegetarian restaurant on Main Street in Vancouver serves delicious food! Every item we ordered had layers of flavours, not just one flavour. So far I have enjoyed the “kalamari”, panko’ed “shrimp”, cheeseburger, pad thai noodle, green dressing salad, beet salad, pulled “pork” nachos, butter...More
I have now visited all three of the MeeT restaurants in Vancouver and love the fact that all three are quite different but all offer great vegan food. I love the art work they have for sale on the walls, supporting and promoting local artists...More
Hello OkanaganYogini! We're so glad you've had a great experience at all three of our locations, and that you enjoy the local rotating art installations we have at MeeT On Main. Thanks for sharing your experience, and we hope to see you back again real...More
A wonderful gastric experience. Dishes prepared fresh with talent and beauty. Wonderful creative cocktails, beautifully presented. My Leche cocktail came with a baby rose bud and fresh leche on a bamboo swizzle stick. We had gf beer battered oyster mushroom calamari with fresh dill dip...More
Thanks for sharing your review, Jaywing18! We're so glad you enjoyed the Lychee Libation cocktail, and both the appetizer and the entrees you and your friend ordered. We hope to see you back again to enjoy more of our menu real soon. Cheers!
We had just landed in Vancouver and happened across this place by accident. So manty great menu options and the food was fabulous (we actually went back for lunch the next day). Went to a different vegan restaurant a few days later and Meet on...More
Hello Murray! We're so happy you enjoyed your meal, and that you would recommend us to others. We appreciate you sharing your review, and hope to see you back again real soon to enjoy more of our menu. Cheers!
I read the menu and placed an order to go. There was no mention that the burger did not have meat. When I got home I was unable to eat the “burger” because I am unable to eat beans. It would be great if the...More
Thank you for your review, TedS427! I'm sorry you weren't able to eat your burger. That must've been a let down! Our standard signature patty doesn't contain beans but our gluten-free black bean patty does so I imagine you ordered that one. Our menu and...More
Had a take out the other day. Mac N Cheeseburger was great as always, but the chocolate tarte dessert is pathetically sized and therefore way overpriced. 9$ plus tax n tip for this 3 spoonfuls of cake!More
Thanks for your review, LeonBiermann! I apologize for the portion size of your Chocolate Ganache Tart. It definitely shouldn't have been 3 spoonfuls! That's absolutely an error. I'd like to make it up to you so please email me at daz@eatmeet.ca so I can learn...More
I was curious to try their burger but after the appetizer I was already full so I just picked a bite of the burger ordered by my brother. The place is very crowded on Saturday night so I recommend to reserve in advance to have...More
Thanks for your review! Glad you enjoyed your visit with us. Hope you can make it back again some day soon!
Great vegetarian food, even if you are not a vegetarian. Everything was delicious and fresh.Staff super friendly and helpful.
Thank you very much, Evelin! We appreciate you taking the time to share your experience. We hope you can make it back for another visit!
Love this chain of vegan eatery's. The delicious food, the delightful kombucha, the vibe, the ethos, the staff, the prices, there is nothing not to love. came here a couple of days after visiting the branch in Gastown (whilst on holiday from the UK) which...More
Thanks for the love, Steve! Hope to see you back in Vancouver for another visit soon :)
We had Vegan friends in town and took them to MEET on Main for our first time. The overall food quality was good and the service was friendly, but we found the menu confusing and the up-charges way too high. On a MEET burger we...More
Thank you for taking the time to share your review, BCGringo. I'm really glad you enjoyed the food and service! I'm sorry the charges didn't seem clear or correct. It's important that they're being properly communicated when you order and never come as surprises when...More
Thoroughly enjoyed this outing for a family lunch. Sauce was tasty; salad was fresh. Even the lemonade was worth it. A worthwhile stop for vegan or vegetarian food.
Thank you very much for your review, Glen! It's wonderful to know that the family enjoyed lunch with us. We appreciate you taking the time to share your experience and we'd love to have you back again soon!
Took my daughters for lunch to this place they raves about. I’m not a vegan like them but found the food pleasing just the same. Had a noodle dish with tofu, was tasty enough. Others had their burger and fries which was pretty awesome.
Thank you very much for your review, FamilySpringBreak! Glad the whole family enjoyed their food. We'd love to have you back again soon!
The kitchen had just closed, but the owner asked if they'd consider making one more - thankfully they said Yes (Thank you Chef!) I had THE best clubhouse ever, with crispy bacon, a huge chunk of roasted chicken (none of that packed sliced tasteless crap),...More
Thanks for your review, Charlene! Glad you had a wonderful experience. We'd love to have you and your family back again soon!
My husband and I were wandering around Main Street and found this gem of a restaurant. Great atmosphere, service and menu with lots of choices. I chose the curried chicken and my husband chose the lamb and we were both very pleased. Both dishes were...More
Thanks for your review, Jennifer! Come back soon :)
Loved the food ... the ambience and the desserts. It is was an awesome place .. very lively and the food came quick. We had the cauliflower soup of the day ... it was delish and then we got the bowls ...food was fresh and...More
Thank you very much for sharing your review and feedback! We hope to see you again soon :)",29,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7193531-Reviews-MeeT_on_Main-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mello,"Read an article about their brioche donuts and wanted to give them a try when we were in the city. Chose the lemon curd and salted caramel and while they looked ordinary at first glance, they were a pleasant surprise. Light and fluffy and not...More
Begun at the end of 2019 in Chinatown, a minimalist space slowed by the pandemic, Mello has now expanded to a second Arbutus location while still maintaining the same quality and creativity that made them a household name with Donut lovers. Known for Brioche-style Donuts...More
Super tasty. These light and airy donuts sprinkled with sugar were not too sweet. Just right! We loved the strawberry and cream and the cereal milk donuts. Fun flavours. Worth a visit.
I came here on a friend’s recommendation. He had prewarned me that they only sell a limited quantity of the donuts each day & get there early. After arriving in the afternoon, a sign was already posted on the door ‘next batch ready at 2:40...More
This unassuming Donut Shop brings together Asian flavours and ideas for what a Donut/Pastry is. They also have cookies/drinks and cakes like basque cheesecakes. Staff are friendly and helpful. The pricing is Mid-range for Vancouver with Donuts in the $4-6 and pastries a little bit...More
Came here, there was a line up. Yes the decor is cute enough, but the donuts are nothing special. Tried the strawberry/cream and creme brulee ones. Wasn't a fan of either, but the strawberry was better. Didn't love the flavor of the dough. Felt like...More
Such a surprising donut shop in the heart of Chinatown. After many friends suggested I go, I decided to give them a try. I wasn’t disappointed. They’re pricey no doubt, but their donuts also use very fresh ingredients. My top 3 favourites would have to...More
“Mellow” – Adj. Pleasantly smooth or soft; free from harshness. I know the spelling is slightly different but if there was one word to describe the Strawberries and Cream brioche donut at this Chinatown donuterie… “Mello” would suffice. As a person who loves donuts (are...More
These donuts are unreal! Definitely worth checking out, the strawberry ones are the best and my personal favourite. The matcha green tea one is so good too. Definitely recommend stopping in!
In a town saturated with donut joints, I was very skeptical about trying another sweet dessert place. But, this is no ordinary donut store - it is a bright sunny room thoughtfully conceived and realized. Painted in a bright yellow, it stands out among the...More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d20356198-Reviews-Mello-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Memphis Blues BBQ,"So, if you were born and raised in Vancouver…or someplace similar, well, you probably have based your idea of what barbeque should taste like based on what you Dad would manage to do during the summer…followed perhaps by what you do now. If this is...More
Now they only have two location one in Robson and one in Commercial Dr , it is my first time visit in these location , meting a great friend in the area ,we both a meat Junkie , so we end up at Memphis for...More
Excellent food, quick service. Not happy to see a charge for an extra plate & cutlery (so I could share with my wife), but BLOWN AWAY by a 'Happy Birthday' treat box! Very thankful we chose this place for a special day's treat!
We came here with a few friends on a Sunday night and loved it- best BBQ we have had so far in Vancouver! Because there were 6 of us, the waitress recommended we get the shared Elvis platter- we were very grateful for her good...More
If you are looking for something other than noodles and rice then look no further. Wow ! Great ribs, pulled pork and Brisket left little room for the corn bread beans and fries. The price was very reasonable for huge potions we had leftovers to...More
The food was pretty good. The service was pretty bad. We listened to other tables get a run through of the menu and house made specialities and watched as the tables all around us were served. An hour into our visit we asked about out...More
As a family we went to this restaurant and ordered the platter. The variety on the platter covered all that you would expect from a bbq restaurant. There was so much food that the staff kindly boxed it up for us and we snacked on...More
We were greeted with open arms by George and his staff. The food and service was above and beyond. Highly recommended.
We ate here after arriving from London. We had a sharing platter between three, way too much food but it was so good we ate it all! Service was really friendly. If we lived locally we would definitely come back.
I took my two young boys to Memphis Blues on Commercial drive. The restaurant was filling up, but we were seated right away. We opted for the Memphis Platter, which feeds 3 to 4 people. I ordered a drink from their cocktail menu, which was...More
Ordered food to go said I'd be out side and they left me waiting in the cold for 20 minutes after my food was ready... 20 minutes of my time is worth a lot so screw them they better pay my invoice! OK! now im...More
Good food and nice atmosphere. Staff was really friendly and helpful when we asked about suggestions and the size of the meal.
Always a little leery of restaurants that have morphed from one or two original locations into franchises spanning several cities, or worse still, provinces, Memphis Blues still manages to pretty much serve up the above-average BBQ fare it always has. Bright spots on a recent...More
Great meat platters, supper for family or friends feast. Selection of ribs, pulled pork, sausage, chicken and more. You can't ask for more.
Our office ordered food for an office lunch from this location. All the meats were good, but the beef brisket was outstanding. It was so juicy and delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9778447-Reviews-Memphis_Blues_BBQ-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Memphis Blues BBQ House,"The food was fantastic. The service was great. The team was friendly. Great atmosphere. The smoked brisket and chicken was tasteful, cooked perfectly.
This restaurant is on Robson ST. in Vancouver. It is near the A & W near seymour St. It is a small place. The staff were friendly and helpful. I tried the jambalaya which was well prepped. The food was extremely delicious with a corn...More
We visited February, 2023. My daughter enjoyed Calamari Po Boy and husband liked his shrimp. We didn’t smell the smoke on our way in so I should have passed on beef brisket sandwich. The bun is not the right choice, need a softer one. Cole...More
I have been to and ordered from Memphis Blues for many years. After time abroad, I took my wife last night for the first time (back in my case) to eat and we order the Memphis Platter. Just to be transparent, she is Brazilian and...More
Commercial Drive location has a nice vibe and great service. Attentive and friendly. Ribs were good. Not much for someone following a keto diet; bbq sauce very sweet.
Much to my delight, I received a call last week from one of the two co-founders of Memphis Blue BBQ (MBBBQ) - George Siu. He felt it was time for their magnificent BBQ emporium - to give back to the front line nurses and surgeons...More
I’ve been to both Memphis Blues BBQ House (Downtown and Commercial Drive) and they’re very similar. Both have delicious food, friendly employees, nice background music and decor. The beer is also good. It’s not the cheapest place in town, but it’s a good call if...More
A long-timeI friend who I have known 37 years, back to my working times in London as a journalist, used to assert most jobs could be done by most people who put their mind to it. I sort of agreed but said there were some...More
The BBQ is always on point and consistent. Can’t wait to go back for more BBQ very soon. Thank you Memphis Blues.
Yummy selection of meats eaten as a shared feast with friends or as burgers,.The sides and drinks are nice too. Portions are huge!
The Blues. The Bourbon!! The BBQ!! Meat still gives me a lard on!! Thank you, Jo for creating a memorable experience at our favourite Vancouver spot for back-home BBQ! This restaurant is the only reason I don’t bbq at home on a regular basis.
This is a good option for lunch in the area. Wait wasn't bad, and I got my food quickly. Quality of the brisket and rib ends was above average. BBQ beans were surprisingly good, and the sauce was very good. Corn bread and coleslaw were...More
Shared a platter that had a wide variety of meats. The food arrived to the table lukewarm at best. The main thing that I found was that it was lacking any smoke flavour. Most BBQ places I’ve been at you can smell the smoked food...More
Had a shrimp po' boy, it was full of hot & tasty shrimp on a very fresh sub bun, coleslaw and brown beans on the side, it was so good I ate more than I should have, actually had some including the sides to take...More
This restaurant is a good option to try some different, I recommended to ask for combo meal and jar of beer",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d785096-Reviews-Memphis_Blues_BBQ_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Memphis Blues Barbeque House,"Incredible food and even better service! The waiter was super friendly, helpful and personable and the food was absolutely to die for. Best meal we’ve had.
It was nice to find this small restaurant along Robson Street, not far from my hotel. I was seated right away and the service was very good. I enjoyed my brisket sandwich and the sides. Will definitely go back again when I’m in Vancouver. A...More
Me and couple of friends wanted to go there for dinner and couple of drinks. We’ve all been there before and liked food, so one of us made reservation a week before, even check the reservation a day earlier. When we showed up we were...More
ordered the platter. ribs were good sausage was good brisket was dry and super salty pulled pork was dry and lacked any taste 1/2 chicken has small fragments of bone littered thorough it. Caution!! not the same quality as old location on broadway
Woman taking order needs to learn a lesson in manners, absolutely terrible customer service skills. We should of walked away after our interaction with her but were willing to give the food a try. The food was just ok, We will never be back.
We were staying across the street at the Hilton and looking for a restaurant for dinner. I was kind of cautious about eating barbecue food because sometimes it’s a hit or miss thing. Well, this place was absolutely fantastic. I had baby back ribs and...More
When we first ate here approx 4 years ago the food was quite good. We came back approx 2 years ago and found the food disappointing. Today we decided to give it another chance and found that the food has deteriorated immensely. In my opinion...More
A famous BBQ place in town, we always order their Signature Memphis Blue Feast (2-4 people). Even if there are just two of us, cause we can pack the left overs and have more yumminess the next day. $70 for a big platter split between...More
This is our Seventh year to Vancouver and not one year goes past without eating Brisket at Memphis Blues Babeque House. The best brisket in the world. A very small and quaint little restaurant between Homer and Richards Street. Highly recommended and it did not...More
Close to Vancouver public library. Rare to find such delicious bbq ribs and brisket in town. My family enjoys their food almost every week
Stopped for lunch, based on reviews, since it was close to our hotel. His Pulled pork sandwich ok, nothing special, but the fries were awesome. My chili was ok, not good or bad. Chewy beef in it. Cornbread fair. Floor was dirty and gross. Tables...More
We were blown away by this little restaurant. Super quick service and such huge portions!!! Their share plates looked amazingly, a portion of ribs will easily feed 2. The flavours were great. We will definitely go back.
The place is good and the food is good and the price is ok. Very recommended when in Vancouver. There is a package for 3-4 adults, enough for a family
We're BBQ aficionados and were pleasantly surprised by how good this barbecue was. We had pulled pork sandwiches which were very good. You can substitute fries for the beans-and-cole-slaw that normally acccompanies the sandwich.
Visited on a recommendation and found it tucked between other units. Service was friendly and quick. We had the pulled pork and brisket meals and the meat was melt in the mouth tender with very tasty sauce, good fries and slaw. Very generous portion which...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3784012-Reviews-Memphis_Blues_Barbeque_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mexican Chipotle Grill Metrotown,"Pretty simple order arrived 50 minutes late and missing an item. When called back to complain spoke to the manager who said I could go to the restaurant and pick up a beverage. Not what I was expecting after a delayed incomplete order.
My favorite food in the entire North America. Eating Chipotle once during a trip to North America is simply not enough. The burrito bowl is superb, especially if you add a serving of guacamole on it. It truly is worth the price! Note: This restaurant...More
Good location for a Chipotle, staff are nice and the food is good. However the portions are quote light, they could be a little heavier handed.
I love stopping for a meal here. Eat in or take out. Always delicious and great value, healthy too. Good for vegetarians! Sometimes a line up but always well worth the wait! Definitely a great stop!
went for a quick takeaway when we were staying at hilton metrotown. quick service but alas they were out of guacamole. ordered a bowl. tasty. large portion size and value for money. cant make a mistake when you eat there
Good carnitas tacos. This is one of the better locations I have been to. We used the online ordering the food was hot and ready to go when I got there.
You can't go wrong with Chipotle. The company is very well respected for delivering quality food every time. I had a bowl quick was cheap, tasty and of a good portion. The meat was delicious and went well with the hot sauce, lettuce and rice....More
I believe it was my first time going to a mexican restaurant. Server were nice, food was yummi, you pay for one cup and you can fill in drinks as many times as you want.
I have waited 6 month since they do not have this place where i currently reside! it was worth the way!
Nice clean place with friendly staff. Quick service and good amount of seats. Great for a quick bite. Food is fresh and they make it in front of you.
I order from here every wednesday and I usually get a steak bowl to go, lately the quality seems to be slipping but today was the worst as the steak was bloody and rather unappetizing with large chunks of sinew and fat. I don't think...More
A very good burrito. Love the brown rice option. Loaded with black beans, guac and cheese. Very flavorful.
Have the burrito bowl which was just excellent. The ingredients are very fresh and flavorful. Excellent offerings.
We don't have Chipotle in Hawaii, so we made sure to get some while in Burnaby. This place is busy, so we got take out as the shopping center closed. The food is standard Chipotle, design your own salad / burrito. We enjoyed the meal...More
bowls, burritos, etc. decent portions, chips and salsa are extra, which I don't like.... not like a real taqueria in the US or mexico. you can get Mexican beer which makes up for that. a bit pricey but not too far out of reach. long...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7705252-Reviews-Mexican_Chipotle_Grill_Metrotown-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Miko Sushi,"FOR THE LAST 10 YEARS, MIKO IS THE ONLY SUSHI RESTAURANT I AM GOINTO FOR LUNCH OR DINNER!!! ALLWAYS FRESH, ALLWAYS DELICIOUS, ALLWAYS FRENDLY STAFF!!! FOR THE MONEY, IT IS THE BEST SUSHI RESTAURANT IN VANCOUVER.ONL
Great spot for sushi at Robson, fresh food plus authentic sushi experience. If you want a cozy place with reasonable price on Robson, forget about all other spots, just stick with Miko!
When I planned my first trip to Vancouver I knew I wanted to try sushi there. Trip adviser sent me here and it was delish! Just like I used to get in NYC when I was younger! Be sure to make a reservation. They are...More
Lovely setting overlooking the water. Fantastic service from a lovely waitress. Best sushi we have had and excellent wine. Nothing not to like, a great choice when in Vancouver
7 of us enjoyed a nice meal together. We ordered various Sashimi, rolls, unagi meal, and appetizers such as tofu too for the kids. Very good service. Make sure to make a reservation so not turned away.
Sushi isn't just food, it's an experience. You want a cozy little place with friendly staff, chefs who take pride in their work, and a leisurely ambience that isn't pushing you through your meal. Miko Sushi is a rare gem of a restaurant. It never...More
The food and service were amazing. The salmon sashimi is to die for! The restaurant was full and we didn’t have a reservation and they went above and beyond for us to get a seat.
Nice atmosphere with good sushi quality, but nothing special. Prices are attractive, but you get what you pay for. Okay for everyday, but for a more exquisite experience with higher grade sushi, I would seek better other places.
Over the past 40 years I've enjoyed many sushi experiences! But this is the best quality I have ever had. I did take out as I had a busy day with business and when I opened my order, it actually didn't look so impressive. But...More
Don't get me wrong, there are a lot of excellent Japanese restaurants run by other ethnicities but as a J-lander, I appreciate it when I can speak the language and know where their cooking influences come from. The quality of the fish was very good...More
We have been going to Miko Sushi since the late 90's and this is one of those rare places where the quality of the food is always impeccable. We no longer live in Vancouver, but we do make a point of going to Miko Sushi...More
A Nice atmosphere and super taste and service. Went with my colleague to just have some pices iPod sushi, ended up with a full meal of sashimi and maki, including «dessert».
I have eaten sushi and sashimi for decades around world. This is best i have eaten The Chefs selection sashimi was incredible. So fresh. Texture flavors. Mmmm
Outstanding food, professional service and atmosphere. Our favorite spot in Vancouver for Sushi and it is well worth the wait.
As a person that eats sushi quite often, I have to say that Miko Sushi did not live up to the expectation that was set by the other Google reviews and reviews on Trip Advisor. I found that the food was overpriced, and the quality...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d786663-Reviews-Miko_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Miku,"We have eaten Japanese food in many countries and outside of Japan this is without doubt the best we’ve had. What made the food better was the great service and advice about what to combine as well. Hard to get a booking and a bit...More
Great service and excellent food. Our waitress, Eva, guided us thru the menu. Highly recommended for a great dinner.
The sushi was superb, and our waiter (Lennie) guided us through the menu to find the most interesting appetizers and sushis. Some of the sauces were clearly specials of the chef, and unlike most ordinary sushi restaurants. This is a ""not to be missed"" experience...More
Had dinner at Miku & was served by Lennie. Exceptional service with simply sublime food! Best sashimi we have had outside of Japan! Lovely ambiance & great atmosphere! They are busy so make sure to book in advance! Huge thanks to Lennie & the chefs...More
My family and I ate here 2 weeks ago and was disappointed with the quality of seafood. It was also rice heavy. In addition, they currently have a rat problem. 😱 We saw a rat running through the restaurant. Brought it up to the manager....More
A suggestion from a friend, wow, it was great! Graeme was amazing, he looked after us wonderfully, made some great suggestions as we weren’t locals. We had the sushi selection which was perfect as we wanted an early but light dinner. I also thoroughly enjoyed...More
The sushi here is amazing! I was hesitant to try the dishes without any wasabi, but you really don't need it. Every dish I tried was delicious and the presentation of each dish was beautiful! Service and staff were phenomenal. They explain the composition of...More
Maybe one of the best sushi places we’ve been to. The restaurant is small and seating is limited but the food was so good. We sat at the bar and were quickly served. You must have the Ebi Oshi Sushi. Oh good grief….good!
Best sushi I’ve had - and I’ve had a lot lol. Everything was so fresh, tasty and beautiful. A flavour explosion for your mouth and work of art for your eyes.
We'd had several locals recommend this spot, and though we've never been to Japan, this was the best sushi we've had. In addition to the extremely fresh and flavorful sashimi and inventive rolls, the aburi sushi is the reason to come here. Out of this...More
Great sushi, lovely location, wonderful customer service! We enjoyed several types of sushi/nagiri, edamame, wine, and a nojito mocktail.
We were served raw chicken! Completely raw. Ordered the Chicken Katsu and it was completely raw. Not undercooked, actually raw pieces of chicken coated in breading and sauce. We called the staff over and they took the raw chicken away and asked if we wanted...More
Excellent sushi with harbor front views in a central downtown location. The ambiance is hip and the fish is fresh.
Fresh and delectable fish, sushi, and dairy-free dessert. The sashimi and stuffed ebi were amazing! Dishes are beautifully presented. Really good service, apart from not receiving extra wasabi and hot water for tea that was requested. I will definitely return, as the excellent meal and...More
Pricey, but excellent japanese food with a little fusion flavor. The famous aburi sushi is a must try. Great ambiance with an excellent view.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1212806-Reviews-Miku-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Milltown Bar & Grill,"I came with my wife and asked for first table available for two. The girl said “it will take 30 minutes, we can take your phone”. I gave my phone number. She said “we will call you once, if you don’t respond we take you...More
This place is off the beaten path, so generally only locals are there. We were there on a sunny and warm weekend day, so the picnic tables (with umbrellas) outside were lovely. Lots of activity with the river and airport nearby. Lots of food and...More
Great spot for lunch or dinner. I happened to have to do some work there and had to pass through the kitchen area and observed that it was spotlessly clean. Stayed for lunch and it was very good. Great menu. Definitely a place to stop...More
We got a little turned around getting to this location but no big deal. We appreciated the server giving us the option to sit on the quieter side of the restaurant. My Battleship burger and my partner’s jambalaya tasted good and arrived without delay. Our...More
Went there this afternoon for lunch with 3 of my buddies. Lots of free parking. We were greeted by a very polite hostess who immediately seated us. The server came over to us within seconds, took our drink order after she dropped off the drinks...More
Very interesting brunch menu, 4 different choices in our group and rave reviews all around. Would recommend reservations as by the time we left the place was really filling up. On a nice day they have ample outdoor seating but on a rainy day would...More
We were in the Vancouver area for a cruise and were looking for a non-chain restaurant for lunch. Found Milltown on Trip Advisor and pleased we did. Great menu and service. Good drink selection. We took an Uber to and from the restaurant and noticed...More
I have been to Milltown Pub 8-9 times thus far, and certainly intend to go back again. It's a little hidden gem! I want to say that the quality of the food has been consistently excellent...but I must hold back a bit on that comment....More
This very warm and friendly pub is located on Richmond Island and situated between a marina on the north side and The YVR Airport on the southern side with planes landing in the distance.. the two waterfront patios provide fabulous outdoor space to consider.. our...More
To say I was disappointed in an understatement. From the “welcome” at the entry (I’ve had better experiences with TSA), to the disaffected uninterested wait staff the visit to this establishment was nothing short of a “never again” checkmark. The food was ok but again...More
I have been to Milltown a couple of times, but not recently. This time we were both disappointed by a lot of the visit. For food, my meal was decent- I had the jambalaya, which was tasty and well presented. My husband had the beef...More
We had the sciracha honey mustard chicken wings, dry dock salad and wild mushroom flat bread. The flatbread was delicious, The wings - we could taste the mustard but not so much the sriacha, but still tasted good.. The dry dock salad was exceptionally delicious...More
After a nice visit with my aunt at the seniors home , family feel have a Western Food , I check on Tripadvisor and find out Milltown Bar & Grill not too far from here , and it is not that easy to find ,it...More
Great food. Great atmosphere. Always a great time going there. Love to patio... when the sun is out!! It’s the place to go.
We’ve come here a few times and it’s always been a solid dining experience. The staff are always very welcoming so expect to have great service. Interesting fact that it’s technically in Richmond but located on the Vancouver side. So let’s get to the food....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d10486129-Reviews-Milltown_Bar_Grill-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Minami Restaurant,"Solid restaurant with excellent service. We felt very welcomed and never rushed. The apps were really tasty (tuna tar tar, carrots). Main reason for 4 stars is the nigiri was underwhelming and just mid.
The venue is quite stylish and we didn't book but managed to get seating for two in the main dining area. All staff were well presented, friendly and able to make suitable suggestions on both food and drinks. The sushi dishes we tried were tasty...More
Walking through Yaletown and considering sushi for lunch. The open door of this restaurant caught my eye because of the beautiful hardwood floors and the elegant lobby. It looked like a small restaurant, but as we were lead through the restaurant back to the main...More
We aren’t sushi experts but my Vancouver family ordered for us and we were blown away. Absolutely gorgeous food, beautifully presented. I have to mention the brussel sprouts appetizer - one of the best things I’ve ever tasted! Don’t miss it! This is a really...More
My partner and I went to Vancouver for a weekend and made a reservation for 5:15pm. It was a very hot day and we were out under the sun for an entire day. I felt a bit embarrassing when I went into the restaurant in...More
Booking a few days ahead is required for dining here, attesting to its popularity. A big fan of Aburi sushi, I was drawn to this restaurant. Not just simply excelling in its version of aburi sushi, there is a modern twist to many of the...More
I ordered the 6 course tasting menu. The first course was terrific. The salad course was ok. Then I waited an hour and a half for my third course. When I got it I was astonished. Apparently they’re trying a new way to make sushi....More
Perhaps it was close to closing time for lunch but I thought the service was not as good as previous times I had been there. I went with a set lunch which was quite decent. But I prefer its sister restaurant Miku, which I think...More
This restaurant is only half a mile away from my place so I have been there a few times. This trip was for lunch. The food and service were amazing and the place was quite busy, given a snow day. Reservations were relatively easy to...More
The food is beautifully presented and the ingredients are fresh and unique. Stephan and the waiter at the bar both take pride in their work and made great suggestions.
Vancouver is known for its excellent sushi /Japanese restaurants and so far I agree and have not been disappointed. We decided on the spur to visit Minami and we did not have a booking but it was late Saturday afternoon and the restaurant accommodated us...More
We found this place last year as a dinner spot before going to the theatre and it's excellent. We love Miku in Vancouver and this is the same owner. The staff is great, the location is across the street from the theatres and good is...More
Good items on the menu but not a five star in our opinion. Really good ideas and food combinations and service was spot on suggesting when desired
We went here expecting a great experience, based on other reviews. The food was good but not stellar. The servers were inattentive, as they are probably overwhelmed (true for so many restaurants post-COVID). My sashimi plate arrived 10 minutes before my son's sushi plate. I...More
I went with all my family, we were 8 and all of us were planning to consume food and drinks. My sister has a health condition and she needs to eat a very strict diet. She wasn’t allowed to eat her own food (she brought...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3321067-Reviews-Minami_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Minerva Pizza & Steak House,"Last minute idea and it was a great one! We We’re looking for a place to eat about 330pm and stopped in to Minerva after receiving a recommendation. So glad they could accommodate us in the lounge since the dining room wasn’t open yet. We...More
We have visited here quite often over the years when visiting Vancouver. The calamari never disappoints and the pizza is great. When I want Greek have really enjoyed the moussaka as well. Service was friendly and will definitely go back again.
Loved the dishes ordered roasted lamb and a pizza. Homemade carrot cake for dessert. Definitely worth a return visit
Stopped by for dinner on a Tuesday evening and was told before I sat down that they need the table back in 90 minutes. It comes off as rude and arrogant. I dine at many restaurants in Vancouver and never get told that I have...More
We ordered pick up for five people. We phoned in and were told to pick up in half an hour. When we got the food home and went to chow down, all of the items were poor. Two orders of Roast Lamb Shoulder, dry and...More
I try the taste and it's marvelous!!!. You can't leave to Vancouver until visit Minervas Restaurant, I recomend it you.
Minerva's has stood the test of time - great service. Had moussaka and it was tasteless - I even asked if they had cooked with any salt and pepper!! Very disappointing. My friend enjoyed his lamb.
This is a well established family restaurant in Kerrisdale which has come to take their customers and quality control for granted. Today we ordered a large family meal and we noticed that one of the calamari had thick hairs. Upon closer examination they had fried...More
Found the owner/manager to be quite rude after a problem with my food being undercooked. Also, not good with Covid protocol At All. My table was dirty and obviously not cleaned
I always liked this restaurant until covid stupidity took hold. Now I realize I enjoyed hanging out with my friends and it just happened to be here. The food is alright but expensive. And like most other restaurants, when you are in the middle of...More
I have been going to Minerva's since my early teens. Now in my mid 50's, have experienced a change of ownership and I must say the selection and quality of the food is just as a good in the 80's, as it is now, even...More
I’d give it a “good” rather than “very good”. First time trying this (our) neighbourhood eatery and we picked one of the highest of holidays to eat out; thanksgiving. Got there on time and checked in for my reservations. They’re swamped so I am more...More
This is a very popular place, with good food, pleasant wait staff and huge portions. We ate from the Mediterranean side of the menu, although the Italian side was larger. I had excellent Moussaka and my husband had roasted lamb shank. Neither of us could...More
The lamb chops are delicious. So is the calamari and the grilled vegetables. Try the house red wine.
this multigeneration family run restaurant has fantastic staff. the food is comfy food you will crave. everything i have ever ordered (and i've been here hundreds of times) is amazing. where can you get a side of lasagna instead of a potato? it's so difficult...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d706915-Reviews-Minerva_Pizza_Steak_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Minoas Greek Taverna,"Absolutely fantastic. We take more salads and starters and “kontosouvli’ that was perfect! Highly recommended!!!!!
Returned after a spell, this time on Valentines Day, to the same charming restaurant and friendly family staff for a guaranteed great Greek dinner. We've eaten here numerous times over the years and they never disappoint. Started with their greek salad then shared a saganaki....More
I wanted to share how incredibly friendly everyone is here, such a welcoming atmosphere. The Roast lamb was delicious, generous portion and the potatoes where perfectly charred and flavorful. I also ordered the calamari and it was tender not chewy- exactly how we love it!...More
Visited for a business dinner..table of 8. The owners run a wonderful old school family business. Great attentive and kind service .. good honest food, generous portions and excellent value.. Will definitely be back. Efxaristo!! Mario
I was in the area for a business lunch and this was the venue. A quaint little spot off Kingsway, we were greeted and taking upstairs to a lovely seating area. Our waitress was attentive. I enjoyed a very garlicky hummus along with a small...More
Rain or shine, Summer, Autumn, Winter or Spring, my wife and I enjoy dining at Minoas Greek Taverna. Candlelight and Greek music set the mood. Order a lovely wine from the extensive menu, a generous salad, sizzling saganaki and you will soon think yourself lounging...More
Reserved for birthday dinner celebration on a Saturday. Parking is tricky as the lot is small and then you will need to find space along residential streets. Even entering the restaurant is difficult if you are not a local. Once in you would need to...More
The real Greek. Superb food, fish ribs, chicken or lamb you simply can not go wrong. Small portions are AOK but if you are really hungry try large. My absolute favourite is Yemista...stuffed rice in tomatoes or peppers. Mythos beer is a real treat. Greece...More
I was celebrating a wedding anniversary and this was my restaurant of choice. I was welcomed with a ""where have you been?"" which was nice. I love the ambiance of the restaurant. I enjoyed my Greek barbecued ribs. They are always tasty and tender and...More
We have not been to Minoas Greek Taverna for years but we had recently ordered pick up. The two times we had pick up the lamb souvlaki was good and the kalamari was tender, the portions generous, so we decided to try dining in. I...More
We used to go to this restaurant on a regular basis, because we enjoyed it, but that was 12+ years. Let me be positive to start. The rice was very good. The chicken was good. What was that green mush? My wife thought it might...More
Came here for lunch with 2 friends, was seated promptly. Took our 3 identical order of chicken and lamb souvlaki combo, was served with water and found mine to have an unidentified floating object after taking a sip, yuck! Kept my cool, pointed it out...More
It was our first time to Minoas. The service was excellent. We had the lamb shoulder - good presentation and tender. The veggie meal with eggplant, zucchini and potatoes topped with cheese - bland and least favourite; The tiramisu cheesecake was different - had some...More
We have been coming here for years and every time we receive all that is expected from a Good Restaurant. Georgia and Anna prove that even when they are extremely busy consider each customer as special. The food is excellent and nicely prepared.
We hadn't been to Minoas in a long time, even though they're in our neighbourhood. Decided to give them another try when they advertised on Groupon. The Groupon deal wasn't much of a savings, however, it seemed that as soon as they realized we were...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d806214-Reviews-Minoas_Greek_Taverna-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Mirchi Restaurant,"Super delicious. Authentic Pakistan good. But be patient waiting for the great food as the owner Joseph does everything for you - greeting, ordering, cooking, serving, collecting payment and also cleaning dishes and tables...so please tip him generously. :)
Enjoyed authentic Pakistani biryani, desi chai and samosa. Highly recommended to try the authentic taste. Mr. Sadiq is a lovely person and owner of this place. Will be back to try Karachi style Nihari and nan.
It doesn't look like much, but the food is inexpensive and amazing Located on Granville Street between Airport and downtown Highly recommend this place
We've been patronizing Mirchi since about 2003 when an Indian friend introduced us to this very cozy Indian cafe. We are particularly fond of their samosas, butter chicken, beef shank and their house combo.
Granville Street of Vancouver is a nice eatery serving tasty Indian and Mughalai fare. The Master Chef Josef makes it more comfortable. The items served are all freshly made to order, the choice is varied, special items of the day are separately listed and the...More
Not fine dining but very fine food. Great value. I’ve been there 20 times or so. Joseph the owner bakes naan fresh on site.
Amazing food, savoury, the perfect amount of flavour in each bite. A bit spicy for me though, my family loved it. Dessert was my favourite, khere.
Having a hankering for Indian food we decided upon Mirchi as it was enroute home. Our evening dinner selection was biryani (rice and chicken) with naan. A very delicious meal. There's more than ample street parking on weekends.
The food was very good. We had a lamb dish and some vegetarian dishes. Service was excellent. The setup was more like a cafe so not a great atmosphere. Overall we had good value.
If my recollection serves me correctly we first visited the Mirchi Restaurant in 2005 (I believe that the restaurant has changed hands at least once since then). Although the food is still more than satisfactory my fondest memories are from our first visit way back...More
Really enjoyed the butter chicken (had a sweetness that I personally really liked) Service was polite and friendly. Will happily return.
Wanting some sustenance after a cold evening out of doors I took my family here. We were warmly greeted and given menus. After placing our orders we waited a full 30 minutes for our food to arrive. I'm all for 'prepared from fresh' food but...More
The restaurant is like being invited direclty of the family that own the place. They are friendly and give good advice (especially in terms of what level of spiceness you can tolerate). The food is tasty and you can see the cooker prepare it from...More
There is a sign outside of the restaurant advising everything is made from scratch and asks for your patience. Definitely worth the wait. The naan was nice and fresh. We ordered the Sarahi chicken, chicken pakora and lamb vindaloo. All excellent. Family run business, very...More
I had a mix vegetable curry and naan to take out. It didn't taste good thought price was quite cheap. May be need to try some more things...",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d816702-Reviews-Mirchi_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
MoMo Sushi,"Very nice easy to get to sushi spot for a late lunch. They have combos that are more than enough for 2-4 people. My family loves their sushi and we left more than satisfied. Service was quick and the waitress was very kind. Every need...More
It was a great, unique place for sushi. Great waitress who was patient and attentive. The draft beer was delicious and orders came out quickly.
We were served hot Miso soup as soon as we sat down and even before we ordered our food! Fantastic because we just walked in from the rain and cold. The food here is delicious and the severing is plentiful. If we had more days...More
We went here for late lunch, and found it to be a cozy and homey place to order sushi & sashimi. They have bento box combos; mine included generous portions of both sushi & sashimi, plus some tempura shrimp & chicken and salad. We both...More
We were taken here by my local friend. FOOD (65 CAD for 4 with drinks/tip; 38 GBP) I have never seen such large, big and chunky sushis in my life before. As we were really hungry two of us shared the Party Platter for 2-3...More
Right across from our hotel. Stopped it for a quick dinner. Had some sushi and bento boxes. Kids said the sushi was good, but their tastes are simple for sushi (California roll).
Actually I wasn't expecting anything superb from a cheap Sushi place but in many other cases I found out that it could be actually decent. Not this time. The food felt like fast food and actually didn't taste like sushi. Good thing that we found...More
Stumbled across this restaurant whilst wandering around Gastown - great menu and food to back it up. One bit of advice - try not to be seated at the back near the restrooms.
Ordered take out from the Robson Street location. I ordered box D which came with sushi and sashimi, ebi sunomono and miso soup, tempura, chicken teriyaki, rice and salad. This is a bargain for the price I paid. The dipping sauce for the tempura tasted...More
We ate twice at Momo. We ordered a ""sushi lovers for 2"" well I think that's what it's called. OMG it's HUGE ! We couldn't believe it only cost $35 for the entire meal plus drinks. So let's start ... miso, salad, sizzling chicken, huge...More
The Sushi was good and very reasonable by US standards. A quirky place but very cozy and inviting. Located just on the edge of Gas Town
Just off the central Robson street but still hidden enough to drop there accidentally, this tiny non pretentious place is a perfect location to devour yummy food at very reasonable budget. Do not count on bringing there a crowded company as the place is really...More
Recommended by our hotel, this small unpretentious hole in the wall in funky Gastown is good value & even better food. Along with two hot Miso soups, we split an overflowing Bento box that was delicious, interesting & plenty for two.
Momo sushi has top shelf sushi at an amazing price. I ordered a bento box - incredibly fresh well trimmed sushi. Service was fast. I loved the complimentary tea. Tummy filled, my bill came in at $7.An incredible meal that didn't break my backpacker budget.
This is an awesome spot to go if you're on the way to the beach or if you're looking for a cheap eat. It is a smaller restaurant but you can sit there and enjoy the hot soup they offer as service which is pretty...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2402691-Reviews-MoMo_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Modern Handi Indian Cuisine,"Today I have dinner in modern Handi amazing food special Methi chicken and garlic Naan and veg biryani all food very delicious special samosas very delicious and fresh quick service serving staff is very polite and corporative
My sister and I decided to stop in for lunch after a cycle around Stanly Park. We had the delicious Thali lunch special and were warmed right up with the lovely service from the waitress and the best butter chicken and garlic naan of our...More
We were visiting Vancouver from Washington, where my British Indian husband cannot find any decent Indian food. Luckily he found this place, it was great. We had the chicken lollipops, chicken tikka masala, garlic naan and raita. It was all delicious. It’s a cute, charming...More
Excellent little joint and very cozy with warm and friendly staff and excellent food. The lamb biriyani was the best and we had it twice in 2 days.
We love Indian food and have been on the search for the best Indian restaurant in downtown since moving here last November. Modern Handi is hands down the best Indian we've found. The chicken lolipops are a wonderul appetizer and the Lamb Madras is our...More
This is the very best Indian meal you’ll find outside of India! Wafer thin delicious paratha, scrummy vegetarian dishes, ample portions and extremely courteous staff.
We have been several times this year and enjoy the food. Lunchtime thali is pretty good value. Kind women at the front. But what's with the scowling man in the kitchen? On each of my visits he seemed super annoyed to have customers. Stomped around...More
When I tried to order Indian food from Modern Handi online, there was a problem with the software that determined the delivery area. But I called the restaurant and they were extremely helpful in taking my order, which arrived within a half hour. The food...More
We ordered biryani and mutton karahi, and we were really disappointed by the quantity and quality of the food. We did complain and requested to take biryani back, but the staff insisted on trying it out. In short, not recommended
I have been to Modern Handi Indian Cuisine quite many times and I just love their food. I have tried various appetizers and mains and my topmost favorites are Tandoori chicken, Chicken Tikka in appetizers, Lamb Curry and Fish Curry in Mains and the best...More
The food was delicious especially the beriani. I strongly recommend it. The dal and the nan were also great.
Provided a satisfying lunch for my brother and I-- we had the tandoori chicken and lamb curry with naan and rice, which were both decent. My favorite dish by far was the butter chicken; it was delicious! They have a lunch special with that dish,...More
We like Indian food, try it often when on trips. We found this place by accident but were very happy with the choices available and the flavors of our dinners. I was happy to see onion kulcha available, as not all places have it. I'd...More
Very good indian freshly made food. Bombay aloo is delicious Shahi paneer is very good roti is authentic and garlic naan was amazing. Best place for vegetarians Indians. Staff is good and very helpful. One must visit if looking for vegetarians food .
We ordered Tandoori chicken from Tandoori Seekh menu (plus tandoori roti bread), which was fine. But, I like chicken in much more special way. I expected it to be smaller pieces of chicken breast much better cooked (as I ate tandoori chicken in another Hindi...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14391369-Reviews-Modern_Handi_Indian_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Moltaqa Moroccan Restaurant,"I loved this restaurant so much that I decided to celebrate my birthday twice in the same place. The entertainment with the live dancer, the food, the bar and management make this place run in a fabulous way. My server Anastasia was so friendly, knowledgeable,...More
My husband adores moroccon food and since being in Vancouver, we have been to this place twice!! This review relates to our 2nd visit and we ordered a roasted carrot, feta and lemon salad which was yum. For my mains I ordered a chicken tagine...More
I went with my friends because of the good reviews I saw on the internet, but now I have doubts if the people who put them are his relatives, The restaurant is dirty, perfect for attracting animals, Not only was the food bad, but the...More
We arrived on time for our reservation but were asked to wait a few minutes to wait for our table to be prepared, this wasn't an issue but there were lots of empty tables and lots of staff around so would be better if this...More
What a pleasure to dine in such a lovely place! Exquisite dishes, great ambiance and superb service made for a wonderful evening and dining experience. Bernd Williams Lake, BC
Food and service was good. I didn’t give them 5 because we were not told the time limit for dining when we booked or when we were seated. Our reservation was at 7:30pm and was rushed out at 9:15pm, dessert wasn’t even half eaten when...More
The food was delicious and the service started off well. However, after not even and hour and twenty minutes we were asked to hurry up and leave. People were waiting for our table! We were a group of 4, we had appies and drinks and...More
If you don’t have a modern smart phone memorise the menu before you visit! Of our group of 5 huddled around our small table only 2 had a phone that could gain access to the menu. If you are not signed up to Shaw there...More
The food was pretty good…I had the duck flambé which I thought was very good and my daughter had the chicken tagline was mediocre. The duck was served on a large cutting board and the tagline was quite large…neither fit in the small table…it was...More
Outstanding evening at Moltaqa with owner Mimo . Food is delicious, very large portions, the vegetarian appetizer platter is a must. Tagines are prepared to perfection. We had so much fun sitting at the bar. Total.of 7 of us moving and sharing plates. The specialty...More
The experience of the Moroccan food was fantastic we loved also the dance show and the decoration is amazing I will back definitely ther
Thought we would try this Moroccan restaurant in gas town for dinner. They seemed to be very short staffed, music was loud, given it was pretty much half empty. The service was excellent, no complaints there.....but the food was....meh at best! The salad appetizer consisted...More
Wow! The Moroccan Kit Royal was really nice to start! I had the chicken tagine and it was out of this world! The olives were the highlight- believe it or not! Would absolutely recommend.
Authentic Moroccan foods with over-the-top service made this place become on of my go-to restaurants in town especially when I am craving for rack of lamb. They prepared their rack of lamb with dry rub for few days to make sure the meat is tendered...More
Authentic moroccan food prepared with love. The ingredients are fresh and I can tell that the Chef spent time in Morocco!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13992901-Reviews-Moltaqa_Moroccan_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mom's Grilled Cheese Truck,"I used to go to Mom's Grilled Cheese truck at least 2 or 3 times a month pre-covid and it was amazing, loved the owner too. She however, sold the truck and now I would say it's nowhere near as good, options are more limited...More
We had the pleasure of having Mom’s Grilled Cheese food truck to our dealership to feed our staff. Everyone was impressed with the food quality. The sandwiches were tasty, warming and large. The best part was Cindy and her staff. She and her team were...More
I was a a local event last night and Mom's truck was supplying the eats. The staff was very friendly. my meal was delivered quickly and hot off the grill. A grilled cheese sandwich better than I could make, along with chips and a pickle....More
Choose your bread, your cheese and any extras. So good. Comes in a cone with kettle chips below the sandwich so your cheese oozes onto them. Also, nostalgic Pop Shoppe pop. They are always so friendly, too.
Always love stopping my Mom's Grilled Cheese Truck when I am by the Vancouver Art Gallery. Great service and great food - just like Mom's. Well worth making a stop.
Today’s special was amazing. Best grilled cheese! Crunchy pickles. Tomato soup was flavorful with lots of cheese. Love this food truck!
Not generally a fan of street food I easily make an exception for grilled cheese. Have eaten from here a number of times most recently yesterday when I had, simply, the cheddar on white. Have tried a number of their other combinations and have never...More
I like a cheese toastie but wouldn't normally have one when out and about- but this truck changed my mind!! Service is super friendly and the food exquisite and well balanced (is not too much cheese - the pickles were great and the chili peppers...More
Really enjoyed the sandwiches and the service was super friendly while it was made Would certainly visit many times if living nearby
This is a must, we can here for lunchtime just before 12 (luckily wasn’t that busy) food is amazing. Staff are really friendly too.
A trip to Vancouver is never complete for us unless we visit Cindy and her crew at the Mom's Grilled Cheese Truck. The staff are always so friendly (often caught up visiting with guests or eager to give you ideas on what to have). The...More
There isn’t much better than a delicious grilled cheese sandwich when you’re looking to carb load and for a bit of comfort food. After walking around the shops in the cold I couldn’t think of anything better. A few different types of bread and cheese...More
We had lunch from Moms Grilled Cheese truck - queue went quick, great choice of bread,fillings & drinks - great prices too. On a busy Thursday lunch hour time, we only waited about 5 mins till our lunch was ready. We sat in sun eating...More
Your sandwich is made to order but believe me, it's worth the wait. I had cheddar and smoked bacon on sourdough. It was delicious, with chips in the bottom of the paper cone and pickles at the top. So yummy and satisfying. The ginger mint...More
On our first visit this week (Thursday special) we had the grilled rosemary ham on rosemary bread I added sliced pickles and my partner added sliced onions to his sandwich, both a little extra charge but that's the way we wanted our sandwiches.......it took a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3243552-Reviews-Mom_s_Grilled_Cheese_Truck-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Momiji Japanese Restaurant,"Authentic sushi by Japanese owners. The quality is good, prices a little higher than average but this is one of my faves coming home from work.
Good selection on the menu and nice cuts of fish plus really nice prawns. I found them to be a little bit expensive given the location. This restaurant seems to have a very busy ""pickup"" business
Traditional, but generous,well presented, reasonable cost, great people and our go to Japanese Restaurant. We drive 10 km. on congested highways, to get our take out from here. Love the place. Eating in is a personal and great experience. Japanese food made by Japanese folks....More
The service is always good and the food is fresh and well presented. Great for a “drop in” dinner. Typical Japanese menu.
Been there so often, don’t need menu. My friend and I have the same every time, Momiji sushi combo? California roll, two each of tuna, salmon and prawn sushi, music soup. Never had a bad piece of fish.
Had heard about Momiji, read the great reviews and looked forward to trying it, that opportunity came this week. Walking up to the front door the view into the restaurant was underwhelming, a basic interior with some Japanese inspired elements. Front reception area is right...More
Arrived in North Vancouver for visit and hungry after arriving. Early dinner at Momiji was satisfying for all five of us. Most got sushi but we also enjoyed Yakisoba and chicken teriyaki. Normal sushi options and limited choices other than sushi but great service and...More
Closed until Nov 15...visited in October from a local merchant recommendation. Very busy place with unique dishes. Ordered a sushi share platter to go and it was very generous in content, nice presentation and at a reasonable price. Have been trying to go back for...More
On Friday night, we had our second visit to Momiji. It was good as the first time we visited with great service, good food, and affordable prices. There is lots of variety on the menu so everyone can get what they like. The restaurant was...More
Nice service. Great sushi. Good quality. Will repeat it. We tried the making roll and sashimi. And also hot sake.
The food is great. The menu has lots of variety. The place is new and very clean. It is very affordable. Their lunch special is a great deal. Parking out front can be limited but there is parking underground .
This is a great place to eat in or (as we often do) pick up and bring home. High quality delicious basics, plus inventive appies, rolls and sides. Good value. The chirashi don is fabulous. Lots of choices in the area, and this is the...More
My family and I eat here almost weekly. The service is good and the food is great. They have wonderful teriyaki, nigiri sushi, noodle soups and rolls. We order the real crab meat California rolls, barbecued eel (unagi) and 'wild salmon' nigiri. They have good...More
This was one of the best finds I've had in North Vancouver in the past year. The food and service is excellent. It is a family run business and it shows. Highly recommend!
I really, really like this place. Great food, very good service, staff are so cooperative. Nice atmosphere, large windows and very classy interior and everything. We found this place by accident and we will definitely come back again. Prices are very reasonable too. Despite all...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d6858007-Reviews-Momiji_Japanese_Restaurant-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Momo Sushi,"Delicious and budget friendly. Staff were great. Place is located well (close to steam clock) Layout of restaurant is original
Delicious and budget friendly. Staff were great. Place is located well (close to steam clock) Layout of restaurant is original
We went for dinner on a Saturday night with our family. We did have to wait about 20 minutes, but when we returned, we were seated immediately. The service was fast and friendly. The sushi was some of the best we've ever had. If we...More
We went for dinner on a Saturday night with our family. We did have to wait about 20 minutes, but when we returned, we were seated immediately. The service was fast and friendly. The sushi was some of the best we've ever had. If we...More
This place has handwritten signs all over the place with rules. “Don’t sit here”, “exit out the back”, etc which is weird. I ordered a box and it was just okay. Some of the food did not taste that great. Service was fine.
This place has handwritten signs all over the place with rules. “Don’t sit here”, “exit out the back”, etc which is weird. I ordered a box and it was just okay. Some of the food did not taste that great. Service was fine.
The pandemic kept us away for a few years. Now we are back to see what we have been missing. We had salmon sashimi…thick cut!!! And King Dragon Roll. An excellent choice! We definitely will come back again and again!!!
The pandemic kept us away for a few years. Now we are back to see what we have been missing. We had salmon sashimi…thick cut!!! And King Dragon Roll. An excellent choice! We definitely will come back again and again!!!
really nice momo box, the avocado roll was a littly bit to dry for my taste but the other things were so delicous the staff is really kind
really nice momo box, the avocado roll was a littly bit to dry for my taste but the other things were so delicous the staff is really kind
Food: We ordered the salon nigiri, monkey brain app and several fancy rolls. The fish was delicious and seemed fresh, the rolls were great, the rice seemed a bit glutenous and pasty but not bad. The monkey brain I'd skip. It's a deep-fried appetizer that...More
Food: We ordered the salon nigiri, monkey brain app and several fancy rolls. The fish was delicious and seemed fresh, the rolls were great, the rice seemed a bit glutenous and pasty but not bad. The monkey brain I'd skip. It's a deep-fried appetizer that...More
Went here with friends and tried a bunch of stuff. Rolls, Nigiri, Teriyaki, Udon, Sashimi and what not. Its a good thing you can share and its not filling. Tried to taste different things. It was an ok experience.
Went here with friends and tried a bunch of stuff. Rolls, Nigiri, Teriyaki, Udon, Sashimi and what not. Its a good thing you can share and its not filling. Tried to taste different things. It was an ok experience.
We had the spicy salmon roll, half tempura shrimp, kappa maki, ika, tako, hokkigai, and ebi nigiri. Everything was fresh and tasty.
We had the spicy salmon roll, half tempura shrimp, kappa maki, ika, tako, hokkigai, and ebi nigiri. Everything was fresh and tasty.
Good food for the entire family, absolutely marvelous experience to have your meals here. Food is tasty and pricing is fair
Good food for the entire family, absolutely marvelous experience to have your meals here. Food is tasty and pricing is fair
Excellent lunch here. We sat in a very nice booth downstairs (don’t be put off by the upstairs entrance) Rolls, teriyaki and yakisoba all prepared to perfection. Service was friendly and food arrived quickly. Asahi ice cold. Very reasonable bill and great value for food...More
Excellent lunch here. We sat in a very nice booth downstairs (don’t be put off by the upstairs entrance) Rolls, teriyaki and yakisoba all prepared to perfection. Service was friendly and food arrived quickly. Asahi ice cold. Very reasonable bill and great value for food...More
The food was really fresh and the servers were welcoming and efficient. The first visit we had the dynamite roll, tobiko, salmon avocado roll, kappa maki, and ebi, tako, ika, and hokkigai nigiri. The second time around later in the week, we had the seafood...More
The food was really fresh and the servers were welcoming and efficient. The first visit we had the dynamite roll, tobiko, salmon avocado roll, kappa maki, and ebi, tako, ika, and hokkigai nigiri. The second time around later in the week, we had the seafood...More
Too much food…good but we way over ordered. Good service and people watching! Miso soup was really good. Sushi was fresh and very large pieces.
Too much food…good but we way over ordered. Good service and people watching! Miso soup was really good. Sushi was fresh and very large pieces.
Very busy so good sign. BUT krab is not crab!!!!!! They advertise it’s crab but it is not. It’s Krab (fake) service good. Only one choice of beer available. It was ok
Very busy so good sign. BUT krab is not crab!!!!!! They advertise it’s crab but it is not. It’s Krab (fake) service good. Only one choice of beer available. It was ok
So I have recently arrived in Vancouver (barely a week) and I had been told that Vancouver had great sushi. We came across this place and decided to eat here. What an amazing amazing Japanese restaurant. We ordered the BC roll, edamame, salmon teriyaki, tuna...More
So I have recently arrived in Vancouver (barely a week) and I had been told that Vancouver had great sushi. We came across this place and decided to eat here. What an amazing amazing Japanese restaurant. We ordered the BC roll, edamame, salmon teriyaki, tuna...More
This restaurant was recommended by the staff at our hotel. The entrance did have me wondering about the place, however the service and food were first class. Great sushi at prices I didn't expect in Gastown. No view of the water in the downstairs area...More
This restaurant was recommended by the staff at our hotel. The entrance did have me wondering about the place, however the service and food were first class. Great sushi at prices I didn't expect in Gastown. No view of the water in the downstairs area...More
Excellent, small and unfancy restaurant on Robson Street. Extensive menu of sushi, rolls, sashimi and other dishes such as donburi. The gyoza and california rolls were especially tasty. Good value too with 8 rolls for around 7 CAD. Service was prompt and friendly. Only downside...More
Excellent, small and unfancy restaurant on Robson Street. Extensive menu of sushi, rolls, sashimi and other dishes such as donburi. The gyoza and california rolls were especially tasty. Good value too with 8 rolls for around 7 CAD. Service was prompt and friendly. Only downside...More
While the Robson St location is still exclusively take out food, their extensive menu still provides good value in sushi. Orders are prepared quickly, fresh, and well presented. Frequented by the locals, and we would certainly return.
While the Robson St location is still exclusively take out food, their extensive menu still provides good value in sushi. Orders are prepared quickly, fresh, and well presented. Frequented by the locals, and we would certainly return.
Love their sashimi salmon!! It was excellent!! Generous cut same as the one in Gastown. We also tried other things like miso soup, tempuras, assorted sushi etc. They were all to our satisfaction!
Love their sashimi salmon!! It was excellent!! Generous cut same as the one in Gastown. We also tried other things like miso soup, tempuras, assorted sushi etc. They were all to our satisfaction!
We ordered from Skip the Dishes and it was just ok. The tuna sashimi was delicious but the rolls were meh. The teriyaki chicken was good but too much bean sprouts for my liking.
We ordered from Skip the Dishes and it was just ok. The tuna sashimi was delicious but the rolls were meh. The teriyaki chicken was good but too much bean sprouts for my liking.
My husband and I are visiting and wanted to try sushi here but didn’t want to break the bank. We did a little research and this Momo kept popping up so we went for takeout. We got five different rolls and ALL of them were...More
My husband and I are visiting and wanted to try sushi here but didn’t want to break the bank. We did a little research and this Momo kept popping up so we went for takeout. We got five different rolls and ALL of them were...More
The food and taste is so so. The restaurant is not so clean and tidy as supposed. The reservation policy is changed as the staff thought.
The food and taste is so so. The restaurant is not so clean and tidy as supposed. The reservation policy is changed as the staff thought.
This was our second choice as our first choice was closed. The sushi was good value. Not as well cut but good quantity and ok quality. Service definitely needs to be improved.
This was our second choice as our first choice was closed. The sushi was good value. Not as well cut but good quantity and ok quality. Service definitely needs to be improved.
Fresh, delicious, reasonably priced. Friendly service. Clean restaurant. A great experience! Centrally located to the Blue Horizon hotel and easily accessible.
Fresh, delicious, reasonably priced. Friendly service. Clean restaurant. A great experience! Centrally located to the Blue Horizon hotel and easily accessible.
One of a number of Momo Sushi in Vancouver. Very quaint, nice atmosphere. We ordered a party platter for 4 adults, and wow. $50CAD was a good price and it was all good. Much less than are used to paying back home and was only...More
One of a number of Momo Sushi in Vancouver. Very quaint, nice atmosphere. We ordered a party platter for 4 adults, and wow. $50CAD was a good price and it was all good. Much less than are used to paying back home and was only...More
Have been there last September during my vacations in BC. It was delicious and great value for money. Would recommend this restaurant and will definitely come back.
Have been there last September during my vacations in BC. It was delicious and great value for money. Would recommend this restaurant and will definitely come back.
I think my pictures speak for themselves! Terrible delivery. Jammed all into too small styrofoam packages, the sashimi looked like a bucket of chum and the rolls were all melting into each other to the point of being inedible let alone unappetizing! So gross!!
I think my pictures speak for themselves! Terrible delivery. Jammed all into too small styrofoam packages, the sashimi looked like a bucket of chum and the rolls were all melting into each other to the point of being inedible let alone unappetizing! So gross!!
Place looked busy so we figured it must be good. Went in for dinner, ordered chicken yakisoba, tuna roll house roll and dynamite roll. Yakisoba was really good, came out quickly hot and fresh. Tuna roll had stinky old tuna in it. I put one...More
Place looked busy so we figured it must be good. Went in for dinner, ordered chicken yakisoba, tuna roll house roll and dynamite roll. Yakisoba was really good, came out quickly hot and fresh. Tuna roll had stinky old tuna in it. I put one...More
Stopped in for lunch with my wife. Get there early. This place is not big and fills up fast! My wife had the unagi don and loved it. I had the fried yakisoba. Good service and reasonably priced. Would go back.
Stopped in for lunch with my wife. Get there early. This place is not big and fills up fast! My wife had the unagi don and loved it. I had the fried yakisoba. Good service and reasonably priced. Would go back.
I walked by this place along Robson Street while I was looking for a late night dinner on a Tuesday. The sign says they’re open until 11PM. Not wanting to stuff myself just before bedtime, I ordered light - prawn tempura (8 pcs), takoyaki (5...More
I walked by this place along Robson Street while I was looking for a late night dinner on a Tuesday. The sign says they’re open until 11PM. Not wanting to stuff myself just before bedtime, I ordered light - prawn tempura (8 pcs), takoyaki (5...More
This was a bit of a dissappointment, doubly so as we only went because the Miko Sushi bar was temporarily closed. It starts badly as the place wasn't really clean, which is probably the most important feature of a raw fish bar. The sashimi was...More
This was a bit of a dissappointment, doubly so as we only went because the Miko Sushi bar was temporarily closed. It starts badly as the place wasn't really clean, which is probably the most important feature of a raw fish bar. The sashimi was...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4882500-Reviews-Momo_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Moose's Down Under,"Great food and friendly staff plus good music! Our daughter found this restaurant just down the street from the Days Inn. Hubby enjoyed his pizza and DD liked her fish n chips. My Reuben was amazing! I had a couple drinks from the menu and...More
What a great little bar, so close to everything. Cruise ship terminals, hotels just everything. Great meals, priced accordingly and lots of it you won’t be disappointed. Owned by the same lady for 28 years she runs a good ship, her staff are well trained...More
This restaurant came highly recommended and it didn't disappoint. The food was beautiful and plentiful...the staff and owner are really lovely too. A must do if you are visiting the area.
I went there for the Vegemite on toast. They distributed it evenly on the bread and had just the right amount. I’m feeling so patriotic right now. Certainly a Vegemite victory in Vancouver.
A nice atmosphere and usually very busy. The drinks are good and the menu for bar food is extensive and the food excellent.
Unpretentious and a great place to eat and drink Aussie beers. A favourite for local businesses and the cruise ship crowd.
We went for dinner and stayed for the drag show we stumbled upon! Such a great atmosphere, food was great and so we're the prices! Our waiter jack was awesome and attentive all night!
Met a friend for lunch. Pub atmosphere with an Australian twist. Very popular - a bit noisy as a result, but what can you expect for a pub at lunch. Food was great - had the Meatloaf Dinner (even thou it was lunch) and it...More
We found this Aussie gem by stumbling into it. Australians need a home base and we made this our breakfast base as it was close to our hotel. Great spot, although showing its age. Aussie rules decor (No NRL in sight). The food and service...More
We were told we had to have a meal at this restaurant and now wished we hadn't. The service was ok, but the meals were ordinary to say the least. They might be huge serves but the flavour was just not there. Not to mention...More
As travelling Aussies, we are reluctant to visit an 'aussie' bar or restaurant, but wandered into this place for breakfast. Loved the vibe, service and breakfast wasn't huge - which is a good thing! I'm getting tired of the gigantic platters of food for breakfast....More
We had spent the morning walking around Gastown and China town. My feet had given out and we needed to find a place for me to sit and eat lunch. The restaurant in the hotel would have been great, but we just wanted something a...More
Made us feel at home from the outset. We've been in Vancouver now for 3 days and have eaten in Mooses 4 times so far. If we lived in Vancouver this would be our local. Great food, great staff and great prices. The only disappointment...More
I loved this place so much when I was in Vancouver! My go to for a great Schnitzel Parma. Corina, the manager, is fantastic. A great spot to watch the football and hang out with great food. Couldnt recommend higher!
Had a great group drink/meal after a tour. Fun place with efficient but laid back service. A little noisy. Or was that just our group?",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707050-Reviews-Moose_s_Down_Under-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mosaic Grille & Bar,"Did take out while staying at the Hyatt. Nice staff. Order took forever to arrive. While I was waiting I noticed mice running around the dining room. Mentioned this to the hostess who didn’t think this was unusual. Oh yes this is an old building...More
I came with my family and we really enjoyed the food and service. There are plenty of options for people of all preferences. The staff are very friendly and welcoming to tourists. Definitely recommend this restaurant over going somewhere else even if you aren’t staying...More
We enjoyed dinner at the Mosiac Grille restaurant as we were staying at the Hyatt Regency and appreciated the convienience and menu. Staff were lovely in seating us in a booth hybrid table a bit farther away from other guests for privacy and comfort for...More
The drinks and pizza at Mosaic were delicious. I had one of the best cocktails of my life! The staff, especially the bartender, were incredible nice and welcoming. I dined alone and didn't feel at all uncomfortable. A great place to rest and recharge, or...More
I didn't expect much when I come here for breakfast with my family and to our surprise, the service is top notch and the food is so good. 8.5/10. Will come back here again for breakfast!
We have eaten breakfast here the last two days. Service from the same guy was excellent both days. The loaded pancakes are loaded and they delightfully decadent. The classic breakfast consists of two eggs, 3 crispy bacon, 2 sausages, potatoes and two toast and was...More
During this difficult time, I was glad that the restaurant was open for breakfast.Mosaic staff was extremely nice. Ms. Mariana & Carey are very professional and made me feel very special each morning.
after flight and arriving to stay at Hyatt, went to restaurant at about 9:30 pm. Almost no one there and offered window seating but right beside a waiter prep station. Ordered butter chicken that arrived quickly but was bland. Wait staff seemed nice but kinda...More
We got back to the Hyatt Regency Vancouver around 9 PM and didn't want to go outside to find a restaurant. We went to the Mosaic Grill as this was most convenient. The food was very tasty and the prices were good. There is not...More
I have been to the Mosaic Grill many times during my stays in Vancouver, and had a Breakfast buffet each morning at the Mosaic Grill. The place had always been over-air-conditioned and this time was not different. The Mosaic Grill has comfortable chairs with large...More
We ate here on our last night in Vancouver, mostly to be back to the room early for packing. We were quickly seated and both ordered the fish and chips, a change from what we had been eating up to now. While tasty, the fish...More
We had tried out bars in the area and a lot of them mixed tourist drinks, formula drinks. We had gone into the Mosaic and asked first thing before ordering, how do you guys make this particular drink. The nice bartender laughed and said ""I...More
Great service, reasonable selection of food that does vary but best part is the omelet/egg station with Fritz who goes way beyond, so glad we got package to include breakfast.
We were staying in the Hyatt regency and didn't want to go far for a light dinner. We originally wanted to visit the Grain Tasting but you can't go there with under 19s It was happy hour so we ordered the 3 dishes that were...More
Heidi was our waitress and she was amazing and so friendly. We had happy hour drinks and tomato bisque soup. It was delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707061-Reviews-Mosaic_Grille_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mott 32,"Recommended by our hotel, we squeezed in a booking. Really glad we did as the experience was surprising good. The restaurant has a luxury feel and was already busy with customers when we arrived at 7pm. The menu is extensive, which we navigated with the...More
Enjoyed excellent Chinese cuisine and especially the very attentive guidance of the very knowledgeable and super-friendly staff- they enjoy what they do and that made us feel all the more welcome. A definite recommendation for downtown dining.
Claim to be a very high end restaurant with great food, it was NOT. The noise level and pounding loud music felt like you were at a Cactus Club instead. Incredibly expensive and the food was nothing special. The only positive was the server. Was...More
The food choices were remarkable. Beautifully flavoured and well presented. We have enjoyed lots of Chinese/Asian food but this was very special. Service prompt and very informative - especially re wine options to compliment the food. Great ambience - definitely need one in London !
Good place to have some good Chinese flavors. This is well prepared and presented. Not the typical greasy chinese. Even the Tea was Very pricy though. Not your weekly affair but a one time try. Peking Duck salad was good. Crab was excellent. Excellent ambience....More
We absolutely loved Mott 32. The food was delicious! We tried a little of everything, including some dim sum, fried rice, sweet sour pork, duck salad, and dessert. All of it was tasty. The cocktails were just as good. I recommend the Old Fashion. Plus,...More
For the calibre of this restaurant, the expectation fell short on their cuisine’s quality. The soup dumpling, although interesting, really didn’t wow me. There is probably a reason why for hundreds of years no other Chinese restaurants wanted to add hot and sour soup into...More
We had a great time stopping in for some drinks and bites at the bar. We didn't have a full dinner but we definitely will be back again to eat there. The dim sum and the roasted pork was really tasty. The atmosphere at this...More
We were recommended to this restaurant by the concierge at the Fairmont Waterfront Hotel, and we were not disappointed. Also, we were recommended to try the Peking Duck for two, and again, it was superlative. The service was personal and the atmosphere was exceptional,
Thank you to the staff of this restaurant for making our dinning experience beautiful. The food here is delicious, filling and memorable
The worst experience we have ever had at a restaurant-anywhere, ever. If you are not the type of person they want at their restaurant they make it very clear.
I really wasn’t sure to expect of this restaurant with branches in Vegas and Hong Kong. Definitely not typical Chinese food, but it was delicious! We had the bbq pork, smoked cod, eggplant, and crab fried rice. While the cod was perhaps too sweet, everything...More
I didn’t know this was a chain. The food was good. The atmosphere was lovely. But hugely, grossly overpriced. The peeling duck was $132 plus $70 for a second dish made with the same duck. That’s worse than London Michelin star prices and not worth...More
We received a tip to try this restaurant for lunch. It exceeded our expectations. The dimsum were delicious. The black cod was the best we ever had but all other ones were also delicious. The restaurant has also a very good wine list, especially quite...More
Highly recommend this place. We ordered several items to share (3 adults) and each one was delicious. Everyone agreed we would easily visit again. Specialty cocktails menu wasn't too great but did not change our minds about the place - it was excellent.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12084006-Reviews-Mott_32-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mount Everest Kitchen And Grill,"Hands down the best meal we had in Vancouver (Nepalese food)! The staff were super friendly, huge portions and so good we returned the second (and maybe the third night). We had steam momos, hot noodle soup, chicken chow mein and chili momos - the...More
really nice place to eat nepalesish/indish cheap and delicous You receive a soup as a gretting of the kitchen, we ordered the momos and some madsla chicken and palek paneer staff is friendly
“One of The Best Restaurant Serving Indian, Nepali & Chinese Food With Atheistic Flavour.”These days you go to a restaurant and at best you get good food. Today we had an excellent dining experience, navigated by a lovely server who is from Napel. She suggested...More
The food here is incredible and the service is amazing. Would highly recommend. Lots of options and as a vegetation, there was a lot that I could eat.
One of The Best Restaurants Serving Indian, Nepali & Chinese Food With Atheistic Flavour. I Have Experience of Visiting Over 100 Restaurants Like This Kind In All Over Canada & This Is At The Top Rank On The Basis of Taste and Serving. I Recommend...More
I went there for lunch today. I had an appetizer and steamed momos there got some chow mein to go. The food was excellent, the people extremely friendly and helpful. I will recommend this place to friends. I had done take out there which is...More
These days you go to a restaurant and at best you get good food. Today we had an excellent dining experience, navigated by a lovely server who is from Napel. She suggested a few dishes that we had never heard of or had. To say...More
Good food great portions, reasonable price and friendly service. I got lunch special - available during dinner time. The curry was very good. Comes with soup rice and good non bread .
good portions (size) and served with rice, very good curries. Butter chicken was very good. I've been there for three times now, I will go again for sure.
Found this while looking for a restaurant within walking distance of our hotel. Brand new Nepali/Indian restaurant with a pleasant, informal space. Also does takeout. Food was very good; our meals were slightly different twists on typical Indian dishes like Paneer Tikka Masala. Did not...More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23691919-Reviews-Mount_Everest_Kitchen_And_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Moxies,"The food at Moxies was great, as we have come to expect. What made this visit stand out was our server Kristin... knowledgeable, attentive, excellent service!
The food at Moxies was great, as we have come to expect. What made this visit stand out was our server Kristin... knowledgeable, attentive, excellent service!
The food at Moxies was great, as we have come to expect. What made this visit stand out was our server Kristin... knowledgeable, attentive, excellent service!
The tuna poke bowl was excellent. First time I had had cabbage rice. It also included avocado, egg, radish, ahi tuna etc. all well seasoned The shrimp Thai coconut curry was also excellent. We would dine there again
The tuna poke bowl was excellent. First time I had had cabbage rice. It also included avocado, egg, radish, ahi tuna etc. all well seasoned The shrimp Thai coconut curry was also excellent. We would dine there again
The tuna poke bowl was excellent. First time I had had cabbage rice. It also included avocado, egg, radish, ahi tuna etc. all well seasoned The shrimp Thai coconut curry was also excellent. We would dine there again
Not enough staff on so manager asked us to go, but then came out to hotel lobby and told us that we could come in. Bar tender was trying his best but we waited way to long for drinks. Had the calamari and it was...More
Not enough staff on so manager asked us to go, but then came out to hotel lobby and told us that we could come in. Bar tender was trying his best but we waited way to long for drinks. Had the calamari and it was...More
Not enough staff on so manager asked us to go, but then came out to hotel lobby and told us that we could come in. Bar tender was trying his best but we waited way to long for drinks. Had the calamari and it was...More
We had no reservations but were seated right away by friendly staff. Service was good. Food was average. 2 beers and to main dishes for about $60.00.
We had no reservations but were seated right away by friendly staff. Service was good. Food was average. 2 beers and to main dishes for about $60.00.
We had no reservations but were seated right away by friendly staff. Service was good. Food was average. 2 beers and to main dishes for about $60.00.
Amazing!!! Fabulous food, great drinks and super friendly service. Will go over and over again. Great for a family night out or drinks with the girls. Only down side 20% gratuity included with a group of 7, other restaurants usually around 15% but still worth...More
Amazing!!! Fabulous food, great drinks and super friendly service. Will go over and over again. Great for a family night out or drinks with the girls. Only down side 20% gratuity included with a group of 7, other restaurants usually around 15% but still worth...More
Amazing!!! Fabulous food, great drinks and super friendly service. Will go over and over again. Great for a family night out or drinks with the girls. Only down side 20% gratuity included with a group of 7, other restaurants usually around 15% but still worth...More
Lot’s of free parking. Host was very polite and quick to seat us. Server came immediately and took our drink and lunch order. The meals arrived in a timely manner and everything was perfect. Big shout out to the young man who greeted us at...More
Lot’s of free parking. Host was very polite and quick to seat us. Server came immediately and took our drink and lunch order. The meals arrived in a timely manner and everything was perfect. Big shout out to the young man who greeted us at...More
Lot’s of free parking. Host was very polite and quick to seat us. Server came immediately and took our drink and lunch order. The meals arrived in a timely manner and everything was perfect. Big shout out to the young man who greeted us at...More
We popped in without a reservation on a Saturday night and easily got a table but it was busy by 7 pm. Service was a tad slow but our server gave us a heads up about being short-staffed and was very apologetic. Food was good:...More
We popped in without a reservation on a Saturday night and easily got a table but it was busy by 7 pm. Service was a tad slow but our server gave us a heads up about being short-staffed and was very apologetic. Food was good:...More
We popped in without a reservation on a Saturday night and easily got a table but it was busy by 7 pm. Service was a tad slow but our server gave us a heads up about being short-staffed and was very apologetic. Food was good:...More
Very friendly staff. Excellent service. We ordered a gigantic portion of Nachos. As main course short rips and a New York Strip. Everything is excellent. The NYS was slightly overcooked.
Very friendly staff. Excellent service. We ordered a gigantic portion of Nachos. As main course short rips and a New York Strip. Everything is excellent. The NYS was slightly overcooked.
Very friendly staff. Excellent service. We ordered a gigantic portion of Nachos. As main course short rips and a New York Strip. Everything is excellent. The NYS was slightly overcooked.
All three of us were impressed with the quality of the food and the great service. Cole and Kelsey could not have done more for us. We went there two weeks ago for lunch and will be going there again next Thursday. The mini-dessert (sticky...More
All three of us were impressed with the quality of the food and the great service. Cole and Kelsey could not have done more for us. We went there two weeks ago for lunch and will be going there again next Thursday. The mini-dessert (sticky...More
All three of us were impressed with the quality of the food and the great service. Cole and Kelsey could not have done more for us. We went there two weeks ago for lunch and will be going there again next Thursday. The mini-dessert (sticky...More
We were staying in the Sandman hotel attached before a cruise and stopped in here for lunch. OUr server was excellent and our meal was great. Great spot to grab a meal when in the area.
We were staying in the Sandman hotel attached before a cruise and stopped in here for lunch. OUr server was excellent and our meal was great. Great spot to grab a meal when in the area.
We were staying in the Sandman hotel attached before a cruise and stopped in here for lunch. OUr server was excellent and our meal was great. Great spot to grab a meal when in the area.
Situated next to the Sandman Airport hotel; in reality the only decent thing about that hotel. So this proved perfect for us as we had just had a long flight from the UK. Menu is big but easy to understand and reasonably priced. Food and...More
Situated next to the Sandman Airport hotel; in reality the only decent thing about that hotel. So this proved perfect for us as we had just had a long flight from the UK. Menu is big but easy to understand and reasonably priced. Food and...More
Situated next to the Sandman Airport hotel; in reality the only decent thing about that hotel. So this proved perfect for us as we had just had a long flight from the UK. Menu is big but easy to understand and reasonably priced. Food and...More
Had a large business was dinner here. Service level was poor due to staff shortage. Sat outside and fans not working on hot day. Very uncomfortable. Food was average. There are better options to consider.
Had a large business was dinner here. Service level was poor due to staff shortage. Sat outside and fans not working on hot day. Very uncomfortable. Food was average. There are better options to consider.
Had a large business was dinner here. Service level was poor due to staff shortage. Sat outside and fans not working on hot day. Very uncomfortable. Food was average. There are better options to consider.
Again i was at this restaurant during the Covid pandemic. The food was very good, the service was excellent reasonably priced. I will surely return when time permits.
Again i was at this restaurant during the Covid pandemic. The food was very good, the service was excellent reasonably priced. I will surely return when time permits.
Again i was at this restaurant during the Covid pandemic. The food was very good, the service was excellent reasonably priced. I will surely return when time permits.
Last night my wife and I dined at Moxie's. In the past parking was always free but no guests need to register for free 3 hr parking. Registration is via a barcode. Upon entering the restaurant staff did not make any comments about the new...More
Last night my wife and I dined at Moxie's. In the past parking was always free but no guests need to register for free 3 hr parking. Registration is via a barcode. Upon entering the restaurant staff did not make any comments about the new...More
Last night my wife and I dined at Moxie's. In the past parking was always free but no guests need to register for free 3 hr parking. Registration is via a barcode. Upon entering the restaurant staff did not make any comments about the new...More
Enjoyed the food and the service was excellent which is exactly what we needed after a long flight. Happy to recommend this restaurant.
Enjoyed the food and the service was excellent which is exactly what we needed after a long flight. Happy to recommend this restaurant.
Enjoyed the food and the service was excellent which is exactly what we needed after a long flight. Happy to recommend this restaurant.
The location on Davie St beside the Sandman Hotel is a great place to have drinks and food. But I sat outside on the street fenced in area designated Moxies. Sat there for 20 min and no service. Went in side and located a waitress...More
The location on Davie St beside the Sandman Hotel is a great place to have drinks and food. But I sat outside on the street fenced in area designated Moxies. Sat there for 20 min and no service. Went in side and located a waitress...More
The location on Davie St beside the Sandman Hotel is a great place to have drinks and food. But I sat outside on the street fenced in area designated Moxies. Sat there for 20 min and no service. Went in side and located a waitress...More
We had an enjoyable evening with nice food & drinks. We‘d really like to thank Lauren for her excellent service. Highly recommended!
We had an enjoyable evening with nice food & drinks. We‘d really like to thank Lauren for her excellent service. Highly recommended!
We had an enjoyable evening with nice food & drinks. We‘d really like to thank Lauren for her excellent service. Highly recommended!
Hello, Thank you so much for your 5-star review! We would love to have you back. Come by anytime. Kelsey General Manager
Hello, Thank you so much for your 5-star review! We would love to have you back. Come by anytime. Kelsey General Manager
Hello, Thank you so much for your 5-star review! We would love to have you back. Come by anytime. Kelsey General Manager
Great food. Happy hour drinks and food menu was terrific. Fabulous service. Staff very friendly and helpful especially Lauren
Great food. Happy hour drinks and food menu was terrific. Fabulous service. Staff very friendly and helpful especially Lauren
Great food. Happy hour drinks and food menu was terrific. Fabulous service. Staff very friendly and helpful especially Lauren
Hi Jennifer, we appreciate this great review, thank you! I'll be sure to pass along your compliments to our team. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Sincerely, Bik Sr. Assistant Manager
Hi Jennifer, we appreciate this great review, thank you! I'll be sure to pass along your compliments to our team. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Sincerely, Bik Sr. Assistant Manager
Hi Jennifer, we appreciate this great review, thank you! I'll be sure to pass along your compliments to our team. We look forward to hosting you again soon. Sincerely, Bik Sr. Assistant Manager
We walked in and the music was extremely loud. We got a booth and thought we could try it out. We had to raise our voices quite loud to be heard at the same table. We asked the waiter if they could turn the music...More
We walked in and the music was extremely loud. We got a booth and thought we could try it out. We had to raise our voices quite loud to be heard at the same table. We asked the waiter if they could turn the music...More
We walked in and the music was extremely loud. We got a booth and thought we could try it out. We had to raise our voices quite loud to be heard at the same table. We asked the waiter if they could turn the music...More
Hello IRW1127, Firstly, I want to send our sincerest apologies on the experience you had at Moxies Davie. I have discussed this with our team members to try to understand what occurred that night including, discussing it with our shift leads. Guest satisfaction is our...More
Hello IRW1127, Firstly, I want to send our sincerest apologies on the experience you had at Moxies Davie. I have discussed this with our team members to try to understand what occurred that night including, discussing it with our shift leads. Guest satisfaction is our...More
Hello IRW1127, Firstly, I want to send our sincerest apologies on the experience you had at Moxies Davie. I have discussed this with our team members to try to understand what occurred that night including, discussing it with our shift leads. Guest satisfaction is our...More
It’s worth your while to make a reservation online through Open Table. No need to wait in line for a table. They just reopened about a week ago after being closed for about 2 years. Great ambiance. The staff are fantastic. Nicole & Lauren our...More
It’s worth your while to make a reservation online through Open Table. No need to wait in line for a table. They just reopened about a week ago after being closed for about 2 years. Great ambiance. The staff are fantastic. Nicole & Lauren our...More
It’s worth your while to make a reservation online through Open Table. No need to wait in line for a table. They just reopened about a week ago after being closed for about 2 years. Great ambiance. The staff are fantastic. Nicole & Lauren our...More
Thank you so much for the online review. We can't wait to have you back. Come by anytime! Kelsey General Manager
Thank you so much for the online review. We can't wait to have you back. Come by anytime! Kelsey General Manager
Thank you so much for the online review. We can't wait to have you back. Come by anytime! Kelsey General Manager
Great food, great service! Moxie Davie can't be beat! Please check them out! They are updating with new ideas every month!
Great food, great service! Moxie Davie can't be beat! Please check them out! They are updating with new ideas every month!
Great food, great service! Moxie Davie can't be beat! Please check them out! They are updating with new ideas every month!
Wonderful service and good food. Makayla was a delight and I would highly recommend anyone to visit Makayla in Moxies. Thanks
Wonderful service and good food. Makayla was a delight and I would highly recommend anyone to visit Makayla in Moxies. Thanks
Wonderful service and good food. Makayla was a delight and I would highly recommend anyone to visit Makayla in Moxies. Thanks
I never normally say things or complain but if I could give this place 0 stars then I would!! My boyfriend and I had the WORST experience at this location last night March 31st, 2023. After waiting 45 minutes on their waitlist for a table,...More
I never normally say things or complain but if I could give this place 0 stars then I would!! My boyfriend and I had the WORST experience at this location last night March 31st, 2023. After waiting 45 minutes on their waitlist for a table,...More
I never normally say things or complain but if I could give this place 0 stars then I would!! My boyfriend and I had the WORST experience at this location last night March 31st, 2023. After waiting 45 minutes on their waitlist for a table,...More
my wife and I had gone for her birthday dinner and our server, Akash, was so amazing that we went back the next night food was good, service was even better
my wife and I had gone for her birthday dinner and our server, Akash, was so amazing that we went back the next night food was good, service was even better
my wife and I had gone for her birthday dinner and our server, Akash, was so amazing that we went back the next night food was good, service was even better
We met friends there. The fellow who waited on us was fun and gave us wonderful service. We ordered beers and they were served the largest beers I have ever seen. Beer was also good. We had steaks, they were very good.
We met friends there. The fellow who waited on us was fun and gave us wonderful service. We ordered beers and they were served the largest beers I have ever seen. Beer was also good. We had steaks, they were very good.
We met friends there. The fellow who waited on us was fun and gave us wonderful service. We ordered beers and they were served the largest beers I have ever seen. Beer was also good. We had steaks, they were very good.
Great spot for drinks or dinner. Lots of variety for happy hour, service is great. Very friendly and inviting atmosphere
Great spot for drinks or dinner. Lots of variety for happy hour, service is great. Very friendly and inviting atmosphere
Great spot for drinks or dinner. Lots of variety for happy hour, service is great. Very friendly and inviting atmosphere
Finding ourselves on Davie St, in need of a late evening light bite, we were lucky to come across Moxies. Chose the chicken and cashew lettuce wraps with an order of sweet potato fries and dips - bliss. Our server Jesse was friendly and attentive...More
Finding ourselves on Davie St, in need of a late evening light bite, we were lucky to come across Moxies. Chose the chicken and cashew lettuce wraps with an order of sweet potato fries and dips - bliss. Our server Jesse was friendly and attentive...More
Finding ourselves on Davie St, in need of a late evening light bite, we were lucky to come across Moxies. Chose the chicken and cashew lettuce wraps with an order of sweet potato fries and dips - bliss. Our server Jesse was friendly and attentive...More
Arrived for a few beers and lunch. The floor staff were friendly. A good basic menu. We ordered starter & mains. Our starter arrived and was good. The big issue was the Main course arrived before we we’re finished. This isn’t good service and as...More
Arrived for a few beers and lunch. The floor staff were friendly. A good basic menu. We ordered starter & mains. Our starter arrived and was good. The big issue was the Main course arrived before we we’re finished. This isn’t good service and as...More
Arrived for a few beers and lunch. The floor staff were friendly. A good basic menu. We ordered starter & mains. Our starter arrived and was good. The big issue was the Main course arrived before we we’re finished. This isn’t good service and as...More
Yasmin provided excellent service to all the customers which was evident the way guests were responding. Everything was good except House Red wine brand needs to be checked.
Yasmin provided excellent service to all the customers which was evident the way guests were responding. Everything was good except House Red wine brand needs to be checked.
Yasmin provided excellent service to all the customers which was evident the way guests were responding. Everything was good except House Red wine brand needs to be checked.
Thank you for your feedback Manoj. I am so glad that you enjoyed your dining experience at Davie Moxies. Yasemin is great, she is a very valued team member. We hope to see you again in the future. All the best, Kristie Oiom, GM
Thank you for your feedback Manoj. I am so glad that you enjoyed your dining experience at Davie Moxies. Yasemin is great, she is a very valued team member. We hope to see you again in the future. All the best, Kristie Oiom, GM
Thank you for your feedback Manoj. I am so glad that you enjoyed your dining experience at Davie Moxies. Yasemin is great, she is a very valued team member. We hope to see you again in the future. All the best, Kristie Oiom, GM
waited 5 minutes at the door before deciding to sit ourselves. Still no service Went to the door and got our own menu. 5 minutes later still no service. Got up and left without anyone blinking an eye. All when the place was 15 %...More
waited 5 minutes at the door before deciding to sit ourselves. Still no service Went to the door and got our own menu. 5 minutes later still no service. Got up and left without anyone blinking an eye. All when the place was 15 %...More
waited 5 minutes at the door before deciding to sit ourselves. Still no service Went to the door and got our own menu. 5 minutes later still no service. Got up and left without anyone blinking an eye. All when the place was 15 %...More
Good evening, I am very sorry to hear about your experience. I would love to speak with you directly if you had a moment? daviegm@moxies.ca. Looking forward to hearing from you. Best regards, Kristie Oiom, GM
Good evening, I am very sorry to hear about your experience. I would love to speak with you directly if you had a moment? daviegm@moxies.ca. Looking forward to hearing from you. Best regards, Kristie Oiom, GM
Good evening, I am very sorry to hear about your experience. I would love to speak with you directly if you had a moment? daviegm@moxies.ca. Looking forward to hearing from you. Best regards, Kristie Oiom, GM
Apparently this restaurant was recently refurbished. It looked fairly nice. We picked this place as I am fairly familiar with the menu and it was close to our hotel. We had to wait for a table ( event on at the arena) and the hosts...More
Apparently this restaurant was recently refurbished. It looked fairly nice. We picked this place as I am fairly familiar with the menu and it was close to our hotel. We had to wait for a table ( event on at the arena) and the hosts...More
Apparently this restaurant was recently refurbished. It looked fairly nice. We picked this place as I am fairly familiar with the menu and it was close to our hotel. We had to wait for a table ( event on at the arena) and the hosts...More
Thank you for taking the time to provide some feedback. If possible, could you please email me at moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca to provide any more details about your experience? I would love the opportunity to rectify the situation. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom
Thank you for taking the time to provide some feedback. If possible, could you please email me at moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca to provide any more details about your experience? I would love the opportunity to rectify the situation. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom
Thank you for taking the time to provide some feedback. If possible, could you please email me at moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca to provide any more details about your experience? I would love the opportunity to rectify the situation. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom
This was our first visit to Moxies. Clearly it has recently been fully refurbished in a modern style. We are in our later years and this restaurant is clearly very with it and complete with quite loud music. Many of the tables are in cubicles...More
This was our first visit to Moxies. Clearly it has recently been fully refurbished in a modern style. We are in our later years and this restaurant is clearly very with it and complete with quite loud music. Many of the tables are in cubicles...More
This was our first visit to Moxies. Clearly it has recently been fully refurbished in a modern style. We are in our later years and this restaurant is clearly very with it and complete with quite loud music. Many of the tables are in cubicles...More
Thank you for taking the time to review us. We appreciate your feedback and hope you can join us again soon for another great experience. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom, Moxies GM moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca
Thank you for taking the time to review us. We appreciate your feedback and hope you can join us again soon for another great experience. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom, Moxies GM moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca
Thank you for taking the time to review us. We appreciate your feedback and hope you can join us again soon for another great experience. Sincerely, Kristie Oiom, Moxies GM moxieswestgeorgiagm@moxies.ca
We came here 5 years ago and I gave it 4 stars when we were staying at the Sandman. This time, we were staying around the corner at the Georgian Court Hotel, and it has recently reopened following a refurbishment. I have to say that...More
We came here 5 years ago and I gave it 4 stars when we were staying at the Sandman. This time, we were staying around the corner at the Georgian Court Hotel, and it has recently reopened following a refurbishment. I have to say that...More
We came here 5 years ago and I gave it 4 stars when we were staying at the Sandman. This time, we were staying around the corner at the Georgian Court Hotel, and it has recently reopened following a refurbishment. I have to say that...More
Cannot say enough about Moxies flagship restaurant . Great food and excellent service from Claire O, who was fantastic, very attentive and recommended what we chose to eat and I can definitely say, we were not disappointed at all. Good day to go is Wednesday...More
Cannot say enough about Moxies flagship restaurant . Great food and excellent service from Claire O, who was fantastic, very attentive and recommended what we chose to eat and I can definitely say, we were not disappointed at all. Good day to go is Wednesday...More
Cannot say enough about Moxies flagship restaurant . Great food and excellent service from Claire O, who was fantastic, very attentive and recommended what we chose to eat and I can definitely say, we were not disappointed at all. Good day to go is Wednesday...More
they are specifically the Best in meals Servered , while on my Trip i made investment with some so called trade group. i almost felt deep regrets but hoskeyteam @proton .me They recover all that was taken from me , I had a great experience
they are specifically the Best in meals Servered , while on my Trip i made investment with some so called trade group. i almost felt deep regrets but hoskeyteam @proton .me They recover all that was taken from me , I had a great experience
they are specifically the Best in meals Servered , while on my Trip i made investment with some so called trade group. i almost felt deep regrets but hoskeyteam @proton .me They recover all that was taken from me , I had a great experience
This restaurant was attached to the hotel we were staying in. We loved the outside area and spent most of our visits out here. The server lit the fire pit in the evenings and was always very helpful, in fact they all were. You got...More
This restaurant was attached to the hotel we were staying in. We loved the outside area and spent most of our visits out here. The server lit the fire pit in the evenings and was always very helpful, in fact they all were. You got...More
This restaurant was attached to the hotel we were staying in. We loved the outside area and spent most of our visits out here. The server lit the fire pit in the evenings and was always very helpful, in fact they all were. You got...More
Moxie's is usually a sassy place with an edge. Perhaps less desirable scene for breakfast, but the seats are worn and the food is not particularly inspiring
Moxie's is usually a sassy place with an edge. Perhaps less desirable scene for breakfast, but the seats are worn and the food is not particularly inspiring
Moxie's is usually a sassy place with an edge. Perhaps less desirable scene for breakfast, but the seats are worn and the food is not particularly inspiring
Hi there, I am so sorry you had a less than exceptional experience with us. Please email me at westgeorgiagm@moxies.ca as I would like to hear more about your dining experience. Thank you, Kaity
Hi there, I am so sorry you had a less than exceptional experience with us. Please email me at westgeorgiagm@moxies.ca as I would like to hear more about your dining experience. Thank you, Kaity
Hi there, I am so sorry you had a less than exceptional experience with us. Please email me at westgeorgiagm@moxies.ca as I would like to hear more about your dining experience. Thank you, Kaity
Excellent food and great service! Stopped by for a bite to eat before the Canucks game and we will definitely return. We had the sirloin & prawns, as well as chicken lettuce wraps and calamari. Calamari is the best I’ve ever had (shrimp in it...More
Excellent food and great service! Stopped by for a bite to eat before the Canucks game and we will definitely return. We had the sirloin & prawns, as well as chicken lettuce wraps and calamari. Calamari is the best I’ve ever had (shrimp in it...More
Excellent food and great service! Stopped by for a bite to eat before the Canucks game and we will definitely return. We had the sirloin & prawns, as well as chicken lettuce wraps and calamari. Calamari is the best I’ve ever had (shrimp in it...More
Hi Taylor, Thank you for taking the time to write in! Our new menu comes out at the end of March and I hope you will come in and try it! Please feel free to request Romalia as your server. Cheers, Kaity
Hi Taylor, Thank you for taking the time to write in! Our new menu comes out at the end of March and I hope you will come in and try it! Please feel free to request Romalia as your server. Cheers, Kaity
Hi Taylor, Thank you for taking the time to write in! Our new menu comes out at the end of March and I hope you will come in and try it! Please feel free to request Romalia as your server. Cheers, Kaity
Stopped by Moxies before a show we were attending last night. Was very busy but we had booked ahead. Seated immediately, service was excellent, as were our meals and cocktails. We were very happy with our dining experience!
Stopped by Moxies before a show we were attending last night. Was very busy but we had booked ahead. Seated immediately, service was excellent, as were our meals and cocktails. We were very happy with our dining experience!
Stopped by Moxies before a show we were attending last night. Was very busy but we had booked ahead. Seated immediately, service was excellent, as were our meals and cocktails. We were very happy with our dining experience!
Thank you Cindy! We really appreciate your loyalty and we hope we'll see you again soon! Kaity
Thank you Cindy! We really appreciate your loyalty and we hope we'll see you again soon! Kaity
Thank you Cindy! We really appreciate your loyalty and we hope we'll see you again soon! Kaity
Lovely experience on a weekend away! Server Sidney was fantastic! Food delicious. Perfect start to our evening.
Lovely experience on a weekend away! Server Sidney was fantastic! Food delicious. Perfect start to our evening.
Lovely experience on a weekend away! Server Sidney was fantastic! Food delicious. Perfect start to our evening.
Hi Sandy, Thank you so much for writing in! I am sure Sydney will be so happy when she reads this. Cheers, Kaity
Hi Sandy, Thank you so much for writing in! I am sure Sydney will be so happy when she reads this. Cheers, Kaity
Hi Sandy, Thank you so much for writing in! I am sure Sydney will be so happy when she reads this. Cheers, Kaity
The food is good, but you have to have a lifetime to have any of it. They seem to be understaffed all of the time. Breakfast is slow and unorganized and every time I have breakfast it's wrong and has to go back to the...More
The food is good, but you have to have a lifetime to have any of it. They seem to be understaffed all of the time. Breakfast is slow and unorganized and every time I have breakfast it's wrong and has to go back to the...More
The food is good, but you have to have a lifetime to have any of it. They seem to be understaffed all of the time. Breakfast is slow and unorganized and every time I have breakfast it's wrong and has to go back to the...More
Hi Wayne, Thank you for taking the time to review us. I want to apologize for your breakfast experience. I can assure you your review have been used as a training tool for our staff and I would like to invite you to come in...More
Hi Wayne, Thank you for taking the time to review us. I want to apologize for your breakfast experience. I can assure you your review have been used as a training tool for our staff and I would like to invite you to come in...More
Hi Wayne, Thank you for taking the time to review us. I want to apologize for your breakfast experience. I can assure you your review have been used as a training tool for our staff and I would like to invite you to come in...More
I love the breakfast its quick and delicious. Every trip I always get the French Toast. The staff is very friendly.
I love the breakfast its quick and delicious. Every trip I always get the French Toast. The staff is very friendly.
I love the breakfast its quick and delicious. Every trip I always get the French Toast. The staff is very friendly.
Hi there, Thank you for the great review! Please ask for me next time you come in so I can thank you in person. Cheers, Kaity
Hi there, Thank you for the great review! Please ask for me next time you come in so I can thank you in person. Cheers, Kaity
Hi there, Thank you for the great review! Please ask for me next time you come in so I can thank you in person. Cheers, Kaity
Not much to say really, great food, large menu to choose from and you can walk right in there from the Sandman Hotel next door. Job done.
Not much to say really, great food, large menu to choose from and you can walk right in there from the Sandman Hotel next door. Job done.
Not much to say really, great food, large menu to choose from and you can walk right in there from the Sandman Hotel next door. Job done.
Thank you so much! I hope we'll see you again soon. Kaity
Thank you so much! I hope we'll see you again soon. Kaity
Thank you so much! I hope we'll see you again soon. Kaity
We headed to Moxies on West Georgia for snacks after the Canucks game. It is a short walk from Roger's Arena. We have been here previously and enjoyed ourselves. Highballs are $5.00 so you can't beat that. My wife had a fish taco and I...More
We headed to Moxies on West Georgia for snacks after the Canucks game. It is a short walk from Roger's Arena. We have been here previously and enjoyed ourselves. Highballs are $5.00 so you can't beat that. My wife had a fish taco and I...More
We headed to Moxies on West Georgia for snacks after the Canucks game. It is a short walk from Roger's Arena. We have been here previously and enjoyed ourselves. Highballs are $5.00 so you can't beat that. My wife had a fish taco and I...More
Hi Brian, Thank you for coming in and dining with us. I am so glad you enjoyed you're experience. Til next time, Kaity
Hi Brian, Thank you for coming in and dining with us. I am so glad you enjoyed you're experience. Til next time, Kaity
Hi Brian, Thank you for coming in and dining with us. I am so glad you enjoyed you're experience. Til next time, Kaity
I chose Moxies for a few reasons, accessibility for my elderly sister, proximity to downtown, varied menu and reasonably priced options. Originally, I had reserved for 10 but at the last minute 14 showed up. It did not phase the servers at all. The restaurant...More
I chose Moxies for a few reasons, accessibility for my elderly sister, proximity to downtown, varied menu and reasonably priced options. Originally, I had reserved for 10 but at the last minute 14 showed up. It did not phase the servers at all. The restaurant...More
I chose Moxies for a few reasons, accessibility for my elderly sister, proximity to downtown, varied menu and reasonably priced options. Originally, I had reserved for 10 but at the last minute 14 showed up. It did not phase the servers at all. The restaurant...More
I am so glad we were able to accommodate your group. I hope you will join us for Christmas again next year. Kaity
I am so glad we were able to accommodate your group. I hope you will join us for Christmas again next year. Kaity
I am so glad we were able to accommodate your group. I hope you will join us for Christmas again next year. Kaity",186,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2461047-Reviews-Moxies-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Mr Ho Wonton House,"Very polite staff, quick and excellent service. The food was EXCELLENT . Highly recommend the War Won Ton soup
Ever since the original brother and sister mr ho owners sold the restaurant, quality and service have gone down hill. The first instance was when we had a reservation but we still had to wait 45 minutes. This never happened with the old crew operating...More
How is this restaurant allowed to be open? Dirtiest place I’ve ever been to!! Just look at the disgustingly dirty carpets: GROSS!! Hate to look into kitchen, saw a guy walking in there I wouldn't shake hands with. Thanks but no thanks, will never be...More
We were promptly greeted upon entry in a very welcoming manner. Our group ordered 12 different selections/dishes this afternoon. All attending thought all the dishes were very good. Service though out the meal was attentive. Well done once again Mr Ho Wonton House.
I was visiting my friend and she wanted to have Chinese and her friend highly recommended this place. Food was pretty descent. We had their House Special Chow Mein (has shrimp, chicken, beef and pork with broccoli and carrots) and boneless honey garlic pork. Parking...More
They won't deliver without an $18 order. Tasty food, delivered to this home. Spring Rolls, Chicken or Pork Chow Mein, Rice either flavour too.
An old establishment in Burnaby area, venues are big and decent enough to have a party where everyone can get a good fill of comfort Chinese style food which is a little bit more authentic than the average Chinese-Canadian style eateries.
Went there for lunch from Detailing Car's at Courtesy Chev Olds. Courtesy is gone, but I think Mr. Ho's is still tlhere on Kingsway. Good FOOD, hit the spot. Service was ok too.
Sunday afternoon we had family visiting and we all felt like Chinese food. We were prompt;y greeted in a friendly manner. Ordered their excellent Wonton and Hot&Sour soups were our starters. Order 9 dishes across the menu. Every dish was very good in both quantity...More
Upon delivery they forgot a $20 dish. The ones they brought were over cooked....Also found a really long hair 12"" long in my chow mein. So very gross. This was the 2nd time ordering here. Both times i regreted it. When i called to tell...More
I have not been to this restaurant for quite some time and revisited for lunch as the food was usually good. I noticed right away the waitresses have changed. I ordered a noodle dish and beef stew noodle soup. When the dishes arrived, it was...More
My dad introduced me to this spot. I had always seen it but never stopped. I’m glad I know about it now. Love their wonton soup. Chow mein, beef and broccoli etc. Everything is just so fresh seeming. It’s never a dull place during lunch....More
Always have take out from this place, many times over the years. Have never been disappointed. Usually the common choices but often try something new and still good. A must try.
Promptly greeted in a welcoming and friendly manner. Just as quickly seated. We were mid Sunday afternoon yet the restaurant still was 50% full with couple large groups many booths full. Ordered a number of our favourites starting with their fantastic Wonton Soup. We have...More
Great food and super affordable. I recommend family plate so you can try everything but their food is huge if it's for 2 people actually 3-4 people. If you only want one item I would recommend wonton soup it was excellent. I would go back...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d972366-Reviews-Mr_Ho_Wonton_House-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Mr. Red Cafe,"Excellent and authentic North Vietnamese food, with options fro vegetarian diners. I'd highly recommend this place for anyone wishing to try different kinds of Vietnamese fare outside the more commonly-found Pho and broken rice menus.
Excellent and authentic North Vietnamese food, with options fro vegetarian diners. I'd highly recommend this place for anyone wishing to try different kinds of Vietnamese fare outside the more commonly-found Pho and broken rice menus.
Love their soul soothing soups, especially the chicken when you’re feeling like you fighting a cold. Pork & crab spring rolls are the best
Love their soul soothing soups, especially the chicken when you’re feeling like you fighting a cold. Pork & crab spring rolls are the best
We enjoy coming here or their Broadway location. We had their curry special, pho and spring roll to share. Vietnamese iced coffee is a tasty treat to have as well.
We enjoy coming here or their Broadway location. We had their curry special, pho and spring roll to share. Vietnamese iced coffee is a tasty treat to have as well.
The indoor restaurant is nice and the food is good and quite big portion. The prices are fair for the quantity of food we had.
The indoor restaurant is nice and the food is good and quite big portion. The prices are fair for the quantity of food we had.
Tried the Bún Trộn here for the first time. The portion is huge. The restaurant is specialized in Vietnamese Northern Dish.
Tried the Bún Trộn here for the first time. The portion is huge. The restaurant is specialized in Vietnamese Northern Dish.
THE place for quality northern (Hanoi-style) Vietnamese food in east van. Amazing service and chatted with the wait staff, lovely decor and the food was A+
THE place for quality northern (Hanoi-style) Vietnamese food in east van. Amazing service and chatted with the wait staff, lovely decor and the food was A+
I was in the area, and heard good things about this place, so I stopped by to pick up some dinner to take home. It's really quite nice inside, and the staff are super friendly. I only ordered two things for take out: - #14...More
I was in the area, and heard good things about this place, so I stopped by to pick up some dinner to take home. It's really quite nice inside, and the staff are super friendly. I only ordered two things for take out: - #14...More
Nice restaurant run by nice people, I stopped on a whim for a Vietnamese sub - which was great and reasonably priced. What stayed with me was how friendly and family like the staff were. My sub was good/ standard fare but I would like...More
Nice restaurant run by nice people, I stopped on a whim for a Vietnamese sub - which was great and reasonably priced. What stayed with me was how friendly and family like the staff were. My sub was good/ standard fare but I would like...More
We ordered Beef and Chicken Pho, Chicken wings and Vegetarian Spring rolls. All were very good, tasty and delicious. Nice portions. The chicken wings were salt, pepper and chili peppers - very kicky. This was good take out. Nice preparation and take out packaging.
We ordered Beef and Chicken Pho, Chicken wings and Vegetarian Spring rolls. All were very good, tasty and delicious. Nice portions. The chicken wings were salt, pepper and chili peppers - very kicky. This was good take out. Nice preparation and take out packaging.
Our friend took us out for dinner at Mr. Red Café and we had a wonderful experience. The dishes were all very fresh and tasty. The ambience was very comfortable and service was great. We had an excellent dining experience.
Our friend took us out for dinner at Mr. Red Café and we had a wonderful experience. The dishes were all very fresh and tasty. The ambience was very comfortable and service was great. We had an excellent dining experience.
Me and my mum love Vietnamese food (having gone on a trip to Vietnam last year) and this was recommended in Lonely Planet. Tasted delicious, almost like we were in Vietnam again. Friendly service, well priced. Great meal.
Me and my mum love Vietnamese food (having gone on a trip to Vietnam last year) and this was recommended in Lonely Planet. Tasted delicious, almost like we were in Vietnam again. Friendly service, well priced. Great meal.
Can we talk about how tasty the food here is? I give them a 5 star rating because they have been consistently good and are efficient with the service. I have spent time in Hue, Hoi An & Hanoi so I wanted to come in...More
Can we talk about how tasty the food here is? I give them a 5 star rating because they have been consistently good and are efficient with the service. I have spent time in Hue, Hoi An & Hanoi so I wanted to come in...More
This is authentic North VNese Cuisine, i.e. rice ball cakes, bún chả Hànội, chả cá (grilled fish) Hànội...There r also the central: i.e. bún bò Huế, bánh Xèo.. I wasn’t thrilled with the Phở broth though. The staff is friendly, attentive & efficient. Price is...More
This is authentic North VNese Cuisine, i.e. rice ball cakes, bún chả Hànội, chả cá (grilled fish) Hànội...There r also the central: i.e. bún bò Huế, bánh Xèo.. I wasn’t thrilled with the Phở broth though. The staff is friendly, attentive & efficient. Price is...More
We had heard some good things about Mr. Red, but we were disappointed with the food. It was all a little bland. We weren't unhappy with the meal, but we also weren't thrilled. Service was friendly, however, and we enjoyed the evening - just wouldn't...More
We had heard some good things about Mr. Red, but we were disappointed with the food. It was all a little bland. We weren't unhappy with the meal, but we also weren't thrilled. Service was friendly, however, and we enjoyed the evening - just wouldn't...More
Only visiting for the week, we have been introduced by a local to this cafe for authentic vietnamese cuisine. It was especially awesome when it was raining in vancouver everyday in december, the hot broth and pho really warms you up. Food is super tasty...More
Only visiting for the week, we have been introduced by a local to this cafe for authentic vietnamese cuisine. It was especially awesome when it was raining in vancouver everyday in december, the hot broth and pho really warms you up. Food is super tasty...More
We went with friends for a very late lunch. We all had a different dish. My wife had the Special Vermicelli Bowl with spring rolls and beef. I had the Chag Ca Tumeric Fish which was very tasty with all of the herbs - dill,...More
We went with friends for a very late lunch. We all had a different dish. My wife had the Special Vermicelli Bowl with spring rolls and beef. I had the Chag Ca Tumeric Fish which was very tasty with all of the herbs - dill,...More
Prepare to be ignored, and to not be attended to. Just tip accordingly 7-10%. Try the Mr Red special if you want a sample of everything.
Prepare to be ignored, and to not be attended to. Just tip accordingly 7-10%. Try the Mr Red special if you want a sample of everything.
Had heard good reviews and that this place was always busy but we left pretty disappointed. The service was poor and the food was quite bland, definitely better Vietnamese restaurants in Vancouver
Had heard good reviews and that this place was always busy but we left pretty disappointed. The service was poor and the food was quite bland, definitely better Vietnamese restaurants in Vancouver
Visited Mr Red yesterday, our second visit. Food was good to very good. Noteworthy were the Green Mango salad and the Lemongrass Chicken. The service is spotty hampered by difficulty with English and our inability to speak Vietnamese. Good value for a quick dinner.
Visited Mr Red yesterday, our second visit. Food was good to very good. Noteworthy were the Green Mango salad and the Lemongrass Chicken. The service is spotty hampered by difficulty with English and our inability to speak Vietnamese. Good value for a quick dinner.
Followed with Vancouver Magazine Restaurant award and found out this place is surprisingly delicious. I think it is the only place you can have The young rice cake. Their own pickled garlic perfectly balanced with pho. The lemon grass chicken is juicy and flavorful. Must...More
Followed with Vancouver Magazine Restaurant award and found out this place is surprisingly delicious. I think it is the only place you can have The young rice cake. Their own pickled garlic perfectly balanced with pho. The lemon grass chicken is juicy and flavorful. Must...More
My brother took me here for lunch. The food was pretty good and the service was above average. The only negative about this restaurant is that you will have to find parking on the streets. I also didn't like the Vietnamese coffee. Way too strong...More
My brother took me here for lunch. The food was pretty good and the service was above average. The only negative about this restaurant is that you will have to find parking on the streets. I also didn't like the Vietnamese coffee. Way too strong...More
I have dined at Mr. Red cafe multiple times and it always hits the spot. My favorites are the Pho Bo, and Bun Tron Mr. Red - the broth in the pho is so flavorful & rich! And doesn’t require adding a bunch of sauce...More
I have dined at Mr. Red cafe multiple times and it always hits the spot. My favorites are the Pho Bo, and Bun Tron Mr. Red - the broth in the pho is so flavorful & rich! And doesn’t require adding a bunch of sauce...More
Lovely place and cute decoration. We ordered beef roll, they were divine. The pho was also delightful. The meatballs were also tasty. Our fav was the bun bo la lot. Boy it was so fresh and felt really clean to eat. Such a great experience....More
Lovely place and cute decoration. We ordered beef roll, they were divine. The pho was also delightful. The meatballs were also tasty. Our fav was the bun bo la lot. Boy it was so fresh and felt really clean to eat. Such a great experience....More
We came for a late Saturday lunch. Even at 1:30 PM place was full and we had to wait five minutes to get a table. Reviewing the menu it appears this was not like the majority of other Vietnamese restaurants but had many different dishes...More
We came for a late Saturday lunch. Even at 1:30 PM place was full and we had to wait five minutes to get a table. Reviewing the menu it appears this was not like the majority of other Vietnamese restaurants but had many different dishes...More
This bustling small eatery has some good food. There are many choices. The more limited options are for vegetarians or pescatarians. But you can find options. The service is good, friendly and attentive.
This bustling small eatery has some good food. There are many choices. The more limited options are for vegetarians or pescatarians. But you can find options. The service is good, friendly and attentive.
This is a neighbourhood restaurant for us and we frequent it regularly. I highly recommend the restaurant for the quality of its food. Service can be a mixed bag as evidenced by them asking me to pack up the remainder of the food. I am...More
This is a neighbourhood restaurant for us and we frequent it regularly. I highly recommend the restaurant for the quality of its food. Service can be a mixed bag as evidenced by them asking me to pack up the remainder of the food. I am...More
a great family place to try new dishes and experience the old standbys in Asian food, great location
a great family place to try new dishes and experience the old standbys in Asian food, great location
Friendly and uncomplicated restaurant serving tasty dishes. Who appreciates typical Vietnamese food will be satisfied here at a very fair price.
Friendly and uncomplicated restaurant serving tasty dishes. Who appreciates typical Vietnamese food will be satisfied here at a very fair price.
Video review on my youtube channel: vancity food crew mr. red cafe . This place in Kitsilano was alright. The place has nice decor and the food is fine, but nothing really wowed us. I ordered a vermicelli bowl with pork crab springrolls but they...More
Video review on my youtube channel: vancity food crew mr. red cafe . This place in Kitsilano was alright. The place has nice decor and the food is fine, but nothing really wowed us. I ordered a vermicelli bowl with pork crab springrolls but they...More
I love these Vietnamese place, it’s good, authentic taste, great flavor, generous size and a really amazing green papaya salad!
I love these Vietnamese place, it’s good, authentic taste, great flavor, generous size and a really amazing green papaya salad!",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7062413-Reviews-Mr_Red_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mui Garden Restaurant,"Beef brisket curry was a highlight!! Vegetable curry and bok choy were awesome!! Service was great. Atmosphere was great. Food was deeelish!! I could eat myself into a coma here! Cash or debit only.
Easy location to find and free parking. Seats about 60 with walls of comfortable booths and 3 large tables for groups of 10. Decor is simple and clean. Menu is a good size with lots of variety. Prices are good and portions are very generous...More
Not up to date menu. Too few waitresses to work on a busy Sunday night supper. My husband ordered a congee and it arrived late after we finished half of our plates. Because the closed at 8:30, we were rush to leave, and my husband...More
wow ! it is so long since I visit the Mui Garden , I use go to the N.road location for their Malaysia Curry brisket and the Hai Num Chicken , truly the curry is a classic ! since the Covid -19 , I am...More
Try their fried noodles. I forgot the english name for their vegetarian option, but in chinese its long hai tzai chow mein. They also have very good curry. I definitely recommend their curry fish. They only accept debit or cash like most restaurants in richmond.
Firstly, this is not Cantonese cuisine, nor Mandarin or even Shanghainese. This is Hainanese cuisine which is not prevalent in the area. Of the two that I know of in Richmond this is the only one that is a true ""sit down and be served""...More
Services is quick. The food we had was fresh and well prepared. Its a very authentic eating house. You go for the food not the atmosphere or the service. Not licenced. The beef and greens Chow Fun we both had was very tasty.
Service is good, food is good, parking is available. they have space for big groups and a separate room for events.
Very impolite restaurant staff at Mui Garden Restaurant. I've been craving for their beef brisket curry rice as it's been a couple years since I got back to Vancouver. Walked in the restaurant just to experience impatient staff asking what I am gonna eat. When...More
OK, this is not your Canadian Chinese food restaurant it is authentic for sure.The wonton soup was prawn and pork it surprised us but was good.The deep fried noodles in the black bean and chicken was kinda grease intense for us but, the sauce was...More
Good food and service. They serve authentic Cantonese dishes. Family orientated. Wish there were more parking spots.
This is one of our family's favorite restaurants. And its curry beef you can find no comparison with anywhere else.
Place was packed. Waited over 10 minutes for a table. Curry sauce, their specialty is good, but the beef tendons, and fish were not. Prices are very high for the quality and portions they serve. Restaurant is dated, needs a revamp. Service is matter of...More
This is a go-to place for my curry beef brisket cravings. Exceptional value for money and the best taste in town if you're longing for some coconut base curry.
If you’ve ever been around the Victoria Drive area near East 41st Avenue, you’ve probably seen the popular HK Style Cafe known as Mui Garden. As it turns out, they also have a Richmond location (they had another location on Main Street that closed out...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d810096-Reviews-Mui_Garden_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Mui Ngo Gai Restaurant,"We are on a vigil to find the top Vietnamese Restaurant in Vancouver based on an article. The food was good but... We ordered beef ribs with knotted noodles, lettuce leaves and other fixings and a salad tofu roll. My wife had a chicken plate...More
I chose this restaurant because it had great reviews and it sure lived up to the reviews. Excellent food and the staff was very kind. Wish I lived closer so I could enjoy it more often!
Went to Mui Ngo Gai based on the reviews. It was good and typical for a Vietnamese restaurant in the neighbourhood. Service was wonderful. I wouldn't say it was amazing as some reviewers have said, but it was fine.
We had a local tell us about this amazing restaurant. It is not in china town but on a busy road. It is wonder food with fast service. It looks and feels like a very local restaurant. The serving sizes are huge so come hungry.
I have been eating at this family's restaurants for years! Before they moved here, they owned a Pho restaurant by Nanaimo & Broadway. Food has always been great. The move here was a good call, as it is a very busy corner. I love how...More
The food was tasty and fresh. w?e had the deep fried fish and some spring rolls. The fish was really good, the spring rolls average. The staff were friendly and the restaurant was busy.
As an east vancouver veteran, living here my whole life, this is By FAR The BEST Vietnamese restaurant in Vancouver. Make sure you DO NOT go to the Pho restaurant next door at the corner (quality is not good and service horrendous). This one is...More
We're not experts on vietnamese cuisine by any measure, but we had a really good meal, very reasonably priced. The crepe was made with coconut milk, which gave it a delicious tang. The salads were wonderfully crisp and fresh, with several leaves new to us....More
Great service, great food. They have a good variety of vietnamese food, rather than just pho. Their vermicelli bowls are good, their chicken pho and mien ga are delicious. Try their fruit smoothies, even half sweet is sweet enough for me! Highly recommend!
Thank you for your rating and review. My favourite smoothie is the avocado one... creamy decadence
For this review, we went to Mui Ngo Gai for a family dinner with our kids and grandkids, having been there a few times before. The restaurant is clean and very spacious. We found the cuisine to be very authentic, very tasty, of good quality...More
Super friendly staff We order 7 or 8 dishes to share - everything was excellent, fresh and delicious. Incredibly reasonable price, great value Will be back for sure
This is in my top three pho places; although I've only been to about 10, that still says a lot about this place. The quality, the price, and the flavor is on point. They do a sweet special which includes small pho, a salad roll,...More
WE arrived later on a Sunday night, 9pm and stayed across the street. Went in and the place was really noisy with a big party, but we needed to eat. Food was really tasty & service was quick. Bring cash to pay--lineup to use bank...More
This is my family's favourite Vietnamese restaurant. + ""tamarind deep fried fish (tilapia)"", comes with rice. It takes a bit of time to prepare so the servers recommend phoning the order in ahead of time + spacious restaurant, great for families with young kids +...More
When coming in here and taking a first glance at the menu, one who's familiar with Vietnamese culture can say that there are dishes here not normally seen at the average Vietnamese restaurant. You can order more of the home made or special dishes other...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4853545-Reviews-Mui_Ngo_Gai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Mumbai Local Restaurant,"All 5 stars are worth it, kept the true spirit of a Mumbai restaurant 👌🏻 everything v had was authentic from Mumbai. Rates too were decent & super enthusiastic team Well done guys
Came with friends for a social evening, great food, started with the Chaat Sampler which was delicious, could have had more then followed by all trying different curries, flavourful sauces. Would rate higher and be back more often if it wasn't for the noise, please...More
Always seeking out good Indian food, Mumbai Local was top tier. Excellent sauces, excellent choices. If you like good Indian, I have no issues recommending Mumbai Local!
The staff were welcoming and friendly. The menu was different from any other Indian Restaurant we had been to...no butter chicken, baji or naan. This is Indian Street Food and different. The appetizers were delicious. Try the Chaat Sampler and your palate will be wowed....More
Don’t know how to start for this, but not a good experience. No AC in 37C . Food tasted ok. I ordered Pav bhaji and sev puri. Sev puri was anything but not the sev puri, as no green chatni. And Pav bhaji was pathetic...More
This is an amazing restaurant that offer food other than regular North or South Indian fare found elsewhere in the city. Their Kohlapuri Mutton Curry was the best ever tasted outside of India. hats off to the chef. Paneer Tikka were also outstanding. Well done....More
Mumbai Local on Davie Street is my go to spot for fabulous, tasty Indian food in Vancouver. The owners, a couple of very friendly young guys, use family recipes to create yummy comfort food. No pretentiousness here! Food is hearty, healthy and in good portions...More
Thank you for this amazing review! Hope to see you at Mumbai Local when you visit Vancouver again.
On Davie near Thurlow, there among some mediocre restaurants without a real chef: Greek, Italian, exotic ... this little Indian restaurant is a true discovery that merits its distinction among best new restaurants in BC for 2019 in the Globe and Mail After more than...More
Thank you for taking the time to write this wonderful review! Hope to see you again soon.
Unlike the stereotypical Indian places, there is no butter chicken, chicken tikka masala etc, at Mumbai Local. Instead, we get a kind of Indian tapas, and some more delicious than others. The sable fish was nice, and the lamb shank good for a wet and...More
Thank you for the kind review! We love that we can provide our customers with a unique experience! You should definitely come by for dinner one of these days.
Wow wow woww! Mumbai Local you are a true Gem! I am a tourist from Mumbai, India and I my every day food hunt is so challenging especially when you are travelling with group of family and friends some of which who are vegetarians. While...More
Wow Siddhi thank you for taking the time to write this wonderful review! You are too kind. We can't wait to have you back when you come to Vancouver again! Warmly, Shreyash K.
A luxury restaurant it is not, and is not meant to be, it specializes in Indian street food so that is what I expected. The waitress was extremely talkative and helpful in selecting combinations. The service was fast and the food very tasty.
We are so happy to hear you had a good experience at Mumbai Local Mauro! Looking forward to seeing you again soon.
Tried this amazing place on a work function. Boy was I pleased. The owner and his wife are so kind. His wife actually painted the mural on the wall. They use local ingredients being able to tell you the farm they use them their chicken...More
Dear Joseph, Thank you very much for your kind words. Glad you loved the cuisine from Mumbai, my birthplace. I will surely convey your complements to my wife Shraddha who is the visual creative and the branding person behind Mumbai Local. She was also born...More
This was our first experience at this relatively inconspicuos restaurant on Davie Street. There arent as many tables - tables along the two sides ( north and south) with the kitchen in the back. There is a small menu providing a good variety of snack...More
Thank you for this amazing review! Looking forward to having you back.
Firstly the previous reviews about Indians being ignored is TRUE. She didn’t even serve water to our table while frequently refilling other tables. The food is equally terrible like their staff. Their $16 Khichdi is best worth $5. Vada pav came with sweet chutney and...More
Hi ! Thank you for your time. We are disappointed by your unpleasant experience. We really tried hard to look for the combination of Khichdi, Vada Pav and Dahi Puri order in a single bill and couldn't trace that combination for the past month. Could...More
I picked this Indian street hawker style cafe / restaurant ( can’t call it a restaurant as it is a basic cafe ) from the reviews on this site. 🤨 Empty. Bad sign. Limited menu which is never an issue IF the food is to...More
Hi ! Thank you for your time. I am the owner of Mumbai Local. We work hard every day to serve authentic cuisine of Mumbai. I am deeply disappointed that you did not enjoy our food. I would greatly appreciate if you can spend some...More",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14960142-Reviews-Mumbai_Local_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Myst Asian Fusion,"There were ten of us and none of us got our food at the same time, including one of our party who didn't get their food until the rest of us were finished. Serving staff were non existent. But, the food was really great!
Went here after dinner for Taiwanese bubble tea/specialty drinks and snacks. Had a great selection of teas and fruit drinks. Menus were available online only. Just had to scan a QR code and it redirected you to the menu. Had the chicken bites for snacks....More
It was hopping busy. Their huge menu selection of Asian dishes include dishes such as Taiwanese salty peppery chicken, Thai Pineapple & Pork Fried Rice, & Japanese Omu fried rice. They have added a few new dishes since I was here last. My girlfriend told...More
Servings are small and overpriced. I notice going through some of the reviews from others are the same. Simply overpriced. The response from the owner seemed to indicate that they wanted to rectify to problem but haven't since similar concerns have continued for so long....More
There is so many Taiwanese restaurants around Kingsway Burnaby , Myst is one of the trendy one around , I only been once ,and that is enough for me ! I am a retired teenage ,when I go out for place to eat ,I like...More
Went once with clients, the food was terrible and the services was terrible. I would not recommend, and definitely won't go back! Be aware!
Servers are all nice, but sometimes not well trained. The food is ok for me, but some friends said good, but it depends on everyone.
This Asian Fusian restaurant located at Kingsway, burnaby. The food more toward health eating and Taiwanese styles. Good selection and good services too.The menu prices are reasonable and more parking lot. Recommended.
You need to make reservations or there will always be a long wait. The food is good and tasty. The service is fast and friendly.
I always have the octopus tentacles with my seafood congee.it's consistent but they charge me $75 for 2 slices of lemon? the place is clean. parking is a challenge during dinner time hours....they need to hire more English speaking servers.
Me and my friend went there around 12 pm, the place was crowded but we did not have to wait because there was a table for two. We ordered the beef and beef tendon noodle in soup and dumplings in soup. Quality of food is...More
Tasty food. Great desserts & drinks. Do make room for dessert: They're all good. Depends what you like. The deep fried squid & wings are especially good. Fun place for groups to share different dishes.
We had dinner for the first time in Myst Fusion , waited for a few minutes for a parking spot as it is a busy hour. Waited for a few minutes to be seated, but order was immediately taken afterwards. We had the squid tentacles...More
We love Myst! Always so fast to get in, order, and food comes out so fast! There is always something for everyone as their menu is massive! The food is always fresh, hot, and delicious. We always order fried rice, broccoli with chicken, and sweet...More
I came here for lunch on a friend’s recommendation. On the front cover of this extensive menu was at least 10 rules and regulations of this restaurant. Diner be aware, read the fine print. They do make you stick to this as it happened to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d12531011-Reviews-Myst_Asian_Fusion-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Mythos Taverna,"Great food but ridiculously overpriced. I used to enjoy the moussaka, but the last time I went it was served cold on the inside. For almost $40, I felt ripped off. They jacked up their prices after moving from their former location on Lonsdale and...More
together with some old friends after a long spell and met them at Mythos, their favorite restaurant. Pleasant location and decorated nicely we ordered some Sangria for starters...We had a lot of talking to do about our travels and upcoming trips. We ordered our entres,....More
We were here in May 2022 - the food was phenomenal, the aura was amazing and the staff were hard-working and fantastic to deal with. We were very impressed with the service, drink and food. Especially given the current state of staffing issues and covid....More
We truly enjoyed our dinner last night at Mythos. The mussels were HUGE and flavourful. The hummus smooth and flavourful. I had the stuffed shrimp and was blown away by how tasty it is. This restaurant is a treasure and we will definitely be back!
Had a great dinner here last night. The grilled calamari, lamb souvlaki and roast lamb were delicious. The service was very good and fast. The calamari was tender and so was the lamb. Would definitely recommend the food and restaurant.
We have been coming here for 15 years. We love Greek food + this used to be our favorite Greek restaurant. Unfortunately, the food is not as good as it used to be under the new management.
Mid week evening was busy but I cannot say enough about the service and staff. With my back against the wall, I enjoyed watching the evening progress. The appetizers and meal were excellent. Lamb was off the hook fabulous with the best sear and flavour....More
Thanks to Andrea, we had a very lovely family meal at your restaurant! Food here is exceptional, very traditional and yet it gives you a different take on Greek food as you know it! Seasoning is just right and not overly spiced. All the items...More
Have been trying to make a reservation and they keep hanging up on me! Guess I won't get a chance to review the restaurant.
Hello 601sharonv, Thank you for trying to contact Mythos to make a reservation. Why on earth would we keep hanging up on you?! Are you calling the right number?!
Beautiful exterior before you enter the facility, the inside is well lit and well laid out, very elegant and tasteful interior. The table service wasn’t too memorable which I suppose is both good and bad because it wasn’t a negative or a positive experience it...More
For over 20 yrs, Mythos is my favorite go-to place for all occasions: casual dinning, celebration (e.g. birthday), and currently, ""emergency"" dinning (covid). Across different time frames and settings, Mythos has never failed to disappoint me. Great value, fantastic service, good food, nice ambience, and...More
It was a busy night for a Tuesday; we were a party of 7 from work. Service somewhat slow but not out of the ordinary considering how busy it was. Looked forward to a delicious meal. Complementary pita bread in abundance but a long time...More
We came here with a LARGE group of 28. They were able to get us on one table, on the inside ""deck"", semi outside. The wait for food was expectedly long for the size of group. But was it delicious. The dipper platter, the melted...More
Food and service just ok, we really miss Pasparos which was the previous restaurant on this site. Now that the Mythtos people have taken over the atmosphere has totally changed. The authentic greek taverna stye is gone, the place is more contemporary and certainly louder....More
Hello Gilliancarole, Thank you for dining at Mythos. It's disappointing that you did not enjoy your meal at our restaurant, however we are a completely different restaurant and have been in business on 18th and Lonsdale for 27 years. I understand change is difficult but...More
The special for the evening was ""lamb shank"". Well, I know what a lamb shank is- it is the small foreleg of the animal. Two of our party ordered this entree, and the server brought out a couple of plates groaning with what looked like...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d707213-Reviews-Mythos_Taverna-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Naam Restaurant,"Still a classic health food restaurant. Table service. Some tables available outside in the garden Very busy popular place.
Huge portions of really tasty vegetarian and vegan food. My husband is a firm carnivore and even he really enjoyed it. Very laid back atmosphere with friendly service.
The Naam Steak! We saw it mentioned in reviews & on return for an early dinner we both ordered it after looking over the big menu. Wow fresh steamed broccoli & carrots with a ton of sesame fries & miso gravy over an incredible veg...More
A very pleasant surprise. The service was great and the atmosphere was excellent. We met for lunch and each one of the 5 of us had something different. I am a grilled cheese fan and my sandwich was very good. Lots of cheese and superb...More
Hi MACIMI, Thanks for letting us know about your recent lunch visit. We're so happy that you enjoyed your meals- especially that we impressed a grilled cheese fan (that's a big compliment). We'll see you soon for your next visit to try more of our...More
Good value for Veggie/Vegan Foods! Large quantity, perhaps more attention to presentation needed. The atmosphere hasn’t changed much over the years, funky & hippy days revisited. Trialed the Naam Burger Platter & Maui-Maui Burger Platter; my spouse enjoyed the latter. The wedge fries with miso...More
Hi Betterthanboating, Thank you so much for stopping by. Happy to hear that overall you enjoyed your experience and meals' value. You're right that we do prepare most items in-house from scratch and are always looking to improve our longtime recipes. With that in mind,...More
After a nice overnighter in Vancouver, I decided to take my wife, and my young daughter, to the NAAM. 1vw always been kind of a carnivore lol, so I’ve been trying to eat more plant-based foods (first time ever for me) as of late, as...More
Today I had the Naam Steak Platter. Yum. Lots of fresh vegetables. Lots of potato wedges. Great veggie “steak”. All topped with miso gravy. Coffee was good. Atmosphere is a bit “sad” due to COVID, but I'm glad the Naam is still here. Such a...More
The service was so slow! It wasn't even a busy afternoon. There were two waitresses and they were both absent minded. When I looked for my waitress, she was just chatting with the other waitress. I saw her scan the room and completely didn't see...More
Food was mediocre at best, bad customer service, waiters were seemingly uninterested in serving and answering questions. Not going back and would not recommend
Been loyal to that restaurant for decades. Sadly and unfortunately, just like everything else in our society, the customer service attitude has been deteriorating for years, because so many individuals with attitude issues are apparently drawn to work there. And hired. Not pleasant to have...More
Very nice place, with a hidden patio whit shadow. Very quiet and calm but maybe because of the covid
Every time I visit Vancouver I make sure to eat at the Naam. It’s become a tradition. The food is fresh, organic, homemade. I’ve never had a bad meal here. This last visit I topped off the Dragon Bowl with the dessert special; a warm...More
Had a couple burgers, beers and nachos at happy hour. The burgers were a bit underwhelming, but still tasted alright. The nachos Tuscan were tasty but sadly we are left with a huge plate of sweaty tortillas (without cheese because they don't know how to...More
I'm not sure I understand the hype of this place. I know people who consider this their favorite restaurant in Vancouver but it mystified my friend and I and we left our plates behind just a few bites in. There was no love in the...More
We went as a family , six people and everything we ordered was just delicious and super fresh and flavoursome. We are not vegetarian , but this was some of the best vegetarian food that we have ever eaten! The bowls are so full of...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d778096-Reviews-Naam_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nammos Estiatorio,"We had an excellent meal and service, polite and friendly. Specialising in shared plates. Food is priced on the high side more attuned to downtown quality eateries. The negatives were the loud thumping music and the high priced wines. Cheapest bottles 70 -80 dollars which...More
Greek salad ho hum with tasteless tomatoes. The worst Spanakopita I've ever eaten: lots of pastry with perhaps a teaspoon of filling. Had to order tzaziki on the side to choke down all the pastry. My husband's roast lamb was luke warm on the outside...More
Enjoyed ourselves immensely! Great food Service excellent. Staff knowledgeable. We were seated as per our reservation time and the server was attentive but not pushy or overbearing throughout. Given how busy the restaurant was, we were well taken care of. The restaurant is “tapis” style...More
A very nice little restaurant. A couple of very good retsina wines. Food all served on plates to share. Perfect quantities. Greek food is not my favourite, but this is one that I'd go back to. A little too noisy, so don't figure on an...More
A nicely decorated, airy, comfortable restaurant with a contemporary Greek menu. The dolmades and the melitzano were both excellent. Many good vegetarian options. I would highly recommend this restaurant but for the loud music more suitable to a club than to dining.
Amazing food. All home made . Very fresh. Melts in your mouth. We had the big platter for four and we got a bit of everything. The meat was just delicious and so were the potatoes. We also ordered calamari which were done to perfection...More
We don't often eat Greek but as Nammos has a patio and it was a lovely day...We have the vegetarian lasagna, pork souvlaki and a lamb burger. Portion size adequate (not all bulked up with roast potatoes and rice as if fairly typical at many...More
I have only had their lunch Pitas ( chicken and pork ) so far - but they have been very tasty and are accompanied by a generous green salad ( greek salad is an option for a few dollars more ) Looking forward to having...More
Our dinner was a celebration of belated birthdays. My friend who treated me had been there before & knew that they had patio dining. They do have a happy hour but we were misled by an old menu that was placed on our table. When...More
Neighbourhood greek restaurant four of us tried during dine out.  Nice modern ambience.  The food and service was good.  The seating was comfortable.  Easy to find free street parking.
Wow! First time ordering from them today. They took a long time to prepare the order and now I know why. Because unlike 95% of restaurants, they prepared the order from scratch. It was fresh and unbelievably tasty. Way to go Nammos!
I tried this restaurant over the weekend and I was so happy I did. The food was amazing, the drinks were amazing and the staff were even more friendly. A special thank you to Lucas for being so kind and welcoming and recommending drinks and...More
While visiting our daughter we had a fabulous meal here! Everything was so fresh! Our servers were efficient and immediate and the mood was upbeat and hip yet casual. Wonderful meal from the delicious dips, olives and pita to the entrees. Will definitely visit again...More
I love greek food, really fresh, flavourful greek food. Nammos has it! How have I missed this hidden gem? Welcoming space, comfortable seating, lots of tables, and seems wheelchair accessible. The service was spectacular! Lots of suggestions and wonderful conversation - our server knew when...More
I ordered through Foodora. Tasty. WAY OVERPRICED. 1 chicken souvlaki for $8. Small mousaka for $16. All meals should have been twice the size. You are not gourmet, you are average. Do not portion high end. DISAPPOINTED",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10257824-Reviews-Nammos_Estiatorio-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nat's New York Pizzaria,"My son and I came in late afternoon after biking and walking 4 hours exploring Vancouver — needed something to get us to dinner —- we eat had a slice one pepperoni and one one spicy mushroom- the slices were nice and crisp enough on...More
My son and I came in late afternoon after biking and walking 4 hours exploring Vancouver — needed something to get us to dinner —- we eat had a slice one pepperoni and one one spicy mushroom- the slices were nice and crisp enough on...More
Hello, I came to this restaurant to impress a business client. We ordered a large cheese pizza. As we were eating the pizza, and discussing business my client felt something large and chewy when he took a bite. He spit the pizza out and found...More
Hello, I came to this restaurant to impress a business client. We ordered a large cheese pizza. As we were eating the pizza, and discussing business my client felt something large and chewy when he took a bite. He spit the pizza out and found...More
This is the 3rd time my daughter has gotten pizza from here and she loves it, This third time my oldest children also ordered pasta dishes they were delicious. Portions were so generous they had left overs to take home, prices can't be beat for...More
This is the 3rd time my daughter has gotten pizza from here and she loves it, This third time my oldest children also ordered pasta dishes they were delicious. Portions were so generous they had left overs to take home, prices can't be beat for...More
Went just prior to closing, was told they wouldn’t make anymore. They then said they would squeeze me in just prior to closing. Great service, delicious pizza. Would definitely get pizza there again next time we’re in town..
Went just prior to closing, was told they wouldn’t make anymore. They then said they would squeeze me in just prior to closing. Great service, delicious pizza. Would definitely get pizza there again next time we’re in town..
Never been tel down by Nat's Pizza - always delicious, fast and very friendly! My favourite is Meat Lover, you won't regret it!
Never been tel down by Nat's Pizza - always delicious, fast and very friendly! My favourite is Meat Lover, you won't regret it!
We had a long sightseeing day, so just dropped in for a quick meal. It is takeaway, but they do have a few tables where you can sit and eat. We had a large pizza which I think was the smallest we could get, and...More
We had a long sightseeing day, so just dropped in for a quick meal. It is takeaway, but they do have a few tables where you can sit and eat. We had a large pizza which I think was the smallest we could get, and...More
Great place to stop and grab a piece of pizza. Love it. The pepperoni pizza is the best I've had for a long time
Great place to stop and grab a piece of pizza. Love it. The pepperoni pizza is the best I've had for a long time
Stopped by to get a slice and it did remind me of a real New York pizza. I had a slice with anchovies and ate it there = would recommend over any of the chain places.
Stopped by to get a slice and it did remind me of a real New York pizza. I had a slice with anchovies and ate it there = would recommend over any of the chain places.
We stopped at Nat's for a bite to eat before the fireworks. I can see why there was a constant stream of people coming in and out of this place. Delicious, non-greasy, slightly crisp thin crust slices and a yummy sauce that just enhances the...More
We stopped at Nat's for a bite to eat before the fireworks. I can see why there was a constant stream of people coming in and out of this place. Delicious, non-greasy, slightly crisp thin crust slices and a yummy sauce that just enhances the...More
So i'm not big on Pizza, but I tried this on the weekend, checked out the types of Pizza they make and I loved the fact they only have thin crust Pizza, various topping made the decision long, but settled on everything, It was one...More
So i'm not big on Pizza, but I tried this on the weekend, checked out the types of Pizza they make and I loved the fact they only have thin crust Pizza, various topping made the decision long, but settled on everything, It was one...More
I am a pizza lover as I am sure many people are! The most important part is the crust in my view. It was thin and chewy - great texture. Ordered the meat deluxe. Toppings were generous and good quality. Highly recommend it and will...More
I am a pizza lover as I am sure many people are! The most important part is the crust in my view. It was thin and chewy - great texture. Ordered the meat deluxe. Toppings were generous and good quality. Highly recommend it and will...More
After a long day in Stanley Park, we came across this gem on Denman St. Pizza was perfect. Not a lot of seating, but we made it work. The Chicken Parm sandwich was very good. We had the Meat Head Pizza. Very good. The two...More
After a long day in Stanley Park, we came across this gem on Denman St. Pizza was perfect. Not a lot of seating, but we made it work. The Chicken Parm sandwich was very good. We had the Meat Head Pizza. Very good. The two...More
A great staff with hands on owner participation. Huge portions full of flavor and very reasonably priced. Pizza is good and slices are large. A definite return is in order
A great staff with hands on owner participation. Huge portions full of flavor and very reasonably priced. Pizza is good and slices are large. A definite return is in order
And they were amazing! Definitely going back here next time were in town! We tried 3 different kinds, and they were all amazing. Eat here!
And they were amazing! Definitely going back here next time were in town! We tried 3 different kinds, and they were all amazing. Eat here!
I was walking around looking for something good to eat and pizza sounded great. I didn’t want a whole one and Nat’s offered slices. I ordered a slice of BBQ Chicken Pizza. It was exceptional! What I liked the nest was the crust was crispy,...More
I was walking around looking for something good to eat and pizza sounded great. I didn’t want a whole one and Nat’s offered slices. I ordered a slice of BBQ Chicken Pizza. It was exceptional! What I liked the nest was the crust was crispy,...More
Yup, you read that right! Forget Deadpool! The far more high-profile Hannibal King also eats here! Okay, they’re both one and the same – characters portrayed by Ryan Reynolds – but the point remains. Nat’s Pizzeria has developed a pretty high profile thanks, in part,...More
Yup, you read that right! Forget Deadpool! The far more high-profile Hannibal King also eats here! Okay, they’re both one and the same – characters portrayed by Ryan Reynolds – but the point remains. Nat’s Pizzeria has developed a pretty high profile thanks, in part,...More
Simply - great pizza - styles from different boroughs. The Square Brooklyn pizza was absolutely killer, and the vegetarian options also superb. These are generous portions, authentic NY vibes and food, good beer and great TV for sports events. Pizzas aren't cheap but they're a...More
Simply - great pizza - styles from different boroughs. The Square Brooklyn pizza was absolutely killer, and the vegetarian options also superb. These are generous portions, authentic NY vibes and food, good beer and great TV for sports events. Pizzas aren't cheap but they're a...More
I have been to Nat's a handful of times now and am blown away by their pizza each and every time! They have a great selection of slices that are sure to fill you up and the customer service has been amazing! I love the...More
I have been to Nat's a handful of times now and am blown away by their pizza each and every time! They have a great selection of slices that are sure to fill you up and the customer service has been amazing! I love the...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew nat's new york pizzeria . I recently tried out this place due to the recommendation of a friend. I like the diner like vibe and friendly staff. I tried the artichoke pesto and classic pepperoni slice. Both were...More
Video review on youtube: vancity food crew nat's new york pizzeria . I recently tried out this place due to the recommendation of a friend. I like the diner like vibe and friendly staff. I tried the artichoke pesto and classic pepperoni slice. Both were...More
Got two pizzas from here last night and both were good (7/10). Nice crust, a nice amount of toppings and tasty sauce. A bit pricey ($45 for two large pizzas) but we liked it.
Got two pizzas from here last night and both were good (7/10). Nice crust, a nice amount of toppings and tasty sauce. A bit pricey ($45 for two large pizzas) but we liked it.
We were in our ""old"" neighborhood and noticed Nat's and decided upon a pizza for dinner. Our starter was chicken veggie soup then opted for a New York Deli Pizza. The pizza was especially nice.
We were in our ""old"" neighborhood and noticed Nat's and decided upon a pizza for dinner. Our starter was chicken veggie soup then opted for a New York Deli Pizza. The pizza was especially nice.
By all means try it, see if you like it. they have sub's and I liked the caesar salad, you have to ask for lemon on the side. No coffee or dessert sadly. About $10.00 for a sandwich and they. serve pasta.About $4.00 or so...More
By all means try it, see if you like it. they have sub's and I liked the caesar salad, you have to ask for lemon on the side. No coffee or dessert sadly. About $10.00 for a sandwich and they. serve pasta.About $4.00 or so...More
Mac 'n' Cheese pizza on Thursdays is great if you want diabetes or high blood pressure... joking aside great pizza that is made on the spot. A hidden gem; probably the best pizza in Vancouver.
Mac 'n' Cheese pizza on Thursdays is great if you want diabetes or high blood pressure... joking aside great pizza that is made on the spot. A hidden gem; probably the best pizza in Vancouver.
I go to Nat's often and am never disappointed. The pizza slices are big and have amazing value and quality. My favourites are the pepperoni, chorizo mushroom, and the taco pizza which is surprisingly good.
I go to Nat's often and am never disappointed. The pizza slices are big and have amazing value and quality. My favourites are the pepperoni, chorizo mushroom, and the taco pizza which is surprisingly good.
Every bit of New York paraphernalia is stuffed into an unassuming storefront - that's just how it should be. So are the pies. Big slices of thin, well-done crusts, drooping just a bit at the tip, with tangy sauce, and a great range of options...More
Every bit of New York paraphernalia is stuffed into an unassuming storefront - that's just how it should be. So are the pies. Big slices of thin, well-done crusts, drooping just a bit at the tip, with tangy sauce, and a great range of options...More
We moved into Kitsilano and made it our goal to find the best pizza place within delivery or walking distance. It took a while, and a few miss-steps - but our son found Nat's and we haven't looked back! This pizza is everything I was...More
We moved into Kitsilano and made it our goal to find the best pizza place within delivery or walking distance. It took a while, and a few miss-steps - but our son found Nat's and we haven't looked back! This pizza is everything I was...More
I ordered an x-large Maui Wowie pizza ($26), an x-large Margarita pizza ($18), and a Greek salad ($7.95) to go on a Friday evening and the service was fairly fast even with several other orders ahead of me. The thin crust pizzas were quite tasty....More
I ordered an x-large Maui Wowie pizza ($26), an x-large Margarita pizza ($18), and a Greek salad ($7.95) to go on a Friday evening and the service was fairly fast even with several other orders ahead of me. The thin crust pizzas were quite tasty....More
My wife & I were walking in English Bay & we're looking for some where to have lunch. We saw Nat's & decided to try a slice of their Pizza. We each decided to have one slice of Pepperoni pizza. We enjoyed the pizza so...More
My wife & I were walking in English Bay & we're looking for some where to have lunch. We saw Nat's & decided to try a slice of their Pizza. We each decided to have one slice of Pepperoni pizza. We enjoyed the pizza so...More
Judging by all the hype you'd expect fabulous pizza with an amazing crust and great toppings. They are gourmet priced so figured hype + price must be a good sign. Sadly I was really disappointed. Two large pizza's lacked flavour and imaginative toppings. Crust has...More
Judging by all the hype you'd expect fabulous pizza with an amazing crust and great toppings. They are gourmet priced so figured hype + price must be a good sign. Sadly I was really disappointed. Two large pizza's lacked flavour and imaginative toppings. Crust has...More
I've had a fair share of pizza but this may have been the worst. I was fooled by the store's flashy facade. Food left me with a queasy, greasy feeling, although the pimply high school boys sitting adjacent to be seemed quite content. Perhaps it...More
I've had a fair share of pizza but this may have been the worst. I was fooled by the store's flashy facade. Food left me with a queasy, greasy feeling, although the pimply high school boys sitting adjacent to be seemed quite content. Perhaps it...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3308525-Reviews-Nat_s_New_York_Pizzaria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Neighbours Restaurant and Pizza House,"Went there for my birthday dinner. Lamb roast was dry and ugly. Calamari was mushy. Service was snooty and very poor, felt neglected without reason. Very poor service. Promised a birthday dessert and never received it. Had to wait for bill, but could not wait...More
Just visited Neighbours new location for a belated birthday with friends! Glad that I made reservations because it was packed to the rafters! It is a smaller space than the previous location but has nicer decor! Everyone at our table was absolutely delighted with their...More
Had a lovely experience at this family restaurant on Victoria Drive. Got there at 4:30 pm, early dinner as our grandson had a hockey game. We were greeted by the hostess and told there was a table available for 6, however she needed it for...More
Needs some time before it is up to expectations. Red snapper, a favourite, was served with the serving dish half full of water. Prawn slouvaki, also a favourite, was overcooked with the prawns stuck to the skewer and salad covered by the rice. While we...More
We were in the mood for pizza and actually dined here. We did takeout several times. They had a great selection of combo pizzas including vegetarian. We liked the fact that the crust wasn't too crispy. Rather tasty. There are 3 sizes to choose from...More
Typical East side eatery but with more variety and high-end prices. There are a lot of people in the area nearby that eat there because it is the only restaurant there that has some Greek dishes as well as the standard pizzas and meat meals...More
Finding comfort food could be a challenge and during the past few months of social distancing and quarantine, we were glad to hear Neighbour's was still open for take out. Like most restaurants during COVID, they were adhering to the no dining-in policy but still...More
Take out only due to Covid19. We had 2 really good pizzas. Great rising crust with delicious toppings.
I was invited to the Neighbours Restaurant & Pizza House after I was asked what sort of food I would like to eat, only a few weeks ago. I mentioned that I had not tried any Italian food while visiting Vancouver this last trip. That...More
Visited this restaurant with my sister and our babies and have never been more disappointed. We had 2 strollers and were seated towards the other side of the restaurant. We were getting rude stares from one of the waitresses and didn’t think too much of...More
Our food was so oily and our water glasses dirty...the waitress licked her fingers when serving our food ... so gross!
Walked in and sat down. The server came over with menus and asked for drink orders. Quick and efficient! The ambiance resembles something out of the 70s or possibly the 80s. No nonsense, no white tablecloths, no candles, no shining tableware or sparkling wine glasses....More
Go for the pizza, it’s made with a homemade sauce and is a Greek style pizza. Love it!! We went with a group of 10 people and they do take reservations.
Amazing delicious and oh so very rich in flavours and textures best I’ve had in over a decade This amazing and take out!
On Tuesday nights, they offer either a chicken or beef souvlaki for $12.95 and is good value. Quality of meat is good, our server was pleasant albeit a little overstretched. I would consider returning.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1082621-Reviews-Neighbours_Restaurant_and_Pizza_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nero Waffles,"Delicious waffles & coffee! Sweet & savoury choices, excellent quick service. We were lucky there was no wait, when we left there was a lineup to get in We will be back :)
Wonderful waffles! We tried both liege and Belgian styles in the Heaven option. Yummmmm! We will have to return to try more.
Tried to buy a box of 21 waffles for takeout, called them at 0900, said they have a big order coming up so it will be a 30 min wait, went there at 0920, the guy told me its gonna be a 30-45 min wait...More
I can’t recommend this restaurant enough. We experienced both savoury and sweet waffle meals and hands down the best waffles I’ve ever had. If there’s a wait to get in, it’s well worth it!!
Came for brunch on a Friday with some coworkers. I had the smoked salmon brussels benny and I thought it was really good. It was a good size portion, lots of hollandaise, and the waffles were very light and a great balance between crispy and...More
As we were staying at a hotel nearby, the smell and enticing menu convinced us we had to try this place out for breakfast ! It seems surprisingly busy in the evening, and judging from the breakfast plates, it's not that hard to imagine why....More
The waffles were amazingly delicious. We ordered different kinds and shared. Best ever. Recommend the lemon raspberry and the caramel toppings.
Kind of a funky vibe, and simple furniture. Fresh everything. Delicious food is an understatement, and service is stellar. Family of 4 adults, and all very stuffed and satisfied. Get there early as it had a line up from the time we got there (9:00)...More
Brought my Dad here and he is from out of town! We were both overjoyed with how amazing our food was and on top of that we got 5 star plus service from Milton here at Nero on Seymour. Hope he gets the best shifts!...More
Happened in the area , feel like grab some light breakfast before my meeting at the Onni group , I am not much a sweet guy , I hate sweet food , but feel like some thing different , Waffles sound okay , they have...More
We arrived only to be greeted in a unfriendly fashion. They were short staffed no tables except outside which was noisy with a old noisy heater. Was like sitting in the ghettos out there. Left before even ordered. I'm sure the food is good but...More
Hi Taylor, Thank you for your feedback on your visit to Nero. We had not tables available inside not because we were short staffed, but because of Covid. We have to block off table in order to keep a safe distance between the tables we...More
Our kids recommended we try this place, and they weren’t wrong! Absolutely some of the best waffles we’ve ever had, including when we were actually in Belgium. We tried both the Liege (thicker) and the Brussels (light and crispy) and both were incredible. Highlight was...More
These waffles are TO DIE FOR! We had the savoury Benny waffles are they are excellent. The mini waffles are even better! Must go
This place was such a great find for us while visiting Vancouver. Waffles are awesome and it was the best coffee I had in Canada and America. Visited this cafe twice and would definitely be back. Staff are also awesome. We had the same waitress...More
Wonderful selection of waffles sweet or savoury soft or firm. Excellent start to the day. Went to both branches, food and service equally good. Stanley Rd has more sitting space than the Robson St branch.",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12077717-Reviews-Nero_Waffles-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Neverland Tea Salon,"Great spot for a high tea. Gorgeous interior and vibe. The server was lovely and super helpful when explaining the menu and teas available. The food service of the high tea was great and everything tasted amazing. Larges tea range that I have seen at...More
Three seniors enjoyed a noontime high tea. Reservation and service were expertly handled and we were happy to have our requested window table. The variety of teas offer a taste adventure, though the dainty cups should be replaced by mugs (which could then be sold...More
Really Frustrating experience at Neverland Tea Salon. I've been coming here for 5 plus years, mostly with 2 or 3 people, but once with 12 plus people. I loved this place. We would never have a bill of less than 50 dollars, and often more...More
We love enjoying high teas and always making it a point to scope out an experience when we travel. Neverland Tea Salon was frequently recommended as a top choice so we booked a sitting here. You are given 1.5 hrs. and I think it was...More
My sisters and I went for high tea and were so impressed. My sisters have a lot of allergies and we always get worried eating out (because some places don't take allergies seriously), but the staff were so helpful, understanding, and accommodating. Everyone that brought...More
Really nice find for our post alaska cruise days in Vancouver. Very good tea and selection. Delicious food options...
The good things about Neverland are that they feature several different high tea menus that cater to patrons with different dietary needs. Their high tea is also reasonably priced, and their service is good. We also appreciated the opportunity to try several teas on their...More
I received a gift card and planned a visit for four friends hoping for a quaint tea time. Service was friendly, attentive, and punctual. Highlights included mango mimosas (they also had orange and grapefruit) and unlimited tea choices. In my experience, tea houses offer unlimited...More
Had take out food from the Neverland Tea Salon. The order was missing something but they made it up to us. I'd love to give them a great review and maybe I'm just picky because I found the sandwiches moderate and desserts pretty good but...More
We felt like royalty during our afternoon tea. I can not wait to go again. The tea was absolutely fabulous and the wonderful cakes and sandwiches were breathtaking. this place really takes pride in what they do and it shows! will return to this spot!
Nice to have the option to takeout and enjoy at home. The food items kept its quality and yummy taste. Tiny parcels of food just brings me delight to enjoy several items.
I try to take afternoon tea wherever I go. So far in Canada I've been to all the big hotels in Victoria, Banff, Lake Louise, PEI, Toronto, Niagara. So I was really excited when my neighbour told me about Neverland. I made a booking right...More
It had been over a year since my last Afternoon Tea adventure, so when my partner suggested we try the Neverland Tea Salon, I jumped at the opportunity. Besides enjoying new and different Afternoon Teas, I was also curious to see how the experience would...More
My daughter was in town and we took out the Mad Hatter High Tea to celebrate my 60th Birthday at home and it was outstanding! We were so impressed by how beautifully everything was presented, how fresh all the little sandwich breads were, how delicious...More
I visited early February with a friend and had such a lovely experience. My server Jen was an absolute delight! She gave great recommendations and really went above and beyond. The food was so delicious as well, I’ve told so many people to go.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5503062-Reviews-Neverland_Tea_Salon-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
New Amsterdam Cafe,"Membership and service was easy. Volcano knocked me out (literally), but staff was en pointe - would green out here again.
Me and my husband were here in june 2022. We came in and were met by a very friendly young woman, Who told us it was ok that we brought our own drinks. (Non alcoholic). Then the manager came a little time after and told...More
I’ve been coming to this place on and off for over 10 years when I come over from Vancouver Island. It’s been a couple years since I’ve been and I recently found out about the membership, which I was excited about at first until I...More
Well been going to the place off and on for a few years . Place was better hrs ago . Now drinks are way over priced and the food also a grill cheese sandwich with a small bowl of potato chips for like $10 half...More
as a regular visitor to Vancouver, New Amsterdam is always one of our first ports of call. The clue is in the name ~ this is more like the brown cafes of Amsterdam than a traditional food-based cafe, although the food is delicious and they...More
• smoke downstairs for $5 per hour before 5pm. After 5pm it's free • table service • food. Munchies. No alcohol • inc use of bongs, lungs • a locals destination • friendly staff • don't sell Mary Jane but there's 210 dispensaries in close...More
I love this place, it's very safe and relaxing, especially I'm a stranger in this continent, they made me feel welcomed. I think they're enthusiasts, they rent out vape machine at very cheap price and set it up for you if you don't know how...More
Very peaceful place with friendly stuff They offer a wide collection of beverages and desserts I recommend it to anyone visiting Vancouver and would like to have Amsterdam experience all in one They don’t have a dispensary at the cafe but exactly on the opposite...More
Visiting Vancouver for the first time, I made sure to stop in here. Very relaxing atmosphere & friendly staff. Being from Montreal (& behind the times) was great to finally have such a place to unwind ;) Recommended.
A smoking lounge for marijuana. The couches are worn, the TV only shows sports, and the food is not why you are there - nor do you care about taste when you have the munchies. But I still gave this place four stars because where...More
Excellent service, friendly and helpful staff. Everything we had was very tasty (and this was pre smoke) - pulled pork sandwich was fantastic and the grilled cheese was oozing with three cheeses. For dessert, a root beer float and a couple of cookies that were...More
Called in to ask a few questions. The guy making coffees was very helpful and pointed me across the road for help. When I came back they made me a coffee and got the smoking equipment ready. Not having these shops near my home town...More
Wonderful customer service and a nice place to stop and have a break from the sea of faceless people that surround it. If it's before five head downstairs and sit in a comfortable place and smoke in peace. The staff will bring you anything you...More
After walking the city streets, this place makes for a nice place to sit down and relax. Service here is nice and friendly. They offer smoking pieces for rent and water within reach in case you tend to cough your lungs out. BYOB (Bring Your...More
If you are visiting the city for the first time. I would like to recommend you this place! Why? Because you have everything that you need, dispensary near by, WIFI and an amazing lounge where you can bring your own, smoke and TRAVEL TO JUPITER!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8037020-Reviews-New_Amsterdam_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
New Town Bakery & Restaurant,"BRING CASH. This place was bustling front and back but the service was still quick and attentive. Had an excellent pork bun, steak noodle, and mandarin chopped chicken. The vegetables in the chicken were particularly great. The chicken itself was all dark meat, moist and...More
New Town Bakery has been my favorite to get yummy baked products. They sell a wide variety of bakery products, steam buns, tarts, and dumplings. The bakery is at the storefront and the dining area is at the back side with limited seats. The menu...More
The his place has been around for ages in Vancouver. Stopped by the cafe for lunch and pastries with the family. Super nice staff and great service. My dads in a wheelchair and they were so helpful and very social. Decor is cool HK old...More
Unfriendly and unhappy-looking staff members, who are not suited for the customer service business, are doing the job they don't want to do. I paid in cash because they don't accept credit cards, but when I asked for change, they gave me a nasty look...More
Tried the restaurant - hot tea served in a plastic tumbler - weird. The chicken soup was bland as was the beef noodles. Not cheap either, Service was good. Then I tried the bakery. I bought several saipao - steamed buns. they were too sweet...More
New Town bakery is like a blast from the past. It has the atmosphere of a typical Hong Kong cafe. Sample the often warm delicious pastries and buns. Don't go to this place for food from the kitchen, it is very average. I recommend the...More
Just had to return! Excellent food and staff. Dined in on dim sum dishes and picked up some amazing coconut buns to eat at the airport. Great spot!
Love this place, classic Cantonese bakery with reasonable prices. Lots of choices either steam buns or baked buns. Stop when you are in China town.
It’s probably the only iconic place left in Chinatown. It was a must stop for my out of town visitors. They had to buy a bit of everything including their famous apple tart which I may add, is to die for. Everything else was delish....More
Excellent congee and bakery! Huge congee menu. The egg tarts and sesame rolls were great. The Hainese chicken was good / not like I expected from other countries. The Singapore noodles were only ok. Lo pak turnip cake was the best we have ever had....More
We had apple fritters, sesame ball with red bean and almond cookie. All good. We will be back to try the takeout frozen foods.
I have been visiting New Town bakery for at least thirty years. The quality of their steamed and baked buns has never wavered. I especially like their Char Sui Bau and their egg tarts, and no visit to Chinatown is complete without a visit to...More
Definitely overrated, and extremely busy. Food is not the greatest, but somehow people keep going there. Not worth the wait, buns are better elsewhere. Good service.
We came for a late lunch, dim sum. Congee with dried fish, peanuts and pork, shrimp dumplings, minced beef rice roll and daikon radish cake. Not busy and everybody spread out or plexiglass so you feel safe. Well known bakery.
Great spot for Chinese pastries, very service and friendly staff. They take debit and cash just heads up. Can't wait to go check this place out again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2508589-Reviews-New_Town_Bakery_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nicli Antica Pizzeria,"Dropped in on a Tuesday at approx. 5:30 … no reservation. Asked young girl in cutoff jeans and runners at the entry podium if we could be seated outside at their back patio. She said “you’ll have to go around, I’ll meet you there”. Fine...More
Nice spot, a little cramped inside, friendly staff and the food tastes good…….BUT, the portions, especially the pasta, are just too small to be worth the prices. Not sure if this is a north shore phenomenon, but a quick trip into the city will reveal...More
Great pizza. Very authentic Italian style base. Lots of toppings. Good atmosphere with friendly staff. Good bar with good selection of cocktails.
Was very impressed not only with the food but service was excellent and one gentleman took care of the entire restaurant, it was short of staff but not noticed he was a champion see you again Mahalo
This pizza was so good. It reminded me of Grimaldis definitely a mango, Naples, Italy type of pizza. And the kids loved that it came with scissors so they could cut their own size of pizza.
What more do you need to know? Thinking about it, the type of pizza would be helpful. Melanzana. Delicious. Apparently I must write at least 100 characters.
This is a charming neighbourhood bistro with a European flair to it. Food is great and the wine and drink menu, while smallish is well chosen. Save room for dessert too. Service was excellent
I love Nicli Antica! The food is fresh and delicious. My favourites are the arugula salad and the vegetarian pizzas. I love coming here. The atmosphere is clean and enjoyable. Whenever I crave authentic pizza, I'm sure to go to Nicli.
I’ve been fairly critical of this place in the past based mostly on value - price vs quality/ quantity. I was really happy with our family trip last night based on the quality of what we ordered. My potato and fontina pizza (add bacon -...More
This is VPN pizza at its best, you can taste the freshness of the San Marzano tomato sauce, I had the Prociutto Arugula and my wife had the Margherita....so good!
Got pasta and pizza via Uber Eats. Pesto Pizza was excellent - really tasty, great toppings and texture. Pasta Carbonara was awesome, huge pieces of guanciale. Pasta Funghi was a little too garlicy for us, but that's a personal preference. Huge bonus points for sustainable...More
Have never been here before but brought my Mum. Pizza was excellent. Nice crust with some burnt edges and nice and chewy. Great sausage on it as well as good cheese. Worth a visit.
The manager (Curt) is great and the pizza IS AWESOME!! We feel it's the best pizza on the block. Huge patio and good vibes!
They don't have a huge menu but the food they do have is very good. It's a cute little place, and their pizzas are excellent. I've been there a number of times now. It's nice to have a place like this in Edgemont.
Amazing location here, the staff are super friendly and the pizza is amazing. Really glad that they are open for take out here, they have the best gluten free crust too!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d15581201-Reviews-Nicli_Antica_Pizzeria-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nightingale,"This restaurant has a very eclectic and varied menu with many great choices. We just split a white pizza with fontina cheese and roasted garlic, roasted mushrooms, and the charred broccolini vegetable dish, and it was all excellent.
We were staying at the Marriott Pinnacle and wanted something close (it was a 3 minute walk), and decided to go to Nightingale. We were blown away by how good the food was - everything we got. I loved the beet salad, I have never...More
Made it in time for happy hour and tried as much as we could. Loved the pizzas and fried chicken. The bear salad is an absolute must.
First evening in Vancouver and I think it will be difficult to top this meal. The balance of flavours in all our dishes too share were fantastic, reasonably priced for the quality and the service. All the staff were very attentive but not overbearing. If...More
A large open space eatery with ‘family style’ (table sharing) dishes. Food is flavoursome and is delivered to your table when ready. So your vegetables may arrive before main entree. Staff are friendly and attentive. The food is good but nothing ‘spectacular’.
Went to Nightingale from a friends recommendation and I was extremely happy. This is a trendy restaurant with an eclectic menu. I had the beet salad, spaghetti with clams and carrot cake. All were excellent. Especially the spaghetti is to die for. Highly recommended.
Coming back to Vancouver, we knew beforehand that one of our first meals will be at Nightingale. We had lunch with friends and we shared the roasted cauliflower, baked sweet potato and seared tuna dishes as well as a mushrooms pizza. As during our pre-pandemic...More
My friend and I shared several dishes. We ordered the beet salad, meatballs, tuna and fried chicken which overall was pretty good.
Totally inspired by the food and it’s not just me. This place is crammed full of locals bringing a great energy and vibe to this chic downtown eatery. Never have veggies been done like this with depth and complexity of flavors that had the three...More
Nightingale was a lot of fun. The service was great, very genuine and friendly. The food was great. Many restaurants tell you that their dishes are meant to be shared. But that usually works only for starters. In Nightingale, even the bigger portions, such as...More
It started a little slow- but you could not fault the 5* food. Unbelievable flavours- we sat at a chefs table and although admittedly service was flat to start- the food was incredible! Overall a 5* reviews for the flavours. Crisp, clean and the depth...More
The food at this restaurant did not suit my palette or my wife's palette at all. Generally, the food was very oily and very salty. The brussel sprouts were burnt on the outside and raw on the inside, with a sour sauce and large cubes...More
This came highly recommended and it certainly deserves its reputation! It was a nit loud for me, but I'm old and particular. The service was excellent - the server and the sommelier were in sync and made a great recommendation for something to go with...More
I went with my ladies for brunch for the fist time with Nightingale. First impression were really great, the host offer to put our jackets away in their locker. Then one server lead us to our table upstairs ( the table was quite awkwardly place...More
A little puzzling to find one of the bar backs begin generously spraying cleaning product less than a foot away from the food I was busy eating. What do you exactly say ? Excuse me, can you not aerosol your cleaning fluid onto my food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10337462-Reviews-Nightingale-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nightshade Yvr,"After almost three weeks on the road, we were experiencing a bit of « restaurant fatigue ». As we wanted a light dinner, we chose to have a vegan meal and went to Nightshade on Mainland. We were seated on the terrace and enjoyed the coolness of...More
Great vegan food! Such creative use of exotic spices to produce elegant original flavors. More than deserves the Michelin guide listing-- if it was up to me I'd give it a star! I had the rendang, way better than the beef versions I've had!
We went here on the last weekend of Dineout, which meant we had to accept a 5:15 reservation. Being early has its rewards, as there were not many people, yet. As the evening wore on, the new folks were nicely spaced a table apart, until...More
I am a hands down meat eater but allowed myself to be taken to a vegetarian restaurant. The food is served family style and was so delicious and creative. All of it. Excellent service too. Note: margaritas was amazing per my friend.
Supper with a vegan friend. We both liked the tastes and textures of the entrees. Small for the price charged. Dessert was great; the crème brûlée a taste delight. Server was charming and patient. Also good at explaining the various dishes to us. Might go...More
As a vegan and vegetarian we LOVED this place. The service was so friendly and the food out of this world. The atmosphere is perfect - casual with a hint of fine dining. I would guarantee that meat eaters could dine here and not feel...More
The food was absolutely delicious - full of variety and flavour and surprisingly all plant based. Great ambience and a real gem of a find. Head chef Chanty is brining the future of food to our plates!",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23858741-Reviews-Nightshade_Yvr-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nirvana,"Excellent authentic food. Try the chicken biryanis. And tiger beer. Nice hosts. We come here all the way from North Van.
After a nice quiet X'mas ,back to the crazy jungle , just finished meting in China town ,craving for curry ,,on the way home ,dropped in to the Nirvana restaurant for lunch ,it is a while since my last visit ,I still remember their delicious...More
Craving something different from my usual fare, I opted for Nirvana on Main Street. Nirvana has been an institution on Main Street for aso g as I can remember. The dining room was very cozy. Service was quick and attentive. I opted for the non-veggie...More
Indian restaurant located near Broadway on the west side of Main Street near Kingsway. We were disappointed with the level of service. Seemed to take forever to get their attention to take our order despite the fact there was only one other table occupied. Even...More
We had delivery from here last year and were dazzled at how good it was. Tried the restaurant for lunch last week. Chicken Rogan Josh and Tikka Masala were excellent. Spinach Paneer was bland. Simple restaurant in a convenient location. Very quiet at lunchtime. I...More
I've eaten here many times before, but we also just had Nirvana cater our holiday party. The food was fantastic, they were so friendly and went above and beyond to help us set everything up/clear everything away, and even gave us takeout containers for everyone...More
We thoroughly enjoyed the tasty Indian food, and it tasted almost like home-made. The hospitality was good as its run by the owners themselves, who have taken over the restaurant last year. It was open for lunch, while other Indian restaurants weren't. In all, a...More
We were staying at a hotel nearby and fancied something a bit different and Nirvana was recommended to us by hotel staff. Couldn't fault the service or the food - really tasty and authentic dishes, but HUGE serves, so we ended up with a take-out...More
Love their Indian dishes. Best love for butter chicken, spicy, hot. Or their curry chicken, and their selection of breads... new owners, since September 2018. Doing a great job of pleasing the customers also.
We had vegetable pakoras followed by the chicken curry with rice pudding for dessert. The pakoras were very good, hot and tasty. Chicken sauce was well spiced for medium but thin. Chicken could have been hotter. Rice pudding was tasty and flavourful. Not the best...More
Food was very good.Service was execellent. Place is small but cozy. Owner was giving very good personal touch.
I went in for an early dinner and was the only diner in the restaurant at the time. The staff was vhowever, ery friendly and attentive and my food arrived hot and in short order. I ordered the Coconut Curry with chicken and was not...More
when i went there for take-out, i was the only customer, the place was empty.The dish I ordered was very hot but the basmati rice was watery. The food itself did not sit well overnight and I actually had a queasy feeling upon waking up...More
Its been years since our last visit to Nirvana and that was for dinner. Looking for a lunch option walking up South Main Street we decided to try their lunch. Opted for the “Nirvana Lunch” off the fairly large lunch menu. Comes with a plate...More
We stayed at a hotel nearby and walked here for dinner. I got the Butter Chicken and my wife got Chicken Tikka Marsala. They were both very good. We were pleased with the reasonable prices as well. We would definitely eat here again on our...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707357-Reviews-Nirvana-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nobu Japanese Sushi,"Looked like a very nice family run restaurant. The miso soup is the best I had. The rest of the food was excelent as well. There was a sence of pride in the food they make. Highly recommended.
Service, excellent. Food, excellent. So pleasant. Ordered small takeout, and suddenly little extras were provided no charge.
so fresh, made with care, delicious! the best sushi on the north shore. always great quality, never disappoints
The best Sushi in North Vancouver!! Owners are wonderful people and dedicated to providing quality. Try the mango roll and yam roll!!
Excellent spot for sushi in Edgemont Village. Very nice couple that own the family restaurant. Sushi is always good.
This small corner Sushi joint in Edgemont Village has good food. We had seaweed salad, yam tempura as starters. Both good. My wife had California and Dynamite Rolls. I had spicy salmon and kamikaze roll. All were fresh and prepared nicely and colorfully. Service was...More
Small, local sushi restaurant, but nothing second-trade about the food quality. Eat in or take-out. Party trays available.
I'm not sure what Maurice F is talking about. Nobu Sushi has been my sushi spot for over a decade, and I can assure you, they have a washroom. Admittedly, Nobu is far from the cheapest sushi on the North Shore, but as a mom-and-pop...More
One of the best sushi I have ever tasted! Trying their food is a must for those who love sushi. A recommendation to anyone that are stopping by.
Very nice Sushi Rest. Recommended by our tour guide. Reasonably priced and very good. All our meals were well prepared and very good.
Family run with soggy food Very dissapointed, horrible service They do not even have a bathroom. No place to sit down. I think it is overrated on other reviews. On top of everything, expensive. The nori of the sushi was wet. They did not even...More
We were in town visiting the Capilano Suspension Bridge, just up the road, and saw this quaint little corner restaurant. Wow, we we surprised at the AMAZING sushi in this little place! EVERYTHING we ordered was incredibly delicious! We ordered the deep fried Gyoza which...More
We were travelling through Vancouver from Whistler back to Seattle. We stopped by the suspension bridge along the way and it was dinner time when we were ready to leave. We stumbled upon Nobu through Trip Advisor and were not disappointed. Their food was excellent-...More
We live on the North Shore and our family regularly enjoys Nobu Japanese Sushi, perhaps eating in the restaurant about once each week on a fairly regular basis, and occasionally doing take-out. For our family, favorites include Gyoza and Endamame Beans as appetizers, California roll...More
We were a party of 4 adults and 1 child for lunch. Though the nigiri in particular was much more expensive than I am used to - I'm not a Vancouver native - the food was excellent, timely and the staff were very friendly. We...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d6678152-Reviews-Nobu_Japanese_Sushi-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Noodlebox,"My wife and I stopped in for a quick bite while exploring the city. The food was pretty good at a good price and they had a selection of local beer.
Awesome location, just needed a quick bite after getting into the city, the food was great, the service was friendly and fast. We will try to go back before we return to Toronto.
Stopped in for take out. Staff was friendly. You can determine your spice level as well. Good portion as well.
Great menu options for vegans and meat eaters. Companion loved his meal. Mine was a light curry, was delicious made to specifications per allergies. Great location walking distance to downtown and lovely atmosphere inside. Staff were friendly and very knowledgeable on the dishes. Only downside,...More
Food was pretty good, lots of nice options. Glad I have a noodle box so close to me. Would come back again.
If you like the thick starchy and spicy noodles then Noodlebox is the place to eat! The noodles come with a selection of how hot and spicy you want your noodle dish. Medium is hotter than other restaurants that say medium spice. Be careful if...More
Fancied something other than fries again and found Noodlebox on TA. Despite some negative reviews commenting on small portions we went and had a good tasty meal. Portion size was plenty big enough, too big to need a starter as well. Service was quick and...More
Good range on the menu with daily specials but the portions are too small, even for light eaters. 20%+ were taken up by the sprouts so I regret not asking they be removed
It was our first time coming here and it was so good! Great service, the employees were very friendly and helpful. Food was great, and big portion. Worth the price and would definitely come again!!
I met a friend for lunch at the Noodlebox this past Friday. We both had the Spicy Peanut Noodle Box. Mine was with chicken and my friend had his with tofu. Both were very fresh and delicious. They had tab water and sparkling water both...More
Visited for 1st time 2 nights ago. Food is reasonably priced and glad to say delicious. After getting the attention of the female staff away from her phone. My soft spoken friend had said ""excuse me"" 3 times I said it a bit louder. She...More
Hi Leslie, Thank-you for your feedback. I do apologize that our FOH staff didn't provide you with the attention and level of service you deserve. I have spoken with our GM over the phone and he has requested that you phone into the location so...More
Very much enjoyed this yummy food. It was good value and the meal was generous and delicious! The Pad Thai was nice as was the Thai Style Chow Mein
I came to Noodle Box as a solo diner - the place provided seating from a range of a large party on a long table to the one space that I needed at the bar. The menu was varied; first you chose your box (i.e....More
We found this restaurant while walking around downtown Vancouver not far from Gastown. It has a nice atmosphere and we ordered two different vegetarian noodle boxes. The food was very tasty, you get a lot, and you can add your own sauces to it. There...More
The food is really good, with a reasonable selection. I like that you can choose the level of spiciness for each dish. The staff are friendly and accommodating. It's a good spot for a decent lunch.",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7270119-Reviews-Noodlebox-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nook,"We didnt really like the atmosphere. It seems old and it was very noisy. The music was very loud. The food/pasta was excellent and the stuff very friendly.
We didnt really like the atmosphere. It seems old and it was very noisy. The music was very loud. The food/pasta was excellent and the stuff very friendly.
Great pasta and pizza specials. I had tortellini in a beautiful broth . The tortellini was stuffed with parsnips, smoked provolone and fungi…..amazing !!
Great pasta and pizza specials. I had tortellini in a beautiful broth . The tortellini was stuffed with parsnips, smoked provolone and fungi…..amazing !!
I was there Saturday night nov 12th with my mom. We were recommended the place by my brother in law who is a red seal chef and clearly has great taste. The food was perfect and the quality was higher than the price they charged....More
I was there Saturday night nov 12th with my mom. We were recommended the place by my brother in law who is a red seal chef and clearly has great taste. The food was perfect and the quality was higher than the price they charged....More
We visited this gem in the West End and were blown away. A cozy ambience with top notch staff. Sean prepared the best gluten free pasta we have ever tried, beautiful presentation and so flavorful. The Cesar salad was also a favorite. The desserts sounded...More
We visited this gem in the West End and were blown away. A cozy ambience with top notch staff. Sean prepared the best gluten free pasta we have ever tried, beautiful presentation and so flavorful. The Cesar salad was also a favorite. The desserts sounded...More
We shared an excellent prosciutto pizza for $25 in this samll initmate Italian restaurant. Service was prompt and professional. The only negative was the small measures of over priced wine.
We shared an excellent prosciutto pizza for $25 in this samll initmate Italian restaurant. Service was prompt and professional. The only negative was the small measures of over priced wine.
We ordered take away. The pizza was ready in 10 minutes. The pizzq was tasty , but little bit small, there is only 1 size option. It is loverpriced. 30 dollars to margarita with 2 toppings.
We ordered take away. The pizza was ready in 10 minutes. The pizzq was tasty , but little bit small, there is only 1 size option. It is loverpriced. 30 dollars to margarita with 2 toppings.
The food is tasty but the value for what you spend is poor. I ordered a pasta dish with baby meatballs add on for $8 extra. Total price for the pasta was $33 which is very pricey considering the meatballs were microscopic. The tiramisu was...More
The food is tasty but the value for what you spend is poor. I ordered a pasta dish with baby meatballs add on for $8 extra. Total price for the pasta was $33 which is very pricey considering the meatballs were microscopic. The tiramisu was...More
Stayed in the West End and we were really hungry and decided on pizza. As growing up in the US northeast and been to Italy several times I was a little hesitant to get the pizza. However, I got the pepperoni pizza and my wife...More
Stayed in the West End and we were really hungry and decided on pizza. As growing up in the US northeast and been to Italy several times I was a little hesitant to get the pizza. However, I got the pepperoni pizza and my wife...More
Got the spicy housemade sausage pizza and Rigatoni Boscaiola to go and it was amazing! Got the rigatoni gluten free and it was so good, definitely can't wait to try this again for dine in!
Got the spicy housemade sausage pizza and Rigatoni Boscaiola to go and it was amazing! Got the rigatoni gluten free and it was so good, definitely can't wait to try this again for dine in!
I ate here recently and found the food to be very good. The pasta dish we had was fresh and very tasty. If you are visiting Vancouver I would recommend that you give this place a try.
I ate here recently and found the food to be very good. The pasta dish we had was fresh and very tasty. If you are visiting Vancouver I would recommend that you give this place a try.
Nice italian restaurant Very good pizzas People very king Often full and i think it is not possible to reserve a table
Nice italian restaurant Very good pizzas People very king Often full and i think it is not possible to reserve a table
Great little local Italian eatery. You know somewhere is good when locals are lining up to get in. Our family had pizza and pastas all of which was really good along with friendly attentive service.
Great little local Italian eatery. You know somewhere is good when locals are lining up to get in. Our family had pizza and pastas all of which was really good along with friendly attentive service.
The pizza crust blisters are not as scorched as 2nd Ave location, the salad dressing is much more acidic and staff did not know the beer they are serving! C'mon folks, this does not have to be hard! Just take some instruction from the other...More
The pizza crust blisters are not as scorched as 2nd Ave location, the salad dressing is much more acidic and staff did not know the beer they are serving! C'mon folks, this does not have to be hard! Just take some instruction from the other...More
Nook is an all time favourite for food, cozy dining and a lovely casual atmosphere. Great for gluten free options and nice cozy food that takes the chill off. It is a lovely winter spot to enjoy pizzas, pastas, salads and wine. at a reasonable...More
Nook is an all time favourite for food, cozy dining and a lovely casual atmosphere. Great for gluten free options and nice cozy food that takes the chill off. It is a lovely winter spot to enjoy pizzas, pastas, salads and wine. at a reasonable...More
All the good reviews you’ve read are true. The best service, wonderful atmosphere and delicious food (we had pizza). A truly memorable evening on our honeymoon.
All the good reviews you’ve read are true. The best service, wonderful atmosphere and delicious food (we had pizza). A truly memorable evening on our honeymoon.
Although the food was amazing and the waitress and service was excellent but our experience was ruined when i think the manager (an old lady with curly hair )started yelling at us before leaving the restaurant when one of our kids stood on the booth...More
Although the food was amazing and the waitress and service was excellent but our experience was ruined when i think the manager (an old lady with curly hair )started yelling at us before leaving the restaurant when one of our kids stood on the booth...More
Yum, The mushroom pizza hit the spot. It’s quite salty so just a warning for some people, but I loved it. Crispy, creamy cheese and all the taste!
Yum, The mushroom pizza hit the spot. It’s quite salty so just a warning for some people, but I loved it. Crispy, creamy cheese and all the taste!
My daughter and I had a wonderful meal at Nook after attending Bard on the Beach. I had the Orecchiette pasta with Italian sausage which was outstanding. My daughter chose the Gnocchi with baby meatballs, which disappeared before I could have a taste. To top...More
My daughter and I had a wonderful meal at Nook after attending Bard on the Beach. I had the Orecchiette pasta with Italian sausage which was outstanding. My daughter chose the Gnocchi with baby meatballs, which disappeared before I could have a taste. To top...More
On a beautiful early evening after a stroll on Kitsilano beach and drinks at Local…we started to get peckish. I had seen Nook on Yew Street and it looked inviting and stylish inside so thought it would be great to give it a try. Warming...More
On a beautiful early evening after a stroll on Kitsilano beach and drinks at Local…we started to get peckish. I had seen Nook on Yew Street and it looked inviting and stylish inside so thought it would be great to give it a try. Warming...More
The Nook in Kits is a fav neighboring eatery for me, serving good pizzas and pasta & more besides, where one always feels welcome. This Sunday lunch it added generosity to the mix. I have been seeking donations for my granddaughter’s noble endeavor of running...More
The Nook in Kits is a fav neighboring eatery for me, serving good pizzas and pasta & more besides, where one always feels welcome. This Sunday lunch it added generosity to the mix. I have been seeking donations for my granddaughter’s noble endeavor of running...More
I was in town for a week with a group of coworkers. We went to nook with 6 people the first night, and it was so good that we brought all 16 people back the next night. The food was unreal, staff and service was...More
I was in town for a week with a group of coworkers. We went to nook with 6 people the first night, and it was so good that we brought all 16 people back the next night. The food was unreal, staff and service was...More
The Nook in Kits, located just behind The Local, on Yew, is a good place for lunch —- that is from Wednesday through to Sunday, when it opens at 12 pm. Monday and Tuesday, it opens from 5 pm for dinners. Recently, over the Covid...More
The Nook in Kits, located just behind The Local, on Yew, is a good place for lunch —- that is from Wednesday through to Sunday, when it opens at 12 pm. Monday and Tuesday, it opens from 5 pm for dinners. Recently, over the Covid...More
The Nook in Kits, just up from the ocean drive of Cornwall, checks all the relevant boxes —- good pasta, pizza & desserts & other nibbles; great service; welcoming management; with a smaller menu but one can certainly find something that will please. It also...More
The Nook in Kits, just up from the ocean drive of Cornwall, checks all the relevant boxes —- good pasta, pizza & desserts & other nibbles; great service; welcoming management; with a smaller menu but one can certainly find something that will please. It also...More
Such a great neighbourhood spot with great food and ambiance. We sat at the bar and Wesley was so hospitable- sharing ideas and recommendations for food and beverages. It was all delicious
Such a great neighbourhood spot with great food and ambiance. We sat at the bar and Wesley was so hospitable- sharing ideas and recommendations for food and beverages. It was all delicious
Step into The Nook and one can be assured of service which is authentically connecting, and good food from its fairly small but well rendered menu. As I often do, I chose the special of the day pizza, this time with bison salami on a...More
Step into The Nook and one can be assured of service which is authentically connecting, and good food from its fairly small but well rendered menu. As I often do, I chose the special of the day pizza, this time with bison salami on a...More
We thoroughly enjoyed a family lunch for the quality of flavours, service & ambiance, even through this ongoing pandemic.
We thoroughly enjoyed a family lunch for the quality of flavours, service & ambiance, even through this ongoing pandemic.
Tonight I went to the Nook in Kits for a dinner, my first under the new regulations brought in under the new Covid regulations —- brought in at midnight 00;00 hours 23/12/2021. It was thus the first day of the fourth round of pandemic restrictions...More
Tonight I went to the Nook in Kits for a dinner, my first under the new regulations brought in under the new Covid regulations —- brought in at midnight 00;00 hours 23/12/2021. It was thus the first day of the fourth round of pandemic restrictions...More
On a night at The Nook on Yew in Kitsilano, one could almost forget we are in the midst of an awful international pandemic. Not that the Nook is not being sure to check diners’ vaccination cards, cleaning surfaces between uses and with staff wearing...More
On a night at The Nook on Yew in Kitsilano, one could almost forget we are in the midst of an awful international pandemic. Not that the Nook is not being sure to check diners’ vaccination cards, cleaning surfaces between uses and with staff wearing...More
Great trattoria style Italian food! We loved this place for classic Italian style pizzas and pastas. The meatballs were exceptional! All in all a great option in a great location. Negronis on tap! Good wine and beer list and small but well executed menu
Great trattoria style Italian food! We loved this place for classic Italian style pizzas and pastas. The meatballs were exceptional! All in all a great option in a great location. Negronis on tap! Good wine and beer list and small but well executed menu
In a time when new restrictions have cut down the options for eating restaurant-made foods, happily Nook in Kits has extended its hours significantly, now opening seven days a week. Of course, given current government regulations this is for its takeouts & patio & outside...More
In a time when new restrictions have cut down the options for eating restaurant-made foods, happily Nook in Kits has extended its hours significantly, now opening seven days a week. Of course, given current government regulations this is for its takeouts & patio & outside...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1468777-Reviews-Nook-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Notch8 Restaurant & Bar,"We had a lovely booth table, yummy food - the charcuterie and cheese plate to start and then the salmon and the trout and a really good bottle of Sancerre. We had top service from Adrian - could not have been better! Highly recommended!
Truly a treat dining at Notch 8, Canadian contemporary fare at its best right here in downtown Vancouver. We had the prime rib recently and it was divine - tender, juicy and of course with all the fixings. Our kid loved it! Kitchen staff’s attention...More
First time here with other five friends for brunch buffet and our experienced was very good. We had a reservation so we got seated right away. The place was very nice and spacious. Seats are very comfortable to seat with. Staff are very friendly and...More
Had lunch here and enjoyed the crispy skin on the salmon along with the novel pea puree. The express lunch was good value, tasty and filling. Our server, Raluca, was exceptionally warm, friendly, helpful yet efficient and professional. Will come back!
While in Vancouver recently we stopped in at Notch8 for a weekday happy hour and were suprised at how busy the place was. Excellent martinis and popcorn were served by Rolf/Bran, with Live Entertainment to enjoy. It was a trip down memory lane, as the...More
The service was very very bad!!! Brought us coffees cold with tea pot but no cup for tea, no teaspoons, forgot about our appetizer… just very very poor, not expected from Fairmont hotel!! Also, just noticed many other bad reviews and even after giving it...More
Amazing Drinks and Food. Chicken wings and Carpaccio were Devine. Every drink we had was top notch. If you like cocktails and martini's this is a great place for them. There is also live entertainment.
I went for the Cherry Blossomed Tea High Tea. We entered a magical room nestled in the back of the restaurant. It was decorated with cherry blossoms. It looked like something out of Alice in Wonderland. Our waitress was friendly and funny. As we have...More
I should preface this review with a comment about the weather and situation in Vancouver between Dec 21-25. The weather was unusually very cold and the streets covered in snow. Airlines cancelled hundreds of flights across North America leaving some passengers stranded and hotels bursting...More
Recently I have been at Nothc8 for brunch buffet. The food was delicious and fresh and the service was excellent. Adrian our server was very attentive, professional and friendly. The atmosphere of the the place is very nice and welcoming. I will return to try...More
Our flight arrived early so we left our bags with the front desk staff and went out for a walk and lunch. Shortly after we left the hotel, we got a text message saying our room was ready. When we walked in, the room was...More
The bagel and lox were delicious, but the price was quite steep. Service was a little slow. I guess it is OK if you are staying in the hotel, but not worth a destination otherwise.
We three stopped in for lunch while waiting for our room so we could check in at the Fairmont. It was 1:45pm and they still had their plentiful brunch out until 2 only so we opted to just have their limited lounge menu. Boy was...More
Located in the Fairmont Vancouver Hotel, this is an elegant place to take high tea. The current theme is Griffin's Gambit and our tea room was outfitted like a chessboard with chess pieces and chess boards literally everywhere. It made us think of Alice in...More
Poor options, missed requests. Food was good but not many options and nothing much for vegetarians. Expected better from this restaurant.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8114031-Reviews-Notch8_Restaurant_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nourish Cooking School,"A lovely, afternoon, private party for a girlfriend's 60th Birthday! Dan and Anisha were very accommodating with specific requests we had. Parking and location were easy to find and convenient. The ambiance and decor is perfectly charming, elegant and comfortable. We had a small group...More
Nourish is such a beautiful space! We participated in a wonderful cooking class as a networking activity for a bunch of travel professionals. The class was super fun, interactive, and some pretty incredible food was produced (and eaten)! We had a fabulous night in great...More
Hi Keri, Thanks you for taking the time to write this review. We are so happy you enjoyed your experience! Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
What an amazing way to spend the evening. The chefs here are very knowledgeable and made the class really enjoyable. I was laughing all night! The food we made was absolutely delicious and easy. We started with bruschetta 2 ways. Then we made pizza bianca...More
Hi Travel A, Thank you for your review. We are so glad you enjoyed it! Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
We hosted a 40th birthday party at Nourish and I would unhesitatingly recommend this beautiful space to anyone! Dan (the owner) was so easy to work with via email and so lovely when we spoke on the phone. His on-site staff were helpful and gracious,...More
Hi Kalyan, Thanks so much for choosing us for your special event and we are so glad you had a great time. Thanks fo taking the time to write this review and we hope to see you again! Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
My husband and I were gifted a cooking class by our kids. What a great idea! We don't need any more stuff. It was a great experience. I am a seasoned home cook but learned some helpful tips. Lovely environment and Dan (and staff) where...More
Hi Marg, It was great meeting you both. Thanks so much for the review! Hopefully we will see you again. Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
Had a fun and entertaining afternoon team building cooking class. The place is super nice and very inviting. The cooking class area is open view so made it more fun. Dan, the owner, was wonderful. Time went by really fast and we came out fully...More
Hi Pamela, Thank you so much for the amazing review! We are very glad you had a good time. Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
My wife and I took the Italian cooking class with owner Dan. The recipes were delicious and simple enough for us to do at home. He taught a lot about cooking techniques including knife skills and general kitchen pearls from his wealth of experience. It...More
Hi Dean! Thank you for coming in and writing this review. Looking forward to seeing you in here again. Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
My daugher had her 11th birthday party at Nourish recently. We signed up for the Hand-Painted Macarons cooking class party. The party was a great success with the help of the Nourish team. All the little guests were able to participate in making the macaron...More
Hi LInda, Thank you so much for booking this special event with us. I'm glad you all enjoyed it. Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
Recently visited with a group of 12 taking part in a Contemporary Chinese cooking class - had a lot of fun and learned a few things along the way. Dan was a very humorous and engaging teacher, and his staff were great also. The space...More
Hi SockBeek, Thanks for taking the time to write this review. We are so glad you enjoyed your class. Best regards, Dan & the Nourish Team
I arranged a group event at Nourish Cooking School for November 24th for 26 guests. All communication leading up to the event with Dan Cheung was responded to quickly and clearly. We all had an incredible time! We had four hand picked cooking stations with...More
Hi PoppyStone, Thank you so much for the wonderful review. We really appreciate you taking the time to let everyone know about your experience with us. Hoping to see you soon! Best regards, Dan
Not much of a vegetarian or vegan eater but was impressed with the bowl I had...super flavour packed! Latte was perfect. Can't say enough about how beautiful the space is. Definitely coming back!
Thank you for the review! Glad you enjoyed it.
Started with the Red Lentil Soup which was hearty and flavorful. Next was the Bangkok Noodle Salad - ingredients were so fresh and tasty! Capped things off with a Cappuccino to enjoy in the great open space. Love how Dan and team insist on using...More
Thanks for taking the time to review us Albert! Hope to see you back in the space again soon.
Nourish is located in the space formerly occupied by the Simply French Cafe. The fare is organic food. To be honest we were not impressed, considering that Aphrodite’s Organic Delights restaurant is not far away and has a far more interesting range of items. The...More
Thanks for your feedback. We will continue to strive to get better.",25,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12550600-Reviews-Nourish_Cooking_School-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Novo Pizzeria & Wine Bar,"The food is excellent, and the service is outstanding. Sitting at a table outside in the afternoon while having a glass of wine an pizza is the best!highly recommend it.
It's all the little things in a restaurant, and of course, the food. Table was not ready, service was slow, and, for example, after cutlery was used for saucy appetizers or salads, we were told to use them again for our mains. Well, maybe in...More
Since we begin going to Novo a few years ago we've gotten to know the chef, Randy quite well. He most often drops by for a visit and a chat...and that's always welcome. Chef Randy is a fresh pasta wizzard! There are very, very few...More
Went out for a family meal on a Sunday evening and really enjoyed what we choose to eat. Good service. We ate inside so not certain what the outside area is like.
I was craving Neapolitan pizza and the reviews online led me here. It did not disappoint. It has a heated, covered patio for those who aren't comfortable being inside unmasked. I had that all to myself, as well as my very own heater. The staff...More
We had a great dining experience here at Novo. The service was friendly and the food was great. Definitely would recommend checking this out if you're in the mood for some good Italian food. The pasta and meatballs were amazing.
As we edge into the festive holidays, and work may let off a bit, it is the perfect time to take advantage of places which have quality happy hours. Nova Pizza is just such a place. Not far from the Burrard street bridge, just up...More
The food and service was very good. The food was large portions and came piping hot, just the way you want and don't always get at some restaurants. They have a nice patio that because of the weather was unavailable. Wouldn't hesitate coming back here...More
We had reservations for dinner at Novo last evening. It was a nice summers evening and we had a table on the patio. They have a great patio. We brought our own bottle of wine as we enjoy wine with dinner and having checked Novo’s...More
With indoor dining currently banned due to the pandemic, restaurants can only offer patio service or takeout, so we walked across Burrard Street Bridge to see if Novo had space on the patio. I’ve been here twice before, I’m on their mailing list, I follow...More
If one likes Neapolitan-style pizza, imaginative dessert offerings, intriguing combinations in salads, and a good wine list, as I do, then you will like Novo Pizzeria &Wine Bar on Burrard, close to the Arbutus Greenway. It is open through the week, from 12 pm until...More
Fantastic pizza, pasta and service. New favourite spot! We usually have our favourite on the drive but this was even better than our usual. Can’t wait to try something different from the menu next time. 👍
This is one of the best Italian restaurants in Vancouver. They have amazing pizza and pasta. The service is incredible.
My fiancé and I were gifted a 5-course Groupon to Novo to celebrate our engagement. We were a bit nervous about dining-in during COVID-19, but our experience at Novo was phenomenal. We went for an early dinner, and were seated on their lovely patio that's...More
I have always liked the various incarnations of restaurants next to Fifth Ave Cinema but Nova Pizzeria & Wine Bar is the best so far. Customers are warmly welcomed, the pizza is among the best in the city, the service is attentive but never fussy...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2490288-Reviews-Novo_Pizzeria_Wine_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nuba,"Hostess was curt, borderline rude. Vegetarian mezze sampler was overpriced as you must order it for 2 people (about $40) with Mjadra disappointing while the potatoes were tasty, falafel was good. Humus was also underwhelming (watery) with pita that appeared to not be made fresh...More
Hostess was curt, borderline rude. Vegetarian mezze sampler was overpriced as you must order it for 2 people (about $40) with Mjadra disappointing while the potatoes were tasty, falafel was good. Humus was also underwhelming (watery) with pita that appeared to not be made fresh...More
Hostess was curt, borderline rude. Vegetarian mezze sampler was overpriced as you must order it for 2 people (about $40) with Mjadra disappointing while the potatoes were tasty, falafel was good. Humus was also underwhelming (watery) with pita that appeared to not be made fresh...More
Main course was very good, as always. However, Fatoosh salad is a huge disappointment. No flavour, a couple of tomatoes and radishes, and mixed greens. I would definitely not recommend this salad.
Main course was very good, as always. However, Fatoosh salad is a huge disappointment. No flavour, a couple of tomatoes and radishes, and mixed greens. I would definitely not recommend this salad.
Main course was very good, as always. However, Fatoosh salad is a huge disappointment. No flavour, a couple of tomatoes and radishes, and mixed greens. I would definitely not recommend this salad.
Great spot and delicious food! The hummus is super good and the pita is warm and fresh :). The location is near Gastown so there’s lots to see around!
Great spot and delicious food! The hummus is super good and the pita is warm and fresh :). The location is near Gastown so there’s lots to see around!
Great spot and delicious food! The hummus is super good and the pita is warm and fresh :). The location is near Gastown so there’s lots to see around!
Left Nubo feeling a little disappointed. We enjoyed some components of the meal, but on the whole it was lacking in quality. We all shared a mixture of their platters and main courses. Here is a summary of the pros and cons from the meal:...More
Left Nubo feeling a little disappointed. We enjoyed some components of the meal, but on the whole it was lacking in quality. We all shared a mixture of their platters and main courses. Here is a summary of the pros and cons from the meal:...More
Left Nubo feeling a little disappointed. We enjoyed some components of the meal, but on the whole it was lacking in quality. We all shared a mixture of their platters and main courses. Here is a summary of the pros and cons from the meal:...More
We loved this unprepossing place. Our meal was most enjoyable . The food was fresh and the flavours were vibrant!
We loved this unprepossing place. Our meal was most enjoyable . The food was fresh and the flavours were vibrant!
We loved this unprepossing place. Our meal was most enjoyable . The food was fresh and the flavours were vibrant!
Food was excllent plus. Servive was impecible, friendly and veryhelpful. Not a 5* as the en ironment was a bit rustic for me.
Food was excllent plus. Servive was impecible, friendly and veryhelpful. Not a 5* as the en ironment was a bit rustic for me.
Food was excllent plus. Servive was impecible, friendly and veryhelpful. Not a 5* as the en ironment was a bit rustic for me.
Went here for dinner with friends and really enjoyed the food. One of my friends was vegan and we had no problem ordering an array of dishes that everyone enjoyed. The only negative was that it was a warm evening and the restaurant does not...More
Went here for dinner with friends and really enjoyed the food. One of my friends was vegan and we had no problem ordering an array of dishes that everyone enjoyed. The only negative was that it was a warm evening and the restaurant does not...More
Went here for dinner with friends and really enjoyed the food. One of my friends was vegan and we had no problem ordering an array of dishes that everyone enjoyed. The only negative was that it was a warm evening and the restaurant does not...More
Food was great. Service was poor. First, seating arrangement was poor (less than desired). They deceived us by making us order flatbread (and pay for it) even though free pita was available for everyone. When we asked if bread came with meals, we were told...More
Food was great. Service was poor. First, seating arrangement was poor (less than desired). They deceived us by making us order flatbread (and pay for it) even though free pita was available for everyone. When we asked if bread came with meals, we were told...More
Food was great. Service was poor. First, seating arrangement was poor (less than desired). They deceived us by making us order flatbread (and pay for it) even though free pita was available for everyone. When we asked if bread came with meals, we were told...More
Everything we tried was fabulous, for both vegetarians and carnivores. Of particular mention was the green juice, the hummus and the flatbread. Staff was extremely nice and accommodating. An added plus was the delicious cucumber water they served! Only complaint was that it was a...More
Everything we tried was fabulous, for both vegetarians and carnivores. Of particular mention was the green juice, the hummus and the flatbread. Staff was extremely nice and accommodating. An added plus was the delicious cucumber water they served! Only complaint was that it was a...More
Everything we tried was fabulous, for both vegetarians and carnivores. Of particular mention was the green juice, the hummus and the flatbread. Staff was extremely nice and accommodating. An added plus was the delicious cucumber water they served! Only complaint was that it was a...More
Excellent food. Great flavours & good portions. We had the veggie feast for 2 which was so good. Not cheap but well worth it.
Excellent food. Great flavours & good portions. We had the veggie feast for 2 which was so good. Not cheap but well worth it.
Excellent food. Great flavours & good portions. We had the veggie feast for 2 which was so good. Not cheap but well worth it.
Went to Nuba for lunch today. Staff was friendly and food was flavourful. Presentation was also great. I have been to lot of Lebanese places but find their sauces and salad flavour worlds apart from other place. Simply awesome!
Went to Nuba for lunch today. Staff was friendly and food was flavourful. Presentation was also great. I have been to lot of Lebanese places but find their sauces and salad flavour worlds apart from other place. Simply awesome!
Went to Nuba for lunch today. Staff was friendly and food was flavourful. Presentation was also great. I have been to lot of Lebanese places but find their sauces and salad flavour worlds apart from other place. Simply awesome!
Very nicely prepared food in a pleasantly casual atmosphere. We had the 2-course meat sampler, which was delicious, and just the right amount of food for two.
Very nicely prepared food in a pleasantly casual atmosphere. We had the 2-course meat sampler, which was delicious, and just the right amount of food for two.
Very nicely prepared food in a pleasantly casual atmosphere. We had the 2-course meat sampler, which was delicious, and just the right amount of food for two.
Wanting something other than burgers or pasta we decided to try something different. First up...the stairs. If you have any mobility issues there is a series of stairs leading down into the restaurant from the street. I'd say 15-20. Sadly, this restaurant is not accessible...More
Wanting something other than burgers or pasta we decided to try something different. First up...the stairs. If you have any mobility issues there is a series of stairs leading down into the restaurant from the street. I'd say 15-20. Sadly, this restaurant is not accessible...More
Wanting something other than burgers or pasta we decided to try something different. First up...the stairs. If you have any mobility issues there is a series of stairs leading down into the restaurant from the street. I'd say 15-20. Sadly, this restaurant is not accessible...More
It took 15 minutes to get a glass of water. My appetizer took almost 30 minutes after they forgot the avocado that's included and thought it was the main course rather than the appetizer. I've always loved this place, but the staff need training on...More
It took 15 minutes to get a glass of water. My appetizer took almost 30 minutes after they forgot the avocado that's included and thought it was the main course rather than the appetizer. I've always loved this place, but the staff need training on...More
It took 15 minutes to get a glass of water. My appetizer took almost 30 minutes after they forgot the avocado that's included and thought it was the main course rather than the appetizer. I've always loved this place, but the staff need training on...More
The food was absolutely amazing, the service was excellent and the feel of the place is fun. You need to go down steps to get into it as it is partially underground. Lots of GF, vegetarian and vegan option. We had Le Feast for 2...More
The food was absolutely amazing, the service was excellent and the feel of the place is fun. You need to go down steps to get into it as it is partially underground. Lots of GF, vegetarian and vegan option. We had Le Feast for 2...More
The food was absolutely amazing, the service was excellent and the feel of the place is fun. You need to go down steps to get into it as it is partially underground. Lots of GF, vegetarian and vegan option. We had Le Feast for 2...More
Loved it, will come again! Amazing vegan selection, excellent and friendly service and an awesome sangria. Cozy little place, just perfect.
Loved it, will come again! Amazing vegan selection, excellent and friendly service and an awesome sangria. Cozy little place, just perfect.
Loved it, will come again! Amazing vegan selection, excellent and friendly service and an awesome sangria. Cozy little place, just perfect.
I have been to Nuba three times now, twice in Yaletown and once in Gastown. I think the food is mediocre and not really worth value for money. Saying that they serve a deconstructed kibbeh which is quite interesting and tasty but again not worth...More
I have been to Nuba three times now, twice in Yaletown and once in Gastown. I think the food is mediocre and not really worth value for money. Saying that they serve a deconstructed kibbeh which is quite interesting and tasty but again not worth...More
I have been to Nuba three times now, twice in Yaletown and once in Gastown. I think the food is mediocre and not really worth value for money. Saying that they serve a deconstructed kibbeh which is quite interesting and tasty but again not worth...More
Wonderful, delicious Lebanese fare. We ordered Le Grand Feast, a two course meal that was delicious and ample for the four of us. Lots of flavour and variety. Definitely a place to return to.
Wonderful, delicious Lebanese fare. We ordered Le Grand Feast, a two course meal that was delicious and ample for the four of us. Lots of flavour and variety. Definitely a place to return to.
Wonderful, delicious Lebanese fare. We ordered Le Grand Feast, a two course meal that was delicious and ample for the four of us. Lots of flavour and variety. Definitely a place to return to.
We called in for an evening meal and were really impressed with the food and service. We ordered 4 chicken shish kebabs, rice and flatbread. The food was delicious and freshly cooked. Our waited, Sean, was polite, attentive and a really good host. He recommended...More
We called in for an evening meal and were really impressed with the food and service. We ordered 4 chicken shish kebabs, rice and flatbread. The food was delicious and freshly cooked. Our waited, Sean, was polite, attentive and a really good host. He recommended...More
We called in for an evening meal and were really impressed with the food and service. We ordered 4 chicken shish kebabs, rice and flatbread. The food was delicious and freshly cooked. Our waited, Sean, was polite, attentive and a really good host. He recommended...More
This restaurant came highly recommended and I was looking forward to it. Unfortunately, the menu is not structured to encourage solo diners. When I'm eating Lebanese food, which I love, one of the best parts is putting together a meal with many parts. I don't...More
This restaurant came highly recommended and I was looking forward to it. Unfortunately, the menu is not structured to encourage solo diners. When I'm eating Lebanese food, which I love, one of the best parts is putting together a meal with many parts. I don't...More
This restaurant came highly recommended and I was looking forward to it. Unfortunately, the menu is not structured to encourage solo diners. When I'm eating Lebanese food, which I love, one of the best parts is putting together a meal with many parts. I don't...More
Friendly, well appointed eatery. Ordered home made ginger beer, (awesome), bison and falafel plates. The servings were plentiful, colorful and balance was spot on. First meal visiting Vancouver, not disappointed.
Friendly, well appointed eatery. Ordered home made ginger beer, (awesome), bison and falafel plates. The servings were plentiful, colorful and balance was spot on. First meal visiting Vancouver, not disappointed.
Friendly, well appointed eatery. Ordered home made ginger beer, (awesome), bison and falafel plates. The servings were plentiful, colorful and balance was spot on. First meal visiting Vancouver, not disappointed.
Found this restaurant when searching for GF options on our first night in Vancouver. It didn't disappoint - great service and excellent food. This was our first time tasting this cuisine and we will be searching out a local restaurant when we get home. We...More
Found this restaurant when searching for GF options on our first night in Vancouver. It didn't disappoint - great service and excellent food. This was our first time tasting this cuisine and we will be searching out a local restaurant when we get home. We...More
Found this restaurant when searching for GF options on our first night in Vancouver. It didn't disappoint - great service and excellent food. This was our first time tasting this cuisine and we will be searching out a local restaurant when we get home. We...More
Excellent food and atmosphere. This is our second time enjoying this lovely restaurant and we will be back again. Delicious dinner options! And always fabulous service.
Excellent food and atmosphere. This is our second time enjoying this lovely restaurant and we will be back again. Delicious dinner options! And always fabulous service.
Excellent food and atmosphere. This is our second time enjoying this lovely restaurant and we will be back again. Delicious dinner options! And always fabulous service.
The food was excellent. Lamb chops, chicken, humus and salad. Not expensive either. A quaint place with 20-odd seats and very friendly staff who bet over backwards to make our night right. What more can I say that we will definitely be back again soon....More
The food was excellent. Lamb chops, chicken, humus and salad. Not expensive either. A quaint place with 20-odd seats and very friendly staff who bet over backwards to make our night right. What more can I say that we will definitely be back again soon....More
The food was excellent. Lamb chops, chicken, humus and salad. Not expensive either. A quaint place with 20-odd seats and very friendly staff who bet over backwards to make our night right. What more can I say that we will definitely be back again soon....More
Great food, very tasty and good sized portions. We sat on their small patio facing Davie to enjoy lunch: Lamb meatball, lamb spices lunch platter and watermelon and feta salad. Two of us left so full and content.
Great food, very tasty and good sized portions. We sat on their small patio facing Davie to enjoy lunch: Lamb meatball, lamb spices lunch platter and watermelon and feta salad. Two of us left so full and content.
Great food, very tasty and good sized portions. We sat on their small patio facing Davie to enjoy lunch: Lamb meatball, lamb spices lunch platter and watermelon and feta salad. Two of us left so full and content.
Amazing food and great staff. Definitely will be back again! Nuba never disappoints. The hummus is amazing and the lamb is great. Definitely recommend it.
Amazing food and great staff. Definitely will be back again! Nuba never disappoints. The hummus is amazing and the lamb is great. Definitely recommend it.
Amazing food and great staff. Definitely will be back again! Nuba never disappoints. The hummus is amazing and the lamb is great. Definitely recommend it.
Lovely restaurant . Honestly we went there looking for the lamb kibbeh, but unfortunately removed from menu. No matter the new menu has variety and we had a good time with the profesional and courteous service offered by Luca, great customer service skills and very...More
Lovely restaurant . Honestly we went there looking for the lamb kibbeh, but unfortunately removed from menu. No matter the new menu has variety and we had a good time with the profesional and courteous service offered by Luca, great customer service skills and very...More
Lovely restaurant . Honestly we went there looking for the lamb kibbeh, but unfortunately removed from menu. No matter the new menu has variety and we had a good time with the profesional and courteous service offered by Luca, great customer service skills and very...More
We arrived here JUST before it closed and were greeted by a friendly welcome in what was a very busy restaurant with a nice vibe. As the kitchen was closing up, we had to rush to decide what to order, and they had sold out...More
We arrived here JUST before it closed and were greeted by a friendly welcome in what was a very busy restaurant with a nice vibe. As the kitchen was closing up, we had to rush to decide what to order, and they had sold out...More
We arrived here JUST before it closed and were greeted by a friendly welcome in what was a very busy restaurant with a nice vibe. As the kitchen was closing up, we had to rush to decide what to order, and they had sold out...More
Excellent food and service. Good clean restaurant, staff very friendly. Originally found on trip advisor.
Excellent food and service. Good clean restaurant, staff very friendly. Originally found on trip advisor.
Excellent food and service. Good clean restaurant, staff very friendly. Originally found on trip advisor.
lively atmosphere.. lots of choices for vegetarians..variety of humus..fresh n light..tasty mains..soups are quite tasty & filling..dinner time better to book in advance..
lively atmosphere.. lots of choices for vegetarians..variety of humus..fresh n light..tasty mains..soups are quite tasty & filling..dinner time better to book in advance..
lively atmosphere.. lots of choices for vegetarians..variety of humus..fresh n light..tasty mains..soups are quite tasty & filling..dinner time better to book in advance..
Great takeout and tasty food. My wife and I had the falafel plate and the Najib's special plate with hummus, salad, pickled veggies, rice, potatoes and pita. We split the cauliflower and felaffel.
Great takeout and tasty food. My wife and I had the falafel plate and the Najib's special plate with hummus, salad, pickled veggies, rice, potatoes and pita. We split the cauliflower and felaffel.
Great takeout and tasty food. My wife and I had the falafel plate and the Najib's special plate with hummus, salad, pickled veggies, rice, potatoes and pita. We split the cauliflower and felaffel.
We've ordered from Nuba many times over the past few years. Food is generally good. Today, my wife ordered on-line for delivery for a birthday luncheon at 12:30. She paid on-line and got an email confirming the order. Food never arrived and after phoning a...More
We've ordered from Nuba many times over the past few years. Food is generally good. Today, my wife ordered on-line for delivery for a birthday luncheon at 12:30. She paid on-line and got an email confirming the order. Food never arrived and after phoning a...More
We've ordered from Nuba many times over the past few years. Food is generally good. Today, my wife ordered on-line for delivery for a birthday luncheon at 12:30. She paid on-line and got an email confirming the order. Food never arrived and after phoning a...More
Fantastic flavors. We had the chicken and the bison skewers. Added a dish of potatoes and a side salad. Fabulous meal!! Appreciated the GF options.
Fantastic flavors. We had the chicken and the bison skewers. Added a dish of potatoes and a side salad. Fabulous meal!! Appreciated the GF options.
Fantastic flavors. We had the chicken and the bison skewers. Added a dish of potatoes and a side salad. Fabulous meal!! Appreciated the GF options.
Met up with some coworkers for lunch. We arrived right at open at 12 noon. After our vaccine passport check we we’re seated and given our menus. Looked there was only one person working the front so it took awhile for our order to be...More
Met up with some coworkers for lunch. We arrived right at open at 12 noon. After our vaccine passport check we we’re seated and given our menus. Looked there was only one person working the front so it took awhile for our order to be...More
Met up with some coworkers for lunch. We arrived right at open at 12 noon. After our vaccine passport check we we’re seated and given our menus. Looked there was only one person working the front so it took awhile for our order to be...More
Spent extensive time in Lebanon...Beirut, Beqaa Valley, Byblos...this pales in comparison. Got a bunch of stuff for takeout one night, hardly any meat on the plate, hummus is super bland, weird green sauce that tasted off, meager salads, falafel dry as the desert, pita that...More
Spent extensive time in Lebanon...Beirut, Beqaa Valley, Byblos...this pales in comparison. Got a bunch of stuff for takeout one night, hardly any meat on the plate, hummus is super bland, weird green sauce that tasted off, meager salads, falafel dry as the desert, pita that...More
Spent extensive time in Lebanon...Beirut, Beqaa Valley, Byblos...this pales in comparison. Got a bunch of stuff for takeout one night, hardly any meat on the plate, hummus is super bland, weird green sauce that tasted off, meager salads, falafel dry as the desert, pita that...More
Enjoyed the seleciton of vegatarian dishes. The staff were wonderful. The only thing I found a problem was the lighting out doors, I could not see my food as the night grew to darkness. I would say an excellent place to eat.
Enjoyed the seleciton of vegatarian dishes. The staff were wonderful. The only thing I found a problem was the lighting out doors, I could not see my food as the night grew to darkness. I would say an excellent place to eat.
Enjoyed the seleciton of vegatarian dishes. The staff were wonderful. The only thing I found a problem was the lighting out doors, I could not see my food as the night grew to darkness. I would say an excellent place to eat.
As this restaurant chain was new to some in our party of four, our table had Le Grand feast, vegan stew and a couple of other mezzes. The food is fresh and a nice mix for sharing. Lots of street parking available. Good service. Nice,...More
As this restaurant chain was new to some in our party of four, our table had Le Grand feast, vegan stew and a couple of other mezzes. The food is fresh and a nice mix for sharing. Lots of street parking available. Good service. Nice,...More
As this restaurant chain was new to some in our party of four, our table had Le Grand feast, vegan stew and a couple of other mezzes. The food is fresh and a nice mix for sharing. Lots of street parking available. Good service. Nice,...More
Loved the food, great service, sadly this location does not have good cocktails. The Gas Town location is a much better option. I would not return to this location.
Loved the food, great service, sadly this location does not have good cocktails. The Gas Town location is a much better option. I would not return to this location.
Loved the food, great service, sadly this location does not have good cocktails. The Gas Town location is a much better option. I would not return to this location.
This restaurant really serves amazing food. the menu is really broad and has a wide variety of very fresh and TASTY food. the menu has lots of vegetarian options. There are a few locations in Vancouver, really worth a visit if you like Middle Eastern...More
This restaurant really serves amazing food. the menu is really broad and has a wide variety of very fresh and TASTY food. the menu has lots of vegetarian options. There are a few locations in Vancouver, really worth a visit if you like Middle Eastern...More
This restaurant really serves amazing food. the menu is really broad and has a wide variety of very fresh and TASTY food. the menu has lots of vegetarian options. There are a few locations in Vancouver, really worth a visit if you like Middle Eastern...More
This restaurant does not trust understand Lebanese food. I used to live in Lebanon. I have had better at Falafel joints on Davies. This is a McDonald's equivalent of Lebanese food. Very bland and weak and the tabbouleh is just sad, no flavour, where is...More
This restaurant does not trust understand Lebanese food. I used to live in Lebanon. I have had better at Falafel joints on Davies. This is a McDonald's equivalent of Lebanese food. Very bland and weak and the tabbouleh is just sad, no flavour, where is...More
This restaurant does not trust understand Lebanese food. I used to live in Lebanon. I have had better at Falafel joints on Davies. This is a McDonald's equivalent of Lebanese food. Very bland and weak and the tabbouleh is just sad, no flavour, where is...More
Nuba is a ""local Chain"" [i.e. they have several restaurants located in Vancouver & Victoria. The menus vary somewhat between the restaurants-- but all are ""vegetarian friendly"". This restaurant's decor is modelled after the 1970's cafe. The food is both varied and interesting... and the...More
Nuba is a ""local Chain"" [i.e. they have several restaurants located in Vancouver & Victoria. The menus vary somewhat between the restaurants-- but all are ""vegetarian friendly"". This restaurant's decor is modelled after the 1970's cafe. The food is both varied and interesting... and the...More
Nuba is a ""local Chain"" [i.e. they have several restaurants located in Vancouver & Victoria. The menus vary somewhat between the restaurants-- but all are ""vegetarian friendly"". This restaurant's decor is modelled after the 1970's cafe. The food is both varied and interesting... and the...More
The place was packed for lunch, I felt lucky to nab a counter sit. I went with their signature cauliflower dish which indeed was excellent, together with local beer. I totally get the popularity of the place... It is Lebanese in the sense that the...More
The place was packed for lunch, I felt lucky to nab a counter sit. I went with their signature cauliflower dish which indeed was excellent, together with local beer. I totally get the popularity of the place... It is Lebanese in the sense that the...More
The place was packed for lunch, I felt lucky to nab a counter sit. I went with their signature cauliflower dish which indeed was excellent, together with local beer. I totally get the popularity of the place... It is Lebanese in the sense that the...More
We went in for lunch. My wife ordered the Najib's Special Plate and I ordered the Lamb Kibbeh Plate. What a super value with salad, hot veggies, hummus, and the main portion. Cauliflower my wife and I had the Lamb Kibbeh. Yummy, tasty and just...More
We went in for lunch. My wife ordered the Najib's Special Plate and I ordered the Lamb Kibbeh Plate. What a super value with salad, hot veggies, hummus, and the main portion. Cauliflower my wife and I had the Lamb Kibbeh. Yummy, tasty and just...More
We went in for lunch. My wife ordered the Najib's Special Plate and I ordered the Lamb Kibbeh Plate. What a super value with salad, hot veggies, hummus, and the main portion. Cauliflower my wife and I had the Lamb Kibbeh. Yummy, tasty and just...More
Great Lebanese food. I had the vegan stew which was excellent. My partner had the flatbread, also great. Others shared a few dishes including a wonderful crispy cauliflower. Sparsely decorated but was clean and good when we were there.
Great Lebanese food. I had the vegan stew which was excellent. My partner had the flatbread, also great. Others shared a few dishes including a wonderful crispy cauliflower. Sparsely decorated but was clean and good when we were there.
Great Lebanese food. I had the vegan stew which was excellent. My partner had the flatbread, also great. Others shared a few dishes including a wonderful crispy cauliflower. Sparsely decorated but was clean and good when we were there.
Went to lunch with a bunch of friends and truly enjoyed the beautifully prepared, fresh food. So many vegetarian and vegan options, it will please everyone in your party. The fresh juices are wonderful as well.
Went to lunch with a bunch of friends and truly enjoyed the beautifully prepared, fresh food. So many vegetarian and vegan options, it will please everyone in your party. The fresh juices are wonderful as well.
Went to lunch with a bunch of friends and truly enjoyed the beautifully prepared, fresh food. So many vegetarian and vegan options, it will please everyone in your party. The fresh juices are wonderful as well.",135,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2301939-Reviews-Nuba-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Nuba in Kitsilano,"Nuba is my favourite restaurant in Vancouver. Period. This visit we had the cold mezze plate. All the flavours are amazing, while being fresh and healthy. I’m particularly in love with Nuba’s baba ganoush. The ginger beer is delicious too. This was my first time...More
The manti (mushroom dumplings) cost me $20.95 plus tax and tip (27$). There were 11 pieces about the size of quarters. They tasted like dough; I could not taste any flavouring from the filling. They did not cover the bottom of the small take out...More
We were a group on a Saturday night and the service and accommodation of guest special needs was excellent. We had a lovely dinner and the staff were amazing.
We had a big party booked in a private room on the 2nd floor and the staff were very accommodating and attentive. The food was delicious and had plenty of variety and very suitable for vegetarians also. Would definitely recommend for either a dinner for...More
An amazing time was had at Nuba in Kits, Ciara, and all of the staff at the restaurant assisted in setting up an engagement party for our friends. Food was perfect, varied, and suited all who attended, vegetarians and omnivores all left with full happy...More
I would highly recommend Nuba for any type of occasion. They were able to accommodate a group of 20 of us with ease and created an amazing atmosphere. The food was absolutely outstanding and all the staff were so friendly and really done their utmost...More
Was not a great experience. They seated us in the back in a separate room knowing thy were having a party or 30 coming to that room. The party arrived and stood all around us standing up for 30 minutes - right over us! People...More
Really nice staff, fun atmosphere, good food. Definitely will return. Mezzes were all great as was the sablefish. Try a few mezzes....
Highly recommend this location ! Excellent menu and service! Top floor seating is very cozy, and waiters there are amazing (especially Sasha!). Great knowledge of wines and all dishes! Very friendly and accommodating! A true 5-star place!
Our second visit to this restaurant. Very good food and ambiance. Initially we were greeted by a waiter who seated us downstairs in a dark corner next to the cutlery stand. When we asked to be seated upstairs, where we sat previously a few weeks...More
Very good food service was a bit slow but ok I was not in a rush. My food was really good and tasty. Will come back!!!
Had an amazing time here at Nuba. The food is incredible and the staff are so nice. I definitely recommend coming here and trying this place out! We will definitely be back soon. Everything we ordered was amazing.
What a crowded, noisy restaurant! We could barely hear each other across the table and I needed to point to my menu selections as the waiter couldn’t hear me. Despite the noise and craziness, our food was delivered after a reasonable wait. The pita and...More
Thanks to our Covid-19 self isolation, dinners we’re getting downright tiresome. So we gambled on takeout. Nuba was a welcome change in meals. Food was excellent, servings generous, food hot. We’ll go this route again...and try others in the neighbourhood for some variety. Stay safe...More
I have eaten in every country around the Mediterranean. I have never had a meal this poorly prepared, presented and this valueless. Itvwas supposed to be Lebanese or Mediterranean food. The floor appeared well trodden or messy. Server brought most in the party a menu....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3876881-Reviews-Nuba_in_Kitsilano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Number E Food,"Terrific sandwiches and options. My wife had the Grilled cheese of the day and I had the Meat loaf. Very fresh ingredients. Both on homemade bread and rolls. Very good pastries and a in house pastry chef.
Fresh ingredients and freshly baked. Can't get any better. Awesome Reuben sandwich 🥪 😋 with smoked meat.
I googled for the best reuben in Vancouver and wasn't disappointed. Do yourself a favour it's worth the visit
A great spot, bar none. Fresh sandwiches with fantastic ingredients. There is a limited selection on deck, but what they do have is a special combination of flavours that make for some sumptuous meals. Top them off with some superior soda selections; they’re here too....More
Amazing mom and pop type of a shop. Best sandwich in town! They bake their own bread! A must to visit!
This might just be the best sandwich joint in all of Vancouver. The two gents behind the counter are constantly working at prepping and preparing food. Its a joy to watch. I can't think of a time I've say and enjoyed a soup and sandwich...More
I came here with my family while on a trip to Vancouver. Restaurant is very small and there is not a lot of sitting area- a better idea would be to take it to go! I had the roasted vegetable sandwich and it was very...More
The food was delicious, the prices were reasonable and the staff was very friendly. Would definitely eat here again when in Vancouver.
I was skeptical going in, but oh boy they knocked it out of the park. Delicious soup and sandwich. Rueben sandwich and red lentil soup was amazing! The coffee was pretty good too. You should come here instead of near by cafes for lunch :)
Found this place on Yelp and it didn't disappoint. Great service, amazing homemade bread, great sandwiches. Go here!!
This place was recommended by the bike shop just steps away. The bike guy told us, ""you won't forget the bread,"" as it's all homemade. We went to grab a quick bite before biking around town. Thoroughly impressed by the awesome amounts of flavor coming...More
Just have to add another 5 star vote, even though the chef here prefers word of mouth to Yelp. Since we were visiting Vancouver from Florida and are not likely to return, I'd just like to say that this place is as good as it...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4847414-Reviews-Number_E_Food-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
O Sushi,"Pretty good sushi - not a huge variety. Seemed tempura prawns were in almost all special rolls! Very tasty food and would go there again. Head chef (maybe the owner) came over to our table which was a nice touch.
The food is so tasty!! The staff is so beyond friendly. The service and price couldn't be better! I crave this sushi all of the time, the best I've had in Vancouver. It's a hidden gem and deserves all of the praise!
It was amazing experience in there! My school is nearby here, so I tried kastu don that I really missed to eat ever since I came to Canada. The food fully satisfied me, staffs were super friendly and kind! Undoubtedly amazing customer service. I will...More
We were looking for a place where we could try some sashimi and sake, and found this place on Trip advisor. The atmosphere here was very cozy and warm, the options were really diverse so there was absolutely no problems for us to order food,...More
This isn’t exactly a high end restaurant, it almost has a fast food vibe, but the food is very good and the service is excellent. It’s also a very good value with reasonable pricing. They have beer and wine too. Perhaps not a spot for...More
Overpriced, tiny portion, not fresh salmon sashimi. C$ 23 for 6 measly pieces! Shockingly expensive. This in the heart on Vancouver Granville Security Token
Lunch for our first time at this restaurant. Lots of interesting menu options. I took another online reviewer’s advice and ordered the Sabu Sabu and was not disappointed. It was delicious! Also had the Van City Fever which was so good. Service was prompt and...More
Took my son here for dinner before a Whitecaps game. We were both craving sushi and this place was definitely conveniently close. Was fairly slow getting someone to our table after being seated. The person taking our order barely spoke English which was I think...More
We only had two days in Vancouver and had heard that the Asian food was great. Tried to get in the super hyped Jinya (30 min wait was too long for my aching stomach). stumbled upon this place. Clean, simple and friendly. Excellent Donburi, tempura...More
Recommended by St Regis Hotel, it is a short distance from there. We were greeted by very friendly staff. Sat at a very clean table. We ordered a variety of items off the menu, we loved everyone of them!! its also loved by the locals.
It was amazing for sure!!! Near by the skytrain station, perfect service and friendly servers 🥰 I was on vacation with my friend and I could find this lovely restaurant in downtown. They have lots of spicy food options as well. I truly recommend here....More
Fishes are fresh and rolls are delicious, torched salmon nigiri has to be my favourite. The choices of beverages are exellent
This restaurant is so good that we went twice in the same day! The sake it's very reasonably priced. The sushi itself is very fresh and very delicious with very nice presentation. We mostly only had sashimi but there are other options if you don't...More
Great sushi selection and authentic. Lunch service was quick. Beautiful presentation. Definitely needs a return visit as the menu is extensive.
The concierge at our hotel recommended O Sushi when we expressed an interest in Japanese food. The restaurant, though simply furnished, was immaculate & the waitresses were most helpful. The menu is quite extensive & we began with a delicious tuna sashimi. We then sampled...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7701637-Reviews-O_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
O5 Tea,"The O in O-Five Rare Tea Bar is for origin, something Pedro Villalon — who founded this tea business in a wonderful space on Kitsilano’s 4th Ave — sees as fundamentally important to his terrior—based vision of bringing teas to Vancouver. He seeks out quality...More
This tea and kombucha bar is so classy and stylish, yet simple ... I've taken a kombucha class there and also buy a growler of kombucha from there every week. It's so delicious. The staff are extremely knowledgeable about teas and the kombucha, like Geoff...More
I'm not a tea connoisseur, but I went to 05 with an absolute tea enthusiast. I can't begin to explain how much I learnt! About oolong, matcha, white teas and a whole host of other teas. I had a Linden herbal infusion but watched as...More
This is a must when ever I travel to Vancouver, and is a gem in a lovely neighborhood on a very cool street. Their teas are special and spectacular. They have a variety of ceremonial grade matcha's. They have some truly lovely and delicious black,...More
A MUST if you are a tea fan! Kombucha was delicious... try it!! A great experience around tea preparation and flavours.
We have been back twice now to this wonderful little tea bar that offers not only Kumbucha on tap (2 choices) as well as hundreds of different teas--both caffeinated and tisane. I had a large mug of Kumbucha for $5 and it was so delicious!...More
I like tea, but in a absolutely non-connaisseur way… So this was kind of a discovery experience for me. We chose a flight of (3) teas, and shared it between the two of us. We could retaste any of the teas a second and even...More
What a visit..! Lot of positive surprises.. New teas,marvelous ceramic pieces for tea,customer service at their best. I notice that 0 5 has develop a new clientele who is coming from around the world ( particularly from Asia) looking for the best teas of the...More
We usually go there around 9pm as it's quiet, and you can relax while enjoying your tea. They have a limited selection of sweet things, but their matcha macaroon is a must if it's fresh. When you choose a tea, they will brew it for...More
Wow! What a great experience this was. Simply the best tea's I have ever tasted in a very relaxing atmosphere!
This is simply the best tea shop I have ever been to. The variety is simply outstanding and the quality of the handpicked teas is superb. I spend hours at a time here because I have such lovely conversations with the wonderful people who work...More
The owners have been traveling since more than eight years (twice a year) visiting all the best Asia spots for tea.Dealing direct with the producers and getting their product for them. This place in Paris,London,Los Angeles will be difficult to beat .I think that Vancouver...More
Pedro and everyone that works there are all extremely passionate and friendly tea aficionados.O5 tea bar is a perfect go-to place on a half hour lunch escape from busy work life. An all time favourite is getting a macha shot as a perfect picker-upper in...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5008783-Reviews-O5_Tea-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
OEB Breakfast Co. - Yaletown,"We had visited OEB in Calgary and were so impressed by the friendly service. This restaurant felt more rushed and although we were impressed by the food, we were not offered more water or coffee. Lovely food though and would definitely visit again
Perfect breakfast spot by the water. Great coffee. Big portions, lots of variety on flavors - would love to try the whole menu! Can see why it’s our friends go to spot.
Stopped here for brunch. Nice welcome and good service. Food quality was good, fresh and nicely presented. The sun was shining the day we visited and it was very pleasant sitting outside.
Noisy place with lots of packaged food. Will not return. Lots of hype about nothing Yes its hip and chic if u like such a environmentMore
Hi 652sirc, Thank you for taking the time to write your review but, are you sure that you have reviewed the correct restaurant, OEB Breakfast. We are a farm to table concept and dont do packaged food. It would be great if it is us...More
Great quality breakfast in an amazing location overlooking the Marina. It was a beautiful sunny morning and the food was delicious and good value. Portion size was about right with some fresh fruit on the side - a nice change from huge portions and not...More
Thank you ToffeeMike for the awesome 5 star review for us here at OEB Breakfast. Great to read that you noticed our farm fresh ingredients in your dish and that you enjoyed our beautiful view here looking over the marina. We hope to see you...More
A huge selection of dishes, especially eggs and the way they are prepared. The food is healthy, tasty, juicy, perfectly seasoned and looks beautiful on the plate. The only small complaint is that the desserts are healthy with very little or no sugar, so I...More
Thank you filipr65 for the awesome 5 star review. Great to hear that you found our menu to be healthy, tasty, juicy and perfectly seasoned. We appreciate you coming in and dining with us here at OEB Breakfast. In reply to your pancake and Nutella...More
Slimy avocado with vile tomato slop. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY, And most certainly don't waste your time giving the company direct reviews/emails of your concern. I got a BS response that was clearly meant to send out generically to ALL COMPLAINTS. The only good thing...More
Hi Rolly, Thank you for taking the time to discuss your experience further via direct message. We do very much appreciate our guest feedback and are disappointed that your experience wasn't positive and our initial response felt dismissive. We'd love the opportunity to have you...More
Average eggs Benedict. Not sure why the server asked how I wanted the eggs cooked when they came out very undercooked & the opposite to what I asked for. Had I not been in a hurry I would have sent them back. Canadian bacon was...More
Hi Bethinhoboken, At OEB we pride ourselves on the quality of food we serve, which starts with using the highest quality products sourced from the best suppliers. We usually receive reviews that recognize this and are surprised to hear that you don't feel this same....More
OEB Breakfast Co offers a lot of delicious breakfast options, from calorie rich to the more healthy options. Even lobster is offered and the view at the harbour is also a plus.
Thank you Monique for the awesome 5 star review. Great to hear that you loved the restaurant and our OEB culinary program. We do like to try and accommodate for everyone, we hope to see you again in the restaurant soon.
OEB shows up on a lot of lists for great brunch in Vancouver and having been I don’t know why. The menu is long and confusing, and based on what I ordered the food is average. We had to ask for water - which compared...More
Hi Getaway47930118945, At OEB we pride ourselves on the quality of food we serve, which starts with using the highest quality products sourced from the best suppliers. We usually receive reviews that recognize this and are surprised to hear that you don't feel this same....More
5 out of 6 of us loved our meals and the last one was my teen, picky about bacon (whom they tried to appease). Although it was definitely loud, I realize many appreciate that kind of atmosphere so can’t take off stars for it. The...More
Thank you mummy75 for the awesome 5 star review. Great to hear that you and the family loved it hear at OEB Breakfast. We do have some quieter areas within the restaurant for your next visit and our staff would be more than willing to...More
We did not enjoy our visit at all. Multiple open tables inside and on the patio but we were told it was an hour and a half wait. Those tables say empty the entire time. Service was slow, pretentious and rude. Food was very average...More
Hi Yvrjeff, Thank you for taking the time to write your review. Although it is very disappointing to hear of your experience here with us. We are known for our warm hospitality and we never would want to keep anyone waiting unnecessarily. I would love...More
Having been a total lover of OEB Breakfast (both dining in and takeaway) I was eager to get a poutine on my arrival back to Vancouver last weekend. Due to the popularity and 2.5hr waiting list we decided to order in and enjoy breakfast from...More
Ok, the food is nice and the atmosphere great, but I can’t see what all the fuss is about, it’s just a faddie place in a great Location surrounded by money which make it’s a popular place. The staff are very friendly and the service...More
We love coming here. Just expect to time your yelp online wait carefully so you eat roughly when you want. The server actually misheard what we wanted to order but so satisfied what she brought out the Chasing Chicken poutine so no complaints. We had...More",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16719208-Reviews-OEB_Breakfast_Co_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Oca Pastificio,"Absolutely amazing for a pasta snob. If you have been Italy & actually tasted fresh pasta you will appreciate every bite. If you have no palette for Al dente pasta, maybe you might even gain one. Get the chefs tasting menu, and you won’t regret...More
If you like pasta, this is your paradise. Order the tasting menu, you won’t go home hungry. Since the restaurant doesn’t take reservations and opens at 5 pm, you need to go early and stand in line,. The restaurant is very small. We arrived at...More
* Opens at 5pm - No reservations accepted, therefore line-up early (4;30) * Restaurant operates with 3 services per evening, therefore you have only 90 minutes * Menu is a la carte, No wines under $50 * Entree (appetizer) plus main dish (choice of 4...More
This is the latest “it” restaurant in Vancouver that opened up right before the pandemic on Commercial Drive in the old Absinthe Bistro location. It’s difficult to get a table without strategically arriving before opening or waiting outside (they don’t take reservations). However, when a...More
An unreal dining experience here in Oca Pastificio. The pasta is so delicious and the service is amazing. They don't do reservations so come early and get your name in as the place is small and can only do so many sittings in one night!
This is a restaurant that completely lacks in kind service. We lined up at 4:30 pm so that we could have the 5 pm seating as there are no reservations. We were amongst the first parties seated. We opted for the tasting menu and asked...More
At least one night a week my husband rescues me from having to cook at home. Not that i mind but with civid and a recent heat wave we needed to get iff the property. We are always up for pasta night and so this...More
Thanks Oca Pastificio friends for the Pasta night. Instagram info on their fresh sheet and even though we were taking away (indoor dining, please come back!) the Pastas were just wonderful. Well priced Entree Sizes between $22-26. Staff friendly and able to pickup with early...More
Oca has the most amazing pasta in the city! The variety and freshness make Oca a ""must try"" restaurant in Vancouver. The restaurant is small, only 20 indoor seats, so it has a great warm atmosphere. The service is fantastic, they people do care about...More
Came here on recommendation and Oca Pastificio blew us away. The food was incredible and service was impeccable. Some of the best pasta dishes I’ve ever had.
Working through our list of restaurants to try we came to Oca Pastificio and decided to give it a whirl since we were in the area. Although they initially did not take reservations they are now doing so which makes things easier and safer. There...More
Warm and attentive service, exquisite offerings. I had the tortelli stuffed with ricotta and herbs in a lemon butter. AMAZING. A must visit when in the neighbourhood!
I can't say enough about our experience here. The pasta was possibly the best I have ever had. We ordered the Taster menu, and the greatness kept coming! There was a plate of meats and olives to start, 5 different pastas and then dessert. All...More
I was able to call at 3pm to see what was available for pickup. They had two meat and one veg lasagne left so I ordered all 3. They were picked up and brought home. The lasagnes were uncooked but had instructions on the lid...More
We discovered this place by chance as we were strolling Commerical Drive. Little Italy is such a fun part of Vancouver and we always enjoy our time. There is no big signage and you can't make reservations, but if you make the journey to this...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d19849591-Reviews-Oca_Pastificio-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Oceans 999,"Went to try the Dinner Buffet Jazz Saturday Night. It was extremely disappointing. When they charge $72 per person, you expect that you will have a very good selection of food and top notch quality. It was embarrassing. Took one bite, paid the bill and...More
Had the Sunday breakfast buffet. 38 dollars for adults and 20 dollars for kids (including my 6 year old) for absolutely nothing special. Honestly the free buffet at the Holiday Inn was on par. All they had was scrambled eggs, bacon, sausage, fruit, Kellogg's cereal,...More
We stayed at the hotel for 5 nights on a cruise and breakfast package and this included breakfast from the buffet. This included a good choice of cold and cooked items and allowed you to eat as little or as much as you wanted. We...More
Buffet option offered cereals, pastries, toast, & other quick & lighter fare. You may also order off the menu if you prefer a more robust breakfast. Service is excellent & attention paid to every detail. The breakfast buffet was refilled continuously right up til the...More
My wife and I came in from Langley for Saturday night. We were attending the Zoomer Show, stayed at Marriott Pinnacle Hotel and decided to do dinner at the Opera Buffet at Oceans 999 in the Pan Pacific Hotel. We went to this buffet many...More
This restaurant is attached to the Pan Pacific hotel. I had breakfast there Although seriously overpriced (6 dollars for 2 slides of bread), the avocado toast with salmon is fantastic and the views are good. When there is no fog. Or rain.
I visited Oceans 999 with my family and our evening was excellent! Our server (Laurie or Lorie I'm sorry for the spelling!) was very friendly and knowledgable about the menu. I'm a rookie when it comes wines so when I asked for her recommendation, she...More
My husband and I visited this restaurant as it offers Italian buffet and Opera on weekends. We were not celebrating any special occasion however the staff made us feel like we were. For an Italian buffet you may think all you get is pasta and...More
Love to have breakfast here. Great wait staff and excellent food. Wonderful view as well, especially when the cruise ships are in.More
Dear WI-Lance, Thank you for posting a review of your recent stay at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read your visit to our Oceans 999 Restaurant and the service, view and menu items you selected exceeded your expectations. We look forward in...More
We shared 3 dishes (pasta, salmon and sea bass). Excellent choice for those undecided. Freebie birthday dessert is a plus!More
Dear Luchie O, Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Oceans 999 Restaurant to celebrate this special occasion. We were pleased to read your dining experience exceeded your expectations. We do hope we will have another opportunity to welcome you...More
At last I have made it to dine for lunch with a small bus load of friends and see the huge cruise ships anchored in view from our table setting. Perfect setting to enjoy a fine dining experience. We were early before noon so it...More
Dear richard2734, Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Oceans 999 Restaurant. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your dining experience and the ambiance, harbour activities and views from Oceans 999 Restaurant. Your feedback has been shared with our...More
We had a nice relaxed meal with views over part of harbour. Service was pleasant and not too rushed, food was fresh, hot and tasty. All we needed.More
Dear Graham H, Thank you for posting a review of your recent stay at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your dining experience at our Oceans 999 Restaurant. Your comments have been shared with our Restaurant and Culinary Teams. We...More
We ate breakfast here before our cruise. This is the Pan Pacific Hotel's full-service restaurant serving breakfast, lunch, and dinner. They also have an Opera Buffet each Saturday but unfortunately we were not there on a Saturday. It sounded quiet interesting. They offer a large...More
Dear GilB867, Thank you for posting a review of your recent visit to our Oceans 999 restaurant. We were pleased to read you enjoyed your visit and the service extended to you during your stay exceeded your expectations. We do hope we will have another...More
I was booked in the Pan Pacific Hotel for the week of UBCM and this is one of the restaurants on site. A group of us went for breakfast on our first morning there. The server was great but the time it took for the...More
Dear looseink, Thank you for taking the time to post a review of your recent stay at the Pan Pacific Vancouver. We were pleased to read you enjoyed the views, ambiance and quality of the items you selected from our menu. Your comments have been...More
The sides were very good. The salmon, which I had asked for medium rare, was dry because it was over cooked. Disappointing.More
Dear LuckySpivey, Thank you for posting a review of your recent dining experience. We were disappointed to read and regret your salmon did not meet your expectations and your comments have been shared with our culinary team for review and follow up. Thank you for...More",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10260295-Reviews-Oceans_999-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
OddFish,"Vancouver was the start of a two week long trip, and OddFish was our dinner on our first night. Unseasonably warm, we were able to sit outside. The restaurant was extremely busy so we were more comfortable being a bit distanced and outdoors. Service was...More
OddFish is a seafood restaurant in Kitsilano, Vancouver, on the corner of 1st Ave& Cypress. Last night I felt like sushi but found the one nearby sushi place unexpectedly closed because of a technical problem; the other always is closed on Tuesdays & the third...More
Terrific local pescatarian restaurant with a fun “neighborhood-y” vibe and carefully prepared fish options. Portions are relatively small but very delicious. Order a combo of fish dishes and vegetables for the table.
A seafood restaurant with fresh oysters, sashimi. Atmosphere is good. Wide range of wine selections. Reasonable price
Nibbles & drinks at & around the bar at OddFish is usually good & server, Richard, a recent addition to the OddFish serving team, takes this quality service one step further. On Saturday the bar seating was taken but I was offered a space at...More
First, I do like OddFish (OF) as all of my earlier reviews attest. The service I get at the bar, where I usually sit, is friendly & helpful, as is the person at the entrance, & I find it a good place to go for...More
Oddfish is usually a buzz, especially on Saturday nights. If one is lucky and early though, one is often able to slide in and get a place at the bar, where good service and nice nibbles are available. So don’t despair if it looks too...More
Before I sat down I knew Oddfish was worth the price of admission. My vaccination passport was easy to locate on my iphone but I was scrambling for photo ID. I found my drivers licence but that was less easy. Kyle, the bar manager, who...More
Almost two years since my last visit , I know girl friend #1 love fresh Fish and like Taps style dinning , so what is the great place to bring her at OddFish , comes to Fish and seafood she so fussy worst them me...More
This is simply the best fish restaurant with the most amazing service and vibe. Nothing pretentious from any of the staff. You feel like they all want to be sure that you have the best experience possible. The food is perfect from start to finish.
What a find...a rare bird that squeezes you into a packed house yet never feels squeezed. Thus is Oddfish, whose owners simply ""get it"" when it comes to customer satisfaction and appreciation. Come once and you'll come again and again and again...
The menu online seems small but they also have a large selection of fresh fish of the day. The food was tasty but very small portions so you have to have a few items to be full so the bill will add up. Three of...More
It is one of the best laid back cozy Tapas restaurants in the area ,, not a place for you eat and run ,.great romantic place for their amazing tapas ,(remind me in California Santa Ana Playground restaurant February this year ) since they reopen...More
Oddfish is odd, perhaps even unique, in its presentation and structure, it's service, menu, presentation, and these differences make the restaurant come to life beyond being a mere purveyor of food. Be open to new, and the place will energize and entice you.
OddFish on 1st Ave reopened May 20, along with its meat counterpart, Nook, some five blocks west on Yew, both of which are owned by the same four partners. OF has accommodated well to the Brave New World the B.C. culinary industry finds itself in...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12692945-Reviews-OddFish-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ofra's Kitchen,"Really authentic, healthy and tasty Israeli / Mediterranean food, served with love and good humour. Highly recommend!
Thank you so much for a great review. Looking forward to seeing you again soon.
Ofra was warm and welcoming and the food was very good. Ofra cooks on a small little grill to work her magic.
First of all the owner is lovely and so warm. Secondly, the food is good!!! We had the mint tea with fresh mint and it was good. We ordered the carrot salad which was yummy. My husband ordered the shashuka and he was happy with...More
Thank you so much fr a superb review. Hope to see you again soon.
Fabulous authentic food, amazing flavours of the Middle East!!! We fell on this place by happenstance and what luck!!! The schwarma hummus plate was to die for! Place is vegan, but taste was very flavourful, also had the beet salad and Sabie pita-very authentic and...More
Thank you so much, Trish, for a wonderful, heartwarming review. Hope to see you again soon.
I keep coming back for delicious food and great service Falafel, humus,shawarma,shakshuka , Amazing salads ( I tried them al) Food for the soul ! Dont miss this gem of a place…never disappoints Thank you Ofra
Thank you so much Mario. What a great, heart warming review. See you again soon.
Ofra is a nice lady and her food is made with love and is very authentic. The place smells great. One of us got the stuffed eggplant and pronounced it delicious. I unfortunately had to pass on ordering because of food allergies. My American germ...More
We stopped by Ofra's for an easy dinner recently. Ofra does everything herself while at the same time warmly greeting her customers and chatting. The food was yummy and homemade.
Thank you Joe, for a wonderful review. All the best.
We were a mixed group of 3 with varying food preferences and chose Ofras because it was vegan and vegetarian food from the Middle East. The meals were superb- falafel pita, hummus fungi and sabih an Israeli specialty. Scrumptious delicious, fresh and good portions. No...More
What a wonderful review. Thank you so much. It has been a pleasure having you over. Hope to see you again soon.
If you want to be transported back to a sweet childhood moment when your mother cooked you your favourite meal and gave you a kiss on the forehead, come to Ofra’s. She prepares delicious hearty vegan food and makes you feel welcomed. A must-visit.
Thank you Alison, for a wonderful, heart warming review. Always a pleasure having you over.
Was in the mood for falafel and found this restaurant while walking on Denman. Ofra is from Israel and you can tell by her outstanding falafel. She was taking care of everything and so she was quite busy but still took the time to make...More
Enjoyed the shawarma and hummus. Ofra is a great host and the restaurant was alsways busy though we found a table without a problem
Thank you Mike. Great having you over.
As neither vegetarian nor vegan, I'm always a bit hesitant about eating at places like this because, well, I'm a carnivore. But fellow meat eaters, I'm here to tell you if you're going to skip animal protein for a meal & still want to walk...More
Thank you so much for a great and thorough review of the dishes looking forward to seeing you again soon.
Expansive menu choices and wonderful flavours and quality. An oasis in the West End! Not to be missed!
Thank you so much Greg
Ofra is just the best. Her restaurant has the best vibes with amazing food and good people stopping by. Her dishes are curated and fresh and made with love. Her restaurant is a fantastic addition to the go to spots in downtown Vancouver. I got...More
Thank you so much Eyal, it was such a pleasure meeting all of you. Hope to see you again soon.
Dear Ofra, I was having a bad day when I came by your cafe. You were so welcoming and sweet. You prepared for me the best Falafel, hummus and veggie salad that I have ever had, outside of Jerusalem. Thank you. We chatted about the...More
Thank you Brad, for your kind words. It was a pleasure meeting you. See you again soon.",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d19806249-Reviews-Ofra_s_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ole Ole Mexican Deli,"I had the three tacos with rice and beans. rice went well with the tacos. My wife had the swiss chicken. Great flavour. Tortilla soup was great too. One of my favorite places in New West
Very good value, there are not a lot of places around that serve tasty dishes like these at this price. Very good server , think he was the owner. They have a very small seating area and the ambiance isn't great but the owners will...More
This is a quiet and unassuming restaurant with likely the best Mexican food in New Westminster. Menu options are diverse and all well priced. The tables were turned over fairly quickly and I was able to see a variety of different meals ordered. They all...More
I can't believe that I never found this homey small eatery before. He has been in business for over 20 years and has been voted ""Best Of"" many times. Great traditional Mexican food at very reasonable prices. So difficult to decide what to eat because...More
Basic but clean, friendly and reasonable prices. Enjoy lunch or diner and go away full. Entertainment certain nights.
I took my family to Ole Ole Mexican Cuisine in New West last night. My wife is a picky eater and was worried about the food. When we arrived she started to panic because the restaurant is small and the building is old. The owner...More
I love Latin food and my spouse and I decided to try this place- Although the owner was super nice, I did not enjoy this place at all. It was sooooo HOT in there- we did not leave because we felt bad-Also, it seems like...More
We went early to eat around 4:30 pm on a Wednesday night and no one was there but sat ourselves. An elder man greeted us however even with his sweetness he could not really communicate when I asked him questions. We loved the dishes we...More
Friday lunch was a tŕeat. Basic but very quaint and clean. Good as expected reflected same. Quiet afternoon and only two tables busy. Sérvice was fast and attentive. Only thing to make it better would be a beer
Fantastic and authentic, and the owner Raoul is completely charming. Order off the menu - or put yourself in their capable hands and let them surprise you! Those in the know ask for a side of the house-made hot sauce, and save room for the...More
I was impressed with the chili relleno but fell in love with the home made mole enchilladas! Very original!
I recommend the papusas and my fave is the enchiladas rojas. I really like their homemade hot sauce! The nachos are great and the staff is friendly.
This is a really great place. The area is a bit sketchy but Raoul the Owner makes you feel like family. My only drawback is no alcohol is served.
I've heard people say this place has great food, and it's reasonable. The only problem is I never saw anyone in there!! I live close by and walk by often. I have a friend staying with me, and I mentioned to her that I wanted...More
Not a fancy restaurant by any means but they serve delightful meals for a more than reasonable price. Went for a casual date there and was not disappointed! Love love love the beans and rice side!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154936-d800463-Reviews-Ole_Ole_Mexican_Deli-New_Westminster_British_Columbia.html
Olive & Anchor,"Tried to get a table at this restaurant, and they were only willing to seat me at a table in their outdoor heated area...no one else was seated out there! There were many empty tables inside. I declined, and went elsewhere to eat. Since when...More
Stopped by for a quick lunch today with my wife. Ordered Cod and Chips: Chips were too dry, too much batter and too little fish. Cheerful waitress, good absence though. Food killed the impression, will never visit again.
The meal we had there at lunch was OK but we were shocked at the prices. Good grief, do not think I will go there again, the shock when we received the bill spoilt the small celebration we were having until then.
We went there due to the positive reviews. But unfortunately we left unhappy and not satisfied. The staff was friendly and efficient. The food of the day - halibut fish and chips - was unfortunately very tasteless. The Ambiente was okay. We were sitting on...More
Excellent food! We used the takeout window. The orders were fast and the food delicious! Friendly service team helped!
Once a favourite now a huge disappointment. Once crowded with enthusiastic guests, now with ample space for drop-in customers. Service is amateurish at best, food very disappointing. After a considerable wait we were told our bill had been, unknowingly, paid by another table - presumably...More
Took a while to get a table but once in, service and food were good. We had their burgers which were very good and a friend had the chicken caesar, also very tasty.
Excellent food, service, and overall atmosphere. The open front of the restaurant, patio and view of the harbour encouraged us to walk in for some fish and chips. The service was very prompt and courteous, and the fresh caught Halibut fish with a non-pinky batter...More
Deeelish!!!! The fish taco was light a d crispy as were the fries and my teenage son was like « damn mom We need to come back here on the back end of pur trip. I tried it and must concur. No complaints at all. Plus...More
Nice atmosphere and good food. Shared the Seafood Cioppino on a cool windy day. Great broth and lots of seafood, a perfect match for the day
my mums lunch salmon with vegetables and rice was Not cooked plus it was cold. the waiter brought us another one but it did not fair well either. service was ok. quality has gone way down and menu has way few items on it
Not only a very tasty tuna salad, good beer and pleasant service but staff went above and beyond when I left my purse there before getting on the ferry!
Good Menu,excellent Service and very good food quality,whats not to love? Hard to imagine there is anything better in Horseshoe Bay. Fair pricing and the bonus is they don't play that thumping music,just a nice mix at nice sound levels I will arrive early for...More
While we are Horseshoe Bay locals for many years, O&A is becoming our go-to restaurant in these bleak days of Covid. Not only is food reliable good, but the menu includes a vast range from ferry-expected easy pub-food, to fine dining. Plus, in these days...More
We have family in Horseshoe Bay and whenever we visit not only do we order take out while staying in Horseshoe Bay, but also lunch or dinner while we wait for our return ferry to Departure Bay. We are die-hard foodies and have always agreed...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d786774-Reviews-Olive_Anchor-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Olove Greek Kitchen,"This restaurant was recommended to me by my brother who is living in BC, and it did not disappoint. I have been to Greece and eaten lots of Greek food over the years, but this was something truly special. The staff and owners were very...More
The food was okay, nothing to write home about, but the service was not very good at all, not friendly or welcoming. I like more traditional Greek food. Might be good if you were with casual friends and sharing plates.
Fabulous authentic Greek food, loved the sharing platers and endless supply of pitas. Cosy ambiance and wonderful service!
New to the neighbourhood, this restaurant was our first venture out for dinner. Busy.. really busy.. mostly regulars, the service was excellent, even being short staffed. We felt “like a regular”. Nice when you are away from home. 2 appetizers plus 2 mains, 2 cocktails...More
Not your run of the mill Greek place, we had a group of 8 for Mother’s Day and everyone loved the food. The service was excellent even tho they were busy. Will definitely return
Really good modern greek food. Not greasy, good portions. We ate the goddess dish and had an appetizer. Been there twice, will be there again.
We have been here a couple of times since it opened, as a couple and in a group.The owners are experienced restauranteurs, and it shows. The décor is warm and inviting, as are the hosts. The menu is not the typical Greek one that you...More
I showed up for a little snack before my son’s hockey game. Damn. I wish I had been hungrier! I had the olive hummus with pita bread and the deep fried zucchini chips. Every morsel was delicious. I need to come back and try all...More
First time visit to this new restaurant. When we arrived we were only 4 of 6 guests. When we left it was packed. The kalamari appie was amazing. Yarides Kadaifi prawn appie was excellent as well. I had the skewer souvlaki. You are able to...More
Every time I go this place blows my mind. Bouyiardi is a must have. I'm lactose sensitive but that gets cast aside right away. Roast lamb, Chicken souvlaki and those crazy fries.....hands down best Greek in Burnaby
We had been wanting to eat here for a long time. Last night we had a delicious dinner out. Amazing service, restaurant seems to be a favourite with regulars. Fresh delicious food, great service. Burnaby is lucky to have this great restaurant.
Wonderful friendly service and great casual food. Owners made a point of coming by and making sure we enjoyed our meal.
Discovered by accident. Stored for future frequent visits. One of the better Greek restaurants in Greater Vancouver. All fresh ingredients all cooked to order. Very impressed.
The moussaka was delicious. Very much like going to a home kitchen in Greece. You can tell the chef has a real passion for authentic cuisine. We will be going back for sure
I didn't like Greek food until I found this restaurant. For sure not the usual Greek, big portions with lots of carbs. At Olove I can have a healthy, delicious meal within a good price range.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d15005127-Reviews-Olove_Greek_Kitchen-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Olympia Pizza Kits,"I ordered the chicken souvlaki and the spanakopita meal through Uber. They messed up my order and delivered the spanakopita without any sides, which didn't upset me too much at the time. I called the place to let them know what happened and the person...More
The food was delicious, but the portions were huge and I could'nt finish mine. I felt like I was in trouble for not clearing my plate and not wantig to take my left overs home!!
Disappointing. Of the 3 pizzas ordered, all were light on tomato sauce. The BBQ chicken had very little BBQ sauce and the margharita had virtually no cheese and was overcooked.
I have been to Olympia Pizza in Kitsilano on Broadway about 2 months ago and it was very good but last Saturday it was a huge disappointment. I realize Covid has hit restaurants hard so I am not happy about writing a bad review but...More
Hi Debi, Really sorry to hear about your experience. Can you please send us an email to resolve this? info@olympiapizzakits.com. Thanks! -Sara
With the closure of Gigi’s in June of this year, I’ve been on the lookout for a good local pizza joint. As I was browsing the Information Superhighway over summer, ads for Olympia Pizza magically appeared. Their propaganda photos looked most tantalizing and appealing, so...More
Hi PookyCake, Really sorry to hear about your less-than-amazing experience. Could you please send us an email at info@olympiapizzakits.com so that we can resolve this for you? Thanks and happy holidays!
This institution has been there for great pizza that is luscious, filling and just good comfort food. Their lasagne is great as well Wings do not order these OMG which animal do they come from but small is an understatement com'on guys order at least...More
Hi there! We think there could be some confusion as to which Olympia you dined at. Either way, we are sorry that you did not have the best experience! Please contact us to discuss further at info@olympiapizzakits.com. Thank you 🙏🏽
very good food and nice area the service is good and the prices are very good you should try the pizza
Thanks for the review, Jordromani!
The go to place on West Broadway for Greek food. all the choices you need and great pizza also. Service is good and friendly - Good spot and setting for a nice evening meal.
Thank you so much for the kind words!
We had not been here for three years, but they really did a nice job of fixing up in the interior. Busy on a holiday evening. Family place. Great, solid fare. Large portions. Very convenient right on Broadway.
Thank you! We're happy with it too. Come back and visit next time you're in Kits!
I usually do not write negative reviews, but feel obliged to say that my dinner at Olympia Pizza was very disappointing -- both in terms of the service and in terms of the food. The person taking our order was far from welcoming; it almost...More
Very sorry about your experience. Please contact us at info@olympiapizzakits.com to discuss further! Thank you.
Very good pizza , great if your around and want to eat some quick. nice staff, defiantly recommended if you are the area.
Thank you so much! Come visit us next time you're in Kits!
Such excellent service! My mother and I went in for a spur of the moment dinner choice and landed in Olympia pizza. We were greeted immediately and while waiting for our souvlaki take-out order we were offered water while waiting. Also on all take-out orders...More
Thank you so much for the kind review. We do love our family portraits and take pride in the generations that have worked here to serve Kits!
Olympia has been here for generations and there is a reason. Great Greek food. Had the moussaka and a glass of retsina and the taste and quality are excellent.
Thanks so much, visit us next time you're in Kits!
This restaurant has lost it's focus and with so many good restaurants in the area it is best to avoid this one. We had calamari and lamb souvlaki. We could not eat the calamari. It was over cooked and the texture was like cardboard. No...More
We're very sorry to hear about your experience. If you would like to discuss this further, feel free to email info@olympiapizzakits.com. Thanks!
We were in the area and wanted somewhere close by for a quick dinner. We booked ahead (only and hour before) and thank goodness we did as the restaurant was busy. The service was efficient and fast. We had both pasta and pizza dishes which...More
Wow, thanks so much! You're welcome back any time.",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707503-Reviews-Olympia_Pizza_Kits-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Olympia Restaurant,"We made several visits to the Olympia during our visit this time around in Vancouver. However, we knew of this establishment on previous visits in 1999 and 2007. So once again, we made a bee-line for this restaurant and we’re certainly not disappointed. Wide choice...More
This is our favourite spot to order take out pizza. Good value and service, but more importantly delicious pizza with generous toppings! A monthly treat for us.
We ate here on our lazt trip over 7 years ago andvthisctime found it even better. Everything was so tasty we had paste and soulvaki and everything was amazing. John is the best host. Great food great atmosphere and great value.
I had been here years and years ago. I was so glad to see it was still going strong. I remembered having a fantastic meal of moussaka all those years ago. I asked my waiter, who was fantastic by the way, what he recommended. Guess...More
We literally live a block accross this place. I walk in front of it almost daily, the owner with his classic bolle London hat is always smiling. The place always has patrons, the patio on the side street (Nelson) is nice and quiet with trees...More
The location on Denman by beach ideal. Outdoor patio superb. Roasted lamb lunch special great quality and quantity. Service friendly and fast
Went for lunch with family and sat on patio. Food and service was great. The lunch specials were very well priced for the meal received.
We went for a birthday dinner and the portions were generous. We ordered the Roast Lamb, Kalamari and Pepper Steak dinners. The service was pretty good and towards the end of the meal, I asked our server if anything was done for birthdays, his reply...More
Food, service and atmosphere are all fantastic! This place has been a longtime favourite for Westenders. Everything on the menu is great.
we've done take away pizza here twice this summer to eat for dinner on the ferry home after doc appts. they only take cash. good meat pizza. comfort food. they offer greek dishes, pizza and pasta and have been in business for decades. good location....More
atmosphere great, food is varied and delicious, the pizzais the best and it is famous for its roast lamb
This long-time neighbourhood favourite has a loyal following serving Greek style food in stereotypical decorated setting. Like the decor, the menu has not changed for years (except for small price increases) and that is just fine, thank you, as it is offers trusted & reliable...More
We used to live in west end 15 years ago and would often go here and have semi regularly done delivery. Their map on their website clearly shows our gastown location as delivery. I called during the pandemic here as it was celebration and our...More
Greek food here is ok, nothing to write home about but satisfying. The pizza here is excellent! Service is friendly and the restaurant is full of regulars who the staff seem to know by name.
At the Olympia Restaurant in Vancouver you can taste the typical Greek cuisine from the central Denman Street in Downtown. The restaurant offers a kind and fast service with a good quality / price ratio.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d844664-Reviews-Olympia_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
One More Szechuan Chinese Cuisine,"After a brusque welcome (table for ?) we studied the enormous menu. Encouraged by the reviews we had picked this restaurant. We had the hot and sour soup (good), ginger beef (soggy, tasteless), bbq duck (delicious), satay prawns with vermicelli (ok), Szechuan beef (ok) and...More
Ordered an assortment of entrees via Uber Eats. Everything was really tasty, with a generous serving size and good price. But everything came in plastic containers and tho we specifically asked for no sauces we still got packets - time to step up enviro practices.
Have been to this place before but never encounter such appalling service. Went for dinner at about 6.45pm and the place was almost full with 3 empty tables. Was seated quite quickly and order taken within 5 minutes. 30 minutes into the wait and we...More
We recently had lunch here on our visit to Vancouver. The food and service were both excellent. Parking is convenient. The atmosphere is relaxing. Highly recommended if you are visiting Capilano Suspension Bridge or Grouse Mountain as it is very close to these attractions.
We stopped in for dinner while visiting Vancouver. The service was very good. The food was tasty and the portions were very generous. We would give a 4.5 for the food and a 5 for the service and value.
The first time we tried to find this we were unsuccessful and I'm glad we tried again. The food was very flavorful and we had plenty of leftovers. We enjoyed it again on the ferry to Victoria the next day.
I am not sure what is going on there, but the service was terrible on the 2 times we decided to come for dinner here.
Our first time for this and we got a take away for 4 people. The Foo Yung was excellent and the veggie fried rice was perfect. The Szechuan Chicken was over cooked and quite mild. The seafood was overall good but the squid was either...More
Whenever we head over to the North Shore, we always stop in for lunch. This restaurant never disappoints us. My personal favourite is the rice noodles with beef. My husband loves the pad Thai. It is reasonably priced, tasty and has great service. What more...More
We order in from here fairly regularly. The food is tastier/more flavorful than regular Chinese food, even if you order the 'regular' Chinese dishes. We've liked everything we've tried - ginger beef, sweet and sour pork, vegetable dishes.
We tried five dishes. The eggplant with beef was flawless. Not oily (at our request). The Shanghai dumplings were subgrade but I love this cuisine so I'm somewhat of an expert. The skin was too thick. The soup volume was low. Interestingly each piece was...More
Great quality ingredients, delicious flavour in an inviting setting. The staff were friendly and accommodating. Good options for vegetarians.
stop by for lunch special, handy, fairly new, clean, food was good. nothing special but would return..
Great menu, excellent food, generous servings, and, what's more, the price is right, especially for the lunch specials. The restaurant changed name and ownership about two years ago and now has a family-owned atmosphere, with a table with toys, books, and art materials for the...More
We had the ginger and green onion chicken, chicken chow mien and pork dumplings. Everything was delicious, friendly and welcoming service and nice decor of the restaurant. Definitely filled our craving for dim sum!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d11906367-Reviews-One_More_Szechuan_Chinese_Cuisine-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ophelia,"Food was delicious. Service was great. Fun and lively atmosphere! Came here because we were recommended by our tour guide. This place does not disappoint.
Great Mexican restaurant. We really enjoyed the margaritas. The bone marrow tacos were great - very flavorful. The ambience was nice and our server was cheerful, informative and fun. The kids liked the non-alcoholic beverages. The decor was colorful, loud and interesting.
Really enjoyed this place. Great vibe, lovely interior. Delicious starters: tomato and halloumi salad, and steak tortilla. Then really tasty trio de tacos. Punchy flavours, great service.
I tried the tacos and I wasn’t that impressed with them. Service was great but food is overpriced when i compared to other mexican restaurants in Vancouver
Ophelia was a great experience for us. Our waiter was very attentive and nice! We went during happy hour. The menu had a good mix of selection to choose from. The food and cocktails were delicious! Would definitely come back!
I have not been here for awhile and I thought their chicken enchilada dish was small, but it turned out not and also ordered the prawn ceviche tostados which was delicious. The enchilada had lots of shredded chicken and filling. Nice modern atmosphere and friendly...More
Amazing vibe!! Great experience. Great service. Amazing staff!! Margaritas are awesome!! Tacos are very delicious. Great salsas!! Overall amazing!!
We had a late reservation but the place was still packed. The service was very good, We had the Skirt Steak appy which was so delish that I could have had it as my meal. The tuna Tostada also very good. My main meal was...More
This should be a good restaurant. However, was there last night, had to wait over two hours for a meal, and over 40 minutes for a refill on the drink. Server was apologetic but the restaurant's attitude to the delay was reprehensible. Clearly, they were...More
The food was good and our waitress was great. The music was so loud we could hardly hear ourselves talk. When we spoke to the owner, he told us he liked it loud and at8:30 they would turn it up even louder
Beautiful restaurant. Great music. Good service. The menu is unique and inspiring. Vancouver has never seen Mexican food like this.
Food was delicious and service was great! Will definitely return. The appetizers were delicious and so were the entrees.
A hidden gem! Very fun vibe and a lively social scene that kicks in later in the evening. Menu is very cool with many creative options. Everything we ordered was delicious and perfectly prepared and plated.
What a nice surprise. No mystery “Trio” slop here. No wondering which restaurant am I in again? Interesting and cleverly prepared food. We had the Aguachile Negro, Prawn Ceviche Tostada (!!!!), Trio De Tacos & Cache Creek Ribeye. And of course Churros. Everything was prefect....More
Went to this restaurant for the first time with friends, as there had been lots of ""buzz"" about this place, generally not into trendy spots... But like to support local businesses especially post-pandemic. Lots of interesting food options, the taste was decent(ish) but unfortunately very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21256495-Reviews-Ophelia-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Opus Bar,"No On Tap product - no big deal as bars near have lots. Just seemed the bar staff was not attentive to greeting then serving.
the drinks are creative and the service is friendly! Great place to grab a drink during happy hour. would definitely recommend.
I sat in the bar for a light dinner- and it was great! creative, delicious and reasonably priced. exactly what I was looking for.
We all stayed the night at the pus and had our dinner at Ancora Restaurant. Before the meal we spent a couple of hours at the Opus Bar, where we had an area booked off for us to enjoy. The staff was excellent and very...More
We have been to Hapoy hour a number of times at the Opus bar . There is only the bartender mixing and serving. We where just there Saturday, again bartender mixing and serving . The bar was packed - the only way to get a...More
Some jerk was trying to impress his girl by singing along with the music. He was way too loud, off key and didn't know the words. The bartender just shrugged. I left and went across the street for a beer.
We went there for brunch and were seated quite quickly in a friendly manner. It went downhill from there. The service was slow and disinterested...had to grab the waiter for every need because he never checked how we were doing...salt and pepper!!! imagine! Coffee refills...not...More
The bar is small and modern, great location, but the people that run both the bar and restaurant (La Pentola) are what make the Opus a fantastic place to visit! The drinks have been good, the food next door is wonderful but the entire staff...More
Came in on a Wednesday which apparently is happy hour all day. Dropped off a family friend at the hotel which you'll notice has fantastic and friendly service and is worth mentioning. For a hotel bar-to be honest I did not expect much but the...More
A limited menu for Happy Hour prices, but the drinks were good and the food was tasty. Service was quick and friendly
I ordered one of their special cocktails. I could not taste the gin in it. That's a dealbreaker for me.
The lady serving behind the bar was quite unfriendly and we felt as if we were intruding by ordering a drink in the evening. Also, there was an 18% surcharge even though we only ordered two drinks (one each). Best to go to the other...More
Nice place to have a drink and relax. They had live music one night. Bartender and wait staff are very attentive and accommodating.
Happy hour is a real event here--as it is in other establishments. The beer and wine options are decent, but the small plate appetizers are excellent. The service is fast and friendly and the prices are great. The place is attractive and the crowd is...More
Great happy hour with $5 drinks and appies. Always buzzing, but not crowded.Adjacent to La Pentola Restaurant. Try the meatball appetizer- delicious!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7086198-Reviews-Opus_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Original Joe's,"We had a late lunch here, menu has some pub style items with a twist. Service was prompt and our food arrived about 20 min after ordering. Good quality was ok, not bad but nothing crazy good either.
This is a great place at Robson & Hamilton, downtown. We had a late lunch and everything was delicious. They have great looking drinks as well. Service was very good and the server helped us decide on what to order. It was good enough to...More
We had occasion, unfortunately to eat there twice, whist staying at the hotel. First time I ordered fish tacos, ....... don't do it! For a mere $22 you will be treated to, two tortillas, sparingly anointed with mayo, a miniscule sprinkle of coleslaw and two...More
Went here with a group of 9 & it happened to be happy hour (2pm-5pm) which worked out well for us. We each had a variety of menu items which included Mini Stuffed Yorkies Chicken Wings 1LB Crispy Chicken Burger Dry Ribs Chicken Tenders French...More
We came in for supper early evening the place was busy but we were seated quickly and staff were very attentive. The menu was clear we we made choices and were offered option that we didn't know about such as changing 50% of our fries...More
Located next door to Rosedale on Robson hotel. Informal bar with good choice of easy meals such as the ubiquitous burger in various forms, but also fish and chips and a range of salads. Several screens for the sports fans and music for the rest...More
An excellent lively sports bar with great food and service. Value for money was well worth it. Plenty of space and prompt attentive service.
Considering that we were not dining within a “dinner rush” time frame , the service was abysmally slow ! Rather expensive for the quality of food, too. They seem to cater to drinkers at the bar. Multitudinous tv screens for sports & loud unappealing music...More
Decided to get a late night snack after a Canucks game and were staying at the adjoining hotel. Was happy hour so we ordered the dry ribs off the happy hour menu and two french onion soups off the main menu. Ribs very very good...More
Popped in here on our first evening in Vancouver staying at a nearby hotel. A fairly large place and was not very busy the time we attended. Service was decent and food was decent also. An average restaurant with several choices to choose from. On...More
Was Hopkins for a Nice, juicy burger and Home Made Fries. Git a dry, tasteless burger and super salto Fries. A big dissapointment!
We stayed at the Rosedale on Robson and Original Joe's was in the hotel's building and outside on the patio. Unfortunately, the restaurant is closed up tight, all the boxed plants are stone-cold dead outside, and litter is collecting where we expected to see outdoor...More
Excellent food and excellent service and clean restaurant. Following all COVID-19 protocols and great social distancing.
Thanks for visiting!
My friends and I ordered through DoorDash, we got the nachos with the cajun chicken addition and paid an extra $3.25 EACH to add guacamole and get extra sour cream and salsa thinking there wouldn't be enough for all the nachos. Not only is that...More
We wanted to go somewhere casual after the game. I had their burger and it was good. Happy drinks were ok.
Thanks for sharing your feedback with us!",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8566829-Reviews-Original_Joe_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Origo Club,"I just discovered this amazing place. It’s a French pastry/restaurant very clean and with a nice vibe. I love them almond croissants because they don’t have that fake taste of almond essence. Very delicious and very fresh. Just a small opinion for the owners is...More
We had ordered a set 3 course dinner,an appetizer of fole gras poele ( duck liver), steak and pasta.My pasta was delicious and tasty with its special sauce.Temperature of the sauce at bottom of plate was hot.The duck liver was very good.Service was excellent and...More
went here with my wife over the weekend. The Table d'hote selection was a great price. 3 courses for CAD 65, anything from the menu. The wine list is very impressive, but I was driving. The food was great the service first class. Will be...More
We, a party of 8, visited on a very busy Saturday evening. Service was a little slow and not as good as expected. However, they apologized and offer to waive the mandatory 18% gratitude. We all ordered the set menu for $65 per person. This...More
This restaurant is quite nice, it has an upscale, modern atmosphere without being pretentious. Our meal was tasty and the $65 3-course menu was a very good deal for the quality of food we received. The escargot was particularly good and very fresh, and the...More
The place was nice, service was very good. The menu was also good. The CAD65 prix fixe menu for 3 courses was a steal by New York City standard. However, because we had eaten too much and we planned to eat 6 jumbo uni after...More
Thank you for a wonderful meal, we will be back, wheel chair non talking customer and all - love the art work and the out of this world pastries
It was a nice impromptu dinner out, mid week. Great to have a really fine dining venue in Richmond, with a refined mix of classic French cuisine with an Asian twist. Well presented food, efficient & attentive service, and very appreciated seating lay out. No...More
all dishes, salad, scallops , beef tartare, pasta with trueffel, apple dessert ////all excellent and in regards of french food with the le crocodile the best in vancouver .... service very attentive and good... problem is : the room is to bright and steril....and the...More
Heard some great feedback about this restaurant and wanted to try it out. There aren't many French restaurants in Richmond so I was excited. The restaurant looked immaculate, very well designed and looks top notch. Staff were very friendly and extremely attentive. We ordered escargot,...More
My friends and I went to this restaurant last week for dinner and we were very impressed with the quality of food, we really enjoyed. We started with the beef tartare (really delicious eventhouh I don't like raw food), the mussels were excellent (couldn't get...More
The service was impeccable, the interiors, the china, and the ""O"" shaped tray are all exquisite. Origo Club offers upscale French cuisine, coffee shop/afternoon tea place and an art gallery, so I expect they pay attention to every detail. They got most of them right,...More
The number of places that you can enjoy Afternoon Tea has certainly ramped up in Vancouver over the last couple of years. One of the newer and splashier places is Origo Club in Richmond. What sets Origo apart from other places that serve Afternoon Tea...More
One tends to look for fine dining in Downtown area when in Vancouver. Origo now pulls you to Richmond, an area that's known for a high concentration of Asian cuisine. Opened only a few months ago, it provides some sumptuous French affair. Menu is small...More",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d15235170-Reviews-Origo_Club-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Orto Artisan Pasta,"A beautiful garden oasis , you would never guess you are 1/2 a block off Marine Drive in North Vancouver. Great food and great service. What's not to love!
This was our second visit in a week. Orto is that good. Our first visit was for brunch and it was divine. I had a frittata which was light as air with tasty ratatouille. My partner had the brunch special. He loved it, especially the...More
Attentive staff, good service and well prepared, fresh food. Most enjoyable experience. Delightful garden setting for outdoor dining
Well, this place knocked my socks off. Located in a back alley, looks non descript, sat outside in a lovely garden, waiter was great, food was just outstanding, I had squid spaghetti with scallops and prawns, and it was off the charts.
In response to your review: : A delicious dinner seated in a fabulous garden with friendly, attentive staff. A perfect evening. Thank you 😊
We go to Orto for lunch and dinner often. It is by far our favorite restaurant. The food appeals to all ages. Our 5 year old grandson asks to go to Orto, so you know it has to be good. The staff are friendly and...More
Fabulous lunch! Spent 3 hours catching up with a dear friend. No one rushed us to leave. Great peaceful afternoon. Best place ever. I’ll be back!!
Great service, fabulous food and beautiful setting in the back garden. The consistency of quality and service is hard to find in restaurants today. This is a gem!
Best garden/ patio in North Vancouver. As always the food and wine were superb and the service was fabulous. Highly recommend!
This place is absolutely dreamy! An oasis in North Vancouver, you sit in a beautiful garden filled with beautiful flowers and herbs and the food is exquisite. Are we in Provence? Last time we were there, we shared the tomato tarte tatin with the Brussels...More
I have written several reviews for Orto and my opinion of the food, service and ambience is always the same - tres, tres bien tourjours. I have taken many friends and family to Orto over the years and they all have enjoyed their visit ....More
We took a retired executive chef for a birthday lunch. It was a sunny day for his first visit to Orto and he described the lunch as “stunning,” high praise from a pro!
A perfect lunch in the garden for a regular meeting with a friend. Orto is consistently fantastic - wonderful food, marvelous service. Patricia
Too bad we couldn't leave 10 stars! As my husband said, this was one of the top 5 meals in our lifetime! 100%! Outstanding, superb, a taste sensation! Orto is a hidden gem that never disappoints. Wonderful service, great atmosphere, and a lovely proprietor who...More
Lovely evening, delicious food & wine orchestrated by the charming Brigette made our evening very special!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d12618309-Reviews-Orto_Artisan_Pasta-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Osaka Sushi,"The fish is often old, the prices are too high and the service is mediocre. There are much better places next to Westview.
The fish is often old, the prices are too high and the service is mediocre. There are much better places next to Westview.
I had originally been to Osaka in the past so my review may be a small bit bias, but in those past experiences and most importantly my most recent experience have all been fantastic. The service is done with a kind greeting and guiding you...More
I had originally been to Osaka in the past so my review may be a small bit bias, but in those past experiences and most importantly my most recent experience have all been fantastic. The service is done with a kind greeting and guiding you...More
Very yummy food can be expensive but worth the money. their sushi is amazingly cooked and yummy always go here after the quarry rock hike
Very yummy food can be expensive but worth the money. their sushi is amazingly cooked and yummy always go here after the quarry rock hike
We are visiting from Hamilton, Ontario. So while on the west coast my son wanted to have some authentic sushi and raw Salmon. This place fit the bill, the sushi and Salmon was fantastic. My son said the best sushi he has ever had.
We are visiting from Hamilton, Ontario. So while on the west coast my son wanted to have some authentic sushi and raw Salmon. This place fit the bill, the sushi and Salmon was fantastic. My son said the best sushi he has ever had.
We had the Dinner Box B which included sashimi, teriyaki, spinach, miso soup, salmon skin appetizer, and a sushi roll. A lot of food for a decent price. My only disappointment is that the restroom wasn't better maintained.
We had the Dinner Box B which included sashimi, teriyaki, spinach, miso soup, salmon skin appetizer, and a sushi roll. A lot of food for a decent price. My only disappointment is that the restroom wasn't better maintained.
Osaka Sushi located in a Deep Cove of North Vancouver. Just a short distance walk to the deep tranquil water of Burrard Inlet. The restaurant has a sparkling wholesome setting and charming decoration. The service was prompting cordial and professional. The servers were warm, friendly...More
Osaka Sushi located in a Deep Cove of North Vancouver. Just a short distance walk to the deep tranquil water of Burrard Inlet. The restaurant has a sparkling wholesome setting and charming decoration. The service was prompting cordial and professional. The servers were warm, friendly...More
I wrote a review last year, but this is a favourite restaurant that I visit regularly, and the last time I remembered to take a photo that I would like to share of my favourite Lunch Box B to go and would like to update...More
I wrote a review last year, but this is a favourite restaurant that I visit regularly, and the last time I remembered to take a photo that I would like to share of my favourite Lunch Box B to go and would like to update...More
Sushi is good, but not the best I ever had in Vancouver and area, also is aging to be a bit pricy. But not bad.
Sushi is good, but not the best I ever had in Vancouver and area, also is aging to be a bit pricy. But not bad.
I have no idea how they do this, but so far it is the best sashimi place in the city. Everything is 5 out of 5
I have no idea how they do this, but so far it is the best sashimi place in the city. Everything is 5 out of 5
Very happy with visit - food was fresh and authentic - service was very fast and the price was also reasonable - easy to recommend
Very happy with visit - food was fresh and authentic - service was very fast and the price was also reasonable - easy to recommend
Love this place. Sushi is fresh, fish portions are generous. The fish is the star. Our go to sushi place. A bit more pricey but you get what you pay for here. Highly recommend.
Love this place. Sushi is fresh, fish portions are generous. The fish is the star. Our go to sushi place. A bit more pricey but you get what you pay for here. Highly recommend.
Excellent authentic Japanese food, exceptional quality and very friendly, fast and efficient service. I live in the area and love to go regularly for lunch and dinner. During the summer / tourist season it can be very tricky to find parking so I am happy...More
Excellent authentic Japanese food, exceptional quality and very friendly, fast and efficient service. I live in the area and love to go regularly for lunch and dinner. During the summer / tourist season it can be very tricky to find parking so I am happy...More
Lovely restaurant with really nice and interesting sushi choices. I would recommend the sunshine roll it's really delicious with a piece of charred salmon on top. The value is good for the quality of the rolls and the restaurant is spacious and a nice place...More
Lovely restaurant with really nice and interesting sushi choices. I would recommend the sunshine roll it's really delicious with a piece of charred salmon on top. The value is good for the quality of the rolls and the restaurant is spacious and a nice place...More
Nice place, good service and nice people serving good food and sushi . Easy to find in deep Cove near the harbor at Main Street.
Nice place, good service and nice people serving good food and sushi . Easy to find in deep Cove near the harbor at Main Street.
The three of us decided to try the Osaka Sushi just before it started to rain! The service and food was excellent and we thoroughly enjoyed our bento box meals.
The three of us decided to try the Osaka Sushi just before it started to rain! The service and food was excellent and we thoroughly enjoyed our bento box meals.
Came here as it was just round the corner from our hotel, but it was the best choice! The place is lovely and cozy, with artful decor and helpful and friendly staff. The food is incredible, large portions for a small price. They were also...More
Came here as it was just round the corner from our hotel, but it was the best choice! The place is lovely and cozy, with artful decor and helpful and friendly staff. The food is incredible, large portions for a small price. They were also...More
Large portions and well priced. That being said you get what you pay for. Quantity over quality. Take out only right now and staff are super. That saved it from a one.
Large portions and well priced. That being said you get what you pay for. Quantity over quality. Take out only right now and staff are super. That saved it from a one.
As well as delightful staff the food at Osaka is fresh and plentiful. We tried several bento boxes and each equally delicious. Outstanding service and courteous staff. I also ordered a variety if sushi for a party and everyone commented that it was the best...More
As well as delightful staff the food at Osaka is fresh and plentiful. We tried several bento boxes and each equally delicious. Outstanding service and courteous staff. I also ordered a variety if sushi for a party and everyone commented that it was the best...More
I am always very satisfied with Osaka sushi spicy salmon sashimi combo set. It is awesome. My kids likes chicken roll and crispy roll. My husband's favourite is red dragon roll. So YUMMY !!!
I am always very satisfied with Osaka sushi spicy salmon sashimi combo set. It is awesome. My kids likes chicken roll and crispy roll. My husband's favourite is red dragon roll. So YUMMY !!!
We have been going to this restaurant for many years through different owners. We generally order take out, about once a week. In recent months it has become clear that they do not answer their phone or simply turn it off! ""too busy to answer...More
We have been going to this restaurant for many years through different owners. We generally order take out, about once a week. In recent months it has become clear that they do not answer their phone or simply turn it off! ""too busy to answer...More
Loved the hot tea offered at the entrance. Miso soup was excellent! Maki (got the red ruby 8pcs) were tasty. Unfortunately, toro sashimi was cut a bit too thick, and so a bit annoying to be eaten easily, and the nigiri were huge, too! Prices...More
Loved the hot tea offered at the entrance. Miso soup was excellent! Maki (got the red ruby 8pcs) were tasty. Unfortunately, toro sashimi was cut a bit too thick, and so a bit annoying to be eaten easily, and the nigiri were huge, too! Prices...More
We love sushi and this is one of our favourite places. Its great for lunch or for dinner. The specialty rolls and seaweed salad are excellent. The staff are very friendly and the prices are quite reasonable considering the quality of the food and how...More
We love sushi and this is one of our favourite places. Its great for lunch or for dinner. The specialty rolls and seaweed salad are excellent. The staff are very friendly and the prices are quite reasonable considering the quality of the food and how...More
I ordered take out and waited 45 Min. The wait was worth it though as the Sushi and Takoyaki was definitely worth it.
I ordered take out and waited 45 Min. The wait was worth it though as the Sushi and Takoyaki was definitely worth it.
Staff is friendly, a large sushi selection, good price, fresh and flavorful food, offers take-out and delivery
Staff is friendly, a large sushi selection, good price, fresh and flavorful food, offers take-out and delivery
The sushi was satisfying and well priced. Served with complimentary green tea, the meal was so lovely that I ended up eating here three times whilst staying in the area. I recommend the yam and avocado rolls!
The sushi was satisfying and well priced. Served with complimentary green tea, the meal was so lovely that I ended up eating here three times whilst staying in the area. I recommend the yam and avocado rolls!
We were 4 for dinner and we all left stuffed! The portions were much more generous than we expected. The prices were excellent for the quantity of fish we got. We had 3 kinds of sushi, tuna sashimi, salmon sashimi and beef terriaki. Service was...More
We were 4 for dinner and we all left stuffed! The portions were much more generous than we expected. The prices were excellent for the quantity of fish we got. We had 3 kinds of sushi, tuna sashimi, salmon sashimi and beef terriaki. Service was...More
It was late and we were looking for a place for dinner, happened in front of Osaka Sushi, which seemed interesting (it was crowded,it had to mean something). Great choice, a good variety of sushi and rolls, we tried different dishes and everyone was satisfied.
It was late and we were looking for a place for dinner, happened in front of Osaka Sushi, which seemed interesting (it was crowded,it had to mean something). Great choice, a good variety of sushi and rolls, we tried different dishes and everyone was satisfied.
Given that this is an area where there are about several options in walking distance, a sushi place needs to be great to make a dent in the market. I’m happy to say Osaka delivers, at least on the food I’ve ordered off their immense...More
Given that this is an area where there are about several options in walking distance, a sushi place needs to be great to make a dent in the market. I’m happy to say Osaka delivers, at least on the food I’ve ordered off their immense...More
I ordered an Atlantic roll and a Rainbow 'oshi' roll. When I ordered, I thought the Rainbow oshi roll would be a variety of the torched oshi rolls - instead it's the regular rainbow roll (rice with assorted sashimi and avocado on top), except pressed...More
I ordered an Atlantic roll and a Rainbow 'oshi' roll. When I ordered, I thought the Rainbow oshi roll would be a variety of the torched oshi rolls - instead it's the regular rainbow roll (rice with assorted sashimi and avocado on top), except pressed...More
We popped in here from our nearby rental and we were very pleasantly surprised. We ordered quite a variety of preparations and everything was fresh and delicious - especially crucial with seafood. Best sushi I've ever had, and the prices are wonderfully low, at least...More
We popped in here from our nearby rental and we were very pleasantly surprised. We ordered quite a variety of preparations and everything was fresh and delicious - especially crucial with seafood. Best sushi I've ever had, and the prices are wonderfully low, at least...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1573172-Reviews-Osaka_Sushi-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Osaka Teppanyaki Steak & Seafood House,"This was our first time there but it won’t be our last. Like any other teppanyaki restaurant, the chefs cook in front of you while performing a few neat tricks with their knife. The service was great and the dishes were amazing. Overall, it was...More
This was my first time there and certainly won’t be my last. The chefs are next level and are so funny. They cook in front of you and create a story board with their food. Everything was cooked to perfection, the service was exceptional and...More
We had a great dinner at Osaka Teppanyaki. I would recommend making reservations and eating here for any occasion. The food was great and the chef was fun! Thank you Osaka Teppanyaki!
Great experience. The food was delicious and the experience was fun. The staff were great! We will definitely return. Thank you for a great experience!
Went last night for dinner with my two adult daughters, son in law and 4 year old grand son. As always, the food was really enjoyable, cooked to perfection, and lots of it. Service from all the staff was spot on. What made this so...More
Whenever our family is in Vancouver, we try to make sure we visit Osaka Teppanyaki. The staff are friendly and the food is amazing. The owner, Roland, is a fantastic chef and a wonderful host. He never fails to make us feel welcome. I am...More
Had a really pleasant time here at Osaka Teppanyaki, the prices are really good and the food portions are amazing. The fried rice here is so good and the staff are incredible. Highly recommend checking this place out.
I do not know why ,for the last 20 years when I feel like Teppanyaki ,I all way end up in Kobes down town ! my nephew in town for few days ,so he choose the Osaka for family dinner , ,( I did read...More
My husband and I love this place. All the staff are friendly and I promise you won’t wait long for a drink!!! We like this restaurant more than the over priced Kobe’s steakhouse!!! Also unlike Kobe’s you are never rushed out for the next seating....More
Went there on Valentines eve, its wasnt too busy just enough to have a good ambiance. Lift my hat to the 2 very efficient waitresses.Good Job. The cooks are funny and entertaining and the food is on point, a lot of food! They have a...More
Great service and the food was delicious and plenty of it. large portions. We will definitely be back again
Haven’t been here for a while. Been to Kobe and Osaka. This is the cheaper of the two. Use a coupon from entertainment book. Paying 35-75$ is just dumb. Serving are a lot for one. Our cook wasn’t that showy. Didn’t do any tricks. I...More
On 2 occasions, I observed the table-side chefs had ""deadpan"" (pronounced amusing close to Teppan!) expression. Very few or none interactions with us even when I initiated some contacts or wisecracks. Apparently, their attitue is ""client-dependent"". They were extremely responsively to certain category of clients....More
We have totally enjoyed our dining experience every time we've gone to this restaurant. Yes, it needs a little updating but the chef at your table, the entertainment, and the good food far outweigh any negative. There were 8 of us and everyone had a...More
We visited Osaka Teppanyaki with friends from Vancouver who ate there many times before. The food is being prepared directly at the table and was very delicious. Staff was very friendly and put up a great show when preparing our dinner. We can especially recommend...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707566-Reviews-Osaka_Teppanyaki_Steak_Seafood_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Osteria Savio Volpe,"Energetic and vibrant place to enjoy great food, great service, large wine selection of Italy’s best. Lisa the sommelier who was very knowledgeable beyond her years was most helpful and ensured we would have a fantastic night. Michelin should have given this at least a...More
Delicious food and drink in a lively atmosphere. You get what you pay for. It's pricey place but the service is great and the food is even better.
We absolutely loved Savio Volpe for the warm welcome, bright contemporary room, friendly and knowledgeable service and truly imaginative, delicious food. Our charming server Rob suggested we order the five-course service famiglia which was spot on. After determining our likes and dislikes, he chose the...More
Fantastic food, great service and ambiance! We chose the family style menu, each course was amazing and plentiful. A great restaurant and we can’t wait to go again.
The food 100%, the ambiance 100%, the service…..not so perfect. I am writing this review because I am very disappointed about the way the staff, especially our waiter ASSUMED that our group was going to have the “family meal”. We had just arrived at the...More
Wonderful food and exceptional service from Rob. We had the Dine A La Familia 🤌🤌 All the 5 courses were great and we even got a bonus course because Rob was such a legend of a waiter. The highlight for me was the cannoli 🤌🤌...More
I have been to Osteria Savio Volpe several times and NEVER disappointed, If I was forced at gunpoint to say one bad thing about it, it would be the level of noise when it is busy....and it's ALWAY busy. One evening, we had a table...More
4 colleagues and I dined family style and although we had a complex array of dietary restrictions the incomprable Simon curated a beautiful meal for us. Many diverse dishes all with complexity and deliciousness we will long remember. The service puts this dining option into...More
Savio Volpe serves a menu of simple but soulful Italian dishes made with fresh regionally-sourced ingredients. Make sure to order at least one pasta dish when you visit and end the meal with their decadent chocolate tart!
My friend and I went to Osteria Savio for the first time last evening. Hard to get reservations so they were made weeks in advance and we were excited to try out this restaurant. The quality of food is good but very overpriced. My friend...More
As a guest of a dear friend I had so looked forward to our meal together, unfortunately my optimism was misplaced. The quality of the food ranged from a risotto that was more like porridge (which was replaced by attentive staff) and burnt cabbage with...More
The only problem I have with Osteria Savio Volpe is getting a reservation, it's busy. After going last night I understand why. The food is on another level for Vancouver. Had heard many accolades about the menu and service but experiencing it first hand was...More
All dishes tried were quite delicious although I feel the cappelletti needed a bit more pepper. Service was so so and the space somewhat loud. The tiramisu was likely the best I have tried in a long time. Prices were high, so a point deduction.
All meals were fantastic! We ordered Spaghetti alla Nerano, Octopus Carpaccio, and Cannoli. Especially Octopus was really good, a various kind of ingredients were matched perfectly. The price was a little bit expensive, but they deserve it. Service was also excellent. Every staffs cared about...More
The noise level is Loud, but after your first taste of any food, you don’t notice and are in the zone. Everything you eat is fantastic! This is the best Italian meal that we have been fortunate enough to have tried. From salads, veggies to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8820970-Reviews-Osteria_Savio_Volpe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Oyama Sausage,"This terrific Granville Island Specialty shop featuring 3 ways to get the products—in person, pre-order pick-up,which we frequently do and use home delivery as advertised on their website..one of the important features is this stores dedication to observing the COVID-19 guidelines.. once you are present...More
Oyama Sausage Co. became a favorite place from the time it opened on Granville Island in Vancouver in 2001. Each time I went, I became an ever greater fan, with it also later becoming a special place to procure the sumptuous artisan pâtés, cured meats...More
They have the absolute best fresh sausages, cured hams, patés, salamis, don't come here if you're a vegetarian! I've been buying from Oyama since they opened many years ago, can't match their quality and freshness.
We enjoyed a wide variety of samples from Oyama Sausage during a foodie tour of the Granville Island Public Market. The duck prosciutto was off the chart.
Excellent products - really, couldn't be better! We selected a few different dried sausages and meats for a charcuterie board. Each one was perfect. There is so much choice and if you need help deciding, ask. The people there know their products. We had duck...More
The staff isn't particularly pleasant, but I don't mind because the food was good. They knew their stuff and were quick. I went when they weren't that busy but I could see it getting very busy on weekends. They gave me tips for packing it...More
Duck prosciutto that is luscious. Salami with Truffles that is earthy and filled with bits of the black fungus. Bison braciola that is intense and has a chew to it. Cuck and apricot pate that is smooth and deep flavored. You can't go wrong with...More
Good bacon in many forms, likewise huge selection of cheese, sausages, pate, cooked chicken beef ham etc to be sliced in whatever volume and thickness you prefer. The confit de canard (duck cured in its own fat - the tenderest duck you will ever eat)...More
A carnivore's (and cheese-lover)'s paradise, Oyama has been making exquisite sausages, handmade bacon, patés, hams and other charcuterie since Granville Island was founded. It is one of the key destinations in Canada for smoked, cured and fresh-cut meats and other treasures, with an incredibly knowledgeable...More
We found Oyama Sausage during our food tour of Granville Island which we did on our first day in Vancouver. It is SOOO good! We had to return again before leaving this wonderful city. A couple of their salamis are the best I've ever had....More
Don't be daunted by the never-ending excessive lineups - they are the real thing. Always full of meat and very little filler, they make Vancouver's best sausages, hands down. The selection rotates often and they always have a generous selection. They also have an excellent...More
Sometimes I will make a trip to the market just to dash in for my supply of cured meats. There is always a line up but the staff are fast and efficient, they always have to time to give you tastes and answer all your...More
Stopped in to try some of their sausages. Took a number for a short wait and got called up by a friendly fellow who seemed happy to serve us. I asked for him to slice the kolbasa which he did by hand. When I added...More
We tried a number of different meats as part of a food tour and it was all very good. Glad we stopped in.
Because we love to stop for a picnic or snacks in our hotel room we head for Granville Island - Oyama's sausage counter. What a selection of pates! Our favorite is the Belgium Pate, Rabbit Pate or just try any one of the 12+. Sausages...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9589925-Reviews-Oyama_Sausage-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Oyster Express,"Awesome oyster selection with an outstanding knowledge of them This small and cozy bar offers an incredible selection of local harvested oysters which are super fresh and delicious. That’s a must go, if you like oysters
Small, thoughtful, delicious. Oyster express is not a place for you to meet up with 50 of your closest friends for a bud lite. It is however the best place for the freshest, well manicured oysters in all of the city! The staff are great...More
As usual, great service and perfect happy hour from 5 to 7pm. Although my fav sun seekers were not on the happy hour list, I ordered them anyway. I love happy hour because I get introduced to new oysters and I really enjoyed the creaminess...More
Really surprised to find this great, little, non pretentious oyster bar at the far end of Chinatown. Excellent variety of oysters to try and good selection of alcohol as well. They have daily specials too at discount prices, with no discount on the quality of...More
I love oysters so I knew I had to try this place when a friend of mine recommended it. I am so glad I did! The oysters were fresh and delicious and so good. I would definitely come back for more. I love that they...More
Very cute small restaurant with a great atmosphere. Good selection of oysters and the service was very friendly. Didn’t have a chance to try the steamed mussels (cause we were so full from oysters) but definitely will be back to try them!!
I've eaten here a few times now. The special of the day changes so you get to try oysters from different locations. The decor is basic and not fancy but the oysters are really fresh and tasty. The focus is all on the food and...More
My girlfriend and I had a craving for oysters as we were passing through downtown on the way home from Whistler. Oyster Express offers daily deals if you get there early. They had two specials on: one for Nanoose Bay Oysters for $1.50 per shell...More
Sync is found in Oysters and having fresh Oysters is like directly charging syns inside the body. After a long day from the outlets, a good place to go is Oyster Express. Friendly atmosphere and greeting is found here. We had Brach Angles and Kusshi....More
Great little spot that use to be a clothing store turned Oyster Bar. The atmosphere and freshness is second to none. If you are looking for a quick place to have pre drinks and appies this is it! Wine and sparkling too.
A surprise location on the fringes of Chinatown, it's a cozy little treasure that we want to keep a secret... but we like them so much we want them to be successful, so here's me letting the cat out of the bag. THE CLEANEST SHUCKS...More
This hidden gem on Keefer Street is a delicious place to visit. If you are obsessed with finding good buck a shucks, these guys have a great variety that is not as expensive as some of the other places in downtown. There are also some...More
Dinner with the family, was impressed immediately by the warm ambience and the real casual feel. Watch our oysters getting schucked and they were delicious. Not sure if they had a nice stout on the menu but that is all I would add if not,...More
I've been going to Oyster Express since they opened up a few years ago and I am always happy with the high quality oysters, friendly service and relaxed atmosphere there. The oyster selections are always super fresh and the owners know what they're doing. Keep...More
After over 2 weeks of craving for oysters I finally decided to get off work early and get my craving fixed, so I googled oysters and this place showed up on the list. I went there and was so glad that I chose this place....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3188703-Reviews-Oyster_Express-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
P2B Bistro & Bar,"While staying across the street at the Coast pre-cruise, we tried the P2B Bistro because it was a short walk for my older parents and they also accept Open Table reservations. The restaurant is up a level from Hasting St but there's an elevator next...More
Perfectly good food and a nice but nosiest terrace with view of harbour. Had a good halibut and veg and a good club sandwich. Staff friendly and engaged and good service. Nice for a hotel restaurant. Not especially cheap but good if you are staying...More
We had a great fresh breakfast, went in for drinks and appetizers more than once, they also have a happy hour, The restaurnat is bright and open !
The in-house restaurant of the Pinnacle Harbourview Hotel is quiet, with widely-spaced tables and a massive wall of windows facing Coal Harbour. Nice happy hour selections from 3 to 6 and our food was always hot and delicious. Staff were friendly and attentive.
I stayed at the hotel for a conference, and one evening I was too tired to go venturing out. The servers are just so nice, the COVID protocols are good, and I enjoyed my meal very much Nice views as well.
Had a dinner and breakfast at the P2B Bistro. Food was great. Was packaged so we could take it back to the room to eat. The service that we experienced was great, from bartender to hostess who took our orders. Definitely recommend the P2B as...More
Due to limited time I ate several meals here and all were excellent with a nice selection. Breakfast was my favourite and was more like brunch! Nice selection of wines for dinner as well and great service.
Easy access to this restaurant will easily be the highlight of a stay at the Pinnacle Hotel Harborfront!
We took advantage of the restaurant in our hotel after a late morning early afternoon to grab a bite to eat and a beer and watch the Jays game. Food was great, a local craft beer was very good and our bartender server was incredibly...More
We ordered take out, and after calling the restaurant +5 times with negative results, had to walk there. Food was ordered and we were told we would get a call when it was ready. After 45 mins with no call, we called in and were...More
I stayed in this hotel for 3 nights and loved eating breakfast here every day. Pavel, one of the servers was exquisite with his service, kindness, care, professionalism and efficient. Rob, who I met in the evenings was also very good at his job. I...More
Waited almost 10 minutes before our drink orders were taken. Our sever acted so put out when we wanted to order food as well. The happy hour menu doesn’t specify what flavour of wings you get or if you get a choice. When I asked...More
Salmon dinner amazing and beef was great too. Breakfast is great and happy hour snacks and drinks great value but very good!! Hostess very friendly it’s a lobby bar atmosphere seems cold but service and food is amazing !!
The restaurant is in the Pinnacle Harbourfront Hotel which is where we stayed. We ate there a couple of times and had drinks. The happy hour prices are a great deal. The food was very good and the service as well. The bartenders made very...More
Went for diner and breakfast. The service is the best! The food was also good. Joseph was very nice to use.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1898505-Reviews-P2B_Bistro_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
PHO DON Vietnamese Restaurant,"Had a late dinner at this place after watching a concert at PNE with group of friends and our experienced was good. The place was very busy at 11pm but we still got seated right away. The place was short staffed and order taking and...More
I use a Pho Bo as a way to benchmark the acceptance of vietnamese cuisine in a city. The Pho Bo that was services to me here was excellent. The beef slices were perfect, the beef balls very good. A good fresh mouth flavour to...More
First time for me having Vietnamese food so I don’t have a basis for comparison but from a foodie perspective the meal was very tasty! We started with a salad roll, which was exactly that, salad and shrimp rolled in a spring roll wrapper with...More
I was originally planning on eating at a different restaurant but it was closed and this was close by. I had the sauteed shrimp & vegetables and it was excellent. Everything was fresh and was a colourful presentation. The service was good and the meal...More
I ordered veggie pho and a salad roll and the salad roll had 2 vegetables. iceberg lettuce and bean sprouts... really disappointing and I won't be going there again.
I ordered salad rolls and spring rolls, and it took them at least 30 minutes to serve me the spring rolls and I continued to wait for the salad rolls. Eventually I told them to change the salad rolls into a take-out and I was...More
I live near by. I went there lots of time and every time something was missing from the order, often they skip you if u r a single one for a bigger table! Very rude!
So good!! I ordered just brisket, all the veggies they had, spicy beef....so so yummy!! I finally found my favourite pho in Vancouver. They were quick and friendly. I ate most of it before I took the picture...
The premises were very clean, the staff were very courteous and helpful and the food was exceptional. The value was excellent.
Had late dinner with other friends after Fright Nights at PNE and our experienced was very good. I’m glad this restaurant is open late till 2am and a perfect place to have soup on a cold a d rainy night. The place is very spacious...More
their food is good, but service is slow - also no kids menu ,make things a bit tricky.. yo u have to order and extra dish for kids which is not ideal
The food here was fantastic, but their staff lacks of customer service skills. I went with my kids and they didn’t have a kids menu.
We came here for dinner. We found easy and free parking located in front of the strip plaza. We ordered the beef pho and pork and spring rolls with rice vermicelli. We agreed unanimously that both dishes lacked flavour. I rather have flavour over quantity....More
Our food was not that good- not much flavor & wish we had skipped it. The customer service was great, as well speed of getting our food to us
Don’t miss your chance to eat at this place. If you are in North Vancouver find East Hastings Street and discover a simply amazing late night Vietnamese Pho restaurant. The fried rice was rich with flavor while perfectly balanced in texture, including the crunchy rice...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4498925-Reviews-PHO_DON_Vietnamese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pacific Poke,"Stopped in and had a delicious lunch bowl. Would recommend it for lunch. Limited number of items, but food was fresh! Will try again
Pacific poke had remained one of my go-to’s for my poke fix. They have fresh ingredients and creative toppings. I usually build my own poke when I go. My typical bowl starts with half rice and half kale, followed by ahi tuna, negitoro, and spicy...More
Stopped in and had a delicious lunch bowl. Would recommend it for lunch. Limited number of items, but food was fresh!
First Poke bowl ive had and it was delicous!! Me and my sister got a take out and it was so much nicer than i expected. Im always slightly sceptical of uncooked fish but this was just wow! So fresh and flavorful! Im back in...More
Our friends suggested that we try Poke after we finished a movie at Tinseltown so we tried out Pacific Poke. It wasn’t busy at the time and it was our first time trying out poke. My wife had the Main and I tried the Maui....More
I just stopped in on a friends recommendation and was extremely pleased with my lunch. The fish is fresh, great service and a stylish and clean restaurant.
Good poke. Waters dispensers always empty. Lol. Get the quinoa!!! #protein #gains #superfoods #vegan
It was so delicious! I loved my veggie bowl and the coconut drink is addictive. The person working was lovely. I will go back!
If you're a fan of this cuisine -- whatever it's called -- you'd probably say this is a great place to eat. This was my first exposure to it. The bowl I ordered was called, I think, the Keefer. I liked most of the ingredients,...More
Hi Sara, Thanks for your review and giving poke a try! We do hope you try it again, and encourage anyone who has questions to ask our awesome staff! Thanks Teale
Every ingredient is fresh and treated with care. Each time is packed with flavor and can be eaten alone but mixed with all the other items creates a delicious treat. I wish there was one closer to my place. Oh! And do try their coconut...More
Our first time eating sushi this way was pretty enjoyable. The ingredients were freshly prepared. I didn't do the raw seafood but my other family members did. The bowls are delicious and the sauce is very tasty. The service was friendly and efficient. The staff...More
Pacific Poke came recommended. Decided on The Cali, the ingredients are fresh and tasty, the decor of the place is nice. Will come back for sure.
Three of us shared the Keefer and the Main. These are the 2 popular ones. The Keefer was more one flavoured while the Main had salmon, tuna and crab with a bit of heat. They put wasabi crunch on top that gives some texture. I...More
As a poke aficionado and having sampled many poke restaurants in Vancouver and Hawaii, I can say this place offers the best variety, presentaiton and creative ingredients. Go for the spicey options and they are delightfully balanced and pleasant.
I have never had poke before so have no idea of how close this came to traditional poke. We tried coming here on Labour Day but it was closed. Luckily it was open the day after. When we told the server we were new to...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11903508-Reviews-Pacific_Poke-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pacifico Pizzeria & Ristorante,"Has a short wait and both the hostess and waiter apologized which was nice. Ordered drinks and a pizza within a few minutes. After awhile I noticed someone who came in after us was done eating his pizza before ours came to the table. The...More
Delicious pizza! We had the 4 cheese, margarita, pepperoni, and Pacifico. All excellent! Service was slow but would definitely keep coming back!
Yes it is a Pizzeria, so we had a pizza. A 12"" pizza, Arugula & Prosciutto, which we shared and very nice it was too. Service was fine, and the beer tasted good. This place was just around the corner from our hotel and we...More
Ok, so let's get the good stuff out of the way first. We arrived sans a booking. Nice reception had to wait a couple of minutes whilst they sorted out a table and sat us down. My wife ordered a Beringer Main & Vine 9oz...More
We visited twice during our stay in Vancouver in May. Once we dined in and once we ordered take out. Both times the pizza was excellent with lots of flavours. The staff were courteous and polite. If you're looking for pizza we would definitely recommend!
The food was great; and the staff were very friendly and attentive. We were only in Vancouver for a week and went there twice, for dinner. The first time we ate Pizza and the second time we had separate meals of Lasagne and Canelloni.
I was here a few years ago, and it is just as excellent as it was then!! I got a quiet corner table during its Happy Hour, and thoroughly enjoyed my glass of red BC wine accompanying a very good pizzetta. Highly recommended!
Absolutely delicious tradition al wood fired Pizza!!! Hands down the BEST pizza by far I’ve ever had We shared a 10” more than enough for two Homemade Italian sausage The roasted garlic to DIE for!! The crust is so crispy and tasty YOU MUST TRY
Our family dined here with a group of friends in early August. This was actually our third or fourth visit to Pacifico in the last several years during trips to Vancouver. The food was pretty good as usual but the service was a bit spotty,...More
$100, 2 pizzas delivery. Appears to be quality ingredients. Unfortunately the pizzas arrived ""un-cooked"" . We had to heat up the oven (30 min) to cook the food and naturally our oven is not capable of making a crisp pizza, so it was a ""meal'...More
We went in between lunch and dinner so it was quieter than specific meal times. I had the Ravioli Special and it was originally spicy, however, when I advised I didn't care for, they (quickly) remade my meal without any spice and it was delicious!...More
Very good food, good service and good ambiance. Authentic pizza. I would recommend this place to anyone craving authentic pizzas
Arrived late in Vancouver after a long trans Atlantic flight. Made our way to Pacifico Pizzeria which was near to our hotel. We both had pizza and some nice red wine. The place has a nice atmosphere and pleasant staff. Great place if you want...More
We ate here our first night in Vancouver due to convenience of location. Turned out to be the best meal we ate in Vancouver, so good we returned a second time, and ordered take out once. Really good pizza, excellent GF crust and accommodating for...More
Downtown Vancouver when you find the locals lined up to get in you know its one of the best. Have never had a better pizza and service.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2061370-Reviews-Pacifico_Pizzeria_Ristorante-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Palate Kitchen,"Very nice food and service was friendly and efficient. There are three seating areas - two upstairs mezzanines plus the ground floor. We were seated on the ground floor next to the open kitchen by the stairs, which was very hot, even though there appeared...More
One of the best breakfasts we have have. We both ordered the cinnamon French toast with sides of bacon and sausage. Really good service and the food was second to none. The only downside was the noise of the extraction fan due to the open...More
We made a reservation and were greeted and seated right away. This place is a really cool picturesque location for a nice brunch and lunch. The food was perfect filling, not too much not too little. The service was also amazing. My friend recommended getting...More
This is an absolute gem just opposite our hotel. We had breakfast here both days we were in Vancouver and it is delicious. The food was amazing, filled us up for the day and great service. All servers were helpful, pleasant and efficient. Would highly...More
Fantastic brunch spot in downtown Vancouver near the cruise terminal. Food was amazing and the service was great.
We capped a two day, pre-cruise visit to Vancouver with a mid morning breakfast at this very nice spot about a block from the cruise terminal. This place has excellent coffee and upscale breakfast fare. Our group of three really enjoyed their meal selections. Two...More
Elegant dining area- high ceilings, well spaced tables, interesting artwork (for sale) by local artists. Tantalising range of all-day dining dishes, with emphasis on brunch options. Fresh, tasty, attractively prepared and presented, and served in generous portions. Highly customer-focused staff team, cheerful welcome followed by...More
Great food, great service, lived up to the hype for sure. It was a busy meal period but everything seemed so smooth, we had a not so pleasant experience at our hotel so this nice meal made it better.
Really lovely place. Way better than your average restaurant for breakfast, relatively small number of dishes (but plenty) and they do it well. Freshly prepared and very well done. Met by a welcoming smile and seated immediately drinks arrived quickly closely followed by our breakfast....More
The parking attendant at the fairmont recommended this for breakfast. This place was busy but we got right in. the French Toast is the best I ever had and look forward to going back soon. The setting is interesting and kind of SOHO but very...More
food and service were incredible. We both appreciated the quality of our breakfasts. We look forward to eating here on our next visit.
Fantastic atmosphere with high ceiling of the space, very funky modern yet well reserved decoration. Food quality was excellent. We had only issue with the echoing sound of music due to the space with concrete walls, hard to have conversation. But overall great, Will come...More
If you just need a coffee and nosh before 9am, this is a great alternative to a Starbucks. After 9 you can be seated and enjoy the eclectic menu. My wife had Avocado Toast with a perfect poached egg. I enjoyed the Kefta Skillet which...More
Recommended by our hotel staff this was not a disappointment. We went for breakfast on a weekday about 9 am. We got seated within 5 min. of arriving. This restaurant has plenty of room, tables are not crowded together and there is an upstairs level....More
Went here for breakfast and got the mamosa! Amazing!! Then a latte!! Even more amazing! And then I got the French toast!! The best French toast ever! So delicious!! Super flavourful!! Side potatoes are good too. Great staff!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d20158903-Reviews-Palate_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Palki Restaurant,"Tasty food in a nice environment, but the prices are very high, especially for the tandoori and vegetable dishes like dhal. The prices for these basic items are so high we would simply not return as you feel cheated. A bowl of curried lentils should...More
Good service , enough staff. Good food taste Indian lunch , hot serving , timely delivering the order Keep it up,………………………………
We have enjoyed meals here for years - we love this place! Even when we have to do takeout which has been more the case lately. Everything is delicious, and we particularly love the tandoori fish! A super friendly family business we recommend highly!
We have been eating at Palki's for many years. The food is always amazing and the service is exceptional. We have visited just my husband and I and many times with a large group of friends, they are always very accommodating.
We have been eating at Palki for many years. The food is always fresh, hot and amazing ! The service is second to none as well . Highly recommended !
Was staying in North Van during a recent business trip and based on the reviews had dinner at Palki. The reviews were spot on and it was a great meal. Servuce was excellent - attentive without being intrusive. The food was excellent - naan was...More
When living on the North Shore Pavlki was a regular destination. Living over town now … Anyhow we were jonsing for great Indian food today so off we went. Just like I remembered it. Nice decor that shows no sign of age. The service remains...More
I hadn't been to Palki for several years, but we were passing by today around late lunch- early dinner time and decided to eat Indian. Great choice. I'd forgotten how good this place is. Best Indian food I've had in years. I'm tempted to give...More
We love and eat Indian at least once a week. We have been all over India and spent weeks there. This restaurant is the first ""excellent"" Indian food we found in Vancouver after returning to Canada 10 years ago. Not cheap but worth it
Amazing atmosphere ! Everything about this place is nice. The service is excellent, they will look after you and ensure that guests have an amazing time. Food is garnished nicely and tastes great. They have some amazing appetizers. Thank you to the team of Palki
Ordered for the first time unfortunately during this Covid stuff.. so I was a bit confused about the menu. the owner was extremely helpful and kind! I can't wait to go back for more take out or dine in once !! Everything was so good....More
Had a really great time here the food was awesome the atmos great the service impeccable I had a great Time !
We ordered and picked up our food. One dish was missing. I called and they took care of it immediately.
This restaurant is a good choice for ""Dine n Wine"" The ambience is really impressive and customer service is just beyond the expectations. Yes, I definitely would recommend you! The vibrant colours, fresh and rich aromas and tempting flavours are just many reasons to love...More
Beautiful atmosphere, delectable appetizers, entrees, and desserts offered up by knowledgeable and professional staff.  We have waited too long to visit PALKI, and now that we have, we know we'll be back!!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d783046-Reviews-Palki_Restaurant-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Panago Pizza,"This is the third time that i feel this branch's priority is customer satisfaction. I went with my two children, it took us a while to make some changes to our order, the people were so patient and supportive and gave us advices to help...More
Our hotel recommended this pizza restaurant, so we walked a couple of blocks, we were surprised it was mainly take-out, but we were able to order a pizza and bottled sodas. They have a small counter with bar stools that you may sit at, but...More
Had a Steak melt pizza and was very delicious. Staff are friendly and prompt service made me repeat customer!
The secret is, after a few years of learning, is to only order 2 or 3 items on a pizza. I have been ordering 5 toppings and getting a skimpy looking pizza. Yesterday we ordered a few pizzas for a group and they were all...More
We had a pizza from Panago when we noticed this place across the road from our hotel. The service was great, it took 12 minutes for them to prepare and cook and it tasted great.
After a long day of driving from Creston the last thing we wanted to do was drive for dinner. Our accommodations for a few nights is the North Vancouver Hotel, which turns out to be immediately across the street from Panago. We had never tried...More
Being from the U.S., we had never eaten at a Panago before. This was far and away the best gluten free pizza we'd ever eaten. We ordered a half pepperoni, half Italian sausage. The crust was nice and crisp and did not taste like cardboard,...More
Pizza/Wings/Cheese stciks good nice and hot when delivered and on time. Large portion and we loved it. Would recommend to a friend
The Order and Pickup signs are right beside each other (like less than a foot) so are those signs really needed? Or just one sign that says ""talk to me"". The plant needs water.
We get these guys to deliver to us on Saturdays at work and they arrive fast and hot. Excellent range of choices and not had one that was not going to be had again. At least 10 different ones now in the last 6 months...More
We have been ordering from Panago for over 10 years. Our last pizza was not as good. It seemed to have less meat on the NY Deli. Maybe in the past we were just happy to get the kids fed and didn't notice. Also not...More
We had quick delivery of this pizza to our hotel, and everyone found something to like. There was enough variety in the offerings to please all tastes.
I don't know why but we got way more food than we ordered and it was all great! The employees were fantastic. Just a short walk from the North Vancouver Hotel, very convenient. SO glad they were open for our late dinner after spending the...More
We were so hungry when we got back to hotel in North Vancover. They delivered to our room promptly. Pizza was hot and fresh. Good value.
its panago its always consistent and good pizza, i had the hawaiian on the gluten free crust it was very good for a gluten free crust",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4874253-Reviews-Panago_Pizza-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Paramount Middle Eastern Cuisine,"We got a quiet night while on vacation. Walked here and it was busy but we got seated. The food was amazing and the portions were huge. We enjoyed so much we got takeout on our last night in Vancouver!
Came for lunch on a weekday. quick service, large portions. chicken was flavorful. rice was yummy. service was friendly and accommodating.
We had an amazing lunch here at Paramount. The food is incredible and the staff are super nice. The hummus is so good and the chicken is great. Definitely can't wait to come back again.
The food was as authentic as you get. The service was excellent and the environment was great. I definitely recommend AAA+
The food is ok but the table was sticky! so was the bench and everything gave me a very weird feeling. The portions were huge and now they're small! Very weird order system and the staff aren't even that friendly! The shawarma plate comes with...More
I don't really write reviews so the fact that I'm taking the time to write this one means something... Tonight was my fifth (and last) time eating here. The food here is great; however, the service is garbage and I refuse to support this owner....More
Ordered chicken shawarma, and it was pretty average. Chicken was dry and not that warm. Service was very slow and meal didn't come with pita basket as advertised in the menu. The male server wasn't wearing a face mask. Don't bother going here.
I want to revise my previous review, I was here today as we normally going to this location every month, regretfully, the quality was not the same, It makes us disappointed, also the restaurant was busy but just one server was running to service all...More
I was just THREATENED by the, I'm guessing it was the manager- for double checking an order. I went to pick up an order, and there was no order number on the meal bag to go, but I was told it was correct. Then I...More
Ordered a bunch of takeout for office dinner. Had the beef shawarma, some fries and humus and pita. Humus was fantastic. Perhaps the best Ive ever had. Pita was not very fresh and on dry side. Fries were cold but ok. Beef shawarma was disappointing....More
Recently Ive been here two times with my family and friends, the staffs are perfect, professional and helpful especially Ali, the foods are really well cooked and served with a nice design, We like the chicken Rap and mix dish. They cooked fresh delicious bread...More
Went on a busy Friday night. Had to wait a few minutes but staff very attentive and had us seated quickly. Service was excellent and portions very large. The guys shared a platter for 3 and couldn’t finish it: it was a huge variety of...More
With a group of four couples, I went to the Paramount last night. My husband and I have been a couple of times before and thought we'd bring a group of friends after a movie at the VIFF. A bit of a risk because none...More
We ordered:Beet Root spinach,& pecan salad. What you will receive: about one cup of fresh spinach on your plate.- NO PECANS! instead we received 3 small chopped up WALNUTS, one ""small"" cut up beet, some slivered onions and about 3/4 cup of pita chips to...More
Fresh baked pita. Fantastic. Mezze plate, fattoush salad and two kebabs beef and chicken. My wife and I split all the food. Tasty, delicious, fresh and yummy. Service was good, attentive and friendly.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12448550-Reviews-Paramount_Middle_Eastern_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Parker Rooftop,"Amazing hospitality. The entire service and management team are super welcoming and friendly and they made sure every single person had a great evening. The ambiance, food and cocktails are all beautifully curated. I will definitely be back
Wonderful drinks with the most amazing views. Love the 3 patios. Spring rolls were so yummy! Will definitely be back to try the happy hour.
Hi Rummy, Thank you for the 5 star review, we are very happy to hear you loved the space. We look forward to seeing you at happy hour soon.
Our new favorite place! Tasty food, warm service and jaw dropping views of this amazing city. Truly a night out on the town. Came hungry and thirsty and left full and satisfied! Will be back!
Thank you so much for taking the time to leave us such a wonderful review. We are so happy to hear you had such a great time with us here at Parker Rooftop. We are excited to host you again soon.
We popped by for Happy Hour without really knowing what to expect. There were 5 of us. We all went “woaaaah” when we got up to the top floor from the elevator. This place is GORGEOUS! It had just rained in the morning so was...More
Thank you so much for taking the time to write this fabulous review! We are very proud of what we have created up here and your kind words truly mean the world to us all. It was a pleasure to serve you and we very...More
I went to the Parker Rooftop with some friends for the soft opening and we were so impressed!! We just had snacks and a few cocktails, but everything we had was incredible, and the room is stunning! We can't wait to return for a full...More
Don, Thanks so much for the awesome review! Hope to see you back on the rooftop very soon. Claire
We had a fantastic time at the Parker. Both the indoor and outdoor spaces are stunning, the service was excellent, it had an all around great vibe. a rooftop cocktail bar in Vancouver is a rare gem and we will certainly be back. Highly recommend!
Jennie, Thank you so much for this fabulous review! It was such a pleasure to have you join us for our opening festivities. We can't wait to welcome you back again to the Parker Rooftop very soon. Claire
This lovely new venue will not remain a hidden gem for long! We had the most delightful visit recently at this rooftop lounge. Their cocktails are exquisite, the staff is warm and professional, the indoor/outdoor spaces are intimate, classic and inviting. Every delicious morsel we...More
Sandy Thank you so much for taking the time to write this lovely review. It was such a pleasure to have you and we very much look forward to welcoming you back to the rooftop very soon. Claire
Great spot for a nice evening! The view is great and there’s nothing quite like it in Vancouver. The food was delicious - my favourite was the duck spring rolls. Service was friendly and professional. Good date spot.
Lindsey, Thank you so much for taking the time to write this lovely 5 star review! It was a pleasure to host you and we look forward to welcoming you back very soon. Claire
We went to the Parker Rooftop last Thursday - we had a great time and amazing service! There are 3 lovely patios with a beautiful view. My favourite appy’s were the Parker slider and the ceviche tart. I highly recommend the Sucker Punch cocktail with...More
Carel Thank you kindly for the lovely review! It was a pleasure to host you on the rooftop and we look forward to welcoming you back for many special occasions in the future. Claire
The Parker Rooftop is a vibe! The cocktails and view are next level. Try the pina colada tart if you want a twist on a lemon meringue pie. Will definitely be back for another sunset!More
Daryl Thank you so much for taking the time to write this 5 star review! We are super proud of our product and appreciate you sharing it with the world. It was a pleasure to host you and we look forward to welcoming you back...More
This place was a fantastic new getaway in downtown Vancouver. Between the ambiance, cocktails and incredible staff it’s sure to become one of Vancouvers new hot spots!
Kate, Thank you so much for taking the time to write this fabulous review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we very much look forward to welcoming you back to the rooftop very soon. Claire
I went for the opening night of the new patio bar/restaurant and it was AMAZING. There are three patios to choose from, all with great views of the city. The vibe is elevated without being intimidating, the location is central and would be perfect for...More
Lillith, Thank you so much for this first fabulous review! It was such a pleasure to have you join us for our opening festivities. We can't wait to welcome you back again to the Parker Rooftop very soon. Claire",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d26227999-Reviews-Parker_Rooftop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pasta Amore Ristorante,"The food at this place is great. However the servers need to understand that eating is an experience and their service is part of it. We came about 15 to 20 minutes earlier and the server not only denied to sit us but she was...More
Hockey windup, the restaurant was full with our big group and the regular guests. Server did great with the crowd. Everyone commented on how good food was. I enjoyed the lasagne. Heard pizza crust very good. Saw lots of orders going out with SkipTheDishes dishes.
Has a late dinner (arrived at 8pm) on a Saturday night after a kids' soccer game. Ordered some appetizers (garlic cheese bread, meatballs, salads) all of which were fine, but nothing remarkable. The mains were much better, in particular, the Italian person with us said...More
Came here for lunch on a weekday, wasn't very full. Decor is very basic, looks like it used to be an old diner and was never renovated. I had the pasta with clams, I didn't realize they were baby clams - the ones you could...More
The servers attend to you in a quick manner and show they care. T?he place can get crowded and reservations recommended because many large groups seem to come in.
In the heart of up and coming Brentwood area, Italian restaurant is the perfect fit. Easy walk from the skytrain this place is perfect for lunch any day. Between pasta or pizza you can never go wrong. Try now for a little taste of Italy...More
Don't let the storefront of this restaurant dissuade you from going here. It's a little deceiving, but once you are inside the place has a lot of charm. We were a group of 8 including 2 little ones and we all enjoyed our meals. We...More
Always good pastas and great service. Usually busy so call to book in advance. If you want Italian, can't go wrong here. Great place to call to get take out as well.
We have driven past this place for years and never thought of trying it out. Now we have been 3 times in the last 4 months. The service has always been great, and friendly. Everyone has enjoyed their meals. I tried the lasagna on the...More
Everything from the time we arrived was fabulous! From the service to the food, we enjoyed everything! We will def be back! Highly recommended!
Just East of Willingdon Avenue on Dawson (close to Brentwood Mall and Willingdon Costco) in Burnaby, you will find this hidden away gem. Food is excellent as well as the service. The owner happened to serve us and took really good care of us. Parking...More
Went for dinner last night. Waitress was friendly and very knowledgeable. Prices ranged from $16.00 and up. The restaurant was very busy. We thought the food was ok not great. The meal came with no garlic bread, just the bowl of spaghetti or whatever. It...More
Twice I went there with different group of over 20 person and in both situation water was served after 30 minutes from our arrival. Most in the clients had to order something to drink before we could get water and many of them didn't like...More
Food is a B+, pizza was good and spaghetti ok, salad was a Safeway box and certainly not restaurant material, seats not comfortable. Service was good. Overall overpriced, you might as well go to poor Italian which is by far superior. It worth trying though...More
We had a large group of 20 that they were able to serve well timed. There was some wait, but the food came out all close to the same time. Appetizers and main dishes were very good. Pop was by the can so fairly expensive",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4295398-Reviews-Pasta_Amore_Ristorante-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Pat's Pub,"A few friends went to the Jazz Fest and we had a great time! The place is older, a bit run-down but ur server was excellent (Jacqlynn), the food was quite good, and the music and camaraderie with strangers was great fun. I would definitely...More
This onsite pub/restaurant at the Patricia Hotel features local beers, including their own incredibly delicious Classic Lager. The food caters to everyone and I have especially enjoyed their many salads, burgers/wraps, poutine, etc. One of my favourites is their Salmon Burger and it comes with...More
Sat 3-7 pm Never dissapoints, great music, ambience food & drinks. The best local Vancouver musicians are found here. This place is busy and lively, come early to get a good seat
Had a meal here while staying in Patricia hotel. Bar staff were shouting at a local to stay awake at the table or drink up ! No interest in taking the order from us and they completely forgot to prompt us as residents to a...More
Great drink variety, and foods were all very delicious! Samantha was our waitress and she is awesome!
I visited Pat's Pub during my stay at the Patricia Hotel right beside it. They had a live amazing Jazz band playing the one night which required a cover charge. I skipped the cover charge and just listen to it outside of the Hotel which...More
My experience with this pub is directly related to a stay at the Patricia Hotel. I did have a relatively early dinner here one evening. The live music and the vintage jazz recordings played afterward were enjoyable, and the sound level was reasonable. I had...More
Very good pub with live music. Hosts Kelly and Ashley were awesome!Will definitely recommend! Thanks for the good time.
This was our first time to the pub and we went for the Blues Band Wednesday evening and had a great time. Loved the live band as I love to dance and was so happy to see a lot of people up dancing. Talked to...More
We were staying at The Patricia Hotel and needed a quick pub lunch. Great value for money and a good selection of local craft beers. Great service and pleasant pub atmosphere.
Awesome selection of beer on tap at this micro brewery. Great atmosphere. Enjoyed the visit. Rough area but ok.
We have been to Pat's before, and while the jazz was quite good, it was for too loud sitting close to the band. We ended up leaving early. Maybe next time.
Amazed they ran out of Salmon on a Saturday night so had Fish and Chip dinner........standard fare. Must admit beer was odd though was one of their micro brewed on premises, service took 10 mins while standing at bar.
I had a bit of time to spare before catching my train to Seattle. I saw advertised that Pat's had a no cover charge jazz session on Saturdays at 3pm so I thought I would give it a go. A Reuben Sandwich and a couple...More
Very quaint place in a seedy part of town. Just don't stop and talk to the homeless on the way there. Food is very good. Place is old, but clean. Great drinks and good food. Brew their own beer.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707761-Reviews-Pat_s_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Patron Tacos & Cantina,"busy place, we have to wait a little bit for a table, but it was worth the food is so niice, I‘ve ordered the vegi burrito, really big portion and delicous they have local beer on tap, i really appreciate that friendly staff
Walk ins only at our time of booking, we ordered chimichanga and burrito both awesome and washed down with beer and marguerites. Staff very pleasant and attentive, this place does not disappoint does what it says on the tin
Excellent Service, Excellent Food, Excellent Drinks, you can’t go wrong! We had the Tanga Chicken Burrito and Burrito Bowl. Both were delish! Atmosphere was great with nice music, clean, and inviting decor. Stopped on way back to hotel and glad we did.
Was solo for a few hours while spouse was at a meeting and decided to go for Happy Hour. I sat outside enjoying the lovely sunshine . They gave me a bowl of complimentary natchos and salsa. The waiter suggested the Tamarind margarita which was...More
Excellent food and service. Gigi and Carlos made our meal special. We felt like we were in Mexico. Highly recommend.
Very nice inside, definitely not cheap, Mexican lite, tables close together, the Baja tacos were ok, not great. Good selection of beer. Good service.
Three of us went here in search of a quick lunch. Service was a tad spotty and we had some difficulty finding a server who would take our entree orders. Food and Drinks were good. Food tasted very good.
We are so glad we went to this restaurant. Picked it because it is close to our hotel but would travel across town to go again. A modern take on classic mexican with homemade hot sauces on the table. The food was tasty and authentic....More
Waren 2 mal hier - Exzellenter Service, sehr gutes Essen, feines Ambiente. Jederzeit wieder We were at least two times here. Excellent service, fantastic food, ambitious ambiance. At any time again
We had dinner. Food was fantastic, drinks were also excellent! Great atmosphere as well! So much food!!
This is hands down the best Mexican restaurant I have ever been to (and I’ve been to many in Mexico). The tortilla soup is the best I’ve ever had. The service is always excellent.
They don't take reservations. Very busy. Do they have enough staff to cope with the number of diners - maybe not. Lots of people were turned away whilst we dined. They will take names and give indications of how long the wait is. Our waitress...More
I wish I could have rated this place higher / enjoyed this place more. The food was pretty good, the drinks were okay, but the service was horrendous. We were basically forgotten once the order was put in. Our water jug was empty and left...More
My wife and I ordered the Parrillada and there was more food than the two of us could possibly eat. The taste of every item that came on the hot iron was delicious and as good as you would get in a high end restaurant...More
Food was excellent! However the service from our waitress was poor. After our food was served she didn’t come back to our table a single time. No check in to see if we wanted another round of drinks or dessert. After a busser cleared our...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4097890-Reviews-Patron_Tacos_Cantina-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Paul's Place Omelettery Restaurant,"I had lunch with two friends at this place and all three of us spent the rest of the afternoon on the toilet. Perhaps it was a coincidence but needless to say we won't be going back.
We had a terrific breakfast at Paul’s Omelettery. It has been many years since we’ve been to Paul’s. Fortunately they did not have a lineup when we went for brunch on Sunday. The restaurant was very busy but our server Charlie #2 was very efficient....More
Great place for brunch on Sunday! A bit of waiting for a place to sit but once at your table service is very good and very quick! Food tastes great!
The breakfast is very fresh and delicious.You have choice of many omelettes and you can also make your own.Made with three eggs and anything you want in it.Almost looks folded like crepe.Comes with your choice of toast and they have a great raspberry jam. Everything...More
All three people had a different dish. The zimmer was delicious and coffee good. Pacific omelet tasty and hot sauce was excellent. Shrimp sandwich and chicken soup good. Definitely a good place, lots of locals.
Paul's Omelettery has an imaginative menu of tasty, diverse, and fulsome breakfast, brunch, and lunch items available any time of the day. The setting is spacious and attractive, the staff is friendly but not intrusive, the prices are good, and the location is ideal for...More
Stopped in for breakfast and they did not disappoint. Serving size is huge, I could eat the pancakes all day and the omelet was super flavourful! If looking for a great breakfast in the granville area go here!!
Let the name not confuse you. They also serve a decent lunch menu and can be very busy during the lunch hour. We tried their steak special this time. Steak was not prepared as requested, but the portions are large enough to share. Paying for...More
I think I fell in love with the place upon setting my first foot inside. The song ""Easy Like Sunday Morning"" was playing, and the friendly fellow behind the counter advised me to sit where I liked and called me ""Bud."" :) The menu is...More
Paul's is our go-to breakfast place. Although we have to drive 15 minutes to get there, the service, ambiance, and food make it worthwhile. We believe a local's perspective is valuable for fellow travelers.
I'm sure the rest of the menu is worth checking out, but the omelettes are so good there's no need to venture beyond that section. Great selection of interesting omelettes and the ability to customize. And it's a cozy little place.
Been many times. Always great food and service. It's busy - arrive early on weekends. Good for social and business meals.
This place has really gone downhill. They serve raw bacon, half cooked onion rings and a soggy thrown together sandwhich. I am disgusted.
We came here for Sunday brunch. They don’t take reservations so we had a long wait, given their good reputation. The menu had a wide variety of interesting breakfast and lunch items. The food was excellent, the portion size was good, and the price was...More
Great place for a delicious breakfast surrounded by local people who seem to visit frequently and enjoy the menu. Great coffee too!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1199755-Reviews-Paul_s_Place_Omelettery_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pawans Indian Kitchen LTD,"Excellent food. A small family run restaurant that has an awesome atmosphere. The service was amazing. Can’t wait to go back for more.
Better-than-average North Indian food, friendly service, and a separate vegan menu with lots of choices. A great choice for vegans and vegetarians.
Just had another satisfying meal at Pawans. Delicious food and great service. Clean restaurant with staff cleaning everything including menus etc in between patrons. We felt safe and truly enjoyed our meal. During these challenging times, its great to have places that feel bring a...More
Just got back from dinner and the nana was so good. We ordered extra to bring home. Everything tasted great and was served quickly and efficiently. Would we come back? Yes
Got takeout from here soon after getting takeout from Vaades, and we felt Vaades was definitely more tasty overall, plus there was more chicken in the dishes. Also, way too much plastic used for takeaway!
Been here twice now and ordered 4 different dishes. All excellent in taste, quality and quantity. Friendly, accurate and attentive staff. Very timely and great value. Will definitely keep going back. Thank you.
We love northern Indian food and this place rocked our world. The thali was amazing, samosas maybe the best we’ve ever had and the goat curry was fabulous.
We ordered chicken and fish and both was excellent ! Even the person who delivered was very nice. We will surely order there again (or dine in). Now on our fave list.
The food is delicious. We ordered 2 non veg thali.the Quantity was huge.the rates are very good. Location is excellent. Service is good. A must go place to try Indian cuisine.
Good selection of dishes, great service and the food was very tasty. Reasonably priced, I will recommend for fans of Indian cooking and dining
Very kind and friendly staff. Yummy and affordable lunch special especially the butter chicken was very tender! Went on a Sunday at around 12:30 and it’s not busy. So nice sitting on the patio!
This is some of the freshest Indian food on the North Shore. No artificial colouring used, and they can veganize almost anything. They even have jackfruit! We did a taste-test comparing Pawan's Eggplant Bharta with Indian Fusion's version. Both were good. Pawan's was less tangy...More
1st time here. The service was good, ambience was pleasant. I appreciated that I could easily communicate with my dining partner - very important to me. Food was fair. Portions were fair sized. Some highlights were the fish pakoras and the butter chicken.
This place and Chilli's Chinese (in the same block) are my go-to places for lunch in NOrth Vancouver
All the staff were excellent and Mayur waited on our table was fantastic. He checked to see if we had satisfied food (it was delicious), filling our drinks when empty and just a nice person to talk too. We will return again as this is...More
Thanks for Visit us Please Keep Coming Back",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d10160946-Reviews-Pawans_Indian_Kitchen_LTD-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Peaceful Restaurant,"This restaurant was highly recommended by family . The Chinese food was average . Order the Mandarin wonton soup , the wontons were tasty but the broth was bland . Waitstaff told a regular customer that the chef was not here today .
This restaurant was highly recommended by family . The Chinese food was average . Order the Mandarin wonton soup , the wontons were tasty but the broth was bland . Waitstaff told a regular customer that the chef was not here today .
This restaurant was highly recommended by family . The Chinese food was average . Order the Mandarin wonton soup , the wontons were tasty but the broth was bland . Waitstaff told a regular customer that the chef was not here today .
Large variety of entrees to choose from. The food was excellent and priced fairly. Check this place out if you want some great Chinese food at a reasonable price.
Large variety of entrees to choose from. The food was excellent and priced fairly. Check this place out if you want some great Chinese food at a reasonable price.
Large variety of entrees to choose from. The food was excellent and priced fairly. Check this place out if you want some great Chinese food at a reasonable price.
Surprised by the quality and variety of dishes. Vancouver has a lot of mediocre Chinese restaurants. This one stands out for me. Will try other branches.
Surprised by the quality and variety of dishes. Vancouver has a lot of mediocre Chinese restaurants. This one stands out for me. Will try other branches.
Surprised by the quality and variety of dishes. Vancouver has a lot of mediocre Chinese restaurants. This one stands out for me. Will try other branches.
For a small narrow restaurant, I am amazed at their fresh and tasty food. Great service too. Lunch specials at about $15.00 are very reasonable and the food is delicious,
For a small narrow restaurant, I am amazed at their fresh and tasty food. Great service too. Lunch specials at about $15.00 are very reasonable and the food is delicious,
For a small narrow restaurant, I am amazed at their fresh and tasty food. Great service too. Lunch specials at about $15.00 are very reasonable and the food is delicious,
Wife and i had the kung Pao Ckicken. Wife had Beef amd Greens The volume of food was large. A lot of meat and. Veggies. Could not even finish. The complementary unlimited green tea hit the spot Wish okanagan had one of these…..
Wife and i had the kung Pao Ckicken. Wife had Beef amd Greens The volume of food was large. A lot of meat and. Veggies. Could not even finish. The complementary unlimited green tea hit the spot Wish okanagan had one of these…..
Wife and i had the kung Pao Ckicken. Wife had Beef amd Greens The volume of food was large. A lot of meat and. Veggies. Could not even finish. The complementary unlimited green tea hit the spot Wish okanagan had one of these…..
Had a very mediocre meal a while ago. Thought I'd give Peaceful another opportunity.... FAIL!! I'm not fussy. Really. But General Tsao Chicken and Green Onion Flatbread inedible. Pitched it. Peaceful no more.
Had a very mediocre meal a while ago. Thought I'd give Peaceful another opportunity.... FAIL!! I'm not fussy. Really. But General Tsao Chicken and Green Onion Flatbread inedible. Pitched it. Peaceful no more.
Had a very mediocre meal a while ago. Thought I'd give Peaceful another opportunity.... FAIL!! I'm not fussy. Really. But General Tsao Chicken and Green Onion Flatbread inedible. Pitched it. Peaceful no more.
Peaceful Restaurant used to be our go to place for delicious and varied food, especially their noodles. Today, we had our usual favourites delivered, but received extremely rude service right after we gave a 20% tip. But we thought, nevermind, the food is kind of...More
Peaceful Restaurant used to be our go to place for delicious and varied food, especially their noodles. Today, we had our usual favourites delivered, but received extremely rude service right after we gave a 20% tip. But we thought, nevermind, the food is kind of...More
Peaceful Restaurant used to be our go to place for delicious and varied food, especially their noodles. Today, we had our usual favourites delivered, but received extremely rude service right after we gave a 20% tip. But we thought, nevermind, the food is kind of...More
Ginger beef is one of my favorite chines dishes and this place does not disappoint. The Dan Dan Noodles I would not order again. The small , narrow restaurant can get very busy during lunch time.
Ginger beef is one of my favorite chines dishes and this place does not disappoint. The Dan Dan Noodles I would not order again. The small , narrow restaurant can get very busy during lunch time.
Ginger beef is one of my favorite chines dishes and this place does not disappoint. The Dan Dan Noodles I would not order again. The small , narrow restaurant can get very busy during lunch time.
We had a wide variety of things to try for 7 people. Excellent quality. Wonton noodles were exceptional. Great delivery service.
We had a wide variety of things to try for 7 people. Excellent quality. Wonton noodles were exceptional. Great delivery service.
We had a wide variety of things to try for 7 people. Excellent quality. Wonton noodles were exceptional. Great delivery service.
Was asking something about their menu and the server was just rude and yelling. I was going to order few dishes to go. But after the unwelcoming and rude attitude, i just left. I WOULD NEVER RECOMMEND, TERRIBLE SERVICE RIGHT AT THE FRONT.
Was asking something about their menu and the server was just rude and yelling. I was going to order few dishes to go. But after the unwelcoming and rude attitude, i just left. I WOULD NEVER RECOMMEND, TERRIBLE SERVICE RIGHT AT THE FRONT.
Was asking something about their menu and the server was just rude and yelling. I was going to order few dishes to go. But after the unwelcoming and rude attitude, i just left. I WOULD NEVER RECOMMEND, TERRIBLE SERVICE RIGHT AT THE FRONT.
We came here tonight with some friends, on their recommendation, as they had been here before and raved about their authentic Northern Chinese menu. We were not disappointed. Every dish we tried reminded me of what I used to have as a child growing up...More
We came here tonight with some friends, on their recommendation, as they had been here before and raved about their authentic Northern Chinese menu. We were not disappointed. Every dish we tried reminded me of what I used to have as a child growing up...More
We came here tonight with some friends, on their recommendation, as they had been here before and raved about their authentic Northern Chinese menu. We were not disappointed. Every dish we tried reminded me of what I used to have as a child growing up...More
I ordered the sweet and sour chicken as a take out. There really wasn't much in the way of sauce that was on the dish which made it quite dry. The vegetables tasted almost raw, like they'd been thrown in as an after thought—cold in...More
I ordered the sweet and sour chicken as a take out. There really wasn't much in the way of sauce that was on the dish which made it quite dry. The vegetables tasted almost raw, like they'd been thrown in as an after thought—cold in...More
I ordered the sweet and sour chicken as a take out. There really wasn't much in the way of sauce that was on the dish which made it quite dry. The vegetables tasted almost raw, like they'd been thrown in as an after thought—cold in...More
Got take out for new year's eve 2020. Spicy ginger beef. Although tasty, no sauce on it to put over my noodles, which by the way, came out of the container in one big rectangle. The next day I had to pick up a few...More
Got take out for new year's eve 2020. Spicy ginger beef. Although tasty, no sauce on it to put over my noodles, which by the way, came out of the container in one big rectangle. The next day I had to pick up a few...More
Got take out for new year's eve 2020. Spicy ginger beef. Although tasty, no sauce on it to put over my noodles, which by the way, came out of the container in one big rectangle. The next day I had to pick up a few...More
I’ve written at length about my introductory experience to Peaceful Restaurant at their Seymour Street location (see my review on this site). In short, I was elated to have found quality Chinese “comfort food” that even far exceeded Hon’s on Robson (RIP). For once Guy...More
I’ve written at length about my introductory experience to Peaceful Restaurant at their Seymour Street location (see my review on this site). In short, I was elated to have found quality Chinese “comfort food” that even far exceeded Hon’s on Robson (RIP). For once Guy...More
I’ve written at length about my introductory experience to Peaceful Restaurant at their Seymour Street location (see my review on this site). In short, I was elated to have found quality Chinese “comfort food” that even far exceeded Hon’s on Robson (RIP). For once Guy...More
We ordered the Beef Roll (a favorite), Pan Fried Chicken Dumplings (very good), Kung Pao Chicken and Moo Shoo Beef Stir Fry Noodles (both good and tasty). The dishes were hot and fresh.
We ordered the Beef Roll (a favorite), Pan Fried Chicken Dumplings (very good), Kung Pao Chicken and Moo Shoo Beef Stir Fry Noodles (both good and tasty). The dishes were hot and fresh.
We ordered the Beef Roll (a favorite), Pan Fried Chicken Dumplings (very good), Kung Pao Chicken and Moo Shoo Beef Stir Fry Noodles (both good and tasty). The dishes were hot and fresh.
We were excited to get a much more authentic style of Chinese food than we can get in our home area, and we were especially excited to see that Peaceful offered Dan Dan noodles - one of our favorite dishes that we simply can't find...More
We were excited to get a much more authentic style of Chinese food than we can get in our home area, and we were especially excited to see that Peaceful offered Dan Dan noodles - one of our favorite dishes that we simply can't find...More
We were excited to get a much more authentic style of Chinese food than we can get in our home area, and we were especially excited to see that Peaceful offered Dan Dan noodles - one of our favorite dishes that we simply can't find...More
Recommended by our hotel concierge and he was right hot and sour soup was fantastic. Fried rice was wonderful also Dan, Dan noodles, and the beef roll.
Recommended by our hotel concierge and he was right hot and sour soup was fantastic. Fried rice was wonderful also Dan, Dan noodles, and the beef roll.
Recommended by our hotel concierge and he was right hot and sour soup was fantastic. Fried rice was wonderful also Dan, Dan noodles, and the beef roll.
I will start by saying this review is for the Port Coquitlam location (which I can’t seem to find on here) we arrived after a disappointing amount of dumplings at the dumping festival. We were seated and waited a few minutes for a server to...More
I will start by saying this review is for the Port Coquitlam location (which I can’t seem to find on here) we arrived after a disappointing amount of dumplings at the dumping festival. We were seated and waited a few minutes for a server to...More
I will start by saying this review is for the Port Coquitlam location (which I can’t seem to find on here) we arrived after a disappointing amount of dumplings at the dumping festival. We were seated and waited a few minutes for a server to...More
We booked a group dinner here for our family last week to welcome them as they’re here for our wedding. We chose this restaurant as it’s the closest to the Church. We were so excited to see everyone and enjoy a meal with them together...More
We booked a group dinner here for our family last week to welcome them as they’re here for our wedding. We chose this restaurant as it’s the closest to the Church. We were so excited to see everyone and enjoy a meal with them together...More
We booked a group dinner here for our family last week to welcome them as they’re here for our wedding. We chose this restaurant as it’s the closest to the Church. We were so excited to see everyone and enjoy a meal with them together...More
Mall Chinese is a better experience than this! Server barely said two words, restaurant is not clean, the ginger beef was horrible (hard and chewy like beef jerky) and overall it was just not a nice lunch experience. I’m not one to complain but this...More
Mall Chinese is a better experience than this! Server barely said two words, restaurant is not clean, the ginger beef was horrible (hard and chewy like beef jerky) and overall it was just not a nice lunch experience. I’m not one to complain but this...More
Mall Chinese is a better experience than this! Server barely said two words, restaurant is not clean, the ginger beef was horrible (hard and chewy like beef jerky) and overall it was just not a nice lunch experience. I’m not one to complain but this...More
Great range of Asian cuisine, meals served quickly. Friendly staff. Great for Guests staying nearby at St Regis Hotel.
Great range of Asian cuisine, meals served quickly. Friendly staff. Great for Guests staying nearby at St Regis Hotel.
Great range of Asian cuisine, meals served quickly. Friendly staff. Great for Guests staying nearby at St Regis Hotel.
This is a no nonsense Szechuan restaurant. The food is reasonably spicy and there are a lot of items on the menu. I had the basa fish in chilli oil and it was quite good.
This is a no nonsense Szechuan restaurant. The food is reasonably spicy and there are a lot of items on the menu. I had the basa fish in chilli oil and it was quite good.
This is a no nonsense Szechuan restaurant. The food is reasonably spicy and there are a lot of items on the menu. I had the basa fish in chilli oil and it was quite good.
Check the photo look at my food all red small things are chilli pepper!! I could not ate it and lost my taste ability for couple days. My tongue swallowed after that experience. Please check food's photo, look how spicy it is!! When I told...More
Check the photo look at my food all red small things are chilli pepper!! I could not ate it and lost my taste ability for couple days. My tongue swallowed after that experience. Please check food's photo, look how spicy it is!! When I told...More
Check the photo look at my food all red small things are chilli pepper!! I could not ate it and lost my taste ability for couple days. My tongue swallowed after that experience. Please check food's photo, look how spicy it is!! When I told...More
Stayed at The Exchange Hotel and got a recommendation for this restaurant. Went twice and had dan dan noodles (spicy), my shu chicken, steamed buns, and beef rolls. All the dishes were very tasty and our waitress who was a tall thin lady with a...More
Stayed at The Exchange Hotel and got a recommendation for this restaurant. Went twice and had dan dan noodles (spicy), my shu chicken, steamed buns, and beef rolls. All the dishes were very tasty and our waitress who was a tall thin lady with a...More
Stayed at The Exchange Hotel and got a recommendation for this restaurant. Went twice and had dan dan noodles (spicy), my shu chicken, steamed buns, and beef rolls. All the dishes were very tasty and our waitress who was a tall thin lady with a...More
I had the northern style yellow curry noodles and the pan fried pork dumplings. Both were great! Noodles are a nice chewy texture and the dumplings are very juicy. Service was quick and efficient.
I had the northern style yellow curry noodles and the pan fried pork dumplings. Both were great! Noodles are a nice chewy texture and the dumplings are very juicy. Service was quick and efficient.
I had the northern style yellow curry noodles and the pan fried pork dumplings. Both were great! Noodles are a nice chewy texture and the dumplings are very juicy. Service was quick and efficient.
I admit I’m a sucker for names. If a restaurant’s name grabs me for whatever reason – be it catchy, silly or whatever – you can bet it’ll inevitably hit my “must visit” radar. That was the case with Peaceful Restaurant. I’d first spied it...More
I admit I’m a sucker for names. If a restaurant’s name grabs me for whatever reason – be it catchy, silly or whatever – you can bet it’ll inevitably hit my “must visit” radar. That was the case with Peaceful Restaurant. I’d first spied it...More
I admit I’m a sucker for names. If a restaurant’s name grabs me for whatever reason – be it catchy, silly or whatever – you can bet it’ll inevitably hit my “must visit” radar. That was the case with Peaceful Restaurant. I’d first spied it...More
Recently went for lunch. Room is very basic with basic cafeteria like ambiance. Obvious that people are here for the food and not the decor, which is fine by me. Make sure to write your name down and number in your party on the clipboard...More
Recently went for lunch. Room is very basic with basic cafeteria like ambiance. Obvious that people are here for the food and not the decor, which is fine by me. Make sure to write your name down and number in your party on the clipboard...More
Recently went for lunch. Room is very basic with basic cafeteria like ambiance. Obvious that people are here for the food and not the decor, which is fine by me. Make sure to write your name down and number in your party on the clipboard...More
Had a great experience here at Peaceful Restaurant. The service is fast, food came out quick. The food was delicious, the xiao long bao was amazing. Highly recommend checking this place out !
Had a great experience here at Peaceful Restaurant. The service is fast, food came out quick. The food was delicious, the xiao long bao was amazing. Highly recommend checking this place out !
Had a great experience here at Peaceful Restaurant. The service is fast, food came out quick. The food was delicious, the xiao long bao was amazing. Highly recommend checking this place out !
Peaceful was recommended by a hotel staff member and it was within walking distance to our hotel. The restaurant staff and friendly and helpful, I loved that they were on top of it with filling your waters. The fried rice is different but it was...More
Peaceful was recommended by a hotel staff member and it was within walking distance to our hotel. The restaurant staff and friendly and helpful, I loved that they were on top of it with filling your waters. The fried rice is different but it was...More
Peaceful was recommended by a hotel staff member and it was within walking distance to our hotel. The restaurant staff and friendly and helpful, I loved that they were on top of it with filling your waters. The fried rice is different but it was...More
My husband and I decided to have lunch at peaceful . We ordered our meals and asked for a specific type of noodles. When we got our meals the noodles were not what we ordered. When we politely told the server she started yelling at...More
My husband and I decided to have lunch at peaceful . We ordered our meals and asked for a specific type of noodles. When we got our meals the noodles were not what we ordered. When we politely told the server she started yelling at...More
My husband and I decided to have lunch at peaceful . We ordered our meals and asked for a specific type of noodles. When we got our meals the noodles were not what we ordered. When we politely told the server she started yelling at...More
Have wanted to try this restaurant for quite sometime, finally in Vancouver for a visit and went for dinner. Dumplings, tofu, steamed buns, sweet’n’sour pork, shanghai noodles, rice. Food was great and some of the best dumplings we have had. Lost a star for the...More
Have wanted to try this restaurant for quite sometime, finally in Vancouver for a visit and went for dinner. Dumplings, tofu, steamed buns, sweet’n’sour pork, shanghai noodles, rice. Food was great and some of the best dumplings we have had. Lost a star for the...More
Have wanted to try this restaurant for quite sometime, finally in Vancouver for a visit and went for dinner. Dumplings, tofu, steamed buns, sweet’n’sour pork, shanghai noodles, rice. Food was great and some of the best dumplings we have had. Lost a star for the...More
A friend took me here. It kind of looks like a 'hole in the wall' restaurant so I would not have chosen it myself, but the food was fresh and absolutely fantastic! The pan-fried veg dumplings were stellar. I had the stir fried noodles with...More
A friend took me here. It kind of looks like a 'hole in the wall' restaurant so I would not have chosen it myself, but the food was fresh and absolutely fantastic! The pan-fried veg dumplings were stellar. I had the stir fried noodles with...More
A friend took me here. It kind of looks like a 'hole in the wall' restaurant so I would not have chosen it myself, but the food was fresh and absolutely fantastic! The pan-fried veg dumplings were stellar. I had the stir fried noodles with...More
We have been to this restaurant frequently and it has never disappointed. We did the take out as sitting down was not an option. The Szechuan green beans were great, thousand chili chicken awesome if you like spicy food. The Chili Garlic Sauce eggplant was...More
We have been to this restaurant frequently and it has never disappointed. We did the take out as sitting down was not an option. The Szechuan green beans were great, thousand chili chicken awesome if you like spicy food. The Chili Garlic Sauce eggplant was...More
We have been to this restaurant frequently and it has never disappointed. We did the take out as sitting down was not an option. The Szechuan green beans were great, thousand chili chicken awesome if you like spicy food. The Chili Garlic Sauce eggplant was...More
Ordered a delivery to our Holliday address after a 4 hour drive from Kelowna. After 1 hour we had not received our food so phoned the restaurant. They said they had cancelled our order despite sending me an email saying the order was being processed....More
Ordered a delivery to our Holliday address after a 4 hour drive from Kelowna. After 1 hour we had not received our food so phoned the restaurant. They said they had cancelled our order despite sending me an email saying the order was being processed....More
Ordered a delivery to our Holliday address after a 4 hour drive from Kelowna. After 1 hour we had not received our food so phoned the restaurant. They said they had cancelled our order despite sending me an email saying the order was being processed....More
The food was so delicious and service was wonderful. Great value as we didn’t have to spend a fortune to get a great meal!!! Highly recommended
The food was so delicious and service was wonderful. Great value as we didn’t have to spend a fortune to get a great meal!!! Highly recommended
The food was so delicious and service was wonderful. Great value as we didn’t have to spend a fortune to get a great meal!!! Highly recommended
Greeted from our first step in the door, seated right away in a booth. Server and servers were friendly and attentive. We ordered the pork belly appetizer then ordered the yang zhou rice, beef and pan fried noodles, sweet and sour chicken and beef roll....More
Greeted from our first step in the door, seated right away in a booth. Server and servers were friendly and attentive. We ordered the pork belly appetizer then ordered the yang zhou rice, beef and pan fried noodles, sweet and sour chicken and beef roll....More
Greeted from our first step in the door, seated right away in a booth. Server and servers were friendly and attentive. We ordered the pork belly appetizer then ordered the yang zhou rice, beef and pan fried noodles, sweet and sour chicken and beef roll....More
We have been several times to Peaceful on 4th. It has a simple basic decor but very flavourful well priced dishes. Our favourites are the Peaceful beef rolls, the beef soup noodles (which we prefer with the round noodles which we find more tender than...More
We have been several times to Peaceful on 4th. It has a simple basic decor but very flavourful well priced dishes. Our favourites are the Peaceful beef rolls, the beef soup noodles (which we prefer with the round noodles which we find more tender than...More
We have been several times to Peaceful on 4th. It has a simple basic decor but very flavourful well priced dishes. Our favourites are the Peaceful beef rolls, the beef soup noodles (which we prefer with the round noodles which we find more tender than...More
Good Service. Peaceful surroundings, food misses the mark. Not inexpensive - premium price for what is delivered. Best dish we had were the pan fried chicken dumplings. Second best was the pan fried noodles with tofu - could not find any tofu. Ginger beef was...More
Good Service. Peaceful surroundings, food misses the mark. Not inexpensive - premium price for what is delivered. Best dish we had were the pan fried chicken dumplings. Second best was the pan fried noodles with tofu - could not find any tofu. Ginger beef was...More
Good Service. Peaceful surroundings, food misses the mark. Not inexpensive - premium price for what is delivered. Best dish we had were the pan fried chicken dumplings. Second best was the pan fried noodles with tofu - could not find any tofu. Ginger beef was...More
Such good food. A huge menu, there are two choices of rice (white and a mix with brown types). There are some really yummy spicy dishes on their menu.
Such good food. A huge menu, there are two choices of rice (white and a mix with brown types). There are some really yummy spicy dishes on their menu.
Such good food. A huge menu, there are two choices of rice (white and a mix with brown types). There are some really yummy spicy dishes on their menu.
I attended a dinner with five people at this location, having been to one of their other locations last year. This location has a bunch of booth and tables. Once ordered the food came swiftly. The local favourite seems to be Dan Dan noodles which...More
I attended a dinner with five people at this location, having been to one of their other locations last year. This location has a bunch of booth and tables. Once ordered the food came swiftly. The local favourite seems to be Dan Dan noodles which...More
I attended a dinner with five people at this location, having been to one of their other locations last year. This location has a bunch of booth and tables. Once ordered the food came swiftly. The local favourite seems to be Dan Dan noodles which...More
I picked this restaurant more or less at random for take away. Wow! What a great decision! The portions were enormous. Three dishes did one person (me) for three full meals. I especially liked the curry rice.
I picked this restaurant more or less at random for take away. Wow! What a great decision! The portions were enormous. Three dishes did one person (me) for three full meals. I especially liked the curry rice.
I picked this restaurant more or less at random for take away. Wow! What a great decision! The portions were enormous. Three dishes did one person (me) for three full meals. I especially liked the curry rice.
Peaceful restaurant is one of our go-tos for a meal out as a family. Most dishes are shareable and we always leave satisfied. Favourites are the beef rolls, dan dan noodles and house rice.
Peaceful restaurant is one of our go-tos for a meal out as a family. Most dishes are shareable and we always leave satisfied. Favourites are the beef rolls, dan dan noodles and house rice.
Peaceful restaurant is one of our go-tos for a meal out as a family. Most dishes are shareable and we always leave satisfied. Favourites are the beef rolls, dan dan noodles and house rice.
Like it’s name, the Peaceful Restaurant is just that. No matter how many people are there it’s clean and comfortable and the food is SO TASTY! A great variety of flavours, the rice is a mix of different rices and chewiness and there’s spicy bits...More
Like it’s name, the Peaceful Restaurant is just that. No matter how many people are there it’s clean and comfortable and the food is SO TASTY! A great variety of flavours, the rice is a mix of different rices and chewiness and there’s spicy bits...More
Like it’s name, the Peaceful Restaurant is just that. No matter how many people are there it’s clean and comfortable and the food is SO TASTY! A great variety of flavours, the rice is a mix of different rices and chewiness and there’s spicy bits...More
We started with the beef roll, Vegetable and tofu soup, the pan fried chicken dumplings and the steamed buns. all these appies were just excellent and spiced to perfection. for our mains we had cilantro lamb, green onion beef and the szechuan green beans with...More
We started with the beef roll, Vegetable and tofu soup, the pan fried chicken dumplings and the steamed buns. all these appies were just excellent and spiced to perfection. for our mains we had cilantro lamb, green onion beef and the szechuan green beans with...More
We started with the beef roll, Vegetable and tofu soup, the pan fried chicken dumplings and the steamed buns. all these appies were just excellent and spiced to perfection. for our mains we had cilantro lamb, green onion beef and the szechuan green beans with...More
Service very good, food is spicy! Had the spicy salted squid and cumin beef with flatbread. All was very tasty, would definitely go back. Went right before closing, was quiet on a Saturday night at 9:30 PM.
Service very good, food is spicy! Had the spicy salted squid and cumin beef with flatbread. All was very tasty, would definitely go back. Went right before closing, was quiet on a Saturday night at 9:30 PM.
Service very good, food is spicy! Had the spicy salted squid and cumin beef with flatbread. All was very tasty, would definitely go back. Went right before closing, was quiet on a Saturday night at 9:30 PM.",135,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1400962-Reviews-Peaceful_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Peaked Pies,"My son and I were walking down the street exploring Vancouver when we came across ‘Australian pies’ and we instantly remembered eating Australian pies with friends when we visited Sydney many years ago. We had the savory pies (the hopper and a steak bacon and...More
Recommended by two independent people as we were looking around for somewhere to have a quick lunch. “It’s all in the pastry” according to one and she was right. Absolutely delicious with a special pie and beer deal on offer. Enthusiastic and helpful people running...More
Great delicious home style pies and exactly what we were after for a quick meal We enjoyed them with Bundaberg ginger beer Highly recommend both of these
I love this Aussie pie place on Denman St. It's a worthy stop when you're craving a fresh, delicious pie. I gravitate towards the savory ones. I like that the savory pies are served with a large scoop of mashed potatoes and peas, hence why...More
Watching an Australian TV series, we were introduced to Lamington cakes. They looked incredible. We Googled ""Lamington cakes near us"" and found Peaked Pies in Vancouver's West End. We were already visiting the lovely Sun Yat-Sen Garden on this particular day and decided to cruise...More
Absolutely fantastic! It was nothing like I expected and we were totally blown away by our first sitting here. First of all the decor was so nice - it was so comfortable and easy on the eyes. Secondly, Rinu gave us the best first impression...More
I was really excited to be able to eat an Aussie pie again. And honestly it was delicious! Prices are good and the pies all look good. The beer was good too. I was only disappointed to have to give a tip when the waitress...More
The pies here are so good and so filling we could barely finish ours. Definitely recommend for a quick but heavy lunch spot.
Thank you for the great review! We're so happy to hear you enjoyed your Peaked Pies experience :) We hope to see you again soon! Sincerely, Lupi
This is a great little cafe serving traditional Aussie grub. Certainly brought back memories of days gone by. Many places imitate but these blokes and sheilas have got it right!!
Sausage rolls were very good. Pastry and full top stuff Traditional beef pie was good but filling was just average. Not bad but not super tasty. I enjoyed it though
Decided to try this given the reviews???? all pastry with little filling, we tried the traditional Aussie, boring, how about a little cheese and spice, the curry one was dry and again so little filling, all pastry. Sorry but not traditional Aussie PiesMore
Hi cwd34, sorry to hear that your experience was not up to our normal standards. As you can see from all of our other reviews, we truly value quality and consistency. The Traditional Aussie is exactly (if not better) as what the true meat pies...More
We really enjoyed our Peaked Pies. They were very tasty. The mushy peas were bright and fresh tasting. Great food and staff. Highly recommend. Give it a try.
Thank you for the great review! We're so happy to hear you enjoyed your Peaked Pies experience :) We hope to see you again soon!
Just awesome and simple! Great options of pies and yes definitely get the mash, peas and gravy:-) So full:-)
Thanks for the awesome review! We're so happy to hear you enjoyed your Peaked Pies experience and that we left you with a full belly :) Hope to see you again soon!
Happen to stumble across this little cafe that serves tiny savoury pies (single serving) Australian style. The staff was friendly and charming with an Aussie accent. I had a kangaroo meat pie topped with mashed potatoes, mushed peas and gravy. Filling and flaky without being...More
I love a good meat pie and Peaked Pies are hearty and flavourful. Good chunks of meat and just the right amount of gravy. Add mash if you’re hungry. Despite the worries of staff, my extra pie heated up very nicely in the microwave the...More",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11909300-Reviews-Peaked_Pies-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Peckinpah,"Wow! We are from N. Carolina and I have to say the BBQ was excellent. It is a must if you come up Sea to Sky Hwy to Whistler. Stop in Squamish at Peckinpah's.
Great spot for lunch right in town. Quick service, good quality food. We ordered the pulled pork sandwich and half rack of ribs with Mac n cheese. It’s Carolina bbq so the sauces had a tangy vinegar taste to them. Would def recommend
We ordered take out twice and dined in this past month. All of our experiences with this restaurant have been positive. Service was fantastic. Greeted warmly and given our choice of seating. Food was ready in a timely manner and very tasty. We ordered the...More
The location in Vancouver closed and re-opened in Squamish 3 mths ago. The food is not that good. I ordered mac n cheese. It was like soup, with pork fatty pieces and no cheese. I can make mac n cheese better at home. The waitress...More
Found this bar up in Gastown after we visited the Steam Clock during our week in Vancouver October 2019. Good Service and Great Beer. We went back a further night to have the same again but also something to eat – highly recommended.
My friend I went to this place. Walked up to the patio and saw a server finishing up with a table and as he walked in we asked if we could sit on the patio and order a drink. He offered inside and explained that...More
Best BBQ & a definite must do in Vancouver if you love meat. Had the beautiful Pulled Pork Burger with coleslaw on a brioche roll & hubby salivated over his pound of Beef Brisket. Hubby could have easily had it twice. Staff are all really...More
Great atmosphere. Brisket was great!! The loaded corn bread side dish was tasty. Definitely recommend a stop here.
Saturday nights appear to be tricky in Gastown but we were very lucky to get two seats at the bar here! Ordered the chicken wings and they were great as was the coleslaw and the chips. Solid atmosphere and seemed positive that they were having...More
Very good place to eat smoked ribs bbq sauce , lots to choose from great place to get food and a beer
We stumbled upon Peckinpah whilst visiting Gastown, and although we originally only intended to get a drink, the food menu looked great so we ordered a few bits as well - fried chicken, creamed corn, hush puppies and fries, all of which went down very...More
we could not get into the restaurant we wanted to and stumbled across this place. It was great with a selection of comfort food, we had the beef brisket sandwich and pulled pork sandwiches both were filling and very tasty The service was quick and...More
Wanted to have ribs and chicken wings and we did so.Came with a sweet and a spicy sauce. Able to sit outside.The weather has been great.All in all a hot and tasty food.Had drinks.Diduse the washrooms, which were clean. Quite busy with tourists. A enjoyable...More
We had an EXCELLENT experience!!! We were there around 12:30 on a Friday afternoon. The place was busy and we sat at the bar. Service was very good. We split a large BBQ pork sandwich and mac & cheese. BOTH were VERY tasty and DELICIOUS!!...More
We were touring Vancouver and hungry, so stopped here on a whim for a bite, since they had plenty of outdoor seating available on a beautiful early June afternoon. We both hat the Beef Brisket sandwich and both were satisfied and filled with it. The...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2250727-Reviews-Peckinpah-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pepino's Spaghetti House,"It has been five years since I wrote my first glowing review of Pepino’s after they took over from Nick’s . Things have only improved ! The food is an homage to Nick’s but better . Great menu , leaning toward “ back in the...More
Came here with a friend for dinner we ordered the focaccia and both rigatoni dishes. We both enjoyed our meals and left feeling very satisfied! It was a little pricey but definitely worth it as the servings were large and we had enough to take...More
A loud room, packed with a bustle to and fro, in other words, just what a Spaghetti House should be. Service was friendly and competent. The food was excellent. Pasta dishes are large enough to share. Deep-dish pizza is excellent. The wine list, although smallish,...More
Yes, watch a guy make fresh Italian pasta made by an Asian guy, cooked by an Indian chef and served to you by a non- Italian waitress. So much diversity goes into your great Italian meal. Love it. Delicious food in this quaint little European...More
Just like the old Nick's except the food was considerably better. Atmosphere was good, service good, prices more than the old Nicks. Careful of all the little extras that you may order without asking the price. And there were 6 of us so a 20%...More
My wife and I decided to give Pepino's a try and were very disappointed. My rigatoni with ""prawns"" was $37. The pasta was underdone and fused to my teeth. The prawns were more like shrimp. My wife's Caesar salad was a sloppy bowl of romaine...More
This is clearly a favourite for folks in the 'hood, including our friends who live nearby. We were visiting from Ottawa and went here for dinner. I had the linguine with prawns and I found it to be rather bland. Lots of quantity, for sure....More
Great little spot for amazing pasta! The food is all so delicious and the staff are incredible! Definitely would recommend checking this spot out.
MY HUSBAND AND I were passing by Commercial Drive heading home from the hike. We were been looking for a place to eat. I saw Pepitos Spaghetti House, I said stop here maybe they are still open. OUR FIRST TIME TRYING THE RESTAURANT. We sat...More
Sister restaurant to one of our favorites (Osteria Savio Volpe). This North End of Commercial Drive location used to be the old Nik's restaurant (miss their Tiramisu). Great takeaway and delivery options. Tasty Pastas and Pizza. Pasta portions a little small, but in the $22-26...More
Food: porchetta ravioli was piping hot, hearty, heavy tomato sauce, a ton of meat in the bolognese. Ravioli was flavorful. Portion was huge, and had a very 'home-style' look and taste. I had leftovers which I used later to make my own pasta. If you're...More
We knew that Pepino’s is a historical spot and wanted to try it out. The atmosphere was great. However we were sad to find that all of the food was underwhelming (we ordered two apples and two mains) and two dishes were so unappetizing we...More
This is a great Italian restaurant. The decor is straight out of the godfather. The food is fine and the staff very attentive. The only thing that let it down was that at the end of the meal there was no espresso. I think maybe...More
Couple of friends invited me out with them on Commercial drive. there was 3 of us. While trying to decide on a place for dinner and reminiscing about old restaurants now gone, Pepino's was suggested. One guy had been there and said large portions and...More
The food at Pepino's is incredible. I had the spaghetti and meatballs, with several sides to start (broccoli, baked zucchini and potatoes). The sides that we shared with friends were absolutely delicious, and the meatballs and spaghetti were amazing. Bring your appetite - the meatballs...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d972597-Reviews-Pepino_s_Spaghetti_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pepper Lunch,"We shared a large pepper beef with rice, corn. It came out sizzling and we let it cook on the sizzling stone platter. It was very good and tasty and enough for lunch. Good service.
Someone had told me this place was good and after coming here, I'm not sure why. I honestly didn't know what this place was based on the name. I still don't understand what this place is. I theorize it could be a place where you...More
Awesone service, great food with reasonable prices. Free pop refill. Convenient location. Just have to go everytime we visit Vancouver.
The hype has died down from when Pepper Lunch first opened it's doors in Richmond so finding a vacant table was not a challenge. I can still recall when the same premises was occupied by a mobility store owned by a good friend. It was...More
We went here for dinner and I almost felt bad about my policy never to tip. We ordered a meal and paid. We were shown a table, asked if we wanted to drink anything. In the end we ordered and ate. My children had some...More
I recall when Pepper Lunch first opened when it was near impossible to get inside the front door, let alone find an empty table. The atmosphere is more calmer now but the fare is still the talk of the town. Off street parking is available...More
This place has comfort food perfect for a cold day. I love their dishes with curry. Even when you order something with curry, they also give you all the sauces they would normally give to other dishes. Great service and unlimited pop. What else can...More
I always love dining at Pepper Lunch right by Walmart in Richmond BC but on the last 2 visits I noticed the quantity of the extra meet becomes less & less. I’m not sure if one or 3 extra thin slices of beef cost $2.50....More
Came across this interesting restaurant whilst looking out for a place for lunch.We ordered salmon steak & sliced Angus beef, Yaki Shabu and Wangyu pepper rice and miso soup. Dishes came on sizzling hotplates.My wangyu beef was tender.I allowed the beef to cook for a...More
Wandered in off the street one rainy Richmond night and found this gem. You order at the till, they have lots of selections both meat and seafood ... your dinner is brought to you on a sizzling hotplate where you stir your chosen meat(s) to...More
First time having this pan Asian skillet sizzling cuisine. Really enjoyed that the food is hot throughout the meal, quality was good as was portion and price. Worth a try.
It was our first time to eat at this restaurant and we were not disappointed. My whole family liked it plus my best friend visiting all the way from Georgia, USA. The steak was awesome, very juicy and the staff were very friendly...they approached us...More
Stopped here for lunch with some co-workers last week. Orders are placed at the front counter. I ordered the most popular dish, the classic beef pepper rice, and by the time I sat down it arrived in about 2 minutes. The beef and rice tasted...More
My friend has been to this place a few times and was ranting & raving about the Kobe beef skillet. I wasn't in the mood for beef so I ordered the curry chicken instead. It was chopped up grilled chicken with some curry powder on...More
I was across the street at VanCity and decided to wander into the Pepper Lunch to enjoy my mid day meal. I ordered the curry chicken pepper rice for $12 which I was obliged to pay upon ordering. It was an enjoyable repast.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7818805-Reviews-Pepper_Lunch-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Per se Social Corner,"2.5 stars - They made mistakes and didn’t rectify them. Our server talked both my daughter and I into having the special. Mushroom and Truffle Ravioli. Not usually something either of us would have ordered, but she was adamant that is was great. So, we...More
We were made so welcome at Per Se Social while we were staying in Vancouver. The food was absolutely delicious and the service was excellent. We ate there every night we were in the city. I wish we could have taken the restaurant with us...More
Service was spot on. Catherine was the right amount of checking up. AMAZING service. Atmosphere and vibe is great. I sat on the patio which was a beautiful early dinner, still sunny. The inside has music playing, great vibe also, I just wish they would...More
First time we visited on a busy Friday for a drink at the bar, host sat us down straight away, bar tender was nice and helpful. Went back on Sunday, for another drink, when not so busy with clearly space at the bar. The host...More
Stopped in for dinner around 7:00. Waited at the bar for maybe 20 minutes for a table for two. Good vibe nice hipster music. The craft drink menu was interesting. I had a whiskey spritz. Very nice but calling it a spritz is a stretch....More
We were really disappointed, the food was just ok definitely not worth the price it Italy/ Naples you get twice the quality for a 1/4 of the price which would be tolerable if the service wasn’t some of the worst I’ve seen, management seems to...More
This place does not want tour business if you are a family. We tried to eat here with our son who is 18mo when the waitress told us we would have to wait 15 min so they could reset for dinner service. Granted it was...More
Manager on Sunday brunch time was a sexist aggressive male who raised his voice to me and my party of 6. It was embarrassing for him and the whole experience was awful
We reserved at a nearby restaurant that was so loud and the tables so tightly squeezed together that we had to leave. Thankfully we were seated at the bar and we loved it. The service was incredible and the pizza was amazing. A very enjoyable...More
Fantastic freshly prepared food. Great service. So glad we came here for our last meal in Vancouver. Nice spacious tables. Superb lobster and card ravioli, amazing Halibut. Having read a previous review, why on earth would you order a take out from here??? The food...More
These fine folks refused to complete our takeout order, I feed 6 very hard working street people peer volunteers who are working 7 days a week to move tents off hastings street. I like to treat my workers to a great meal once in awhile...More
After a full day of flat hunting, we finished with our last viewing at 8pm and we decided to pop in and see if per se had any availability. We were seated promptly by friendly staff and our waitress was lovely and knowledgeable about the...More
Stopped at per se social after a day of touring. My husband & I sat at the bar and ordered a coconut tequila mojito & a glass of Pinot noir. Both were very good. We then shared the charcuterie platter which was excellent. (Meant to...More
Nice atmosphere, food was really nice if not a bit expensive. Good selection on the menu also. We brought our kids but there is no kids menu. That's ok, however the restaurant would not provide a small/half portion either. They really were quite strict about...More
i dont like the vibe……. Hated the food……. Poor management……. Head cook is a dumbwit ……. Nothing good about it.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9838673-Reviews-Per_se_Social_Corner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Personas Patio Restaurant And Lounge,"Really appreciate the hospitality by the hotel and there staff Naveen . This place would be my go to place and encourage others to stay and enjoy the warmth
We were staying at the hotel, and decided to choose this place for lunch. We were in the mood for decent pub food, and this place hit the spot. We both were in the mood for a burger… We ordered the tuna burger, and hamburger....More
I came here on a Sunday on a sunny day but their patio they did not open it. Too bad. Otherwise, I really enjoyed my skinnytini and salmon bowl. My friend had to have their caesar drink and caesar salad wrap. Food amd drinks were...More
Food was great and our server Kevin is exceptional. He noticed the sun was shining on me and helped us move the patio umbrella! It was my first time at this restaurant and I'll for sure come back for dinner soon!
Six of us coworkers decided to stop for a casual bite after work to socialize. We enjoyed a variety of items including burgers, flatbread and wings. All food items were good and even more wings were ordered. We sat in a comfortable semi circle seating....More
I've come to the Grand Villa Casino many times for the Buffet, Atlas and Dim Sum but never at Personas until now. And it's too bad I had never come earlier even though we had to wait until we had a discounted 2 for 1...More
One of the best things about Personas was the server Michelle who made our visit relaxing and personal. Michelle was attentive and bubbly. We have a toddler with us and Michelle made sure we were happy with whatever we needed. She's a SUPERSTAR! We had...More
Had a lovely lunch Food was very tasty in a pleasant surrounding Michael the host was very pleasant greeting us with a warm smile and checked to see if we enjoyed our food and stay. We are seniors and appreciated the attention Will visit often...More
Fun place inside the casino... the live bands are great and they have dancing. Food is good as well.
My husband and I decided to have a date night at Personas and it did not disappoint! The service, food, and drinks were fantastic! Service on every level, hostess, server, supervisor, and management, was top notch. These guys give quality customer service making helpful recommendations...More
I have been coming here for years on Friday and Saturday nights and the last time I came I was told I needed to wait 70 person line up to get in the restaurant and once in general restaurant I needed to wait in another...More
Sally has been my server a few times now and it’s always an awesome experience. Travel a lot for work and this is always my go to stop for dinner. Not because of the beer - they need a better IPA - but the service...More
Four of us recently celebrated a birthday at Personas and happened to be seated during their happy hour. Our Server, MJ, was absolutely great. He helped us with our drink order and suggested how we could not only order the best appies but saved us...More
We had lunch out on the patio during Happy Hour. The drinks were amazing! The food was really tasty too. We stayed in the hotel and noticed that the place turns into a club with lineups at night so I don't recommend dining here but...More
It was good . Sally did great ! Wtf sallywhy are you such a good bartender omg why do I have to write so many characters",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4765523-Reviews-Personas_Patio_Restaurant_And_Lounge-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Phnom Penh Restaurant,"1 hour wait at 5 on a weekday. Food was nothing special. I agree with others that if you must have their food, take it to go and enjoy it at home.
Amazing food had by all three of our party. Our favourites were the Chicken Curry and the Butter Beef, absolutely amazing!! Love this restaurant and worth the two hour wait for a table, (went to the pub on the corner and they sent a text...More
My husband and I really enjoyed our food and drinks. We only had one dish we weren't a fan of and it wasn't because of the quality or anything the restaurant did, it was just not a favorite of ours. The lemon pepper wings were...More
We came here for lunch as I had always wanted to try Cambodian food. We ended up ordering both Cambodian and Vietnamese dishes and everything was delicious. I had the deep fried garlic prawns - they were delicious even though I decided to remove the...More
Oh so good. Book a table I believe for 6 or more else you wait. But still worth the wait. We just ordered many, many good things for our group to share family style.
Went due to appearing on many ‘must go’ lists/ videos of Vancouver food. Don’t get it, was just OK. The chicken wings were nice but not amazing, the butter beef was very good but the Vietnamese roll was poor and the dry noodles were really...More
The restaurant really is a churascharias but with additional food and buffet. It was good but it should concentrate on grilled meat. When we arrived, no information or menu were given to us; we didn't know what to expect and how much it will cost....More
The decor was simple, bland and dated but the food was outstanding! We were blown away with the butter beef, lemon grass pork chops and crispy chicken wings. Perfect blend of flavours ! Service was prompt and efficient. No wonder this establishment has lasted for...More
We were a group of 10 and had dinner at this place. It has been around for a long time and is busy. The southeastern Asia Decor has been the same for a long time. Not much ambience. We order their famous dishes. A couple...More
I have not dined here since covid-19. Oh, the food was so good. We were a table of 8 and were able to get a reservation which is available for large groups only else wait in line to get in. One must have is the...More
My son, a visitor from London, UK wanted to enjoy the Cambodian food at Phnom Penh in Chinatown, Vancouver, BC , Canada. Sad that Vancouver Chinatown is fast changing as many old and traditional shops has closed- worst still are the many vandalism and graffiti....More
I lived in Cambodia for three months and this restaurant brings me back to a place and time that many did not survive to share their history. The staff will help you decide what to order if you are not familiar with Cambodian food. Try...More
Lucky we made a reservation because there’s a line to get in! Even for a Monday night, it was busy! We pre-ordered two of the steak Luk lac - pricey but tasty, butter beef and deep fried chicken wings - excellent as usual, fried rice...More
Good food and fast service. Within 10 mins food came out. Very busy all time of the day reserve or else wait outside. They limit you to 2 hrs since they always busy even with large table.
On top of covering their history and numerous accolades (including a hand-written note from the late Anthony Bourdain), my earlier review of Phnom Penh focused exclusively on their chicken wings. After trying them during their “takeout-only” phase, I made a personal commitment to return and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d707888-Reviews-Phnom_Penh_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho 99 Vietnamse Noodle House,"I was here last year , I do not like it that much ,noisy , ,poor food quality , location is not that great , they did a update renovation and change the restaurant name to "" Tang '' same owner !, and now very...More
The restaurant jut went through some cosmetic renovation and the dining area is now with contemporary setting...simple, bright and clean. The food typical Vietnamese and their spring rolls are crispy. The price is very reasonable.
Not many Vietnamese restaurants have vegan pho. We were delighted that this place had this option and plus made us great vegan slushies ! Great friendly service and delish food. Also very affordable
We found the spring rolls and the house special beef noodle soup especially nice. Parking is always a challenge along Alexandra Road.
We were staying across the street at the La Quinta hotel and asked the desk where to eat. They recommended Pho 99, inexpensive and we could walk to it. I had the Lemon Grass Chicken, served on a bed of rice. Just great! I'd certainly...More
This Thai noodle salad is best eaten at room temperature. Chicken noodle soup If you’re in a rush and want something yummy and satiating quickly, chicken noodle soup does the job
went with a groupon so it was all set menu. the beef noodle soup was fine, just not excellent compared to other places. appetizers were nicely presented. overall, we would return
Good food and service. We love the BBQ pork slice on vermicelli, tofu . My boss ordered the #18. The soup is really good. They have a combo with a soup , app and drink for only $13. They have free wifi and big free...More
Pho 99 is conveniently located and a handy place to stop for a quick lunch when enroute to Vancouver. My lunch today consisted of the special deep fried tofu with rice and soup for under $11. The only downside is that at times parking can...More
Excellent soup shop. Friendly staff... Soups to go are well packaged. This programme insists that I type more words.
There is free parking in their small lot in the back or pay street parking. I came on Saturday afternoon and it was not busy. The single washroom was clean. You can do a la carte or order 3 item combo with your choice of...More
Food here was amazing! Nice and fresh and great service. Awesome lemon iced tea too! I would highly recommend pho 99 for a great fresh, fast meal.
Our hotel recommended this nearby restaurant, and we were quite pleased with the pho & salad rolls,but really liked the flavorsome shaking beef,served on a hot metal plate.
I was invited for lunch at the Pho 99 (who couldn't resist a free lunch?). I discovered the menu with numerous menu items, the decor inviting, the wait staff efficient and friendly and the food very satisfying. Free WiFi and parking.
I came in to Pho99 with my friend last week. My first moment over there was the manager so nice. introduce me ordered some food very delicious like Pho Dac Biet,Bun Bo Hue,Beef stew (Bo Kho) and Dragon Roll. and there have free parking at...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4849860-Reviews-Pho_99_Vietnamse_Noodle_House-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Pho Central,"When I lived in Vacouver I heard from so many people that this place has amazing Pho. When I went for a visit I decided to give it a try. Drinks are very yummy and unique. The food was very average! well.. some of the...More
We will make this our regular diner during our stay in town this winter. We have been here before for simple Pho and Summer rolls. Everything is fresh and well prepared. The service is also earnest and friendly.
Great service, good pho, very quiet restaurant. Enjoyed my time here! Order Banh Mi, Rare Beef Pho and salad rolls. Very good overall!
This one time my parents found my internet search history, and I told them that my friend Steven was using the computer, and I didn’t know what he was doing because I was in the bathroom. I’ve had stomach problems since I was born, so...More
Had better pho before and they forgot to give me a spring roll on my vermicelli plate. Not much flavour, run down place and kinda dirty. Wait staff wearing sweats
Don’t know what makes the rolls so darn delicious but I can’t say enough good things about them. Good decent noodle bowls that don’t weigh you down with grease.
I often go there to have the yellow curry chicken pho. I have tried other Vietnamese restaurants but is not the same taste.
I live in California, and the first pho i tried was by my work place. I thought it was the best thing ever after i tried a few others around the area with pretty good ratings, but this pho place in vancouver just ruined any...More
Yes, it is plain, and could use a face lift, but who cares. The service was fast, and the food was good. My husband enjoyed his pho, and I liked the green papaya salad with shrimps. The fried breaded calamari was also nice. We planned...More
I really wanted to eat in a Vietnamese restaurant. I already had some Vietnamese cuisine before but I wanted to take my parents who had never try it. I loved the place. The service was a little slow but nothing to worry about. The food...More
We both had the pho great taste. Had the tofu was delicious and so fresh. Very friendly staff was busy but still only a short wait for take out.
Nothing amazing but pretty good Vietnamese food. Was super convenient since we were on Davie street for the Pride Davie Street Dance Party and staying nearby. Too hot for Pho so opted for vermicelli noodle bowls of different varieties. Would recommend the chargrilled pork it...More
We went to Pho Central for a mid night snack after the fireworks. The staff were friendly and the kitchen was very efficient. We tried the spring rolls, deep fried tofu and a beef and beef ball pho. Out of the three, I liked the...More
We didn't come to Vancouver for the Phô, instead we wanted to try the Chinese food and sushi. But when a local suggested we try this restaurant we figured if the other asian food was great here, so would be one of our favorite foods,...More
OK - so this was my first introduction to pho so gotta take this review with a pinch of salt. Really tasty though and I highly rated it. 10bucks (inc tax) for the rare beef pho. Very flavourful and good sized portions.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7855596-Reviews-Pho_Central-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Express Ankor Noodle House,"Yesterday I have ordered a take out from the Pho Express Angkor Noodle House through Skip the dishes. Once my order has arrived and I took the food out I saw a staple in it!! The appetite was lost. I immediately called the restaurant to...More
Another great visit, another great time. This place has the best Pho this side of Hanoi. Have the rare beef with the spring rolls, you won't be disappointed.
Late lunch, not many places open. Chose this as it is still quite bus. Ordered combo 1, Rare beef noodles, 1 spring roll & basil seed drink which I’ve switched to canned drink. Liked the soup base a lot😋. Everything else tasted good. Food served...More
I am fan of pho and was looking for taste of actual Vietnamese pho and this place has some good food
Still the best after 4 years of patronage. The interior has been improved and new signage outside. Service is so fast, and the food items delicious. Can't say enough great about this place. I don't have pho anywhere else.
It tastes so good and they has fast service. The tempura shrimp was crunchy and well cooked. I also liked how they took American cash.
Very tasty cheap soups with noodles. Prompt and polite service. The meals come with a pot of good tea.
Ordered the pho with pork, very flavourful. I would return to the restaurant if in the area. Restaurant interior is ok but pretty dated
Worst experience ever! Not only did i find hair in my food, there was also a rodent running around in the washroom. Plus these people had the audacity to automatically add gratuity to my bill!!! When i asked them about the extra charge, the old...More
The food here is good but definitely not exciting. My favourite is the seafood pho, a safe dish. My wife's favourite is the mango salad and the beef pho. The owners are the most unsmiling couple you'll ever meet. I think I saw a touch...More
I was going to this neighborhood and my friend and I wanted to have some Pho. So we went there around 12:30 pm on Wednesday. It was not busy at all and Pho came right away. Food was good, not too bad but it was...More
It was Christmas Day and we had a traditional dinner booked for the evening. We wanted something warming to drive out the winter chill. The pho was perfect- generous, well flavoured and comforting. Service was excellent and although we had to wait a little while...More
This is a great place, family owned restaurant, quite cheap Very good value and very good service. The food is really good.
A place you have to go to when visiting Vancouver, or if you live there go there anyway. I ordered beef Pho. I got a large bowl of yummy Pho, lots of meet and veges, and soup full of flavour. I wish I could have...More
I had a cld and had resently read a book that took place in Korea and decided to try something new, so I wondered in to the restaurant and the server asked my likes and dislikes and the next thing you know I had a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3612048-Reviews-Pho_Express_Ankor_Noodle_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Garden Vietnamese Restaurant,"Great food and vers tasty but the restaurant itself is dated and doesn’t look super clean. Order delivery, ignorance is bliss : )
Stopped in with a colleague and was quite happy. Great service, seems family run and the food was fresh and hot. Gotta try the spring rolls, were amazing. Wasn't that busy but can see how it gets really busy.
Get the one with seafood but in a chicken broth, pfff, incredible. The lemonade with soda is pretty good too. The other patrons that ate with me were fascinated with their food as well.
We go there often and it is always nice when you go to a restaurant and the cook and servers remembers you and get greeted with big smiles , #47 my Favorite
We ate at the Pho Garden in North Vancouver. The Pho offerings were quite varied and all of us had excellent dishes. The restaurant is in a small shopping centre and offers take out as well as table service. The family owners are very friendly...More
I go to this restaurant several times a month. The family who owns it and operates it is welcoming and friendly. The wife is cooking in the back and is always smiling and friendly. The husband is out front and keeps everyone happy. The food...More
Came here for the second time and still has tasty food. I had the pork and spring roll on top of rice vermicelli. It was nice to have fresh veggies in the bowl. None of the brown discolouration you find in ‘old’ veggies. Food is...More
I came here once before last year and I liked the atmosphere of a family-run restaurant. Today was my second time here and I'm afraid that I'm falling in love with this place. Restaurants like this don't really exist in North Vancouver anymore. Really Yummy...More
This is good value for money if you like Asian food. I had the brisket and beef balls in soup, a full order, and it was more than enough.
It was exactly what I needed for lunch yesterday — a simple bowl of pho. I ordered the rare beef pho and the shrimp salad roll. The pho was quite good given that the soup was just right — wasn’t too heavy and didn’t have...More
This was my first time here and I didn't expect too much. But I was very pleasantly surprised by the food, the ambiance, and the prices. The food at Pho Garden manages to convey some of the spice/herb flavours that characterize true Vietnamese food and...More
The service is great the food has a really nice taste for Canadian Asian food. About as close as you can get without flying to asia to get the seasonings and fresh herbs.
Down to earth home-cooked Vietnamese food at an amazingly reasonable price. Friendly atmosphere. Good location, near Whole Foods. Free parking.
This was the second Pho restaurant that I tried on the North Vancouver side. However, it would have been good if I never had the Pho Japolo – end of story.
Stop by for a quick lunch. Pho is watered down and no flavor. Does not have condiments for the soup. Ban mi was flavorless. It is small place in a shopping strip. Would not recommend.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d6849051-Reviews-Pho_Garden_Vietnamese_Restaurant-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Goodness,"The food is reasonable and the service is prompt enough. However, the waitress was super rude and quite unreasonable about a very mild complaint, to the point of insisting the restaurant is not a Vietnamese restaurant when I asked why they had thai spring rolls...More
Delicious! I’m not that into Pho but my daughter has recently starting eating it so we checked this place out on a visit to Vancouver. We both ordered #21, she got the regular and I paid for extra for the Spicy peanut broth. Servings were...More
I ordered a chicken pho noodle with vermicelli. I specifically said PHO in the order by saying- it comes with Brussels sprouts? She says- Yes. She hands me a bbq chicken with noodle- no pho or Brussels sprouts. I told her, I ordered pho. She...More
Excellent dinner. My husband and I ordered a beef soup and spring rolls to share. The portions are quite large and we even had leftovers. The soup was delicious and the beef in it was very tender. Spring rolls were delicious also. Service was quick...More
Drop in to see my friend in West End , she told me there is a great Viatnamese restaurant on David Street ,so we order the dinner for pick up , I choose their menu #20 , also ask extra hot sauce , very quick...More
We have been here quite a few times. Always good tasty values. Try beef stew in tomato sauce. So tender! Lots of beef too!
I used to go there because the soup was always delicious. But lately, I tried three times , and I felt the reaction of MSG. I went there because of No MSG, but now they start using MSG in the soups. Seems like the new...More
Had good pho and noodles dish. The portions were big and the service was quick. Had vegetarian options
We ordered food from here at the davie street location and my boyfriend got a severe allergic reaction from our order. We strictly said beforehand that there was a peanut and egg allergy and the server replied with a shrug as if he did not...More
Pho Goodness on Davie Street has been our go to place for pho for several years and we rated it excellent in the past (5 stars). However, we were there about a week or two ago, and something has changed. The pho was excellent/fantastic for...More
Great value, and the food was exceptional. It has a tiny street frontage, with most seating hidden behind a glass counter, and whilst a bit basic, it is a very authentic Vietnamese style restaurant.
My daughter loves Pho so whilst in Vancouver we visited this restaurant. I’m vegetarian so I opted for #56 vegetarian pho. Absolutely delicious. The broth was so tasty and the vegetables were so fresh. I had vegetable spring rolls to accompany it washed down with...More
Our go to place for Pho downtown as they server good quality food that is prepared well and at the right temperature, which is important for Pho. We tried a satay version of Pho which makes the broth more creamy and like curry. Good, continent,...More
My son and me were craving for some good Vietnamese food. We went to the front desk and explained to the staff that we wanted some vermicelli in broth with 2 specific requests. Request 1, No peanuts involved in my son's food because he is...More
This is an awesome little Pho house on Davie. The cold rolls are larger and tastier than I've had before. I had a pork Bun and my wife had pork patty Bun. Both were terrific. The atmosphere is that of a busy noodle house, and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7239410-Reviews-Pho_Goodness-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Japolo,"Visit here based on good review. Ordered Pho, Vermicelli with grilled pork and spring roll, and Rice with grilled lemongrass chicken and spring rolls. All foods are delicious and service is great and quick. The building is old. Food is reasonably priced.
It must be a family run operation since the server was busy, the cook brought out my dinner. Friendly staff and reasonable prices.
Service sucked! I went to the restaurant to pick up my food that I ordered on the phone. I asked the staff(a woman) about my pick up and the staff stared at each other lol The man said ""You may have phoned a different location"",...More
Went there for dinner looking for a light meal. The service was good and the meals were also good, not fantastic or as some people have stated large. In general for the price was in the expensive range, cannot agree that the food was reasonably...More
Thanks to Pho Japolo for fitting our family of 9. Tasty pho for all - also order shrimp and spring rolls for kids who snarfed it down like a treat. Adults enjoyed the broth on a wet day
We had lunch here on our way out of North Vancouver. We ordered the Shrimp Rolls, Spring Rolls, Grilled Pork & Shrimp Rice Plate, and Grilled Pork with Pork Rolls Rice Plate. The Shrimp Rolls were delicious, but the Spring Rolls were just okay. They...More
Lunch for three. All three dishes were flavourful and satisfying. Everyone enjoyed the food. Service was fast and friendly.
First of all the building doesn’t typically reflect what an Asian restaurant looks or feels like and I found that very enjoyable Two TV screens playing jeopardy was interesting as well and people watching it Service was friendly and quick I walked in on a...More
The restaurant looks run down with a lot of maintenance issues, including broken men's washroom. I started camping here 18 years and it needed new carpet and renovations then and there hasn't been any renovations since. If you can look past that, the pho is...More
We walked 1.5K to Pho Japolo from our AirBnB. I'm glad we did. The ambiance had a 1970's old steak house feel to it when we walked in :) The food was fast, fresh and plentiful. I had the Pho with spicy broth and lean...More
As mentioned by many other reviewers this restaurant does not have an impressive facade. But the product - amazing Vietnamese food - sells itself. The menu has plentiful choices, however I went for the classic Pho during both times I visited. Yes it’s worth a...More
Pho was ok but no wow factor. Service was descent and location great. Building is dated but whatever I eat the food not always the surroundings.
We were staying locally at the Best Western and were recommended Japolo and told about the discount we could get. We almost left as soon as we entered - the outside was bad but inside it was grim, dark, dingy and dirty windows with cobwebs,...More
If you are looking for good Pho , this is the place, if you are into fancy surroundings this is not. The structure itself is suspect but the food is better , faster and cheaper than most. If they were to renovate I would give...More
We wife and I went to Japolo for yet another great Pho meal. We took my mother in law and kids. Item #28 is so good! Everyone's meal was excellent. Now before I give Japolo a 10 I have to say this restaurant is a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2392297-Reviews-Pho_Japolo-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Khanh Express,"Found this gem last year on our Vancouver/Alaska trip. This is our second time eating here this visit. I love love love their number 62. It is my favourite meal in the entire world. I had it yesterday too. May be back for a third...More
the food and service were both exceptional. i had the curry chicken and steamed rice it was a very generous portion and tasted great also the servers were super nice and kind
We had takeout. We had the Chicken broth Pho with chicken breast and all the fixings. We also had the beef brisket and rare beef Pho also with all the fixings including noodles, sprouts, basil and spices.
Went for dinner. Staff had a friendly greeting. The menu is huge lots of choices to pick from. I ordered the grilled beef and pork with spring roll. It came in a large bowl with salad, noodles and the beef, pork and spring roll. It...More
Wondeful and tasty Vietnamese food and very generous portions. Quick service and friendly staff. Perfect gem of a restaurant!!
We stumbled across this place on our walk home and definitely to give this place a try. It is such good pho and the staff were super nice. Definitely recommend checking this place out for some great Vietnamese food!
We were hunting around the Yaletown area of Vancouver for Asian food and come across this little gem almost by accident. The interior is nothing special (pretty typical, well-arranged Vietnamese decorations), but the food is outstanding. Equally wonderful is the staff. My, what gracious people!...More",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23664681-Reviews-Pho_Khanh_Express-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pho Tan,"No frills or fancy surroundings - just good, honest food. Good idea to book. Pay parking outside also free parking close by. No credit card - cash or debit only.
Very casual restaurant serving some good Vietnamese food. Lots of pay street parking. Make sure to make a reservation. The 6 of us enjoyed their well know beer crab, Ox tail and rack of lamb. We also had on choy, baguette, and rice noodle with...More
Seriously! They have the most delicious, soul warming Satay pho. You can order vegetarian option with tofu and it is unreal.
I love their Pho but also really enjoy the family feel by Mathew and his two sisters. Kerrisdale is luck to have them.
Really enjoyed the fast service even though the restaurant was quite full. I think the broth is a little bland but then again I had pho in Vietnam so the bar is really high pho me... (sorry for the bad pun)
Delicious broth , easy free 1 hour parking .... best flavoured soup I have had in a long time . Great job !
First of all, we found hair in our pho soup, notified the waitress right away and she just shrug her shoulders and left (WTH?!) My husband ordered the spicy pork hock soup that he tried few weeks ago, except this time there wasn't any pork...More
Local simple Vietnamese food restaurant. very good Chicken Pho Satay Spicy Style and my wife had noodles with chicken and spring roll. Very good and helpful service.
My hubby is always looking for the best Pho soup - and he says that this is #2 beef satay soup ever. The place is definitely ""well used"" but the service was friendly and fast. My daughter and I shared shrimp salad roll, veggie spring...More
We don't get to mid Main Street that often, but we were at the farmer's market near by and remembered about this place. A few things, the place is very busy at time, the decor won't make any sense to you, there are things stored...More
Not particularly inviting from the outside, but really friendly service and great food. The waitress, who was also front of house for the take away section, was lovely. She took the trouble to show my daughter how to use chop sticks and explain what sauces...More
Went there at 4pm on a Sunday afternoon, restaurant was empty, we were refused entry because we had a stroller for the little one. Instead of having customers they would rather be empty. Unbelievable.
Great pho and special cocunut satay soups. Also the spring rolls are amazing as well as the stuffed chicken wings. Everything else on the menu is very solid, so I come here all the time. Also very decent prices and fast and polite service. I'll...More
My in laws love this restaurant. They always pre-ordered the food and they claimed that the dishes that they ordered were not from the menu (I've never checked the menu). What they usually order includes crab cooked in beer, an ox tails dish and an...More
I go the extra distance to get to this restaurant as I have a ridiculous passion for their spring rolls. Look I love other dishes too, but when a plate of these land on the table that's what I dig into first. I ordered a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d817227-Reviews-Pho_Tan-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pholicious Restaurant,"Banh mi was cheap but the filling you get was pretty much bare. You get what you pay for. Wasn’t full off 2 banhmi. Pretty much one slice of meat wasn’t too impressed by it. I wouldn’t go back
I ordered the House Special Pho large and it’s good, it has good amount of meat a combination of beef & chicken with all the trimming of veggies and hot chilli oil.
This restaurant was recommended to me by the bartender at my hotel. Was he ever right! It was so delicious, fresh and a great price. I tried different vegetarian items on the menu and enjoyed each one as much as the next!
Lovely ladies making excellent pho and Asian subs.Perfect if you are staying at the Delta just order before 7pm closing. Special sub was so tasty and all so reasonable too!
We were staying at the Delta in downtown Vancouver. After a day of touring around we decided to eat in. Pholicious is a little hole in the wall place just out the door and 10 steps on the way to Richard st. My wife had...More
Delicious! Looking for cheap eats near Days Inn Hotel after arriving on a flight. Had the chicken pho, spring rolls, veggie salad rolls. Seven year old son and I gobbled it all up. Hit the spot and was very reasonably priced. Space is tight here...More
This tiny little shop is worth finding! The food is great and the service is quick and polite. You can choose no spice or tons of spice. Great pho!
This is literally a hole in the wall, but the pho was very good. You can choose the spicy level as well. I stayed at the Delta Suites downtown, so this was literally right there. Doing take out and eating from the room was very...More
What a great find! As the other reviewers have said, this place is excellent. We needed breakfast on a cold grey Vancouver day and the pho hit the spot. Even at 10:30am there was a steady flow of customers. We were luck to grab 2/3...More
The food at this place is just great Vietnamese. The chicken sandwiches are great and fresh and tasty. Just love the attention to fresh.
This hole in the wall restaurant really does Pho right. Everything I have eaten at this almost food truck not on wheels is very good. Service is efficient and good at the counter. Big thumbs up.
There is something always happening when you walk by this little street joint. People are waiting to have their names called to get their order. If a seat is free, you can dine right on the sidewalk in front. This Pho Stop is on the...More
Quick service for non-fast food. Great staff, excellent price and food. A gem of a restaurant with the best value in city centre Vancouver.
Pholicious is simple but serve warm comfort delicious pho. I had the chicken ball pho and it came in decent portion and a serving of bean sprouts. I finished every drop and did not feel thirsty afterwards. Would go back for more. Their special pho...More
We were desperate for a good Pho and after reading the reviews we headed here! Can't recommend enough! The Pho was so delicious and to top it off it was a great price, the staff were really friendly and even thought it was small it...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10299564-Reviews-Pholicious_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
PiDGiN,"This spot is great for larger groups and especially if you like sampling. We had a group of 9 and sampled for over 2 hrs! Great variety, superb flavours and left full and happy!
As a tourist in Vancouver, being driven to Gastown for a high class meal felt like I was in a dystopian world. There were homeless (but harmless) addicts teaming within the vicinity of the restaurant. One has to be ready to be bombarded by the...More
two of us, women and old friends, well traveled and good cooks, wanting something exciting, different and yummy. started with the perfect cocktail ( yuzo& burban) had the tasting menu, we enjoyed with gusto, filling and delicious in every bite. thoughtful, knowledgable and kind service...More
Now toqued by Chef Wesley Young PiDGiN looks at the melting pot that makes Vancouver tick, its Gastown location adding some grittiness to a minimalist dining room filled with a mostly young clientele served by a friendly and professional staff. Self-described as Asian-French fusion built...More
I do like a restaurant with a concept and I do like fusion cuisine but I must say Pidgin was too much for me. The atmosphere is dull, the food presented is elevated to an underwhelming experience. Apart from the spoonful of scallop which was...More
This excellent Gastown restaurant lived up to its great reviews and was definitely one of the best meals we had while traveling in Canada. The cuisine was inventive and delicious, with a distinct Asian influence. My wife and I shared the tuna tartare, chicken wings,...More
Excellent meal - well-crafted and well-thought out. The tasting menu was terrific. The squash blossoms were especially tasty, but every course was a winner.
On a very hot Saturday night in late June of 2022, we walked into a fairly quiet Pidgin Restaurant at 8:30 PM. As is our wont, we chose to sit at the bar, and we were an island onto ourselves. No one else was at...More
We were a large group of 12 people and needed a table very last minute. PidGin was so accommodating and was able to seat us within an hour of my request (which I thought would be impossible). Not only did they seat us, but we...More
We invited 8 of our guests for a meal at PidGin, we where greeted by the server who's eye to detail was great. We choose the tasting menu. The server asked us at what pace we would like the food to come out, and these...More
We had the tasting menu and each course was a taste delight. The offerings were varied and original without being quirky. Highly recommended..
Superb, locally sourced food and friendly service in cool decor. We opted for the tasting menu and were wowed by the explosion of different tastes.
Just had the best meal hands down on our trip to Vancouver and Canada, and it’s not even close. Wine/cocktail pairing was sublime Would not have changed a single item on the Fixed menu, with the wait staff being incredibly helpful but not in the...More
My daughter and I came here for dinner last night. To be honest, we never heard of this restaurant until we saw their sous chef on Top Chef Canada. Kym was the runner up for the season but IMO, they should have won! They had...More
I recently visited Pidgin for dinner. I must say, I was utterly blown away by both the food and the incredible level of service from the staff. Pidgin is a beautiful restaurant/bar nestled in Vancouver's historic Gastown district. It is extremely refreshing to walk into...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3313842-Reviews-PiDGiN-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Picnix,"We received a Picnix gift certificate as a wedding present and it was an amazing experience. The food was fresh and very tasty, the view was spectacular, and Simon was extreme accommodating. I highly recommend going on a Picnix for a truly unique date night!
I think this is the best picnic I ever had. Beautifully presented and absolutely delicious. Everything you need including a rug and pillows. The salads were imaginative and colourful with great dressing. Lovely fresh bread. Fantastic cheeses and meat selection. The maple bacon is divine....More
My boyfriend surprised me with a Picnix at English Bay. Everything you needed for a picnic was all in a cute little wagon on wheels that turned into a table! The food was amazing (especially the cheese) and it was an unforgettable evening. I highly...More
The FUNNEST picnic of my life! Just be sure and bring your appetite because the food is amazing and plenty. Thank you and we’ll be back! 😋😊🥰
Lovely picnic box for a perfect sunny evening at he beach. Food was delicious and plenty. Lots of salade and fruit..so a healthy meal... not so healthy but certainly delicious was the cheese cake ;-).
Everything from the service, to the cleanliness of carts, to the quality of the food was outstanding. Strong recommend from a Vancouver local
If you are going to Stanley Park this is a MUST! The food is delicious. The entire set up is so perfect and it allows you to do the park on your own terms. Not to mention the service is so personalized. Will definitely do...More
We used this picnic service for a baby shower in Stanley Park. Was it ever worth it. The food is just fantastic, and I can't say enough about the service. The carts were packed with such care and the owner was so helpful and accommodating....More
If you are spending anytime around lunch time around Stanley Park do yourself a favor and get this picnic basket. Everything is made fresh for the day. Everything just taste do delish. And best of all you don't have to clean anything up or take...More
Fantastic experience! Simon was amazing to deal with. I had requested a number of modifications to the menu, everything was done exactly as I had requested. It was easy to find, the food was delicious, pickup was right on time. We couldn't have been happier...More
We picked up our food wagon at the Stanley Park info booth parking lot, and walked 20 minutes to be close to the 9 o'clock gun, with views of the seaplanes and cruise terminal. What a unique experience, well worth the $100; the food was...More
This was an amazing picnic experience, the dishes were absolutely delicious. It was great to reconnect to nature in beautiful Stanley park. We are so looking forward to do it again with our children this summer :D can't wait!
I received the groupon for picnix from a friend of mine, she swore it was the best experience she had of a picnic. I was pleased to meet Simon, he texted my and called to say he was running late and stuck in the truck...More
Our daughter recently gifted us with a picnix lunch. My husband and I thoroughly enjoyed the fresh and wonderful tasting dishes which were so nicely presented. It was a great afternoon, and playing with the ""large"" dice after lunch was great fun. We love being...More
I booked this picnix with an umbrella. It was a beautiful day in the park and the food was fantastic. Simon kept in contact with us - even calling to check in the night before. He was super accomodating for us as he knew we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8523580-Reviews-Picnix-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pier 7 restaurant + bar,"Outstanding restaurant - views across to Vancouver, lovely food - fresh salads, super steak , but the experience was made by the professionalism of Alia the server. Best service yet in BC. We shall be back.
Food was good and ambience was lovely, but front of house lacked attention to details. Given the prices, we were disappointed with Pier 7. Shared calamari was very good - fresh and crispy, served with creole spice, jalapeño, red peppers, tzatziki sauce, lemon. Salad as...More
We came to Pier 7 based on TripAdvisor reviews and we were not disappointed. The location is great The food was stunning. I had the strip loin it was so flavorful and cooked to perfection. I will definitely be back here when next in Vancouver
We had dinner outside and it was fantastic! Great food and amazing views! They even offered a “kids” pasta for our little one who loved it! Highly recommend, we will be back if we visit Vancouver again!
The food was poor. We ordered steaks and they were tough and not nice. Complained and they did send a new one for one of us but this was no better. They said they had changed meat supplier and if this is the case they...More
Great view, good service. Food and drinks are average. Fish dishes are the best choice. They are open on Sundays and Mondays which is a good thing since many places are closed.
We had a nice brunch at Pier 7 recently. The ambience is pleasant and the staff was nice. They have a patio that's heated for those who want to sit outside. You do have access to views views views regardless of where you sit.
Beautiful views wasted on a restaurant with below mediocre dishes. This place needs a new chef to turn things around
We ate at the Sandbar on Granville Island and the famous Joe Forte's but nobody's Seafood Tower held a candle to Pier 7. The views are also spectacular.
The Lonsdale Quay / Shipyards district of North Vancouver makes a wonderful, less hectic destination than Granville Island. One of the restaurants here is Pier 7. What made our lunch experience special was our server Annika. She was very personable and helpful.. My wife and...More
Overall a very good meal with great service from Hershey. However, i have had better steak at chain restaurants. The prawns and lobster were both very good
Went out with family for the 1st time to this restaurant. The only time we saw our waitress was when ordering and we had to wait almost 15 minutes to do that. The food was served by the manager and some other staff member. They...More
My friends and I went there for a late lunch/early dinner. The server barely came by to check if everything was ok, and if we needed anything else. However, she had no trouble to inform us that her shift was over, so we needed to...More
This is the 6th time here... we've had pretty good experiences previously, therefore have returned. They have good promotions and the food is reliably decent. Unfortunately, we all decided after our dinner on the patio this would be our last return visit. The waitress when...More
We had really good service. Sat outside and watched the sun going down over Burred. Food was reasonable in terms of pricing. Food was very good. Service was excellent. Great place to eat on the waterfront. Will go back.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2663564-Reviews-Pier_7_restaurant_bar-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pink Elephant Thai,"We ended up on this street to visit a store and hadn't eaten -this was the only place nearby so we went in. Ohmygoodness it was delicious and amazing service. The lettuce wraps were the best I've had. Nothing was too spicy and everything was...More
First of all, I had to go look for a person to be seated and when a guy (who I suppose was a manager) saw me he only pointed at the table where I should sit. When I wanted to make an order, I called...More
Unprofessional staff. The portion is smaller now and the food is bland. Every time i order it’s different. No consistency. Very disappointed. My friends had similar experience.
I walked out of Pinkj Elephant restaurant today after waiting more than 45 minutes without seeing my order or any communication from staff. My colleague got their meal after about 20 minutes, but mine was a no-show. They seemed to be far too busy servicing...More
Went for lunch ,quiet busy ,food was alright for the price. However Tony ,one of the Managers was utterly unprofessional, rude ,and made the whole Luncheon unpleasant. Would not go back ,to be treaded in that manner .
Loved this restaurant the food was great and very fresh , Tony was very friendly we had a great night
On Alberni street, opposite Trump tower. Absolutely marvellous meal with excellent. Service. Toni ,manager looked personally after us and did his best to provide an excellent meal. There is a wide selection of food and it’s not at all expensive. Would night recommend this for...More
Mediocre, somewhat disappointing food. Service was good - relatively fast & friendly, lunch menu reasonably priced ($11) with a good selection, but Pad Thai was lacking in both taste and texture, and the red curry, supposed spicy, was not at all, but it was more...More
A colleague and I frequent the Pink Elephant during the lunch hour. The food is awesome and we have always experienced top notch service from Kate. She’s accommodating, friendly and has a beautiful smile. Two thumbs up.
Great value lunch set menus, friendly service and good food. What else do you need. We had a mix of a-la-carte and set meals and shared the food. The curry's were comparable to what we get in Hong Kong so that's a definite plus. The...More
No words! Delicious! Delicious!Delicious! So friendly too! Tony Leng Chai is such a brilliant manager! Highly recommended! Amazing interior deco!
Extremely disappointed with the food. 2 small pieces of chicken and very few veggies in the curry. Left very unsatisfied and hungry. Will not be returning
Decent decor but the food was lacking any Thai flavours. No chillies or fish sauce in the dishes means this isn’t a Thai place. If you want Thai go somewhere else. That said the chicken satay and peanut sauce was good but that’s not Thai....More
This place was delicious! I like my Vancouver dining experiences to be authentic and memorable, and Pink Elephant was both. Tony Thai was a great host with great recommendations. All 3 of us in my party loved our food (we shared w noodle dishes, spring...More
Just to thanks tony and Kate for this wonderful place and service. You will be surprise by the pink inside",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2325064-Reviews-Pink_Elephant_Thai-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pink Pearl,"This restaurant is excellent! Lots of space at a round table with lazy susan. Sharing food with all of us worked out well. The service and food was wonderful. I highly recommend a visit!
Pink Pearl still serves delicious dim sum at an excellent price. We don't care that the decor is dated.
went for dim sum, must have had a huge party, 300 ? place was walled off but managed to serve our small group of 6 in the smaller area. menu was ordered off menu and fewer carts . seems more people want to order but...More
They would not let any of us pay separately lol... we even told then in advance then at the end the told us we should have told them in advance... we're in Vancouver get it together. All of us had to e transfer my friend....More
The waiters were pushy and didn’t real care about the order. The food came out 1 soup for one person then was told it would be several minutes for the second person’s soup. The main course was served then the second soup arrived. The refried...More
Our family came here for early dim sum on the weekend. By the time it was prime time for lunch, the place was jammed packed of diners (at least a couple hundred) with lots of chaos happening. They need a better system in delivering the...More
We have been going to the Pink Pearl as a family for 30 years. I have given them a break for the fire, and then covid. But I am done. Such poor poor service and not the old days here at all. Hardly any carts....More
We were frequent customers here and used to enjoy both dim sum and dinners here very much. We went for dim sum for the first time since the covid restrictions. We were sorely disappointed. We had siu mai which were bland and much too large....More
PP has been here forever and back in the day it was one of the early purveyors of dim sum. They closed for the longest time for renovations but now open again...very large restaurant even with space seating due to COVID restrictions. Anticipated delicious dim...More
Excellent dim sum for brunch, we ended up going back for dinner on the same day, also excellent dishes and services. We only go to the real authentic Chinese restaurant, after this first meal, we will surely come back again.
3.5* The Pink Pearl East Vancouver +Cantonese dim sum served from the carts Private parking lot; very popular; local favorite Good food service; friendly and helpful Food is good; prices are fair Ordered har gow, sio mal, char siu bao. Best dish was the delicious...More
The food here is amazing! I went for Dim Sum, and we ordered a lot of food and it was delicious! The staff was very kind and on top of things. The bbq pork baked bao were super delicious.
So I haven’t been here in ages so I thought I’d come here instead of my usual. I got here relatively early so we got a seat quickly. I was pleasantly surprised by the old school dim sum carts and was able to order many...More
We have been here many times, and in the past I think we often left feeling that it could have been better. But, on this occasion Pink Pearl put on a pretty good performance. Seating and initial service to get us started was timely, and...More
Great food and price free parking I like and lots of tables and room available . Great restaurant and totally recommend",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3369821-Reviews-Pink_Pearl-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pink Peppercorn Seafood Restaurant,"Discovered this gem while searching for quality seafood. What a great surprise to find many people that previously worked at the amazing Cannery that the Vancouver port shut down, carrying on their greatness here. We enjoyed a very tasty, properly prepared meal. Perfectly cooked seafood...More
My first time going to the Pink Peppercorn was an amazing experience. Everything was incredible. The host was friendly and attentive. The server was exceptional and funny. The chef is a legend. Creating dishes that look as good as they taste. They exceeded all expectations...More
Admittedly, I always get the same entree. Try as I might, I just love the salmon wellington too much to try something else. My loss though, because everything is amazing. The scallop salad was so good I wiped the plate clean. I used my finger...More
OMG! I have been trying to find the chef from the Cannery restaurant & find it! They had opened the pink peppercorn seafood house… it is through Facebook food pages that I found out about this restaurant, I have been back a few times &...More
This is a hidden gem! Amazing, fresh seafood with custom sauces and classic presentation that’ll take you back to the 80’s! The staff are a dynamic duo that work the room like a true professionals. The choices are endless… we’re going to be back till...More
My dad and I went here after searching for a seafood restaurant online. We had no idea what to expect. It's a quaint little place with a nautical theme and the food is absolutely wonderful! I had salmon wellington which was amazing and dad had...More
Tonight the Mrs and I ventured out to the Pink Peppercorn. It was on our list of restaurants to try while visiting Vancouver. Let me tell you something…IT WAS THE BEST MEAL WE HAVE EVER EXPERIENCED IN OUT ENTIRE LIVES! We started things off with...More
The food and service was perfect.Whenever we want a great seafood dinner we drive from Langley to the Pink Peppercorn.The Cesar salad is worth the trip alone.Add the Chilean Seabass special and Pecan pie for dessert you can't beat it.Aurturo and Teddy top things off...More
By chance I discovered pink peppercorn seafood restaurant so I decided to give them a try and I’m glad I did. The food was excellent. Every dish was well executed and the portion sizes are very generous. Yes their entrees are on the higher price...More
My husband and I were huge fans of the Cannery years ago and have always talked about how wonderful the food was. I stumbled on this restaurant when I searched for lobster oil and found out the former chef of the Cannery had opened Pink...More
It is a while since my last visit ,my niece in town for a week ,want to take me out for my early Birthday dinner , so I choose the Peppercorn because they stay with their friends apartment just across the road from the restaurant...More
The biggest problem with the Pink Peppercorn is deciding what to eat. Tonight the scallop appetizer was simply the best, most tasty, most perfectly cooked scallops I've ever had anywhere. Their caesar salad is delicious as well, and you know how few restaurants can make...More
Was here for our annual Anniversary dinner and Eddy (executive Chef) did not disappoint. We have been to this restaurant 8-9 times as the food and service is always 5 stars. Following tonights dinner, (I had the evenings special of halibut in a lobster tarragon...More
We have been regular visitors at The Cannery for years and we were so disappointed when it closed almost 10 years ago. As many have mentioned here, the lobster oil/balsamic mixture with their sourdough bread was always a great start to any meal. So after...More
Quaint old fashioned restaurant that looks to be dated from the 70’s. It is approximately 3.5 miles from downtown Vancouver. The restaurant anchors a street strip of smaller shops. The interior is comfortable. And, the service is attentive and friendly. The portion sizes are enormous...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1797826-Reviews-Pink_Peppercorn_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pizza Carano,"I had the most amazing Burrata and beet salad. The funghi Pizza was awesome with a mouth watering crust! Everything super delicious. Staff very helpful and friendly. Nice outdoor space to sit outside and eat. Definitely recommend!
Thank you Trevor for providing amazing take out during these crazy social distancing times! The takeout windows work perfectly to keep the distance and we still get your delicious cooking. Loved the tagliatelle bolognese and Italian sausage pizza the other night..the noodles were so fresh...More
Can't fathom why mostly families frequent the place? By 7:30PM you can easily get a table. The place is hip with great urban music and great pizza. We had the ""Carne"" with superb ingredients. In season the grilled artichoke is to die for, end it...More
Everything was great from the service to the food. Pizza was thin crust, ordered a couple of gluten free crusts too which were excellent. Meatballs were also mouthwatering delicious!
The area of town is slowly being gentrified, so I hope this place does well. I had the quattro formaggi pizza its just wow..but then ask for the Truffle oil and you get WOW!!!! We tried the pizza special, butternut squash, walnuts and arugula -...More
small but comfortable.the aromas when you walk in are great.we had the smoked olives..they were awesome.had 2 pizzas and I am a very fussy pizza critic..usually don't like thin crust but these hand made pizzas were terrific.the menu is very different from just your plain...More
A friend and I had been wanting to try this restaurant / pizzeria for some time and we did one night with a bottle of wine, salads and a pizza. It was alright and thats it. The server was terrific and the guys making pizza...More
I discovered this little gem of a pizza joint 5 years ago, back when Fraser street was non-descript. I love pizza, been in love with pizza all my life. Always game to check out new pizza places in town & this place rocks!! That thin...More
First time visit to this amazing small restaurant. While the noise level was fairly high and the music not to my taste the service and the absolutely AMAZINGLY DELICIOUS pizza means I will go back for sure. The autumn special pizza was inspired and the...More
Pizza Carano is hands down the best pizza in Vancouver. It is absolutely delicious and the service is wonderful. If you love pizza and want the best and live in Vancouver be sure to go as soon as you can. You do not want to...More
Really not much to fault with this great little restaurant. Great service and great food in a cozy atmosphere. We had pizza and they were the best pizza we've had for a long time. Very busy and limited seating so get there early!
Awesome place for amazing pizza. I love thin crust and this place has the best ever. So delicious. The mushroom one is my favorite so far and I can hardly wait to taste them all.
Never heard of it until a friend took me there. On Fraser street the small space (soon expanding) the place offers great pizza soup salads and pasta. Small quaint and friendly the waitress was more than forthcoming on here favourite. Ordered the mushroom soup like...More
Not pretentious, just wonderful bubbly thin crust perfection with clouds of love toppings served by down to earth and friendly pizza artists! My only complaint is that it took us three years to finally visit Pizza Carano. And their beet and walnut salad is killer....More
Pizza Carano has been around for a few years now but the consistency in delivering outstanding food has remained super strong. Just like their Funghi pizza that has been my personal favourite since day one - the combination of their delicious crust that carries the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7141197-Reviews-Pizza_Carano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pizza Garden,"Brutal service. Delivery took almost two hours, and the pizza arrived cold. Super frustrating, especially with hungry kids.
We ordered pizza delivery for our family during a hotel stay in Vancouver and it was really great. New York style crust and perfectly sauced and prepared. Highly recommend.
We stayed in Downtown Vancouver at the Moda Hotel which is 1 block to Pizza Garden. After a full day of hiking through Vancouver, we went to Pizza Garden at 10:15 for a late pizza party. The pizza was hot, crispy and flavorful. We tried...More
Good pizza, good service and friggin good time. I like the pizza i like the guys, good time. good bathroom.
Pizza Garden has a number of locations across Vancouver. I go to or order from the Vancouver downtown location on Smythe. I love good pizza but did not think one could get it from pizza places which focus on takeout. I had thought — until...More
Pizza Garden was a pleasant surprise. Specializing in authentic Neapolitan pizza pies, this BC-born chain offers pizza lovers a fine alternative to your standard Chicago or New York-style pizzas. Priding themselves on making pizzas with only the freshest ingredients, they offer patrons a unique take-out...More
This is Neapolitan-style pizza, and it was quite tasty, with a thin, chewy crust, not a lot of cheese, but plenty of toppings. The Calabria we ordered was really good. We wanted more after we ate it. My only complaint was that we ordered this...More
The hotel we stayed at recommended this place so we walked here to just to get Pizza by the slice. At the time, there wasn't much to choose from so we each ended up with Pepperoni & Pineapple (would have preferred just Pepperoni or but...More
We were very lucky to get to this Pizza Garden in downtown Vancouver, Canada. Authentic neapolitan pizza. Pizzas are cooked in a stone hearth oven. It allous to achieve pevect crispness and lightness. Staff hand craft each pizza. Many different toppings. Sides are bread and...More
Followed recommendations for nearby pizza place and discover this great Neapolitan pizza place - popular for quick meal and take away. Friendly staff, great choices, fresh ingredients - highly satisfying meal.
Great pizza, cheesy garlic bread also awesome not a lot of seating but worth waiting or taking to go! Very busy for take out!
We ordered from Pizza Garden on a recommendation from our hotel when we stayed at the Residence Inn on Hornby downtown Vancouver. It did not disappoint...... The delivery was quick, the pizza cooked to perfection and it was extremely delicious!!
I became edicted to this place every time I go downtown Vancouver I have to stop and pick up couple of slices it's quality been consistent
Ordered delivery; four types and all very delicious. Favourite was Pollo Excellente followed closely by Primo. Large are good sized pizzas. Delivered on time and pizza hot
Very tasty. Good value. We had 8 slices from the pre-cooked range, $22 - £12.70 They warmed them all up together. Very friendly helpful lady taking orders.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4851043-Reviews-Pizza_Garden-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pizzeria Barbarella,"When the waitress brings you a dirty glass with lipstick on it, you wonder whether the rest of the glasses were unwashed, too. Total turn off bur we had no energy to walk out due to heat and exhaustion. The restrooms look like they've never...More
We have been to Barbarella many times over the years so we are familiar with what they have usually provided in the past. On a recent visit, although the bruschetta, salad, sangria, and service were excellent as usual we found the pizza itself to be...More
Wish I'd had time to dine in this trip. Kids picked up a couple of pizzas on the way to us. Flavour and texture was very good; the drive just meant they'd cooled down too much to get a true sense of how they would...More
Video Review on youtube: vancity food crew pizzeria barbarella . This place has solid pizza. I got two lunch sized ones. The better one was the Cavolini, with charred brussel sprouts and pancetta. The sausage and peppers one was okay. The pizza is delicious and...More
Excellent pizzas which you can wash down with a good selection of local brews. The atmosphere is casual and the service is good.
We really enjoyed the pizza and brushetta was to die for! Our server Cami was very nice and attentive. We'd recommend!
Barbarella has been our favourite dine in thin crust pizza choice since they opened several years ago. The crust is excellent, the topping choices and quantity perfect. The house salad is huge and more than ample for two (or more) to share. If you prefer...More
We have been to Barbarella many times and find it consistently good with cheerful service, excellent salads and bruschetta, very good selection of pizzas. As others have noted, it can be a bit chilly on a cold night so watch out for the air vents...More
The ambiance is stark, the temperature on the chilly side, but the food is fantastic. Easy to get to by transit (right on the main Broadway line), it is well worth making an effort to get there.
Spartan, kid friendly East Van venue. Extensive choices in pizzas cut into New York size slices. The staff were very friendly and accommodating. Fresh ingredients and unexpected quality salad. Kids were able to wander around without any issue.
I come here quite often as I live very close to it. Pizzas are so fresh and the artisan crust is wonderful. Favorite topping is the honey picante. The green salad is very fresh and the dressing on it so delicious.
Been there many times. Good pizza and many different ones to chose from. They have a great kids menu including juice and dessert. Usually filled with families from 5pm to 7pm and then a more kidless crowd rolls in a bit later.
We were here with a large group on a Monday night. 20+ people. Dining area is large and the staff very accommodating, especially given that we had 12 kids in the group. Parking can be a bit tricky but def. worth visiting.
Their food is absolutely outstanding. This is my daughter's boyfriend's favourite restaurant and I can understand why. The homemade pizzas have extremely fresh ingredients. We had 4 different pizzas and all of them were delicious but my favourite was Campagna. The caprese salad was absolutely...More
Went here with 6 friends. Lots of room and not overly crowded. Pizza was very good with many vegetarian selections. Will definitely come back again. Beer on tap selections were varied and enjoyable",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2589348-Reviews-Pizzeria_Barbarella-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pizzeria Farina,"Loved it in the past, but haven,t been there for more than a year. Not good on this visit! Actually the crust was very good, thin and cooked perfectly, but they must be trying to save money, as the toppings were so meagre as to...More
Finally got to try this pizza spot and I’m glad I did. Placed an order online just before 4pm and showed at 4:40 on the dot when it was just being boxed. Took it straight home to eat. I tried both the margherita and the...More
I’m very disappointed. I went to the pizza place tonight and I’ve never been so insulted and the woman that was running the place didn't address the problem that I had there very well and afterwards she was very impolite. I would never go back...More
Farina was highly recommended by our Airbnb host and others who had stayed in the apartment. They were right! Unbelievably good - we had the Funghi, Margherita and Carciofi and they were all superb. Cost about $20 each and they are roughly 12"" in diameter,...More
We came in early right after 5pm to avoid the lines. We were the 3rd and 4th person in the place. We ordeed 2 pizzas. Each one of them costs $22 plus tax. Our food did not come out until after 30 minutes. The lady...More
Great little spot on Main Street. Grabbed some fresh pizza to go and it was delicious. They also sell their dough if you want to have a pizza night in
Mr Food Lord Follow me on instagram @mrfoodlord⬅️ Tag & comment below!⬇️ My Tag👉#mrfoodlord —————————————— Restaurant🏠: Pizzeria Farina Location📍: 915 Main St, Vancouver, BC V6A 2V8 Closed ⋅ Opens 5 p.m. Saturday 5–9:30p.m. Sunday 5–9:30p.m. Monday 5–9:30p.m. Tuesday 5–9:30p.m. Wednesday 5–9:30p.m. Thursday 5–9:30p.m. Friday 5–9:30p.m....More
Stumbled upon this place while looking for something to eat in False Creek. It's very unassuming, but pretty busy on a Saturday. The place itself is quite small, and they make pizza to order, so things sometimes take awhile. It also gets really hot inside,...More
One of the better pizza places in town for thin crust. Good selection of toppings. It’s good but not the best in town. They are next door to the Boxcar at Cobalt, where you can order a pizza and take it over to enjoy with...More
Staying in the neighborhood we went twice for pizzas at Pizza Farina- had to try more as they were so delicious. And worth waiting for. Super service.
I simply love the pizza here, it is my absolute favourite! It's thin - but not too thin, with a great chewy crust (but not too chewy!) - a must go for everyone!
Loads of Atmosphere as tiny, just down the road from the Roger's Arena, Friendly staff, brilliant fresh pizza
We split the Pizza Funghi with arugula and Parmesan sauce. The crust was lightly charred. The pizza was a bit salty but tasty. Service was minimal and at the counter.
After reading so many amazing reviews about this place I perhaps placed too high of an expectation on their pizza. It was great don't get me wrong but it was similar to some places in Edmonton where I believe the concept of good food never...More
Although seating is at a premium, if you are lucky enough to score a seat at this eatery consider yourself lucky! The pizza dough is light & crispy. All the ingredients are fresh and flavorful. You can't go wrong with whichever delicious pizza you choose....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2390371-Reviews-Pizzeria_Farina-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Po Kong Vegetarian Restauran,"We have gone to this Buddhist restaurant for years and love the staff, the tranquility and the food. Skin rolls in black bean sauce, tasty fresh mushrooms and green beans with black beans are our favorites. Park on Kingsway or a side street as parking...More
I'm not a vegetarian but my neighbors are, so PoKong it is, for shared food. Despite no meat, the dishes are amazing for flavor and texture, Chinese style. I like the food here even better than at some regular Chinese restaurants. All dishes have a...More
Been visiting Po Kong (formerly Bo Kong) for over 22 years. It's been part of our family's celebrations/traditions for this long. We each have our favourites. Staff have come and gone, but they care for their food and customers. They're vegan and good people. Need...More
One of best vegetarian restaurant in town. If you don’t need the frou frou ambience, you definitely more bang for your buck at this Chinese vegetarian resto without sacrificing taste. We came here to see they have respectful covid distance for seating. They have bright...More
FABULOUS. DELICIOUS. I’m in quarantine and have ordered four meals from here. Everything has been even better than anticipated. Highly recommend Po Kong. My faves are the soups. Always end up ordering extra for midnight snacks. Thank you. Your chefs and staff are incredible.
We ordered 5 dishes and were unhappy with how bland they were. We enjoyed the sweet and sour wontons but have had better elsewhere. Probably won't go back.
So hard to believe all of this food is vegan. Shish kabob was quite filling. Love this place for its vibe as well.
Price is fair, the portions are huge and everything I tried so far was delicious. My recommendations are: Spicy Green Beans, Bean Curd rolls with black bean sauce, sweet and sour bean curd pineapple delight and Tofu with Eggplant (ask for a rice portion on...More
I took my family here recently and have been coming for years. Their food is exceptional, and it reflects with how busy they are all the time. The prices are very reasonable, despite their last increase. I have taken many non vegetarian friends who are...More
So after a month of travels in Asia and being spoiled with all the local delicacies we return home.. feeling that we need to get realistic in our eating habits we return to one of the local favorite vegetarian restaurants in town.. and they hit...More
Came here because Sun Po King across the street doesn't open till 11am, so I gave this similar name vegetarian place a try because they open earlier. Turned out that are just as good if not better than their competitor. Staff were friendly and cheerful....More
always outstanding, the old main street bo kong, with classic chinese veg dishes. i love the one that is sort of a fake fish: nori and bean skin curd wrapping a variety of gluten stuff with black bean sauce and pine nuts. superb.
This was the former original Bo Kong on Main St. before it closed. A scrumptious vegetarian meal for 2 for under $11 bucks. You get a vegetarian chop Suey, crispy tofu cake, and soup. We ordered an extra vegetarian spring roll. It was tasty and...More
Food in there is ok, good, but nothing exceptional. There is a second almost the same restaurant on the other side of the road with the same menu, weird.
I was here with a large group of people so we got to try a number of dishes. Some were a little 'uninteresting' or 'bland', but most were very tasty and delicious. I'll definitely be back, especially as I want to try their dim sum...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4848055-Reviews-Po_Kong_Vegetarian_Restauran-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Poke Time Robson,"Poké Time on Howe If you are trying this place for the first time because of their B1Gq Free special, be prepared to wait. We waited for between 40 and 50 minutes, then noticed that many people who came in after us were leaving with...More
Poke Time Howe Street location was probably my favourite lunch spot when working in downtown Vancouver. I order the large Lanakai Bowl. It is a cornucopia of flavours and textures. Ahi, Salmon, rice, mandarin oranges, watermelon radish, cucumber, crab salad, pineapple, green onion and mango!...More
Tried the denman and Robson location. Very good the vegetarian and the Cali poke, reasonably priced. The free toppings are pretty much to be tried all. Very refreshing
İngredients are so fresh... And mainly either wild caught or sustainably caught... Organic black rice ..try it... Sooo good. İf you want high quality sushi grade fish and side dish and condiments, this us the place. İf you are looking for a place to linger,...More
I had only had poke once before, in Manly, Australia and loved it, so when we came across Poke Time we went straight in. Staff were very friendly and helpful, explaining our options. I had the raw marinaded tuna and salmon for the first time...More
Such a good option for lunch on the go! Great menu with a ton of options. Much healthier then the typical grab and go lunch spots
First time to this establishment and there were lots of choices and add ons. Staff weren't as helpful in giving me ideas/options (even though we were the only ones in the establishment). Decided to go with one of their Poke bowl combos instead of a...More
Was walking down Robson and decided it was time for some healthy food. Salmon and Tuna Poke with Crab salad. 16 bucks with a bottle of water. Great clean flavour, spicy aioli was perfect. Worth the stop by. I will be back!
looked at Trip advisor for some fish recommendations as we were craving poke and yaaaaas. so good! The place is small and easy to miss on Robson but glad we found it! We got to choose whatever we wanted in our poke and their marinated...More
The Wild Salmon Westcoast Poke was amazing. Clean, quick and delicious. The best Salmon dish that I have ever had. I will be eating here a few times a week.
On our last night in vancouver we walked around town and passed by this place after they had already closed so we planned to eat lunch there the next day. We came in right at opening, and it was a good thing we did because...More
I love this poke place! Clean, fast service and good portions for the price :) I usually make my own bowl
I had read the reviews before going here and they were all positive. I was SO impressed with the food. It was so good. The portion size is really generous and to be honest I ended up taking half of the food home. 3 options...More
I thought Poke time was clean and provided great service. However, I am used to Poke and my 9 year old loves it! I also thought it was reasonable for the downtown area and quick.
Tried Poke for the first time was good. Lots of choices and flavors were overwhelming. Choose your protein, rice, sauces, and sides. Pretty much a mixture of sushi rolls and sashimi in a bowl. I would eat it again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10592489-Reviews-Poke_Time_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pokérrito,"My first poke bowl and it was delicious! The Pokeritto lady helped to make a right choice)) fair prices, fresh ingredients, good portions.
Good poke, nice selection and prices aren't that bad. Nothing insanely crazy special but it's good! Great location too.
This is a place where you stand in line at the counter and figure out what you want to order. Behind the counter the staff go into action to create the bowls/wraps you are looking for with a number of choices. You can choose various...More
I usually build my own bowl as I like to pick and choose what goes in my poke, I have tried other poke places before but I always end up coming back to Pokerrito! My favorite thing there is their Umami sauce, it is so...More
I got turned on to eating poke from our last visit to Maui. So, I looked forward to trying Pokerrito. This is a small place. There are only a few seats. Most of the space was for people to line up and the Poke making...More
Certainly wanted this one to be special, as it was a while since I'd had poke. A local's recommendation led me to Pokerrito on Dunsmuir. 1st impression was of a dingy not too clean place, needed a good wipe down, floors grubby, condiment bottles requiring...More
Been getting back to eating poke more often lately. Pokerrito is as good as I remember. Love how the ingredients are so fresh.
Pricy but good. We made our own poke bowl with salmon and tuna. A little ridiculous how a scoop of avocado and crisp toppings are a extra dollar each when already paying over $10 for a regular sized bowl. I would rather have a poke...More
Great, cheap and rwally tasty. So many flavours! It has everything to eat, nuts protein carbohydrates veggie
This is basically a take out place though there are a few tables. The food is excellent and super fresh. Good value. I took a bowl of poke back to the hotel and really enjoyed it. All kinds of toppings to add so each meal...More
Absolutely amazing place. The whole idea of a poke bowl is just great, and with produce they have in Pokerrito your options are basically countless, since you can modify it in numerous ways. Or just get one of their signature bowls, there are few masterpieces...More
Just so perfect, I cannot fault this place. My first poke bowl ever and it was so delicious! The interior is very modern and edgy! Worth a visit!
Hi Tidacakes, we're so glad you loved your first poké bowl ever! We hope to see you again many more times. :)
One of the better poke places in town. Well priced and good portions. Get there early as it gets bay6!
Hi Maria, thank you for the review. We hope to serve you again soon!
Fresh ingredients, bowls prepared in front of you, and a check not that expensive. For a tasty and healthy meal, we cannot ask better... Just don't plan to go there for a date, it is not the place for it.
Thank you for such a kind review Matthieu! It definitely does get busy during lunch time. We look forward to seeing you soon :)
We ordered vegan bowls from here and they were delicious. Easy to build a bowl or order one of the suggested bowls. Great variety of ingredients to choose from. All the food was fresh.
Thank you for the kind response! We hope to see you soon.",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10745237-Reviews-Pokerrito-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pomegranate Grillhouse & Cafe,"The best pizza ever! Love the homemade crust. Arash (one of the owners) is a very good host. They do not split bills so be prepared to coordinate that with your friends before dining or paying. Not a big deal. Will be back for sure.
Honestly I keep going back. My favorite burger in Vancouver by far. The family running the place are very nice hard working people. Highly recommended.
Stopped in for a pint and a glass of wine along with a quick bite ahead of our hike into Quarry Rock. Had a pint of Bomber IPA which was very good. The three of us shared a pizza which was fantastic. Easily feed the...More
It’s amazing taste. You must try. In front of cashier is a young guy that it seems is a son of owner and a little bit creazy. But the owners are old man and woman that work hard to bake a great pizza and sandwich...More
Stopped by here after doing a hike and our experienced was good. The place is very busy so it took a while for the server to come out and get our order. I had Pom Burger, fries and beer. My burger was very delicious, the...More
The famous Pomegranate Grillhouse & Cafe is located at 4361 Gallant Ave, a short walking distance from the cove. Head to Deep Cove, hike the Baden-Powell trail that leads to Lookout Quarry Rock or go kayaking or stand up paddle in the calm waters or...More
The person working the front was incredibly rude. Told myself and my two friends that we had to order and pay together or we wouldn’t be served at all. We questioned him and as we wanted to pay separately and he told us to leave....More
By the time we reached this cafe for a hearty meal... around 7.30pm , they had run out of all Burgers on their Menu List . Being a Saturday , holiday Revellers were in plentiful around this area.... so it was understandable !! We ordered...More
Worst place I ever been to! WORST service and the RUDEST manager ever. 18$ for a terrible burger. I’m sick to my stomach. Highly don’t recommend this place.
When we got there the place was really busy. It was a Friday in July after all so was to be expected. Place is a Mom n Pop n Son run place. Deep Cove was supper busy, so was the restaurant so we knew we...More
Pizza is a family go to food when we are travelling and decided to go here for lunch after our hike in Lynn Canyon (also because of good reviews in tripadvisor). Unfortunately, our experience doesn’t match the rave reviews ...the pizza is okay but nothing...More
Lovely place, people and pizza!! The boys thoroughly enjoyed their pizzas for lunch and I opted for the burger. After a 2 hour Kayak in the bay the pizza was most welcome. Everybody enjoyed and very full - we ate a light dinner that evening!.
A cozy restaurant in the heart of Deep Cove, owned and managed by mom, papa and their son. We had a homemade pizza, which was delicious. Allow some time for your food to be served, enjoy the atmosphere because as I said, it's a small...More
Excelllent homemade charbroiled burger and homemade pizza. Went for a hike and was feeling hungry with my partner. We saw the funny sign outside and thought why not? We were impressed by the cozy atmosphere and welcoming service. Also got a chance to catch up...More
Small basic menu. Three cheese pizza was not cheesy- more tomato sauce than cheese. Over cooked fries- and only around 8 as the side with burger. Burger was decent. Understaffed for a busy Sunday with one server and one cook doing the running of food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7933393-Reviews-Pomegranate_Grillhouse_Cafe-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Poor Italian Ristorante,"We came here for a family birthday celebration. A few family members have dined here before & recommended the place. We all enjoyed the food. They still have good food. Unfortunately they have limited dining hours – Thursdays to Sundays and only on Fridays are...More
Got invited to my Italian friends 25 years anniversary dinner at the Poor Italian restaurant down on East Vancouver , lot of parking , because their location , it is been a while since my last visit , I ate out a lot for business...More
Best Italian I have been too in Vancouver. We had order the Pappardelle and lamb, lemon chicken scallopini and Nonna’s lasagna. Nonna’s lasagna was the star of dinner. I recommend pre booking and request the window seats.
Much-vaunted by friends and family I was disappointed in the atmosphere and the food after all. House red Tuscan wine was not even what I had hoped for. Olives were an enjoyable starter and service was excellent.
Been to PI many many many times...always been great food and great service...this last time...all the dishes were salty! but the service was great!
I booked a reservation for a pre Valentine’s Day for me and my boyfriend the night before the day we were going out for dinner on Feb 13th. We were really looking forward to trying out this restaurant because we heard great things. We arrived...More
After passing by this restaurant for several years on our way through town, we finally tried it, and with the added unexpected bonus of being part of Dine Out Vancouver. The mussels marinara appetizer was fresh, light, and delightful (and there were a lot of...More
This is a nice option for Italian. The Caesar salads were great and the caprese was all right. Lasagna was very good but linguine and clams too fishy. Good service. Jus a suggestion do not sit near the door to drafty with the smoking outside.
Great pasta dish, tried their daily special fresh fish which was Halibut. My all time favorite is the Vongole pasta, which is clams
In this place be sure that you will find a great pasta! Al dente and tasty! The service is excellent and the place is so great. The meal is was very good even more in the Seafood Festival! I had a Linguine with Lobster that...More
Dear marciosantosrj, We appreciate your wonderful review and would love to welcome you back again soon! All the best!! - The Poor Italian Team
It’s all good, especially the pasta and deserts. Very reasonable prices. I will be back for sure. We liked it.
1st time there and was so surprised how yummy this place was... should have tried it sooner I will for sure go back... Can’t stop thinking about the yummy stuff we had Please try for your self and see a hidden gem 💎
Thanks for your wonderful review, we look forward to welcoming you again Steffanyp2013!!
We had an impromptu dinner at the Poor Italian, we got incredibly lucky just walking in as they only had one table not reserved. The staff were friendly and attentive and the food was wonderfully balanced. We were there in July during their fresh seafood...More
I been here once few years ago and standard of food and services were ok. Yesterday I went again with my parents but all went completely downhill. They are holding seafood festival but what’s on menu were not what u get. Baby octopus salad isn’t...More
Excellent service, delicious pasta dishes and not too busy at lunch - easy to have a conversation. Best place in the area.",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1990389-Reviews-Poor_Italian_Ristorante-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Portland Craft,"There's a strong beer list here with a fairly standard food menu. It's right on Main Street and a good place to pop into for a beer or two and some food.
Strike one: The one thing on the menu that caught my eye before even going was the dish with prawns and house-made lamb sausage. Upon being seated we were told that they were out of sausage (how can that be on a Friday night at...More
Decided to try this place out for Happy Hour. We arrived before 1700 as that's when Happy Hour ended. Unfortunately, we did not have a great experience, but was graciously compensated and therefore I gave it an average rating. When I first arrived at 1620,...More
Great list of craft beer and decent menu. Good music. A good place to meet a friend/s. Nice dark atmosphere and good music. Hip but not pretentious. When not peak hours about 8-10 seats at the bar.
I was on my way out of town and wanted to sample a few brews before I left. I stumbled across this place by chance and ducked inside to see if I could add a flight or two. While not overly large, it does have...More
This place has a cosmopolitan range of clientele and a great vibe to it. There is a wide range of beers available and a great menu with attentive service. It’s not hard to see why the place was packed on a Wednesday night when we...More
We went with friends after a hiatus. We found that the food wasn't as good as in past visits. Smaller portions and not as tasty. However, the beer selections are great. Lots to choose from not only from Oregon but Washington and beyond. Service is...More
Stopped in on my way past. Ordered the Portland burger. Tasted like a salt burger. Not sure I can trust a restaurant that gets a burger so very wrong. Staff were really lovely.
My brother in law suggested we try it. It is a large open room with some booth seating with mostly long communal high tables. The board above the bar lists Oregon beers on tap like Dechutes. Menu items include the ubiquitous chicken and waffles which...More
So, I was fooled. My wife and I were out walking and saw the name of the pub and thought they make beer. They don't. Worse, or more bizarre depending on your tastes, they only have one Vancouver beer on tap. So...if you want an...More
I had stopped in to a couple places on main. They were ok. This place was better. Maybe 2/3rds full. A well was $6.04 during happy hour. Regular price. Nothing special. Service was quick and good. Props to shervin. Its a two storey room with...More
Portland craft is a great relaxed place with some awesome craft beers, good IPA and in addition some great food. Perfect to go with friends and family on a chilled-out evening. Have a look at the daily specials though (Monday - Craft beers!) :)
I came here with a couple friends and was pleasantly surprised. The sable fish dishes were incredible. I'm very picky about my Mac and Cheese, and that was also delicious. Of course, their beer selections was outstanding! But my absolute favorite was the smoked olives...More
Great bar.lovely beer and very convenient for pre baseball drinks. Food looked good although we didn't eat
We stopped into Portland Craft around 5:30 and just made happy hour. The beer menu is amazing. As the name suggest many of the beers on tap come from Oregon - mainly Portland. As an big fan of IPA's this was wonderful news to me....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3420478-Reviews-Portland_Craft-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Pourhouse Restaurant,"Our party of eight had lunch here before boarding our cruise ship. The place was mostly empty, which astounds me, given the high quality of our experience. The drinks were carefully crafted and excellent. The food was all very well prepared and delicious. The service...More
The double burger was amazing, loved it! The pourhouse burger was nothing special for me. All in all, great value for money!
The vibe of the restaurant was nice. Our server was friendly. But we were not impressed with the food. The steak was mediocre, as was the burger, and I wasn't a fan of the fact we had to order our sides separately, as the mains...More
Stopped in for happy hour and enjoyed their smash burgers, onion rings and a salad. All very well prepared and very tasty as were the craft cocktails. We'll have to stop back next time we're in Van to check out their dinner as that menu...More
Our waiter Mike ruined what could have been a very nice experience. We had been on the road for a while, and we were a bit hot and tired. Our son has celiac, so his dining options are usually pretty limited. We stopped into the...More
Hey Aj, I am incredibly sorry to hear about your experience with us this past week, as a Celiac myself I can completely understand the frustration and nervousness about dining. While we can't allow for outside food or beverage for health and safety reasons, we...More
We made our reservation but arrived 15 mins early and were sent in our way to get back at the correct time. Then we were seated but to our amazement there were no less than 8 available tables so why we couldn't be seated 15...More
We are a family of 5 with 3 coeliac kids- it was great to go somewhere where they had a choice of gluten free food and could eat safely, AND which still felt like a good, quality dining out experience for us. They looked after...More
Good location within Gastown, but price to experience ratio was definitely off. Expensive for standard meal: $23 for an underwhelming burger w/ no sides is excessive.
My family ate dinner at Pourhouse during a recent trip to Vancouver. We started with the scotch eggs, which were delicious. We all got burgers and they were very good. The cocktail menu is inventive. The ambiance was great, and we really enjoyed listening to...More
Great brunch stop, from drinks to terrific food enjoyed our whole experience. Irish coffee and an espresso martinis were excellent ways to start brunch. The brunch burger was great, the mac and cheese hit the mark as typical quality pub food. Wonderful atmosphere, great staff....More
Just got back from our last night in Vancouver. Tried the cocktails the night before and decided to come back for cocktails and food. Absolutely brilliant service, great food and amazing cocktails. Wish we had discovered this place earlier so we could have enjoyed more...More
After a few hours of wandering through the streets of Vancouver, we were looking for a late afternoon spot to sit and have a drink and some munchies. While strolling through Gastown we found the Pourhouse and saw they had gluten-free munchy options. The decor...More
I can't way enough good things about our lunch at Pourhouse! After dealing with endless paperwork and covid tests to cross the border today from Seattle, I really needed a good meal! My teenage daughter and I arrived at the door hopeful we had found...More
Nothing wrong with going out at 10:30pm for a craving! We didn't know what we would get until we sat down, and ended up with their house fried donuts and Irish coffee for me, and the house baked cookies for my friend. We both had...More
Whilst we enjoyed our visit to Pourhouse, it didn’t wow us. Firstly, we had booked a table a couple of days in advance but were still seated at a high top table next to the bar. There were only 2 types of beer on draft...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1544023-Reviews-Pourhouse_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Prestons Restaurant + Lounge,"Waiting staff did not understand meaning of gluten free! Served dangerous food without thinking! Won’t eat here again in our hotel.More
We are sorry to hear such an experience happened to you. Please keep in mind that we remind each other weekly on how to be extra cautious around allergies and food sensitivities. I assure you we get daily requests for such requests and we make...More
Stopped in at happy hour for an early dinner. I found the room to be open and comfortable. The waitress was very sweet and efficient. We had wine and lemon drop for drinks. For starters we had Korean beef tacos and calamari. They were delicious!!...More
Thank you for your honest words. We look forward to have you back in Prestons soon Prestons Team
We stayed in the Coast Coal Harbour Hotel and had a dinner and a breakfast at Prestons. Both meals were very good. My husband had a burger that was really good, and I had their Korean beef tacos that were excellent. Service was good. We...More
Dear Patricia, Thank you for your honest review. Hope to see you soon at Prestons Have a great week ahead
food was quite tasty and very reasonable . We made reservations for dinner on a Saturday night . It was quite busy . They are not open for lunch
Dear Gerry, Thank you for your review. Hope to see you soon at Prestons
We chose to have breakfast in the hotel (Coast Coal Harbor) because it was easiest with elderly parents and were pleasantly surprised by the food quality and service, which were both excellent. I had a smoothie that was generously sized and had several kinds of...More
Thank you for your detailed review. Hope to see you soon at Prestons
To be honest, had we known that this restaurant was in a hotel (not one we were staying at) we might not have gone. But we're glad we did. Nice restaurant that appeared to be popular with business people in the area. I had the...More
Dear Gopher, Thank you for your honest review. See you soon at Prestons Prestons Team
Stopped by for a quick bite and wasn't disappointed. The staff were helpful and willing to help make the experience a good one. Highly recommend it, especially when the sports games are on !!
Greetings, Thank you for your honest review. We hope to see you soon at Pretsons Prestons Team
We took a friend there for her birthday a month ago. - There were four of us, and we were all very satisfied with our dinner. - My boyfriend who loves steak, but has a hard time finding a place where they get it right,...More
Thank you so much Anne, Hope to see you soon at Prestons. Regards Prestons Team
I was at the hotel last week for a few days so I visited this restaurant several times. I enjoyed having drinks there at night after long days of walking. They made my special martini exactly how I asked. The crab cakes were good and...More
Thank you Carobilo, See you soon at Prestons Prestons Team
We had a burger with fries and buffalo wings with a couple libations. Food was very tasty and large portions. Sara was a very good server. Very attentive.
Dear Davis6528438, Thank you for the review! We are happy that you enjoyed the food and that service was very good. We are looking forward to welcoming you back soon! Best regards, Bogdan Anton
This restaurant truly embodies customer focus. The staff recognised me by my second visit. They always greet me with enthusiasm and genuinely thank me for coming. When our tables have had abnormal requests, they are actually happy to accommodate. The restaurant is clean and the...More
Dear Jennine T, Thank you for the review and thank you for the suggestion! We will look in to adding more QR codes on tables. Always a pleasure to have you here and we are looking forward to serving you again soon! Best regards, Bogdan...More
Coast Coal Harbour Vancouver Hotel by APA Vancouver Prestons Restaurant not following Covid-19 guidelines 774187539 Before reserving dinner on Sunday, October 11, 2020 we found this statement on the hotel's website: ""Servers are adhering to strict safety procedures while serving all food and beverages, including...More
Dear t0rkildc, Thank you for your review, we appreciate your feedback. I am sorry to hear that you didn't feel safe in our restaurant. I can assure you that here at Prestons Restaurant + Lounge, we are doing everything we can to make sure our...More
Went here for dinner during dine out, so fixed menu! Was so good and server gave extra options for dessert when there. Our server was good and very observant, we made an awkward dessert order and was no issue. It was a Wednesday night so...More
Dear Caroline thank you for the great review! We are so happy to hear you enjoyed everything. We hope to see you again soon! Bogdan Anton
1 other table occupied now I know why - waited for a table no staff available- finally got a drink and menu after 20mins - another half a hour for food - waitress didnt speak English so hard to communicate- overal not returning ; now...More
Dear taylorn59, Thank you for choosing to dine with us at Preston's Restaurant + Lounge. We strive to deliver a refreshing dining experience each and every time, and are disappointed that we fell short on your time with us. We truly appreciate knowing about your...More
I dine at Preston’s every time I’m in Vancouver. The happy hour is fantastic but when I missed happy hour tonight I decided to try the Buddha Bowl and added chicken. So, so good. Every bite was a treat. Thanks again for another great dining...More
Dear Travelinjack64, Thank you for taking the time to rate and review Prestons Restaurant + Lounge. We are delighted to hear that you enjoyed the Buddha Bowl so much, despite missing happy hour! We look forward to welcoming you back soon to try out some...More",30,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1947325-Reviews-Prestons_Restaurant_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Prospect Point Bar & Grill,"We used to love walking up here for luch, but the ravages of Covid seem to have caused most of the place to be closed. We did buy food from the cafe, and the seafood croissant was good. The ham and cheese baguette wasn't. Staff...More
My husband and I went for a long walk in Stanley Park today. Finally got to Prospect Point and got the surprise of our lives. The place was open. Beautiful umbrellas were, themselves, basking in the sunshine as were many people on the patio. It...More
Had a coffee on our first day and a green tea on our second visit. Situated right by the bus stops this is handy and the gift shop is in the same building. Prospect point lookout is a stones throw away so all very convenient...More
This was an attractive destination restaurant in Vancouver in the past but, with the new traffic patterns in Stanley Park, it is now inaccessible to the disabled. The parking lot has been turned over to cyclists, who I suspect spend much less at the restaurant...More
Easy walk from the aquarium. Very attentive staff even though it was full. Excellent Ceasers from the bar. Food served on boards - modern.
This restaurant is located at Prospect Point, insider Stanley Park. The food is expensive and most of it is just OK. We had Thai chicken strips, a hummus plate and a couple of beers for lunch. But oh, the view is glorious, especially on a...More
I would give this a higher rating just for the view but the food is average. Some nice craft beer selections and a full bar. I would recommend snacks there and enjoy a beverage and outstanding views instead of a full meal. I would not...More
This was a great stop along our way. Lots of nature surrounding you. You can also walk back just a little ways to get a great view of the lion's gate bridge
The worst tasting almond croissant! Awful texture of the beef sausage in the roll even when warmed. Very pricey also.
Solid beer selection, fairly average food, lovely setting which makes you feel like you're eating in a treehouse with a bridge view. Burgers were pretty good, though one was still a bit pink and the other was very very drippy. Fries good but salty.
We took advantage of a 2 for 1 appetizer offered, and tried 4 plates. The mussels and wings were great, the poutine was average, and the curry vegetables were just ok. The specialty drinks were very good.
Stopped by on a lovely day in Stanley Park. We dined outside. The setting is somewhat scenic, not stunning, but pleasant, certainly. The food, well, unimpressive. I had the duck sandwich which was passable, while my wife had a salmon dish, in which the fish...More
My boyfriend and I had just landed in Vancouver and wanted to hit up Stanley Park immediately. Prospect Point was the first restaurant we came across so we decided to go in, since we were starving. I ordered the salmon Benedict and my boyfriend had...More
Wasn't expecting much since it seemed like a tourist spot - didn't even know there was an actual restaurant here. I would say I was pleasantly surprised but not overly impressed. The view is okay, where we sat on the patio you can sort of...More
We shared a delicious duck sandwich on the deck and our server was one of the most helpful we've ever experienced; showed us on a map the most peaceful place in Stanley Park to sit and read and she was spot on. However, the deck...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1510364-Reviews-Prospect_Point_Bar_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Provence Marinaside,"So delicious and a great atmosphere! You get to sit right across from the boardwalk and people watch while sipping Mimosa's or a Caesar. Brunch was delicious and the service on par with everting else!
I would give this 10 stars if I could! One of the best meals I’ve ever eaten; the food was absolutely incredible and the service was superb. Highly, highly recommend!
Great ambiance and superb service! I had seafood pasta which was amazing! Others in our table had the oysters which they raved about. All the fish dishes, especially the halibut were spectacular. Best of all was our server, Ilija, who was knowledgeable regarding all: drinks...More
I had the Seafood Platter Provençal, which includes lobster, prawns, salmon and fish. It was just delicious! For dessert I had a Fondant Chocolate, a dessert to eat on one knees!
The whole experience was disappointing. We went for the dine out Vancouver and ordered the bouillabaisse which was not good. Will not return.
We enjoyed a lovely evening here after a chance meeting with one of the cooks on public transit - thank you Moussa for the excellent recommendation! The food and drink pairings were delicious but most memorable were the welcoming and engaging professional staff that looked...More
The place is nice and modern. Staff are friendly and attentive. Unfortunately, the scallops came out a bit cold, which was a let down. Similarly, I was surprised that the seafood linguine did not include fresh-made pasta. Flavors were good. Not sure I will be...More
The three of us enjoyed a very nice brunch with a marineside view. We managed to get in on a weekend without a reservation. We really enjoyed their seafood crepe and seafood pasta. Lovely ambiance to sit inside and even better their patio.
Great location on a busy corner with wonderful views. Our breakfast was fantastic but wow, it sure added up fast to over $70. Two people, brunch with bowl of fruit and toast, 2 cappuccinos. (We obviously didn't read the prices on menu) As good as...More
Ordered the eggs any way breakfast. French baguette was dry - didnt even come with butter and I had to ask for cream cheese. potatoes were quite good and crispy. Eggs are eggs and were good. I asked for the veal sausage and it was...More
If you're biking along the seawall (which we were) and you require refueling or sustenance to help you along the way, do yourself a favor and stop in at Provence. We sat outside, sipped some great cocktails (try the French spritz) and loved our meals...More
Recently arrived in Vancouver and our first brunch for Sunday we chose this restaurant. Unfortunately, the food was a disappointment. I am writing this review whilst we are still eating our food. We ordered the eggs anyway which came with baguette some smoked steelhead ,...More
Our last night in Canada had to be good. We search through all the usual restaurant reviews and thought Granville island would be great, but we settled upon this restaurant due to its reviews and marina location. We were not disappointed. We were warmly greeted...More
Booked for brunch and sat outside on the patio. We had the salmon eggs Benedict, eggs and bacon, and the chorizo scramble. All delicious - poached eggs were perfect and breakfast potatoes crispy and tasty. Fast and efficient service. Coffee good. Nice location.
Recommended by our hotel (OPUS) Provence Marinaside is a short walk with a great view of the marina and an even better wine list and menu. I had a great glass of BC Viognier (Lightening Rock) to go with my seared sea bass on quinoa...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708118-Reviews-Provence_Marinaside-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Published on Main,"Fun date night dining! Such interesting food and tremendous service. It wasn’t on the menu but we inquired about wine pairings. The sommelier gave us plenty of half glasses and shared stories with us about the wines. While we weren’t able to get a reservation...More
Thoroughly enjoyed our meal, the setting (beautiful plants hanging from above, excellent lighting and relaxed vibe) and our wonderful server Joseph who was friendly, funny and incredibly helpful with suggestions. Highlights include the Ableskivver (savory donuts) , scallops, prawns, ‘chicken’ fried maitake (mushrooms) , burrata,...More
Enter…… or not. The very heavy front door is not an invitation to anyone physically challenged. Fortunately the gracious receptionist who was most observant, rushed to the door to facilitate my access. While my companion parked his car, I was promptly seated and my walker...More
We were in town to celebrate our anniversary and chose to have our special dinner here, the tasting menu. Lila, the hostess was so sweet and kind and set the mood for our very special evening. The food and it's presentation were amazing and the...More
Michelin rated place on Main in Riley Park area . Very popular so book way ahead . Dishes are for sharing . Exceptionally good tapas style dishes . Staff are good but not as good as they seem to think they are . Prices are...More
Our party of 4 were all quite excited to celebrate our friends 70th birthday at a Vancouver Michelin rated restaurant. We arrived to a densely packed somewhat loud atmosphere and were seated. We were greeted by a rather casually dressed server who educated us in...More
How this restaurant ever got a Michelin star beats me. A restaurant experience is more than food on a plate, and we missed essentials in having what one would expect from a high-quality restaurant experience. We came on a wet night and found one overloaded...More
This is a restaurant not to be missed - we were fortunate enough to be a group of 4 which meant that we were able to explore more of the menu than we would have been able to if only a couple - but do...More
We went just a few days after the Michelin star was awarded, although we had booked before. Love the room - the size, the lighting, the atmosphere. Service was excellent - I actually knew the server from when she worked at a different restaurant in...More
Everything was great! An energetic but relaxed ambiance. Original and delicious cocktails; truly well done… The food is outstanding. Order anything and you’ll be ooing and awing… Wonderful all around!
As a single diner they don't make reservations for one. I knowingly opted to get there early and hope for a seat at the bar......I got one...after about a 30 minute wait. There were other vacant bar seats....so I must assume the wait was staff...More
We enjoyed a fabulous 11 course tasting menu with wine pairing. The courses were interesting, fun, delicious and beautifully presented. The wine pairings were right on point. I scored our experience 5 stars but really wished I could score this 4 1/2 points because the...More
The Published on Main eleven course curated tasting menu with accompanying cocktail and wine pairings provided an extraordinary culinary dining extravaganza. The cuisine was truly exceptional both in taste and presentation and on its own merits worthy of many a return visit. Unfortunately for this...More
Went for a family dinner. Fantastic food. Unpretentious service. Sommelier gave good advice without steering us to the most expensive wines. Lots of innovative dishes> We have been to quite a few of the ""top 100"" restaurants in Canada (in Toronto, Montreal, Vancouver and Ottawa)...More
On a Thursday evening we showed up at 4:55 and waited for the restaurant to open at 5. The hostess said she would seat the 2 couples with reservations first which was reasonable. There was one couple in front of us. The hostess returned from...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d20355647-Reviews-Published_on_Main-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Queens Cross Pub,"It's a little fancier now than it was back in the day when they got started (and I lived nearby a loooong time ago), although not much has changed other than a few dishes and choice of beers. It still has a pleasant gastropub atmosphere...More
Just off the highway so we stopped to eat. Service was good, the place was not busy. The food was just OK. Nothing memorable.
In my wide circle of friends, this particular couple will only meet for lunch at pubs. Over the years, my late husband & I have had some good experiences, but mostly mediocre. So, I was rather reluctant to meet them at the Queens Cross today,...More
This is a busy pub with a great atmosphere, good beer selection, and reasonably priced food that we enjoyed very much. Definitely a place tworth stopping by if you are in the neighborhood.
The food was amazing and they took great care helping one of my family members have a great gluten free Ruben sandwich. Our fish and chips were some of the best we have had and their poutine was great. But I can’t say enough about...More
Thank you Colin, Mason, Channelle and Myra for being outstanding, always, and making this past year’s dining experiences true, fun and tasty!! You really make a difference.
Great pub, nice selection of beers, good evening specials, and great staff. Different specials each night so check the website for details.
Looks like a pub, smells like a pub, it us a pub. Great food and beer selection. Good service and grub is skyways cooked fresh and served promptly. Have, alas, recently adopted the Canadian laxness in the description of a pint measure. The glass does...More
If you are looking for an actual pub within Canada then this is one! Coming from England it is refreshing to find something which isn't just a bar. They offer amazing food & entertainment. Would deffo recomend. Good prices!
Very good food. Large pub. We went upstairs where it was quieter. Service was fast. We had drinks and dinner. The poutine was lovely, as was the steak sandwich.
But that is it. The interior needs a total remodel. Especially redesign to keep the noise down. It is only 2 blocks away and I only go if forced to.
You don’t have to travel to England to find a great English Pub. There’s a gem of one right on the North Shore. It has that olde world charm, with great pub fare! Try the Guinness with a hamburger & fries/salad, they make their own...More
I ate here often about 6 months ago and liked it. I just ordered a $7 bowl of soup and it was surprisingly small, definitely not enough for a meal and more of a small side dish size. It smelled seafood but I didn't recognize...More
I have to be honest - I never ate such a tasty burger (hurtin' albertan) and fries before. We also ordered czech Pilsner on tap with it which was just amazing. I love the place and super friendly staff. Will be back soon.
Got in late yesterday to North Van. Mrs F said there was a pub round the corner who did “Eats” thought take a chance. What a find. The place was rammed, usually a good sign for a pub. Young blonde girl told us to sit...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1167771-Reviews-Queens_Cross_Pub-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
R&B Ale & Pizza House,"Our group of 7 ranging in ages from 14 to 76 were welcomed, and well fed. The servers were accommodating and friendly. The pizzas were very good. the desserts were great. The beers and nonalcoholic drinks were also all great.
First stop on our Mt Pleasant self-guided brewery tour and an excellent start. Great beer and good food. Very cozy relaxed atmosphere.
On my third try, I finally had a chance to try R&B brews! On the first two pre-COVID attempts wait time was way too long, and having a bit of time to spare during lunchtime on Sunday, I had to try once again. Well, there...More
Always great food. Always great beer. Always great vibes. It's where the locals drink and visitors should check it out!
We stopped here for a quick bite and a beer. I thought it was pretty cool. The food came out pretty quickly, but not to quickly. Just the right amount to feel full, but not stuffed. The beer was pretty darn tasty. I like the...More
After a 25 km. walk stopped in here for a brew. The young man serving beer was an Aussie and since I am headed there next spring we had a great conversation. Do not downplay the importance of genial conversation. Along with my Dark Matter...More
R&B is one of my favourite breweries in this area. The beer is great and it’s always fun to hang out here with a few friends.
Enough variety of beers that we all find something we like. We had the Pizza Special and even though it was busy it arrived pretty fast and was delicious. This place never disappoints.
Had a super fun time at R&B Brewery Taproom. Lively, busy Wed night, with nice dim lighting. Had delicious IPA & great pizza. Sat at bar, which was fun chatting with bartender. A must for a walking birthday craft beer tour!
The flights are terrific...get a sampling of different beers which are all awesome! Staff are friendly and easy going. Tried the pizza..could use a bit more flavour but over all hit the spot. A nice easy going, chill place to meet friends and have a...More
Though no pizza fan they converted me with their hamburger with blue cheese drizzle pizza. Their large selection of craft brews had distinct characteristics. I sampled a fight of five for a reasonable price and all were tasty. Hats off to the crew and brewmaster.
We stumbled into R&B Brewing one afternoon been back four times within two weeks. It is just a great hang out, great atmosphere, beer selections, yummy pizzas. Staffs are super friendly and chilled. The price is unbelievable affordable. We had two full size pizzas and...More
The pizza was OK. it was missing some flavours and spices. the beer was good. the pretzel was perfectly salty and the mustard was twangy. the caprese salad was arugula and hardly any caprese (not many tomatoes or mozzarela). the salad was very disappointing. you...More
Delicious place to try some local brews and have lunch/a snack. Feels very local and not overrun with tourists
We stopped by on a whim while we were in town, and R&B did not disappoint! There was a tiny bit of a wait (20 min), which is to be expected on a Saturday. No big deal. We each had a flight and split some...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10193436-Reviews-R_B_Ale_Pizza_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Raglan's Bistro,"Due to covid, you can only eat at the patio. It’s been chilly at night in Vancouver. This place could have more heater outside, so customers can enjoy eating outside. Overall food was great, but the fries was a bit salty. Would go back to...More
Unusual menu, with 11 beef burger options. Ordered takeout. Bonus points for sustainable packaging, but the burrito and burger were just okay, nothing great, and were quite salty.
Nice cozy restaurant on the Lonsdale Avenue near waterfront area. Looks pretty popular for its pricing but I wasn't impressed with the quality of their local tap beers. We tried both their pale ale and pilsner but neither appealed to us for a second round.
My family loves to visit Raglan's mostly for the incredibly rich and creative poutine they offer. It always tastes great, is presented beautifully in boat-shaped plates that are big enough to feed 1.5 person at least. Top it up with a cosy patio and Jamaican-inspired...More
Stopped here for a quick brunch on the long weekend. Lucky to arrive when they opened so we had a choice of patio seats. I ordered the hippi hash - likely one of the best I've had. My friend stuck to traditional eggs and bacon,...More
We met two local couples (friends) there at their suggestion. What a delightful place and really good food. I had the Republican Burger and it was just super with the Blue Brie and crispy fried onions on top. The others all had a mix of...More
Stopped in for beverages and were amazed at the enormous drinks some people were sharing. Good selection of beverages. Cold beer. Good service. Handy to the seabus.
Your typical Mexican fare coupled with some gigantic hamburgers. Situated in the burgeoning Lower Lonsdale restaurant district it benefits from the new decks on the street. Reasonable but there are better choices within 50 yards.
My friend has lived in this area for 4+ years. Every time someone comes to visit, she brings them to Raglans Bistro -her go to place, and has never had anyone not be more then happy about what they've ordered, myself included. I ordered the...More
My son Matt & I wanted a late night drink & snack and Raglan's Bistro had a nice quiet outside patio so we stopped in. Our servicer was pleasant, drinks were quick and cold, and our snack was also fast and hot. We enjoyed it.
Came here for brunch on a sunny summer day and sat in the cozy outdoor area. Lots of interesting sounding entrees on the menu, all reasonably priced. I settled on Hippie Hash - and loved it! The server was friendly and helpful. Overall great value....More
We had lunch here on a very hot day. There is outside and indoor seating - we chose indoor. Service was a bit slow as they were very busy but it was very friendly and we soon had drinks. We chose burgers and one of...More
Very good service and huge options of entrees and main menus. The hamburger was definitely good and served with super crispy french fries on the side. Don't expect something super organized and ultra clean, but I really recommend!
Awesome place for a delicious breakfast with a great soundtrack! Must try in the evening next time. Great little outdoor area that looks to be brand new.
Now when I write this I really had to debate weather I should or I shouldn't. Why I should was because food is awesome, drinks are great, and service is amazing. Why I shouldn't is because it's so good but not so big, so you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2265225-Reviews-Raglan_s_Bistro-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Railtown Cafe,"The owner has a lot of bad attitude and seemed quite irritated that we would bother her just by ordering. I ordered a cinnamon bun which was very dry and would have been better as a half price, day-old offering. The owner hardly spoke and...More
Very tasty food, good price and friendly staff! They have amazing salads and sandwiches!! i will definitely go again!!! 🥰
The Railtown is quaint cafe located in a questionable part of the Strathcona neighborhood. I personally found the reuben sandwich and the salad bar very enjoyable. A deal for about $25.
This is a more rarefied sort of cafe - easy to sit and eat, but possibly not to your taste if you don’t like a visually and aurally noisy environment. The kitchen is right there by the dining area, and they move very quickly due...More
Who would of thought you could eat so well in the Downtown Eastside. Located just steps from the gritty industrial waterfront, and steps from crack-land, this is the epicentre of Railtown chic. The cool kids all get their lunches here. (also, you can order your...More
I've been at Railtown Cafe a few times and it never disappoints. The Reuben or The Pork are my favourite choices of sandwich to order as well as a nice cold local beer. I'll be back that's for sure., especially once dragonboat practices start up...More
We just stopped in for a quick lunch and were pleasantly surprised by the food here. Great soup and sandwiches. Fresh and tasty. The chicken noodle soup was amazing!
Good place for coffee in the Main Street / Olympic village area. Good breakfast options and fresh baked goodies.
Outstanding spot - interesting options. The Vegan Club was excellent - beets, sprouts, avocado on excellent focaccia (crispy, not heavy and greasy). Neighborhood is a little sketchy- was happy to find this spot!
Great food choices. Yummy cold drinks. They ran out of my first protein choice so less satisfying than would have been. Great vibe and concept.
Love this little hole in the wall cafe. I had a remarkable spinach salad along with a cheddar scone. The salad had lots of bacon and a wonderful homemade dressing. They offer beer/cider as well as interesting teas and lemonades too. Everything is so fresh...More
Always fresh and tasty, I love their homemade soups and sandwiches. Do yourself a favour and try it out.
Trendy cafe near the seedy part of Vancouver's waterfront. Cool vibe, fresh baked snacks and coffee. Nice chia seed yogurt. A little pricey but worth it.
I was impressed with the quality of food made in such a fast order. My husband and I both ordered sandwiches and the meat was tender, not over cooked. The coffee was great. They serve beer as well. It was hard to figure out at...More
We went in for the ice cream Sandwiches and ended up taking home the ancient grains salad for dinner, a sourdough bread and a muffin. All very good. The salad was huge and tasty and delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4134665-Reviews-Railtown_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Raisu,"If you can plan ahead book a reservation and order their box in adavnce which is great for a first timer if you have not been there before to sample so many of their dishes. Mostly young people who come to eat amd drink.
Raisu is from Kingyo's family, i.e. a typical izakaya and above all of identical quality whatever the chef and the month of the year .... udon with crab and sea urchins a killer, extra sushi sashimi, delicious ebi mayo, almond tofu etc. nothing is bland...More
Since the restaurant it really fills up fast, you might need to make sure to get reservations ahead of time. We got truly lucky and we find two spots. We ordered Omakase Uni Zukushi and it was heavenly, what a blast. Amazing service, loud and...More
A bunch of us booked dinner at Raisu over a month ago. We pre-ordered our food for 5pm reservation. They have limited orders for their bento box so only 2 people got one. Others had lobster udon - good but pricey, creamy snow crab udon,...More
The Japanese restaurant was packed but inside was too loud, everybody talking loud plus the Japanese welcoming from staff. Could not hear very well my party talking. The food was great quality and great presentation! You can stay in the restaurant for 90 minutes in...More
My friend and I shared the Kaiseki Course and it was really memorable. So many dishes I would not have picked on my own such as the wagyu croquette and the prawn shooter but they were fantastic. The matcha dessert was also delicious. The restaurant...More
A must try restaurant. The food is great here, and the presentation is great. I definitely recommend checking this place out, the kobe nigiri and omakase aburi is amazing.
Cool place to grab some really good Japanese food. We enjoyed all the dishes we tried and came back again two weeks later to try more. Lots of pay street parking. The restaurant I 2nd Floor so stairs to walk up.
Went with my daughter for lunch. She had salad with corn and I had a seafood bowl. I didnt feel that allt the ingredients in the bowl were super fresh (coming from a fish eating nation I know whats fresh). The dish looked absolutely beautiful...More
Authentic Japanese Sushi and Sashimi at good values. We love the Aburri (Pressed/seared Sushi) and Chirashi Bowls (mixed Seafood on Rice). Easy pickup and takeaway. They do have a small patio for outdoor dining (please come back indoor dining!). Signup for email list for weekly...More
The cuisine is elevated in it's originality and freshness. The uni omakase meal is unique and totally enjoyable, to those who love uni. The spicy lobster udon is very memorable. All the sashimi and sushi items were excellent in quality and preparation. Freshly ground wasabi...More
Took a Saturday lunch. Cosy environment and our server was patient and excellent to introduce tasty dishes for us. All Japanese dishes were fresh, yummy and reasonably priced. Will definitely come back again and again!
We went for an early dinner and missed a rush of people which was great. Everything we ordered came quickly. Servers are all very sweet. The food: one of the best Japanese restaurants I’ve ever been to in my life! I didn’t want to drink...More
It’s not busy in here. Especially with social distancing. So many staff just walking around while we are sitting forever waiting for our order to be taken. Not even asking if we would like a drink to start. If you see a customer just sitting...More
Not good food, looks good for photos only. Ordered the lunch set yesterday, steak was overcooked and served cold, yes cold, and bowl of rice was cold too, got the sashimi instead of the grilled fish that I ordered and the waitress repeated order 3x,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12315897-Reviews-Raisu-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rajio Japanese Public House,"Surprised got invite for dinner from my nephew's family , they live by UBC area and love this restaurant , the restaurant well know for their Kushikatsu , it is deep fried skewers with variety of meat to choose from , very unique concept ,...More
This restaurant seamlessly blends great service, food and ambiance. Very welcoming and conversational staff. Varied menu full of delicious little treats, and a high energy room with high turnover, but without feeling in anyway rushed. FYI, all the skewers, the steak were great. The assorted...More
The Japanese pub scene is underrated - Rajio crushes it on a Friday night when you need to unwind and have some good food and drink! Deep fried food is my kryptonite - put it on a skewer and viola! you have kushikatsu. There is...More
This place is one of our go to local spots. Never disappoints.The rib eye is an awesome deal. KFC, Hot Stone bowls, Ebi Mayo, and edamame are standouts. The skewers? Pretty damn good, try the special sheet for something different.
Wow! Went here tonight with my girlfriend and another couple and we had a wonderful time. The famous watermelon drink lives up to the reputation and all of the cocktails we tried were great. We all tried the house made ginger ale and agreed that...More
The skewers were super fresh and crispy! Really good! The watermelon drink is super fun to drink:) it looked great and tastes great!
Small and cozy restaurant, different from a lot of pseudo Japanese restaurants, serves really great Japanese Cuisine. All dishes are delicately prepared with top quality ingredients. Love their seafood skewers and sushi. Their Jumbo Shrimp Skewers is one that you should not miss. Good and...More
We ordered a variety of food including the tempuras and the sashimi platter and everything was excellent. The service was top notch.
Been meaning to dine here but never had the chance. We were lucky to be given a table despite not having a reservation as long as we promised to stay within an hour as all their tables were booked. Just too bad they had a...More
This place try to emulate a shitamachi feel of Osaka and it visually does the job well. The kuchi age is really expensive considering portion size. For about 2$ the lotus root age was maybe the size of a toonie. 6 of us went and...More
Ugh so disappointed. Had been looking forward to trying here, especially as it is Raisu’s sister restaurant - one of my favourites!! Rajio does not live up to my expectations at all. We ordered the squid karaage and were very disappointed. The squid was inedible...More
Great place to hang out with friends and eat. Make sure you have reservations as this place gets pretty busy. Highly recommend any of the katsu items. Definitely try the specials on the menu as they are seasonal. If you're hungry, be prepared to spend...More
Every time when my boyfriend and I have some small things to celebrate, this is the first place that would come to our minds. I love the crab bibimbap, pig trotter and kid's punch the most. But basically everything on the menu tastes great.
nice place, great staff, good food. watermelon punch was excellent on a hot day. squid tentacles were crispy and delicious. actually everything we ordered was tasty.
Our first experience here was not good. Service was horrible. It was so bad it took me a couple of years to try it again. Very happy to report that this experience was completely different. Service was great. Very friendly staff - very friendly and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3973990-Reviews-Rajio_Japanese_Public_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ramen Danbo,"Scored meter parking on the residential street behind the restaurant. 5pm, the restaurant was almost full and lots of to go orders. Al dente noodle, reg broth, char sui tasty. Just what I needed.
Although it can be a bit of a wait, the ramen here is fantastic and service once seated is extremely quick. I'm a fan of the classic rekka ramen; the spiciness can be tuned just to your liking!
Small spaces, small line, delicious ramen! It's like a good food and quick beer kinda place. Very authentic. Waited maybe 10 minutes in line. Very precious service and fresh options. Busy so you know everything is fresh. Would 100 % go back.
This restaurant was recommended to us by the Parq Marriott where we stayed for @ a week. Reservations are not accepted so it is first come first serve. A line had already formed when we got there a bit after 6 pm. We waited just...More
In the future, I don't know if I'd wait as long as we did, but the ramen itself was just what we needed on a cold and rainy day. The broth is rich and flavorful without tasting too fatty or thick, and the noodles were...More
Service was efficient and fast. Very very tasty. You can selection how you want your broth and noodles. And you can get a side order of noodles. Come early or be prepared to wait outside.
The scent of air seeped deep into my soul when I heard voicesspillingp from the store. Ok, so, I know what you're thinking. I didn't want to believe that a place would actually serve raw men. To my surprise, when I walked in the store,...More
Visiting family in Vancouver and my son recommend this restaurant. It is not big at all, and during the peak meal times there is always a line outside (be ready to wait and there are no reservation.) I arrived for a late lunch (1 PM)...More
Friend and I headed out to have ramen for lunch. Ramen Danbo is not a big restaurant so we had to wait about 20 mins for a seat. No reservations - when you get there, you have to put your name on a wait list...More
We went there at dinner time. it seemed busy but we could site quickly. We ordered 2 ramens as soon as we ordered, our ramen came! Actually, we could customize noodle's firmness, such as hard or soft and degree of spice as well. it is...More
Ramen Danbo offers a very authentic Japanese Ramen experience. The service is quick, meant to be in and out like Japan. As it gets busy, you write your own names down at the door , size of party and if you have to remain together...More
Having been here for more then 1/2 dozen times, finally, I am putting in my 2 cents. Ramen shops in Vancouver had seen its ups and downs, about 10 yrs. ago, there was a surge of Ramen eateries in the downtown core mostly around Robson...More
There’s no disagreement, Vancouver has some seriously good ramen joints around town (most of which are located in the downtown core). Ramen Danbo is one such ramen joint (they have 1 location downtown and 1 in Kits) and they are frequently busy. Like many of...More
Service is super quick. Prices are very decent. I would say the ramen is not something to write home about.
This place serves one of the best ramen in Vancouver. I usually go here twice a month. The broth is really good and you can add more flavours and spices.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12814172-Reviews-Ramen_Danbo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ramen Danbo - Robson,"There are several Ramen places in Vancouver and I never went to Danbo because of the line up. Friends visiting from out of town had it on their must try list. So we took a few cold beers and lineup on Robson. It took about...More
The ramen is very tasty, this is not my first time go there. But you have to line up waiting the seat a bit long.
The previous night I had ramen at Horin-Tonkatsu, across from the Blue Horizon hotel. So tonight I thought I would compare Danbo....well there was no comparison. Danbo's broth barely had any pork flavour and was way too salty. Their noodles were not great either, but...More
Found one of my favorite ramen shops in Seattle while walking in Vancouver BC! The weather was cold & rainy so a ramen stop is always a great idea. The Negi bowl was fantastic! And the ambiance was cozy & the service was no frills...More
We tried the curry pork ramen and the vegan. Both were delicious. Enjoyed the thin noodles. Friendly staff.
My daughter is vegan and loves ramen so we were recommended this place because they have a vegan section on their menu. It's very casual and we had to wait in line for a while but it was definitely worth it. You can customise your...More
Well worth the wait in the queue. Really good Japanese ramen. Great to have various options to tailor the ramen to your tastes. Wife also tried the vegetarian version and reckoned it was better than the normal Tonkotsu version! Prices very reasonable for Vancouver and...More
Delicious and authentic. Crowded and popular spot. Very casual and quick service. The classic chashu-men can be adapted to taste...my traditional bowl plus added egg was so so tasty!
Excellent ramen. We tried several different things on our 2 trips here. Everything was flavourful and just the right amount of spicy. Service is attentive and, even on a busy evening, prompt.
Excellent ramen!!! Both the classic and the vegetarian Amazingly efficient and nice sevice. It is located in a very lively area.
Their classic ramen was tasty and noodles were cooked to perfection. It’s been awhile since I’ve had authentic ramen. Be prepared to wait in line because it’s a small spot. We arrived at 9:40pm and had to wait for about 30 minutes to get seated....More
Delicious Tonkotsu Pork Broth Ramen, the staff receives their clients in a very friendly and attentive way, it does not take long to receive the food, very good service.
Given the huge line out front and all the praise online I thought I would try this place out. It was yummy but an hour long wait was excessive. By the time I finally got inside I just asked for the meal to go.
Having eaten at this chain in Japan, over several days we watched the constant customer line for this establishment. Locals know best and one day when we spotted no line we decided to experience the popular trend for ourselves. Busy & crowded with seemingly little...More
I'm constantly amused by the cult following this place has. I live right next door and pass the long lines of Ramen junkes standing in the rain waiting to get in. Look, there's nothing wrong with Danbo but there's really nothing special either. Yeah, I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8855001-Reviews-Ramen_Danbo_Robson-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ramen Gojiro,"It was pretty alright, ramen had great noodles but the broth was really my thing and if you want something spicy i recommend getting the third level because 2 want even spicy but overall it’s good
I read and hear so many good views in TripAdvisor about their Ramen , most of the time , all way long line up during the lunch hours ., dropped in for lunch few weeks ago maybe the weather rain like cat and dog ,...More
We didn’t have to wait but that was sheer chance as 5 mins later there was a queue. Server was great as she gently suggested we wouldn’t want two dishes as too much food, sharing ramen would be fine. We ordered the spicy chicken and...More
The best chashu tsukemen in Vancouver, the taste is amazing and the price is good. The ramen and the gyozas are really good too.
Linh our server provided fast and friendly service. You must try the Karaage Original Chicken as it terrific. Our wait in line was about 40 min but worth it.
Absolutely delish probably the best ramen I've ever had. Would recommend to anyone. Look forward to coming back next time. staff are very polite and quick with service.
After arriving to the city late, this was a perfect end to cold wet day. They offer a wide variety of broths and ramen choices, plus a few tasty Japanese side dishes.
I stopped here back in October just for some noodle fix on a rainy day. Any noodles are just perfect for this Raincouver for sure. I had to wait outside until my turn was ready. Later I had to show my vaccine card and 2...More
I’ve been on a mission to find great vegetarian ramen in vancouver. I’ve tried about 10 ramen spots in one month lol . This place is definitely one of my top favourites. The broth was full of flavour, it was loaded with veggies , and...More
We had ramen here at lunch time. Even though it was crazy busy we were in and out in 35 minutes. Delicious tsukemen, pork ramen and the special Yuzu shio ramen were fantastic and hot. Gyozas were good too. I’d go back when I’m back...More
We queued in line for a while to eat in this establishment. Clearly popular as there were queues the day before when we passed and this will be due to the very nice and tasty food which is served efficiently by friendly staff. Relatively cheap...More
Pork broth was rich and complex, noodles fresh with enough chew to delight. Small place, but very good prices.
We were surprised we had to wait outside in a line around the corner of the building to get seated but we made the best of it and made a friend in line who was from France while waiting. After about a 30M wait we...More
Delicious!! Good choices and prices were reasonable. I was lucky to get there a few minutes before noon and got a seat. Be prepared to sit with others.
Visited for a quick lunch as I always love a good bowl of ramen. This was my first time visiting this spot and I was quite excited based on other yelp/trip advisor reviews. And boy, I was not disappointed!! The flavour of the broth was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10103049-Reviews-Ramen_Gojiro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ramie's Greek Restaurant,"Our group of 7 had a nice lunch here. The service was very good and we all enjoyed our meals and tried an assortment of items.
I ordered for pick up two lunch special items right at their opening at 11:00 a.m. on Thursday, Feb. 24, 2022. The female staff said it will be ready in half an hour. So at 11:30 when I pick up my order, the door was...More
The lady in the restaurant was too rude. Once we informed her that we have Entertainment book coupon, her behavior was changed. Hello, we are not here for the free food, we got the coupon!! She got the water with ice cubes inside. I asked...More
Just finished a nice business lunch at the Ramie's , it is a while since my last visit , little out date , but very relax with the blue and white decor , good size dinning room , lunch menu not over size , but...More
We used to consider this our ""go to"" Greek restaurant, took visitors there, and recommended it to friends. Las time we went, we had to wait an eternity because they were too busy filling take out orders (this was Pre-Covid) and today the person I...More
I was looking for Greek food in the Metrotown area and discovered this restaurant. My friend and I enjoyed the appetizer platter and lamb chops. Lots of food, good variety and taste very good. There is a few outside patio tables here too which we...More
I been here a few time over the years. Used a entertainment book coupon. It’s not the bogo ( buy one get one) it’s buy one get 2nd 50 off so make it 25% off only. I always order the lamb so I though I...More
Great Greek food! Nice and quiet ambiance for lunch. Service was very pleasant. Our server wasn’t too pushy and she responded promptly when asked for help.
Ramie’s Greek Restaurant is a well-established restaurant on Kingsway that we’ve visited on a number of occasions. Usually, we wind up ordering one of their special platters for take-out (really a good option if you’re looking to try a bunch of different items). However, we...More
I have been To Ramies several times with friends over the years that they have been there. The food is average; nothing special but the service has always been good! Therefore one of the reasons we went there on Friday. Once again our server did...More
I was craving for something a bit different and if in Vancouver you can't find nice places I don't know where on Earth you can. I've stopped for a Greek lunch at this restaurant. The lady who served us very nice and polite, her service...More
Went to this restaurant for lunch during Dine Out and it was OK. The servers were super nice but the inside may need updating. The Food was OK. Easy parking out front.
The lamb was amazing, service was great and the price was right. Definitely not a fancy restaurant but if you are looking for amazing Greek food this is the place.
We all had a craving for Greek food for lunch so with the help of our GPS we found our way to Ramie's. We thoroughly enjoyed the appetizer plate, saganaki and lamb souvlaki. Great service and food here.
We have been coming to this restaurant for years. The food is great, and all the servers are terrific.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2616645-Reviews-Ramie_s_Greek_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Red Accordion,"Everything about this eclectic restaurant makes it my new favourite! Food, decor, owner, staff, all outstanding!
Had the burger it is by far the best in Vancouver. Everything is fresh including the buns. Can’t recommend it enough.
The Red Accordion restaurant in downtown Vancouver, next to Stanley Park, is a real hidden culinary gem. Don’t be discouraged by its decayed façade and entrance. Certainly, the restaurant is located in a heritage dwelling. You will be rewarded and surprised by quality of food,...More
Our concierge recommended the Red Accordion and I’m so glad he did. It’s an eclectic atmosphere with an eclectic menu. We had a lovely table outside. Our awesome waitress Taylor told us that people travel from far away just for the appetizer featuring an edamame...More
Went for Happy hour last weekend as our first visit here was great. This time-not so much. Waiter forgot to put in our food order, wasn’t very apologetic, and this was after waiting over an hour for food that wasn’t coming. It wasn’t busy but...More
I had the Tra Breakfast. The wet greens took up a third of the plate and I had to dig deep to find the actual eggs that were were not only slightly undercooked but were also cold and soggy as they had been soaked in...More
Only have time for one meal in Vancouver? Make a reservation or drop in at the Red Accordion (which is open for brunch, lunch, and dinner most days). It is like having a meal at your grandmother's house…in all the best ways! The atmosphere is...More
This is a hidden gem, do yourself a favour and check this place out. Very kitsch affair, lovely décor all add up to a lovely atmosphere. On-line booking ensures you get a table as the restaurant is not overly large. Can highly recommend the Mimosa's....More
Cannot rate this place enough, a total hidden gem! Food - incredible, best wings we’ve ever had Service - perfectly toned, they get the vibe! Thanks Vanessa! Ambience - very artsy, cool, cozy, chilled I’m just hoping that too many people don’t find out about...More
We went there prior to the restaurant opening as our nephew/niece had asked the owners if they could get married and have some pictures taken in the restaurant. The owner was fantastic and was extremely accommodating to the bride/groom. (*This wedding was just the couple...More
It was a bit noisy and we were about to leave but the owner found a new table in an unopened section and the staff were nice enough to accommodate the inconvenience. Service was great. Food was exceptional- maybe the best burger I have ever...More
I only wish there were a place like this in my town! Red Accordian was recommended to us by a bartender at another restaurant and he did not steer us wrong. This venue is warm, charming, and provides first-rate food and cocktails. First, the restaurant...More
Incredible! The loction is super chill, very friendly staff and the food is fresh and really tasty! It's a must visit restaurant/bar in Vancouver!
Amazing! The staff is super friendly, the food is fresh and tasty, the drinks are yummy and the negroni is heaven! Coming back for sure!
I don’t give many 5 stars but this is an easy one. This is an amazing wee find in Vancouver with fantastic staff and absolutely amazing food. We just had a lovely time. It’s near Stanley park and we are here pre theatre for under...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17340832-Reviews-Red_Accordion-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Card Sport Bar and Eatery,"Good looking place but the food was not that great. We ate a classic burger and a crispy chicken burger. The dishes were not that big so the price is high for what you get. The fries and crispy chicken burger were fried too long....More
I went with friends to watch a football game the other night. Only two or three of their beers come in pint sized glasses. They charge pint sized prices for tiny beers. I sat on a red leather chair and the dye from the armrests...More
After touring the city we tried Red Card for dinner. 6 of us, the waitress was great, knew her stuff, 3 of our group ordered fish and chips, but they only had 1 serving left of fish and chips, so others order pizza and salad,...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for the review and feedback. I am happy to hear the waitress was great and I have passed your comments onto managment. We hope to see you again soon if you should decide to dine with us. Regards, Kelly JH Sales...More
Restaurant next door to the Moda Hotel Downtown Vancouver. Serving typical American food like mac & cheese, burgers, pizza, salads, pasta etc. They have a large beer selection if you like a special beer and the beer has the right temperature (beer has to be...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for the lovely review and great feedback. Hope to see you again soon. Regards, Kelly JH Sales and Marketing Manager
This is a great little bar for chilling gout and having an ice cold beer. Being from Australia that is one of the most important aspects of drinking beer, it has to be ice cold and this place delivered it. The service is great and...More
Hello, Thank you for the great review, hope to see you again soon! Happy Holidays Regards, Kelly JH Sales and Marketing Manager
Ate here on business recently. Games on a tv’s, football, hockey, basketball, plenty of seating, cool bar, raffles for sports jerseys every Monday. A happening place for a quick bite and some drinks.
Dear Guest, Thank you for the lovely review. Hope to see you again soon! Regards, Kelly JH Sales and Marketing Manager
Eight of us met for dinner here. We were seated immediately, a big tennis match just got over. The food was very good with ample portions. The Server was very kind and friendly. We spent a good amount of time eating, drinking and chatting. I...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your review. We hope to see you again soon. Thank you, Best regards, Kelly JH
I recently visited Red Card to try and watch the rugby world cup, because it is in Japan it is at a tricky time of night (kick off 1am). But last Friday the bar couldn't of been more accommodating. We watched the whole game there...More
Food was hot. Service was okay. Nothing special but close to the show we were going to. Good pub type food. Prices were very good considering the location
Dear guest, Thank you for taking the time you leave this review, as feedback is how we improve. I am happy to hear you enjoyed your meal, I do hope we see you again soon!
Difficult to find anywhere to eat if you don't want pizza or burgers but found this place. Pasta and local wine were excellent.
Thanks for taking the time to give us such a great review, we hope to see you again soon Richard!
Great sports bar, reasonable service and good prices. Sport on quite load so difficult to talk but if that’s what you want it’s a great place. Food is very nice.
The only 2 reasons we chose this establishment was because of it’s proximity to a concert venue & an Entertainment Coupon! The latter only works for entree items which are limited! I had the salmon which was the size of an enlarged postage stamp! Tasty...More
They have plenty of screens so you can watch your favorite sport from any angle. Food is good for a sport bar, good selection of beers. Waitresses are really nice and ready to bring you a drink. I really enjoy watching sports there.
Its a Pub, It serves Beer and wine quickly. the staff know what you had the first time and ask if you want the same. they are good it is good. every sport going on the TV and reasonably close to BC Place.
We are East Vancouverites and don't get downtown a whole lot any more but during World Juniors, the downtown/Yaletown/Gastown area was hopping. Went to a concert at the Commodore last week and saw this place was conveniently located. We made a reservation thinking it would...More",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3264517-Reviews-Red_Card_Sport_Bar_and_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Chilli,"I have been eating their food for 30 years. It is absolutely the best chinese food you will ever eat. I no longer live at the coast and I truly miss eating there regularly. When I am in Vancouver for business I always take dinner...More
The restaurant is not open for dine in so we ordered take out over the phone as we live close by and prefer to pick up the food while it is still hot. The take out order had just been completed when I arrived at...More
We finally took the leap and ordered out during the Covid crisis. What a treat...Red Chilli did not disappoint! The food was fresh, hot and better than we remembered!
For 13 years the Red Chilli has been our go-to Chinese restaurant on the North Shore. Not any more. Our last three deliveries have brought us food that is a shadow of he formerly excellent food they served. We have decided to go elsewhere in...More
We have been dining at this restaurant for years. Also do take out. We have found that the quality of food is excellent. From time to time, a particular dish may not be as good as the previous visit. But on average, we find that...More
My wife and i USED to go to this restaurant regularly. Then something changed (either the ownership or the Chef) The food went from Delicious to Terrible plus the price for this terrible food sky-rocked..$$$$$ Now the place is empty of customers when you pass...More
Red Chilli has had the same operator for over 40 years and there is a reason it has stood the test of time! North Vanocuver's little secret is out! Great food, Nice Ambiance and wonderful serving staff. Selina made our night with her friendly and...More
Red chilli has some of the best chinese food available on the north shore. The style of cuisine is mostly Szechuan. The food is nice and spicy with very bold flavours. Personally i have been going to red chilli regularly since 2012. It has the...More
Unassuming restaurant on Lonsdale, in North Vancouver. But don't let the look fool you. Excellent Chinese food. Lots of spicy dishes. All fresh ingredients. The restaurant is small so may need reservations. Highly recommended.
My grandson had recommended Red Chilli as his favourite Chinese restaurant so six of us went there for dinner without a reservation. The restaurant is very much a local place like many on Lonsdale. We were seated very quickly and since we knew what we...More
It has been a couple of years since we last ate here. Service was good although the server's English was minimal. Fortunately most dishes have a picture and a # so that helped. We ordered the Sweet & Sour Pork, the Beef & Broccoli and...More
This had been one of our favourite Chinese restaurants. Our recent visit was a real disappointment. Spring rolls looked flat, pre-cooked or frozen, and were tasteless. Lettuce wrap (chicken) were, at best, OK as was the shredded pork on spinach. Wine selection very limited. Went...More
They Screwed up our delivery order and refused to rectify the issue. We won't order from or visit here again
Stopped here for dinner based on reviews and were very happy we did. A wide variety of dishes both spicy & not. Just be aware that some dishes that aren’t designated as spicy are. Will definitely return.
Living literally 1 minute away from this what used to be my go to amazing place to go for eat in or take out they have lost my business. Reasons why. The service is horrible and quite frankly they are rude. I used to order...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d793409-Reviews-Red_Chilli-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Robin Gourmet Burgers,"This restaurant needs a deep clean and mend. I’ve never seen such a tired and grubby place. Ordered and it took ages for the food to arrive and when it did my fries were cold and inedible. My husband found a fry that wasn’t cooked...More
We Ordered Take-Out for my kid ( Kids Meal: Pizza,Juice,Fries). It Was the worse thing possiblem. When we received the order it looked neatly packed but when we opened it, it was horrifying. The pizza was Folded like a Sandwich, the fries were stuck on...More
Horrible experience with take out for kids. The lack of attention to cleanliness and food preparation totally disgusting. Please take a thorough look through food especially salads look what came with our side Ceasar salad. Daughter brought up food after seeing this in her food
I went there to pick up my birthday gift and waiter refused to reedem it, he said I should go back in 48 hours. I have lost time to go there and chance for reward. Very poor customer service. Avoid this place!
Must preface this by saying I have incredibly low expectations of Red Robin. It’s a burger joint with mediocre product, but we were just looking for a quick meal. Went to the one on Robson. It was absolutely filthy and I’ve seen cleaner bathrooms in...More
My girlfriend and i are visting from Manitoba and were very surprised and impressed by not only the amazing quality of the food but the customer service from our seving staff and rhe managment . The manager took time fro. His dutys ro make sure...More
This is the second time I’ve eaten at this Vancouver branch. The age is showing in both the decor and perhaps even the food. It’s not that it’s bad, it’s just not that good. That said, the place still has personality and the wait staff...More
First of all our server from the fair city of London was an absolute gem. As too previously a Londoner myself it was great to share some sentimental conversations. We both reside in North America now. His recommendation the Steakhouse Burger complete with HP sauce...More
Actually pretty disappointed in our visit, having been here on previous years and loved it. The range of different dishes on the menu seems to have become less varied including the removal of our favourite fajitas. The meals we had were good quality and the...More
Visit 1 was midweek. Seated quickly and served by a lovely young waitress who was very helpful. Great burgers, drinks and sides. Fast friendly service, all in all, 5 star. Thank you. Visit 2. Weekend. 20 minute wait to be seated, not a problem. Disheveled...More
My husband had a burger and I had shrimps. The food was hot, tasty and served by very pleasant staff. Reasonably priced for Vancouver City. The restaurant itself is very tired and in need of a major make-over.
Sat on the rooftop patio for drinks. Good drinks and prices, didn't have any food. Seemed short staffed so they brought complementary fries. Service was good
Looking for a quick bite to eat we spotted Red Robin from Robson and thought it looked like a good spot. The online menu also looked appetising and had a good range of meals to choose from. The entrance to the restaurant should have been...More
Service was quick and friendly. Food was served nice , hot and in a timely manner. Place was clean, sports tv provided at the bar. Note there was a waitress there that resembled the actress Rosario Dawson.
First time we've eaten at Red Robin. I'm not a burger person but I have to say they were excellent. Extensive menu not only of burgers but salads, sandwiches etc. Also liked that you could order your choice of side and get free top ups...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1916763-Reviews-Red_Robin_Gourmet_Burgers-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Star Restaurant,"It is my first visit since last year , took my sisters and brother for our once a month get together dinner , we choose the Red Star because not a extravaganza expensive restaurant in Richmond , very family friendly airy clean spacious with two...More
Ample parking on second floor. Opens at 10am. Good service and dim sum. We ordered beef tendon and tripe, big grouper with 2 dishes and steamed bun with with egg yolk filling. One grouper dish was stir fried with flat rice noodles. The second was...More
This restaurant is one of the local love to hang out ,, special for the family dinner , birthday ,weddings , nothing extravaganza about the ambiance , but foods all way solid good , lot better the Vancouver location , it is old style dim...More
Great authentic dishes, including bbq duck and plenty of seafood options. Located adjacent to The Radisson Hotel - friendly service, everything was delicious.
I have read some rather unflattering reviews about this place in Yelp, and I must respectfully disagree. We eat at this restaurant on a semi-regular basis, and honestly cannot remember a time when the experience was anything less than satisfactory. The dimsum here easily ranks...More
Stopped in for dim sum quick between meetings and it was really good. I’m not in Richmond a lot so it’s nice to have good dim sum here and there to remind yourself of what it should be. Being alone I only got a few...More
Had dinner there and the prices are similar to others in the area. Fish was fresh and the chicken was good.
I recently stayed in Radisson Hotel Vancouver Airport after a 10-night cruise. Having had Western cuisine during that period on the ship, I immediately went for dim sum lunch after checkin. Red Star, beihg the closest restaurant to my hotel, was the obvious choice -...More
The dim sum here was great, we ordered har gow, rice rolls with shrimp, rice rolls with fish, sticky rice, chicken feet, duck noodle soup. They were hot and delicious. What I am not happy about is the customer service. Because we liked the food...More
A Chinese restaurant for sure. Chinese all the way. Good food. Comes hot to the table. Servers extend their services to insure you are happy. A good floor captain keeps the place orderly and rumbling. Greater Vancouver is so fortunate. The number of very good,...More
Went there on Friday at 10.00 am but was told restaurant opened at 10.30 am.( Weekend 10.00 am ) .We ordered supreme shark's fin dumpling ( in soup), siew mai, bean curd wrap, steamed spareribs, prawn spring roll, BBQ pork bun and prawn & chives.Food...More
Another Dim Sum place that got buried into our ""one day I will return"" file! Invited by a friend and his wife for dim sum on Labour Day, as expected most places are fully booked or even if you have a reservation, you will still...More
Thought this Red Star restaurant, which is attached to a hotel complex, is quite good. Service was adequate, really liked the cod dish and the scallops. Duck dish was okay but the duck seemed slightly over cooked.
Ordered 3 dishes. All had good flavors especially the chicken flavored with red fermented tofu. The other dishes were the asparagus with fungus and pork hock appetizer. More barbecue items than other restaurants. Visited on a Thursday evening, not crowded and service was prompt.
It is clear this Red Star location is not up to par with its Vancouver sibling. The interior of the restaurant is old and outdated with no air conditioning. Dim Sum was served pretty much luke warm and not hot. The rice roll in particular...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2455112-Reviews-Red_Star_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Red Star Seafood Restaurant,"Was quite surprise how good the food was when I ate here. Everything was great. Definitely come again. We tried the expensive Geoduck and they brought us the raw Geoduck prior to cooking it. They made serval dishes with it and it was quite an...More
Meeting up with friends we haven’t seen for a while is always great. Nothing like going for a banquet style dinner at a chinese food restaurant. We started off with their Peking (Beijing) Duck and loved the crispiness of the skin. It seemed liked it...More
My wife and I keep coming back to dine in this seafood restaurant in South Granville Area. Upon arrival we were warmly greeted by a staff member and were directed to a table as we had made a reservation before hand. The pot of hot...More
They were having a crab promotion for their 15th anniversary and we ordered two crabs done in two different flavours. Both was excellent and fresh. Soya Chicken is also good not over power by the soya taste. In general all the dishes is good and...More
I will definitely recommend this restaurant if your are in the area and looking for delicious Asian cuisine. Very friendly staff. There is also a bus stop right in front of the restaurant if you use public transit like i do.
Ordered lobster and was shown by the waitress on size and weight at the table. The lobster was switch with a smaller size and a non fresh or dead lobster was used. The lobster meat was soft and in small piece like (minced pork) there...More
Our family of four thoroughly enjoyed a multi-course meal here while staying in the Marpole area of Vancouver. We had a fish course, shrimp and a three-part duck course which was too much food but it was very delicious. A kind manager assisted us in...More
We just moved into this neighbourhood and thought we should give it a try. The menu was quite different from our experience on the Prairies, but we ordered a nice array of food (spicy chicken and shrimp, spareribs in black vinegar and traditional steamed eggplant)....More
If you have a long layover at YVR or if you are in the neighborhood and looking for a good Asian restaurant, you should try this place. Loved by locals for its seafood dishes and for its wide range of traditional Asian food, this place...More
An extremely good restaurant with excellent food and superb service. Occupied by Chinese customers only. Recommended thoroughly.
This place serves authentic Cantonese style squabs. One bird cut into quarters. Crisply and juicy and I like to add a bit of the salt tat comes with it. We went there for dinner because of the bird. Also ordered crab with noodles and some...More
Red Star has some of the freshest and tastiest dim sum around. Prices are a bit higher but the quality of food is well worth it. Service is decent at this location. Food comes out hot and fresh. Roomy dining area as you're not jammed...More
We had dinner at this restaurant with our extended family. They serve authentic Cantonese cuisine. The seafood was very fresh and portions were extremely generous. Everything was delicious. Friendly and helpful staff. Good for large groups. Probably one of the best Chinese restaurants in Vancouver!
The prices at the Red Star are a tad more than other Chinese restaurants in metro Vancouver. The ambience and service more than justify the additional cost. The dim sum is especially pleasant and the items arrive piping hot and are very flavorful.
My wife booked a table for 6 members of the family to celebrate (my) Father's Day in advance. We were surprised when the hostess informed us we didn't have a reservation. I was shocked as I heard the telephone conversation between my wife and the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1627172-Reviews-Red_Star_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Truck Beer,"I ordered a burger and waited 30 minutes. After I asked where is my burger, they told me that a waitress gave it to someone else and they were making new for me, waiting 10 minutes more and still got nothing, (guess they forgot about...More
It was our first visit to Red Truck and we will be back. Great beer, good food and excellent staff! Too many types of beer to try in one visit! Thanks Gail and Keagan for the attentive service! 🍺
We thoroughly enjoyed our Sunday evening visit to Red Truck beer with two kids in tow. There is ample outdoor seating which was a bonus. With a patio, brightly decorated red trucks in the parking lot and a colorfully painted tower, it was a visually...More
I recently purchased the Red Truck Hop Pack The pack did not have 4 different types of beer in it. Obviously a factory error. I email the brewery and they are sending me a new pack with the correct configuration. That is amazing customer service....More
We were in the area and decided to stop by as they have a covered and heated patio along with food. We brought our 2 year old along and the service was great. I've had red truck beer several times but never been to the...More
Came with friends to have brunch and beers after a bike ride as well as catching up with some sports games on the TVs. I think this is a great spot for beer lovers or those who like dining in a unique atmosphere.
One of Vancouver's breweries that's not a craft microbrewery anymore. I would say it's one of the most recognized breweries in town. I absolutely can't say that it is my favorite spot for brews, but I can see how many people admire this company. Their...More
We went here a few times staff very friendly, food good and good beer. Commercial drive in general is a good place to visit with lots of good places to eat and drink.
Thank you for the 5-star review. We really appreciate the feedback.
If you are still in the area, don’t miss an opportunity to visit Red Trick brewery. Traditional pub food is available at a reasonable price. Service is good.
Here you can get very good beer (Pilsen is my favorite) accompanied by delicious food. Try the garlic fries, they’re delicious and fit perfectly to the beer 🍻
The Red Truck ran out of beer. When I asked for a refund, they said BC law does not allow the refund on alcohol. There is such a law, but ot applies to BC Liquor Stores without receipt. NO receipt, no refund. The red truck...More
My husband found the restroom quite a ways down stairs, and the water in the sink was turned on by turning a switch on a pipe beside the sink made from a tire. I thought the restrooms were unique and worth a visit. We sat...More
Went here a couple years ago for eats and brews. This time just for some drinks! Great experience once again. We were even able to snag a mini private tour up inside the brewery. I enjoy trying lots of craft beers and this is still...More
Wow! Friends and I just visited Red Truck for a beer and a burger and had a great experience! The restaurant/tasting room is very cohesive with the Red Truck and craft brewery theme. Nothing fancy. Parking is easy on he weekend. The menu offers lots...More
Great spot to go for some beers and snacks. We sat outside and had beers and wings. Wasn't busy, staff was friendly, and the decor was fun especially the washrooms. Their beer was delicious with over a dozen to chose from. We also had wings...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8499285-Reviews-Red_Truck_Beer-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Red Umbrella Cafe,"This is a lovely little cafe. The food was delicious (large portions) and reasonably priced. Great music too!
This is a really good breakfast/brunch spot in Vancouver's West End. Very good food and service. Not the biggest cafe in the world, so there is a chance you may have to wait, but definitely worth it! Also has a place for book swaps when...More
For our last Vancouver breakfast, we went to the Red Umbrella Cafe located on the same bloc as our hotel. We took the West Ender plate an the salmon and avocado sandwich. Both were very good and the plate was so big that I had...More
Nice place, close to Denman. Fast service, friendly. Small restaurant. Clean. Parking can be a challenge.
We stayed in a hotel nearby and went here for breakfast one morning, and ended up eating here at least 5 times during our stay in Vancouver. The food was so delicious - lots of savoury options for breakfast and the pancakes were so good...More
This place doesn't open until 0830 so we waited a bit to get in, but there was a queue for a table already by 0830. Obviously a popular option on Davie St. $13 bacon eggs is very reasonable for downtown Vancouver and was excellent. I...More
Amazing eggs Benedict! Staff was friendly and exactly what we needed for breakfast. It opens 8:30, so we needed to wait a bit (we are morning people), but it was worth it. We had the wild smoked salmon and avocado Benedict and it was just...More
We stopped here after cycling around Stanley Park. We were just looking for a quick bite to eat, but we were pleasantly surprised by delicious sandwiches and generous portions. They serve an all day breakfast (which my husband had) and really good sandwiches. We tried...More
Lovely welcoming place, with a wide range of food for breakfast, brunch and lunch. The veggie breakfast was delicious and poached eggs perfectly cooked to order. Egg sandwich was amazing. Coffee great. Nice decor. We were lucky and got a table really quickly, but I...More
Best coffee in the town. The place was super busy but it proves it is outstanding. The staff was friendly and helpful event thought the stressful and busy environment. Recommend to make a reservation in advance to be sure you have a table.
Delicious brunch. Great eggs benedict. We had a bit of a wait as it’s so popular but well worth sitting with a coffee while the kitchen prepared everything fresh. Very friendly young Irishman from County Kerry served us and did a great job as did...More
We were lucky to arrive just as they’d opened and everyone in the queue was seated straight away. It was a very interesting menu, with some very different breakfast choices. I had the belch and my husband had the meat lovers breakfast, both were delicious....More
Super staff and the food creations are unique. I had the eggburger with tomato jam egg ham cheese lettuce and it was delicious. Huge! So good will revisit when in Vancouver next.
When you arrive, if the place is full, you leave your name and wait outside until there is space. Luckily we didn't have to wait long, 5-10 minutes at most! Once we were seated our drinks order was taken and we were given time to...More
Cute little spot on Davies Street close to the Best Western Sands. Good basic bacon and egg breakfast . The baked goods looked amazing but we were too full to try any of them, maybe next time. Staff were friendly and efficient. They apologized because...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3471000-Reviews-Red_Umbrella_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Reflections Terrace,"We made a reservation for dinner. They left a VM to cancel with no explanation. When called back they said they were cancelling all resos that night because someone wanted it for an event and reserved the whole place. Annoyed they did not honour our...More
This used to be a great spot in the summer months - always expensive but fun people watching. When we were there last week the first thing out of the hostess's mouth was ""You have one hour and thirty minutes at your table"". Not exactly...More
We booked a table and sat in the area with the sofas and couches. The pretty lights and gorgeous decor can distract you from the fact that the food quality is terrible and the drinks are overpriced and watered down. We ordered the caprese flatbread,...More
Have been to both Hawksworth and Bel Café, two eateries located within the Hotel Georgia. Both have provided stellar food and service, and so our group decided to try Reflections in hopes of a similar experience. The elevator up to the patio can be hard...More
Lots of glitz attempts to hide mediocre, wildly overpriced food and an uncomfortable ambience. You'll need to wear your winter coat once you're more than three feet from the heaters. Lack of attention to detail suggests poor management (dirty throw rugs, large gaps in the...More
We booked reflections restaurant for Christmas Day dinner at the start of December for a group of 5 friends. We have recently immigrated from Ireland and are away from our families at Christmas so wanted to make it as special as possible for all of...More
a wonderful oasis in downtown vancouver. certainly a happening place with guests dressed to the nines. high prices as you’d expect but justified with excellent food, good sized portions and prompt and friendly service. a great place to hang out with friends and family.
Came here for a special occasion and the waitress was so unfriendly. Didn’t smile at all. The waitress also was not attentive dish refill water and I had to ask her too. Also she didn’t bring the bill in over 15 mins so I had...More
Lack of attentiveness and inept service. Started with wobbly table, we fixed that with sugar packets under a leg...staff should permanently rectify. Had to ask for refills on water (our server forgot, 5-10 minutes after asking our server we got refills from busser), refills on...More
We just walked in and just lucky to have a few available seats at the bar in the mid afternoon. We only had drinks, but this is a beautiful place and you definitely will need reservations if you want the full experience. Definitely top notch...More
Thank you for your review and comments. We look forward to welcoming you back soon. Paul Li Director of Sales and Marketing
It's tough to summarize all the poor decisions and the degree of substandard service from a single visit in one review. I'm also sympathetic to the fact nearly every establishment is short on staff or training staff with no prior experience. Let's just say on...More
Don’t be surprised if this place cancels your reservation just days before providing no reason and making it impossible to get a reservation anywhere else in the city on such short notice. This happened not once but twice despite having made the reservations weeks in...More
It is located at on the 4th floor at Hotel Gorgia in Downtown Vancouver. Rooftop Bar , good drink menu, super polite staff , variety of appetizers and food , it a good place to spend sometime with friends , they usually open seasonally so...More
Dear Karanaf, Thank you for your review and comments. We are glad to hear that you had an enjoyable visit. Please keep an eye out on our social media channels for news about Reflections : The Garden Terrace 2022. Paul Li Director of Sales and...More
First time back since the pandemic, and was actually surprised based on previous experiences how ""poor"" the quality of the customer service was. Although initially we were welcomed in by the hostess and quickly seated, that's where the service very quickly deteriorated. There appeared to...More
We were at Reflections for a bachelorette party on June 19 2021, the food was amazing, however the service was absolutely atrocious, staff was rude, we waited over 45min for our first drink, they didn't even come by with water",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3157230-Reviews-Reflections_Terrace-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Relish The Pub,"Good food, drinks, service and atmosphere, friendly, helpful and attentive staff. So good we went back for a second night.
We just wanted a drink - nothing else, since we’d already eaten. Young lady shows us to a table - dumps menus and leaves. Time passes … I get up and head to the bar. The guy behind is very busy cleaning glasses, so I...More
A group of us visited this central venue in August this year. Since there were quite a few of us we opted to have a table outside. It is relatively good value for money, we enjoyed great service but when we opted for the recommended...More
Stopped by her for a couple of drinks. Beer was good but pretty much every liquor drink ordered was out of stock. The girl did explain that this was due to a strike by the logistics people but was a bit disappointing for us.
We were looking for someplace with a patio and walked by this pub where there were a number of people enjoying the large patio. On the way to be seated, we noticed a sign mentioning that wings were 50 cents each on Mondays. The menu...More
I stopped in with an associate for a glass of wine, this is a really nice pub. It is quaint, the location is great and they have a nice patio area. Our server was delightful. The menu/wine list was limited, but they had some excellent...More
Great little spot to head in with a good beer selection. Went in with a few friends and we weren’t disappointed. Service was quick and friendly.
It is in a great location. It was very close from where we were staying in Vancouver, so when we were looking for a place to eat, we found this place. I had tuna tataki tacos, and while it wasn't bad, I found that it...More
When I'm in Vancouver I stay at the WorldMark at The Canadian -- and this place is next door, and it's GREAT. Good happy hour deals.
Had dinner here most evenings in my week in Vancouver, Limited menu which is generally bar food. Large servings of nachos. Has wine and beer specials each day. Helpful staff and reasonably quiet atmsphere on weekday evenings. Friday was crowded and loud.
Great location. Right in the middle of downtown Vancouver. However it’s still nice and intimate. I love the large outside patio area. It’s a great place to go for a drink drinking the summer time.
Good food and mostly attentive service. Sitting utside is very nice (weather permitting). Every night they offer a local beer by the glass for 3 $.
Intrigued by the $3 beer special and it was time for a break anyway. Ordered a $4 beer and sat at a rustic table to people watch. Service was attentive but not overbearing.
This place has its own way of defining cool. The staff make the joint what it is. We loved every minute of this place. The food was good but nothing to rave about. The drinks, well, they're drinks. They go down smooth and get re-filled....More
A very pleasant bar for late night drinking. We had some appetisers with our drinks. Main complaint was we felt the drinks were very watered down. We complained and they were re-made much better, so don't be afraid to ask!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708295-Reviews-Relish_The_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Revel Room,"My wife and I were looking to get out of the burbs and listen to some live music in the downtown core, so we took a chance on the Revel Room. Our expectations were certainly exceeded as the atmosphere, crowd and music was energetic and...More
A small venue with a classic feel but it leaves a big impression! The staff were super friendly and helpful! The music was incredible. From the lone piano player to his saxophone accompaniment, every song has your foot tapping! Finally the food is superb. We...More
The Revel Room is a Vancouver legend. Its an intimate space in the centre of Gastown with live jazz every night starting at 7:30 pm (closed Monday). The menu is pure Lousiana and offers something for all palettes. The drinks menu is very inventive and...More
Had a fabulous evening here two weeks ago, food was perfect, staff were friendly and the music was great! Recommended by a friend who visited in June and we weren’t disappointed, would recommend you book though
We went for a friend's birthday specifically for hushpuppies a southern fav of the birthday lady and the Revel chef had taken them off the menu but not the website...the waitress did not know the food except for a cheeseburger. Our 2 steaks MR came...More
I booked a reservation at the Revel Room so we could take in some live music (jazz) while in Vancouver. And it was only a few blocks from where we were staying. The ambiance is very fun, old black and white movies playing on the...More
We'd walk past this place many times and kept meaning to come in. Finally set up a reservation for a birthday, and it did not disappoint. The pork belly is incredible and if you're ok with the meat sweats and needing to go to bed...More
My husband and I love the Revel Room. The staff is terrific, the food is good, good drinks and great music. There is live music just about every night, and the rockabilly group on Wednesday night is so much fun. It's fairly small but the...More
This happened in the last week of April. I called in the morning to make a 9.30pm reservation for a large group of my friends on the occasion of my birthday. I got a call back from the Revel room confirming my reservation. I arrive...More
Revel Room is one of the few places in Gastown with quality live music, around 5 nights per week. Location is right in the heart of the district at Abbott and Cordova. The space is small, with room for maybe 60 customers, so get there...More
We dropped in after an event at GM Place stadium, which is about 10 min walk away. The place was packed and they have a jazz quartet playing. There is seating downstairs and also upstairs. We sat upstairs and ordered some cocktails and appetizers. It...More
A great spot to begin an evening wandering through downtown Vancouver. Excellent drinks, warm atmosphere, decent appetizers (all at happy hour prices), super-friendly service & lovely jazz piano
My wife and I went to the Revel Room this last Friday. It was perfect. Arriving @ 7:00 pm as per our reservation(must have a reservation-it's cozy). Service and Food was good..had the cajun fish dish...oh, on the spicy side and my wife had the...More
Went here during 'happy hour' had something to eat too (delicious) and had a brilliant time. The pianist was amazing and the whole atmosphere was great, partly due to the lovely young bar man who hailed from London. One of the best experiences we had...More
Loved the atmosphere - very ""gastown-ish"", good music - the pianist was amazing on Friday (Loius/Quinn) . The flank steak was juicy and great - one of the best we have had. I just wish the folks near the band would shut up when the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1064918-Reviews-Revel_Room-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rileys Restaurant Fish & Steak,"A great experience. Everyone was so very nice. It was a little loud sitting in the bar area for dinner and we asked to move to the patio. Everyone was very gracious when we commented about the noise. Food and presentation were top-notch and price...More
Fabulous new restaurant. We were a walk-in of 4 from the Pinnacle Hotel. Short walk The food and service was fabulous! We had cocktails which were excellent and a bottle of Rioja . Food was Seafood chowder in bread bowl and beef carpaccio. All great...More
Thank you for coming to check out our restaurant and for leaving us this positive review! The Beef Carpaccio and the Coq au Vin are crowd favourites! Hope your stay in Vancouver was fantastic :)
My first time at Riley's, and it most certainly did not disappoint! We were completely spoiled by the staff and in particular Raj, Oskar and Jarod. Their service was exemplary! We certainly did life the life of Riley, and can't wait to go back! Thank...More
It has been years since I could honestly say that we went to a place that treated us like family, and that had that extra sparkle that only a few old Yaletown haunts ever had! Maybe just one in particular. Can’t remember the name now....More
Thank you so much for dining at Riley's and for taking the time to leave us this amazing review! We're so happy to hear that the bar team gave such a memorable dining experience. We can't wait to host you for your next visit at...More
Riley's Fish and Steak in Vancouver was an absolute gem that saved our only Saturday in the city! After two disappointing culinary experiences, earlier in the morning, the restaurant delivered an unforgettable dining experience. The lobster was as superb as expected, but the real star...More
Thank you so much for joining us at Riley's for brunch yesterday! We're so happy to hear that youhad a fabulous experience and that Jerri helped to make it extra special. We are so grateful for your recommendation and we can't wait to host you...More
Absolutely Outstanding!!! Nothing else to say. Absolutely Outstanding!!! Nothing else to say. ABSOLUTELY OUTSTANDING!!!!!
Thank you so much for your kind words and feedback, we are very grateful! We can't wait for the opportunity to host you again in the near future :)
Wonderful venue. Tastefully decorated. Excellent service thanks to Kristian. And both the oysters and mussels were fabulous. Thanks for the great service Kristian (with a 'K').More
Thank you so much for dining at Riley's and for taking the time to leave us this amazing review! We're so happy to hear that both the food and service from Kitchen were fantastic! We look forward to the opportunity to host you again soon...More
We attended to Riley's for my birthday on July 3rd. 4 of us had steaks 1 of us had the halibut special. Between the 2 tenderloins, 1 strip and 1 rib steak all were cooked as ordered and were tender and very flavourful. The halibut...More
Happy belated birthday David, thank you so much for choosing Riley's to celebrate such a special occasion! We're so happy to hear that Serayha provided your group with an amazing experience! We can't wait to host you again on your next trip to Riley's :)
We had been looking forward to trying the Michelin recommended Riley’s by The Glowball Group so made a reservation for brunch on Canada Day. Everything was fantastic. The food was exceptional and the service was amazing. A big shout out to Ali who made our...More
Thank you for taking the time to visit Riley's and for joining us for brunch! We're so happy to hear that Ali provided your group with excellent service! We can't wait to host you again for your next visit :)
I visited Riley’s last night with my boyfriend for my birthday and honestly had an amazing experience. Luis was our server and he was so attentive and kind and really made our experience memorable. I definitely recommend him if you visit the restaurant. I had...More
Happy belated birthday! Thank you for choosing Riley's to celebrate such a special occasion! We're so happy to hear that Luis was able to provide such an amazing experience for you! Don't hesitate to visit him and us at Riley's again soon :)
Sat inside as the outside tables were very noisy. Nice to have a live musician. Cocktails (Riley and the Beast, Botanist passion) were good but not exceptional. The Beef Stroganoff was with pasta (prefer rice) but the addition of foie gras made the flavor exceptional....More
Thank you Trevor for dining at Riley's and for taking the time to provide us with feedback about your experience. We are grateful for your comments and we look forward to the opportunity to host you again in the future :)
A restaurant with very good atmosphere. We are a big table of 10. We order a bottle of wine and we brought wine too which they charge cad 40 which I think it's reasonable. Very good service , professional and helpful.
Thank you so much Nyson for dining at Riley's and for taking the time to leave us this revew! We're so happy that you had great service and a great experience! We look forward to hosting you again in the near future :)
Six of us met there for brunch. Everyone, including me , enjoyed our meals . Good recipes , great ingredients , very well prepared . Staff was terrific . Pricey but worth it . Parking was available but very expensive ( about $25gor 3 hours...More
Thank you so much for joining us for brunch at Riley's! We're so happy to hear that your whole group had a great experience! We look forward to hosting you again for your next weekend brunch :)
My wife and I went here for our wedding anniversary and oh Boy! What a lovely time we had. Serahya (server) and Kevin (manager) made sure we are having the best time at the restaurant. Food was delicious and vibe was just perfect for a...More
Happy belated anniversary to your wife and yourself! Thank you so much for dining at Riley's and for taking th etime to leave us this amzing review. We're so happy to hear that Kevin and Serayha were able to make your experience extra special! We...More
An extraordinary experience, I think it was the best decision I could have made, my best friend and I went to this restaurant to celebrate my birthday and everything was truly delicious, super personalized attention, first class service, many thanks to our waitress Emanuela, she...More
Happy belated birthday! Thank you so much Michel for this amazing review and for taking the time to provide us with feedback about your experience! We're so happy to hear that Emanuela provided your group with amazing service! We look forward to the opportunity to...More",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d24046034-Reviews-Rileys_Restaurant_Fish_Steak-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rive Gauche Bistro,"Lazy Sunday, with snow on the horizon. Brought my two teenage daughters with my wife and I to have a little brunch to discuss an upcoming trip to London & Paris. Service was decent but a little inattentive. The food is excellent, and presentation decent...More
We decided to try this restaurant for the first time as part of a “Dine Out Vancouver” promotion. $45 for 3 courses which were beautifully presented, cooked perfectly, and tasted delicious. Portion sizes are on the small side for a man; perfect for a woman....More
Stopped in for brunch and it was very good. I always try the onion soup in French restaurants as that should the one thing they can make and it was excellent! The rest of the meal was presented beautifully and everything was very tasty. Might...More
Went to try Rive Gauche during Dine Out Vancouver. Crab cakes wereexceptional. The boeuf bourguignon was very good and the porfiteroles were lovely. Wine was very good and reasonable priced. The appetiser and entree were delivered a little too fast for our liking almost as...More
We tried this restaurant for a night out with friends on the first night of DIne Out Vancouver. We are wondering if this is why the service was so odd? We arrived a few minutes early thinking we would have a drink and were pleasantly...More
Just had a meal that took the edge off a miserable day. Used to be a patron of this local in the past but had bad experiences with last ownership. The food , and service was very good , will try for dinner soon.
We took a cab from downtown to the restaurant and it was worth the drive. I felt like we were entering a bistro in Paris - the restaurant is charming and our waiter was very helpful with suggestions off the menu. The crab cake to...More
I think the ""Bistro"" part of the name is a bit misleading....finally a French Restaurant on this side of the bridge that serves traditional French food and at the same time pushes the taste and presentation envelope. The onion soup and the the scallops were...More
We’re so lucky we finally have a world class restaurant in West Van. Don’t need to cross the bridge to experience great food and ambience. Chef used to work at a top restaurant in Vancouver. ( I think Four Seasons). The service is excellent as...More
Dinner last Sunday with another couple at this place. We were here before and it was under a different name. Our server Andre is knowledgeable and entertaining. A short menu and the food was good. Onion soup full of flavour and the scallops were fresh....More
My wife and I had dinner with friends at Rive Gauche Bistro last Tuesday evening. The food and service were outstanding. The onion soup was absolutely the best as was my halibut. Andres our server was great - very personable and knowledgeable and helped us...More
Food came out hot and was so delicious and tasty The wagyu Burger was moist and the patty was a nice size The French onion soup was flavorful and was piping hot full of gooey cheese just like I love it ! I would go...More
My friends raved about this gem...and they were right! From the moment we sat down, we were treated like royalty. Prompt service, extra attention, phenomenal food. Hands down my new favorite restaurant on the North Shore. The foie gras is divine and the squid ink...More
We choose Rive Gauche for our weekly Dinner Date. Being locals, we have frequented the various eateries found in this location over the years, some good, some average. The premises has had a nice update and a table on the shady terrace was just what...More
Finally in West Vancouver a little bit of Europe. This restaurant is absolutely amazing. I can’t imagine who wrote a bad review it just makes no sense to me. From the moment you walk in the door you are greeted with a complimentary glass of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d14059505-Reviews-Rive_Gauche_Bistro-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Riverway Clubhouse Restaurant,"We always love coming here for their three course dining special. Started off with their corn chowder. Very tasty and their garlic bread might have even edged out the 🥣. It was that good! I ordered the ribs and the 🦞 tail of course. Very...More
Son’s Wedding Was here and the food was fantastic! From the prawn salad to the perfectly cooked steak and lobster. Great staff, who were always ready to help.
It is one of the hidden gem gulf course in mainland ,,great location ,not vey crowned at all ,very affordable ,great place for wedding and meeting , it is been awhile since my last visit ,,lovely clubhouse , decor very modern ,floor to ceiling windows...More
We celebrated our wedding at Riverway Clubhouse in November 2018. When we were looking for venues for our wedding reception, we had a few places in mind but as soon as we arrived at Riverway and saw how gorgeous the venue was with the high...More
Went here for lunch after using the driving range. My wife had the BMC burger and Moroccan soup and both were awesome! I had the New York steak with Mac & Cheese and it was really good too! They have specials Tuesday’s and Thursday’s where...More
Great venue for a wedding and the food is amazing. Highly recommend this place for a meal or for weddings. Beautiful venue.
We came here during lobster festival and had a lovely evening. The restaurant was packed. There is outdoor seating as well. The high exposed wood ceiling and big windows is a beautiful venue. The service was very good. We had their 3 course meal and...More
It's an anomaly when you see negative reviews of this restaurant because I have had the most outstanding and special dinners at the Riverway Golf Club Restaurant. More importantly, this restaurant has special meaning to me because it's where I got married and have had...More
Today was my first visit to the Riverway Clubhouse and I have to say the experience was excellent! The restaurant is in a large open room with high ceilings and lots of natural light. In the back ground there is a soft sound of music,...More
14 of us tried their dine out menu in Jan 2019. The food and the atmosphere are awesome. Sable fish and lobster were perfectly cooked. Service was good and we will be back for sure!
OMG this place is a hidden gem! Beautiful view super friendly staff and delicious food. Definitly worth a try. On lovely golf course and you don't even need ro be a member to enjoy lunch. I could onlynimagine how lovely it would be to attend...More
I totally agree with the reviewer who had a hard time trying to book this venue. No reservations taken over the phone I was told when I called, can only be done through their website. Plus all Fridays, Saturdays & Sundays were booked up already...More
I tried to make a reservation for a 12 person corporate Christmas Dinner and I was told that the soonest they except reservations is 2 weeks in advance maximum AND that your reservation could be cancelled if a company comes in and books the whole...More
After a grey & rainy day in Vancouver, it's nice to get out soon as the sun is shining again! Located in South Burnaby, this restaurant is part of the Riverway Golf Course, the dinning area overlooks the picturesq setting. The architecture reflex the Pacific...More
Let me start by saying the last time I visited this restaurant a few months ago, I noticed how poor the service was then, but thought given time that it would have improved. It had not. Our visit was in celebration of a friend's birthday,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d2704002-Reviews-Riverway_Clubhouse_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Robba Da Matti,"We called & made a reservation for 6. We were not told on the phone there’s an automatic gratituty. Then in person, one person couldn’t come, so it was 5 of us. The waitress didn’t inform us again that an automatic tip applies. Then once...More
This restaurant was first of all accommodating and sat us down without any reservation on a Friday evening. It's a very busy restaurant and the vibe is a happy one. We ordered a salad and sadly can't remember which one but it was good together...More
I looked at their dine out menu and found it very appealing. We made reservations for dinner on Saturday, January 2l. I’m glad we made reservations because they were absolutely booked solid. It is a very small restaurant but the inside has a very nice...More
We enjoyed the appetizers and carbonara at the Yaletown location. Service was excellent. Close to Opus hotel.
Robba Da Matti (RdM) on 1st Ave in Kitsilano, the latest of the small “empire’s” four restaurants, is a wonderful double dip, with a restaurant on the ground street level & a burrata bar above with a scaled down menu. Both are well worth visiting,...More
Very busy little Italian restaurant. Attentive & intimate service & fabulous food. We were a group of three and had two appetizers and a pasta each. Everything was superb. Can’t wait to go back!!
Robba da Matti makes good Italian food, but they need to figure things out. At 5:30, scanned the QR code and the mobile menu said Happy Hour til 6 - great! Tried ordering a HH wine and the server said HH ended at 5; showed...More
This restaurant was recommended to us and now we know why! The service was attentive and friendly, you could tell that the staff really liked working here at their Mainland location! ( one of their three locations ). The food did not disappoint either, coming...More
My friend and I ate here for the first time. It was busy for a Monday night. The salads we ordered were both very good. The pasta at best, was just so so. I had the pesto pasta with Burrata and my friend had the...More
My friend Steeve took me there for my first visit. We shared the beef carpaccio and he ordered the seafood pasta and the spaghetti with clams for myself with drinks. Steeve indulged in the tiramisu. Wonderful dinner!
My husband and I are from St. Louis where we have an area called the Hill that is known as the Italian part of the city with some of the best Italian markets and restaurants. It is very hard for us to find pasta outside...More
It was a Friday night, a date night, and we went to the BESt place. They listed “date night” where you get four courses for each person in the couple AND a bottle of wine for $120. We were fortunate enough to be served by...More
A great experience, the team was incredible and worked so hard to make our evening memorable. Lisia and Logan really went above and beyond to make the evening special. The food was delicious and everything was cooked to perfection. Cocktails are also delicious. Would highly...More
I am sorry to say this but ""poor happy hour menus."" It wasn't all that it's cracked up to be. I don't know where to begin. Maybe we lived in European countries for so long and at least we know how good quality cheese &...More
As soon as we arrived, the waitress informed us that we only had an hour and a half for our dinner and we should order quickly. One of our friends was a bit late and the staff kept pressuring us (although our food took 30...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3244241-Reviews-Robba_Da_Matti-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Robba da Matti (West End),"Went here for the first time for our anniversary dinner, and all I can say is WOW. Im always a little sceptical on Italian pasta places being over priced, but this place is well worth it for top quality food and service. A cute little...More
My daughter, her fiancé and I visited Robba da Matti in the West End on Haro Street in April 2023. When we entered, we were given a warm welcome and seated immediately along the cozy and comfortable cushioned wall seating. The service was fantastic as...More
We found this restaurant online and were not disappointed. We were looking to eat outside as it was a nice evening and this met the criteria! While indoor dining is also available, we had a wonderful table outside under an arbor. Service was good and...More
4 of us celebrated my husbands 50th birthday here tonight and it was perfection! The food was beyond delicious, loved the classy (but not fussy) ambiance of the room and our server Kelly really made it a special evening, he was such a delight. Will...More
No reservation and a one hour wait for a table but so glad we decided not to try and find somewhere else as it was totally worth it. Lovely decor, warm atmosphere, food and wine both delicious but the best thing was the amazing attention...More
Lovely quiet patio to enjoy brunch. Our server Andre was wonderful and provided impeccable service in spite of being alone and clearly run off his feet (the other staff were stuck in traffic and had not yet arrived). A very nice menu selection of brunch...More
Lovely spot in leafy apartment filled neighbourhood. It was warm so we choose patio which was pretty and perfect. Very good service, didn't rush us, let us try a couple of wines before choosing, Had the Capes said which came with bread and it was...More
At first, we arrived without reservation and were turned away (ever so politely) but booked a table for the following night and it was well worth it. Pleasant garden, excellent service and excellent food. We just shared a bruschetta and a cioppino, it was very-very...More
I've now been to this location 2x now. I had a friends birthday dinner here and loved the service and atmosphere so much that I booked a corporate dinner here with 20 guests afterward. The staff was incredible, they were kind, organized, and took care...More
Lovely setting and good food but the experience was overall disappointing because of the service. Untrained staff, who seemed to have no understanding of how to provide good service.
My visit here has been always pleasant, but our visit here last night was just exceptional from the moment we walked in. Greeted by lovely Elsa, such a warm, friendly, genuine welcoming gesture was very well received. Our waiter Kelley was very attentive, great food...More
Amazing service and food. Lovely atmosphere on the patio and delicious drinks and food. Loved the tiramisu too. Patio is very warm even in winter
I absolutely loved this restaurant. I heard good things about it and really wanted to try it out for my birthday. The food certainly did not disappoint and the person who served us was excellent. My only issue was the parking situation. The restaurant is...More
Booked this restaurant based on recommendations and got a table on the patio. When we arrived our table was not ready and we were given a seat to wait. While here we noticed a mouse clambering up the building wall. When seated we could smell...More
My husband and I had the absolute pleasure of dining at the Haro Street location. It was delicious and the service was outstanding. Ambiance was beautiful as it is nestled into a residential section of Haro Street just West of Denman. We had the Date...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17514315-Reviews-Robba_da_Matti_West_End-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rocky Mountain Flatbread Main Street,"Staff are friendly and portions are reasonable. Would return for the delicious flatbread pizzas, especially the fire roasted pizza!
Favourite restaurant to try new pastas! Their daily feature pastas are always amazing. The space is warm and inviting and the staff are friendly!
Ordered the potato and bacon flatbread pizza and it was great! We really enjoyed the meal and also got their chorizo hash. The ingredients were fresh.
Had the most horrible experience from their manager Manuel who was working the night we were dining in. Had 3 kids for their Sunday pizza making night and everything was great from the sit down till the very end. We had booked for 445pm to...More
I waited before writing as I was angry about the way we were treated. It was busy and we had to wait for our food no problem. As we began to eat a member of staff started looking at the raisable windows behind us. She...More
Delicious mushroom linguine and chocolate brownie. Great ambiance and service. Will be back very soon!
Great ambiance, delicious fresh food and great service. Mushroom linguine was fabulous. One of the best restaurants in Vancouver!!
Service and food was great. Our waitress Jane was so pleasant. I had the Rotini pasta special, Everyone enjoyed their meals. Great evening
Great food. Excellent service. Family friendly. Loud environment. Very accommodating to allergies. Would definitely come back.
It was a very busy and animated, sunday night, as it was make your own pizza night for kids. We met friends for a quiet night but... We shared a pizza and a salad. our friends had pasta and soup. We closed the place down...More
The only issue if you are driving is parking. Very vibrant area lots of restaurants. Their white sangria was very nice. The pizzas were really good. It was super busy and the drink service was little slow, but not out of range. Kid friendly.....5 year...More
Very pleasant and no glitches. We made an online reservation for three a couple of hours before 515pm seating in a Friday. The table was set and well located. Efficient and considerate food and drink orders. Three parsons shared the veggie appetizer and two 10...More
My friends and I came to this restaurant on a Saturday for their happy hour. The drinks were delicious and were a great price. I had a London fog and it was the best one I’ve ever had. The flatbread was also really good. The...More
Super, prompt service right from the greeting! Will be here again many times over. Keep it up - thank you!
Today was our second time visit and surprisingly they have a section/ table for the kids to make their own pizza… my two kids had so much fun and really enjoyed the pizza they made. The pasta we had today was the Chef’s Feature (...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3978379-Reviews-Rocky_Mountain_Flatbread_Main_Street-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rodney's Oyster House Gastown,"Rodney's in the gaslight district is a terrific spot for fresh shell and fish galore. Sitting is at the bar or tables the bar is casual with a fun vibe. The bar and bar tender are the center of action and diners,drinkers connect with one...More
This is for the Gastown location. Overall a bizarre and expensive experience ($150+ for two). We looked very forward to the visit based on looking at the Oyster menu online and reviews, but we were fooled. Waiter seemed stoned and plain goofy...not in a good...More
Ahoy, Thank you for the review. We are Vancouver's original Oyster House offering casual East Coast Hospitality. please email gastown@rohvan.com to discuss your experience further.
We saw this restaurant on TripAdvisor and decided to try it. We were pleased with the selection of raw oysters and beers. We also had their salad, which was fresh with alot of dressing. The New England clam chowder was delicious with lots of clams...More
Ahoy, Thank you for the review. We love to hear this! Hope to see you again soon.
This is one of the best places to have oysters! And our waitress Mina was just awesome. She knew about all the flavor nuances between the different varieties of oysters. This is a casual dining atmosphere. Get ready to eat and get your hands dirty.
Ahoy, We absolutely love hearing this. Thank you for the review.
We had a wonderful time here. The guys had beers and us girls has wine. Really nice pour on the wine. The appetizers were very tasty. Loved the calamari and the halibut bytes were very yummy.
best if you come with a group of friends or if on a date, let's not hope for a quiet evening, but do enjoy the tasty food, (can be a bit noisy if you prefer a quiet/romantic time) and the opportunity to look around at...More
Cool and quirky setting, casual atmosphere. Our table was ready within a few minutes. We had BC oysters to start and they were amazing. The kitchen was missing a cook, orders were backed-up and hot food took longer to come out. However, our server Fox,...More
We where greeting by Charlie and we started with a Shrimp cocktail and it was the BEST we had ever eaten. The shrimp where huge,fresh and crisp!! Oysters on the half shell where recommended by Mike and he recommended that we try the PEI of...More
My boyfriend and I went to Rodney’s last night for Valentine’s Day and we were so impressed with the quality of food but most importantly, the incredible service!!! Mike was our server and he went above and beyond to make sure we had a wonderful...More
The hostess was obviously wasted as well as our server. Who was extremely rude and forgetful. We ordered three drinks which never came. We brought a cake and asked for it to de delivered twice. He only brought it after we asked for the third...More
Okay, first time for me to Gastown and it was my birthday dinner. I searched long and hard until I decided on Rodney’s Oyster House for my date dinner. I am so impressed with the quality of food, the amazing presentation, and literally the BEST...More
I've been here twice since the pandemic for dinner. I'm not saying I came here because I loved it so much - I just happened to come twice. The first time I came in July, we ordered: Oysters: always, consistently good. I think Rodney's has...More
So many good things to eat. Was right near the place we stayed when we visited. Definitely recommended . They have some oyster specials and a variety as well. Kyushu is the best ones
On a wet, cold October day we sought lunch in Gastown. They had us a the sign saying four types of chowder. Went in and upstairs. Delicious chowder and bread and so cosy and maritime. Would go back in a heartbeat but it's a long...More
We didn't even notice how Rodney's Gastown location turned in one of our favorites in town. Before, we mainly went to Fanny Bay to feed the craving for oysters but decided to try Rodney's one day, and there's no coming back. Upon our first arrival,...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7045770-Reviews-Rodney_s_Oyster_House_Gastown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rodney's Oyster House Yaletown,"second time here for lunch..... oysters were wondeful as was the service.... will try and make it back one more time before we go home.... highly recomment!
I had terrible service. I came, sat at the bar with a friend, and sat there for 15 minutes before we were asked for a drink. After we got our drink, we weren't served for another 15. Arrogant we won't be back!
If you are looking for beer, booze, oysters on the half shell with plenty of vibrant, happy talkative people then this is the place for you. In terms of a full dinner meal there probably should look elsewhere. Fish and chips is below average, same...More
Had an amazing dinner at Rodney’s. It came as a recommendation from two separate locals. We had the oysters to start, they were amazing and came with an assortment of toppings. The bread was soft and fluffy. They didn’t have a variety of cocktails but...More
If you love oysters and seafood... you will never go anywhere else. Rodney's is the best both in atmosphere and food. I have been going there since 1999.
Amazing clam chowder, Lobster rolls and Canadian Sparkling wine. The team were relaxed and friendly. It clearly is a popular place as (due to bad weather) other restaurants were dead but this one was packed. Sometimes took a few attempts to get things but you...More
Absolutely fresh and delicious oysters. We had all the varieties available and loved every single one of them. The people behind the bar were really friendly and seemed genuinely interested in making conversation. Will 100% be back when in town!
We were looking forward to having dinner at Rodney's and we were not disappointed. We had the lobster poutine and fried oysters. Everything was full of flavour and cooked perfectly. Welcoming service and great food. Will definitely be back here again.
Rodney's is a busy restaurant with great ambience and service. We love oysters and had the blue point (lovely salty flavour) and a new one 'paradise cove' oysters that were sweet and lovely. The paradise cove oyster has a deep, fluted shell that is thin...More
Me and my gfs go here often. It’s such a fun vibe. Honestly good service. Actually GREAT service. Always greeted with a smile and the staff will go above and beyond for you. I’ve been here to many times to count. If your looking for...More
You can’t go wrong with fresh seafood! We started with a couple dozen fresh oysters. Super fresh and nothing wrong with getting them during their happy hour. Loved their selection of hot sauces along with the horseradish. Deep fried calamari with some freshly sliced jalapeños....More
We were originally going to go to the Gastown location as it was closer to our accommodations. We were sad to see it was closed Mon/Tues. Checked the hours of this location, and were so happy to see it was open. Quick Uber ride and...More
During our stay prior to our cruise we visited the yaletown location of Rodney's. I am a 30 year visitor of the original Toronto location and the king west location. This is a great spot and we thoroughly enjoyed our 2 visits. It can get...More
Our second trip to this location and they don’t fail to deliver. Always an experience coming here with the fresh seafood and of course the oysters, I could eat here everyday if I could
Went here for lunch. The service was great from the time we walked in the door. Good menu advice and both very happy with our meals. A wide variety to choose from. Not the cheapest place to eat oysters, but you get what you pay...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d819682-Reviews-Rodney_s_Oyster_House_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rogue Kitchen & Wetbar,"Great for a casual dinner. The chicken and shrimp bang bang was a spicy coconuty curry that hit the spot. Better than average fish and chips. We’d go back.
Had a lovely lunch meeting at the Rogue Kitchen for 6 of us yesterday , located inside the Waterfront Sky train station , very mordant high celling and tall lights very relaxing atmosphere , hostess so friendly seat us on the back section , very...More
Went to the restaurant and was absolutely astonished at the service we received, we had not booked a table but the waiter did everything she could to accommodate us, she even brought us upstairs when there was a free table, as someone who works in...More
Well-organised bar that we went in three lunchtimes during our stay here. Their beer range is excellent and of very good quality. Chicken tenders very tasty. Service we found was attentive. Well-recommended !
This is a nice place with a good food menu. The beer menu is really good, with lots of choices. Service wasn’t the best. My waiter finished his shift (without telling me) so I sat for a long time waiting for the bill. I finally...More
The ordering process was a joke. Had to order a couple of times because they were out of menu items and draft beers that the waitress did not know about. She had to keep coming back to our table to let us know that they...More
This restaurant attached to the Waterfront station is well worth the visit. About halfway between Canada Place and Gastown, we chose to sit outside adjacent to the Main Street. Good service, despite it being busy and a varied menu. My wife had lettuce wrap and...More
Located in Waterfront Station in Vancouver, The Rogue Kitchen & Wetbar has a lot going in its favor - a very good menu selection with a liberal Happy Hour which includes not only selected drinks but also selected menu items, a great location at the...More
Short 5 min walk from Delta Marriott. Very funky interior. Despite it was a busy Friday night we got seated quickly. Drink orders taken and came quickly. Had a very nice red sangria. Had the taco /soup/salad meal with beef brisket taco..very flavourful and filling....More
We were visiting Vancouver and went to the Vancouver lookout. Rogue is just across the street. Great decor, food, drink and service. Thanks to Shay for the 5 ⭐️ ⭐️⭐️⭐️⭐️ service. We highly recommend this restaurant!
I came into Vancouver to see a play and read about Rogue in the waterfront station. It's close by so thought I'd check out happy hour. I have died and gone to heaven! I had 3 of the ahi tuna cups and easily could have...More
Enjoyed the beer selection and the black ended chicken sandwich was really good it incorporated mango which was Musial, but it worked. the brisket risotto balls were decent but could have used a little more meat. Cool decor with wine barrels and chandeliers
Stumbled across this place in the rain, just killing time before leaving for the airport. How I wish we’d found it earlier in our Vancouver stop off!! In 3 weeks of travelling east to west across Canada, it was one of the best places we...More
We stumbled onto this place walking by on a rainy day. The service, food, and atmosphere was fabulous. We were very impressed and highly recommend. The servers in the bar area were amazing. Even on a busy Thursday at lunch time, we didn’t have to...More
Steamworks had quite the wait so while we were walking through the station we saw this place and the menu looked interesting. The whole experience was excellent, the drinks were fantastic the food was amazing.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1819782-Reviews-Rogue_Kitchen_Wetbar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Rogue Kitchen & Wetbar - Broadway,"The restaurant has the best small plates or appetizers. The prices are so reasonable too. Examples is the Nice Little Salad, it’s the perfect size with a tasty lime dressing and $7. Also the chicken tenders are huge pieces of white meat in a crunchy...More
What a lovely surprise this spot was. We picked it as we were in town for some appointments and it is near the Holiday Inn and the appointments. We were fortunate to have Minah as our server. What a wonderful personality and very keen to...More
We had Sunday lunch with a family group of six. We were given a large double table which was rapidly set up and our waiter was with us quickly to take orders. Food arrived quickly and was hot and very good (we had a variety...More
I was in Vancouver for a medical procedure. However, my surgery was delayed a day so the night of that reschedule I knew I had to eat something having fasted since the previous evening. I had a craving for steak and noted that this restaurant...More
Being a vegetarian it's usually the same offerings at most places, but here they had extensive options! My meat eating husband was happy, my non red meat eating son was thrilled with the fish tacos and I had the tofu lettuce wraps with the garlic...More
We had a great evening. The food was excellent. Burgers, jambalaya, onion rings were all good. The waitress was newer but was exceptional.
Granted we were a party of 12, seated at 2 tables but the restaurant was empty so it should have been manageable. We had been seated for almost 20 minutes before a server appeared to take our drinks orders. Then the server argued with the...More
Food was mediocre. Burgers were soggy. chicken batter was too thick for a burger. The server warned us about the ice coffee, yet there was no alternative. Supposedly management is aware of numerous complaints about the coffee; yet still doesn't take it off the menu....More
Super friendly staff, good quality food and a cozy atmosphere. They make a perfect place for a dinner at a rainy night!
We ate the fish and chips, brussel sprouts and the truffle fries. Very filling. The one piece of fish was perfectly fried and was quite large. The brussel sprouts had lots of bacon pieces, which makes everything perfect. The truffle fries were quite tasty. Fast...More
Take out prompt and tasty - nacos and chicken tenders. Plus two comp drink coupons to be used when Rogue opens up again closer to old normal. Thanks, Rogue staff!
A good western style restaurant. I tried calamari, nice little salad, steak, and white chocolate cheesecake which were so yummy. The menu is reasonably priced. The decoration was good and the staff were so helpful and friendly. The service was fast, too.
Tired of always going to the same restaurant chains you go to in any city. I think Rogue kitchen and Wet-bar was a great alternative with great specials. The best features of this place was the great seating accommodation for large groups. There's a row...More
PLace for business people and single folks. Not a place for a quiet dinner. The noise was huge there. Good service, quality food but way too noisy!!!
Stayed nearby for 4 nights and ate here 3 times. Tacos and Bao buns are really tasty. Good beer selection too",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7256256-Reviews-Rogue_Kitchen_Wetbar_Broadway-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Roland's,"Best road trip lunch between Vancouver and Whistler IMO. Sure beats Squamish fast food and Village lineups. The food is beautifully prepared, clean and tasty and the service is outstanding. Reasonable prices, overall quality WAY past usual pub fare. Highly recommended.
dependable quality pub food, cold beer and fun atmosphere. Big Rich and Gail behind the bar keep things going.
Well cooked food, good sized portions, great value. What you probably don't know is that they share a kitchen with the The Red door. A very good restaurant next door and their food is one of the better kept secrets in Whistler. It's a pub,...More
Three of us walked over to Roland's for dinner tonight and are glad we did. My husband had the half rack, friend had the beef dip and I enjoyed an excellent veggie burger. All of this was topped off with the daily special pitcher of...More
Visited Roland's for my first time and was pleasantly surprised ! It's a pub - sports bar but the food (we had the fish and chips and fish tacos) and service was excellent!
We've been coming here for over 20 years - in one form or another. Friday night for fish and chips wouldn't be the same if it wasn't at Roland's! Last night was no different. Don't fuss about your table position, if you can see a...More
Prompt service, good food, reasonable prices. Went for dinner with family. Can be busy on hockey nights
This is a locals favorite off the main drag with lots of good food and large selection of beer & wine plus cocktails!
We were staying next door at the Nita Lodge, and decided to check out Roland's. Nice spot -- local crowd -- sports bar / lots of tvs. Pleasant servers and good pub food.
This is next door to the Nita Lodge Hotel and if you want to people watch then it is a good venue. Organised chaos with reasonably priced drinks, quality food and excellent friendly and helpful service.
A mixture of local's bar, skier's hangout and a 'posher' restaurant make this the best informal dining choice in creekside. We drank and ate here a couple of times and really enjoyed ourselves. The service comes with rich banter, the food was all good, so...More
Located next door to Nita Lake Lodge at Whistler's Creekside, Roland's has been a local watering hole for eons. Good selection of local and not so local beers.
This is a friendly atmosphere with some of the best pub food I have had. Their fish and chips, using thick salmon steaks and hand batter was amazing. Batter wasnt overly thick and the salmon was very moist inside. We also had their Full rack...More
Their burgers are good and their home made BBQ chips were some of the best I've ever had. Nothing crazy on the menu that reinvents the wheel, which is fine. Good food and (for Whistler) a good price.
If you're visiting Whistler and want to get away from the crowds to have good pub food go to Roland's. Good food, lots of tvs to watch sports and a chill environment. What else could you ask for?",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154948-d1104313-Reviews-Roland_s-Whistler_British_Columbia.html
Romer's,"We've been regulars since they opened, but our last visit was disappointing. Service was very slow although the server was friendly enough; her colleague seemed genuinely concerned for us. The food was well below usual, especially the burger buns were nowhere near the usual excellent...More
First time here. Amazing food, great service and beautiful view and patio. Highly recommend. Hidden gem for sure! Salmon Burger and Guiness burgers were spectacular!
This was a very good restaurant until this year. The food quality was poor. The burgers have shrunk down in size by a lot and were cold. There used to be a heaping pile of fries, and now there is only a small cup. The...More
We recently had our business holiday lunch at Romers River District and we are absolutely pleased with the service from beginning to end! Thank you Christa – booking the venue & menu with you seemed effortless. You were on top of everything and was quick...More
We’ve been coming here since they opened. I don’t know what the heck has happened but today was the pinnacle of bad. Ordered the eggs bennie/Caesar combo. It was obvious everything but the home fries was pre made and had been sitting around waiting for...More
We ordered takeout and sat on their picnic tables outside. The bartender was kind enough to bring the lunches out to is. My wife and I both had salad bowls. My wife the Bang Bang Chicken and I had the Salmon bowl Both were yummy,...More
Great burgers, fantastic location right on the river. But they couldn't get it right. My niece ordered a sangria, she got a glass of wine. My wife ordered a plain burger with mozzarella cheese, sides of mustard, mayonnaise and avocado slices. She got a burger,...More
Excellent restaurant, unfortunately it was my first time, no matter is a very well known spot. Fantastic experience, scenery is gorgeous, the patio is perfect and culinary even better . Service was great . Have to go back soon !!!
We came here after an event for a late dinner, and it was a really great experience. Our server was attentive, and the food was really good. We were very well taken care of. One of our party is a vegetarian, and he had lots...More
The atmosphere, serving staff, selection of food items and location are noteworthy. However, my Huli Huli Hawaiian Chicken Salad was rather disappointing. It relied too heavily on shredded cabbage rather than lettuce. The chicken was cut into teeny little pieces & the tastier items like...More
We had a great lunch at Romer's recently. We enjoyed the outdoor seating, and had great service from C.C.
stopped by Romers on a rainy Thursday for lunch with a friend. We were set to have a salad and then saw a chicken sandwich come out of the kitchen and chose to split that with a brussel sprout appy, it was DELICIOUS! Would recommend...More
Went to the River District location a couple of weeks ago because we live close by. It’s a shame really because each time we go the service sucks and the food is just alright to bad. But the lack of good customer service bothers me...More
Four of us went for a late lunch, which we had reserved space for. When we arrived, we asked for patio service as it is outdoors (heaters) as we are seniors very sensitive to covid threats. They immediately switched us to the outdoor patio and...More
Great patio and river view. Staff attentive. Had the ""new"" Nashville Hot chicken burger. Not hot or spicy as advertised, spice barely registered. Was not a chicken burger - more like two chicken mcnuggets dipped in buttermilk a few times to make the two pieces...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2389886-Reviews-Romer_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Romers Burger Bar,"Gone to crap. Burger no longer includes fries! Who does that?? $16 for an overcooked burger. Friend ate half couldn't stomach it server didn't care to ask why? More like a bar scene now!
Normally super reliable for a great burger, the quality on our last visit was disappointing . Their normally excellent buns have been replaced by mediocre versions and overall the burger was not up to par. Service very slow. (We’ve been regulars since they opened)
Ellena was great person and I would like to thank Denise for the perfectly done steak. I will refer my friends all the staff were friendly and the bartender was great.
You can tell they reuse the oil many times because the strong old oil taste lingered in your mouth and I have to drink lots of water to kind of wash it out. The batter is so soggy and thick and there’s little fish in...More
On my last evening in Vancouver, my travelling companion suggested we visit again after being away for the past year. We decided to try happy hour without reservations. We were seated at a table of 4 in the centre with the possibility of my friend...More
My boyfriend and I had tickets to a concert we were really looking forward to going to. We live outside of the city and don't go into Vancouver but this was meant to be a special night for us to enjoy our first concert together...More
Distracted service & burnt food? What’s not to love. Once our server finally arrived to take our order he stopped 1/2 thru to pull out his phone - read a message and reply. Really? Burger and crispy fish burger arrived burnt. Not sort of maybe...More
Well, I been there twice and I'll never go back to this place. First the service very distracted. I asked for a hot sauce and they didn't bring absolute nothing. Second I found some hair in my burger, disgusting!! I waited for more than 20...More
Romers restaurant in the River District has a fabulous location but I would never recommend this restaurant Our walking group used to stop here for lunch but each time there would be a problem with one of our orders so we no longer go there...More
Honestly such good service and the food is amazing, you should definitely check this place out!! The chefs are amazing and really great at what they do, Alyssa who works there is fantastic and would highly reccomend.
My son rates his burger a 5 and I’d rate my salad bowl a 3ish so we’ll end up at a four. I had a bite of the burger, was pretty darn good. And they had lots of options for toppings. Our service was good...More
Stumbled upon this place while hungry and in the area, didn’t expect the promises of greatest burger in Vancouver but damn was I happily wrong. If you think you like your burger cooked a certain way you’re wrong, this burger is cooked to perfection, there...More
Right on! Great presentation Nice ambience with a selection of craft beers to go with that burger or non burger!...They have happy which looked good but forgot cuz I was so hungry! A good variety of tastey burgers on the menu (of course) and fries...More
We ate at Romer's one lunchtime as my husband had seen great reviews of the burgers. The food was really good, the service was quick and friendly but I found it weird they didn't take a drinks order and at the end of the meal...More
Three friends and I were having a good dinner at Romers until we got our bill. My friend was under the impression that the only wine on special was the house wine as the menu is very misleading. The server admitted that this had been...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1929991-Reviews-Romers_Burger_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Roundel Cafe,"It's priced on the high side with breakfasts starting @ $15, but what's weird is the extra $1.50 for toast on several meals. Food was good, but not up to paying $17-19 a brekkie. If you're going for 2 people, and with ordering coffee, anticipate...More
Wow! Could not be more excited to go back to a place. Homemade everything or bought in the neighborhood. One of those menus where you just want to try everything. I had the chillequilles (sic?) and loved every bite. Dina, the owner, took care of...More
This restaurant, established in the 1960’s is a great find. They are only open for breakfast and lunch and consequently, are very good at what they do. The food is delicious, the service is great and the prices affordable.
This is the best Eggs Benedict in East Van! The atmosphere is very cosy and warm, everyone is always friendly. Truly a neighbourhood diner.
Perfect start in the day!! Staff so nice and food outstanding. Came here two days in a row because we liked it soo much.
What a cute restaurant! But what was even better, the food and service! The waitstaff were so accommodating to my peanut allergy and reassured that they would do everything possible to prepare the food safely! I had the eggs Benedict, they could not guarantee the...More
Funky diner. The place was PACKED. I had the club sandwich, and I added cheddar cheese to it. It was yummy. The potatoes were a bit 'meh', but that's what ketchup is for. :) The servers and manager seemed really nice.
Really enjoyed our breakfast here. Traditional eggs with a unique twist, everything tasted beautiful and the staff were really nice, efficient and friendly. Definitely recommend.
Great food at reasonable prices. Make their own ketchup and jams. Sunday brunch time really busy. Usually take out of town guest here.
The place was full for Sunday brunch. The Cesar’s are one of the best, the salad very good, the eggs cooked to perfection, but the potatoes were some of the worse I’ve had. Service is good and slow. The “special” was bland.
Went to this place a couple of times while staying nearby. Every time the food and service were great. Try to home made hot sauce and the jam!
I was kind of disappointed overall with this place. With the strong reviews, I expected better quality and service but ended up with lukewarm potatoes and a Farmer's sausage that was half way between a hot dog and a Polish sausage. That said, coffee was...More
Been enjoying breakfasts here regularly with a friend for few months now so brought my love the other day. Must admit I love the vibe as well as all the homemade sauces and jam that comes with my breakfast order. Not crazy about their potatoes...More
First time visited this place and found it's so cool with a lot of customers in and out ! I think it's a neighbourhood gem with history ! The coffee & foods are great, our server Sergio is very nice with funny outfit, and all...More
If you love a burger with every topping imaginable that literally explodes upon contact due to the sheer volume of ingredients, quit reading now! If, however, you appreciate a simple well-priced burger that lets a few ingredients become a hand-held taste sensation like Burger Biters...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d972806-Reviews-Roundel_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Roundtable Pizza,"The delivery was fast and the driver was very “happy”. His attitude was great. Pizza was good.. just not great
We ordered takeaway pizza and got violently ill after eating one slice each. The pizza was also greasier than average. I would not recommend this place.
We heard of their speciality pizza and headed to the Round Table Pizza. We ordered Indian Masala Pizza. It comes with ginger, garlic, coriander. It was sooo delicious and mouth watering that we plan to visit again. Must try once.
We had a personal pan pizza and salad bar good prices fast service. Clean easily accessible. If you have kids there are arcade games, its very kid friendly. We are at Roundtable last year and it was just as good this year.
My experience is that 3rd party delivery service typically arrives at your home with ice cold pizza. We had a hankering for a pizza so we drove down to Roundtable in Blundell Centre for a large meat lovers pizza. Tonight's pizza was one of the...More
Tried this place based on reviews and it did not disappoint! Great tasting pizza and rave reviews from my picky co-workers!
Now this is not really a dine in sort of spot but it doesn't matter you take the pizza home and gorge yourself on it. My itinerary when I hit Vancouver is get out of the airport, rent a car order, a Roundtable Pizza and...More
What a deal, a large meat lovers pizza for just $18.00. There is generally more than ample off street parking after 6:00 PM.
This is one of the few pizza places that is for one cheaper than Pizza hut and Panago but actually as good or maybe even better. Try it out you wont regret it. We always get take out and spend time in a park somewhere...More
I always order there pizza and it’s always very good so I decided to try there pasta but the lasagna was not as good as the pizza it was very salty
I ordered for pickup. Parking chaotic with cars double parked and parking on the curb. It doesn't make for an easy pickup experience. As i was paying for the pizza the guy disappeared. I took the receipt myself and asked someone else for the pizza....More
Really good pizza in Richmond. I had the Tropical Hawaiian and it was one of the best Hawaiian styles I have had (bacon, ham, tropical sauce, etc.). Staff were friendly and fast. Will definitely return if we are ever back in Richmond.
This Pizza take-out place has been here for years and years. Their Pizza's have been consistently good all this time.. The prices are very reasonable. Not the best Pizzas ever, but great value.
This was the best pizza I have had in years. Ordered it to our hotel room in Richmond as we have done with other pizza places there and bar none this was wicked pizza at a great price. We will be ordering again on our...More
I was really dismayed at the attitude of the employees of this pizza restaurant. I needed to order a gluten free pizza along with a regular pizza. It seemed to be a real problem for the employees and it was more expensive than I'm used...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4877859-Reviews-Roundtable_Pizza-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Roxy Burger,"Great food. Bison burger and a.erican burger both were moist and cooked perfectly. Lots of hot French fries too.
Look no further than the Roxy Burger for an delicious burger and great service! Amanda was an excellent server who knew the menu in detail and made excellent recommendations. I enjoyed the California Burger with delicious Smokey bacon, cheese, & guacamole. They have two patios...More
I love Roxy Burger. The food, the staff, the ambiance. Get the special, it will be good I promise. And the music that Amanda has on her phone is awesome.
Still loving Roxy Burger. What a place. Such great staff who get to relax and not put on a show. We listen to the music off the staff's phone - 70s, 80s, all the best. The food is awesome and the drinks are well made...More
We dropped in here, chosen as near to hotel, after a long flight and just needed some comfort food before crashing. The bar is a typical lively sports bar showing all the baseball games . There is a great choice of local beers, we loved...More
Just top notch. Great food, great service, great people, and AWESOME music (ok, I'm old and I appreciate music from the 60s-90s). I will be back this week for sure!
I ate here 3 times while in town. The burger was great, but the shepherds pie was REALLY good (huge portion, too). I'll be back, for sure!
Right next to the Vogue... Pub food at it's best, Great seating! !Booths, Bar or on the small patio.
You cannot go wrong with Roxy Burger. The food is amazing, prices are good, portions are huge and the staff is awesome!!
This restaurant serves the best burger for a great price. We have never been disappointed no matter what we order. Fast service with a smile.
Had dinner, and a few drinks before a show at the Commodore. $5 wines on Wednesday turned out to be a great deal. Sports bar kinda set up. Plenty of seats, and a great pace to the service. Food was excellent. We will be back...More
Here I ate the best hamburger I’ve ever had in my entire life. Delicious Swiss cheese and high quality meat. I will definitely go there again
Best burger i’ve had in a long time !! Very happy we stopped in and picked this place to eat . Our server however didn’t come over to see us at all she sat in a booth with her friends as i was sitting and...More
Excellent experience in the Roxy Burger. Very good burgers, good choice of beer - extremely friendly staff and very fast service. They have a special every day - on WED it was the wings: 6 monster wings for 4 CAD - delicious. We all loved...More
Stopped in for a saturday drink. They dont have happy hour. Instead they have daily drink specials. Friday and Saturday had dbl long island ice teas for $7.50. We werent hungry but saw the burgers coming out. They looked awesome. We would definitely order food...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3956953-Reviews-Roxy_Burger-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Royal Dinette,"A friend and I decided to try the family-style tasting menu at Royal Dinette, and we were impressed with the quality and quantity of food for the money. For about $50 USD, we got eight dishes, most of which were among the higher priced on...More
Went on a Saturday night at 6:30 pm.. there was only one other occupied table with two people. That should have been a great hint to stay away. I ordered a Caesar and what came was a small skinny glass with for ice cubes that...More
We recently had dinner had dinner at this restaurant and enjoyed the experience. The service was friendly and attentive, and we liked the ambiance and décor. We ordered a few appetizers to start. The nori butter that came with the bread was fantastic: a must...More
We came here twice for dinner during our trip to Vancouver and enjoyed delicious food on both occasions. Think warm, comforting food like gnocchi, elk tartare and rabbit tagliatelle. Serving staff very pleasant with good recommendations of craft beers. Perfect place for dinner as far...More
We came here for drinks. Their cocktails are amazing and the service was great and friendly. Such a cool place. Must visit when in Vancouver!
In downtown Vancouver, near luxury hotels and just a few steps away from the barber's you can find this easy going, comfy traditional dinette. Good food, excellent wine and beers. Friendly staff too.
Quite a treat. This was our first time to Vancouver and we stayed in a hotel downtown. It seemed everything was either a chain or attached to a hotel. The Royal Dinette became an oasis we went to twice for dinner and had a great...More
We had reservations at Royal Dinette on a weeknight. The staff was very friendly. The food was delicious and fast. We started with the Deviled eggs which were moist & had a spicy chip as garnish. As a group we had the gnocchi, flat-iron steak...More
This dinner did not disappoint.You don’t need a swanky restaurant to get great tasting food and Royal Dinette showed us that.Loved the duck with gooseberry.OK it’s not cheap but worth it.
Great evening. Sat at the bar overlooking the kitchen by choice. Very clean very organized kitchen. Relaxed, attentive the plating was perfect detail, detail, detail. My partner had the special a fresh pasta we watched being made then prepared, coming from a restaurant family I...More
Great concept, terrible execution. Visiting from out of town and wanted to see what the hype was about. I was shocked and disappointed with the quality of food served, especially for the price. Our table of 4 were all disappointed. Cold steak, rock hard crackers,...More
I went with my coworkers for lunch. Prices was very high for lunch! So we decide lets have sandwich..... For $21/ sandwiches you get a thick sandwich bread with nothing on the side!! and the quality is not there!!
This place pleases. 50's farmhouse decor, smiling waiters, open kitchen, jars of home canned fruit on shelves and food that tastes homemade. My son raved over his pasta dish, my daughter in law had a giant sourdough sandwich, I had the cheese plate. Dinner for...More
Trying to find a good business lunch spot is a challenge when you don’t have much time. Thought we’d try this place. Greeted with “do you have a reservation”? No, but as you’re empty perhaps you can squeeze us in. We were seated and ordered....More
I chose this place for my hubby’s birthday because of the farm to table claim and the great reviews. It was an evening of disappointments. We arrived at 5:00 on a Wednesday and were immediately shown the worst table in the house! As there was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8531119-Reviews-Royal_Dinette-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ryuu Japanese Kitchen,"The reception ask for vaccination card which is fine but I told her I gonna step aside so the group of people can go in but she hold me and said we need to see your card first. I keep searching for my card till...More
This was my second time at this location, we went to Ryuu for the happy hour apps, but unfortunately, they no longer have happy hour. Regardless we ordered the spring roll and the pan-fried dumplings. Both items ordered were good, the service was good. Convenient...More
The quality of the food was acceptable. The prices were reasonable, too. The staff are so friendly and helped us with our order, while it was not currently on their menu.
Went for lunch sushi bento box. The sushi was fresh, well presented and delicious. Miso soup was also included and excellent. Salmon, Toro nigiri and spicy tuna roll all fantastic. Services was efficient, courteous and quick. Room was fairly small but had lots of light...More
We enjoyed our time together. The sushi we each selected was delicate and delicious. Service was prompt and attentive without being hovering. We had to find an ATM because their card reader was down, but otherwise, this was the perfect stop.
Went there a few times, last time we were in a large group. Great location, and really good menu options. Tried many things and everything was delicious. Japanese-owned unlike the majority which are Korean-owned. Highly recommended
We had a most delicious dinner here. We ordered a beef noodle soup and a single bento box. We were delighted to find that the bento box came with a delicious miso soup and very good pickled rice noodles with seaweed. The bento box was...More
Rynn Japanese Restaurant is located on Seymour St. Nearby Robson St. The location is easy to find, but it’s not easy to park. We haven’t been tried the new restaurant for a long time since the beginning of this year. After work, my fiance and...More
I ordered this through door dash. Delivery came quick! Ordered the yam tempura and beef teriyaki The yam tempura was hot and mostly crispy (lower pieces has some soft spots) Super delicious! The beef teriyaki, was far from what I expected (not even sure it...More
My family of 6 was walking around Vancouver looking for somewhere to grab a dinner and we happened to come across Ryuu. I checked out the menu and spoke to a waitress and knew right away that this was legit Japanese food. We grabbed a...More
Decided to visit this restaurant as it was close to our hotel and so glad we did. Excellent service and really yummy food. Toilets were clean and overall experience was excellent. Great menu choices although no Ramen!
We were looking for some sushi and other Japanese dishes, and this appeared quite nice by the reviews and an easy walk from out hotel just up on Seymour street. Small restaurant with a sushi bar, tales for 2 to 6 and a nice menu....More
Had a wonderful dinner on a cold night. The cucumber avocado tomato salad was a fantastic start to the meal. The tofu with mushroom sauce was exquisite and the chirachi bowl finished the meal watch a bang. The food was all fresh tasty and served...More
We did notice the chefs have changed though so wondering if it’s new management- they were all Japanese and now they’re Chinese. Regardless food was still very good and very reasonably priced for a casual night out. The chefs sushi & sashimi trays are very...More
I stopped by this place for lunch the other day. The place was packed...a good sign in my books. I was seated at the sushi bar. There are endless lunch specials to choose from. I opted for the sashimi set lunch. The sashimi was very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8665390-Reviews-Ryuu_Japanese_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
SURA Korean Cuisine,"Really enjoyed the food, service was good. Authentic Korean food but a smaller menu than normal. I would recommend this place.
Was looking forward to going back to Sura on my trip to Vancouver. My partner is Korean and she rates Sura as one of her favorite Korean restaurants ever. As usual we were not disappointed. Great atmosphere, super friendly staff and amazing food. If you...More
Wow! We happened across this place while wandering. We ""thought"" we were hungry, so the three of us ordered the Set Lunch. It was SO MUCH FOOD! Everything was absolutely delicious. It was a sampling of all sorts of different dishes. Some things were quite...More
The food are spicy but delicious. The selections are simple to understand. The server Hyundai is very friendly. And smiley and have patience to explain the menu. Parking might be a challenge otherwise reserve time to find a spot nearby.
Fried dumplings Kobe beef and so much more So tasty Very busy but quick turn around worth the wait Fun food to share and be social
Looking forward for a spicy meal in the cold weather, Dumplings were okay. the spicy pork sliced I was looking forward was too sourish and wasnt enjoyable, Beef soup too lacked flavors. Busy place quick service but mediocre food.
The restaurant has a nice ambience. Nice to hang out with family, friends, or for a date night. We all opted for either the dolsot Bibimbap or the gulgogi Bibimbap on a cold night. We were all wanting the crispy rice at the bottom. However...More
It is one of the best lunch restaurant downtown , they do not take reservation , so first come first serve , best avoid any rush hours dinning ,line can be long , had a amazing lunch with my business client on Friday , it...More
Really delicious Korean food - we had the small bossam and bulgogi, which proved to be a very generous amount for two people. Friendly staff and fast service, but didn't feel rushed. A great dining experience.
Always love eating here when we visit Vancouver. Outstanding Korean dishes and service is fast and friendly.
This restaurant is very popular, but does not accept reservations. I did not have to wait too long to get a table and I ordered the bulgogi. The ""small"" portion serves one person, but was huge! It was delicious and there was so much food...More
We stumbled into Sura Korean Cuisine for a Saturday lunch not knowing anything about the restaurant. A NYC dining experience at JUA turned us on to Korean food, but we had no idea how to order. Fortunately, the 25 Canadian dollar set lunch took ordering...More
I wanted to try Korean steamed dumplings but I prefer the Chinese version better. We also had our usual favourites the dolsot bibim bap and japchae. The service is always prompt and efficient. Tables are well spaced and a line up on Christmas day opening...More
Full order of Bulgogi was massive and best ever had. Shared with wife and could barely finish. Came with two cups rice potato salad superb kimchi and seaweed. Beef so tender and delish
We had a great time eating up all the main dishes as well as the small side dishes that came along. Besides the regular table seating, the lower table seating was quite comfortable and fun too. Both their food and service were quite satisfying. Will...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d972073-Reviews-SURA_Korean_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Saffron Indian Cuisine,"Delicious Indian cusine. Just the ticket after a long day out by the Fraser River. Good atmosphere and inviting warmth.
I came for lunch on a Wed and the restaurant was almost all full! I had the lamb curry lunch special that is served with basmati rice and naan, medium heat. It was so delicious and flavour balanced. It tasted quite close to home cooking...More
Saffron I wasn’t a big fan of Indian cuisine until a couple of friends recommended this place. I had the mild butter chicken with naan. The others ordered different dishes - saffron Thali, chilli beef, tandoori chicken, vegetarian Thali, & chicken biryani. The best valued...More
I have frequented Saffron for years. Always fantastic food/atmosphere. Great menu. Try the mango lassi
Good Indian restaurants are hard to find. Our staples butter chicken was sweet and the Spinnach cheese dish was loaded with cream and was like a puree. Not happy
I love Indian Food. Couldn't wait to get the takeout home and have a decent Indian dinner. I was told that Saffron Indian Cuisine was the best in Burnaby! Unfortunately, after a few bits of chicken tikka masala, I had to give up. The chicken...More
Best quality of Indian Cuisine in the mainland. In their meal you can taste the time and passion they dedicate to cook each dish. Expect professional friendly services. I can't wait to go back.
The food is always great, the service is friendly and is nice, clean, great family restaurant. I been there many times and is always been great, I have tried almost every dish. I suggest the Sunday menu for anyone wanting to try it out.
Me and my husband have been coming here for the past three years. My favourite is the spicy tandoori chicken, while my husband always loves his creamy butter chicken!
We wanted a sampling so went with their thali platter.  My friend tried the vegetarian one and I did the one with various meats.  It was very good and very filling.  We also tried their vegetable samosa which came out piping hot and was very...More
We ordered take-out through Skip the Dishes, The butter chicken tastes like tomato soup. Apparently this restaurant has never heard of spices. The palak is like pureed slop. I ordered CHICKEN palak and they sent tofu. I honestly don't know how they have any good...More
We arrived early to get a seat for lunch at this very popular restaurant. Only one of our party had been here before and two had never tried East Indian cuisine. There was a wonderful buffet ( I tried at least 6 different hot dishes)...More
I nearly died from overeating it was at an S&M level of pain and pleasure . The naan is even 10 star. I only get to eat hear every once in a blue moon. Do not miss out on one of the best places in...More
Having tried another Indian buffet place several times in Vancouver it was nice to find one that was good closer to home. We had been there a few times over the years but this was the 1st time since they renovated. In my line of...More
We had not been to Saffron for over year so we were pleasantly surprised by the updates to the restaurant - including old family pictures from the owners past. The food quality is still good and worth the recommendation. One of the dishes we tried...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d878052-Reviews-Saffron_Indian_Cuisine-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Saku,"Saku is definitely something special. I visit here whenever I'm in Vancouver. The tonkatsu is always fried perfectly and very fresh. The sesame salad dressing and tonjiru are incredible. I love how the food is always presented beautifully with careful attention to detail. They're very...More
Very popular place, always a queue (and not possible to book). We finally took the plunge and hung around for a table (c40 mins). Was a very unique and distinct experience for us. Never done anything like it in the UK (or in our time...More
Mmmh it’s crazy. My cheese pork was incredible. I’ve spend a really good time with my little family. Thank you saku team,
We fell in love with this restaurant on our first night in Vanvouver, so much so that we had to return on our last night. Portions are large, everything is very flavorful. Wonderful food, great staff, I wish I could go regularly!
The tonkatsu tasted delicious. The watermelon soda is from other world! The service is fast and the staff is always friendly.
We ordered the ebi,hire, and rosu katsu along with some extra cheese menchi and vegetable katsu! I also ordered some curry as well and it just completed the dishes for me. The breading is so light and flaky too and the meat was so juicy....More
I had a awesome lunch with my old friend at the Saku on Robson to day , restaurant is not very big , they do not take reservation , first come first server , decor very cozy modern and airy , plexiglass around all tablets...More
Tonkatsu tastes just like the ones I tried in Tokyo. Delicious salad and miso as well. Expect a line up as it's very popular.
This place is specialized in pork chop set meals while chicken, seafood, sandwiches, noodles, etc are also offered in the menu. When a set meal is ordered, rice, house special miso soup, and cabbage salad are free to refill. Their price range is reasonable. Service...More
Saku always had a line up before COVID, but not so much now I think. Their tonkatsu is very solid, although I had better in Tokyo. Pork was tender, but not as juicy as I hoped. I also ordered the cheese and ham croquette, which...More
loved the food here! I came here with friends a few days ago for lunch and the food was amazing (a little greasy so just prepare yourself for that) and the service was unmatched, our server was so friendly and came to check on us...More
Finally, an authentic Japanese tonkatsu restaurant in Vancouver that offers simple but beautifully executed delicately fried pork, chicken and vegetables. Do go early as this place is beyond popular.
I hesitated to write the review about this restaurant because Saku was one of my and my family's favourite places for lunch. My experience at Saky on 6th of Jan 2020 was not very pleasant. It was a rainy day and there was only one...More
One of my favourite items on a Japanese food menu is any kind of katsu, breaded and deep fried protein. Tonkatsu, or deep fried pork cutlet is the most common type of katsu. It can be pretty hit and miss as the meat can be...More
Don't be discouraged when you see the long line, it means that the food is great! We waited in line (for a party of two) for lunch on a weekend. While the line looked long, we only waited for about 15-minutes. When your table is...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14979109-Reviews-Saku-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salade De Fruits Cafe,"I found this place quite disappointing. The service was sterling, as others have noted, and I really enjoyed the mussels, as well as the gateau bisque dessert. But the duck was tough and quite expensive. More, the noise level was so painful I couldn't wait...More
This cosy little bistro never fails us... Just fabulous French food and service in a casual and fun setting. Reservations are made the old fashioned way, on the phone and I love that. The proprietor and staff are super friendly and the menu is extensive....More
We went with our out of town friends to our favorite local neighborhood French restaurant in South Granville. The service is friendly, attentive and very helpful by the team. My wife had the NY steak w/ peppercorn sauce and frites. It was prepared to perfection...More
Meeting a friend for dinner from Levis , it is a very small authentic French Bistro , down by the west of Granville St , very cozy atmosphere with patio seating , dinner is from 5 pm to 8 pm , may be a week...More
Three of us had a delightful lunch. Big menu with lots of delicious options. Small space. Outdoor patio as well. Friendly and attentive service. Superb quality at a reasonable price. Fish and lamb dishes were outstanding.
Four meals, all excellent. The ribeye was cooked to perfection, just the right amount of seasoning. Vegetables were delicious and pomme frites tasty addition. Moule et frites and tenderloin all exceeded expectations.
A great meal with friends. From the warm complimentary bread, to the fish trio cooked to perfection, a wonderful meal. The dining space is a tad tight and a bit loud, but the food more than makes up for the tight quarters. I always enjoy...More
Upon entering this restaurant we were greeted with a very warm welcoming and we knew just looking at the menu that we made the correct choice for this special celebration..as we looked around at the other tables we felt a delightful feeling as we ordered...More
We went with friends and sat on the heated patio for brunch. On a unusual sunny day in Vancouver. Salades doesn't disappoint. Our friends had the benny wellington and croissant benny with crab and spinach as did my wife. I had the vegetarian French Onion...More
We had not been to one of our favorite restaurants in Vancouver since winter. We sat on the patio. My wife had the shrimp salad which was just tasty and delicious. I had the wild spring salmon with rice and salad. Nice portion, tasty, delicious...More
This has always been a favourite restaurant for us. Excellent food, great atmosphere, fun friendly service, & good value. It has been our go to place to impress visitors from away. We were thrilled to find out they were offering take out during the corona...More
Thank you very much for the lovely meal (during the pandemic)! We ordered this afternoon and picked it up on the dot . We thoroughly enjoyed the salad, duck confit and the chocolate ganache. We hope you get lots of takeout orders so that we...More
A friend and I came for dinner one night. They get quite busy but they had a small table for us near the kitchen. We shared the steak frites which was delicious and perfect for sharing - it was huge. We also had the escargot...More
A cozy bistro located in the Francophone Cultural Centre. A group of us went there for dinner with our French teacher. The waiters are very friendly and speak French and English. We had a lot of fun practicing our French. We had the set price...More
Enjoyed a delicious lunch special, a croissant BLT and lentil soup. Both were very flavorful dishes, clearly made from the freshest ingredients. Service was attentive and quick. I'll be back soon.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708661-Reviews-Salade_De_Fruits_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salam Bombay,"The server was charming and professional, sharing insights to the menu. The kitchen was a glorious well-oiled machine with a smiling chef respectfully orchestrating a house full of hungry diners. The cocktail aperitif was their own version of Negroni so I must go back for...More
Excellent meal and service. We were made welcome. The restaurant was very clean with appropriate distancing. They were able to accommodate my disability scooter. All in all an excellent experience.
The best Indian restaurant in Canada. We had tried many Indian restaurants. This is the best in ambience, food and service. We were a group of 8 and they wouldn’t let us sit together. They sat us in two separate tables far apart. We were...More
Some of the best Indian food we’ve had! Definitely start with the onion bhaji. If you need a fresh veggie, the chef salad is a great mix. All of the meat and curry dishes were great. And the boys inhaled the tandoori chicken - the...More
Frankly speaking I did not visit this place. Actually I bought a coupon from them and gifted to my daughter living in Vancouver, on her Birthday ! As mentioned by her - the taste was excellent and it was a real treat to be there....More
The restaurant is tucked on the second floor ,been in business for awhile ,over looking the busy street Burrard , it is very upscale spacious and cozy place , this is the place I all way come for their Lunch buffet with my staff and...More
We thoroughly enjoyed our meal at the Salam Bombay. We were 4 adults and two teens from out of town. Our server was attentive and offered advice on how much food to order for our group. We had popadoms and mango chutney, onion bhajis and...More
Stumbled upon this place and so grateful we did. The halibut coconut curry was incredible and we were thrilled with our meal here. The staff was very kind and attentive. We’ll be back!
Hard to imagine a better meal. The entire experience is 5 star. This was my second visit and I came back because the first was so exception. Consistently delivers a first class Indian experience at very reasonable prices.
I had the chefs special 4 course meal. It's the best thing I've ever put in my mouth. First Course was vegetable pakora. Second BBQ lamb. Third Assorted curries. Fourth banana and ice cream. You must eat here.
Have been searching for years for really good butter chicken, and without question FOUND IT here. Rich tasty delicious sauce, lots of chicken (yay), and choose how spicy you want it. I have never had better butter chicken. And the naan … light, tasty, perfect...More
Place is great, friendly, great food and casual atmosphere. Definitely I will go back when in Vancouver again.
We went with our friends to try this restaurant. It is convenient to get as is near Expo Line, Canada Line and bus stops. When we arrived the waiter received us and took us to our table. The table has an amazing view to the...More
Lunch time is the best for buffet menu from 11:30 a.m. to 3:00 p.m. Eat until your stomach is full, with both vegetarian and non-veg options, they also have rice pudding <3. During the visit, the staff were very attentive and kept on refilling our...More
If your looking for a yummy lunch or evening meal within the city limits this is certainly a spot to consider. Centrally located, window seats available so you can watch the world go by and Tasty food. what’s not to love.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1140846-Reviews-Salam_Bombay-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salathai Thai Restaurant,"Wow. The best Thai meal I’ve had and very reasonable too. Good service, delicious main meals and a nice atmosphere. Tempted to go again!!
We were looking for somewhere to eat close to our hotel (Fairmont Vancouver) and just happened upon this wonderful restaurant. We were met by Alex at the door who took us to our table. A scan of a QR code was needed to access the...More
Authentic Thai cuisine absolutely lovely had massaman penang pad Thai and rice just like being in Thailand at a great price
We had pad Thai, chicken satay, chicken cashew, spring rolls, wine, and a Sweet Rama mocktail. Everything was amazing!
Consistently good, decent value and fresh ingredients. We usually go for the lunch curry and rice, or noodles. The tamarind duck is good too! Always manage to get a table weekdays without reservation and they’re so friendly.
Although the wait staff and ambiance is very inviting, the food is very 'average' - especially if you're from Asia or have lived in Asia. The food seemed a couple steps above shopping mall level - not bad but no where close to authentic Thai...More
We live in Whitehorse where there is no Thai restaurant so we decide to have Thai cuisine in the big city. The appys were unremarkable but both mains ( chicken cashew nuts and drunken spicy noodles with beef ) were great, as was our server....More
We visited this restaurant on a busy Sunday evening. We were shown to our reserved table then had to wait for quite a considerable time for a waiter to take our drinks order which arrived in due course. We then had an even longer wait...More
Although called Thai, this restaurant also serves other types of food as well. A good selection of wines is also available.
We booked a table for four here. The receptionist was far too busy on the phone to deal with mere customers. We should have been warned when the two people in front of us walked out. We were seated on hard couches just behind the...More
Underwhelming experience - the food was rather bland & sweet but this wasn't the issue, it was the service - way too fast - we were half way through our starter when the main courses arrived - then when we were having a small pause,...More
Ask my wife and she'll tell you I'm a bit of a nut for Thai food. I visited here on the last evening with my wife and two sons (15 and 18) of our two week trip around Vancouver and island. We arrived with no...More
Delicious Thai food reasonably priced in lovely restaurant. Wish we had discovered earlier. Conveniently located on Burrard st.
We made a last minute change of plans and managed to get a reservation at Salathai, and so glad we did. The food was amazing. 4 of us enjoyed 4 different dishes, and they were all amazing. The floral dumplings with delicious and fun!
Visited Salathai, as staying nearby at the Sheraton Wallcentre for a couple of nights. Booked online 30minutes prior, and after a brief walk arrived to a warm welcome from the hostess. Offered a choice of tables, even though the restaurant was pretty busy. Ordered 2...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d968985-Reviews-Salathai_Thai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salmon n' Bannock Bistro,"It has very high reviews and I can definitely see why - this place is awesome! First of all - they called us about 20 min before our reservations to let us know that they were running late because they had issues in the kitchen...More
We decided to try this restaurant since it specialized in indigenous cuisine. Can't say enough about the delicious food. Everything we ate was tasty and at a good price.
What a treasure! Not to be missed. This small, first nation's run restaurant features locally sourced delicious offerings. I had a bison slow cooked stew....absolutely nourishing. My husband had the fresh salmon and wild rice.He ate every last morsel. The mushroom Bannock and berry trifle...More
Came full of excitement for the Indigenous cuisine and did not leave disappointed. The restaurant has a thriving delivery/ pick up service while also being full inside and out! A reservation is highly recommended! We overheard the waitress say that 800 bannocks are baked in...More
This restaurant is an absolute must when in Vancouver. It is the only owned and operated indigenous restaurant in Vancouver and not only were the staff friendly and helpful but the food was outstanding as well. So many little details that you don't get in...More
We had dinner at Salmon n’ Bannock that is offering a First Nations cuisine. We went for the salmon with wild rice and the sablefish with polenta. Both fishes were perfectly cooked and the sides were very good. Our waitress was kind enough to explain...More
Honestly can't think of a better dining experience! The Sable fish was 'melt in your mouth'' delicious - as was everything else! Impeccable service and lovely atmosphere made for a wonderful overall experience. Will definitely return when back in town.
Amazing food! The bison soup was hearty and the bison pot roast was so tender and the flavours of the bison will fulfill your spirit. The cherry and sweetgrass cake was delicious and will up lift anyone one’s spirit. Proud Indigenous owner Inez is a...More
Inez was the best host you could have. Her staff were amazing. The Chefs are amazing. Everyone was very friendly. The food was absolutely heavenly. You will not be disappointed.
I am so happy and so full, everything I ate was excellent. Full of flavourful and full of so much love and goodness. I will be back, here to support my Indigenous Sister. The customer service was excellent. Feels like Home.
Incredible lunch in a charming bistro Well prepared food that was delicious. Friendly and attentive service. All in all a very delightful meal and experience Thank you!!
I’ve rated a 4 though I per se did not enjoy the meal completely ONLY because I am a fussy eater, so for us fussy people there is a slightly limited menu though what I did have was nice but not 100% to my taste,...More
Best food in bc! Native owned and run! Excellent service and art. I would highly recommend it ! Every thing was delicious and unique.
Always get the bison pot roast. The end. Lol! I always love the food, love the atmosphere, love the people.
Delicious food, warm hospitality, beautiful space. Can’t recommend highly enough. We had the salmon sampler and mushroom bannock with bison sauce appetizer, bison pot roast and smoked sablefish. All amazing",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1719718-Reviews-Salmon_n_Bannock_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salsa & Agave Mexican Grill,"Sole dinner tonight. The place was hopping. Everyone happy, owners serving and making delicious Margharitas. Definitely a must try and you will be back. All ingredients fresh, tasty food and great staff
Great margaritas, great food at a great price...& churros!! For a small space the view of the bustling corner of Davie & Pacific makes up for it!
Food was so delicious. We ordered tacos and shrimp enchiladas and some margaritas. Service was friendly. Can’t wait to come back.
I ordered a beef steak style burrito whichI I did not enjoy. The burrrito was mpstly filled with rice and the very small amount of beef was very tough poor quality _hard to chew ! Very Disappointing I had way better burritos at Chipotle
The staff was friendly and helpful and the food was terrific. Had the soup and burrito lunch with chips and salsa to start! Super affordable and absolutely delicious!
I had high hopes for this place after seeing several positive reviews. We ordered takeaway tacos 4 for $14.00. Tacos were very small and the fillings were non existence, very basic and had no flavor.i have not tried any other menu items so perhaps I...More
Understated small family type restaurant, where the owner and servers take pride in the food and service. Menu is quite extensive and you can stay simple or try specials. I would prefer salsa to a sauce with my corn chips but other than that the...More
This is a nice spot to pop into for lunch or dinner. The service is always friendly and prompt, the food is tasty, and the beer hits the spot after a walk on the sunny Seawall. The tres leches cake is amazing if they have...More
They try to gauge customer by charging 1$ for hot sauce and even then they only give you a quarter of the container. Usually the burritos were decent but this time I found there was more beans than anything else. I do not know if...More
Always very good food and very friendly service. Family run with authentic Mexican dishes. Year round outdoor patio.
GREAT SERVICE in a city where it's hit n miss I have to make notes when its deserved! This is my 1st visit and I will def. return. My food partner in crime joined me and we tried the Happy Hour Menu. They had tacos,...More
I went there based on the reviews in other websites .The food was so bad that I was thinking I have to rate it terrible but the service was good . All the food needed some seasoning . Rice was undercooked and taco was awful.
Very friendly and helpful staff. Reasonably priced authentic Mexican dishes. Has small outdoor patio.
Discovered Salsa & Agave on a recent weekend trip to Vancouver. We had not intended to go for Mexican food, but are very happy that we found this location while looking for brunch. The food, service and atmosphere were all excellent! I had one of...More
What a rip-off! The worst Mexican food I have ever eaten in my life. I arrived and sat down. The two waitresses first served several tables who were seated after me. I had to hail one. I ordered ice water and the 2 chicken enchiladas...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1060285-Reviews-Salsa_Agave_Mexican_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Salt Tasting Room,"If you like wine and charcuterie, then this is the place to go. We had a bit of a tough time finding it as it is literally in an alley in Gastown but we’re glad we went. You have an option on what kind of...More
Have been to salt three times now and each time I love it. The staff are all amazing and if you let them they will choose the flights and charcuterie for you. They have always done a great job. This is my go to when...More
Excellent Hospitality... Highly appreciated the owners attention to detail, and helpful suggestions for meat, cheese suggestions and the associated wine pairings. Wonderful Evening 🍽
Excellent idea... everything flavoured and tasting! You can spend hours just sipping, tasting and chatting. The only downside is the location. When we left was late night and decided for a walk, not the best idea.
It was my first visit after COVID. The cheese and wine selection seemed less than before, but I still loved what they offer. Their Wine serving portion is 5 oz a glass (or a whole bottle), I wish they could offer 6 or 9 oz...More
Such an incredible experience! We were greeted by the manager and he took such good care of my group. Him and his staff were very professional and knowledgeable about the products that were offered and served, the restaurant was very clean and had such a...More
We had the buttermilk chicken sandwich which was really good nice and tender fresh with coleslaw and pickle in it. The salad was not spectacular but it was okay. The garlic shrimp appetizer was very good as well. We were in a bit of a...More
Salt is a great place if you’re looking for something a little different. With a huge chalkboard showing 30 different meats, cheese and condiments you can build your own platter and then it will be matched with wine tastings. I tried 3 cheeses and was...More
Charcuterie delight. Please just leave yourselves in the staff’s hands. The game is that from an expansive chalk board you pick three meat and/or cheese offerings then add three condiments of your choice and either select a wine or opt for a there wine flight....More
Beautiful charcuterie and Canadian produce from nearby Okanagan Valley. Great service...a bit hard to find in Gastown (it's located in a dodgy-looking alley but it's safe!). Worth the trip!
We had wine flights primarily from BC as we were vacationing from the South East US. Staff was very knowledgeable about the wines and willing to engage as necessary. Also had a great charcuterie plate with mostly local cheeses (not sure if the meat cuts...More
I like how the Blood Alley area is becoming a hip place, what a fantastic transformation. The Salt Tasting Room is an excellent addition to it, and the ambiance at this place is simply amazing. The whole concept is fascinating, taking wine, cheese, and meat...More
A clever concept where you choose fried meat, conserve & cheese which can be paired with wine. They also have standard plates you can choose. Excellent. Highly recommend.
I got my family there and the experience was great. Don’t worry about having under age in this place. Although of course it is a wine tasting room, they offer non-alcoholic cocktails as well pop. No juice or iced tea though. It was a busy...More
The service was amazing. We chose to make our own tasting plates with help from our server. He walked us through the different cheeses and gave his recommendations for accompanying condiments and wines. We had so much fun experiencing new things and tasting wines that...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d946727-Reviews-Salt_Tasting_Room-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Samsoonie Noodle & Rice,"A mom and pop style restaurant that offers all the essentials. Delicious Bulgogi and large portions. Make sure to order the dumplings
We did a Richmond Dumpling foodie tour and this was our last stop. We found the dumplings and wontons to be delictible and great value. What we also thought great was the complimentary serving of kimchi and veges that came with them. A few things...More
Nice Korean restaurant. Small, less than 20 tables. Service was quick and friendly. The food was pretty good. We ordered pan fried dumplings, fried won ton, beef roll, sweet and sour pork and bulgogi. All were pretty tasty. Korean sweet and sour pork is different...More
All I can say is good food, service, staff and even parking! I was hesitant on going to this location as it’s located in Richmond BC which has probably the most worst drivers in the whole province, but I’m so glad that my hubby made...More
This place is another Asian gem in Richmond. We did not have reservations, but they were happy to accommodate us (party of 4). It’s a very tiny place, so difficult to accommodate large parties – I would say party of 6 max to be comfortable....More
Ordered Soft Tofu hotpot soup (was asked for level of spiciness)and I requested for Extra spicy. When the hotpot was served, another waiter brought a small dish of chilli flakes in oil and said, to add to the hotpot since you ordered extra spicy. It...More
Came for the dumplings and it's was cooked to perfection. I have never had dumpling taste so good. I will definitely come back and visit.
We came here for lunch at 1:00 on this sunny Monday. The restaurant was busy but not full and we were able to get a table within 5 minutes after some tables were cleared. We ordered the following: • #2 Pan fried dumplings ($5.49 for...More
This little gem can get very busy as their prices are very reasonable for the taste and portion of their dishes. Mostly the service is good and they always offer to replenish the kimchi and side dishes. If you are dining alone, they may move...More
Our friend knows the owner so we decided to go to Samsoonie for an early dinner. Lucky we did as the restaurant had a line up out the door after we left! We shared the pork belly wrap dish, gyozas - well made and crispy,...More
Very good and quick service. Very reasonable price and tasty. A great choice for a quick and simple meal.
We dined at this unpretentious little place at the advice of my son who knows of these things. The place is small and was packed with diners during our visit with a small line up a the door. This is a good sign. We sampled...More
I was already in the neighborhood so I ventured into the Samsoonie Noodle & Rice for lunch. My selection of the soft tofu hot pot arrived piping hot prompted. A very enjoyable lunch for $10.00. As always parking was a challenge.
This was our second stop on the Dumpling Trail and certainly our favourite. While this Korean restaurant has an unassuming appearance the owners have designed it so that every meal is a pleasurable occasion. The tables are made of thick blonde planks and the very...More
I came by here on a whim when I was shopping in the area and stumbled across a goldmine! I love Korean food and this unassuming place has some of the best dumplings and seafood pancake I've had. The Bibibimbap is outstanding and the tofu...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d9835286-Reviews-Samsoonie_Noodle_Rice-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Samurai Japanese Restaurant,"On March 12th my friend Allan suggested this place and after ordering 2 beers, he ordered Tuna Tataki, tempura Prawn plate , assorted sashimi plate. Good value for fresh food. Very efficient service as well. Will return for sure
I wrote a review 3 years ago of this place and am back now to say that it has maintained the 5/5 ranking. Servings are large and well prepared though you should always check to be sure you are getting what you ordered. This is...More
Its been two years (2019) since we last visited this joints due to pandemic and we are happy to see them thrives in the midst of chaotic pandemic era, we always love their food, taste good and the servings is big for the price.
The food was okay but the service was terrible. We went there at 3:00 pm, we were the only people dining in. Our orders came out separately. My husbands came our first and I waited 10 minutes watching the cook on his phone and the...More
I used to like this place before June 2021. Since the restrictions were eased I re-visited for dine-in. I ordered hot sake as usual and it tased so sourly...so weird. The color of sake in a tiny cup was hazy yellow as well. I explained...More
We ordered the Ikura and Salmon donburi (Salmon Roe Chirashi). Also a sushi set meal. The fish is fresh and the Ikura was worth my wait while away from Vancouver.
I was told that this place is good for students as they offer big size sushi with affordable price. It was true, and the quality of food was much better than I expected to be honest. I had a lunch bento box with pork cutlet,...More
Best sushi place you can find in downtown for the price. The service is not the best, but it's not terrible. If you go on weekends the line can get quite big.
I’ve been to this place a couple times and I was never disappointed. The food is tasty, the beer is good and the service is friendly. It is reasonably priced too.
Recommended by a local friend to try and we value the tip. We went there at about 6pm fir early dinner. It was an awesome experience, seafoods were fresh and servings is big and satisfying. The server knows their menus and superb experience. Oysters is...More
Was staying at the hostel just around the corner and this is a great place to get some good food in a casual setting. Had one of the combo sets with a bit of everything which was good value and waitress was very friendly
I hate leaving bad reviews but unfortunately with this one I have to. We arrived late for dinner – around 10.30pm which is unusual for us and already later than we wanted to be eating so the atmosphere wasn’t great. We ordered the shrimp tempura,...More
This place exceeded our expectations. Having lived in Vancouver nearly two decades ago, we had fond memories of good sushi… With this nostalgia we ventured across downtown into Samurai and were not disappointed. The portions were quite generous, the makis were delicious, and the prices...More
Came here for lunch, had Sashimi,Bento and Oysters (there was promotion of CAD1 per Oyster). The food was decent though not fantastic, but to be fair it is pretty affordable. When I first came here in 2009, a friend studying in Vancouver brought me here...More
My friend and I felt sick after eating here. Long wait, noisy, crowded..thought It must be worth It. Large unattractive sashimi and sloppy sushi. Octopus was not edible. Textures, after taste, lack of quality. It’s for people who don’t know any better.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d967954-Reviews-Samurai_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Samurai Sushi House,"I was tired and hungry and driving along Cambie street. I had been meaning to stop in this small Japanese for awhile as thought it had good reviews. I did not realize how big their rolls were as I ordered the beef teriayki roll and...More
This is clearly a local sushi paradise, restaurant is fairly small but plenty of people coming in for take out at this great value sushi place across the road from Oakridge mall and the biggest sushi rolls I've ever seen. I ordered 2 dishes and...More
This is one of the tiny little places in Vancouver good to park in front, order and take out quickly. There are less than 10 seats if you are lucky. Be careful with rolls size , it’s huge. Don’t order a bunch of it. Tea...More
Quick, cash only place on Cambie known for its massive rolls at a decent price. Quick service,limited seating and complimentary tea. Pictured: dragon roll
Took family of eight here and it took a little while to get a table together, but it was well worth the wait! Sushi was amazing and everyone left full and smiling. Service was also good and tea flowed all night.
My friend raves about this sushi restaurant because it's cheap, portions are large and it's a popular, busy place. So we went together. It's a little different than most sushi places... it's a no frills take out place with a few tiny tables cramped in...More
Had a nice and cheap dinner in Samurai. Although service is minimal, the quality sushi is a true bargain. The fish is thickly cut and fresh. Portion is very generous. This is a good place to have a fast Japanese meal.
Dropped by this place after work one day to try it out. I did take out, service was good and the wait wasn't long. I got 2 rolls, BC and dynamite. They were huge, almost comparable to a small orange. The BC roll had lots...More
Great sushi with friendly staff. Sushi is fresh and their miso soup refreshingly flavourful..... i want to come back...
This place is great when quantity over quality is what you are after. The big fat rolls are filling and quick to come. A really easy stop for lunch on the go
Small resturant across the street of Oakridge along the Cambie side. The rolls are huge and filled with mayo in the cali rolls and some are near impossible to all fit in your mouth. The resturant itself is not a service resturant. you order and...More
My favourite sushi. Great value. Big chunks of sashimi, and huge rolls. The only negative is that they put too much rice on the rolls and the sushi, but not a biggie as it's easily removed. Not the best for eating in as space is...More
Recommended by our air b&b host we weren't sure what to expect. Small place with limited seating but so worth a visit. Food was fresh and delicious, really good value and the portions were HUGE. I had salmon sashimi and was served almost a whole...More
This is probably the best sushi restaurant in Vancouver. The prices are cheap and the portions are big. Because the restaurant is very small, the lines occasionally go out the door. The wait is definitely worth it though. It is 6.50 for 5 pieces of...More
Cash only, it's warm in there. Good value in the Oakridge area. Only a couple of seats, if the weather is nice I recommend walking 1 block east to Columbia Park to eat the food there. If it's raining, take the food to-go and eat...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1058023-Reviews-Samurai_Sushi_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sansho Sushi & Japanese Dining,"Our new neighbourhood go-to. Easy ordering online. Friendly clean simple place to eat in with good service. But most important is the quality of the food. Top-grade.
Incredible! Great wild salmon, sashimi like butter. Many delicious rolls to try. Would definitely come back for more.
Sansho has been a favorite spot since we moved to the local area about 5 years ago. We mostly do takeout, but also dine in at times, mostly at lunch. Everything on the menu is great; our go-tos are the teriyaki combo meals and sushi....More
Away from most restaurants on Queensbury - a short walk from our house and has become our local sushi restaurant. Excellent fresh sushi, good pricing and friendly service. Not fancy, but good menu selection and convenient. Go try it!
I’m addicted to their Veggie Dragon Roll. The staff are fabulous, it’s no wonder there’s a line-ups on occasion.
Excellent quality food. A basic restaurant with good service. The tonkatsu was so good I ordered it twice! A highly recommended spot for a casual dinner.
So happy to go to a sushi restaurant with a separate gluten free menu, with a wide selection!! Super tasty, good prices, nice interior. Will be back!
We've been to Sansho a couple of times in the past few months and recently we decided to buy 2 party trays of sushi for a family party. Our guests were very happy with the quality of the sushi and the presentation in the sushi...More
Very nice sushi, simple restaurant atmosphere. I really wnjiues the food, was disappointed at their unwillingness to accommodate changes in combos ever when offering to pay differences. Staff were friendly though. Their sansho roll is bursting with seafood and is a meal into itself; naturally...More
We love the restaurant. Probably as authentic as it gets around here but the service is really slow. We’ve had to wait 45-60 min for our food to arrive once.
This restaurant was recommended to us and we liked that you didn't require a reservation, parking was free and easy to find, the prices were good and the food was SUPERB!! We tried a number of different rolls we had never tried and enjoyed all...More
We are regulars at Sansho for a good reason! Their food is authentic and well priced. If you get one of their noodle dishes you can tell their broth is homemade. Their sushi chef is also highly skilled and service is always great. Try one...More
Had driven past this spot so many times and finally made a point to stop in. So glad we did! Tried the port gyoza, tuna tataki, a whole variety of rolls and nigiri and enjoyed every single bite!! Wish I had remembered to take photos...More
I read the positive reviews, looked at the website, checked out the menu, and was very looking forward to a wonderful experience at Sansho in North Vancouver. What we got was poor/indifferent service, and low quality food. If the food was good and was in...More
Had heard about this place from friends, and finally got a chance to try it. Full disclaimer: I don't like sushi, so can't speak to the quality of any of those dishes, but have tried almost everywhere else on the North Shore for teriyaki etc....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7387754-Reviews-Sansho_Sushi_Japanese_Dining-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Save On Meats,"I had the savoury chicken and waffles and I have to say... IM HOOKED! The atmosphere is amazing and the food is delicious!
We saw this in Lonely Planet and decided to check it out - very pleased we did. We both had the burgers with different toppings and Granny Smith apple slaw. Excellent quality meat with good fresh buns and accompaniments. Service was friendly & relaxed and...More
I’ve been there many times but not for a year. Wasn’t aware the homeless coupons increased in price. This company started from a deli perspective. So the bacon is sinfully good. The Caesars are Amazing. Old time diner food. Very worthwhile braving the local colour...More
Nice welcome from the staff and friendly service through out. We had the savory and sweet chicken and waffles...I prefered the sweet, but that's just me. Not too expensive at all Great diner experience.
Still a great deal for a great burger but fries are no longer included. Always good service and friendly staff. Has a nice dinner feel. Area is a bit rough but I have never had any issues.
No longer a meat store . Now a great diner with fabulous hamburger . They have stopped serving their fabulous string fries , which is very sad but their ordinary fries are pretty good . Milkshakes are form”back in the day “ . VERY good...More
Went with the wife to this place on skid row of Hastings street, but this place is clean, and they serve great food. We both had the Reuben sandwich with fries which was great with a decent amount of reuben too. Their milk shakes look...More
I went to the restaurant as early lunch on a weekday. So it was not busy there and atmosphere was kind of traditional western style. Furniture and some items are featuring red color, by contrast, there are a lot of stylish black & white pictures...More
After search on trip advisor we decided to track down save on meats, we all opted on BLT and Poutine, we weren’t disappointed! It was delicious. We loved the Old Skool charm diner and friendly service. Music wasn’t the best but it is linked to...More
This diner is in the heart of downtown eastside. Has the real diner of 50s feel. Locals hang out here mainly, but great spot for tourists too if staying in a hotel around coal harbour or getting off the cruise ship for a day visit...More
We love this place. Great vibe and burgers are terrific! We love that “adult”boozy shakes are available any time
Hours are not right on TA. Suggested correction, check before you go. Not sure why a diner that serves breakfast doesn’t open until 9 but ok. Food was OK. Large parties beware, one meal came out cold because it was the first one prepared -...More
After the Whitecaps game, me and my girlfriend stopped by for a bite and a beer, but were blown away this place! Seriously, best burger I have ever had, plus the service was fantastic. Sarah was our server and was very attentive and just gave...More
I have been told to come here on many occasions and we decided to try this place for once. We are so glad we did! The staff are so friendly and the food was amazing. Great prices too
Stopped here on Vacation. I had a burger and poutine with an adult milkshake. Service was good. The burger was a good, enjoyed the Poutine. They were out of chocolate ice cream so could not make a couple of the adult milkshakes, but got the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3207876-Reviews-Save_On_Meats-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sawasdee Thai Restaurant,"Very good and busy Thai restaurant on Main Street in East Vancouver. Great service and affordable prices as well. A reservation is needed.
Delicious Thai food and lovely, friendly and attentive staff. We had the Crying Tiger Beef - exceptional, the Duck Curry - exceptional, the Larb - exceptional, the Stuffed Chicken wings - exceptional. It’s so difficult to choose which of these dishes we liked the best,...More
A friend brought me here recently. This place has been around for decades and when you try the food, you'll understand why. I've never tasted so much flavor in a fried rice dish, it's almost surreal how good it was. The fried stuffed wonton app...More
I have been here once previously. Nice thai option in the area. My friend and I decided to try 3 mains for dinner. We tried their chicken red curry, prawn pad see ew and pad khing nuea (beef) dishes. All pretty good tasting to enjoy...More
ALL 3 generations of my family loves Sawasdee Thai Restaurant. Very flavorful food made with prime ingredients. Welcoming but not intrusive service. Our go to place for family dinners. I give them a 10 out of 10!
First visit, covid protocol and all. Warm welcome. vax pass checked pleasantly. Ordered Pad Ped with prawns and jasmine rice. Prompt presentation of the dish. Real Prawns. Green basil, not purple. Cheaper veggies predominated. Not inspiring me to eat or visit again.
So good we went back. Good quality no-frills food. Good service Wise to book a table as it can get busy.
We ordered takeout Tom Ka Gai (soup), red curry, seafood medley, pad Thai, Chicken cashew, and papaya salad for my birthday. We have been going to eat here for almost 4 decades and their current chef is phenomenal! The balance of flavours is fantastic, with...More
My wife and I were in the area walking to another eatery and saw this restaurant. Wife said let’s check it out! Food was so tasty and visually stunning! Ambience was great! Service and staff were friendly and personable! Ordered 2 mire dishes to go...More
While the tomato based pad Thai was very good , the curry dishes were watery and lacked distinct Thai flavors and the duck curry had very little duck in it. This is the second time we have eaten here and we weren’t very impressed to...More
Fantastic food, great food and wonderful service. We had dinner here and had the stuffed chicken legs, spicy beef and green curry chicken. Everything was fantastic. I have never tasted stuffed chicken legs before and they were fabulous. Great place - highly recommend it.
Good old place on Main Street. Loud when full, but service is very prompt. Full menu. Try the octopus appetizer, the green mango salad, any of the curries, the pad thai, the tom yum soup.
First time here and came later in the evening. The service was fast and very gracious. Tried a few curries which were all good. Not too crazy about the dumplings. We were a party of 6 and shared many dishes.
I ordered their Tamarind Pad Thai for takeout because of a positive review I had read. I went home excited to try their Pad Thai and was left disappointed. Portions were good but the noodles were too soft(mushy) and the spicing seemed like mainly sugar....More
We really enjoyed our meal at Sawasdee Thai Restaurant, we made a reservation before our arrival, we were promptly greeted, very nice, kind, attentive service. the food was fresh. piping hot and tasted wonderful",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708776-Reviews-Sawasdee_Thai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Say Mercy!,"Had the tasting menu for one, which consisted of a couple of appetisers and five items from the menu. All the dishes tasted great, I particularly loved the tuna tartar and the short ribs were melt in your mouth. The kale salad I thought was...More
The most eclectic menu we have had in a couple years. Texas BBQ meets Italian. With 4 of you, you get to taste everything on the menu for $65 apiece. I would order everything again a la carte. Amazing deal! Despite all the courses, save...More
The simple idea of creating a menu by crossing Italian cuisine and BBQ is genius. I'm surprised no one has come up with this idea before. We had reservations and arrived at open, so we got our pick of seats, so we decided on a...More
I went here because it recently made the Canada's Top 100 restaurant list so I wanted to check it out. It is in a nice neighborhood on Fraser Street in Vancouver. When you get there, staff are a very warm and welcoming. We got there...More
Interesting creative fusion of food. We enjoyed their 5 course tasting meal. Despite smaller plates, you were full. Too bad they were not busy on a weeknight as we only saw one other table. We had great service.
Fantastic food, great service. We had the Say Mercy 5 course special - it was excellent quality and more food than we could possibly eat
We had a great time dining here! We tried the tasting menu and that included a lot of the best dishes they had and it was very good. Definitely would recommend that route if you're hungry! The service was excellent too.",7,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23607488-Reviews-Say_Mercy-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Scandilicious Foods,"Great waffles, straightforward casual atmosphere. Norwegian theme. Little potato pancakes things are really good. Patio
I always enjoy going here when need a gluten free waffle. They have lots of fabulous options to choose from, but without fail I order the West Coast with the smoked salmon and poached eggs. Their hollandaise sauce is outstanding. We have been here twice...More
I eat here often with friends because they have a lot of Gluten free options. They are famous for their waffles and attract a large crowd most days so get their early. Seating inside is limited.
Red Wagon was smokin’ busy on a Monday at 11:15. Didn’t feel like waiting so we made our way here instead. What a great choice! It was busy but we were able to get seated and ordered at the counter. I was indecisive so i...More
Love the Monkey's Munchies! What a combination but it works! Rest of the menu looks great to, couldn't pick. Very friendly staff, clean place and kids friendly. Could be very busy, but if you go early, you will find a nice spot to enjoy your...More
Amazing waffles, gluten free options too, really friendly staff. The chicken and waffles is the best!
I've been wanting to come here since I moved to East Van. I enjoyed it! Everyone working was super friendly, the atmosphere was chill, and the food was filling and good. Definitely would like to go back and try some of the sweet options on...More
Awesome food. Worth the wait! I got the ABBA waffle and a great latte. Lots of GF options was a plus as well!
Slow service, average food at best- went twice and both times same experience. So many other places to go where there’s good service, food and friendly staff.
We’ve been here a few times (with different friends) and we all love the Waffles here. My friends love the Valhalla (back bacon) and the (West Coast) salmon benny one. I also love the hummus spinach one - Leaf Ericson. It does get quite busy...More
The waffles here are AMAZING! I can highly recommend the Valhalla waffles. If they sold that maple bacon jam in jars, I'd have bought a couple to bring back to London with me - dreamy!
Wow, this restaurant has been here for four years and yet I pass here everyday not knowing about this hidden gem until it was mentioned to us. The waffle was wafflecious! Hot and Crispy dripping with butter and maple syrup. However, you can either choose...More
My husband is Celiac so finding gluten friendly restaurants is always a challenge. Before any trip, I spend a few weeks doing research on where he can eat and what restaurants are in our vicinity, etc and it really does have an impact on where...More
I was so excited to find a place serving gluten free waffles. I hadn't had a waffle in 10 years! I had the one with peanut butter and Nutella. It was excellent. I wish I would have had two or at least a side of...More
Visited early August with my fiancé for brunch on a Saturday afternoon. A perfect place for breakfast/lunch with a huge selection of sweet and savoury waffles! I ordered the Leaf Ericson (hummus, peppers, artichokes, cheddar, spinach), and explained I was celiac and the waffle was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3864067-Reviews-Scandilicious_Foods-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Score on Davie,"We stopped here for an early dinner and it was so good! Delicious food and a big selection of beers! Great atmosphere too with everyone in there to watch the playoffs! Would recommend the burrito bowl with shredded pork!
I knew Score for its novelty “food” Caesars - Caesar cocktails with obscenely large burgers, onion rings, etc. as garnishes. I knew its patio is always busy and that it’s a beloved community hub of Davie Village. What I didn’t know was how good their...More
One of the best spots on Davie, and amazing pubs in town! The staff are incredible here and the food is really good as well. The drinks here are amazing as well. Definitely recommend checking this place out.
Went there for nachos & beer on the first day of business after Covid restrictions. Staff & management are doing an amazing job The safety protocols in place are not at all an inconvenience in anyway and makes me feel safe. I am happy they...More
We wanted to visit a place with some good sports vibe to watch the hockey game. We were lucky to find seats at a shared table, 30 minutes before the game started. The two of us shared a burger with yam fries, wings and massive...More
At good place to eat they have lots of different types of food lots of craft beers but there speciality are Caesars they are fantastic
Been to Score 2 times in 2 days. Caesars are amazing! Went for lunch today and Melissa looked after us so well. Such friendly and professional service. Food was delicious. Will be back on my next visit for sure.
We sat outside had great drinks, ribs were great, super cool server. Local bar seems to be popular with young college students, resulting in very interesting atmosphere.
Enjoyed a few really awesome Caesars here on the weekend. And the eats were really good too! Nice fried comfort foods, and other things, and a really interesting mixed bag of Bloody Caesars topped with all kinds of cool edibles. Prawns, Corn Dogs, Mac and...More
Food and drinks are an adventure here. Lots of to choose from. Everyone in our group was totally satisfied. The place is obviously very popular among locals. I think we were fortunate to get a table on a Saturday afternoon. Tons of energy in this...More
love all the crazy drinks ! always a blast here . fun atmosphere . Grilled Chaeesar and deep fried pickles ! The Perfect Sunday brunch ! A little vodka in the morning to get things off to the right start . .
Sat outside on the patio at the front on a Saturday sunny afternoon! Burger and ale , delicious! Friendly waiters and good service
We stayed at a nearby hotel and had dinner at Score our first night. Interesting street to stroll and pick from a wide variety of restaurant options. We were lucky to get an outside table as it was pretty busy. Service was good, food was...More
Went here with some friends while working on Vancouver and we had wings and burgers. The prices were good and the atmosphere was great. The music was grunge and lots of 90s music. Food was tasty and came in a good amount of time. Service...More
Am a Brit travelling alone so popped in here to see the first World Cup semifinals and good people in there and staff and good beer and food",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7211759-Reviews-Score_on_Davie-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Scratch Kitchen,"This is now our family’s favourite restaurant - pizzas are delicious. Service is great. My favourite is the Hot Momma. You can’t go wrong!
The prosciutto pizza was absolutely perfect with the hint of lemon from the dressed arugula on top! And the west coast sour is my new favorite drink. Absolutely amazing!
First time here and everything we tried was great! We kicked it off with the West Coast Sour with cedar infused bourbon which tasted like a local forest… in a good way! 🌲Then we started with the Street Corn which is fresh, sweet corn smothered...More
This is the BEST pizza place I’ve ever been to. We discovered this place by accident and we were beyond impressed with everything from the service to the food. Their takeout is fast and fresh. Mushroom pizza is bomb. Hit it. You can’t go wrong.
Sunshine rice bowl was delicious, flavourful and simply amazing. I am a foodie but this was a total new experience to my palette. I took a vegan option. Was in the area and simply googled restaurants. So happy I chose it! Thank you chef!
Based on the poor quality of the “artisan” pizza we received, it's hard to understand how this restaurant gets such a high rating. We ordered a takeout brussel sprout pizza and asked if it could be made gluten and garlic free. “No problem”, was the...More
Hi Ron. We don't recommend making modifications to our menu items. Every sauce and ingredient serves a purpose. That being said, we understand that people have diet restrictions and allergies and we try to accommodate the best we can. We do not advertise anywhere on...More
This is literally the best place on the North Shore, luckily it’s close to our house, lol. Best homemade pizza in town and also healthy salmon bowls and appies. We keep saying we should go to other restaurants every week, but then say ‘nah, let’s...More
Thanks for the review! It's so great having you guys stop by on the regular :)
So cool to see this place doing so well. I have reviewed this place before but I’m compelled to review again after an awesome Saturday night family dinner. Just so good to see local, independent ownership providing tasty, inventive and addictive food and drink. Well...More
Thanks for your review! We very much appreciate it and all of the local support we've had from a great community!
One of the best gluten free pizzas I have every had. I call our front end staff person over and double checked it really was GF, seemed to good to be true. We had a very nice time there and the food was great.
Cute place, feels like it has the owners' personal touch. Menu had lots of drink and food options, including local beers on tap. 'The bowl' with squash was a very healthy post-holiday remedy, and the mushroom/rosemary pizza was superb. Looking forward to the next visit!!
Cozy little restaurant with honest local food and great service. Highly recommend. Good for brunch, lunch or dinner.
Very happy with the kitchen and front end staff here. I need a gluten/dairy free diet and the staff went out of their way to make sure our food was delicious and allergy friendly. Several great pizza dishes and several others that would work for...More
Thanks for taking the time to leave us a review :)
Just looking for a spot to grab some quick lunch and stumbled upon this hidden gem! The menu has something for everyone, from burgers and pizza to delicious salads. Our server was very friendly and helpful. Would definitely come here again!
Thanks for your review :) We really appreciate it!
4 of has brunch here, & enjoyed it very much. The restaurant is in a small strip mall with plenty of parking. There is a spectacular view of mountains & water. The atmosphere was cheerful. It was busy, & yet Devon, our serve, spent time...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave us a great review :)
On a girls trip with 3 other women with all different palettes. So glad we yelped Scratch Kitchen, but I just wish we were in Vancouver longer to go back! Each of us loved what we ordered. From the watermelon margarita with fresh watermelon juice...More
Thanks for such a great review Kristi! Glad to hear you enjoyed everything :)",22,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d15229161-Reviews-Scratch_Kitchen-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Seaside Provisions,"We just came back from an exceptional late afternoon experience at Seaside Provisions. Their happy menu and Buck a shuck oysters are not only a great deal but delicious. Our server Fiona was amazing. She had a great attitude and was attentive to all of...More
I absolutely love it here! The food is amazing and so fresh, I highly recommend the chicken karage and seafood platter. Staff goes above and beyond and is so knowledgeable. If you are look for a great cocktail, their menu has a great variety and...More
Hi Sandy Thank you very much for the fabulous review! We very much look forward to hosting you again very soon. Claire
We had a lovely dinner last night at Seaside Provisions. The atmosphere, the music and the food were wonderful, as was the service from Paris, our server. We loved the oysters with freshly grated horseradish, the burrato salad with tomato and watermelon was delicious and...More
We just finished an exceptional happy hour meal and want to acknowledge the outstanding service and food! We dined during happy hour and our meal included the following small - paradise oysters - they were so gastronomically splendid, we ordered more after devouring the first...More
Excellent service, great vibes and good value foods!! Highly recommended ! been visiting this place quite regularly for quite awhile with my partner. Recently for this visit, I suggested happy hour meet up to my daughters and their partners to try out the place and...More
Hydra is an excellent, spacious Greek restaurant with a very urbane, contemporary flair! Hans was our magnificent server! Highly recommended!
Wow, this was a complete surprise atmosphere service and food were all top-shelf, and the manager and staff made you feel like you were a VIP regular the minute you walked through the door. Ownership is very lucky to have a manager of his caliber....More
We used to be regulars at Seaside Provisions and unfortunately had a not so great experience on my birthday in Dec 2022 so hadn't returned. A big part of what make it great was Vadim who frequently served us. He was always polite, professional and...More
I found this place by googling 'best restaurants in North Van'. We wanted to try something new. The reviews were good so we decided to give it a shot. We were there late on a Sunday afternoon. We did have a reservation but arrived 30...More
Great dinner for our 2nd wedding anniversary. We absolutely love the service,food and ambience. If could I'd give them 10 stars 🌟 Thanks for another amazing dinner!
Thank you so much for the lovely review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we are honored you chose to send such a special occasion with us. We look forward to hosting you again very soon. Claire
Love coming to this spot. My lady and I are treated so well every time. Vadim(the GM) is a total pro. Each time we’ve been to seaside it was 11/10 service and 11/10 food. The happy hour is one of the best if not the...More
Rob Thank you so much for the wonderful review! It is always a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to hosting you again very soon Claire
In March , we visited this amazing, cozy place during Happy Hour..we ordered oysters and brussel sprouts and it was fresh and delicious. We had the pleasure of being served by a server named Nevena. She was kind, patient, and incredibly helpful. Her kindness and...More
Thank you so much for the wonderful review! It was a pleasure to serve you and we look forward to hosting you again very soon Claire
The experience my gf and I had celebrating her birthday at Seaside Provisions was incredible. It wouldn't be an exaggeration to say that we enjoyed the best dining experience at a restaurant ever at Seaside Provisions. From the unbelievable food (at happy hour prices, too!??),...More
Kevin! Thank you so much for the awesome review! The team truly appreciates the kind words. It was a pleasure to host you and we look forward to welcoming you back very soon. Claire
I Come here alone and with friends often. Great bar and restaurant to pass some time. I love the bartenders, always a welcoming expression and warm service. Very knowledgeable and can make some amazingly tasty drinks. Worth coming any night of the week.
We love Seaside. It is our go-to spot in North Vancouver. Their food, drinks and service are unmatched. It is certainly the best Happy Hour spot in the city. Their oysters are always amazing and the prawns are a must have. The staff are always...More
Thank you so much for your great review. My team and I (Vadim) are always happy to do whatever we can to make sure you have a great time. Hope to see you again.",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d19407527-Reviews-Seaside_Provisions-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Seasons in the Park,"Yesterday, Bryon, our RBC Investment Advisor, treated us to an annual luncheon get together at Seasons. Although not having been here for some time, we were greeted as old friends upon arrival by General Manager, Richard Baker and promptly ushered to a beautiful window table....More
I went to this restaurant a few times with my husband and son during our summer trip in July 2023 mainly because we really liked QE Park and we lived close by. However, we could actually sense some discrimination from the servers. We are Canadian...More
Thank you for taking the time to provide us with your feedback. I apologize your experience fell short of your expectations and our standards. Our General Manager would greatly appreciate the opportunity to follow up with you. If convenient, please forward this full review along...More
Had a wonderful dinner one Sunday when it was Prime Rib day, and all 4 of us had the Special. We were seated at a perfect table with a great view to share with our nephew and partner visiting us from Denmark. The Caesar Salad...More
We had a wonderful dinner at Seasons at the Park on Thursday, July 13th. We decided to go there to celebrate our anniversary and our experience was top notch. We were blessed with Robert who went above and beyond to make sure we had a...More
This restaurant was amazing in every way. We were lucky and were able to snag a patio seat right next to the window (we ate late at 2:30pm). My husband is a pretty picky eater and he was raving about the quality of the food,...More
We were very disappointed in our service tonight. July 3rd. Have been before for special occasions. Great food. When I made reservation, said it was a special occasion. No offer of complimentary dessert at table. Didn't refill our wine glasses. When paying bill, greeted me...More
Seasons is a beautiful restaurant located at the highest point of Vancouver's Queen Elizabeth Park. A patio or window table gives diners a commanding view of the park, downtown skyscrapers, and the mountains that surround the city. Dining here can make you feel like you're...More
We came here for lunch after touring the QE garden nearby. The ambiance of this famed restaurant was superb. Even without a reservation on this Saturday, serendipitously we had an amazingly perfect “ring side” table on the patio overlooking the gorgeous garden. The cold draft...More
My Prime Rib was the toughest stringy prime rib I have had in my life. From a high end restaurant this was extremely disappointing. The Seasons mushrooms appetizers had not sign or taste of crab or shrimp in them, very disappointing. I didn't raise a...More
Thank you for taking the time to provide us with your feedback. I apologize your experience fell short of your expectations and our standards. Our General Manager would greatly appreciate the opportunity to follow up with you. If convenient, please email your telephone contact details,...More
I had a lovely small lunch outdoors at their exquisite patio with a view panning Vancouver's skyline. The service was 5 star - I really enjoyed my grilled lobster tail - and clam chowder - the patio featured gas powered fire places which lent a...More
Hadn’t been to the restaurant since I left the city more than 25 years ago. The food was very, very good, the beer excellent. Only disappointment was the wine, a BC Riesling way too sweet, nothing to do with its Alsace and Moselle cousins. The...More
It was kind of a grey March day. This was our first visit to Seasons, which I'm sure would showcase our beautiful city much nicer in a month or two. My partner and I discussed our Dinner experience after leaving Seasons and heading for home....More
The restaurant was hopping. The food was very good and the service even better. Marek was our server he could probably work in any restaurant he wanted. Our whole brunch experience was ""First Cl;ass""
Our meal began at 2:15, so the restaurant was beginning to calm down. Our party of three was shown to a table by the window. The view immediately enthralled us--sunlight bathing the buildings of Downtown! The waiter (Marek) informed us about some fantastic specials (lobster...More
So much to love here. Our lunch was exceptional—fish and chips and a salmon burger. The views are simply spectacular. Great views of the city and mountains. We were lucky to have snow and it made it even more special. Located in Queen Elizabeth park.",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1070055-Reviews-Seasons_in_the_Park-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sen Pad Thai,"I love Thai food and looked forward to eating here but I was disappointed. Jen had the beef curry and I had the crispy pork belly. Both dishes come with lots of rice, in fact the portions are very generous and we could easily have...More
This is without a doubt the worst Thai food I’ve ever had - gummy, over sauced noodles. No finesse. I’m thankful that the Granville Island public market has composting bins available so that I can throw it out without feeling horrible about the waste. Such...More
The Sen Pad Thai is well worth the trip to Granville Island. Extremely well prepared, authentic Thai cuisine. We thoroughly enjoyed the Pad Sie Ewe, Pad Thai and crispy chicken wings! Sen Pad Thai is located in the door court at the Granville Island Market...More
I lived in Bangkok for 15 years, and I was spoiled by having some of the best Pad Siew Gai in the city just around my corner for 60 baht. This Pad Siew (beef) is really good. It's not 60 baht, but it was tasty...More
My daughter and husband tried this place while at the market. They give it 4/5 stars, not 5/5 because it was sweeter/heavier than other pad Thai we've had
This Thai restaurant on Granville is quite busy. Their pad Thai with shrimps are excellent. It’s a small pace so lines are long. In the center is sitting area. Since turnaround is quick so grab a table first and than go for order.
I was visiting the Granville Market with my hubby, when we decided to have a quick, simple dinner here. Crab and prawns Pad Thai were both very good, plesantly spiced and price was good.
Our favourite spot on Granville island so far! We ordered a pad Thai and within 5min we had our food. It was incredibly tasty and definitely the best pad Thai we have had outside of Thailand! Will go back for sure before the end of...More
Sen is now in the main public market, so it's easier to find than it used to be. As you can tell by the name, pad thai is their specialty, but between us we had a few different noodle dishes. Pretty safe to say that...More
We wondered a bit yesterday searching for this place. It is inside the Granville Market along with other eateries in a food court. I had the green curry and my husband had a pad thai with shrimp. The food was around $13 per entree. It...More
I noticed Sen Pad Thai has moved into the main Public Market which means an even harder time to find tables during peak hours. I ordered the Crispy Chicken Wings for a snack. I was expecting them to give me the ones behind the glass...More
We found Sen in a somewhat quiet corner of the public market. Actually, we were surprised to bump into it. We enjoyed the pad Thai, the noodles were so good. Also had the beef over rice and loved the spice, fried onions and green beans....More
Best pad thai in Vancouver. Noodles are firm and chewy. Very flavourful. Better than many pad thais I have had in Thailand. Of course the price is higher than what you would pay in Thailand. But definitely coming back. The very crispy garlic chicken wings...More
Sean Thai Restaurant is located in a building diagonally from the main Granville Island Public Market. There a neat indoor courtyard patio area with a number of tables. There are a number of loyal patrons who eat here. There is a second restaurant also in...More
Delicious pad Thai, so good that we visited twice during our visit to Vancouver! The pad thai is the best I’ve had outside of Thailand, the noodles are chewy and the flavours are perfectly balanced. It is a little more expensive than other food stalls...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12726019-Reviews-Sen_Pad_Thai-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Seto Sushi,"Asked server to pick some rolls for us! He did a great job! Brought the right amount and some very interesting rolls! That is the way to do it!
Restaurant was recommended by hotel staff. Looks small from the outside, but once inside you find it quite large. Server was very helpful as it was my first time there. Tried a steak combo. It was deliscious. Loved it. If in the area highly recommend.
The sushi was good but not outstanding, especially for Richmond. Service was good and prices fair for the quantity of food received.
Seto Japanese Restaurant is located in Richmond and serves up some pretty solid Japanese fare. We visited here in early February for lunch and had a bit of difficulty deciding what to order because they had a regular menu, a lunch menu, and then various...More
I had been there twice. Their food quality is good. Seafood is fresh. Price is acceptable. Not super cheap, but worth it.
Authentic Japanese food. The sushi was very good. We has the Combination Sushi Dinner and everything was great. Good variety of sushi and other foods included in the combination. Very friendly and helpful staff. A little hard to find in the back corner of the...More
Had lunch here, won’t be going back. While the sashimi was fine, the other dishes were not worth coming back for. Agedashi tofu pieces were way too large. Chicken in the Bento box tasted like something from the back of the fridge from last week,...More
Fresh sushi for a good price. Special rolls are too big to be eaten in one bite graciously. Donburis are all of large portion sizes. Courteous serving, private booth. All good though not very special. Very good price for the whole meal -quality/service/environment. Will definitely...More
Small sushi restaurant in Richmond with wonderful Japanese ambiance. Service was phenomenal and sushi was some of the best I have had. Recommend for sure, but make a reservation.
We were meeting a large group here for lunch and a private room was available for the 13 of us. We ordered the Bento Box A and it was good, but not the best we have had. Prices were reasonable and service was attentive.
Visited for the 1st time a few weeks ago. We were extremely happy with the food and service. It is very authentic with a good atmosphere. Sitting at the sushi bar was just like being in Tokyo. Order directly from the chef as you wish.Two...More
We all had a bento box for lunch and boy it was excellent. A great variety of food and the staff were excellent. It was fast and the staff service was friendly and helpful.
Haven't been here in while, but will try to come more often. The place is fairly authentic in ambiance and the quality of food is excellent. Prices are a bit higher than many of the more commercial places in Richmond, but well worth it for...More
If you want sushi that's close to authentic and fresh, Seto's is the way to go. We've been going there for about a decade now and we can't say we have had a bad experience. Servers are friendly and the booths offer a cozy and...More
Came with family and enjoyed fresh sushi and sashimi. My kids enjoyed the soup noodles and rolls. Good service as well.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d892698-Reviews-Seto_Sushi-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Seymour’s Pub,"Well we were a group of 4, we got our appies and dinner at the same time. Some of us did not get cutlery. Then we got asked to move to a different table to accommodate a bigger group. Took our glasses of wine and...More
I was in support of this place but that was awful. Won’t be back too soon. Toby’s is very close. Will go there instead.
Been going to the bar/restaurant for years and with this new owner everything as gone to crap. Not only has food quality gone down but portions are 3x smaller then they used to be. If they can’t make good food then they shouldn’t be making...More
It is a while since my last visit , before the new Management , place just run down it is lot comfortable cottage style ambiance lot cleaner now , menu is good quality Pub Food , dropped my client off at the hotel , and...More
The website states they are open until 12am. I ordered at 10:35 and was told after ordering that I would need to have eaten and be out by 11 pm. The chicken wings I ordered were tiny, drenched in sauce and you are charged extra...More
New management has completely changed this place. The food is fantastic, with new menu items to keep up with current demands, and fresh, amazing meals every time. My personal favourites are the fettucine alfredo, the burger, and wings (amazing!!). This pub has changed for the...More
I used to love this place - loved the menu, the service, pricing and portions. Since new ownership the menu has changed, they have eliminated personal favourites, increased the prices and the portions are about half of what they used to be. I'm am very...More
Refreshed menu late 2019, nice lunch special soup / sandwich combo, had a couple different choices now, very nice homemade soups. Love the wings! My daughters boyfriend is vegetarian and was pleased with the menu options and his selection. Personally I think their burgers are...More
Our 50th grad class reunion was held here for the second time. This time round I was hungry, as I arrived about lunch time. I needed only a light lunch as I was meeting a relative for a heftier dinner later in the afternoon. My...More
Residing in North Vancouver, this used to be one of my regular pubs to eat at. Being a vegetarian, their veggie burger was amazing. Went out for dinner last night with my husband and we thought it was strange that there was no special listed...More
regular meeting place for a group of us, Beer Wings and watch the game, lots of big screen tvs everywhere.
Had many meals here while at the hotel next door. If you stick to pub fare you'll be fine. The mini yorkies are good as is the rest if the burgers and fish n chips etc. If you forget that you're in a pub and...More
We came here with friends from New Zealand on a beautiful sunny day and opted to eat inside by the large windows with sunshine streaming in. (The view was not great, but it was bright and comfortable.) Each of us had a different entree or...More
This pub has been around for a long time and it shows. It's really time for a reno, even if it's just new carpet and paint, it still has the smell of when you were allowed to smoke in a pub. It's disappointing because the...More
Part of the Holiday Inn. Service was great. Food was like any above average pub. Atmosphere was enjoyable. TVs are everywhere.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4713259-Reviews-Seymour_s_Pub-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shabusen Yakiniku House,"2/5: not an easily spotted restaurant as it on the second floor. Our sever didn’t explain how ordering works. They turn on the bbq and disappeared. We wrote up our order. The items come out fast but They didn’t instruct us how long to cook...More
... You should tell your customers when they come into your restaurant that the last order is 30 minutes before closing in the lunchtime.
I think the food is great. The service was great. There is very few dishes with any vegetables (tempura, gomai or teriyaki veg). So be prepared to eat a lot of meat if you want to get your money’s worth. We were 4 adults and...More
Tried this place after hiking Jeoffrey Lake and since it is hard to find Korean BBQ in downtown. Price was expensive so we were expecting the food and service was atleast good. The food was okay but we were worried of food contamination if there...More
NEVER IN MY LIFE HAVE I EVER BEEN HARRASSED INTO LEAVING A TIP....! Being from a European back ground TIPS are something you leave if everything was very good, food and service. When I paid the bill I did not tip as I really did...More
Been coming here for many years. Only thing I can complain is that it's getting bit pricey. Other than that food is always good service is your typical all you can eat place.
This restaurant in business for a long time , more quantity them quality ,,little expensive for the poor quality of the food you get, again I all way say you pay what you get ! safety plan and social distance well follow , we all...More
Check your receipt, the manager adds his own tip to your bill more than 30% of your total. Needs customer service training. Food is tasty.
We arrived at opening time and joined the queue after a very long 3 hour walk on the waterfront, therefor we were starving. When we got inside we were asked if we had a reservation, which we didn't think we needed, anyway the waiter said...More
We tried to reserve a table but were told there was no need as at 8pm it was no problem to get a table for 2. First disappointment was that we waited almost 45 mins for a table and were then seated at the Sushi...More
My wife were hungry after travelling and doing some shopping so when we saw the all you can eat sign we decided to go there for supper. The restaurant was not busy when we went in so we were promptly seated. We were asked if...More
For about $36 per person (including tax), you can enjoy all-you-can-eat sushi/sashimi along with Korean BBQ and all the offerings in the kitchen! Wonderful deal, quite enjoyable. Service is fast and efficient despite being a full house, and the quality is excellent-- great sashimi! They...More
All you can eat Japanese food and table side Korean BBQ. Service was good. Tons of sushi, good tempura, good meats to grill at the table! Be careful to order to much at once as you will be charged for not consuming what is ordered....More
This place does all you can eat very well. I came with my 13 year old son and he really loves it! Nothing especially fantastic about the service but our food came quickly and was tasty. I would say that if you're coming for sushi...More
This place is not fancy and don't expect stellar service BUT not for lack of trying -the staff there are constantly on the move, serving a diverse all you can eat meal - NOT a buffet but at your table. Again the menu is not...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708889-Reviews-Shabusen_Yakiniku_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shameful Tiki Room - Vancouver,"It took us 3 months to get this reservation. By that standard alone, I thought it would be ..more. We love tiki, and it's a good Tiki place. The food was good, the service was good, the atmosphere was fun. It had a few things...More
SUCH a fun little Tiki bar, amazing decor, friendly staff, interesting drinks, incredible food. Cannot rate it highly enough,
Shameful Tiki is one of the best Tiki experiences on the west coast I am a tiki fan and been to tiki bars all over and I have to say is shameful tiki is close to the top... My favourite drink is their ""Day of...More
I don't even know where to start with this review. This was my second time visiting and I should have learned the first time. Let's start with the service. The moment we sat down our server (female) came to the table and asked what we...More
Meeting a friend for her birthday , she choose this place because she love the atmosphere and unique drinks , the restaurant located 28th Ave on Main Street no window look in or big sigh , easily drive pass by , definitely is not like...More
Had a great time for my wife's 40th! Drinks are reasonably priced considering they're 2-3oz drinks. Can't wait to go back once covid is over
Absolutely love the atmosphere in here, the cocktails are unreal. The rum selection is crazy, definitely recommend stopping in for a drink! Make sure to make a reservation. Can't wait to come back again!
Our experience was the twilight zone and traumatic. I brought my out of town bridesmaids here before my wedding. The waitress, ""Tally_420"" who had green hair, controlled and dictated to us (in a condescending manner) what we were going to order, and if she didn't...More
First time here for a friends birthday. We didn’t have a reso we we went early at 530pm. Server was awesome and knowledgeable. Drinks were really good and strong. Food was decent. Overall cool experience!
One step through the door transports you to a completely different place. We left the cold gray night of Vancouver behind and were taken to a Polynesian hut with volcano drinks and tiki masks. Tons of fun! The staff made us feel super welcome. You...More
We eat at The shameful Tiki Room on Thursday 2nd January. I’m French, so my English is not so good. Be it the atmosphere, the dishes or the choice of rum, everything were really good. I asked the kind and helpful waitress to surprise me...More
Unique and fun atmosphere to enjoy one of the many specialized cocktails on the menu, coupled with delicious food, from mains to shareable plates like nachos and a pu pu platter filled with mini bites. We spent New Years Eve here and took in two...More
Everyone is going to rave about this gem, as am I...but first I have to ask that when you go to this experience of a restaurant; (and you will!) to look beyond the obvious thrill of the senses that The Shameful Tiki Room provides you...More
I came here with two friends on a Friday evening and we had a great time. This restaurant is like a “Rainforest Cafe” for adults. Our server, Christina, was attentive, informative and very friendly, and went above and beyond to ensure we had a memorable...More
If you're a tiki fan, you have to put Shameful Tiki on your list. Reservations are strongly recommended. This checks the boxes for classic tiki decor. We had read that the food was not great, but we thought there was a nice variety of options...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4105724-Reviews-Shameful_Tiki_Room_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shamrock Alley,"Whoever is driving this truck has some unresolved anger issues, might also just have been trashed couldn’t tell. Car is disgusting too so I wonder what the kitchens of this place look like!
We had great craic in the Shamrock! Very friendly staff. Small and cozy Irish Bar. Conor looked after us all night. Would recommend the Fish & Chips. We will definitely be back for sure! Thanks guys.
Lovely little Irish pub with a welcoming staff. The Manager has gone to great lengths to adhere to the new covid requirements in separation of tables with tastefully etched hanging plexiglas partitions. The staff keep the bar immaculate. The food is always good but I...More
Stopped here for a quick drink, the happy hour deals and staff are more than enough reason to come here alone. We saw the chef (yasser) put up freshly made Yorkshire puddings, we couldn't help ourself we ordered this of the appetiser menu and it...More
Very warm and friendly welcoming from Siobhan and James the drinks where amazing my friend has a lemon obsession and they lovingly put 10 slices of lemons in her drink for a laugh and it was well received lol following they played a song with...More
Looking for a nice pub after a great walk through Stanley Park? Right near the. corner of Davie and Denman is the fun Shamrock Alley. Serving up plenty of beers, various food items and a small pub atmosphere the Irish Alley is a great way...More
Stooped by here for a drink and some food.plenty of drink choice. The food menu is simple but nice.One thing i liked is you can order what you want. (within reason). Staff friendly (barman from Sligo he's on the ball. Drinks served in minutes). Worth...More
Great location right at an entry point to Stanley Park. The all day Irish Breakfast consisted of eggs, black & white pudding, sausages, bacon, grilled tomato, toast & beans. Beans were a bit weird, maybe curried beans & I didn’t like the sausage but that’s...More
The staff is great, especially James and Martine. Location perfect, with a patio with a view of English Bay, The secretion of drinks is good, Irish cuisine. The food is very good.
Excellent Location Love that they had club drinks and Irish crisps. Food was nothing special. Had the curry and fish and chips.
I had wanted something walking distance from the hotel where we were staying and this was within a block - great choice! We stopped by late afternoon on a Monday. They had some great specials and a hearty assortment of 'real pub food'. The customers...More
Ist time we went, around 6.45 on a Friday, place was packed with drinkers enjoying the happy hour. Barely anybody was eating and neither did we as nowhere to sit. Went next day at 5.30 and got the last table. Mainly people drinking. We both...More
So glad we stopped in. They have a great selection of beer and the food was great. The lasagne was homemade and better than mine. The cedar chicken wrap was delicious. The place was warm and friendly. I will go every time I'm in Vancouver.
Busy bar with front terrace perfect for people watching, ordered fish tacos, onion rings, wings and chicken tenders, all were very nice but the tenders weren't real chicken breast pieces, decent bar for drinks and sports though
Stopped here a couple of times during are time in Vancouver , very friendly staff and a great atmosphere. Drinks are reasonably priced for the area and a great location to people watch from. Looks a bit rough and ready from the outside but don’t...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4302637-Reviews-Shamrock_Alley-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shanghai River,"Superb food and pleasant environment made my visit with my daughter most enjoyable. I would recommend highly.
I have been at this restaurant many times and the quality of food and service is consistently good. Ample parking and fairly spacious. My favourite dishes here are the Shanghai dumplings and Black Vinegar Spare Ribs
Soup dumplings steamed and pan fried are freshly made on-site. Very delicious. Spicy beef noodles are al dente in a rich spicy broth. Stir fried rice sticks were quite good as well. Good service in a pleasant but loud dining room. Busy on the weekends.
Was recommended by a friend to try this restaurant when we visited Vancouver and was not disappointed. The shanghai dumplings and gyozas are a must try!
Nice popular place with ok service. We went at 11 and were seated quickly before it got busy. Ordered noodles and xlb and a sesame sandwich. All were fine just nothing we loved.
My friend took me to Shanghai River for lunch and I must say the Xiaolongbao dumplings are just to die for! Will have to come again during my next trip to Richmond!
I eat primarily at Cantonese restaurants, but close friends of ours invited us to Shanghai River Restaurant in Richmond and the food was incredible! We started with hot & sour soup which was not as vinegary as typical hot and sour soups. The mild taste...More
I think I might have to go out for Shanghai food more often. We started out with hot and sour soup. The combination of spicy sour and savoury is just soooo good. And I loved the crunch of the bamboo shoots and black fungus. Their...More
this time we went as a family, ordered beef brisket light stew, soup dumpling, wonton soup with chicken, and a spicy fish. the spicy fish was the highlight with ultra tender fillet topped by minced spicy pork. it's not an easy dish to make. the...More
This authentic Shanghainese restaurants is one of the good quality in food and in service, well know for their Peaking Duck and unique Dumplings , ,,having a business client stay close by the hotel , so we choose this restaurant for our lunch meeting ,...More
We went with friends for a nice and delicious dinner, we ordered Peking duck (ordered in advance) 2-course (first was skin with pancakes, second dish was stir fried duck meat with vegetables), plus Shanghai fried noodles, Yangzhou fried rice and Xiao Long Bao. Staff was...More
Had dinner with some colleagues on a business trip. Good flavours and fresh ingredients. Spicy but not too hot for the people with more delicate palates. Very good food. The service was prompt and efficient, and attentive without being overbearing. I'd go back and would...More
While ordering, waitress told us the soft shell crab was recommended, only $29. We decided that since this was pretty cheap for soft shell crab, to order it. Upon receiving the bill, we were surprised to see an $82 billing for the crab, and when...More
We ordered a crab, which our server told us was 29 dollars. Not a bad price for crab! But it turns out that they left out a critical piece of information (intentionally, in my opinion, since I even asked to clarify the price). It turns...More
Xiao long bao and tea smoked duck are the best dishes among the other we had here. Definitely would come back for more great traditional dishes on the menu. Can't wait! 🐷🐷🐷",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d1118741-Reviews-Shanghai_River-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Shanghai Wonderful Restaurant,"After a long day meeting , girlfriend # 5 and I , both just want to relax at the hotel , I noticed the Shanghai restaurant just across the street from the hotel , so we dropped in for a light meal , very modern...More
First the food was great. We enjoyed it immensely but our welcome was well...possibly racist. We felt as though we were unwelcome amongst the Chinese clientele. The server clearly was unfriendly and gave us the impression we didn't belong in the restaurant. The expression on...More
We stayed at the Holiday Inn Express on Bridgeport yesterday. We all wanted Chinese food and reception recommended Shanghai Wonderful across the street. WOW!! The food was absolutely delicious and beautifully presented. We had Spring rolls, Wonton Soup, Deep Fried Prawns, BBQ Pork Fried Rice,...More
Stopped in yesterday, staying across the street at the Holiday Inn. In a word, awful (and expensive) We ordered beef/broccoli and BBQ fried rice, sounds safe no? Beef had been boiled I think that left it puffy/mushy and chewy too-yuk. The rice sure looked like...More
If you're staying in the Holiday Inn Express Vancouver Airport, walk across the street for excellent dim sum!
Not all the items on the menu were available on our visit; but we have ordered probably a little too much for the two of us. We recommend the hot and sour coup and the pork chop noodle. The soup portion is big enough for...More
Patrons are returning and enjoying meals at Shanghai Wonderful restaurant! Try to arrive early to catch a table and find a place to park. On weekends it is better to make reservations! Food is great, portions are good, staff is very polite. Recommended to order...More
Went for dinner last night and was impressed. We ordered meal for two and was served extra of everything for my nephew. Which was not expected! Fast service and good food 👍
How nice to return and check that the place is doing fine, the food continues with great quality, polite staff and we were served so quickly! Just make your reservation...one of our favorite authentic Shanghainese restaurants!
We really enjoyed the real authentic Shanghai cuisine without going to Shanghai. Love their juicy dumplings and their dim sum dishes, also many dishes especially the live seafoods. Great dining experience at a very reasonable price.
Spicy Schezwan Shrimp- the best Chinese food I’ve had in a while. Service so-so. Fairly expensive: $ 30. for shrimp, small steamed rice and two egg rolls.
We had the hot and sour soup. It was very bland, we even tried spicing it up but it made no difference, very disappointing
Shanghai Wonderful (旺) Restaurant located at the next door of our stay: Abercorn Inn. Very convenient. The restaurant had a decent setting and nice decoration. Service was quick cordial and professional. This was the first restaurant we visited after we got together in Richmond just...More
If you are craving Shanghai Soupy Buns or Xiao Long Boa, this is the place to go. They are known for the tasty dumplings but they have a lot more to offer than that. They have all day dim sum selection albeit it is limited...More
Have just had the best meal of our holiday so far! Not certain about what we should choose we were helped by a staff member who made some recommendation and suggestions after asking us us about our likes and dislikes. He certainly got it right,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d795996-Reviews-Shanghai_Wonderful_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Shark Club Sports Bar & Grill,"The Shark Club is very conveniently located a block away from the stadium and arena. Lots of large screens and open area makes it ideal to watch any game on TV. I remember the Shark Club as being one of the best places to go...More
Sampled the fried pickles with a great dill inside. Tables had burgers, French dip. Steak sub and chicken enchiladas. Good size portions and great flavors. Screens everywhere for complete sports bar atmosphere.
Good location, fun staff. Went twice in one day, first for drinks and then late night food following a concert. Ended up getting food to go while waiting for drinks as the place was packed and so loud, not complaining just after the concert and...More
Travelled solo to Vancouver. Walked around looking for a place to eat and drink. Stumbled across the shark club. Sat at the bar. Bartender was very friendly, great to talk with. Very good service. Returned later that night, had the sliders and steak frites. Cooked...More
We are staying in Sandman Hotel for two nights. On our first night we went to Moxies, which is in the hotel and had very good food. On the second night we chose to go to Shark Club for dinner. I had steak frites. The...More
We stayed at the Sandman and during our previous stays breakfast was unavailable but this year they serve breakfast. A simple variety of breakfast choices not unreasonably priced. It’s nice not to need to leave the Hotel for meals. Friendly, polite, fast service, we were...More
Poor Called in for breakfast when staying in hotel. The waitress was yappy, took my order wrongly, gave me bacon when didn't want it. Rook it back but just took it off the plate. But as it was quite veggie tou could still see the...More
Visiting Vancouver for three nights. Visited Shark Club on the first night and received first class service. I have a nut allergy and was made to feel 100% safe no issue. Also received similar service in Kamloops. Due to this service, I returned on the...More
We visited from prince rupert bc. And what a place to have dinner and watch the nhl playoffs . Very great service and the food was great.
We are visiting from Australia and called in for a drink pre ice hockey game. Only reason we came here was because the sports bar at the Arena was not open yet. So pleased we did as the service we received from Sonya was beyond...More
My husband and I recently spent a few days in Vancouver and chose the Shark Club Sports Bar & Grill for our evening cocktails. Tara was our server on the first couple nights and she was wonderful, super attentive and friendly. She made us feel...More
This restaurant is a part of Sandman hotel downtown Vancouver. Long time to be seated, cold and old coffe, rock music in ear for breakfast. Waiting more than 30 minutes for my food.
Dined here when we stayed at the Sandman hotel above. Food was Devine, waitresses were top quality and service was second to none. Went back again the second night even though we had all of Vancouver to choose from!
Decent prices, good craft beers, good wings, plenty of TVs for watching sport, nice and cool, polite staff and quick service.
Adjoining sandman hotel,so ideal as hotel restaurant an bar shut,watched champions league final ,great atmosphere and staff very friendly Nice food aswell",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710061-Reviews-Shark_Club_Sports_Bar_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sharky's Chophouse & Eatery,"Have a VIP Card fully stamped from being a very loyal customer. A VIP card with 10 stamps entitles you to a ""Free meal valued at $9.95"" with no expiry date on the card. It should say ""Worthless!"". I went to redeem and was told...More
Very good perogies ans beed brisket. Sausage were a bit dry. We took 2 mains and 2 sides for 17$, we were 2 adults on the plate and we were full. Best food court food i ever had.
Located in the Lonsdale Quay, Sharkeys is a self service restaurant. At least four main meats to choose from plus a variety of sides. Brisket of Beef, tender, you can almost cut it with a fork Baked Ham with a great glaze. Loin of Pork...More
It is inside the Lonsdale Quay Market, seating is found in communal areas that serve many restaurants. Don't get the wrong impression- the ambiance is much better than a mall food court. The food was tasty and like home cooking.
The food is very tasty! The baked beans, best I ever had! Huge portions, soooo good, we bought another meal to take home!
All kinds of different meat for meat lovers. Generous portions with reasonable price, easily shareable. We had the assorted sausages. Delicious food and friendly service. You have to try it if you are there.
One of my favorite meals while in the area. The staff was friendly and helpful. The food is absolutely delicious and a regular size plate was enough for my wife and I to have our fill. They allowed us two meat selections and their meatloaf...More
SO GOOD! I repeat, SO GOOD! The value is crazy - for $10 you can get a ""small plate"" (easily shareable for two people and you'll both be full) with amazing meats (if you want two types just ask - they can mix!) and the...More
I had their $9.99 roast lunch. They have a bigger one, but you better be hungry. I considered it because everything looked so good it was hard to choose what to eat. It was great home style food. Nice big portions. And SUPER tasty. The...More
Less than $10, huge portion size, and some pretty amazing choices. The chicken was tender, not dry whatsoever and the sausages had the perfect amount of spice. Reviews on Google give this place a 4.9 out of 5. I don't live here and will definitely...More
The food at Sharkeys is outstanding and the value... well, you can't cook it at home for these prices. The ribs, meatballs, chicken, roast beef, ham... it's all great and the veggies and other sides go very well with the meal. Besides the deli meals,...More
Our kids love it here and we break down sometimes and revisit just because. This is one of the places that puts a serious damper on our efforts to not eat meat. It's a take out/butchers place in Lonsdale Quay that serves your meal on...More
Sharkeys Chophouse at Lonsdale Quay in North Vancouver is a place to go for lunch if your craving a big, meaty, starchy meal. I had been hearing about it from my co-workers for quite sometime so I decided to go with them a week ago....More
I loved the food here so much that I wanted to leave a bad review so that no one else would go here and it could remain a little secret, with only an elite few in on it. Great food, huge portions, amazing price. Yes,...More
We were craving for Boston Clam Chowder from our favorite soup place. Unfortunately, no hot clam chowder served for that day. We ended up walking around the market and looked around that will perk our interest. Never went to the Sharkey's aisle. We were about...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7231713-Reviews-Sharky_s_Chophouse_Eatery-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shaughnessy,"Excellent and creative dishes that are uniquely prepared and delicious. I found all the dishes very good, great service and a stunning setting right in a garden.
The service was quite slow (the place was not busy - there were lots of empty tables) and the waitress did not come to our table very often and we had to wait even for our bill. The ""advertised"" quiche feature was not even available....More
A dinner meeting of about 30 people at the restaurant in the beautiful surroundings of van Dusen Gardens turned out to be a great event because: Service of pre dinner drinks perfect ! Whiskey Sour one of the best, I ever had, good selection of...More
We are not from Vancouver and drove in to see the VanDusen gardens and wanted a lunch meal. We had reservations and Milan was very cordial, helpful and could give us a table at the garden patio even a little later. Thanks Milan! I think...More
My friend and I went for lunch after a stroll through the lovely gardens. We each had a croissant - her the ham and Brie, and me the crab and shrimp. Both were burned - a very dark colour - and my crab and shrimp...More
The views and convenience to the garden are great. The food is so so at best. The service is a horror show. If you are assigned Francis (white hair, male with 10 years experience) demand another server or leave. We were ignored, literally had to...More
I booked a group lunch at the Shaughnessy Restaurant following a special family occasion. Our group of 11 was seated in a private outdoor space that overlooked the garden - the perfect spot on a gorgeous spring day. Milan and his team took wonderful care...More
This was a last resort restaurant as everything else in the neighbourhood was booked. 6 of us, we had been there before a couple of times and it had been good, not great. This time they went out of their way to make the Valentines...More
Had a great evening food was wonderful staffs was very accommodating. And everything especially the slow short rib was great . Appetizers where on point left with a nice doggy bag. Enjoyed the Frangelico coffee with Irish cream , yummy
We were a group of 6, we went to the restaurant after the light show. Four of us ordered the ""slow braised short rib""; each plate was different and did not resemble what was described on the menu. The presentation was embarrassing to say the...More
Ate here after visiting the light show. Food was good, but service left something to be desired. Our appetizers came reasonably quickly, but extremely long wait for main dishes. Them two where the wrong items and had to be redone adding 10-15 more minutes to...More
Pros: nice decor, yummy tuna Cons: seemingly no air con, useless fans, small portions, awkward server Came for lunch on a day where there was a heat warning. it's a nice enough looking place and the tuna was fairly good. Not much else to say...More
We love this place but have been quite disappointed with a waiter. Pointedly looks and the bill when you are paying (looking at the tip amount). Does not acknowledge you or even look at you after that. Not enough of a tip? Leaves a poor...More
I ordered the sea food pot pie, which was the worst I have ever eaten! Made with canned tuna, frozen peas & corn when fresh fish & veges are easily available. The servings are quite small & prices high for what is served. We had...More
We helped a friend celebrate his birthday at lunch and greatly enjoyed the beautiful surroundings, the excellent service and the delicious food. The fresh air seating with a view of the gardens was extremely pleasant. Our server Ottelia was attentive and friendly, and took good...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708924-Reviews-Shaughnessy-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shebeen Whiskey House,"The Shebeen is a super cool whiskey bar behind the Irish Heather. Highly recommend checking this place out, it is such a good vibe and such a great spot for drinks and snacks. I can't wait to come back again, it's amazing here.
This has the feel of a speakeasy. You have to to the back of the Irish restaurant to get into the Shebeen Whiskey House. It is a small but cosy place. The food is the same as the Irish Restaurant. The whiskey selection is pretty...More
Shebeen is the smaller, more intimate cousin to the Irish Heather. It’s tucked away behind the main restaurant, and feels somehow cozier. We were here for a surprise party recently and found the staff really attentive and accommodating. The food menu was varied enough, and...More
Really superior whisky selections and the food is excellent! This is a busy place and it’s easy to see why. Staff is also super friendly and helpful!
Hidden spot in the Gastown area of downtown Vancouver, well worth stopping in for a pint. The beers are great and the Irish Whisky is well worth it!
Came here to meet some friends on a Saturday night. The place was packed (it is a small room), but still found chairs to sit in. I'm not a big whiskey fan, but many of the people I was with are, and ordered the whiskey...More
I suspect that while there are many good ways to enjoy Shebeen Whiskey House, there are none *better* than to try a leisurely Scotch tasting on a quiet, early, mid-week evening. The dark, cozy bar is a little bit hidden.The selection was very large and...More
Shebeen offers a laid back atmosphere while still offering an incredible whiskey selection poured by the most knowledgeable staff. I only get the chance to visit Shebeen every few years and am always so happy to see that it is still there!
A few friends and I came here and the staff were very attentive and knowledgeable. We were made to feel as if we were the only guests there. We had different levels of knowledge and they catered to us specifically. So many options and ambience.
This was our first stop on our visit to Vancouver to celebrate our 20th anniversary and it did not disappoint. The atmosphere is cozy but lively. The staff are incredibly knowledgable and enthusiastic. The scotch selection was AWESOME and the charcuterie board was fantastic! So...More
Went here after dinner for a nightcap. Had a whiskey flight and Randy the bartender was very helpful explained the types of whiskey's and options
This is the hidden whiskey bar affiliated with the Irish Heather (it's out their back door in an alley). The food is the same, but it's a separate whiskey specific bar, and it's pretty fun. We tend to come here when we're waiting for a...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7942494-Reviews-Shebeen_Whiskey_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shibuyatei Japanese Restaurant,"After reading the reviews I popped in for an early evening meal - I was not disappointed. I had the prawn gyoza followed by crispy fried chicken with rice - both very tasty
Found a diamond. Don’t judge this restaurant by its appearance. And don’t go here if you are a snob or don’t know what quality food tastes like. The owner, puts everything he has into his authentic Japanese dishes. Its all about the food here. Every...More
We went with friends and all had different dishes at this very small sit down with 3 to 5 tables. My wife had Larmen Ramen with gyōza and I had Katsu Curry with Cod Fish and Rice. Our friends had similar dishes.
What a great little place. Had gyoza and Japanese curries, absolutely delicious. Considering it is a one person operation the service was timely and courteous, wonderful experience.
Despite the location and the worn down look inside, the restaurant hits the mark on food quality and price. I had gyoza and larmen, and both were very good. I was hesitant when I first opened the door, but thought I would give it a...More
Staying at River Rock and didn't want to drive or pay ridiculous buffet prices. Only three blocks to this tiny gem. Very friendly owner/chef/waiter who explained right away that sushi is not his thing. ""I understand, sir. I read the reviews"" I say with a...More
My wife and I were staying at a nearby hotel and were looking for a fresh and authentic dinner. Looked online and found this place literally across the street. Not much of a building. Walked inside to see some locals eating. Was a one man...More
From the outside the restaurant is not the most inviting, but the owner / chef / waiter was friendly and the food was great. All four of us really enjoyed our meals, all freshly made within a few minutes.
This place is THE PLACE for excellent tasting food that is made fresh and without compromise. Upon arrival the chef (who runs the place single handed) questioned us on whether we were there for sushi as that is not what he does. We assured him...More
I give him credit for handling all of the clientele by himself but it made it challenging for home to cook, serve, and take money when it got busy. Didn’t care for how greasy fried items were. Soup and noodles were terrific.
When I saw this restaurant referred to as ""humble"" I was intrigued. But that's the best word for it. Simple, unassuming, with well worn paint & fixtures. Just 6 tables, tucked into a corner of a car wash. But the chef (it is a one-man...More
Shibuyatei is an unasuming hole in the wall dive that is soon to be swallowed up by the megga development that is taking over this part of Richmond. This ""little restaurant that could"" produces some of the best authentic Japanese noodles and curry I have...More
The staff or might even be the owner(?) is very unwelcoming and rude. We went in, sat down and we decided to leave due to the treatment. It made us felt like we had to beg to be served.The worst place I ever visited. It's...More
We happen to come by this small restaurant which is just opposite Days Inn hotel. The ramen is very good and tasty. The shop itself may not be appealing but the food is really yummy and the price is very reasonable. We strongly recommend to...More
We went to this restaurant as part of the Richmond Dumpling Tour. I have been curious about this place as I've always driven by it on the way to the airport. The restaurant was empty when we walked in. He told our friends who were...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d3297077-Reviews-Shibuyatei_Japanese_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Shiok Singapore Cuisine,"This restaurant requires you to order when you enter, from a menu posted on the wall. You choose your menu items, write it down on a clipboard and hand it to the girl at the counter. You pay, then you get seated. I ordered the...More
It is a small family run authentic Malaysian restaurant , in any Malaysian diner , there is three dishes you got to try it out , #1 Laksa Noodle #2 Hainanese Chicken #3 Satay , dropped in for lunch by myself , it is a...More
We stopped by the restaurant, as I had read about it &, as we enjoy Singaporean food, decided to try it. It was a wonderful meal. The flavours were complex & the spices were excellent. We had a snack size nasi lemak, curry puffs, a...More
If you are looking for authentic Singapore cuisine, look no further. THIS IS THE PLACE! It is called Shiok! The word “Shiok” is a slang for Singaporeans who used the term for good & very delicious food. Parking - Street parking in a residential area…...More
We have been there a few times and really like the deep fried fish noodles recommended by the owner. We like the fish just fried and still crispy in the just tasty soup (which is not spicy but the three pieces of green chili is...More
We are always in search of authentic Malaysian food in Vancouver, beyond home cooking. We so happened to drive pass Shiok Singapore restaurant on Kingsway in the afternoon and decided to return in the evening to order takeout. We are so very happy that we...More
I took my dad who is a Singaporean missing his real laksa. The laksa is nice and rich with a generous amount of shrimp and noodles, much better than the thinned out broth you might see in other Malaysian restaurants. We ordered the otah otah,...More
Drove by, glad we came, no nonsense eatery, neat and clean, family owned, friendly service, paid first, reasonable prices, many choices, tasty food, decent portions, will be back. Closed at 8.
Shiok is a newish Singaporean restaurant that opened up on Kingsway in mid-2019. I dropped by for some takeout in early October. The food's pretty good so I might wind up coming back to try their dine-in service. First off, let me just say that...More
I have been back at Shiok numerous times since they opened, to try out all their different dishes. I cook all these dishes pretty well myself and am very picky with all restaurants serving Singaporean or Malaysian food. Shiok is truly serving really good quality...More
I've had at least 4 separate visits here in the past few months and each time it was excellent and authentic. The prawn noodle soup was with a rich broth and equivalent to a hotel standard in S'pore and not the watered down ones you...More
“Shiok” is a typical comment for good food Heard there was a new Singapore restaurant. My daughter & I checked it out. It is on Kingsway, if you are going westbound, it is passed Victoria Dr, street parking available but limited. Newly decorated with clean...More
A small menu but all your Singapore (Malaysian) favourites. Portions are a good size, prices very reasonable. A special promotion that for every 10 main courses you order (they are all around $10) you will get a free one. We had the chicken curry, beef...More",13,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d18031908-Reviews-Shiok_Singapore_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shiro Japanese Restaurant,"First time dining in since the pandemic and hands down one of our favorite places for sushi. Fresh, well prepared and quick service. Expect to wait if peak meal period.
We had takeout which is all Shiro provides at this time. We had some excellent sushi rolls such as California, sweet potatoe, spicy tuna, spicy BBQ salmon and negitofo rolls. We shared some eggplant nibidashi and chicken yakisibo. Good food.
Been going to Shiro for many years now. They’re always a good option when you want more high quality Japanese food. That being said, it also comes with a quality price tag, but completely worth it. The restaurant itself is quite tiny, I highly recommend...More
I got the rare chance to stop in for lunch in the summer and enjoyed one of their lunch specials: beef udon, salmon nigiri, and chopped scallop roll. The casual food is so good and quickly prepared for you. Service is excellent. Plenty of free...More
I rarely get a chance to come out lunch here and we took advantage of their lunch special combos when you could dine in back in January.  We had the sushi combination and tuna avocado don and miso coups.  Well priced and great taste.  Expect...More
We had a diverse group of foods to eat. Eggplant Nibidashi; Chicken Karaage; Yam - Oshinko - Real Crab Roll - Oshinko Umeshisho - Spicy Negitoro Rolls and a Tuna and Salmon Don. We ordered all to go. All the food was tasty, fresh, and...More
First time coming here and I have to say it's a good place. The food is good and it's very cute inside. I recommend coming here. It has a good price point for every wallet but is mostly higher price than your normal sushi joint!
This is a lovely local restaurant with excellently presented and fresh high quality sushi and sashimi, as well as udon, soba and tempura. The service is quick and friendly. The restaurant is clean and simply decorated. As a family, this has been a favourite for...More
Fast, fresh, delicious and reasonable price. Luckily no wait for dinner this time. Just put your name on the wait list inside the door and they will call you in. Small parking lot else drive around for street parking. Quick, efficient service.
Being close to our accomodation, we thought we'd give this a try. The people who were prepared to wait outside to get a table is a measure of how popular this restaurant is. Good value - good food. We enjoyed it all, even the soft...More
Kama = Fish collar, one of tonight's highlight is Grill Yellow tail Collar, this item is not on the menu, ask the server if it is available, yes......loved it, also available tonight is the Blue Fin Tuna, best Shashimi money can buy.
We were staying near by and Shiro was recommended by a local. We had a fabulous dinner with our family sampling many different rolls and dishes. We will be back on our next visit to the area!
We had another quick and delicious meal here for dinner. There was a waitlist but luckily no wait if 2 people. We ordered the ebi gyoza, prawn tempura udon, real crab California roll off their menu and organic, zucchini tempura, and hamachi sashimi and blue...More
For a neighborhood Japanese restaurant, it gets top marks for great sushi and sashimi. The sushi rice is well made. The uni is to die for! Have tried various rolls and loved them. This place opens only for dinner and is not fancy but does...More
After traveling we missed having good Japanese food and this place hits the spot. We tend to always order sashimi, real crab California roll, prawn udon, gomae, and ebi gyoza. Depending on timing there can waits to get in.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708954-Reviews-Shiro_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shizenya on Broadway,"This is my go to sushi restaurant when I'm in town visiting my son. Great service, fresh and delicious food!
We walked around Vancouver looking for excellent Japanese food and we found it! We eat a lot of Japanese food in Sydney and this was absolutely great. We really enjoyed how fresh every dish was and they arrived promptly. The service was excellent. I can...More
This will be our number one choice for Japanese food in Vancouver. With COVID, there business is huge in the takeout category, but we chose to go to their restaurant on Broadway. We loved reading the menu on-line, and were excited about so many things....More
I ordered tofu terriyaki and added vegetables to it for an additional 2$ this is what they gave me. Terrible , not even a full strip of pepper, just absolutely unbelievable
I do not believe in Sushi with brown rice based on a bad experience in USA. Here we tried some rolls and found they were more than OK. Place cozy, staff attentive and overall it was a nice dinner. We had a pleasant time. Prices...More
We walked by this tiny place and decided to give it a try. Outstanding service and amazing food. The sashimi melts in your mouth. We tried the fried eggplant in miso sauce, wow !
Went for lunch ordered salad with sashimi was disappointed by the small size and taste, the rolls looked better
I've been going here since it first opened. Healthy fresh and delicious! I didn't like sashimi until I had it here. Their tuna is like butter, brown rice is delicious, lotus root with a hint of spice and salads with thin crispy garlic, yum!
Been here twice with friends and am yet to have a good experience. The second time we went as a large group but not even one person enjoyed their meal. The food was terrible and the portions small. Most of us were still hungry and...More
First time in Vancouver and I tasted wonderful Japanese rolls in here, soft Udon with chicken breast, it is worthy! staff was nice and friendly as well lovely
Healthy Japanese food using organic ingredients and making brown rice sushi and maki. Lots of options for vegetarians. Very friendly service, delicious food, and a cozy atmosphere. Make reservations or be prepared to wait; seating is limited.
We love all the Japanese choices in Vancouver and find it more authentic than what you typically find in USA. Shizenya on Broadway is small but staff is very friendly. The restaurant was always full patrons as well as lots of people coming in for...More
A friend invited me here for lunch and The food was so good I returned for dinner a week later. Excellent and creative sushi dishes, served with organic brown rice which gives everything a subtle nutty flavour. Great flavours!
We had a wonderful sushi lunch break and gave our feet a rest. It met our expectations for quick service and delicious food! We will return the next time we come to Vancouver!
Our experience at Shizen Ya on Broadway started with a friendly greeting from the charming staff. The service continued to be excellent throughout and the food was reasonably good. I liked the concept of the brown rice sushi and would definitely eat it again. Overall...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3943814-Reviews-Shizenya_on_Broadway-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Shizenya on Hornby,"After a very long, hot, travel day, we wanted a low-key, lighter fare, relaxing dinner. Shizyena turned out to be the perfect spot. Our group of four enjoyed a great variety of sushi rolls and sashimi, along with a nice spicy tofu dish. The staff...More
The food is real good. With the help of the staff we slected 3 rolls. The food was excellent. Although the english was limited. The sushi is fresh and tastes like it did in Tokyo.
We had fabulous, fresh, crispy, clean and very tasty spicy salmon rolls, and their specialty a vegetable roll with mango and veggies (forgot name). We ate there twice during our three day stay at the Wedgewood hotel. Saw local Japanese eat dine there, which is...More
No reviews in a while so I'll add ours. Delicious sushi, udon noodles. Prompt service, just the right amount of attention. Good value. We were glad we came!
Very fresh fish, great service. I like that they use brown rice and organic vegetables. They also have gluten free options. Love it.
Just got into town Saturday evening and wanted something good and quick to eat. It‘s not that big but we got in without a reservation just after 8, ten minutes before last orders as they close at 9. Inside is nothing special, wooden tables and...More
For nice Japanese food near Vancouver Gallery of Art, cannot be beat. TIP: small place; be seated by 8 pm/closes 9pm.
My spouse and I dined here twice it was so good. The sushi is so fresh and well prepared and we really appreciated brown rice. We also enjoyed generous salad. Service was terrific
We went here for dinner as ""drop-ins"". We were just walking down Hornby and looking for a quiet place to eat. This place delivered and more. Service was friendly and attentive ut not too so. The vegetarian entrees were especially good. A green roll both...More
Brown rice sushi turns out not to be my thing, however if you like mushy sushi with little to no flavour this is your place . Overpriced and overhyped, consider going to 711 for sushi before here. Also the staff was pretty lack lustre. I...More
Really liked our takeout sushi lunch. Was done very fast (our order) and sushi were nice and fresh. Would recommend !
Used to be really good, quality went downhill Paid 20$ for lunch to get below mediocre sushi with barely any crab. See photos attached.
I was tentative about trying the Brown Rice version of Sushi but was pleasantly surprised. I had a dynamite roll, some Nigiri sushi and some salmon sashimi. Food was very fresh and well presented. Usually like my sashimi sliced a little thinner but was still...More
Second time visiting in two years. Delicious, fresh, healthy. Spicy salmon roll is excellent. Wasabi is wonderful.
This place is really lacking any flavour at all. Seriously bland food. Great you use brown rice. But it is like wrapping the sushi in wet cardboard. The chicken udon soup was the worst udon I’ve had anywhere. No flavour to the broth. And weird...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2165846-Reviews-Shizenya_on_Hornby-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Showcase Restaurant & Bar,"We were the table from hell. Several small children, people swapping places to chat, sporadic ordering of various drinks and food. Mariel was our server. She was unflappable, professional and sweet. She was one of the best servers I’ve seen and I hope the restaurant...More
During our stay at the Marriott Pinnacle, we enjoyed coming to this hotel lobby bar/restaurant to take advantage of their happy hour. It’s a better deal than the offering at the Executive Lounge. We particularly liked the refreshing, cold draft WIT beer. Noel the bartender...More
It is always a enjoyable visit to Marriott Showcase Restaurant and Bar as a lunchtime choice. Plenty to choose from and always delicious. I highly recommend the Butter Chicken and Tuna Tataki Bowl
This restaurant doubles up as the hotel dining room and cafe in the Marriott Pinnacle Downtown Hotel in Vancouver. The location is great, and the first impression is good. As hotel guests at the Marriott for five nights in September 2022, we had a breakfast...More
We had a great time stopping in for some drinks and dessert. Definitely will be coming by for a full meal next time!
We stayed at the Marriott Pinnacle and got in late after a grueling day of flying. No tables free, so we sat at the bar. Bartender couldn't have been nicer or more attentive. He got us drinks and food fast and we were able to...More
Yes it is located in a hotel, but after three breakfasts and one dinner, we can attest that this is a great place. Very attentive and professional staff - and enough of them to provide excellent service. Food quality was wonderful; at the breakfast buffet,...More
And much more than a convenient hotel restaurant, I've never had a bad experience here, and recommend it even if you're staying in another downtown Vancouver hotel. Excellent food, inventive cocktails, attentive service. There are long tables for a happy-hour crowd or a family lunch,...More
Stayed for four nights at the Vancouver Marriott Pinnacle Hotel and had breakfast each morning in the Showcase Restaurant. The food was fabulous and the service from Shannon was outstanding.
Had breakfast three mornings in a row. The service was fantastic - warm and inviting - and the food was excellent. The eggs benny was my favorite.
We stopped in for happy hour drinks. Noel was a really nice and helpful server. He went out of his way to make sure we felt like valuable customers. We don't live in Vancouver anymore so it was interesting to discuss changes that have occurred.
I had so many business meeting at these wonderful hotel , got invited for dinner few nights ago , restaurant located in the Marriott Pinnacle Hotel downtown , very cozy quite and comfortable with the Covid safety plan , good views of city scape ,...More
Fantastic Breakfast*****Dwayne - you rock!! Dwayne was the best server I have enjoyed in a long time- and I was at Chicago Fairmont all last week. Hot coffee the second we sat down, breakfast recommendations (loved the avocado toast), bottles of water for the trip...More
Our server was great. She was attentive and prompt. The food was well prepared and came quickly. The litmus test is always my youngest and she ate everything in front of her.
Thanks for the tasty food and the server was super good, great memory from one day to the next as well!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d708970-Reviews-Showcase_Restaurant_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Silk Lounge,"We were greeted and sat in a nice atmospheric table. The menu includes authentic delicious Indian dishes and delicious burgers for my kid who dose not like spicy food. We had the amazing appetizers/ Salmon pakoras!! Off the scale "" butter chicken"" and was is...More
Ordered on Uber eats. Was excited because they had cauliflower rice and keto options. They only sent one of the things I ordered - the other two items never came nor did they contact me to explain or see if I wanted something else instead....More
Hello Janine Thank you so much for ordering with us, We are very sorry for your disappointment, however, we would like to propose a 25% discount on your next order. We try to serve our customers with Organic freshly cooked food every time, for which...More
I tried Silk Lounge for the first time & will not be going back there. First of all, it took an hour for our food to arrive (only after I reminded the waitress that we were waiting or our meals) after we had ordered. It...More
Hello Dear, Thank you so much for your visit and we are glad that you loved our Ambience and decor. At SILK LOUNGE we create your dish fresh from basic organic ingredients, we don't use any pre-cooked curries/sauces or frozen food, this is the reason...More
Fantastic food, amazing decor, just a wonderful experience. The area of town not the best but very safe. Once you open the doors it like walking into paradise. Don’t be in a rush, food is worth the wait, enjoy the night. Very reasonable price for...More
Thank you for your positive feedback.
This place is a bit hidden right now in a Developing area of downtown. Well worth the little bit of effort to find it. Food is flavourful and spicy. The service is excellent. Best Indian food I’ve had In a while. Recommend the aloo gobi...More
Happy new year to everyone! As we enter the year of 2020, let us all try to prioritize our health through being more conscious about what we’re putting into our body. Eat fresh, eat healthy and eat organic. Organic is more than just a recent...More
Food was too rich.Service was too slow. The appetizers took an hour to arrive.It was not that they were busy.There were only 2 tables when we arrived.We ordered poora for our desert which came burnt with no taste..Great ambience and the decor is very lavish.Beautiful...More
Incredible dining experience. Silk Lounge is an oasis of bliss from the moment you approach the door from the street. You are then transported into another world once you pass the threshold. The decor is beyond perfect, every detail in place with great intention. I...More
An amazing experience. The food and drinks are fantastic! The decor is eclectic. The staff attentive. Just a great experience all around.More
Eu adorei esse restaurante! A decoração é um charme (eu e meus amigos fizemos praticamente um ensaio fotográfico), os garçons são educados e o preço é justo. Acredito que foi um dos melhores Moscow mule que experimentei durante os meus meses morando em Vancouver. Vale...More
Silk Lounge is magical. The best food, best service and best ambience. You have to experience to believe it. This is the best kept secret in Vancouver. 😀More
Wow! Amazing food, freshly made, such unique flavours, family recipes passed down from generation to generation. Excellent service! Highly recommend!More
I went to Silk restaurant with some friends who had recommended going. The restaurant isnt in the best area but once inside you are in a different world. The decor was quite incredible and the owner Gary gave us a tour and explained where everything...More
Looking for a truly magical experience? You may have heard about this new restaurant but if you haven’t tried it then you are nuts! Silk Lounge in Gastown is a stunningly gorgeous setting with French and Indian style cuisine that will melt in your mouth....More
I have never been to a restaurant where quality and attention to detail is so prominent. We went to celebrate a birthday last night and the place was spotless. Fresh flowers floating in blows down the hallway towards the bathroom, the kitchen is spectacular. The...More
This restaurant is by far the most lovely decor I have ever experienced. The food is also delicious, the service impeccable. I only wish there was a place like this in Chicago. So glad we decided to give it a try while on vacation in...More",19,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14070399-Reviews-Silk_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Silvestre Gusto Latino,"This place is like be in home. Excellent Peruvian food. Ceviche mixto, Choros a la chalaca y seco de res tasted just like in Peru! Irresistible to not try it! Family very friendly and the music makes your heart and appetite increased. Highly recommended.
It’s a very authentic Peruvian restaurant, simple, very flavourful food. We shared the pescato ceviche, which was delicious and empanadas with aji de gallina. Washed down with a very fresh pisco sour.
Attempted to try this place out as someone had recommended it. From the moment we walked in we were met with rudeness or indifference. The serving staff were not wearing masks and the table we were sat at was not cleaned or disinfected. All this...More
About as authentic as it gets and pretty much like sitting in a small picada in Lima. A great stop if you're running around in the Gastown area. My wife's ceviche and my lomo saltado were both very good.
My wife who is Peruvian and I ventured out while in Vancouver to seek out an authentic Peruvian restaurant and I am very glad we ate here. My wife who speaks Spanish spoke to the owner directly and the food was authentic and very good....More
What an amazing cultural meal! The food was top grade (kudos to the hard working kitchen staff), and the service was amazing. This was my first time here, and my first time with Peruvian cuisine. All I can say is “muy delisioso!”
Owner female is rude. While the lady serving us ice cream tried to help. I'm very happy I didn't end up eating something else at this place. Real Peruvians are not like the owner. Not worth it
Waited at 1 counter to eventually be told by the rudest girl to go to another counter where another Miss Happy Personality gave us our overpriced gelato to then be ordered to go back to the other counter to pay. Stood there for over 5mins...More
Just wandering around Gastown and found this little gem. It was pretty packed which to me is a good sign but they got me a table ok. Wasn't real hungry so had a sandwich which was very tasty. The waitress suggested a drink which I...More
We came here in search of Peruvian roasted chicken with green sauce...we found it! We started with a beef empanada and the papa rellena. Being from Chile, I am used to baked empanadas and this one's only downfall was that it was sprinkled with powdered...More
We had a very nice experience at this Peruvian restaurant. Food was excellent,plenty and at a reasonable price. I had the tofu with veggies and my husband the chicken with rice .Small place but well located in Gastown area. We enjoyed watching soccer while eating....More
A good selection of flavors, about 20, for the gelato. We sampled a few before buying some, all was flavorful and delicious.
First time here. Clean, attentive waitress, tasty Peruvian food. And the coffee with Peruvian roasted coffee, excellent. Having to stay longer in Vancouver, we will come back!
I only ever come in for the ceviche de pescado, it is phenomenal. So damn authentically Peruvian you could swear you were there in Peru enjoying it. I’ve had it on multiple occasions and never been disappointed. There is a little room for improvement with...More
We came one afternoon in late january nit knowing what to expect, it was a pleasant surprise, great flavors in every plate!!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3678273-Reviews-Silvestre_Gusto_Latino-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Simba's Grill Ltd,"Fantastic food from a talented chef. Great service and each dish was fresh, carefully prepared and delicious! We are so grateful for the excellent hospitality as well! We were visiting from London and would love for you to open a branch there for the jeera...More
Went for lunch with friends and ordered Mogo. Chicken surwa and kuku choma. The Mogo and kuku choma were above average, but the chicken surwa locked taste in space. The food was a nice blend of Afro Indian fusion, but the low rating relates to...More
Absolutely disgusting, food will fall on the floor and the manager will still tell the cooks/servers to cook and serve it to his customers. Treats his staff like slaves and doesn’t even let them keep their own tips. No food-safe rules being followed, kitchen is...More
This is an amazing restaurant the chef is an amazing person he has a heart of gold,nice size portions you won’t go hungry incredibly delicious food it’s a hidden jem. You must eat here.
Recently moved to Burnaby. Now located next to Starbucks, close to Canada Way, and Boundary road. This location is larger, has ample parking and a bright airy feel. Nicely decorated with African motif, showing a pride of heritage. What is more exceptional is the taste...More
I was so happy to find an East African restaurant! Their menu is awesome. The portions were huge! I went a little crazy ordering because it's so hard to find good Kenyan/Tanzanian food outside of the region. We especially enjoyed the mchicha (greens), fried fish,...More
We stopped two ladies on the street & asked them about this restaurant before going. They suggested we ask for the owner to choose our dinner & we were so glad we did. For the four of us - Muhogo (fried cassava root) to start,...More
Decided to give Simba's a try due to the fact that I live in close proximity-- it's alright. I tried Simba's chicken, which more or less equated to fried chicken. Also had a prawn & pasta dish which tasted okay. My favorite aspect of it...More
So ill be honest here.. one thing really offended me that the own rudely asked my 5 year old to stop making a noise (restaurant had one guest beside us) and he was just tapping his shoe. You ask me to tell my kid not...More
Very good food, enough to eat and enough served. Good staff and the price is also regular. Definetly go back there if I had the chance.
I'm a local and this is my favourite restaurant in Vancouver. The friends I introduce to Simba's rave about it after and go back. Simba will assist you with menu selections if you're unfamiliar with any of them. Have it hot - or not -...More
Because this restaurant is known for its grilled meats, we ordered the chef’s special meat platter for two, $50. Wow! We could not believe how much food there was! On a huge platter a bed of lettuce, cucumber and tomato with a side of rice,...More
Really good food, huge portions. The main thing that stands out I'd the service though. Owner comes to table and explains the menu and just has a general chat. You don't get that many places!
There is an unending choice of food on Denman Street in Vancouver’s West End. Food photos in the windows of this unassuming little restaurant looked intriguing so in we went. We were warmly greeted and seated. Menus and water appeared as we sat. Chef (and...More
The food flavour, quality and quantity was perfect. The owner came to our table treated us and suggested a perfect dish for the two of us to share. I'll definitely go back.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10258603-Reviews-Simba_s_Grill_Ltd-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Simply Thai Restaurant,"We ordered take out tonight. Cho Muang dumplings were great. Pad thai was terrible; tasteless. The duck in the red curry was good but the curry itself was bland and tasteless. The green curry with beef was good. For the price we were extremely disappointed...More
The atmosphere could be a little better, but nothing to complain about. Other than that, this is the best Pad Thai in town. Soooo good. will be back regularly.
It had been several years since I was at Simply Thai. It was one of my favourites back then. When my husband & I were in the Yaletown neighbourhood in mid December we opted to go to Simply Thai for a late lunch. They offer...More
Very tasty food. Small restaurant so limited amount of space however food does certainly not disappoint. Would recommend if you visit Yale town in Vancouver.
The restaurant we were heading to was full and it was raining so ended up ducking in here. The food was very nice and the portions just right. Service was almost too quick. I think we were in and out in less than 30 mins!
I finally gave this place a try after living in the area for many years. We were all very disappointed. The service was terrible. Many guest having to get up and ask for food, ask for bills, ask for water... I did enjoy my Red...More
Nice Thai restaurant situated across the street from where we were staying Visited twice, the first night the food was very tasty, but served look warm. Plates had not been warmed - I returned mine to be reheated Because the food was really nice we...More
Simply Thai offers a very reasonably priced lunch menu in the heart of Yaletown. Portions are smaller than most restaurants, but the art of good cooking is flavour. Very good service, great green curry and nice to sit outside in the ambience of Yaletown. A...More
I went here for lunch during the week. They have a special which is a selection of meals at $10 and you get a spring roll with it. Service was good and quick and we sat outside on the patio, which was nice. The spring...More
Had the veggie curry and rice and was very impressed with the taste and price. Service was very good too.
After reading the reviews of this place, I was looking forward to eating here. However we were rather disappointed. Service was reasonable, but the food was not really up to scratch. We have never been to a Thai restaurant and had such small portions, and...More
A welcome addition to the area. I had the seafood curry and spring rolls. It was delicious. The restaraunt is super clean and my server, Reya was courteous and attentive.
I don't know how I had missed eating at this charming place with its great patio right in the heart of Yaletown. Today I went for lunch. There are many choices for a flat $10.00 and beer for $4.00. With it's lovely decor and attentive...More
We ordered takeout from this restaurant, and were impressed with the freshness and taste of both the Pad Thai and Massaman. We weren’t looking for a big meal, but enjoyed the fresh flavours and tastes. Could have been a little hotter for medium. But good...More
Came in for to go Tom soup and was shocked that the portion size of a large soup for two was in the same container as a single to go rice order from most places. The soup looked as if it was made with zero...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709010-Reviews-Simply_Thai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sitar Indian Restaurant,"Dined twice at this excellent restaurant during our recent Vancouver visit. At lunch we just wanted something light so had the samoosas and chicken wings. The samoosa pastry was the nicest we have eaten, and we eat a lot of Indian. It was light, not...More
thank you very much for theses moments. We went here a couple of time and we will come back for sure. Best experience in Vancouver !!!!! Don’t waste time and go for it
We ate here one evening having booked a table earlier that day - but no need as not at all busy even on a Bank Holiday weekend. We were not able to get either of the drinks we chose from the menu as they had...More
Surprisingly very good Indian considering the reviews. The place was not at all busy, we did go early midweek. We ate alone outside in a lovely tree lined square. The restaurant has been active at this location for Forty years. The food was better than...More
In 30+ years of living in/near Lower Mainland, I’d never gone to Sitar. I did tonight. OMG literally best Indian meal we’ve EVER had (and my wife has eaten IN INDIA! :) ) and in the top 5 best meals I’ve ever had with samosas...More
We had the vegetarian dinner for 2. The papadams were good and crunchy. The vegetarian samosas were just ok. The eggplant was nice and tangy. But the muttar paneer needed some flavor. The rice pudding was good. My wife had a Lassi and I had...More
My mum and I went for lunch after attending the Circle Craft Fair this past weekend. We were hungry, and had a wonderful lunch of veggie samosa, butter chicken, eggplant bharta, with garlic nan bread. The food was hot, not too spicy, and we had...More
Indian/Bangladesh food is our favourite cuisine so we've had many a curry around the world. The Sitar served flavoursome food. Thoroughly enjoyed all the dishes and sides. Waiting staff were very attentive and polite.
We were coming in late on Sep 30 and craving Indian food. We called ahead to see if we could have a table for 5 adults at 8pm. They said no problem as they don’t close until 10pm. Once we arrived we noticed we were...More
A great Indian dinner for all of us after 7 days of Canadian cuisine. Perfect location in Gas Town, Awesome food specially my Gosht Masala. The staff was over courteous. As a Restaurant Expert Level 15 on Trip Advisor I would rate it as the...More
When I visit my friends in Vancouver, I suggest we eat at Sitar. I enjoy the food and ambience very much. It is good value and the staff is very nice. Fun to be right in Gastown, too.
My experience of this was just not at all what I expected. I ordered my dish to be hot in spice and it was mild at best. It lack depth in the flavour and it was just not great at all. You get a lot...More
Since I have been going here 1986, it is still the Best Indian Food around. Mouth watering dishes include: butter chicken, chicken vindaloo, The best vegetable biryani, Veggy Samosa and the list goes on including lassi. Yummy I want to go back now!
Sitar is located is located in the heart of Gas Town. Casual Ambiance. Good portions of food. Stuff for friendly. Meal meal was well priced.
My wife and I visited Vancouver recently. We like Indian food, and nearly everywhere we travel we manage to fit in an Indian meal somewhere. The food here was pretty good, but the service was a bit lacking. (Surely the waitress could have replaced the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709031-Reviews-Sitar_Indian_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Six Acres,"Cery welcoming host, Aba. One of the best! Great experience. She recommended greats drinks. We will surely come back.
We visited Six Acres after having read glowing reviews of the food online. We hoped that this would be our experience, but it was not to be. We never got to try the food due to safety issues. When we arrived, we were seated by...More
Welcomed our group in and we loved the food. Even fussy kids were well looked after by the staff. Adults found tasty beverages also. Big smiles and instagram posts followed.
Great ambience and service . Cosy little place With good wide choice on menu . Loved the poutine and bison tartare , lamb shepherds pie .
In a group of 8 we chose from the happy hour menu (3-6 from memory). Everyone was very happy with their meals. I had the Mac cheese with mushrooms which was not a huge portion but filled me up nicely for a ‘mini’. Nice Pilsner...More
Enjoyed a drink in this cute place. We had a view of Gassy Jack’s backside. Would have liked to sit outside but inside was very quiet and relaxing.
Stopped here for a drink whilst sightseeing Gas town.Not-to busy whilst we were there, but was getting busy by the time we were leaving.Food menu looked good.But did not order any food,would go back.Able to sit outside the sun was shining. The place was all...More
Six Acres is right in the heart of Gastown. Actually if you sit on the patio, you'll have a great view of all the people visiting Vancouver who stop by to take a picture of the Gassy Jack statue (which is actually quite funny since...More
Stopped for a drink whilst in Gastown, nothing special and went mainly for happy hour. Beers very small and Aperol which was on happy hour was very weak. Not that good but did the job stopping for a refreshment.
Six Acres is perfectly located in Gas Town - a great place to people watch. We had the poutine and mussels which were both very tasty, along with some BC wine which was nice. The service was good, even though it was busy - it...More
Such a great place to sit and eat lunch and watch the world go by. Their mini crab burgers were delicious
Extremely slow service - over cooked fish. Three of our party ordered cod and chips; after a 45 minute wait two were served and one was served just the fish and told the chips would follow in 10 minutes! The waitress did her best and...More
On a corner in Gastown. Young crowd, good people watching. Food just fair. Poutine tasted of canned bouillon. Crab cakes not distinctive though buns were flaky and good. Beer was OK, but a couple of menu selections were not available and the IPA-heavy list did...More
Friendly service and wonderful comfort food. I went with a group of friends for their unhappynhour and it was awesome -- mini sizes of the poutine, mac n cheese, and salads mean you can try a little bit of everything. They also make an excellent...More
We enjoyed a late afternoon happy hour with a few small plates. A little loud but a fun spot. Corn fritters, Mac and cheese and beet salad were all good.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d798966-Reviews-Six_Acres-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Slickity Jim's,"Needed breakfast before some Main Street shopping on. Saturday morning. This place is full of quirky and fun decor. Was with the family. Two teenage boys so big appetites. We all ordered something different and everything was fantastic. Highly recommend
Took a friend. Absolutely loved the vibe. Great service, excellent food choices to choose from. Good music
On a rainy cool morning in Vancouver my daughter recommended Slickity Jim's for Brunch - our last meal together before she headed off back east for another term of university. The place was warm and inviting, the coffee was hot and fresh. For Breakfast the...More
First time visiting this eatery. A diverse menu including vegetarian and vegan options. Delicious food and great service! I will return!
Thanks biff Naked for the terrible service, passive aggressive attitude and poor customer care. Just moved to this hood. Wont be returning here
Visiting Vancouver was reccomend by some locals. Food was amazing!! Very eclectic decor but very fun for the type of business. Being a smaller mom and pop type of shop dont expect step by step service, but the friendliness of the staff make the overall...More
Lively people watching; bustling sounds of Main Street. Great coffee and huge portioned breakfast. And if you ever need a little “hair of the dog that bit you” they offer a full service bar.
The Ceasar was the best I've ever had. The Cuban sandwich was so good but the side of fried potatoes showed effort. Very pro. See y'all again!
I love the No-Frills ambiance. The service was excellent the foods were excellent. Early morning breakfast eggs benedict were awesome. I will definitely be back
The menu is very fun, the food is just amazing and the place cozy and fun with an affordable prize. There is nothing not to love. <3
I came here with friends for brunch. It’s a cozy place with interesting decor. There might be a bit of a wait because it’s not a very large restaurant. The servers were friendly and courteous. I ordered the shakshuka and it was really delicious. There...More
After waiting for 30 mins was really looking forward to breakfast here . The waitress was great and only one there doing all the work the cook was unfriendly to her as I sat right in front of the kitchen. I ordered a basic breakfast...More
Went for breakfast on a Sat.morning rather than Sun. morning. Was easier to get into and still very interesting dishes on the menu. Since it opens at 8:30 am it tends to attract a local clientele on Sundays so Saturday is a better option to...More
Wonderful little spot to grab breakfast if you're really into Eggs Benedicts. They have a huge selection of variety of ways you can get your eggs with hollandaise. The waitress was extremely friendly despite it being hot during the morning. She offered us the cold...More
We were looking for a new breakfast place in Vancouver and came upon Slickity Jim’s. Great decor and unique menu. The food was awesome...we will definitely go back.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2425832-Reviews-Slickity_Jim_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Smoke And Bones BBQ,"Not bad! The waitress and service was amazing I will start by saying that. They were very accommodating and sweet. The food was ok. The brisket was amazing and next time I just get that! The ribs were so so the pulled pork was also...More
We were a party of 3 and had difficulty getting a booth because the booth for 4 was reserved. They ran out of chicken and tried substituting ground chicken without asking. The ribs and brisket were over cooked and dry. The beans, corn bread and...More
I was there tonight with my friends for dinner. One of the waiters was so mean to us. The other one drop the food on my hiking clothes which needs laundry and they simply just said sorry. When we paid for our bills, the first...More
Came for dinner on a weekend evening; had the sliders and sweet tea cocktail - both very good. also tried the brisket sandwich which was good but there was too much bbq sauce for me. great vibe though, seemed like a nice patio and polite...More
On the way back from Lighthouse park , drove pass by the restaurant , girlfriend ask me can we stop in for lunch , I never say No to food . special BBQ , they open 12 noon to 9 pm , all day menu...More
Happened across this place by chance and what a find. Food is amazing, tasty and plentiful. Staff were so friendly and chatty. We ate the beef brisket and the Louisiana jambalaya. The brisket was beautiful and tender with plenty of tasty sides. Absolutely no hesitation...More
My friend and I headed over to Smoke and Bones on a rainy Sunday afternoon to sample the barbecue there. It was relieving to have our QR codes and ID thoroughly scanned on entering, and then escorted to a small table near the semi open...More
While I’ve had smoke and bones for a catered event in the past, this was the first time we’ve had a family dinner from this place. Ordering online was easy and quick. My order was ready as expected and pick up was a breeze. While...More
Service friendly but occasionally comical. We once were served our ribs before the drinks even arrived! Overall the food takes it. We are massive fans and go back 2-3 a month.
After a long day meeting in N. Vancouver ,my business partner surprised me having a dinner at the Smoke and Bones BBQ ,(The rush hours is crazy ) they know I am a meat monster , it is my first visit , since the new...More
Food was very tasty, but the service was even better. Couldn't have asked for a more awesome waitress Wish I had gotten her name.
I am no stranger to BBQ having spent several years in the US South, and I can testify that there aren't too many pit joints down there that can outdo this place. Everything is absolutely spot on, the fat fries are golden crispy, the cornbread...More
Here we go. I feel sorry for giving such a bad review to this place. We’ve been there so many times and the impression I have is that the quality of their food is falling ... like, badly! Such a great place and not many...More
Great place for a casual dinner. Brought my boys to the restaurant and they had the brisket and poutine. They liked the southern-BBQ spin on the poutine and said the brisket was the best they have had. Atmosphere is comfortable and casual … sports on...More
We have frequented this restaurant and have always liked it. We visited tonight with 4 out of town guests and we were blown away. First we had wings (dry rub) and they were super delicious. Everyone ordered a different entree- black and blue burger, ribs,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d13152060-Reviews-Smoke_And_Bones_BBQ-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Snowy Village Dessert Cafe,"Didn't know what to expect When I was introduced to this place in the food court of Aberdeen Centre. But what a lovely surprised. But knowing I went for the Oreo one which was shaved milk ice with Oreo crumbs and a little whipped cream....More
The sign at the front when you first walk in doesn't make any sense. I believe it means ""make sure you can find a table and seat yourself before you order because we're not serving you if you don't have a seat"" (which is common...More
Went here for desserts and tried the bingsoo, whipped cream, fresh fruit, Korean style shaved ice, I was surprised by the size of the desserts, very generous and filling but the shaved ice is pleasantly lite, very odd experience due to the silkiness and flavour
It’s to die for. We ate it the evening before we were running a half marathon bec all of us were craving shaved ice. I could eat here everyday. Casual fun place. Super packed at night when we were there. Two of us could have...More
Really enjoyed the mango shaved ice. Large size shared with three people. Casual, fun atmosphere. Recommended.
Took the kids here on a recommendation from a friend and she was spot on. Kids got the Oreo Cookie and Green Tea Bingsoo and the Takoyashi dessert. Everything was a hit. The regular size were huge but a 6 & 7 year old were...More
We stopped in here for dessert. My sister had the Cheese Cake Bingsoo and I had the chocolate Bingsoo. Both were amazing! My other sister tried the taiyaki, which was also delicious. I look forward to returning and eating here again. The servings are huge,...More
The food and coffee here is amazing. Snowy village really takes their time to layer their ingredients into the bingsoo and they pack the toppings on top. Their fish cake isn't like any other taiyaki because they use layered butter pastry for it!
These shaved ice were so huge and more fruits and stuff were put at the bottom. It’s so worth your money and time!!
Went to the Robson Street West End location. Ordered the oreo bingsoo and the green tea bingsoo. Our palates prefer the oreo flavour, the green tea flavour wasn't as prominent as we usually like, but the red bean topping was delicious. Highly recommend!
Location is kinda hard to find, no parking, limited seating but they are quick to find you one, you sign your name on a waitlist sheet. It's a cool place,little stools and simple tables, you order at the counter and they bring food to your...More
We’ve been here multiple times and this is one of the places we come to visit every time we are in the area, even in winter times. Our favorite are mango bingsoo and taiyaki. Bingsoo wise, it’s not to watery nor too creamy, and sweetness...More
I went to snowy village all excited because people have been saying great things about it! It was ok... the ice cream tasted like ice and the cheese cake didn’t taste like cheese cake at all. I’d go back but wouldn’t be my first choice.
Asian dessert that is really good! Came here to enjoy their famous bingsoo and was not disappointed. The place is small and we were able to get tables right away; howveer, they have set up a tape stand outside for potential lines which I would...More
A friend told me to try this out and I am so glad I did. I ordered a strawberry bingsoo as the mango was sold out. It was the best and yummiest treat. I can’t wait to go back and have it again.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d9822575-Reviews-Snowy_Village_Dessert_Cafe-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
So Hyang Korean Cuisine,"Cold noodle only had seasonal on the menu, but $15.95 on the check; Bulgogi $17.95 on the menu, but 19.95 on the bill........
Perhaps unfair to review this restaurant as not particularly familiar with Korean cuisine. But tried their luncheon specials and the food was OK..perhaps the bulgogi a trifle sweet for my taste. Very quick and friendly service, prices were good (around $12 for the lunch special)...More
I know they don't take reservations, and I can respect that. So I called ahead to confirm they weren't busy before leaving the house. Arrive 20 minutes later and they are full. What can you do? They told me to wait outside on the street,...More
We decided to try South Vancouver for a different dining destination after having just come from Chinatown and not finding a restaurant to our liking. After we parked our car on a side street, we walked up Fraser Street looking for a restaurant and by...More
Have frequented this restaurante several times in the past. Great place for a typical Korean meal. They have good side dishes with whatever dishes you order. It's not your Korean barbeque restaurant but it serves up pretty good japchae, Korean pancakes, bibimbap etc. Have not...More
Small neighborhood restaurant serving authentic Korean food. Good lunch specials. Beef or chicken bulgogi or spicy pork with rice, served with a bowl of soup and traditional side dishes (banchan) like kimchi, sweet potatoes, marinated bean sprouts and fish cake. My favorite, the spicy pork...More
I am a Korean-Canadian-American kyo-po. I enjoy my ""western"" food but I love me my Korean food even more so. How many ways can you spell Banchan? My family and I enjoy frequenting Korean restaurants in different cities. Some factors that determine whether it's been...More
While the Punjabi Market area of Vancouver is primarily focused on Main Street between 49th and 51st, I’ve always considered the neighbouring area along Fraser Street to be an extension of the Punjabi Market. What you notice, however, is that there are a lot of...More
We always come back to this restaurant because they simply do the basic things right -- good service, good foofd and reasonable price! It is just plain tasty korean food anytime of the day! There is almost always a line up so be prepared to...More
My family eats here often and we are never disappointed. The food is very high quality so we always have a great meal. But besides the food we come back for the warm and friendly service from all the staff there. We are made to...More
The restaurant is only small but the food certainly packs a punch here. Great service combined with excellent flavours and a good selection make this a must try. We had dumplings, bimbimbap and kimchi pancakes and every dish was excellent. Attentive helpful service and a...More
We decided to go back to our local favorite restaurant to celebrate for New Year's Eve. The quality of service is outstanding. The restaurant was super busy but the servers were very attentive and were constantly filling up our tea and replenishing the delicious side...More
I have been coming to So Hyang for 2 years now, I have never once been disappointed here. Neither food nor service, I like quite a few things here, but I think the seafood pancake and the sweet and spicy chicken are some of my...More
Maybe it was the open parking space just outside the door of the restaurant or else we would have missed this little discovery on Fraser. This is an authentic Korean experience and the lunch was excellent. The menu is interesting and the service is friendly....More
Been here many times- my go to for Korean food. Service is always good. If you have a party of 5 or more, recommend you reserve as they only have 1 or 2 tables that can accommodate . Service - 5*, Food- 5*, Ambience-5* absolutely...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8353509-Reviews-So_Hyang_Korean_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Soft Peaks,"After dinner, we decided to go for ice cream even though it was a bit cold outside. We tried the special flavour of the month cinnamon pear and we also tried the matcha red bean. The soft ice cream is very good. Toppings are ok....More
Amazing ice cream here, staff are super nice and I can't wait to come back again! The matcha is delicious.
It is a perfect time for ice cream, so I'm glad we bumped into this shop. I like their choice of milk source for their product. A lot is happening on the menu, but once you figure it, numerous options open up to you. I...More
An excellent Asian ice cream place. The flavours were unusual, and worth trying. I went for the green forest - which is green matcha with condensed milk and sweet red beans. It was very good. I look forward to coming here often in the summer.
This Ice Cream shop sets itself apart by serving good quality, no sugar added Ice Cream, in a way that you’d find in a Starbucks. The servers carefully and artfully line the cup with various syrups, honey or whatever toppings you choose. Its unique and...More
Soft Peaks recently opened a location across from Metrotown carrying their signature organic soft serve ice cream with cool toppings. Their new location is actually quite spacious inside and I was surprised at how quiet it was (I think I was the only one there...More
I stumbled upon Soft Peaks walking back to my hotel. Their ice cream is simply amazing -- fresh, light, and delicious. So worth a visit.
This place is my new favorite ice cream place. Full disclosure, I'm not a huge ice cream fan. The only type of ice cream I really do enjoy is a soft serve. When I heard about this place I thought it's a perfect place to...More
Entering the store, I got a really good vibe and feeling. Industrial and clean. The menu was easy to navigate. I tried the blueberry small ice cream. So creamy and texture superb. They use Avalon ice cream which is organic. Not too sweet. A bit...More
I came here craving the gelato that Vancouver and BC are famous for. This place does ice cream in their own way with unique toppings and I walked away pleasantly surprised. It is worth a try, a break from the regular ice cream shops.",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d14066411-Reviews-Soft_Peaks-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sophie's Cosmic Cafe,"Oh my, what a gem of a place. Everything is 5 stars; atmosphere, service and food. Hi hi my recommend. Had the Sante Fe eggs Benedict. So much food on the plate and delicious.
The food here was very tasty. The portions are a nice size. The service was great. I used to go to this Cafe over 25 years ago when I lived in Vancouver. It's nice to see that the restaurant is still in business after all...More
Its not what it used to be that's for sure. The kitchen needs to be told to put some love into the food because it sure isn't there now.
I don't leave reviews but couldn't let this go. My son and I just had breakfast here while waiting for my car to get serviced, I have seen lineups at this restaurant in the past but that was quite a long time ago. We were...More
Came on a Saturday morning and it seemed that everyone in Kitsilano was eating breakfast/brunch here. The place was packed. All the portions we saw were huge. We opted for apple pie with coffee. The apple pie portion was enormous, almost the size of a...More
We really enjoyed our first time to Sophies. The food was darn good. The music was little off though. We expected soft fifties and sixties music, to match the decor. The music was fairly loud at 8 am and was a mixture of techno and...More
We always assume that everyone in Vancouver has either been to Mexico .... or any the very least has some vague idea of it .... maybe even from looking at it on a post card. Apparently none of the above is true for the cooks...More
The breakfast was really good, some of the staff were super nice but our waitress in particular was very absent. Service was definitely a bit lacking but overall the food was really good.
These burgers are out of this world @sophiescosmiccafe! Loving their cosmic workout burger with the patty covered in cheddar cheese, tons of mushrooms and crispy applewood smoked bacon. Super delicious! And nothing wrong with having their scrambled eggs, bacon with a side salad… gotta get...More
Went here with the family. Heard a lot of good things but the particular dish I had was pretty bad. I had the Mediterranean omelette and there is nothing Mediterranean about this omelette and it does not taste very good. When you think Mediterranean, you...More
There are some things in life you just do, for us it’s going to Sophie’s Cosmic Cafe. The place has interesting items inside and the food has consistently been fabulous. I’ve been going here for for a number of years and I’ve never had a...More
I went there for the second time today and I was afraid that with the pandemic something would have change. Still it was perfect! Great milkshake, smoked salmon with eggs so good! My friend had waffles and she said that was also really good!
I started going to Sophies in 1993, when I was 26. Lines were always long and out the door on weekends but it was sooo worth the wait. Lunch and dinners never disappointed either. I no longer live in Vancouver (sadly), and I now have...More
Had a wonderful time; good food, the waffles were great.In the heart of Kitsilano. Only prob is a bit of a line up so get there early
The retro decorations in this cafe are awesome. We had the poached eggs with extra crispy bacon and the western omelet with sausage. Both meals came with toast and potatoes. We just came back from crabbing on a cold, rainy day, and the hot chocolate...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709135-Reviews-Sophie_s_Cosmic_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sopra Sotto,"A very nice Italian restaurant. I've only tried their pizza and was very good. Excellent crispy crust, but a bit too loaded on the toppings for my taste. An excellent environment and very good service. Overall a very good experience.
A very nice Italian restaurant. I've only tried their pizza and was very good. Excellent crispy crust, but a bit too loaded on the toppings for my taste. An excellent environment and very good service. Overall a very good experience.
We heard good things about this place so we thought we try it. It was fully booked except at 4:45 and we were told that we had a time limit. Never like hearing that. Our friends were late so we enjoyed some happy hour drinks...More
We heard good things about this place so we thought we try it. It was fully booked except at 4:45 and we were told that we had a time limit. Never like hearing that. Our friends were late so we enjoyed some happy hour drinks...More
Although the staff were obviously rushed off their feet, the service could not be faulted. We all loved our food but especially me as I was able to have a gluten free pizza which was the best I've eaten and I've had the pleasure of...More
Although the staff were obviously rushed off their feet, the service could not be faulted. We all loved our food but especially me as I was able to have a gluten free pizza which was the best I've eaten and I've had the pleasure of...More
shame lovely place. my mains arrived and sat in front of me for 7-10 before my other two friends'and arrived . it was dreadful. why serve one person and and not all 3 of us at the same time. so disappointing the manager I m...More
shame lovely place. my mains arrived and sat in front of me for 7-10 before my other two friends'and arrived . it was dreadful. why serve one person and and not all 3 of us at the same time. so disappointing the manager I m...More
This is a very neat place where service was pleasant and the food - tasty - that particular evening. There are many vegetarian options on the menu. The Tuscan salad and vegetarian pizza were both great. They make good coffee too.
This is a very neat place where service was pleasant and the food - tasty - that particular evening. There are many vegetarian options on the menu. The Tuscan salad and vegetarian pizza were both great. They make good coffee too.
Don't know why we did not go to this place before. Great food, great staff and very well managed. When we were there we made another reservation for a larger group in April.
Don't know why we did not go to this place before. Great food, great staff and very well managed. When we were there we made another reservation for a larger group in April.
I have never reviewed a restaurant I haven’t eaten in recently, but SS gets my first. The time was 11:48 am Saturday, twelve minutes before opening time. The sign was out, the lights were on, it looked open to me. So we walked in, my...More
I have never reviewed a restaurant I haven’t eaten in recently, but SS gets my first. The time was 11:48 am Saturday, twelve minutes before opening time. The sign was out, the lights were on, it looked open to me. So we walked in, my...More
I love this place. We have been three times now (we are new to the neighbourhood) and it is our favorite. Atmosphere is lovely and staff wonderful. But the food, oh the food..... big sigh. So good. The choice of pasta isn't huge. Maybe around...More
I love this place. We have been three times now (we are new to the neighbourhood) and it is our favorite. Atmosphere is lovely and staff wonderful. But the food, oh the food..... big sigh. So good. The choice of pasta isn't huge. Maybe around...More
We enjoyed a fantastic Sunday lunch at Sopra Sotto - delicious, authentic Italian food; professional, prompt, and friendly service; and the opportunity to hear Bruno Hubert play solo piano - he is a real talent and a treat to listen to. We will definitely go...More
We enjoyed a fantastic Sunday lunch at Sopra Sotto - delicious, authentic Italian food; professional, prompt, and friendly service; and the opportunity to hear Bruno Hubert play solo piano - he is a real talent and a treat to listen to. We will definitely go...More
Today we had a pizza diablo at Sopra Sotto. It was delicious , tender and the tomato sauce had the refreshing fragrance of basil. The service was professional, friendly, and quick. Highly recommended.
Today we had a pizza diablo at Sopra Sotto. It was delicious , tender and the tomato sauce had the refreshing fragrance of basil. The service was professional, friendly, and quick. Highly recommended.
We had an absolute blast trying this place out! The food here was unreal and we are so glad that we finally came here. The pizza and the gnocchi are amazing. Our server Adil was great, we can't be back again.
We had an absolute blast trying this place out! The food here was unreal and we are so glad that we finally came here. The pizza and the gnocchi are amazing. Our server Adil was great, we can't be back again.
Wife and I went for date night on commercial and thought to try this spot. The pizza qnd the pasta wasnt the best. I've had better pizza and pasta but for the price and atmosphere I would expect better food. Will have to maybe try...More
Wife and I went for date night on commercial and thought to try this spot. The pizza qnd the pasta wasnt the best. I've had better pizza and pasta but for the price and atmosphere I would expect better food. Will have to maybe try...More
The server was friendly, the food delicious and the wine flavourful. What more would you ask for? Not much. The main room is stylish, the terasse very pleasant. We had a simple lunch, Caesar salad and pizza with a glass of Vermentino. All good. A...More
The server was friendly, the food delicious and the wine flavourful. What more would you ask for? Not much. The main room is stylish, the terasse very pleasant. We had a simple lunch, Caesar salad and pizza with a glass of Vermentino. All good. A...More
Great choice for my Birthday! Everyone was happy! Yummy pizza! And Pasta dishes! Ready for another round good pizza!
Great choice for my Birthday! Everyone was happy! Yummy pizza! And Pasta dishes! Ready for another round good pizza!
An Italian restaurant with some pastas and a good selection of pizzas. I am a sucker for Quattro Formaggi pizza. It turned out to be just what I wanted. There are others that look inviting. Alas, my wife is not into carbs particularly and found...More
An Italian restaurant with some pastas and a good selection of pizzas. I am a sucker for Quattro Formaggi pizza. It turned out to be just what I wanted. There are others that look inviting. Alas, my wife is not into carbs particularly and found...More
We started with a few salads which were good and then enjoyed a few thin crust pizzas and a calzone and they were excellent . The service was ok. We will definitely go back
We started with a few salads which were good and then enjoyed a few thin crust pizzas and a calzone and they were excellent . The service was ok. We will definitely go back
Cute place. Food was lovely and pizza was tasty. Friendly and cosy atmosphere. Did not feel rushed and attentive to our needs. Definately would come back again
Cute place. Food was lovely and pizza was tasty. Friendly and cosy atmosphere. Did not feel rushed and attentive to our needs. Definately would come back again
We shared panzerotti trio and rucola salad for starters, followed by pizzas. We will be back definitely, we have to try their pasta dishes.
We shared panzerotti trio and rucola salad for starters, followed by pizzas. We will be back definitely, we have to try their pasta dishes.
A smaller venue, very busy but the service was awesome. Had the pasta and it was yummo! Next try will be the pizza!
A smaller venue, very busy but the service was awesome. Had the pasta and it was yummo! Next try will be the pizza!
Too busy, don’t bother. Spread your business around the neighbourhood instead. Menu looks good, bit pricey.
Too busy, don’t bother. Spread your business around the neighbourhood instead. Menu looks good, bit pricey.
Fresh, sophisticated and tasty. Sopra Sotto did not disappoint in any way. Visited on a busy Saturday night, and felt like I discovered a little bit of Italy in Burnaby.
Fresh, sophisticated and tasty. Sopra Sotto did not disappoint in any way. Visited on a busy Saturday night, and felt like I discovered a little bit of Italy in Burnaby.
Love this restaurant. As close as you can get to authentic style Italian pizza without going to Italy. The only reason I'm not giving five stars is because when it's busy...it is so noisy you can't hear your companion talk.
Love this restaurant. As close as you can get to authentic style Italian pizza without going to Italy. The only reason I'm not giving five stars is because when it's busy...it is so noisy you can't hear your companion talk.
Busy place but they keep things moving along and the food is very nice. Very traditional crust, wood fired oven cooked. Pasta was very good. Peroni on tap.
Busy place but they keep things moving along and the food is very nice. Very traditional crust, wood fired oven cooked. Pasta was very good. Peroni on tap.
Only found out about this pizza place as it was recently written about in the Burnaby Now. I drive by here every day but had not seen it till I was looking. We popped in for supper last night and shared a Quatro Formaggio Pizza,...More
Only found out about this pizza place as it was recently written about in the Burnaby Now. I drive by here every day but had not seen it till I was looking. We popped in for supper last night and shared a Quatro Formaggio Pizza,...More
Tried this place which was recommended by a friend of mine. On Friday around 7pm was fairly busy but we were seated Ina bout 25 minutes. Small place but very modern setup. The server was really nice and quick. Ordered a Peroni on tap, pasta...More
Tried this place which was recommended by a friend of mine. On Friday around 7pm was fairly busy but we were seated Ina bout 25 minutes. Small place but very modern setup. The server was really nice and quick. Ordered a Peroni on tap, pasta...More
The food is amazing but this location doesn't have (or didn't as of February) the lunch specials that the Commercial Drive location does so lunch although excellent is too costly for regular visits. It is a beautiful restaurant and the service is as impeccable as...More
The food is amazing but this location doesn't have (or didn't as of February) the lunch specials that the Commercial Drive location does so lunch although excellent is too costly for regular visits. It is a beautiful restaurant and the service is as impeccable as...More
We live in the hood and venture all around for authentic cuisine. We are lucky and happy to have Sopra Sotto so close by. The staff and service was great, they are open to tell you what they like and suggest, and it's done with...More
We live in the hood and venture all around for authentic cuisine. We are lucky and happy to have Sopra Sotto so close by. The staff and service was great, they are open to tell you what they like and suggest, and it's done with...More
We live in cove and love our Italian eateries. This is a great spot, lovely decor especially birds behind pizza oven. We always try the Margareta pizza as our base and loved it, not too soggy and easy to fold. They even provide scissors for...More
We live in cove and love our Italian eateries. This is a great spot, lovely decor especially birds behind pizza oven. We always try the Margareta pizza as our base and loved it, not too soggy and easy to fold. They even provide scissors for...More
My friends and I were happily surprised by this small, yet bright and welcoming Italian restaurant on Hastings street, in Burnaby. We enjoyed the food and the ambience. They feature a wooden woven, where they make delicious thin crust pizzas. Delicious Salads and pastas are...More
My friends and I were happily surprised by this small, yet bright and welcoming Italian restaurant on Hastings street, in Burnaby. We enjoyed the food and the ambience. They feature a wooden woven, where they make delicious thin crust pizzas. Delicious Salads and pastas are...More
We have been waiting for them to open and we were not disappointed. A nice clean room with a large forno at the end. The wash rooms are spotless and everything is accessible. I had the pasta special and my wife had a pizza. Both...More
We have been waiting for them to open and we were not disappointed. A nice clean room with a large forno at the end. The wash rooms are spotless and everything is accessible. I had the pasta special and my wife had a pizza. Both...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13884680-Reviews-Sopra_Sotto-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sorella,"We had a great time here, the food here is amazing and the staff are amazing. The carbonara at Sorella was definitely my favourite, the desserts are amazing too. Can't wait to come back again soon!
Lovely place with delicious fresh food. I had the black truffle cacio pepe and my partner had the linguine vongole. The burrata was delish but way too overpriced at 26$! The main dishes was not overpriced at 27$ each. The doughnuts were filling and delicious.
Food was delicious, well-flavored, cooked beautifully. so good. Clams were really good; duck and porcini ragu pappardelle was soo good. Lots of sauce, tender moist duck, pappardelle tasted fresh. Zeppole for dessert was also really good; very light and tasty. Service was polite but not...More
We have always gone to Sorella prior to COVID and now that they are open again we are still anxious about eating in a public places so over the last 3 weeks we have done takeout dinners. Every time, they have created unparalleled dishes. For...More
Thursday night, place packed at 6.30, lucky to only wait 20 min, then had the Tues/wed/thurs/ special of salad split for two, choice of menu pasta each, dessert and bottle of very reasonable house Rioja Crianza red wine for $99.00 for two. Great service, food...More
Every time I come to this restaurant I leave beyond satisfied! The food here is of the highest quality and is prepared with love. The flavours are rich yet balanced and just unbeatable! Pretty much everything is made in house from scratch, including the fresh...More
Great evening at Sorella. Family style pre set 4course dinner was fantastic. Very cosy restaurant. We had a family celebration here and Sara was great to deal with. Highly recommended.
Wow! We stumbled into this small neighborhood place before a movie at the Park and are so glad we did!! Amazing food and service, especially loved the Cornish Hen, arugula and chocolate salami!! We will be back !!
I typically eat out and have eaten at many Italian restaurants - I thought that being a small restaurant that they would have out of this world pasta - but unfortunately I found the food average and a bit over priced.
Had an amazing evening meal here as was staying nearby. The waitress was very accommodating and managed to fit us even though we hadn’t booked. Food selection was on a chalk board and included a good mix of Italian choices. Food was delicious, between us...More
A casual cozy little restaurant to enjoy a meal before or after a movie at the close-by Park Theater. The food is authentic Italian and is quite good. Nice flavors and attractively presented. We were disappointed, however, that the pasta is not freshly made. It...More
Have been here twice now while visiting Vancouver and the food and service are very good. Good wine selection as well.
I enjoyed the atmosphere, service, and food. I don't usually eat pasta, but the 2 dishes that we shared we absolutely delicious. I look forward to returning soon.
It's taken me a while to write a review of Sorella's but it's been a long time coming. It's not very often (actually, I don't think ever) where I have given a place 5 stars but Sorella's deserves it. The staff are amazing and attentive...More
Really enjoyed our visit here. Used to be regulars at Pronto until it closed and quickly found a much better replacement nearby. Small intimate space with wonderful Italian food. Thursdays they do a special where they offer dinner for 2 which includes a bottle of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10250961-Reviews-Sorella-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Spicy 6 Fine Indian Cuisine,"We did eat Indian food at 4 different Indian restaurants in Vancouver, and this one is by far the best. The place was nicely located, the service was great and the food was amazing.
Located in a central downtown Vancouver, I and my wife spotted this excellent joint for authentic Indian food. The owner/ manager is a very warm person who is so prepared to go all his way to make food to your requirements. Excellent value for money.
Both enjoyed our lamb kadai main courses. Lamb very tender and dish was perfectly spiced for our taste. Restaurant was comfortable. Staff were welcoming and courteous. Restaurant was well patronised.
In Vancouver overnight between cruises and happened upon Spicy6. Great food. Excellent service. Reasonable prices. Local craft beer. A definite repeat. Had butter chicken and lamb korma. Both were delicious. I make both at home and Spicy 6 was better than mine.
Lovely Indian lunch here at the Spicy6. Papadum with mint and tamarind sauce for starters. Nice in taste, it would however been nice if there was some yoghurt dip to go along as well. The Vindaloo lamb was nice and tender. The sauce was aromatic...More
We decided to try this restaurant because the prices were good. We bravely walked up the narrow stairway from the street and were surprised to find a reasonably sized restaurant with white tablecloths and tables set. We were seated and given time to look at...More
Super friendly staff. It’s always a bit tricky to order Indian food at the right spice level but these guys got it spot on for us. Food was excellent and good value
We were here on 2nd July for our lunch. An excellent spot for Indian food. Very nice food. The restaurant is neat and clean and staff is very cordial. It was pleasing to see a lot of locals and non-Indian tourists or residents having their...More
Excellent Indian fare with a large variety of both vegan and meat entrees. Food is on the mild side, so you may want to amp up the spiciness level. Service was initially good, then moved to “benign overlook” as the meal moved on - this...More
Food flavors were outstanding! My wife and I over several visits to Spicy 6 had the lamb Rogan Josh, lamb vindaloo, Malai Kofta and Aloo Gobi accompanied by the best tasting garlic naans we have had for some while. Neeraj our friendly and knowledgeable server...More
Thank you David for such an amazing review. It was always a pleasure to serve you both and we look forward to seeing you on your next visit to Vancouver. It was a pleasant surprise to see you when you flight got delayed as well....More
Spicy 6 was a great stop! We were a little late for dinner and hadn’t made any reservations anywhere and they were able to seat us. The servers were super friendly and helpful. Our food was fantastic! The curry was super good and the peshwari...More
Thank you so much for such an amazing review. It was our pleasure to serve and we look forward to seeing you on your next visit.
Delicious food. Attentive and very polite staff. Well priced. Will definitely eat here again and recommend to friends.
Thank you so much for your review. We look forward to seeing you soon.
Food was delicious! Best butter chicken. Samosa batter was light and awesome. Garlic naan was also fabulous. Would recommend.
We were a foursome out to Friday Night dinner and decided to try Spicy 6. Glad we did. Menu can be read traditionally by though a QR code, We ordered the Lamb Korma, Chicken Tikka and Butter Chicken and all were well sized, well priced,...More
I was referred by a friend who gave high ratings for their cuisine and service. I ordered my two favourites, Chicken Korna and Saag Gosht, and their quality and taste was easily the best I have had. Tender chicken/meat in a generous amount of flavourful...More",18,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6717324-Reviews-Spicy_6_Fine_Indian_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Splitz Grill,"The burgers here are the best in town. So delicious and great atmosphere. Would eat here again anytime.
MacDonalds is better than this place. I took 2 bites of my god awful burger and threw it in the garbage. I swear the chicken patty looked and tasted exactly like a frozen burger you buy from the grocery store. They had no selection of...More
Waits at other places on Main were 30+ minutes, so we just walked in! Order at the counter burgers of varying diets (beef, sausage, Beyond Meat and more) along with fries and milkshakes are all I remember cuz that’s what we ordered. Everything was made...More
Amazing food. Amazing hospitality. Never regretted going here and I recommend this to everyone. Absolutely mouth watering burgers
Splitz is by far my favorite burger joint. I have been going there for years. I absolutely love the lentil burger and in particular all the sauces and extra yummy stuff like humus and babaganoush that you can add to the bun. Great eats. Hope...More
We really enjoyed this little burger place. Staff was very friendly!!! I ordered a bison burger with blue cheese and was very happy to see that I was able to pick my own bun, sauce and veggies. We sat outside and life was really good...More
Ordered burgers and they were so greasy the buns were soaked in grease. Couldn't eat them and won't go back.
the burger patty was salty and tasteless. after the burger was added to the topping , the burger was served cooled down quickly. FRENCH FRIES WERE GOOD.
We've been going to Splitz since they first opened in Whistler and regularly go the Vancouver location. Always great! The only reason for four stars today was the misic.....rap!!!! Trevor, the owner, wasn't there today but if he was, I'm certain he would have insisted...More
Custom made from scratch patty with tons of topping options. Best restaurant burger I have had in a long time.
We stumbled across this diner by accident. Really enjoyed the experience. The burgers etc are made fresh to order while you wait. When the bun is ready you choose all the fixings you would like to have in it. The booths are not very comfortable...More
Great food! I had the veggie burger, made from lentils. There are plenty of sauces, toppings and veggies to make your burger special! It was pretty loud, and hard to figure out how to exactly make your burger. The girl running the cash register was...More
Excellent homemade burgers. Buns were super fresh. Burgers juicy but not greasy. Garlic mayo was a great touch. Pricier than fast food but the quality is on point. Decent seating. Diner experience. Will be back.
I like this place. I particularly love the atmosphere. It just works for me for some reason. The food is also pretty good. It's not my favorite burger but it is pretty darn good. It's also pretty close by so tend to eat here a...More
Excellent fries and burgers. Great place to take family; we were 3 adults with 5 kids. Each customer choses their toppings and sauces so each burger is made to order exactly the way each child/adult wanted it. Everyone loved their burgers. Shared two HUGE banana...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d793010-Reviews-Splitz_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sprezzatura,"I love the atmosphere as well as the great service. The restaurant feels lovely and open. It has a patio too. I love the pizzas and the Negronis at Happy Hour.
A fantastic evening with Jason and team , great food, fast service and a couple of drinks to boot. It’s a lovely atmospheric place to enjoy a meal with great choices. Highly recommended!
Great lunch. Everything was really good and authentic. Pizzas, salad, mac’n’cheese, drinks. Very friendly service. Highly recommended if you are in the area!
very excellent service and great food and very helpful restaurant with small children. Would go again many times when in Vancouver, bc
Friendly service and delicious food. Special baked sandwiches are amazing. My husbands favourite sandwich in Vancouver is their meatball sandwich. I had the muffuletta. It was awesome. Had such an amazing lunch.
We tried out Sprezzatura because the restaurant collaborates with First Table which offers food 50% off food for the first sittings at participating restaurants. We had a 5pm reservation. Finding street parking wasn’t too bad because it’s not really a busy area, but is mostly...More
Myself and a group of friends get together for dinner at newly opened restaurants in Vancouver every three or four months. Sprezzatura was the most recent destination for 10 of us. We were seated in their private room and had a dedicated server. The food...More
Sprezzatura a great new restaurant in Mount Pleasant. We dined here for the first time last Friday and the place was hooping. The pizzas are perfection; the roasts are amazing and the drinks delicious. We had great service and the price was amazing for the...More
Had a great meal here tonight. Attentive staff and an interestingly designed restaurant. Fairly new, we understand. We wish them well!
The pizza was tasty but the thin crust was a little soggier than I like. Was there during happy hour and saved $5 on every pizza.
Great pizza one of the best of Vancouver ! Typically italian or napolitan, awesome tiramisu and we tried a delicious lasagne as well !
Enjoyed a great father-daughter meal after stumbling across this brand new restaurant near Kingsway and West 12th . Very attentive and friendly staff from hostess up to managers. Lemony citrus flavoured arugula salad was a delicious light starter . Pizza is very very good ....More
Decided to try out this Italian restaurant newly opened in my neighbourhood. Service friendly but needed more training which can be excused as place recently opened. Ordered the arugula and green salads to start. Fresh with nice dressings. We all ordered different pizza toppings and...More
On a recent visit to Vancouver, I invited my daughter and family for dinner at Sprezzature. Pleasant atmosphere, friendly staff and decent food. OK wine list but primarily Canadian ... no European wines ... wines were on the expensive side for what is on offer....More
Three of us had dinner - a pizza, an antipasta plate, meatballs, mussels, It was wonderful. Great design with white tiled walls but a bit noisy. Open pizza oven. I would highly recommend it.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17749865-Reviews-Sprezzatura-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sprig,"Great food, large portions and little prices! Top address for a lunch break while exploring Granville Island
Really good food. I had two lamb wraps and they were tasty and juicy. Absolute recommendation. …………………………………………………….
Visiting Granville Island after our covid hibernation. Decided to try Sprig because the food looked fresh and tasty. We ordered a couple of falafel wraps. The food was efficiently prepared and super quick although there were a number of people waiting. A lady ahead of...More
I had their lunch special plate which included spanikopita, 2 falafel, Greek salad, and plenty of tzatziki. The falafel was kind of *meh*, but everything else was really tasty. I lived in Greece for 2 years, so I'm now pretty picky about Greek food. This...More
We had the chicken souvlaki plate, falafel wrap, and sides of ours, hummus, and Greek salad. One of us can't eat dairy and they offered to substitute the yogurt for hummus. It was excellent! The falafel wasn't greasy, and was practically fluffy inside. It was...More
We were visiting the Granville market on our vacation and decided to try this place for lunch. There was a line and in my opinion that's always a great sign when it comes to a restaurant. The food did not disappoint. All the items/ingredients were...More
We settled on this food stall to get a falafel sandwich since we love them. I thought it was okay but my lady loved it and thought it was unique in taste. My thoughts were that it had too much spinach greens and took away...More
This small food stall crosses many cultures in a very good way. I had the Chicken Souvlaki Wrap with fresh veggies, harif, hoummus, and super tasty moist chicken. I had a side of falafel with houmus that was outstanding in taste, freshness, and prepared perfectly...More
A great little stall in Granville Island market. I had the calamari entree with the chickpea salad and the squid was plentiful and cooked to perfection and my partner had the chicken souvlaki and Greek salad - both were delicious and reasonably priced too. Lovely...More
This is a little stand in the Granville Island Public Market. It specializes in Greek Food. Healthy food and the price is reasonable here. I ordered Falafel Entrée (C$10.50) and Eggplant spread + Pita (C$6.00). Typical Greek food. The stand is clean and the servers...More
Among the many cooked food choices inside, this one is one of the gems. Relatively inexpensive, I had the combo lunch (choice of 1 entree +2 sides) for $15, not bad at all here. I chose the grilled calamari+ Greek salad+ pita/tzatziki. Loved Greek salad,...More
It looked clean, bright and new. Loved the unique flavors added to give some zest to Greek. Everything we had was very good. The spinach filo pie was so light and delicious. Would go back again for sure.
This is some of the best Greek food we've ever tasted....and at a fast food stall at Granville Island Market. The food is very tasty, reasonably priced with very ample portions served up with a big smile. We had the calamari dish and it was...More
Sprig a new style of homemade low processed fast food. All done in daily small batches and even the pita bread is homemade. The menu is stellar, offering modem Mediterranean fair like no other in the area and is a welcome addition to the Granville...More
I had a wonderful fried halloumi and greens wrap with the most delicious mint dressing! Will definitely be back before I leave.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10778214-Reviews-Sprig-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
St Lawrence Restaurant,"Close your eyes and you could be in Paris. In fact it’s a good idea not to look outside as it’s not one of Vancouvers best areas. Never mind, the dining experience is excellent, a mixture of surprises and choices on the menu, backed up...More
Expected a bit more from a Michelin stared restaurant , having eaten in many all over the world I was excited and knew what to expect. The food was really good but nothing really stood out as amazing. The service was good but not quite...More
My husband and I recently went to the St Lawrence Restaurant for dinner. The 7 course meal was perfectly timed not too fast not too slow, with each course was as remarkable as the previous. The food was exceptional! But the other very important element...More
As a Montrealer, we could not pass up the nostalgia of Cabane a sucre. We noticed there was a Cabane a sucre tasting menu and did our best to get a reservation. After 7 days of trying, we finally found a table! We asked for...More
We had dinner at St Lawrence on Saturday the 22nd of October. The atmosphere of the restaurant is intimate, inviting and classy. The staff is attentive and positive. They explained the menu in detail and provided recommendations. The food was exceptional. The amuse was incredible,...More
... but their amuse, which contains buckwheat bun with honey rosemary smoked salt, and foie gras, is the best I have had in my life!! this restaurant's location is bit on the edge of city's rough area, other than that, I highly recommend St Lawrence...More
Having traveled the world, there are only a handful of dining experiences that truly stand out as phenomenal and unparalleled… the St. Lawrence in Vancouver is one of them. Walking to the restaurant from downtown, I must admit the location gave me pause, but once...More
Wife and I went here for a nice dinner together and are very glad we did. The food and drinks were amazing - try the not-so-simple gin and tonics - and the staff was one of the most helpful I have ever seen.
This gem of a restaurant is hard to get into but WELL WORTH it. Visiting Vancouver in July 2022, we were able to secure seats at the Chef's Counter. Started with the escargo which was served Escargots à l’ail en bouchées de la Reine aka...More
Full disclosure: this is my favourite restaurant in Vancouver and we have been many times but I have just never got around to a review. The restaurant is located in an ‘interesting’ part of town but this is not a problem. The locals won’t bother...More
This year we have averaged coming here monthly. We love their changing menu to sample so many of their wonderful fixed price 3 course menu which you can also add on too. The pork chop always great and lamb shoulder we had for the first...More
After a decidedly cold and disingenuous greeting at the renown St. Lawrence Restaurant, we settled in to one of our best meals in Canada, reminiscent of our experience at Edulis in Toronto. The temperature was hot in late June of 2022, and we walked in...More
We've been meaning to try this place out for so long and I'm glad we finally got to go. The food was unreal, the drinks were amazing and the atmosphere is great. The experience was one of a kind, definitely can't recommend it enough.
I visit quite a few restaurants and post on Youtube. In my humble opinion, this is one of the top restaurants in Vancouver (has to be Top 5 or maybe even Top 3 on my list). I have many meals at this restaurant with many...More
After we booked here we noted that Air Canada had this restaurant in its top ten, which set us up to be disappointed. We were not. The food was heavenly and the service perfect. I had the pate-en-croute for starter and then the most amazingly...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12603910-Reviews-St_Lawrence_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
St. Augustine's,"I went with a group of friends and we were seated outside as requested. I am personally not a fan of this type of food so this review will probably be irrelevant to beer lovers, but relevant to non-beer drinkers haha. I never go to...More
Gazillions of beer choices here. I am not a beer drinker so I asked for their wine list. They offer one red, one white, from the same mediocre local winery. Yuk. Not sure I get the marketing here.
Great choice of local and micro brewed beers. After 2 visits, however, the dingy, unaesthetic atmosphere and bad service has turned me off. Both times, it took forever for my friend and I to even get menus. When I wanted to pay my bill with...More
Even though it's been on the map for what seems forever, in 2019, St. Augustine's became one of my favorites in Vancouver. For one simple reason: beer. I mean, they have few decent food items on the menu as well, but the rotation of beers...More
Stopped in for a quick bite and a beer. This place has a large selection of beers to choose from. The food was decent. The Sicilian pizza was good, it was around $16. The calamari wasn’t that great it was like the chef poured the...More
This is a good pub with a big variety of beer and good food. They have a special on the menu for everyday. The location is also good, one block from Broadway. The waitresses have funny T-shirts with pseudo-religious beer lines. :)
Friends who live in the area recommended we meet up there on a Sunday evening for drinks. It was not overly busy, however we were completed ignored by any number of staff members. Even after my husband went up to one at the bar and...More
Big place with very loud music. Lots of staff and everyone is friendly. Usual pub menu, a few lunch specials. I had a pizza that was just OK. This probably isn’t the place for pizza but really, the menu wasn’t very tempting or interesting. My...More
After hearing all the horror stories about the ""entertainment district"" and difficulties in getting a cab, I suggest you consider this establishment. Located where both Skytrain routes and the Broadway bus intersect, so no matter where people are coming from, they can get here quickly...More
Literally the worst ""beer"" i have ever had. The menu changes daily so the menu online isnt accurate. I have had beer from all around the world.. from home brew.. craft brew.. to corporate brew... this was not beer it was juice. Been 18 hrs...More
This place is a bit out of the way for us, but we still find ourselves coming back time and again. The beer selection is second to none, and it includes a lot of local picks. The menu really explains each selection in detail so...More
What a great place to party! Delightful servers outstanding selection of local beers at my going away we had a great going away lunch where I had the beef short ribs. While the serving was surprisingly small the flavours were worth every penny It's a...More
I don't drink beer that much and pub food, sadly, has just not made the cut in the past but I have to say I was blown away by the quality of the food at St. Augustine's. About 6 months ago I was there and...More
Met up with friends for dinner and beer. It was taco Thursday so I got 2 fish tacos and 2 carnitas and they were delicious. Everyone else also enjoyed the food. The real reason to go is for the beer. A fantastic selection. Don't go...More
The selection of beers is staggering. Service is always good. Often crowded. Big selection of seating options. Quality of the food is way above the call of duty for bar food. On this part of the Drive there's no excuse for eating and drinking anywhere...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1867412-Reviews-St_Augustine_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
St. Regis Bar & Grill,"Spacious and comfortable bar, with a great selection of delicious snacks and more substantial meals. We loved the cajun dry ribs and crispy shrimp washed down with a beer in happy hour.
Met 2 friends for lunch. place was not busy. food came quickly. I ordered beef dip. it was a little bland. But fries were good.
Staff were chatty but not over familiar. Beer was fine and light bites were tasty enough. Screens showed sports but without sound and we were able to play cards with no bother.
Our group of 6 thought we would try this place out since we were staying at the St. Regis hotel next door. So happy we made this choice. Excellent drinks and food. Big portions, too. Huge and delicious nachos. Highly recommend. Many TVs. We were...More
We were heading back to our hotel nearby and looking for something to eat at the end of the night. Some other places were already closed so we were getting desperate! :) Thank goodness this was open. A few people inside and a friendly welcome...More
Good ""pub"" style dining. The prices were reasonable. Nothing particularly fancy but I enjoyed the experience.
I wanted to say how excellent the general manager was to us when we dined at the bar and grill at The Saint Regis hotel here in downtown Vancouver. He went a step above in addressing all our needs and was very professional as well....More
My Husband and I stopped in on the way back to the hotel. Its very clean, the staff are super friendly. The red sangria was delicious!
Our accommodation included a full breakfast in the morning. There were 4 choices but each of us chose traditional with different food options. Tasty and our server/chef was good
Absolutely love this place. We were so upset when it was closed for so long due to covid. The food is always such a great standard and we love coming here! Also lovely friendly staff and always treated well.
Having visited the Vancouver Central Library we were looking for somewhere nearby to have a meal. Walking past this eatery the interior looked cosy and the menu varied and reasonably priced. So we went in and are glad we did. From the friendly and efficient...More
This restaurant Is located in a great spot, the atmosphere was really great and the food was great. Staff friendly and welcoming!
We were not staying in the hotel connected to this bar and found by accident on our first day in Vancouver. We a quick meal and a few drinks at the bar. Staff are so friendly and helpful, and provided advice of where to visit....More
Even if we were not staying in the hotel connected to this bar we would still have ate and drank here. Staff are so friendly and helpful, even giving us advice of where to visit. After a long haul fight and 8 hour time difference,...More
We were staying at the St Regis and had the opportunity to use this facility on a couple of occasions. Great service good pricing, warm surroundings, and great food. I would describe it as a warms sports bar by default of the number of large...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4105528-Reviews-St_Regis_Bar_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Stable House Bistro,"Four of us (girlfriends) chose Stable House for dinner before a theatre performance at the Stanley, and all of us were extremely disappointed. The halibut cheeks were tasteless and stringy, as was the soufflé tasteless. The dressing on the sprout salad was sour. We all...More
Great side street location, excellent & friendly service, delicious shared plates. Great atmosphere. Highly recommended.
Food was OK but nothing outstanding. Ignore the online menu as most items shown there are not what you’ll be offered on site. Grossly overpriced. The sausage (1 only) was the length of my thumb. My wife’s halibut ($35) was very small. My lamb (also...More
We were really excited about the 4 course NYE set menu but left feeling rushed and practically forced out the door with a bit of indigestion quite frankly. The table was not ready when we arrived promptly at 19h00 for our booking - the 15min...More
Recently went to Stable House for the first time since COVID - on Saturday around noon. We were delighted to find the food as delightful as ever. Unfortunately the waitress - admittedly the only on on at the time - was at best surly. While...More
We waited for 90 minutes for a patio table that was supposed to take 30 minutes, while eating nanoparticles of food, sitting in a dark corner of the inside of the restaurant, embarrassed in front of friends we'd brought to this badly run place.
So glad we found this gem. The food is amazing and they got a great wine list. Definitely will be back again for drinks or dinner. The service here was amazing too.
Pretty easy to find this smaller place just west of Granville on 13th. Good for shoppers in the neighbourhood. I had heard great things about it, but was disappointed on my visit for lunch. The server was not welcoming and not interested in providing good...More
I only discovered this restaurant recently. It's tucked away on W. 13th avenue, just west of busy Granville Street. The restaurant is small and intimate, the food was wonderful and the atmosphere very cool.
I went on my first date with my husband here so it will always have a special place in my heart. Every meal I've had here is delicious. Service is attentive and unpretentious. There happy hour is a great deal too.
the decor, atmosphere just about right. Cramped quarters but at least one can talk there is no loud music one has to shout to each other across the table. Service was extremely slow. Martini's watered down / had to ask for remake. Food> well if...More
Celebrated a friends birthday here. Wonderful food and great service. On the list for a return visit on my next trip to the city.
we've been going to stable house for about a year with the first few times excellent and the last ones less so. the food remains fantastic. I gave the staff the benefit of the doubt last time and perhaps they couldn't hear me (the place...More
Stopped by with a friend for dinner after a play at the Stanley Theatre. We enjoyed sharing some tapas: mixed olives (small plate) chicken liver pate with red wine jelly, pickles, baguette (Board), spaghettini carbonara (medium plate) and scallops, lentils, house made chorizo, smoked turnip,...More
Ours was a lunch visit - on our way to UBC Botanical Garden. What a charming restaurant! The lunch menu provides a nice and varied selection of plates. The cheese and charcuterie plate was wonderful - hard salamis, Italian spiced ham and cheeses form different...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5969611-Reviews-Stable_House_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Stanley Park Brewing Restaurant & Pub,"We went to the brewery for dinner with friends, The service is excellent, everything comes quite fast, the beer are absolutely amazing, i recommend the sunsetter, for eating we had the bretzels and fish and chips, i would take both things again
Wow so disorganized it is shocking. Six empty picnic tables in the beer garden, it’s going to be a 20 minute wait. No leadership whatsoever.
Fantastic food on both visits we made while in the city. We had the nachos which were some of the best we've ever had, the gyoza, chicken wings, fish tacos and chicken tenders. All was clearly homemade and delicious. A great selection of beers and...More
Good beer, love their Sunsetter! Decent food, the hot chicken sandwich was especially yummy! Favourite part is that they allow dogs on a section of their patio!!
I will start off with saying their beer is good and have always been a fan of their beer. The food, on the other hand, was possibly one of the worst experiences at a dining establishment I have ever seen. I seriously think the kitchen...More
After a short wait we were seated on the deck. Nice breeze in combination with the patio heaters was perfect. My husband enjoyed a flight of beer and I enjoyed the punch cocktail. Chips, salsa & guacamole and savoury pretzel bite were amazing.
Like the menu, like the location, like the beer alot. Worst fish and chips I have had in years. Costly at $24 but small chunks of cod in huge batter. Not greasy but crunchy and overcooked. My guess is the fish tacos would be similar....More
We only had about an hour to stop in and grab lunch, but it was a great hour! We loved the vibe of this place! Charming inside. Our waiter was very friendly. Our food came quickly. We had pizza for lunch, and it was very...More
We had a nice dinner but could not pay for parking due to the parking machine not taking credit cards or taking coin, tried by phone that did not work so a parking fine was issued to us. I spent the whole time trying to...More
We visited the brewery for dinner and a few beers . We parked in a parking area by the brewery . Food and beers were great. Service friendly . Pleasant atmosphere. Big shock when we got back to the car: $50 parking fine . We...More
We booked a table of 13. The atmosphere is great. And the beers were very much enjoyed by all. The good menu had plenty of options for adults and teenagers. And the guys bought merchandise- shirts as well. Would recommend this place for large groups...More
Service was very attentive and warm. Quality of food was excellent and the beer tasting flight was value-for-money. A very wonderful experience!
Been here a few times, and this time it was on a Saturday. I came by myself and was able to be seated at the bay right away, however, larger parties were looking at 20-25 min waits.The beer is still excellent and the chicken tenders...More
To visits here for a beer or two and wish we had had more time in the city to return again. On both occasions we were served quickly and chose a selection of local beers flights with snacks. Knowledgeable staff and great good value beers....More
Delicious flight of beers. Chicken wings and chicken tenders very good. Good vibes and friendly staff. Loved it - great place to stop in Stanley Park!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d18186510-Reviews-Stanley_Park_Brewing_Restaurant_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Stanley's Bar and Grill,"Fantastic seafood chowder and an excellent happy server - Ben. Sat outside overlooking the beautiful gardens. All makes for a great experience! We will be back!!
There is a lot to explore in Stanley park but there are some neat little places to enjoy a beer and some food. This place is close to the rose garden, the bus loop and you can easily walk there if you don’t want to...More
This used to be our go to spot for lunch on a Sunday however the menu has changed drastically and the new chef won’t even bother to make any dish adjustments for vegan options. Even though we knew this place as great for vegan food....More
Beautiful building and gardens. Stanley Park Pavilion is worth your visit while touring Stanley Park, Vancouver. Dubbed “The Jewel of Stanley Park,” originally opened in 1913, the building is a beautiful structure offering surrounding gardens, event space, a restaurant, and bathrooms. The restaurant, Stanley’s Bar...More
Had a chicken flatbread and Cesar salad while visiting Stanley Park, the food was delicious and the service was outstanding. Great little spot.
We had just visited the Aquarium and came across this little gem as we walked through the park in the early afternoon.When we came across this a wedding was taking place at the front but we didn’t need to worry as the restaurant was still...More
We had high hopes of our visit here, such a wonderful location in Stanley Park, and a beautiful building. However, was a big disappointment, very tatty and not clean, food was poor and service slow. So much more could be done with this place, nowhere...More
Dined here with three generations of family, all of whom found several items on the menu they liked. Food was generously portioned and very good. Service was terrific - as good or better than any other we have been in while traveling. Sitting on the...More
We went to this restaurant in the afternoon, to have coffee and dessert. When we got there, we saw that they had a large espresso machine so decided to have a Spanish coffee along with a dessert (crème brûlée). The dessert was just OK, to...More
Come here for my girlfriends birthday weekend. Absolutely loved the food and the service from Mia was brilliant. Kept us laughing every time she came over. Cant wait to dine here again! Mia made our evening!
It began with a care less attitude. Sit were you want! So we chose a shaded table on the patio. Then followed a litany of unfortunately bad service which complimented the tiny menu. We were entertaining a friend from Quebec. A bottle of Chardonnay please....More
We were a bit hesitant to eat here based on the previous review but the patio beckoned so we gave it a try. We started off with a beer and 9 oz glass of BC wine which at 9.50 was very reasonably priced. My husband...More
They recently re-opened (probably under new management), and they changed their theme from a classic pub restaurant to a BBQ restaurant. As an old customer, I was excited to revisit. I am sad to say that it was a total disappointment and I would say...More
It is a perfect restaurant to have lunch after a good walk in the Stanley park. Surrounded by trees and garden it is a beautiful place to enjoy food and drinks. Great patio for summer as well.
It is a beautiful place, but is too expensive. The food was really good, and the amazing view because you are inside the park.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1877190-Reviews-Stanley_s_Bar_and_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Steamworks,"Great local spot. We sat at the bar and had a great bartender/wait staff who provided sincere recommendations, which turned out to be spot on.
Located on the edge of Gastown, this is one of the better restaurants in that area. Good food, reasonable menu selection, and friendly service at reasonable prices. Nothing special or memorable, but it checks all the boxes.
The pizza here is really excellent! We shared a pizza and salad out on the patio and had a great experience. Our server was very friendly.
Really enjoyed our visits to the Steam works, lovely outside seating are when it was sunny and fab bars inside at nighttime. Staff excellent, both the waitress (Niki) and the bar man (we think it was TJ)were superb, engaging and fun. Food was really good,...More
I was in Vancouver with a buddy on a business trip and we had an extra day so we decided to wander through downtown Vancouver and go on a bit of a pub-crawl! One of our stops was this Vancouver Craft Brew Institution - Steamworks!...More
We found this brewery while out walking around gas town and checking out the gaslight which is just down the street. Stopped in for lunch, place was rocking was able to get a table for two for lunch. We tried the ten sampler paddle and...More
While I’m not a pub food fan, this restaurant really bulled it off. I went twice during our trip to eat their chicken sandwich. Highly recommended. Great balance of ingredients and flavors, executed to perfection. Great service too.
Good food selection and similarly good range of drinks. Very busy each night we either passed or went in. Great service from our wait staff and very good food. Great pub atmosphere.
Had a drink there but friends had food which they liked. Its a popular place and a bit loud when full but still a place to meet with friends.
Great fun. We dined twice during our recent Vancouver visit. Without a reservation you may have to wait a while to get a table, especially on end of week, weekend nights. Service was good, the selection of beers and wines excellent. Food choices are wide,...More
Can’t rate this place any higher.great food, ales and friendly staff. This is a popular spot, so my advice is to avoid peak times. A great spot 😊
Went there for some food and drinks after work. Steped out for 15 min while my drinks whore still at the bar where i was sitting, wheni got back it was all cleared out and i was told in the rought manner that i cant...More
So glad we found this restaurant as it had good atmosphere, good food and excellent staff. We were unsure of the wines on offer as there were no details but Duran, our waiter, gave us a taster before we chose one that fitted our preferences....More
This pub and restaurant has a great atmosphere across several levels for dinner or just a relaxing drink. The staff were friendly and provided great service. Definitely worth a visit
Very good craft beer. Awesome location. The pizza was amazing! Centrally located in Gas Town. Easily walkable from the sky train",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709284-Reviews-Steamworks-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Stem Japanese Eatery,"Table was ready at time of reservation. Service was polite and timely. Food was unique , and delicious. Price a little above average. Very popular restaurant. RESERVATIONS A MUST !
Omakase with 7 courses and desserts…..at award winning Stem. Each photo is one portion per person for each course, completed with a dessert platter of 5 bite sizes variations to complete a ceremonial and delicious meal of the fall season’s finest. A combination of fresh...More
Amazing birthday dinner with 6 of us. We only ordered cooked food. No sushi or sashimi. Cauliflower gomaae *Organic mushroom salad Yasai tempura *Gyuniku Kabocha korokke Chawanmushi Ebi Hasami age Dashimaki tamago Black cod collar Yellowtail collar Tsukemono *Tsukemen 3 desserts * top 3
we had a fun TGIF dinner eating chef recommended very fresh seasonal delicacies.... Appetisers: an Obanzai Plate with 4 different seasonal varieties to taste Seasonal speciality sashimi 5 kinds: for as fresh as if they were just caught, and thick slices too. Were given 4...More
Very rude and bad service. Food was also not good and very overpriced. Avoid coming here and go somewhere else that will treat you better
Service gracious and professional. even when very busy, you are not overlooked for a minute. The menu is unique. Imaginative, fresh local and fresh Japanese. There's a daily board as well as an excellent seasonal menu that is unusual but very well described. Delicious, small...More
This place is so clean and hygienic. I only eat at Japanese Owned Sushi Restaurants, for 2 reasons. Freshest Highest Quality Sashimi selections, Creative and Super Tasty. I absolutely love high quality Blue Fin O'Toro. Buttery and melts in your mouth. Each table has alcohol...More
I had so many friends tell me I should check this place out , I know the area very well,I had one of my restaurant by Nelson almost 20 years , restaurant is not too far from the Burnaby South school ,the area change so...More
Really enjoyed the omakase dinner here in July. Phase 3 of Covid19 so limited space for dine in so reservations are a must. We saw them turning away walk-ins so be warned! We had the omakase dinner for two. Outstanding quality for $90 per person....More
It is authentic Japanese Kaiseki style restaurant with great service. We heard that there is a Japanese restaurant opened by Ex Zest restaurant chef’s in Burnaby. Since we love their meal and service, we thought worth to try it. Their website said “Beautifully-crafted dishes are...More
Walked in on a Monday thinking the place would be empty. Without a reservation we were able to get the last table for 2. On a Monday evening! Suggest you make reservations. We had walked by the night before and it was completely full so...More
We went there after work for an unplanned family dinner. The place was full but welcoming, service was genuinely thoughtful and caring and food was one of a kind. This small restaurant truly earned it’s title of being one of Vancouver’s best new restaurants. 10...More
Reservations highly recommended. There is plenty of street parking. No easily visible storefront signage. The service was very good but difficult at times to hear their description of each dish because of a stronger Japanese accent. Lovely presentation on the smaller portion serving so order...More
STEM is a great Japanese restaurant that is a bit out of the way in Burnaby. They have a ride selection of dishes and also have a good seasonal menu. It is write popular so do reserve ahead. I would definitely go back again.
We tried this restaurant for the first time last night. Heard about it from a colleague and the fact that the owner used to own Zest in Vancouver. Since we loved Zest, we were curious and wanted to check it out. The food was great....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d13557626-Reviews-Stem_Japanese_Eatery-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Stepho's Souvlaki Greek Tavern,"The quality of the food is very bad, the amount of food is very small, the price is very expensive and the atmosphere of the restaurant is very old and dirty
Stale hard fries, calamar that was really not fresh. Don’t eat here. We won’t be back. We thought we’d give them a last chance but what a waste of money.
I rarely review restaurants on here these days as I find that reviews are very subjective and one person's idea of good is often another person's idea of poor. In the case of this restaurant I make an exception. The restaurant itself is dated, grubby...More
Stefanos has been a Vancouver favorite on Davie street for years. They also have another location on Robson which closed recently. The food, and portions, are amazing! We had the lamb shank dinner, which we shared and it was more than enough food for 2,...More
Tired old and need of some love and attention Had moussaka was not to mu liking large unknown topping which I left. The lamb roast was very good and must have been over two pounds of meat
On our visit to Vancouver we were very happy to be able to visit Stepho's Greek Tavern. We have had good meals there in the past. This time in January 2023 it was not good. Dave the waiter was well rehearsed and mechanical. The food...More
We first visited here in 2014 and could hardly move after our meal, we ate so much. So another visit in 2022 ..... this time with a promise to ourselves not to eat too much. So I just went for the roast lamb ....... it...More
Meeting a great friend at the West End after the parade , we both choose the Stepho's because their home style authentic Greek cooking , special the Lamb dishes they been in West End almost or more 20 years , it is my regular diner...More
My family and I ordered takeout from this Davie location last night, and halfway into eating the hummus I noticed a large bug in it, possibly a baby cockroach. I’ve never been so disgusted in my life this was completely unacceptable. I will never be...More
Food was ok. We were a table of two asked to move twice to accommodate a large crowd on two separate occasions within an hour. No complimentary offers for moving or apology. Won’t go back because we were an inconvenience not a valued customer. Not...More
We had been craving a Greek gyro sandwich. If you don’t know what that is, you could get a job here. We asked the server for the closest thing to a gyro. We ended up with a plate of French fries covered by a pita...More
We both had the lamb souvlaki and it was done to perfection. The saganaki and pita were delicious but the highlight was our very peronable, efficient waitress Tamara. In spite of being short staffed and being inundated with take out orders we received attentive service...More
located right on Vancouver downtown on busy Davies street. We ordered their famous Lamb Roast meal. Big portion size. Tender meat. A bit bland in taste though. Insufficient lighting inside the restaurant. Comes with rice, pita bread, salad, vegies and big sized roasted potatoes. Some...More
We had a great take out experience here at Stepho's! The souvlaki is so good and the pita and tzatziki! Definitely will be back to dine in next time, the service was so fast too.
My husband and I have been coming to Stephos restaurant for several years. Whenever we are in Vancouver, this is where we eat lunch or dinner. The food is always delicious! And very authentic. The staff are friendly, courteous and helpful. Service is excellent. We...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709292-Reviews-Stepho_s_Souvlaki_Greek_Tavern-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Stepho's Souvlaki Greek Taverna,"The place did not look fancy, so I was not expecting much. Turns out that the food was very savory and portion was huge. Best Greek resto I have been to so far
We ordered door dash and it was terrible. We ordered to go from doordash and the food was brought to the wrong address and it was cold and terrible. We spent $80.00 for nothing ..We were very disappointed in this meal and will not order...More
We've been fans of Stephos for an extremely long time. We've noticed that over the years, quality has slowly drifted down. We ordered Take-out a couple of days ago (first time in about six months). When we got home, we discovered that they had forgotten...More
I've been a customer of Stephos for over 20 years. They never disappointed, and they didn't do it today August 30th 2021. Fast and great service. The waitress was very nice and polite, We didn't wait more than 10 minutes, food was as good as...More
Stephos is apparently having kitchen problems snd needs to make a change. Food came after long wait over cooked/burnt. Got 50% discount from manager but really wish I didn’t bring my family there. Terrible.
Used to be my favourite Greek food restaurant in the city. Went there recently, prices have increased, food was cold, beef souvlaki was not cooked well, coffee and tea were cold, Baklava was so old it was sour instead of sweet. Very disappointing.
In Vancouver, you can easily find Greek tastes in Stepho’s Souvlaki Greek Taverna! They have a Menu with different kinds of Greek food, they also have local and house wine! The hosts are so friendly and patient, the food has a good quality and has...More
I ordered a pita for takeout, waited 20 minutes finally got it when I looked inside it was so disappointing. The picture is below. The Tzatziki was terrible!
Unfortunately the take out food we were looking forward to was really bad. Threw most of it away. Chicken Souvlakia and Prawns. Greek salad had a lot of oil in it so it was not edible. Same with the Prawns. The rice was old. Nothing...More
We were there at the start of the corona virus problems, but I don't think that was their only problem. The waitress seemed sorry we were there, and the food was very boring. All in all very disappointing.
Wednesday evening. No Greek Beer? (later found it was just not cooled enough, so they told us they had none, only found out later, when our table neighbour ordered and received one!). No first choice for entree menu. Food was terrible, barely edible. Waiter's pants...More
Used to be Good! Ordered pickup dinner for 4. Live close by so just a couple minutes to home. The food was lukewarm. The price was high in my opinion and the quality of the meal in my opinion has gone downhill. How sad. Enjoyed...More
""food poisoning, it happens"". Seems to be the slogan Stepho's is carrying around these days. I'm pregnant in my 3rd trimester and my husband and I decided to have a quiet night at home for New years eve. We decided to get some greek take...More
bad food per mile... bad tables, bad chairs and bad tablecloths for the slightly dirty decor but we can already imagine the cleanlinessof the kitchen. spanakopita, tsarziki, mousaka no taste , cooked and cooked meats , serving mussels at a Greek restaurant ? huge menu...More
On a cold night, this looked inviting. While the restaurant was warm, sadly, the meal was utterly disappointing and the wine by the glass (premium) was even worse. I had moussaka, which was dry, over cooked and bland. My partner had souvlaki, which was marginally...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6405468-Reviews-Stepho_s_Souvlaki_Greek_Taverna-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Storm Crow Alehouse,"I ordered online this time. The quality of the food was amazing. I preferred it to have more sauce. But, the taste was just perfect. It definitely would be one my favourite burger places.
We’ve been wanting to come here for a while so as we were driving around trying to figure out the eternal question “What’s for Lunch?”... We just happened to see this and immediately looked for parking! So glad we came here and their safety protocols...More
I didn't really expect to enjoy this place as much as I did. The decor isn't fancy and it's not really all that comfortable, but the ""nerd crowd"" was friendly and fun and the drinks were reasonably priced. Be prepared to wait quite a while...More
Good service, reliable pub style foods, great beverage options and the menu is a good read in itself. Try it - we've had brunches and lunches at this one, and it's always excellent.
We stopped here around 1030 on a friday night. my husband went through to check it out as I looked for parking. sadly, he came back out and said it was entirely too crowded to enjoy it. (he was impressed with the space and decorations...More
Very cool spot that celebrates the nerds in all of us. Ask them to put Supernatural on the TV's... Harry Potter? Try the Butter Beer! Inventive menu with interesting names and dishes. Highly recommend this spot for some fun!
Was never here before,buy was not impressed. Sigh outside that days $13.00 lunch in 13 minutes is wrong. Was the only one in there and took 25 minutes. Very small portions for the price. Took forever to get the bill. I had better serve at...More
If you are ready to relax, play a game with some friends, have a beer and a burger, this is your place. Oh...and you can nerd out...which is always fun!
Dropped in during Vancouver Craft Beer week. Very good selection of craft beer. Fried chicken burger was good, hand-cut fries. Very good service. Interesting decor, movies playing - fantasy-type, lots of games. Karaoke night proved popular.
We went to say goodbye to some close friends who were moving away with a party of 10. They asked 2 members of our group to leave because they didnt have 2 forms of ID, even though they weren't even going to drink? One of...More
We were just looking for any place to have lunch with our 4 month old, ideally in a place that served beer. We found this place, think through Untappd. We were both happy with our meals. Beer selection was impressive. All non mainstream breweries. I...More
Great vibe in this pub with good service and great vegan food. The vegan poutine is to die for and their beverage choices are plentiful.
We made reservations for a birthday celebration over three weeks in advance. Our party arrived a little early and were seated on time - this is when it started to go downhill. When we were seated, the hostess said she would get us water. We...More
Great place to hang with pals, have a beer and a snack and play a few games. Even if you go alone, there is so much to look at, including Star Wars memorabilia.
Despite the abundance of dudes with long beards and other associated ""hipster"" identifiers, this place is a good place to go. They have board games and nerdy interior decor. All intended to raise the pulse of societies' awkward people, you know, the nerds, dorks and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d9856930-Reviews-Storm_Crow_Alehouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Strathcona Beer Company,"Great Pizza and Beer. A very good selection of fresh toppings combined with a wide range of craft beers. Booth style seating in front of a large TV screen - a good way to spend a Spring evening.
This was our first stop on a Canadian Craft Tour beer tour of Yeast Van, and definitely the best brewery we visited. Great room, beers were all very good and the food was absolutely delicious, very high quality and fresh. The pizzas and meatballs were...More
Strathcona was a fun brewery with a lot of great beers. The IPA I had was spot on (make sure you specify your size or they will give you the biggest size), and the sour my wife had was really good. The location is also...More
Strathcona Beer is fantastic. They always have a great beer selection. I am a huge fan of Superflux, which is brewed out of Strathcona. The pizza and salads offered are amazing. I have yet to be disappointed. My only suggestion would be to maybe offer...More
Really consistent beers across styles, but particularly adept at sours. Good food, good interior, good staff, always fun to go to. Highly recommended.
One of my favourite breweries in Vancouver! Delicious IPAs and my missus loves their sours. Pizza is always tasty and service friendly and quick. A must if you love craft beers!
Fantastic beers and pizzas! Wide variety of beer types, and a good choice for vegans/vegetarians as there's usually a vegan pizza on their specials menu and staff are always wonderful about modifying a pizza to make it vegetarian. Highly recommended for the chill atmosphere, great...More
We had a casual lunch here on Canada day. Very friendly atmosphere. The service was great as was the the food. I had a Pilsner which was outstanding. It was light and refreshing. We ordered the meat and the margarita pizzas. Both were outstanding. We...More
Stopped in with my family after a day at the suspension bridge and Grouse Mountain. Small menu of pizza, salad, and appetizers. Approx. 10 types of beer. Long bench seating. Kind of loud, but still a fun local hangout.
Nice corner location, good seating options, decent choice of beers and a dry cider that was excellent. The second choice of the sour raspberry was a let down. Arrived just before noon opening on a Thursday. Not busy, about 1/3 full by the time we...More
like the at atmosphere and they have a great beer list and food options. always a fun time. Afternoon beverages at Strathcona Brewing ! delicious beers and ciders. A craft brewery located in the heart of Strathcona, Vancouver's oldest and most diverse commercial and residential...More
OK, I'm old and don't buy alcohol much, however, my sister told me to get a couple of ""growlers"" for Thanksgiving dinner. I went down and found out that they are 1 or 2 litre capacity glass bottle and they fill them from the tap...More
I met a friend for beers at this place on a Friday evening. I got there around 5:40. There was one booth left, which I was invited to take. When my friend arrived, the place was almost full. We ordered beers and a pizza each,...More
I just went in to fill my beer growler (the beer was very good) and I saw the pizza. It looked so good I think I will have to go back and try it.
8 of us. Tried lots of different beers and pizzas. We all enjoyed all of them. I personally loved the Radler and would go back for this alone. We all enjoyed the pizzas especially the Funghi. Yes you could argue that this is neighbourhood gentrification...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11999195-Reviews-Strathcona_Beer_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Suika Snackbar,"I wanted so much to write a bad review because of the initial mix up but this restaurant is so good with its customer experience that this turned into a positive review. I booked the back room for a special event. I was told we...More
Suika offers a nice range of quality Japanese food. Although the interior setting can be abit dark, the service is warm. Food-wise, standouts include the chicken karage, salmon roll and the beef udon. A highly recommended place for a modern Japanese dining experience!
Had really good beef rice bowl and salmon aburi. The food was really good and the service was quick. Definitely worth checking out!
Finally had the opportunity to dine in for lunch with my friend and co-worker. I had the sashimi chirashi bowl - nice presentation. My friend had the oxtail ramen - some chunks of oxtail but no veggies, and we shared the ebi mayo - shrimp...More
We had a small gathering and ordered take out from this place. So many awesome choices. We opted for the Sashimi 15 piece, Seaweed Salad and Sweet & Sour Chicken Karage. Ingredients were very fresh. The S&S was just right. Very enjoyable and would like...More
We visited as a family of five. The place was crowded but precautions were in place. It was a late lunch after some snacks already in Granville market. But the menu was intriguing so we ordered quite a few items. Portion was small which was...More
My first time here but I’ll be back that’s for sure! Thoroughly enjoyed everything I ate, forgot to get photos - was too busy munching!
Ordered chicken karaage and chashu. The chashu was great, not quite melt-in-your-mouth, but still tender. Chicken karaage was delicious. Not as crispy as I've had at other places, although well-flavoured. Friend ordered ""Chinese Poutine"", which looked just like regular poutine to me, but they said...More
This is one of the best meals we have ever had, sitting at the chef table you wont be let down. The quality of the food is excellent and you can really notice the freshness in the way the food comes together and compliments each...More
Having walked by this place many times, we finally decided to check it out based on a recommendation from friends who raved about the food. They were not wrong. The crowd and servers were lively and boisterous adding to a fun atmosphere. The menu is...More
Came here based on my friend’s recommendation. First of all, the dishes are HUGE for an izakaya/ snackbar so don’t overdo it (especially when you think it’s really affordable the portions must be small)...then we ordered the Suika box with 9 samples, a deep fried...More
Great Japanese food, and authentic! Great atmosphere and great staff! Fun to order many different dishes and share with your friends!
On our second visit, my wife and I tried a number of other dishes we did not try the first time. Beef short rib was excellent. Very tasty, especially with the sauce. Decent portion size for the price. Grilled sablefish also an excellent value. Very...More
Very trendy happening place. The place was packed inside so we sat on the patio which was good for us. The wall divider was high so didn’t see the street which was good. The menu was hard to read in the sense that didn’t explain...More
I came up there with a friend, we had a blast, staff was really friendly and funny. We really enjoyed the nice fresh cocktails, I took a strawberry mint mojito, we ordered food too, I was starving so I forgot to took a picture, we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2554057-Reviews-Suika_Snackbar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sula Indian Restaurant,"Delicious food and lovely service. Enough said. Only thing that could be better is the acoustics - it's pretty loud when the restaurant is busy, so difficult to chat across a table for 6.
Delicious food and lovely service. Enough said. Only thing that could be better is the acoustics - it's pretty loud when the restaurant is busy, so difficult to chat across a table for 6.
Absolutely amazing food and experience I'm very picky when it comes to India food as I come from from a family of chefs and brilliant home cooks Would absolutely recommend this place a d most definitely will be a regular there. Our waiter Ash was...More
Absolutely amazing food and experience I'm very picky when it comes to India food as I come from from a family of chefs and brilliant home cooks Would absolutely recommend this place a d most definitely will be a regular there. Our waiter Ash was...More
Great meal, reasonably priced but didn't get to try dessert as the server did not come back. Was at the Commercial Drive location. Great atmophere.
Great meal, reasonably priced but didn't get to try dessert as the server did not come back. Was at the Commercial Drive location. Great atmophere.
Collectively lovers of Indian cuisine, Sula meet our expectations, delicious! The service was great, friendly, prompt and helpful.
Collectively lovers of Indian cuisine, Sula meet our expectations, delicious! The service was great, friendly, prompt and helpful.
Sula is my favorite restaurant in Vancouver! The food is so delicious and the service is excellent!
Sula is my favorite restaurant in Vancouver! The food is so delicious and the service is excellent!
Wow Will go back in a heart beat Ambience, Greetings, Attentiveness, presentation Seating Will recommend
Wow Will go back in a heart beat Ambience, Greetings, Attentiveness, presentation Seating Will recommend
Every time we go here it's the best Indian food we've ever had. A bit more expensive than your average Indian restaurant but worth every cent.
Every time we go here it's the best Indian food we've ever had. A bit more expensive than your average Indian restaurant but worth every cent.
First time at this restaurant and it had a great buzz. Service was swift and the menu a real adventure but make sure you have a curry ----delicious. A happy night out.
First time at this restaurant and it had a great buzz. Service was swift and the menu a real adventure but make sure you have a curry ----delicious. A happy night out.
Excellent service from Harpreet, Sujarta and the young lady who first seated us - sorry I forgot to ask your name! - as well as the young man who brought us our food. The food was tasty, but not our favourite choices (chosen by our...More
Excellent service from Harpreet, Sujarta and the young lady who first seated us - sorry I forgot to ask your name! - as well as the young man who brought us our food. The food was tasty, but not our favourite choices (chosen by our...More
The experience was great. The restaurant is beautifully decorated. The food is fantastic. The service is top-notch.
The experience was great. The restaurant is beautifully decorated. The food is fantastic. The service is top-notch.
I went to lunch with my sister and brother who I had not seen in a long time.we enjoyed great food and great service in a reslly lovely setting
I went to lunch with my sister and brother who I had not seen in a long time.we enjoyed great food and great service in a reslly lovely setting
Visited on a Monday night with my Dad & my girlfriend. Restaurant was quiet. Some of the female staff are rude and very unwelcoming. Food is very good but overall I don’t think it’s worth all the hype.
Visited on a Monday night with my Dad & my girlfriend. Restaurant was quiet. Some of the female staff are rude and very unwelcoming. Food is very good but overall I don’t think it’s worth all the hype.
We eat here about 4 times a year. The food and service are always excellent. They adjust the heat levels according to your taste. The depth of flavour is excellent even with the milder versions of their main dishes. The serving size is ample enough...More
We eat here about 4 times a year. The food and service are always excellent. They adjust the heat levels according to your taste. The depth of flavour is excellent even with the milder versions of their main dishes. The serving size is ample enough...More
A beautiful space. Plants, paint, fabrics, music create a little escape l. Delicious food. Flavours are amazing. Very good value. Adorable goldfish. Excellent service.
A beautiful space. Plants, paint, fabrics, music create a little escape l. Delicious food. Flavours are amazing. Very good value. Adorable goldfish. Excellent service.
Looove this restaurant! First time there… Service was fantastic, and food was even better! We were celebrating a birthday so had many share plates and this was by far the best Indian food I have had in Vancouver!
Looove this restaurant! First time there… Service was fantastic, and food was even better! We were celebrating a birthday so had many share plates and this was by far the best Indian food I have had in Vancouver!
We were a party of 5. They seated us with 2 tables (2 person table) pulled together so one person sits at the head of the table. The restaurant was not full for the evening. We asked to be moved to another table but they...More
We were a party of 5. They seated us with 2 tables (2 person table) pulled together so one person sits at the head of the table. The restaurant was not full for the evening. We asked to be moved to another table but they...More
Was a treat to eat here. Well prepared dishes of quality food of decent portions. It's a busy place! The service was quite attentive. The price is what was expected. The hostess was very pretty. Would not hesitate to go back there. A fine experience...More
Was a treat to eat here. Well prepared dishes of quality food of decent portions. It's a busy place! The service was quite attentive. The price is what was expected. The hostess was very pretty. Would not hesitate to go back there. A fine experience...More
Fabulous Indian food. Friendly, attentive service. Comfortable surroundings. Highly recommend the palak pakora chaat. My only complaint is that the recorded music was a bit too loud for my taste. But we could converse comfortably. A quibble, not a major issue. (Most restaurant experiences would...More
Fabulous Indian food. Friendly, attentive service. Comfortable surroundings. Highly recommend the palak pakora chaat. My only complaint is that the recorded music was a bit too loud for my taste. But we could converse comfortably. A quibble, not a major issue. (Most restaurant experiences would...More
Order the pakora chaat-it is absolutely hands down the best!! I have had it several times; sometimes with vegans and sometimes with people who eat dairy. Even with the yogurt on the side this dish is memorable and will make you swoon!!! The service today...More
Order the pakora chaat-it is absolutely hands down the best!! I have had it several times; sometimes with vegans and sometimes with people who eat dairy. Even with the yogurt on the side this dish is memorable and will make you swoon!!! The service today...More
Excellent food and service. The staff was very accommodating and helpful. We will definitely go back!
Excellent food and service. The staff was very accommodating and helpful. We will definitely go back!
Great food! My family is visiting from Portland, OR and we wanted some good Indian food. We have two teens who are still learning to like spice so we got everything mild. We ordered the Vegetable Samosa, which was huge. I thought the spice level...More
Great food! My family is visiting from Portland, OR and we wanted some good Indian food. We have two teens who are still learning to like spice so we got everything mild. We ordered the Vegetable Samosa, which was huge. I thought the spice level...More
Great food, everything came hot and just spicy enough for my taste. The portions were very generous. The peach sangria was the best Sangria I’ve ever had! Service was great. Will definitely be going back.
Great food, everything came hot and just spicy enough for my taste. The portions were very generous. The peach sangria was the best Sangria I’ve ever had! Service was great. Will definitely be going back.
Four of us had dinner early on a Saturday evening. Every dish ordered was outstanding. We had: Palak pakora chaat for appy, and Madras lamb, baby eggplant, chicken jalfraize and lamb biriyani for mains. Dessert was almond Rasmalai (Indian cheesecake) and mango coconut rice pudding....More
Four of us had dinner early on a Saturday evening. Every dish ordered was outstanding. We had: Palak pakora chaat for appy, and Madras lamb, baby eggplant, chicken jalfraize and lamb biriyani for mains. Dessert was almond Rasmalai (Indian cheesecake) and mango coconut rice pudding....More
I loved the decor Our server was so helpful and friendly And the dishes were very tasty Especially the deconstructed samosas
I loved the decor Our server was so helpful and friendly And the dishes were very tasty Especially the deconstructed samosas
Quality of food was good -- hot and delicious. Service was cordial. Dishes were served in a prompt and timely manner. Loved the ambiance overall. Restaurant space/size was a bit tight/small for the number of tables. Parking could be an issue for some people. Will...More
Quality of food was good -- hot and delicious. Service was cordial. Dishes were served in a prompt and timely manner. Loved the ambiance overall. Restaurant space/size was a bit tight/small for the number of tables. Parking could be an issue for some people. Will...More
Delicious food, especially the tandoori wings, paneer, butter chicken, and Garlic naan. Sweet server. So helpful and kind.
Delicious food, especially the tandoori wings, paneer, butter chicken, and Garlic naan. Sweet server. So helpful and kind.
Great Indian food and artisan cocktails! We ordered the Samosa chaat, butter chicken, and chicken tikka masala. All the food was great, and the service was very attentive. My only complaint is that it can be a little chilly at times in the restaurant so...More
Great Indian food and artisan cocktails! We ordered the Samosa chaat, butter chicken, and chicken tikka masala. All the food was great, and the service was very attentive. My only complaint is that it can be a little chilly at times in the restaurant so...More
The food is always amazing and staff are very knowledgeable with their extensive menu! Fantastic gin and tonic options too! Hard to try new thing’s because the butter chicken gets us every time… but tonight, we tried the lamb which was incredible!
The food is always amazing and staff are very knowledgeable with their extensive menu! Fantastic gin and tonic options too! Hard to try new thing’s because the butter chicken gets us every time… but tonight, we tried the lamb which was incredible!
Extra wide comfortable chairs for our table of six to enjoy a lovely meal. We started with the appetizer platter which had Samosas and pakora and cheese, chatpata, lamb biryani, lamb vindaloo, butter chicken, chicken Tikka masala amd tandoori chicken which was so moist. Great...More
Extra wide comfortable chairs for our table of six to enjoy a lovely meal. We started with the appetizer platter which had Samosas and pakora and cheese, chatpata, lamb biryani, lamb vindaloo, butter chicken, chicken Tikka masala amd tandoori chicken which was so moist. Great...More
We read the review and we’re not disappointed in any way. Fabulous food and service. We had the appetizer combo and then the traditional Indian entrees. All exceptional
We read the review and we’re not disappointed in any way. Fabulous food and service. We had the appetizer combo and then the traditional Indian entrees. All exceptional",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2416911-Reviews-Sula_Indian_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sun Sui Wah Chinese,"We had a large family dinner on Sunday Feb 5th, ordering Black Bean Crab, Garlic Crab, Peking Duck, Salt Prawns, Salt Squid, Filet Pepper Beef, Sautéed Seafood. All were superb. However, the service lagged far behind what I’ve come to expect from Sun Sui Wah....More
We went with friends to have dim sum for lunch on a Sunday with reserved time. Even with reservation we only could get our table after 30 minutes. So I would not recommend going for lunch on weekends. It was worth because the food was...More
Dim sum in many restaurants in Richmond is usually pretty good. This restaurant has been in business for many years. Usual standard dim sum with some specialties. We ordered rice roll with fish paste, beef tendon and stomach, shrimp on fish maw, beef ball and...More
Was recommended by a friend to try Sun Sui Wah and he described it as a city favorite for him and his family. Glad I went to try because I was not disappointed. Try the crab!
While we have been coming here for many years, it was before covid since we last set foot here. First, the food is as good as remembered. Their dim sum is really good however we sure miss the pre-covid times when they had the carts....More
We had lunch at one of the traditional Chinese restaurants in Richmond serving Cantonese dim sum. The venue was great and comfortable, the staff was speedy and polite, the food was very good quality. We were lucky to go for lunch at 11:30am during weekday...More
Driving back to Seattle from Whistler, wanted to stop for Dim Sum for our party of five. Did a quick internet search and connected with this place - five stars. We ordered a ton of food - every single dish was amazing - hot and...More
we dined at this excellent restaurants thrice. once for lunch and twice for dinner during our 8 day visit to Richmond. we loved its food. the dim sum chefs are skilled in preparing large variety of dim sum dishes with pleasing presentation. we had its...More
My family have been going to this place for years. Before Chinese restaurants were abundant in the lower mainland. This was our go to Chinese restaurant. They also have a huge advertisement sign just outside of the YVR exit. We have been to Sun Sui...More
It is time for our brother & sisters once a moth get together !also it is one of my sister's 70 yeas birthday coming up ,and she love pigeons ,and just happen the restaurant have their special Pigeons promotion this month , ,the restaurant have...More
One of the best dim places I have ever experienced Located in Richmond, Vancouver Very busy, great for lunch/brunch
We had the crispy tofu, deep fried squid, Gai lan, eggplant with shrimp, shrimp wonton. Service was prompt, no waiting with reservations and the food was hot and tasty. It’s now a regular place to go.
We usually go to the Main Str. location when visiting Vancouver but decided to try the Richmond branch mainly because of the parking issues. We were there at opening( 10:00 am ) and by 10:20 the place was full. The food was FABULOUS and served...More
The Chinese mentality is at times embarrassing. We arrived promptly at 10:25 AM for dim sum (the restaurant opens at 10:30 AM although the doors were open) and we were ignored by reception until 10:32 AM. A queue was beginning to form behind us however...More
We were treated to a Tim Sum lunch at the San Sui Wah in Richmond. The Tim Sum at San Sui Wah is still very good albeit the increase in prices. It is well located and has lots of car parks and the decor and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d785975-Reviews-Sun_Sui_Wah_Chinese-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Sun Sui Wah Seafood Restaurant,"We made reservations based on the recommendation of friends and were completely satisfied with our experience. Every single employee made us feel welcome and took time to explain various menu items. Spot prawns were in season so we got an order. They were perfectly cooked...More
I have been to Sun Sui Wah on several occasions and always found the food consistently good. Not life changing but never a bad meal either. Service standard is also high and consistent
Sun Sui Wah was a nice restaurant has gone downhill. The actual price of the food (on dinner menu) was much more expensive than what they advertised on their website. The food was way overpriced ($30-$55/dish), not very good quality, small portion and lacking ingredients....More
We went here as a group of 2 families (10 in total) for yum cha on the recommendation of some locals - it was largely disappointing. Some of the food was good (the dumplings) and some very ordinary (squid/calamari and the greens) - and there...More
First opened in 1988, and at its current location since 1995, Sun Sui Wah has established itself as one of Vancouver’s finest Chinese restaurants. Known for its dim sum and fresh seafood, Sun Sui Wah has garnered plenty of praise from the media and food...More
We were there for dinner last week. Not sure if they accidentally left our ordered dishes in the kitchen for too long. When our ordered food came, it was really lukewarm. This was no good, especially, as I ordered squabs and stir fired fish fillets...More
The 2 of us came here for dim sum lunch on a weekday and it was still busy. We ordered a couple of our all time favourites – steamed shrimp dumpling with asparagus (something different and tastier than plain old shrimp haw gao) & bean...More
This place has the worst service ever! Many Chinese restaurants are notorious for bad service but this place is on another level. I arrived for lunch and they said the waiting time will be around half an hour. I asked to put my name on...More
This always had been (and still is) my ‘go to’ favourite dim sum place to take out of town guests and friends. They have really stepped it up since Covid and are top notch when making sure customers stay safe. They check for ID &...More
Sun Sui Wah here in Vancouver and also in Richmond is a mainstay of Dim Sum in Vancouver. Really haven’t had a bad dish here - selections during this particular visit included steamed prawn dumplings, shiu mai, sticky rice, bbq pork buns, pea tips and...More
First wedding in over 2 years and we had a FEAST at Sun Sui Wah! The 10 course meal in FULL effect and it was just as good as I remember it. We started off with the Roasted Pig cold cut platter. The jellyfish was...More
IT IS ONE OF THE "" OLD Boy "" around over 30 years since they open their door , I surprised my business partner for her Birthday Lunch , make a reservation few weeks ago , wow , the place is packed , but happy...More
I read somewhere that one should check the state of the washrooms as an Indication of the state of the kitchen. There were no towels and no fan to dry your hands. The floors were Slippery and Slimy wet. There were patches of water or.....More
This is my go to place for Dim Sum! I love it here. The food is fresh and it’s tasty. Just about the same as you would get in Hong Kong. They now have 20 percent off with for Dim Sum to attract customers during...More
The Alaska King Crab is very fresh, delicious but expensive. There are many kinds of tasty food to choose, such as : seafood, meats and vegetables. Worthy to come !",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d790635-Reviews-Sun_Sui_Wah_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sunshine Diner,"What a great find. Quality and quantify of food was fantastic, excellent quality and extremely friendly staff. You won’t go hungry here. 1st ever peanut butter milkshake - so nice!
This restaurant had been a go to breakfast place of ours for decades. We moved out of the area a few years ago so our visit to Sunshine Diner last week was eagerly anticipated. It was a complete disappointment and likely we will not return....More
Went for breakfast, we did'nt eat again until dinnertime! Had the omelette, potatoes, toast and fruit. It was a huge portion andwe were stuffed for the rest of the day. Service was quick and food delicious. Great if you want breakfast to fill you for...More
We've gone here a couple times with our 1 year old. The food is always good. The service is always friendly and fast. No complaints on anything at this place. It's always super busy on weekends so come early if you wanna sit right away.
Dropped by to enjoy a ""Canadian"" omelette with Bacon and Mushrooms for a very late breakfast. Lots of 50's and 60's memorabilia and music.
If you fancy having half an hour of your life wasted this is the place for you. This is the type of place that prides itself in having a queue outside the door. Its unfortunate that customers can see all the empty tables through the...More
One thing I will say about COVID is it’s severely limited the number of public toilets available. We were in urgent need of washroom facilities while ambling down Kitsilano. We spied a Dairy Queen across the street and thought it would act as our saviour....More
Great food. Old time service. Good value for money. Fun vibe. What's not to like? Excellent bennies.
No busier time than Sunday noon, but this place took great care of our party of seven. The portions here are quite generous and quite tasty. There is good value for the price. This is a well-run restaurant featuring good food and an attentive staff.
We actually had breakfast twice during our Vancouver vacation—we loved this place! The food is delicious, wonderfully presented in perfect portions. Waitstaff was outstanding—very friendly and attentive, and very helpful to us visiting Americans. Prices were reasonable, the 1950’s nostalgia decor with cartoons on the...More
Had a great brunch meal here recently . Had delicious well prepared Eggs Benedict , side bacon , and Short stack of pancakes . Great service , fun nostalgic atmosphere and awesome food and portions . Still a great choice amongst all the newer trendier...More
Listen. I am trying very hard to be patient. I really, truly am. But what is it with all these establishments, or, as shrek calls them, ""restaurants"", that get no repercussions for clearly advertising falsely??????????? ""sunshine diner"". Uh huh? Sunshine. flipping. diner. had no sunshine...More
This was a great local diner. However, perhaps due to problems with hiring / retaining cooks or staff, the level of service at this establishment has really gone down. If you do not have a reservation, do not bother showing up. We were asked to...More
Decorated with classic 60’s parafernalia including the Bugs Bunny Show on the monitors and Elvis Presley on all the walls, it has a great menu at reasonable costs. The Benedict eggs in several versions are done with perfection. Service is fast and efficient. On Saturdays...More
The Sunshine Diner is attractive and interesting. Very nice decor with lots of 1950s artifacts, very efficient and friendly staff and good wholesome breakfast and lunch dishes. Lots of choices of eggs benedict and burgers. Croded, we had to go for a long walk while...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709372-Reviews-Sunshine_Diner-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Super Chef Grill,"Using trip advisor found this place. When we arrived was a bit unsure but went for it. The owner was a lovely man, very welcoming and couldn’t do enough. We ended up eating in. It was the most delicious chicken satay I’ve had. Chef cooked...More
We stopped by for an early dinner before a hockey game and we’re not disappointed. The food is cooked in water instead of oil so healthier. We had the black pepper chicken and beef on rice and Szechuan chicken with noodles. Both were freshly prepared...More
Bit of a hole in the wall but also a bit of a hidden gem! The food is the perfect combo of delicious/affordable, and the owners are so friendly. Super Chef is definitely a casual favourite.
My family and I have been eating here for over 5 years. This is the best food in the city. It is simple, clean, fresh, and the owners are kind and friendly people. Don't go expecting trendiness or anything other than great food prepared well...More
We ate here while staying down the street. Food was good and prices were fair too. The staff was very friendly and helpfull. The service was fast too. Would go again.
I went to this place based on the reviews. First of all, for a hole in the wall type of place 10bucks and up for mediocre beef with rice or 13bucks for beef with noodles is not a deal. The portions were not huge, lots...More
Wanted something quick and happened across this place. Very glad we did. Owners were very friendly and offered recommdations. Food was very fresh and flavorful. Will definitely be back. I had garlic chicken and prawns and my wife had teriyaki chicken. Bother were excellent.
First time eating Pho. Had a bowl with chicken. The ‘small’ bowl was huge and the chicken pieces were big and fresh. Broth was perfectly seasoned. Not too salty. Love it. Place casual, inexpensive and clean.
A good selection— something for everyone. Sweet to spicy, vegetarian or not, everything cooked on a grill without oil or msg. We had fish, beef, and chicken, three different styles. Everything fresh, served up hot and very good. Small, at six tables and twelve chairs,...More
Stopped here for lunch based on the menu outside. We were pleasantly surprised by how good the food was and how friendly the owners are. They went out of their way to make us happy and welcome. I thoroughly enjoyed the peppered chicken and my...More
The food was delicious, healthy and fresh. The service was friendly, I would definitely eat here again!
The food is awesome, portions are large, customization is welcome, and the owners are just THE SWEETEST people. I go here at least every other week for lunch or dinner. Order the ""green bean tofu curry"" - you will not be disappointed!
Came across this mom and pop shop while checking out places on Robson street . Excellent value meal at a budget price. We tried the black pepper beef and it was excellent.
I dropped in here for a quick take-out supper. Most reviews were good, and I had checked that first. It is true that language was a bit of a problem for we English-only people, but the couple running it were very pleasant and helpful as...More
This is a hidden gem. A tiny, family run little shop on Robson. I get take-out from here at least once/month. The hot and sour chicken & beef and broccoli are wonderful!! I would recommend getting everything on rice (the default) because the noodles are...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8497088-Reviews-Super_Chef_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sura Korean Bbq Restaurant Richmond,"Was recommended by a friend to try Sura in DT. They dont take reservations and the line was out the door. I realized they had a second location in Richmond so I went with my husband to try there instead. I was not disappointed. Food...More
I’d intended to patronize Tiny One Café for lunch; however, they were apparently closed for redecorating (translation = total rebranding and name change); thus, I took this as an opportunity to visit another eatery on my “must try” list: SURA Korean BBQ. SURA first came...More
We had a family dinner for our under graduates who wanted Korean bbq food. The restaurant only held a reservation for 5pm so early dinner! Confirming the reservation was a bit uncertain but once we got there, it was ok. Since it wasn’t that busy,...More
Came here with friend and what a lovely restaurant. We had glass noodles, seafood pancakes, stone rice and short ribs. Short ribs were so succulent they they fell off the bone. And the taste. Totally amazing. This is as authentic as you can get outside...More
Due to COVID-19, I have not gone out to try new restaurant for quite some time. Today, while going to Aberdeen Centre in Richmond, we paid a visit to this one with satisfaction. First of all, food tasted good and also not expensive. Instead of...More
So happy to have stumbled upon this place just across from the Radisson. It’s the real deal. Watch out though, they aren’t joking about closing time.
An unpleasant experience! I have visited this restaurant many times before with my friends and the food was delicious and we received good service. However, our experience here yesterday was worse than subpar. We ordered the lunch set menu SU for 3 people, which used...More
We were in Vancouver on vacation. We found this restaurant as one option close to the airport. The menu has lots of options but we decided to try the RA menu (minimum of 2 people). It was a great choice since you get to try...More
I used to always question why there was always a lineup at this restaurant. This time I went with a friend and was pleasantly surprised by the quality of the meat that we ordered. Prices are pretty high in the menu, but you actually get...More
It was a reminder of the experience in Seoul in 2017. While the ambience is akin to many restaurants, you will find the meal quite rewarding. If you have never had Korean BBM you should ask your server for some guidance,we took our time and...More
Good food, good price and good service. Went there for lunch. Ordered 3 set lunches. All the dishes were good.
I’ve always wanted to try this restaurant but the place have always been full with a long line of people waiting. Finally, we came in early and didn’t have to wait. Now I know why there’s always a long line. Not only did we get...More
Went here with friends and had a great time. Food was very good. We had a few of the Chef's Specials and they were all delicious. We had to wait a while but we came at a busy time Friday night so we expected to...More
Had lunch with friends. You can make reservation to avoid lining up. The restaurant has two set menu for lunch. One is $15 per person and the second one is $20per person (has more meat). The set menu meals are OK, but most of the...More
We went on a Sunday night right when they opened at 5pm only waited a few minutes for table. We weren't starving and were waiting for our flight so we couldn't have left overs. The portions were huge, it would be nice if they had...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d7262329-Reviews-Sura_Korean_Bbq_Restaurant_Richmond-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Bar Maumi,"This place is the real deal - an exceptional high level sushi experience. The restaurant only accepts reservations - no walk in. They offer 2 services per night with a maximum of 10 customers seated at a bar. The restaurant is run by 2 people...More
We had an amazing time at Sushi Bar Maumi. The omakase is amazing, the food is so delicious and the service was friendly. It is a small restaurant and very strict on their service times so come a bit early so that you are ready...More
The place is a small hidden gem that seats 10-11 people for a set omakase sushi dinner of 11 pieces. They have a list of other nigiri that you can get afterwords if you want to try a few more pieces. The chef is very...More
What is not to like about this place? A tiny 10 seat curved sushi bar tucked near an alley on Bute Street with a Master Sushi Chef, wow! There are only two seatings, the first at 6:00pm with the second at 9:30pm. A word of...More
Before you go, know what you are getting into. If you are expecting to have westernized sushi with rolls, fusion dishes and sake/beer, this is definitely not the place for you. However, if you are looking for a quiet, high quality, authentic Japanese omakase nigiri...More
This was my first Omakase experience and I really enjoyed it. Delicious sushi and some new tastes. The 11 pieces in the set price ($75 each) was enough for us, but the other guests ordered more. Only 10 seats in the restaurant and you all...More
You must reserve a spot at Mauimi’s 10 seater counter with your credit card and you must show up on time. Fail to do so and they charge $75 to your card. Fair enough, they are only open for two seatings between 6 and 9:30...More
This is the first time that we came to this place after the renovation (while I can’t go too often since it cost about $80 - $100 per person). Originally I was going to write a long review, but I’ve decided to keep it short...More
I may be biased as this was my first time in an Omakase sushi place, but I enjoyed every minute of it. The Blue-fin Tuna and the Hokkaido Uni were amazing, and were a first for me. The service itself was very professional and I...More
Everyone's reviews tell you about the amazing fish and the not-so-great ambience. It's true. Don't go to this place if you want to ask the chef questions, learn details about the fish, have a really luxurious experience. DO go to this place if you want...More
I suppose once is ok, maybe the quality is above average among Sushi restaurants in Vancouver. But not mind-boggling. To our surprise, they do not offer Sake or any drinks other than green tea. Omakase consists of 11 pieces of sushi and a miso soup,...More
We booked dinner for two looking forward to a nice night with personal service at the bar. Instead, it was boring and cold. The chef essentially wants you in and out. There is no conversation. There is no welcome and no pause in between. Even...More
My husband and my first time to Sushi Bar Maumi for their $75 CAD per person Omakase. Advanced online reservation is required and you need to leave your credit card details to hold the spots. In case of no-show, you would be charged the full...More
This is a small intimate sushi bar that really replicates the experience I have had in good sushi places in Tokyo, Japan. These days there are many kinds of non-traditional sushi/maki available with all kinds of bizarre fillings. In contrast, Maumi excels at the traditional...More
I have been to Maumi only twice, but I enjoyed both visits. I ordered Omakase ($45 for 10 pieces) and Anago tempura and Agedashi-dofu, when I went there with my husband. Everything was cooked to order and delicious, but Agedashi tasted like any other restaurant....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4852892-Reviews-Sushi_Bar_Maumi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Bella,"Stay with regular menu even if it’s pricey. All you can eat - ugh- Just not at all a good meal never mind the price. You get a reduced quality and/or product. The sashimi is farm salmon and they cut pieces in half to qualify...More
We have been to Sushi Bella several times over the years and are seldom disappointed. Our latest visit was delightful. Service was excellent ( thank you Misol) and it was so good to see Bella back again. We missed you 😊. We have always loved...More
I hadn’t been here since Covid started. The food was fresh and tasty. What’s different are dishes such as sushi pizza, healthy wooden bowls, and bacon tempura. We shared the black unagi bowl and dynamite sushi combo. Go for the unagi bowl. Their menu will...More
Their sushi is great! Ok portions for the price it is definitely not the cheap sushi place of the neighborhood but the quality, flavour and presentation are excellent! Clean and quiet restaurant, service is good very reserved service but good in general. They haven’t taken...More
Went for late lunch and experienced amazing food quality and presentation, delivering exceptional dining atmosphere. The staff remained quick, friendly and courteous while ensuring proper Covid protocols throughout the entire stay.
Food here is great. Have been multiple times. However, the last three times I have come their time estimate has been worse and worse. When you're told that it will be ready in 40 minutes (for a rice bowl and small tempura), I expect it...More
5 month’s pregnant, asked if i could use their washroom, she answered in a very rude snd disrespectfully way in front if all the customers that its not for public. Very disappointing.
The food was well prepared and well presented. Service was quick and easy and like many restaurants the menu is online now. I didn't notice until after we ordered but when we come back next time I'll probably order one of their bowls. The pictures...More
So so good. Got some drunken tiger rolls and they were easily the best sushi rolls I’ve ever had. They also do a great udon soup (which is weirdly hard to find around here).
Very casual family run Japanese dining , is not too far walk from the Sea Bus Terminal ,is on Lonsdale Ave /2 rd , the decor very comfort and clean ,they do also have a small section of patio ,now you can have All You...More
First time for us at Sushi Bella NV, now you have the option ALL YOU CAN EAT, excellent menu for lunch and dinner...good portions and huge variety, but the best the quality of food and great service. Our waitress ISEUL was very gentle and professional...More
Food is always good here. Lots of variety and creative selections. Well priced. Generally busy so lots of turn over of their product, so always fresh. Good place for family and friends
Service is always sorta bad here...tonight it was really poor service. 3 waitresses- not that busy and all tables waiting for drinks and food. We had to flag them down. The food tasted okay - and 1 off the roles, the tuna role had bones...More
My girlfriends swear that this has the best sushi on the north shore so I decided to try it out! I agree the food was fresh and delicious. We came in close to closing time and we were extremely rushed to get out...to the point...More
This amazing Sushi place stands out among the rest because of the unbelievable fresh selections for the senses ! The flavors and blends and fusions that you could be there awhile trying to decide what to eat ! My fav cocktail they create also fresh...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d5068494-Reviews-Sushi_Bella-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Bros,"Yummy, fresh, no frills, inventive sushi. Served fast and pleasantly. Everyone in the family enjoyed their food. Would come again!
Really good take out sushi. The sashimi is huge! Took about ten mins from ordering to be ready. Would definitely recommend. Can’t remember all the dishes we had but no bad ones in there
Delicious Bento Box. It gave us some of everything. The teriyaki chicken was tender and flavorful. The miso was hot and very tasty. I loved the flavor of the ginger dressing on the salad. Crisp and hot spring rolls added another texture. The crab salad...More
Took a little time from the Island. Stayed at a friends place on Nelson St. and we wanted to go to a sushi place. We seldom get good sushi and fresh sushi at that!! Like other reviews on this place I am in agreement that...More
Having recently moved to the area I was really pleased to discover Sushi Bros. The staff are friendly, the service is quick and the sushi is really good value and made freshly on the premises. I’ve been back four times in the last month &...More
If you go to Vancouver you must have sushi. We tried this little spot and were not disappointed. The lovely lady who took care of us was such a delight with suggestions. I do not recall what we ordered but one was a spicy tuna...More
Stopped with friends for dinner. I got a sashimi bento box. The fish was fresh and clean tasting. The sushi roll was good. The the spring rolls were on the under filled side but good with the plum sauce. The dressing on the salad was...More
Came here for a quick bite as it was close to our hotel and what a disappointment. Although I love a good hole in the wall sushi joint this place missed the mark for cleanliness, service, food quality, etc...Vancouver has so many great options for...More
Warm friendly service, delicious edamame, miso and sushi. Would definitely recommend and will visit again in future!
Our teenage boys went here for a quick bite, and got a lot of sushi for a reasonable price. The sushi was fresh and flavourful.
Friendly staff and truly awesome tasting food. the restaurant is a little cramped but the food makes it worth it. great value a perfect spot to stop in for lunch. I go a few times a week.
We are here in Vancouver for a cruise and had a long trying day to get up here. We just wanted something to tide us over for dinner when my wife eyed this wonderful place. We eat sushi back in So Cal several times a...More
I needed to put my Sushi Low Level Light out and this place did the trick! Received far more food than expected and the quality was excellent!
We stopped by for lunch as we were just walking past. Sat in and had yam avocado roll, mango, cucumber avocado roll, dome gomae and veggie gyozas. It was all really delicious. Good vegetarian options and came quickly although they were busy. Would definitely recommend.
Thank you! for your 5 stars review.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13188804-Reviews-Sushi_Bros-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Den,"Portions, service and prices were excellent!! We were extremely happy with our experience. Two hard to please kids were very happy too!
Good place to go for Sushi. It’s was very busy which was good because everything was fresh. Not a very large restaurant with limited seating. Service could have been better but the meal was good. Portions were large. Don’t go here if you are looking...More
Casual family type restaurant. Great food and rather large portions for a Japanese restaurant. The Nigiri Bento and the Beef Teri Bento were very good. Service was friendly and good. Excellent value.
We were visiting Vancouver and a craving for sushi led us to this venue! Very fresh and a few unique rolls including the Dance of Salmon roll. The spiciness is a nice little kick! The Dragon roll was excellent and so was the salmon sashimi....More
Good value sushi place, ingredients were mostly fresh (except for the chopped scallop). Tempura has a nice coating and crunch, but had a burnt oil taste. Food came really fast, but had to flag down our server for everything. The service can use some major...More
The portion size is reasonable for the price and the quality of the food was good. It is not one of the best, but definitely good for the price.
Seven of us from work went here. There may be a line up so stick your name on the waitlist board and hope you can get in soon. The food was ok.
We still go to this Bistro in our neighborhood, serving genuine Japanese meals, although the menu is limited, but everything tasted so good! We went for lunch and ordered from Special meal sets menu section, a starter and a lunch box. So, the kitchen and...More
Hey I’m not a big Japanese food person, but if you are, this is the place for you and if you are not it is also the place for you. The food is awesome, hot, fresh, authentic. So I don’t do raw, but they do,...More
I had the sashimi bento for dinner. The food was good, and the portions were very nice. The fish was fresh with generous cuts. The tempura was tasty and not excessively greasy. I liked the miso soup as well. I would definitely come here again!
We had sushi on our eleventh anniversary at the sushi den. I had the draft Asahi and my wife had the green tea, the spicy tuna was amazing and the other rolls cannot be beat.
Visiting friends near here in March, they suggested this place for dinner. It was a Sunday night, so not too busy as there were no sporting events on at the nearby arenas. We were seated almost immediately. Green tea was provided and our order was...More
We came here late night 30 minutes before it closed so no wait. We ordered Beef udon Salmon nigiri and Chopped scallop roll. The food was fine, just nothing special. Street parking is available. Service was ok.
I went to there at lunch time. Inside of the restaurant was tidy and food was reasonable. We ordered some pieces of Nigiris and 2 rolls. One of the rolls was Unagi with spicy source which was new experience for us so we could enjoy...More
I live in Hong Kong. We know about sushi. This amazing place has fresh and amazing sushi and japanese dishes. close to rogers arena and always great to pass by and have some sushi or rolls! go, its worth it",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3794774-Reviews-Sushi_Den-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Garden,"I hadn’t been here in years. We had sushi dinner on a week night at the Metrotown location. Our rating: Service: 4/5 – it was busy and we didn’t feel rushed to order, eat & leave Food Value: 4/5 – decent portions. They offer combo...More
In my opinion it is one of the best Japanese restaurants in Burnaby , and I have been in several other restaurants already . Menu is very good , service offered by Hyunjoo Kang was courteous, impecable , profesional and diligent …. Well done !!!...More
I really enjoy sushi from Sushi Garden as it's close to home and convenient for take out. The sushi is always fresh and delicious, and you have a lot to choose from. I am yet to meet anyone who doesn't like sushi from Sushi Garden....More
They offer a good variety not only of sushi. The fish is really fresh and the nigiri are more fish than rice which is definitely a plus! People work here very efficiently. It is not a cosy restaurant though to spend a lot more time...More
Sushi Garden must be doing something right because they’re still here. They’ve outlasted a number of sushi eateries along this stretch of Kingsway, chief amongst them Yakko and Satomi. And I admit this initially surprised me because I always held Yakko and Satomi in high...More
Everyone who lives in Burnaby seems to know about this spot. So if you know, you know. And if you don't, your loss.
The food was good, either maki, temaki and sashimi. I enjoyed the scallop temaki and the surf clam sashimi. Never had before. Almost all the tables were occupied on a Saturday night. Gently staff but putting a bit of pressure as they wanted to close
Full parking lot, quick greeting, immediate seating, busy & noisy atmosphere, friendly service, good prices, tasty food, clientele an eclectic blend of nationalities. Loved every minute of our meal experience!
My family and I visited the Sushi Garden Metro. Really really good sushi. Completely fresh and a lot of different things to choose from from the menu card. The level of service was a bit strange, but it didn't matter at all. Also the prices...More
Terrible service, waitresses were very rude and with limited understanding of English. Didn't explain or even understand the vaccination receipts process. Just tell us to get out.
First and foremost, I do not eat seafood due to allergies, so I went with a friend and go the vegetarian stuff. I live in Alberta so when I saw $4-8 for sushi, I expected a small amount of food. I ordered vegetarian dishes and...More
the fish was fresh, large, tender, and reasonably priced. I cannot emphasize more how much we enjoyed eating here. Yes, there are better quality fish out there but we are now talking about michelin star quality and price. For this price, the quality of the...More
A good value sushi place in Metrotown. Good portions for the value. The restaurant is always busy, but their service is quick. Solid food overall, can be a bit loud inside, but due to the amount of customers, the turn over of ingredients is very...More
Not sure if it is a late evening (close to their closing time) or starting of the long weekend break holiday. The food and service dropped compared with our previous visits.
Me and my wife went for lunch. The restaurant is nice and clean. The parking is easy. And their food are nice, fresh and great value. Highly recommended.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d803284-Reviews-Sushi_Garden-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Giwa,"A delightful middle-of-the-road restaurant that offered delicious and reasonably priced meals. We enjoyed a platter and two extra dishes and ended up taking one meal home.
It was our first time in this restaurant. We ordered a hosomaki combo, beef udon, lunch box and the special: fried ika yaki (octopus). The octopus was fried whole and cut for us at our table. The food tasted amazing. The service was on point...More
I think that there are some better sushi places in the neighbourhood. The rolls were oversauced and the mayo they used didn't taste quite right (a bit runny).
The options for sushi are great. We really like the specialty rolls and everything is super fresh. Fast service!
I had come for a quick dinner but after 45mins I had to ask to get my 2 rolls as take-out. Apparently people ordering by phone get priority over restaurant guests... They were kind enough to bring lots of tea and a miso soup while...More
Fresh fish, good prices and generous portion sizes. Service attentive during our lunch visit. Had the lunch box, sashimi, sushi roll of your choice, tempura, miso, salad, gyoza (these weren’t great), and a small bowl of fried rice all for 15.95. Will return.
Better food and service compared to the other sushi restaurant nearby and the price is very fair. They have great roll combos and special rolls. I personally like the crazy boy roll and the delta roll the best but there are many options to choose...More
My son has tried a LOT of sushi places and this is his local favourite. The service is quick and the rolls are large.
Great sushi . The best perk for me is how close it is . I can walk to dinner ;)) super friendly. Big selection on the menu . Everything is fresh . As a bonus my husband loves that you can watch sports in their...More
I went in not knowing what to expect but I was pleasantly surprised. The interior is clean and the flower trees inside make the restaurant look very welcoming. Service was excellent and friendly and I really enjoyed the special rolls. If you don't know what...More
Unfortunately under new management with higher prices and lower quality food. Service has also been compromised. Not a great sushi joint... It's nothing like the old Sushi Giwa I used to frequent with my friends weekly. If you can, try a new sushi joint.
We loved Sushi Giwa when they were at Hastings and Madison. The second location at holdom and Hastings is now where they are at and the quality is not the same. An added bonus was for the kids when they had the Hastings Madison location...More
We had a big group and they treated us well , despite the fact that it took awhile for everyone to get there . I only had sushi a couple of times . I ordered the prawn tempura and it was very good . Our...More
We had a wonderful experience post a convocation celebration. Good generous portions and nice service
Their only 2 chicken dish was awful. Instead of white chicken they use whole thigh with skin which is not properly cooked. I couldn't eat it. I don't recommend those to anyone. They should change that nasty chicken to skinless cleaner piece of chicken. Then...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7927778-Reviews-Sushi_Giwa-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Jin,"Sushi was awesome. This is on par with some of the best sushi places in LA and NYC. High quality fish. Creative combinations of flavors. Very nice presentation. It’s a tiny place that seats max of 6 people for a 6pm seating or 8pm seating....More
Everything was perfect, food amazing and the amount of detail of each sushi is something that you don’t see in other omakase.
Delicious. We ordered the takeout Sushi Nigiri platter (15pc) and the Sashimi platter (7 pieces) plus some extra IKA (squid) and Hotate (scallop). Was enough for 2 of us and we paid about CAD $130 excluding tip. Sushi was Uber fresh, expertly sliced and portions...More
We walked inside, all the tables were full with Japanese people. This was a great sign for us as it meant the food was authentic ! We just returned from a 2 week trip from Japan. The woman behind the counter said it would be...More
I’ll dive into to it right away and say that for a little restaurant (serving about 8 tables only), it’s one of the best Authentic Japanese restaurant I’ve been too (and I didn’t even have to ask for soya sauce to dip my food in...More
This is a place for sushi lovers who are willing to spend an extra dollar (or 50) to experience unique, fresh, and luxurious dishes. If you are looking for a cheap sushi option this is definitely not for you; this establishment focuses on delivering a...More
Small, clean, friendly, good service and excellent sushi. It is on brown rice and the rice and fish are so good and they seem to melt in your mouth. Best sushi.
Can’t go wrong here, best Sushi you’ll ever have. Easy to walk to, use maps to find it, tiny place. Must make reservations in advance for weekends or busy nights. The staff is wonderful and they will explain each piece of fish to you. Be...More
It’s widely understood that Vancouver has great sushi. There’s certainly no shortage of “good” and “very good” places to visit. Our experience at Sushi Jin stands head and shoulders above the rest. To be blunt, this is the best sushi I have ever had -...More
Sushi here is great. Japanese restaurant and a little small for seating but the quality is amazing. Must visit people.
This place is AMAZING. I don't think we've ever had such good quality of Japanese food in the city. The aburi Blue fin tuna and chutoro nigiri are to die for. Service was a little slow but always very friendly and accommodating. Complimentary miso soup...More
This restaurant just opened a couple of months ago and is already fast becoming the worst kept secret in town! It is a VERY small restaurant - 16 seats only, and only ONE sushi chef: the owner himself. So be prepared for a long-ish wait...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16665147-Reviews-Sushi_Jin-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Mania Japanese Restaurant,"Friendly staff! Quick service. Take out took avout 7 mins. They have great combo deals! Yam tempura roll kindof fell apart though.
I was actually quite surprised how good this place was. I had the unagi roll plus the choose from the 3 items combo which was nicely presented in small dishes: tofu, gyoza and beef teriyaki. My friend had the tempura, chicken teriyaki and roll for...More
Good food for the price! This is your typical neighborhood restaurant. I recommend coming here for a sushi fix.
Had a great experience with great food of course. The staffs got a great people skills n know how to treat customers. They put themselves in customer shoes. I highly recommend this place if your looking for great food n service.
I saw the good reviews of this place on Yelp and TripAdvisor so took my family here for lunch. I’m glad we did. It’s a small unassuming place with only about 20 or so seats. When full seated, it gets quite tight. We ordered two...More
Fresh, delicious sushi at very reasonable prices. The place is small and unassuming, but despite the size, even in the dead of a mid afternoon on a weekday, there were people waiting to be seated. They know this place is good. The staff is über...More
We feasted, lots of variety from the traditional to the contemporary. Everybody was happy; prices were ok; service good! Did the job perfectly.
I always love coming here, service is amazing and the sushi is hands-down the best in the neighborhood. I've been to many sushi restaurants in Vancouver and this place is by far the most consistent and fresh.
Absolutely superb. I was last here in 2015 and was very pleased with service and food but they have improved since then. This holiday we have eaten there twice and both times we came away very very satisfied. The restaurant is small, the welcome is...More
Hole in the wall yes. Very friendly service. Sushi is fresh and quick, which is how we like in Vancouver. Oh did I mention cheap. That too. Been to many places, this is overall the best tasting and value on Main Street. 3 items and...More
Went for lunch today ... so yummy ... so affordable! Small but mighty place. ""Crunchy Munchy"" was one of the dishes ... very different ... Had chopped scallops .... never even heard of that in sushi!! Amazing ... must try if you are a sushi...More
I have tried around 20 different sushi places all over Vancouver and this is one of the best ones there! I usually order salmon, sockeye, dynamite, tuna, negitoro and their FABULOUS B.C. roll. The sushi pizza is amazing too, so many flavors in one bite!...More
Sushi mania is a small restaurant and a local gem. The food and service are great. Be prepared to wait for a table or get take out but it is definitely worth the wait.
love this lil neighbourhood sushi place..my gf and i would come a few times a week mostly for the lunch deal. sushi always seemed fresh and delicious. service is quick and friendly (maybe sometimes one or two too many 'hey' though). can definitely recommend !
We love this place!!! Its one of our favorite sushi places in Vancouver. The staff are amazing and very helpful. I would highly recommend the creamy yam roll, the hot roll and the tuna gomae.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3562430-Reviews-Sushi_Mania_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Mugen,"So I went to eat at this place with my freinds, and we sat there ordered and seem like an alright place not mentioning its really crowchy inside. The moment our order came, and had a bite with their sashimi, we imeddiately noticed how fishy...More
My husband's go to sushi place in Vancouver has become sushi mugen. Luckily for him it's a 5 min walk from where we live. The sushi is good and my husband loves the sushi teriyaki. I think the rice from which the sushi is made...More
I got the incorrect food I ordered. I do wonder when their shipment comes in because the fish tasted extra old and fishy. When I got to discuss my incorrect order at 9:20pm, the waitress tells me they are closed and she cannot help me...More
This was one of the first Japanese cuisine spots I tried when coming to Vancouver and dare I say that it was amazing. Sometimes when you know there is a waiting list, that the place has to be great, and I wasn't disappointed. It is...More
This is a great Japanese food place, sushi is good, presentation is on par and the most impressive thing for mi are the prices.
The food was excellent. 1st time at a sushi restaurant and I would definitely go again. Food was delicious
We found the prices are similar to other restaurants in the area, same type of food. The food presentation is really something and the food tastes delicious. The restaurante is very busy, but service was fast and efficient. We order susbi, sashimi and nigiri twice,...More
Very good sushi, nice flavours, cool with the lay-out and fire. Good service and friendly staff. Location was great, mis centre.
Found this Sushi restaurant while we were out walking. The prices are great, the sushi and noodles were fantastic! Gets busy so make reservations if possible otherwise you may have a long wait. We’re arrived just before the rush and we’re lucky not to have...More
Food was not the issue. Waited an hour for a table. Once seated no one came to the table for over 20 minutes. Had to flag a staff inside to put in order. No cups brought to table. Also waited over 25 minutes for a...More
The BEST sushi we’ve ever had. Small place, casual atmosphere, but fine dining quality food. The presentation is artistic and the flavours are amazing!
Fresh and delicious sushis. Value is incredible vs quality. You have to pay much more in some other places for quality food like this. Patio is available.
We dropped by for an early dinner, as we had always seen the restaurant packed. The service was great and efficient, however the sushi was quite average. We are frequent sushi-goers, so were a little disappointed by the rolls and nigiri. The rice was too...More
We checked the Internet for recommended restaurants near our hotel and this one on Davie Street stood out, both for quality and value. We were certainly not disappointed as the food was delicious and there was even a weekday “happy hour” (15 % off) for...More
We ordered many items, that we needed another table to set our food. Food and portions were good. Service sucks! I still don’t understand how the waitress didn’t let me review my receipt, handed me the debit machine and took my receipt. By ordering so...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17593233-Reviews-Sushi_Mugen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Mura,"Many people suggested we try this Japanese restaurant! And we are happy to have gone! Small place, but social distancing OK! It was fascinating to watch the 6 chefs behind the counter, making rolls etc, more work happening in the back, with staff taking orders...More
They started out OK but we’ve noticed a steady decline in the quality. preparation and value of the food the last few times we ordered takeout. I hate to give bad reviews, but all our takeout orders have been very disappointing. The rolls were made...More
This was probably the worst sushi I've ever eaten! California roll was mushy and tasteless and the dynamite roll contained skimpy chewy tempura. The beef teriyaki roll was dry as a bone devoid of teriyaki sauce. Even the edimame was dried out and weird. The...More
When it comes to sushi, the most important thing i Is that the fish it's fresh. We had both nigiri and sashimi along with a few of their special house rolls. Ford was fresh, nice presentation, and service was good. I would not hesitate to...More
Well, I think excellent food goes hand in hand with long wait time. You can’t make a reservation for a party smaller than 8 (or 6 maybe?). Best to come before 6 pm for dinner and before 11:30 for lunch. The food is really great...More
I’d always order the spicy salmon sashimi and the seafood udon! The price is decent and the service was fast!
Slightly out of downtown but well worth the trip. Great food & the atmosphere was buzzing. Would rate it very highly.
Busy place with really humming vibe. Lots of young customers, likely because of totally casual dressed-down atmosphere and good value for large portions. Fish is very fresh for the price. Upbeat young servers. Very small cramped parking lot outside, so may have to park a...More
We always stop at Sushi Mura when in Vancouver. Close to airport so either on way in or out. The sushi is unreal. Maybe its like that elsewhere in Van but I havent seen it. Fish is very fresh and great selection of creative rolls...More
Good value Japanese food, NOT all you can eat. Service is okay. Make a reservation at least 24 hours ahead, they refuse same day.
Went with friends in April. The place is not big, it is an eat and go place. Don't expect any atmosphere. During lunch time the place was packed. The service was fast, we ordered 5 dishes. I love the Volcano Roll the most out of...More
This has quickly become a place for my family to come after a visit with my grandmother at a nearby care home. Sometimes she joins us, but either way, we are always treated to brilliant food at amazing prices. Because of this combination of great...More
I have been here a lot of times already and they did not dissapoint me so far. Really good sushi for really good price. Fast service as well.
Enjoyable dinner with spouse. Go early or wait for a table. Food came quite quickly, good maki rolls. Service declined as it got busier around 7 pm onwards.
I came here with friends for lunch - first time for me at this restaurant. We arrived at about 11:45 a.m. before the lunch rush. We were seated right away and the waitress took our orders when she noticed we were ready. I ordered a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5313125-Reviews-Sushi_Mura-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Nanaimo,"Good service at this place. Nice selection of Sushis and I didn't regret my choice because it was delicious! Highly recommend!
Impressive top class sushi with big portions! Sashimi is thick and fresh I loved the taste of each piece. Special rolls are unique and rich in flavour. Good fast service. What a place to visit I'll be back again!
I love this sushi place. Great service, after you order expect your food to be 5 minutes in your table! Love it. And the rolls are awesome! This was one of my favorites, great spot to have a nice affordable dinner in a nice cozy...More
I’m obsessed! The sushi was amazing and as was the service! I will defiantly be visiting again. We got the beef teriyaki, chicken teriyaki the avocado and cucumber it was so tasty probably some of the best sushi I have ever had!
We decided on take out sushi for Friday night dinner for four of us. We ordered from Nanaimo Sushi. We have order from here before. Most things were good. Except the Chicken teriyaki was fatty, was swimming in liquid, and not overly tasty. I think...More
We were here tonight and it was still excellent. All the way from the enthusiastic greeting when you walk in to the end. Prices are still modest and portions are viable. Thankfully some improvements have been made. Service was spot on. New menus that are...More
This place is just perfect, simply; - Delicious sushi ✓ - Not experience ✓ - Super clean ✓ - Nice ambiance ✓ - Fast service ✓ -10% off during happy hour We ate a lot, like too much for two and paid around $30. The...More
First time visitor this past Wednesday. Restaurant was packed. But despite being busy, both female servers were very sweet, with warm welcoming smiles (a real rarity in Vancouver restaurants nowadays), and took our order right away. Food arrived hot and fresh about 10 minutes later....More
I've been going to this place on and off for the past five years after being introduced to it. We came on a Monday evening and it wasn't too busy. However, the place felt different. The sushi chefs didn't do their usual goodbyes in Japanese...More
My partner and I were craving Japanese food after travelling for several weeks, so we managed to find this place close to where we were staying in Vancouver. It was lunchtime when we arrived at Sushi Nanaimo. We walked inside and were seated by the...More
I've been coming here since they opened and have had consistently amazing experiences every time. The staff is always quick with a smile & a suggestion, and the food is fresh and beautifully presented. It's also very reasonably priced for the quality that you get....More
We were here about 6pm on a Friday night the restaurant was full but our wait for a table of 2 was only 5 minutes. We ordered lots as always, too much we had to take some home. We had their ebi gyoza, Hamachi sashimi,...More
Got takeout from here for the first time and I was very satisfied with the service and the food. The server was friendly and my order was ready quickly. The spicy salmon sashimi here is so addictive and has excellent portions. The Alaska roll was...More
Sushi Nanaimo is a rare sushi restaurant that offers fresh, delicious food at the most reasonable prices. They also make sure you give generous portions so it's close to perfect for sushi lovers. Menu is pretty straightforward and the special rolls and combos are so...More
Nanaimo Sushi offers exceptional good value for excellent Sushi! Located just off E Hastings street, the place is not big so make sure you either reserve or bring time for the waiting list! Party trays rock and the quality is amazing! Great place!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3809722-Reviews-Sushi_Nanaimo-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi S Japanese Restaurant,"We came here just at opening for lunch on a week day as it got busy at 12. We ordered sushi & noodle dishes. The ratings are based on everyone’s agreement: (1 to 5 with 5 as the best) Ambiance: 5 (clean & nice environment)...More
Stopped in for a late lunch around 330pm. I had California roll, spicy tuna roll and salmon maki rolls. All the items were average, I’m a avid sushi customer so I’ve dined at many places in the lower mainland. The restaurant says it’s open until...More
Good food here. Got take out and the prices are decent, food is good. Highly recommend checking this place out!
This place offers good sushi, I like the presentation since you are able to bite the rolls without them being huge. The flavour is right on point and the service is friendly.
I saw this from Zomato looking for sushi and was rated high. So gave it a try. It was good. Match omaya or better. Better than kiku and omaya for prices. This 27 piece sashimi chef platter!!! Is only 27$ a dollar a piece!!! Forgot...More
Back again for a business lunch while in Burnaby. The food is still as good as I remembered and the tamago nigiri is quite good. Prices are very reasonable. Unfortunately, parking sucks...
I'm not usually a sushi fan. But decided to try this place out. We met in a booth - one of the largest I've ever seen. It was perfect for eating and conducting our business. Staff were quick to seat us and serve us. We...More
Often get take out, the trays are good. Love their spicy sauce. Note that parking can be a nightmare but there are limited reserved spots.
The food took a while to get to our table but that's because we ordered right behind a very large table and our waiter told us right away that we might have a bit of a wait for our food to arrive. He offered us...More
Ordered this through the new ""Skip the dishes"" app and I must say the food arrived exactly on time as promised. The sushi was fresh and the rolls were well filled. We tried a few different rolls alongwith the sashimi and every one of them...More
This a nice place to eat at a great price. Fast service with no nonsense waiters ready to help with basic needs. The food was good. We ordered a 54 piece sushi platter that was just what we were expecting for three.
The restaurant is in a small plaza on Willingdon and Moscrop. It was our first time going. They were able to accommodate our group of 9 and we got parking in the plaza; probably because it was a Tuesday night. The food was fresh, tasty...More
For a person who loves sushi rolls for the wonderful fillings and only wants a single layer of rice to fill you up so you can eat lots, this is the place! The location is ok and the decor average but for substance you won't...More
Sushi S is located in a busy mini mall located on the southwest corner of Willingdon and Moscrop. I’ve often passed by this location but steered clear due to how busy the crowded parking lot seems to get. The interior decor isn’t bad… it’s definitely...More
I had noodles and they were very good. My son had some specialty rolls and they were very good. It is in a strip mall and the overall appearance is not upscale but the food quality made up for any cons.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d6662123-Reviews-Sushi_S_Japanese_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Station,"will go back again and again and again. Had the spicy wild salmon sashimi and the appetizer tuna tataki and they were delicious and fresh. Service was prompt and excellent as well. Very friendly :)
North Vancouver has It's fair share of restaurants, and I must say, some are the best anywhere. Take for example Sushi Station, a Japanese style experience that will have you coming back for more. Family owned and operated. The master chef, Mr. Kim knows his...More
My wife and I fell in love with this family owned restaurant in North Vancouver on our visit from Toronto( where good sushi is rare). The service was impeccable, the fish fresh and portions generous at very good price. If you like sushi and happen...More
Amazing customer service, good quality fish, big portions and pleasantly surprising prices! Small place but always pleasant to come back.
picked up my sushi as they have a good lunch special includes miso soup. everytime I come to visit north van I order sushi here. very fresh and consistent. I will be back
Sushi Station is our favourite sushi restaurant on the north shore. It’s a small place, and run by a very friendly family that takes pride in what they do. The quality of the sushi is excellent and so is the price. I can only name...More
Friendly family run restaurant. Great sashimi box, and good price! We have only tried a couple things but we will return to try more.
Love this place! Recently visited from Australia and this is definitely the best sushi we ate whilst in Vancouver. All the ingredients are super fresh and the staff members are all so friendly. Delicious! Will come again!
Our favourite place to stop for a fresh, filling sushi dinner when in Vancouver. The new owners are amazing, so kind and attentive and the food is 10/10! The sushi special is a great deal but all the meals we had were delicious!
I used to love Sushi station! It used to be my favourite place to go for lunch and I had to stop myself from going there every day. But...recently the management and the whole restaurant changed. The restaurant looks prettier now, but that is about...More
I've been checking this place out for years.... several times a month. Forget about decor and all that stuff. Sushi Station simply does good sushi and at very good value. The folks there are very kind. Can't go wrong.
Don't expect a huge place to go and eat. Expect excellent sushi. The place has never disappointed. Usually pick up and take home.
Affordable, great taste and really nice staff. Our favorites include the tofu dinner box, 18 pc sushi special (many choices available), chicken karaage....and everything! A must try for your North Shore/Vancouver sushi cravings!
Regular sushi. Not innovative or unusually tasty. Fairly fresh. Quick service. Reasonable prices but not great sushi.
Excellent Japanese food and reasonable price. Small dining place but servers conscientious and service is fast.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4867331-Reviews-Sushi_Station-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi U,"Fantastic Sushi! Fresh, tasty and nicely displayed. I am super impressed with this small restaurant and will continue to come here anytime I’m in the area. Some of the best Sushi special rolls and Sockeye Salmon Sashimi I’ve had, and I eat a lot of...More
Smaller neighborhood jaoanese restaurant fairly close to Holdom sky train station. Located in a strip mall so lots of free parking. I was introducing a friend to the raw stuff and thankfully she enjoyed for the most part. I threw in some cooked items as...More
We dined in this neighborhood restaurant. The few tables were spread a good distance apart. Standard food, ordered various bento boxes.
Local Japanese restaurant where we grabbed takeout from. We ordered the beef and the chicken teriyaki bento boxes plus another roll. I was surprised it was split into so many containers but otherwise the food was really good.
Super awesome sushi spot! Amazing food, amazing service. What a hidden gem! new favourite for sure! Close to the sky train aswell 5 stars :)
Amazing aburi sushi and tuna tataki roll. Very nice owners and service. Very fresh ingredients and well cooked. One of the best secrets in Burnaby
Although they offer sit down dining, we have mostly taken food out. The entire staff seem to appreciate your patronage by the warm and genuine greetings every time you enter. The food is very tasty and each serving is a good size. The price is...More
Went here because I saw the reviews were good. I'm in agreement! Small place doing lots of takeout business. Friendly staff. Prices reasonable
This little hole in the wall place is our favourite for sushi that is closest to where we live. The staff is friendly, not pushy and when you get to be a regular the chef sends you thank you's in the form of samples of...More
We loved going here as a family. The previous owners knew us by name even though we only visited once per month. The menu changes and the name change and the service change just was too much for us to keep coming back. We only...More
This is basically a little hole in the wall that I've driven past so many times but one day I decided to drop in for dinner. Boy, am I glad I did! The sushi was outstanding and the tempura was perfectly crispy. The service was...More
Sushi U was chosen as our go to place for lunch recently. We arrived at the destination and found a parking spot near the restaurant a few minutes before its opening time of 11 am, and when seen near the entrance, staff welcomed us to...More
this has unbelievable service and great food. we've been here for lunch and now breakfast! very fast and reasonably priced
The restaurant is new to the area. It is small and out of the way but the food is fantastic. Staff are friendly and accommodating. We have been for lunch twice and dinner 3 times since they opened - have not been disappointed by any...More",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d11813063-Reviews-Sushi_U-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Umi,"I know it sounds so simple, but I needed to share this for that someone who is simply looking for a good, delicious, warm soup. We just had the best homemade/in-house Miso Soup, ever! I mean there may have been a time in the past...More
This place used to be good however recently the portions have become smaller and prices have increased. The sake containers seem to be significantly smaller but the price has gone up. The food is good and the service is fine however I don't like paying...More
For the boss's reference. The transaction number on the receipt was 411 246 with cashier's name "" Jong Sun Kim"". We went there for dinner and the food was great. However, at around 8:30pm onwards, a waitress was clearly absented minded about filling our order...More
This place used to be good but it seems to have deteriorated in the past few months. The last three times we were there the service was mediocre and rushed. The food doesn't seem to be as tasty and fresh as it used to be....More
I visited Sushi Umi and was delighted with the whole experience. The decor has a natural colour palette, the social distancing measures were not intrusive, and the staff were friendly and attentive. The menu is easy to read, inventive and well priced. I ordered the...More
Ordered a party tray for dinner. Everything was fresh and tasty, great sushi, especially the yam tempura.
We have had take out on three different occasions during August because of COVID-19. The food has been excellent and I ordered my favourite, the Tonkatsu box on all three occasions and received three different versions of what they describe in their menu. The menu...More
So We sat down for 1 minute before being rushed to order appetizers and some mains at the same time because of last call. You close at 9:30 and we walked in at 8:40, relax!! Your not in the business of rushing and saying no....More
If you want a sushi place in North Vancouver this is the place to go. Personally, I would say this is the best Sushi experience I've had while visiting Vancouver, and I've tried several upon my arrival. Not only is the Sushi great quality, fresh...More
We arrived around 4:30pm on Sunday and the restaurant was noticeably empty. As a group of 8, this worked in our favour as the dishes came out and were cleared quite quickly. The signature dishes were beautifully plated and the farmed salmon sashimi was on...More
Good/Great Sushi, Hot Sake and Superb Service is what I look for most in this style of restaurant. I want the sushi to be fresh and priced reasonably, I want a good quality hot sake that is not watered down or stale, and I always...More
Lonsdale is full of crappy and/or pretentious sushi joints. This is the real thing; ethnically ""correct"". You'll pay more, but you'll get what you pay for.
We stopped by Umi by chance and loved it. We try different sushi restaurants around Vancouver and this is one of the good ones that we’ve been to. Fairly a larger restaurant with professional management. Good ambiance, decor and good popular music. 60 minutes parking...More
Family dinner. Excellent service and fabulous food. one of the best Sushi restaurants I have been to in Vancouver. Very busy, but food was worth waiting for.
This restaurant has some of the best Japanese food I've ever had. Amazing flavours, highly recommended the Katsu Box and the rolls both were delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d7367243-Reviews-Sushi_Umi-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Uomo,"A few of us hadn’t been here for awhile. The prices were decent considering the portions were big. They offer a couple of unique menu items such as the sashimi salad and sushi pizza. I liked the sushi pizza as it was sushi on top...More
We've been eating here for over two years. Dine-in and take-out are excellent quality. The seafood and nori is super fresh. We've never been disappointed. It's easily our favourite sushi in the city. The spicy tuna inari pocket and the Hastings Roll are must-haves.
What a lovely hidden gem! As soon as you sit down they bring you soup to start with the menus. Their portion sizes are huge, so best go with an appetite! The appetizer Sashimi had 7 HUGE pieces, the Vegetable Tempura was another huge portion...More
Spacious and quiet place when we went. The servers were friendly and had a good atmosphere inside. Great for families. We ordered toro sashimi as well as some à la cart nigiri sushi. I ordered an unagi sushi but I think our server heard “inari”...More
Nice Japanese restaurant. Very fast and friendly service by Mena . Last order for lunch is at 3 pm, they close at 3:30 pm for a staff lunch break before starting dinner schedule at 4:30 pm . The sashimi assorted deluxe was splendid , we...More
The sushi is always good. Everyone is extremely nice and helpful. There are a lot of different choices for the adventurous type as well as traditional fare. The prices are great and they are fast. It's one of my favorite sushi places for sure.
This area of North Burnaby has lots of sushi restaurants, like Lonsdale in North Van., Marine Drive in West Van., Denman in Vancouver itself- that cater to primarily an occidental clientele. We found a parking spot in front of a different sushi place 2 doors...More
We have been coming to Sushi Uomo for quite some time now. We love the great selection of food and it is a very popular restaurant here in Burnaby. We have gotten to know the staff there and they recognize us when we come in...More
Went here for dinner with the family again. It hasn't changed. Great food, service, prices. Their sushi pizza great. Fish fresh, good tempura.
makes yummy non sushi rolls for those not into sushi yes i mean the meat lovers prices are ok but yummy rolls
After reading some positive reviews we decided to give this place a try. Nice welcoming deco and greeted by friendly staff. We ordered a plate of assorted Sushi, rice bowl and Sushi pizza. All were delicious. For anyone living near this area then this is...More
Honestly I am shocked of how much this place changed since when the new owner took over! Service poor 1* of 5* The two servers were running around like crazy, constantly blinking place! They didn’t ask to the “””chef””” in the kitchen if my request...More
We really enjoy the sushi at this popular spot in our neighborhood. It can be very busy so we don't come here for a relaxing sit down meal but more of grabbing some sushi when we are hungry.
This is a great neighbourhood restaurant. They have weekly specials and great sushi. It is clean and the staff is helpful with the menu. You are served tea and miso soup before you even order. Everything is good and I recommend this place.
I wasn't sure what to expect but it was busy so I wanted to give this place a try. I saw at the bar area and the servers were extremely busy. It took a bit long to place my order but all was great after...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7991109-Reviews-Sushi_Uomo-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushi Yan Restaurant,"I had never been there before, but it was the first food my parents ate in vancouver and i thought it was amazing. The lights and the music were really nice and calming, i really liked all the decorations, it was a great environment. I...More
Have not been to this restaurant for years. We were downtown for a meeting and decided to go early to have dinner. Most downtown restaurants are very good. i dont consider my self a Japanese food expert but I have eaten my fair share over...More
I’ve been told this place is happening during the lunch hour but we came here for dinner. It was a Friday night and needed a place that was a bit quieter due to a brain injury and this was a perfect option. I enjoyed my...More
I had the take-out Bento Combo (A). Everything was fresh and delicious and I could not have possibly finished all the food. I am ordering a smaller Bento Combo next time. :-)
Met up with some friends here, after a long day of meeting friends at various places. glad I saved room because the plates were fresh and yummy!
Great Sushi at a great price! Very good food! The Bento box with Salmon, tofu, tempura & California rolls was delicious & fresh. Very friendly staff. Restaurant is located below the street level down a few stairs.
Satisfying meal in a basement. My initial thought was-what is that horrible smell (urine was my first thought, but could have also been international food/ basement smell). I couldn’t smell it or at least I got used to it after 15 mins. We were happy...More
We arrived at Vancouver Airport and were looking for a quick bite before heading to our hotel. What a find. We ordered the green salad with pineapple dressing, sushimi salad, two misos and a yam combo. The combo was 17 pieces! Everything was delicious. I...More
We stumbled across this restaurant, checked out the menu and then made our way down the stairs which upon first impressions kind of felt a bit old and run down. There were only 2 other people here when we arrived and weren't sure what sort...More
We walked in by chance, and were surprised with the delicious food. Try the rainbow roll, prawn tempura. Good prices too. Visited 3 times, ordered different things and we all liked it.
The is an average place in the basement with no good view nor beautifully designed. However, the Sashimi and Sushi were excellent and for an very attractive price. I would come back any day!
We went for their lunch special. It differs from Monday to Friday. The combo meal we tried has everything - sashimi, sushi, tempura & teriyaki chicken with rice. It costs less than $15! The sushi roll is good & cheap- fried prawns and avocado. Fresh...More
Sushi Yan was a great little gem tucked away in Vancouver, and I really was glad we decided to pop in and try it. You go down the stairs into a cozy establishment, get seated, and get some green tea to start off with. They...More
Had a break between shifts. Felt like Japanese. Ordered the Maki Roll and teriyaki beef. Roll was good. Complicated combination of prawn and salmon. Made well, big and enjoyable. Little too complicated for me, but that is ok, others will disagree. The teriyaki was ok,...More
I was wandering Vancouver and stumbled upon this small sushi restaurant. Prices, even outside of lunch hour, are reasonable. And likely some of the best sushi I've ever eaten. Friendly service too.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8121718-Reviews-Sushi_Yan_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sushimoto Enterprises,"Perhaps the best sushi I’ve ever had. Interesting and tasty rolls. Nigiri was great also. Service was very good. Definitely recommend.
We came here on the spur of the moment for a late dinner based on the reviews. We barely made the last call & ordered a mound of food. Our out of town guests were impressed by the ambience & tasty fresh sushi that they...More
Great food but felt rushed. I guess it's understandable when people are waiting. Liked the continuous offer of hot tea. And everything tasted great.
I've been going here for years and the quality is fantastic. Unfortunately it's quite busy now and not a lot of seating, but I would definitely recommend
Sushimoto was chosen as our venue for lunch the other day. An anticipated first-time visit for us - we arrived at the restaurant a few minutes before it opened at 11:30 am. The restaurant is located about mid-way in a small and rather neat &...More
Went here because it wad nearby and reviews looked promising. I went with a friend to find it extremely dissapointing with sub par service.
Friend of mine recommended to come here and it was fairly busy. Took us a while to get seated and the hostess asked us 3 times if we were helped.... and we were right up front. Took a while to get the menu, order and...More
Very small rolls for the price you pay...But the rolls were fresh and without too much added stuff..
This tiny restaurant served the best authentic Japanese meal I've had since my Tokyo visit. Great price for a wonderful meal; can't go wrong. Looking forward to my next visit.
I came here with my girlfriends and didn't expect too much but we were pleasantly surprised. We ordered 3 different rolls and they were all outstanding! My favourite was the volcano roll. It is very small inside but worth the wait since there's not many...More
Did not expect such a great place close to sky train. Lots of choices, professional staff, lots of chefs and the seem to know what they are doing. Great sushi, sachimi Nd excellent soup. Will be back again.
Great spot for sushi and sashimi. Didn't expect quality from a sushi restaurant in a skytrain station but this place blew me away. They had some less common dishes and some creative mashups. Recommend!
Heard good things about this restaurant so decided to try for a change of pace. Very extensive menu with lots of different options. A little more expensive than our regular sushi place but it did not disappoint. Nice waitresses.
This place is amazing. The sushi is so tasty, and the choice is good too. When I was in Burnaby I always wanted to eat there. Also the prices are fairly good.
This is a hidden gem. Food is great and service is consistently great. It's sometimes a bit of a wait for a table but so worth it!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d5510195-Reviews-Sushimoto_Enterprises-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Sushiyama,"Love the lunch bento boxes! We will go back. Fresh, flavourful and delicious. My first time back in several years, and the food was even better than how I remembered it.
I’m very disappointed in the new ownership changes. Our family has been long time customers for years and have loved the company. Tonight we ordered and the prices were very high, and the pieces of sushi, Nigiri, were substantially smaller. And the sunimono salad was...More
Excellent food and service! Very fresh sashimi! Changed to Moody music and dimmer lighting! Love there
We came here for lunch and the restaurant was doing a good trade. They have an extensive menu of Japanese cuisine, including many unique sushi combinations. We had the sunset role, which at almost $15 for 8 pieces was the most expensive of their special...More
If you’re looking for fresh sushi this is the place to be. We had some rolls and nigiri. The nigiri was our favorite because of the freshness of the fish. The rolls where very generous though! Quick but good service.
I eat here every time I visit YVR. The sockeye salmon sashimi is to die for! The place is a little no-frills but the food is excellent!
Came here with some friends looking for fresh sushi, and was not disappointed. While I can't really speak to how this measures up to other Vancouver sushi places, I can say that I enjoyed the selection of rolls that seemed as if someone took some...More
Good portion sizes and decent prices. The nabeyaki udon is great and the sushi is fresh. It gets busy on weekends, so plan appropriately. Cash only.
Very nice food for affordable price, above all when you talk about Vancouver. Rich and varied menu, with options for very different tastes. The combos are big and have very reasonable prices, the rolls are also very good. Everything my friends and I ordered was...More
I've been eating at Sushiyama for years, had lunch and dinner there maybe hundreds of times. The set bento meals are amazingly good value, or you can break the bank ordering more exotic stuff a la carte. First question about a sushi joint: is the...More
Tasty food, speedy service, excellent lunch value with the bento combinations. Not as fancy as some of the pricier sushi restaurants, but good food nonetheless. Their other dishes are delicious as well, such as the don buri bowls and the teriyaki beef.
Overall good sushi but not the beat in town. The waitresses are very nice. It is a bit pricey but the quality of the fish is quite good.
We made reservation for dinner on Saturday for 2 families of 8 went for dinner. Around Vancouver, there are not many restaurants will take a reservation on weekend. The restaurant was packed while we were there 6:45pm-8:00pm. I loved deluxe asorted sashimi.
Came here at a coworker’s suggestion and I was so satisfied with the black cod. I’ve seen other Japanese restaurants charge double or triple for the same quantity so I thought maybe the quality wouldn’t be as good but I was totally wrong. The black...More
Fantastic food and a wonderful place to eat with family or friends on a budget. They offer a huge sushi pizza that's super delicious and the nigiri is cheap with many options. Love visiting here whenever I'm in the neighbourhood!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d789854-Reviews-Sushiyama-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Swad Indian Kitchen,"Everything was very professional and in a high quality. The waiter served us was very helpful and polite, the food portion was enough and delicious, we tried Lamb butter & Chicken butter with Garlic nasn and rice. The Lasi drinks were so close to the...More
THIS IS AN ABSOLUTE SHAM OF A RESTAURANT!!! WE WENT IN TO DINE-IN AND SPOTTED A RAT RUNNING ACROSS THE RESTAURANT FLOOR AND IT WAS LITERALLY CLIMBING ON TOP OF THE SEATS WHILST SCURRYING AROUND FOR CRUMBS! THIS WAS SHORTLY AFTER WE PLACED OUR ORDER....More
THE WORST servise. So slow and so rude busy or no. All the foods are crazy salty. They've been reported for not checking vaccine card illegally during the pandemic while all other restaurants were following those rules and having a straggle. If you find hair...More
This restaurant is my families favourite restaurant in west Vancouver, the staff are incredible and very pleasant to be served by. They are very accommodating and understanding. The food is wonderful my younger sister can’t eat spicy foods and they do a wonderful job of...More
I was hesitant about going to Swad when it was recommended. I ordered mild and after the first bite I tried everything that we ordered. Swad is now on my list of favorite restaurants. I didn't give it 5 stars but I was tempted.
I remember tasting the food here when it first opened and it was spot on authentic. They must have lost their head chef because the swill they served on for takeout over 2 different visits (Oct 2021 and Jul 2022) was horrific. All the curries...More
Ordered a biryani and the chicken did not even get the sauce of the curry, it was cold and flat with no taste of the sauce. Terrible service as well.
We have been a few times because of its location but its quality is variable. This is an expensive restaurant without the value. The food is pretty normal -- with small amount of meat or such duped in a ton of creamy, overly rich gravy....More
Staff greeting us wore a mask over his mouth, not his nose, dismissed our attempts to show our vaccine cards and it became evident as we watched that no one was asked for them. Another server wore his mask over his chin -?? Food was...More
I ordered takeout from Swad and although the food was great the service was terrible. On the phone I was told to come pick up the food in 30 minutes. So I came to the store 30 minutes later and I was waiting for an...More
We’ve been a huge supporter of Swad since it opened, spending consistently with them throughout those years. When ordering $200 of food on DoorDash each Friday through Covid it is galling to have a call from them demanding another $10 for adding paneer to a...More
We enjoyed this restaurant many times, but it has gone downhill severely and I no longer recommend it. The staff are overworked; atmosphere is chaotic and service is extremely unprofessional. The quality of the food was nowhere near what it used to be. Definitely not...More
Thankyou for your comments. As you know it’s pandemic time and we are struggling to keep doors open and working hard day and night to provide our customers best service and food. We wish you would support our efforts and encourage us more. We love...More
I went to Swad Indian Kitchen for the first time and I had an amazing experience here. Presentation was outstanding, ambience was attractive, best place to go for meals with your loved ones. I had Tomato Shorba, Heryali Paneer, Dal Makhani, Reshami Paneer, Tandoori Roti...More
Food is pricey by Indian standards, but tasty. Service is charmingly inept. Pleasant to sit there enjoying the ambiance and the company while waiting though.
The service here is awful. Don’t waste your time or money on being treated terribly. Total disgrace! Never will I ever set foot in this place again! I have never been more annoyed with service anywhere that I’ve received at Swad. How can they possibly...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d9453692-Reviews-Swad_Indian_Kitchen-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Sylvia's Restaurant and Lounge,"Room was so small compared to the picture shown. The hotel had weird smell. Bathtub was not clean. They told us to use the washroom tap water to drink if we're thirsty. Me and my friend were so disappointed. The only good thing is the...More
It was a good breakfast. But we did venture out to other spots after the first day. So it wasn’t so great that we wanted to eat there every day.
We stayed overnight, then caught breakfast at the restaurant. I had the Avocado eggs on sourdough - excellent. Roasted potatoes were pretty good, but I've had better. My husband had the Stanley Park Benedict, and he quite enjoyed it. Service was friendly and just the...More
A great spot for lunch and drinks. Great, unobstructed , ocean view. Free underground parking. Casual menu. Enjoyed the flatbread pizza. Nice service. Located in the West End of Vancouver in a classic hotel. Nice historic photos in the lobby. Will go back.
The food and the service were very good. A nice place to have dinner on the terrasse overlooking English Bay.
Wonderful location, pleasant staff and excellent food. We stayed at the hotel and enjoyed the ambience created by the character and history of the Sylvia.
Do not book this hotel unless you're 100% certain that circumstances totally out of your control will not occur. We did not make it to Vancouver for our one night stay because of a 'weather' flight delay from Boston to Toronto, where we missed our...More
We generally avoid eating in hotel restaurants - but Sylvia's Restaurant and Lounge were so outstanding we ate and drank there every day of our stay, and sometimes more than once. After our flights, we were so tired and hungry that we decided to eat...More
I, along with 7 friends, spent two nights at the Sylvia Hotel from the 5th to 7th July 2023. We enjoyed a delicious breakfast, as well as two casual but lovely meals at their outdoor patio. Beautiful city, lovely hotel, excellent restaurant and lounge.
Such a lovely spot to enjoy English Bay, whether during the day or in the evening. Sitting by the window allows you to experience the sights of Vancouver while enjoying a meal or delicious dessert.
nice quiet bar where you can carry on a conversation.... Great view and lots of activity on the beach @ English Bay
Great spot, great breakfast, drinks and dinner. Staff was attentive and personable. Will definitely be back.
We had tickets to Coldplay Tribute concert and wanted to combine that with a trip to Granville Island and an ebike ride around Stanley Park, which are both right at the doorstep of the Sylvia Hotel. Stayed two nights in a corner suite room on...More
The hotel service needs a lot of work; things on the menu that were not available, service is really really slow. One morning, it took 40 minutes to get my breakfast. I ordered a cheesecake with raspberry sauce for dessert and got something that was...More
My friend and I had a great three night stay at The Sylvia! Loved the ambience, comfort, cleanliness and beautiful location. We especially enjoyed our experiences in the restaurant. Everyone we came in contact with was helpful, kind and so pleasant. We have made some...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2702888-Reviews-Sylvia_s_Restaurant_and_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
TAPshack - Coal Harbour,"Oh dear. TAPshack needs renaming to CRAPshack. Positives? Location as in the view. That’s it full stop. Negatives? How many characters do I have? The staff are left to sort it out but unfortunately they simply don’t have the skills required to keep customers happy....More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave a review. I would love to connect and hear more about your experience to share with the team in hopes to bring you back for a different experience. Please reach out to coalharbour@tapshack.ca and I...More
Nice location but average service and food. Also have to order food and drinks from the bar which is not convenient. Good option for a quick casual meal but there are nicer options.
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave a review! We would love to hear your feedback about our service model, if you could reach out to coalharbour@tapshack.ca I can get in touch through there.
Had just got into Vancouver and we needed a quick bite. Surprisingly high quakity pizza served al fresco overlooking the sea wall. Basic but good.
Hi there! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review! Glad you liked the pizza. Hope to see you again soon!
We had lunch here a couple of times. It overlooks Coal Harbour and the kids play-fountain. The food is fine and the service extraordinarily good for this sort of place. The grilled cheese was delicious (and huge).
Hi there! Thank you for taking the time to leave a review! Glad you loved our location and that you had a great experience with the staff! We hope to see you again soon.
No service!! lousy food!! over priced!! No service!!Poor Menu!!!Lousy service!!over priced!!!poor menu!!How many times do I have to say it???
This is a great place to watch people and all the activities on the waterfront. You can order and pay right from your table, using a QR code. The grilled cheese sandwich is really awesome...big enough to share! The nachos and tacos and pizza at...More
Can’t go wrong with the wines on tap, the excellent pizzas and salads, and especially the gyoza! Fun place, great location and friendly service.
Stopped on the way back from a cycle ride along the sea front and had beer and a pizza to share. Delicious, enough to share as a snack to fill a gap with plenty of pepperoni and spicy peppers
Hello Catherine, Thank you for stopping by during your cycle! We are excited you loved the Pepperoni pizza and look forward to your next visit!
We walked here from the pinnacle Hotel. Beautiful spot right on the water. The service was fantastic. We truly enjoyed our meal. We started with the chips salsa and guacamole. The salsa was so tasty and fresh. I had the tacos which were so flavorful....More
Hello, We are so pleased you enjoyed your full experience, including the tasty salsa! We hope to see you again soon!
After walking around Stanley Park for four hours we were ready for a sit down and a beer. TAPshack is in a nice location over looking the bay and you can watch the sea planes taking off. We had a couple of beers and a...More
Hello, Thank you for your review. We take all feedback very seriously and appreciate you taking the time to provide yours. We are excited you enjoyed your experience although we are disappointed we weren't able to help direct you to our washroom located inside the...More
We just stopped by for a couple of beers and a pretzel. The service was efficient and friendly. Laid back atmosphere. Watching the seaplanes land and take off it great fun as well as watching ships coming and going. Great place to relax and people...More
Hi Stuart, Thank you for leaving such a positive review. We are elated you enjoyed your visit through and through and look forward to having you spend time relaxing again!
Our last night in Vancouver and after a walk around the city we came across this place with a great view over the bay. Staff were great and very friendly and the whole place had a great atmosphere. Food was excellent and wish we had...More
Hi! We are so pleased you enjoyed your time here! Hopefully your recommendation will entice other guests to stop by earlier in their stay. If you are ever in Vancouver again, we look forward to seeing you again.
Had lunch here twice whilst in Vancouver nice food great location helpful staff what’s not to like oh I forgot nice beer
Hi! Thanks for taking the time to leave such a positive review. We look forward to your next visit if you are ever in Vancouver again!
We had lunch here and we're really impressed. There's something for everyone. I had the pulled pork sandwich and honestly it was the best pulled pork I've ever had. Really flavoursome and not fatty, with some coleslaw. Nice view when dry with outdoor seating area.
Hi. We are thrilled you completely enjoyed yourselves and our pulled pork sandwich! We look forward to seeing you again.
My husband & I walked from the Pinnacle Hotel & stopped in for dinner. Great choice! Fabulous waterfront location with harbor, fountain & park views. Friendly servers. Outdoor seating right in the middle of the action. Limited, but delicious cafe-like menu choices. We ordered the...More
Hi! Thank you for leaving such a positive and constructive review! We are so happy you tried and enjoyed so many items from our menus. We look forward to having you back again.",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10558623-Reviews-TAPshack_Coal_Harbour-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
TWG Tea at Vancouver,"We had a bridal shower there last May 2019 and everything was great, service, food it was very good! We just celebrated a birthday party for a party of 6. We knew we had to all order tea and they did tell us it would...More
Went there with some friends. Great tea selection (multi-page menu) but no offering for recommendations or if we had questions about the teas. Everyone in the group enjoyed full afternoon tea menu selections...it's not what you expect since no actual tea sandwiches. This is fine,...More
Reservations of 6 with some special friends on a Sunday afternoon. I arrived 15 mins early and our table was ready. The place was bustling with guests in the boutique and the tea salon was 3/4 full. The high ceiling makes the room look so...More
We went for afternoon tea. The scones were excellent, other desserts were average. Enjoyed lobster sandwich; excellent teas. I would not say it is vegetarian friendly in-terms of sandwiches. The service was slow. The manager was a little prud. But he came around. Overall, good...More
I walk by this place all the time and decided to do some holiday shopping here. Instead of being excited about this place, I just got frustrated and disappointed. I had to come twice since the first time they were sold out of the tea...More
We were willing to try their rather expensive Tea and waited for a very long time for the food to be served and when they finally served it, the quality of the food is just not there, you could probably pay less than half their...More
I dined at The Urban Tea Merchant many times but have a limited experience with TWG Tea Salon. This is an elegant establishment located conveniently on West Georgia Street in downtown Vancouver. I found the designated dining area small but the tables were large and...More
A friend and I enjoyed a lovely high tea service. The 'Chic' Tea included several creative and delicious hors d'oeuvre sandwiches, scones with whipped cream and jam, and an enormous selection of wonderful teas. The service was pleasant and attentive. The surroundings were contemporary and...More
Like others, I found the selection at TWG in Vancouver to be exceptional, but the customer service is extremely poor. We stopped by as we were out shopping to see what their selection of teas was like, as we were not familiar with the brand....More
The place was awesome with very satisfying service. It was our first time to visit this place and we were so amazed and satisfied. We were very happy to get a chance to be there.
I love TWG tea. We stopped and had a cuppa and some pastry. What a lovely way to spend an hour. Take time to smell the teas. You’ll want to take some home.
TWG is a very fine tea. It is tea for a tea connoisseur and here is their tea shop, right, smack in the heart of Vancouver. Just try it. Really good and simple .
A tea store that offer a huge selection for sale. Half of it is also a restaurant with the main focus being of course tea. Make reservations because it is a small place and getting a table during the busy times looks like it can...More
A very elegant place to have a date, bday party, showers or Mother’s Day lunch/dinner. The venue is very clean and elegant with piano music playing softly at the background. There is a huge list of tea selections with different high tea selections (from $19-up)....More
Amazing place. Very expensive but the place is luxury and that is good to have in your life once in a while. Great service. Food is delicious. The varieties of teas are incredible and you could spend a whole afternoon just trying to decide which...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12133336-Reviews-TWG_Tea_at_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tableau Bar Bistro,"Very good and authentic food and not too big portions (European portions). Very nice service, great location and nice interior.
Perfect place at Loden hotel vancouver. Loved the Foie Gras Monte Cristo starter that was fabulous. Service is also great. recommend!
We went for Happy Hour to this charming restaurant. The servers were friendly and helpful in explaining the menu. The drinks were great ( fabulous bubbles!) . The food however was just ok with small portions and when I asked for more dressing on the...More
Great atmosphere with very friendly staff. Sat outside as the evening was warm. Menu has a nice selection and the GIBSON (a version of a Gin Martini) was served in a unique way. Food was good but the portions are a little small. However tasty...More
Beautiful lunch seated outside at a large comfy booth with elegant white marble table and Parisian charm! The food was all perfectly cooked and delicious and service very prompt and friendly. Will be back!!
This place ranked 2 in Vancouver Review.. We ordered dinner- 1 foei grass app, 2 halibut 1 steak frites 1 mussels and clams. Foie- arrived in timley manner. OK but very sweet. I've had better. The mains took an hour to appear. The halibut was...More
We had dinner here. We had French onion soup, good, saddle of lamb, but no mint sauce ,too many fries to eat, and mushrooms on toast, very good, bistro filet, again too may fries, finished with white chocolate roulade and pavlova, coffee drinks etc $200....More
Overpriced and undelivered. Ordered Niçoise salad and it was not! Mere 2 oz if tuna 4 green beans 2 sun dried tomatoes 8 baby romaine leaves 2 eggs and a castlevetro olive served on a glob of potatoe salad. Looked terrible and changed $24!! The...More
Tableau is definitely my new favorite spot in Vancouver for some French bites. Every single dish was absolutely delicious, perfectly seasoned and well balanced. The oysters had some brine, a little sauce, some caviar, and a dill twig. Delicious. The toast with mushroom was to...More
What a gem! Such a wonderful experience. My husband and I were really appreciative of the manager who knew we did not have a reservation and still accommodated us. We both had americano’s and enjoyed the Le grande breakfast. No need for salt and pepper,...More
My husband was craving seafood, so we came to Tableau. He was not disappointed. He had Geoduck Crudo and Moules Clams. I had coq au vin. All dishes were well prepared. The place was hopping and the noise level was high but conversation was still...More
I went several times for breakfast and dinner. Most of the time the service and food were excellent. I recommend the burger and the artic char. Both tasty and done perfectly.
We came here for their Happy Hours and ordered the Eiffel Tower for $128, 16 oysters, Geoduck clam, bone marrow, tartar, Foie Gras, and more. Pair with their house wine and Caesar salad. You will find a perfect dinner there.
The young lady wa s nice and I was seated in the bar next to a very loud group and two loud ladies and I could not here myself think. Once I moved the server never looked at me again I don't know if they...More
Awesome food and drinks in a dark and sultry setting. Came down for a night cap and back again in the morning for brunch - crepes suzette and croque madame were fantastic!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2317824-Reviews-Tableau_Bar_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tacofino,"Stumbled on this little hidden gem in Gastown for lunch. All the tacos we had were fantastic and our waitress was super attentive. My only complaint was there was a stair/ladder dropped from the ceiling right in front of the 4 bathroom doors which made...More
Stumbled on this little hidden gem in Gastown for lunch. All the tacos we had were fantastic and our waitress was super attentive. My only complaint was there was a stair/ladder dropped from the ceiling right in front of the 4 bathroom doors which made...More
We live in the area and frequent regularly for takeout. The quality and consistency have both gone downhill steadily as the prices have skyrocketed. Two burritos with sauce and two cookies for over $50 is embarrassing that I paid for it. It just feels like...More
We live in the area and frequent regularly for takeout. The quality and consistency have both gone downhill steadily as the prices have skyrocketed. Two burritos with sauce and two cookies for over $50 is embarrassing that I paid for it. It just feels like...More
Pleasant place but didn’t really love the tacos. They were unique, but we would have preferred more traditional style.
Pleasant place but didn’t really love the tacos. They were unique, but we would have preferred more traditional style.
The best tacos EVER and SO worth the hype!! Tacofino was an experience in itself / we got there about 11.30 which helped beat the queue a little. We got krispy chicken and fish tacos (get the hot sauce on it) and then 2x gringas....More
The best tacos EVER and SO worth the hype!! Tacofino was an experience in itself / we got there about 11.30 which helped beat the queue a little. We got krispy chicken and fish tacos (get the hot sauce on it) and then 2x gringas....More
Service at the bar was fast. The food was a perfect portion, and delicious... I had a lamb taco and chorizo tostido. The cocktails were creative.
Service at the bar was fast. The food was a perfect portion, and delicious... I had a lamb taco and chorizo tostido. The cocktails were creative.
This place is located in a funny spot but if you can find it you MUST stop. They have amazing tacos and nachos!
This place is located in a funny spot but if you can find it you MUST stop. They have amazing tacos and nachos!
Although these are pretty good tacos, the value seems to be missing. We ordered 6 tacos in total and it came to $47! We had pork, lamb and steak tacos, all of which resembled an authentic version of what you’d get in Southern California or...More
Although these are pretty good tacos, the value seems to be missing. We ordered 6 tacos in total and it came to $47! We had pork, lamb and steak tacos, all of which resembled an authentic version of what you’d get in Southern California or...More
Food was amazing. Service was fine. Had the Tortilla soup. Perfection. Just tge right amount of spicy. Im still dreaming about the carnita. Going back soon.
Food was amazing. Service was fine. Had the Tortilla soup. Perfection. Just tge right amount of spicy. Im still dreaming about the carnita. Going back soon.
We came here 5yrs ago and today we came back & once again tacofino did not disappoint! We ordered the amazing fish tacos, crispy chicken tacos, pork tacos and the lamb birria. We all ordered a margarita as well. This place is a place yo...More
We came here 5yrs ago and today we came back & once again tacofino did not disappoint! We ordered the amazing fish tacos, crispy chicken tacos, pork tacos and the lamb birria. We all ordered a margarita as well. This place is a place yo...More
Came for dinner with friends who had been to Tacofino before, and it sounds like a lot had changed at this location. The food was great, enjoyed a few different tacos as well as some chips and guac, all of which was fantastic. A good...More
Came for dinner with friends who had been to Tacofino before, and it sounds like a lot had changed at this location. The food was great, enjoyed a few different tacos as well as some chips and guac, all of which was fantastic. A good...More
Good food and service always leave customers happy, and myself and family after our visit(s - yes we went twice) on our recent trip to Vancouver and surrounding area. Don't be put off by the fancy restaurant next door, the food here is simply delicious.
Good food and service always leave customers happy, and myself and family after our visit(s - yes we went twice) on our recent trip to Vancouver and surrounding area. Don't be put off by the fancy restaurant next door, the food here is simply delicious.
We had a lunch time drink and bite to eat here and the food was fabulous. I had their speciality fish taco and we shared a huge plate of really good nachos. Cold beers, cocktails, fun atmosphere and a largely younger crowd. A really good...More
We had a lunch time drink and bite to eat here and the food was fabulous. I had their speciality fish taco and we shared a huge plate of really good nachos. Cold beers, cocktails, fun atmosphere and a largely younger crowd. A really good...More
Having been a fan of their Tofino truck, I tried their Sit-down in Gastown. If you like the truck, the resto is just as good with more options. Crispy chicken taco was especially good - though maybe the crema could have had a bit more...More
Having been a fan of their Tofino truck, I tried their Sit-down in Gastown. If you like the truck, the resto is just as good with more options. Crispy chicken taco was especially good - though maybe the crema could have had a bit more...More
Ate here on first night in city as wanted something quick to eat and not too heavy. Really nice vibe in restaurant and had a lovely waiter who took the time to explain the menu and advised that 2 tacos was a good meal for...More
Ate here on first night in city as wanted something quick to eat and not too heavy. Really nice vibe in restaurant and had a lovely waiter who took the time to explain the menu and advised that 2 tacos was a good meal for...More
I usually love Tacofino, but this order from Uber Eats today was inedible. First, we never received our diablo cookie that we ordered and paid for. The two fish burritos had zero sauce in them - it was completely missed and thus the burrito was...More
I usually love Tacofino, but this order from Uber Eats today was inedible. First, we never received our diablo cookie that we ordered and paid for. The two fish burritos had zero sauce in them - it was completely missed and thus the burrito was...More
We love going to Tacofino everytime we come to Vancouver. The nachos are the best in the world...and the fishtacos! The service is always great too!
We love going to Tacofino everytime we come to Vancouver. The nachos are the best in the world...and the fishtacos! The service is always great too!
We had crispy chicken taco, nachos and sangria. everything was so delicious and the service was friendly.
We had crispy chicken taco, nachos and sangria. everything was so delicious and the service was friendly.
Good for late diner. The burritos are stuffed full. Little outside deck to enjoy your meal and drinks. People working there are very nice.
Good for late diner. The burritos are stuffed full. Little outside deck to enjoy your meal and drinks. People working there are very nice.
Perhaps it's because of the multitude of taco offering in Vancouver, but we fancied tacos ! Plus we had heard raves review about Tacofino. Staying the the Yaletown area, we decided to try it out for dinner. The neighbourhood is quite nice for a little...More
Perhaps it's because of the multitude of taco offering in Vancouver, but we fancied tacos ! Plus we had heard raves review about Tacofino. Staying the the Yaletown area, we decided to try it out for dinner. The neighbourhood is quite nice for a little...More
Had Guacamole and chips, plus tacos 🌮 for dinner; and, it was as amazing as Tacofino always is. The Guacamole portion was so good for the price. And the chips tasted amazing. For the tacos 🌮, I really loved the cauliflower one. I would love...More
Had Guacamole and chips, plus tacos 🌮 for dinner; and, it was as amazing as Tacofino always is. The Guacamole portion was so good for the price. And the chips tasted amazing. For the tacos 🌮, I really loved the cauliflower one. I would love...More
The environment and staff were amazing; it was a nice location and really tried to take care of my girlfriends dietary restrictions. However, the food was really small in portions and the lemongrass burrito bowl was super dry and bland.
The environment and staff were amazing; it was a nice location and really tried to take care of my girlfriends dietary restrictions. However, the food was really small in portions and the lemongrass burrito bowl was super dry and bland.
No words to describe the flavor of this Nachos... I believe it is the feta cheese that made it so special.
No words to describe the flavor of this Nachos... I believe it is the feta cheese that made it so special.
after we went to cho we felt lets give another tacofino a shot but here you have to much fat and mayonese on everything.... nothing was mexican spicy or original
after we went to cho we felt lets give another tacofino a shot but here you have to much fat and mayonese on everything.... nothing was mexican spicy or original
We stumbled on this when we liked the name of the road the back alley is on blood alley!) Delicious fish rack, pork taco and chips and dips
We stumbled on this when we liked the name of the road the back alley is on blood alley!) Delicious fish rack, pork taco and chips and dips
Delicious meal, would eat here again. If only they offered their ""late night snacks"" menu all the time. Ha, it seemed everything we really wanted was not offered until after 4/5pm (can't remember exact time).
Delicious meal, would eat here again. If only they offered their ""late night snacks"" menu all the time. Ha, it seemed everything we really wanted was not offered until after 4/5pm (can't remember exact time).
Seem to be some resting on laurels here. Tortilla was waxy and appeared to be under cooked which is unforgivable when that is your mainstay. At $6.50 for a fish taco (which requires more than just one to satisfy a small eater) it is overpriced....More
Seem to be some resting on laurels here. Tortilla was waxy and appeared to be under cooked which is unforgivable when that is your mainstay. At $6.50 for a fish taco (which requires more than just one to satisfy a small eater) it is overpriced....More
Great atmosphere with lovely staff. Menu offers both meat and vegetarian dishes with several in each category. Perfect for sharing food in a group.
Great atmosphere with lovely staff. Menu offers both meat and vegetarian dishes with several in each category. Perfect for sharing food in a group.
This place is excellent, and whenever we are on the Mainland we like to try and go here for lunch or dinner at least once. We love the fish tacos that they serve, and we have them every time we are there. There is a...More
This place is excellent, and whenever we are on the Mainland we like to try and go here for lunch or dinner at least once. We love the fish tacos that they serve, and we have them every time we are there. There is a...More
This is a nice place for a light meal or snack. Sit down, grab a menu and then order at the counter. The food is brought to you along with your drink. They do beers wines and cocktails to have while you graze. We had...More
This is a nice place for a light meal or snack. Sit down, grab a menu and then order at the counter. The food is brought to you along with your drink. They do beers wines and cocktails to have while you graze. We had...More
Really good food, super nice location when the suns out. 7 dollars for a taco is a little pricy but they are super tasty.
Really good food, super nice location when the suns out. 7 dollars for a taco is a little pricy but they are super tasty.",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7987354-Reviews-Tacofino-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tacofino Commissary,"Truly as busy as it was, WHY is my question? Over priced, crappy food. $24 for a sparse taco chip plater with avocado that was cold & empty other than a little tomato, greens & some long ago melted cheese. Ever hear of sour cream???...More
I would recommend this place for its delicious tacos. The chips and guac are also great. Prices are reasonable and the service is good based on how busy it can get there. I would come here again anytime.
With the current COVID indoor dining restrictions, we decided to order a Carnitas Taco Kit from the Tacofino Comissary as takeout. This is a really thoughtful meal pack for you to prepare at home, which includes a starter (lamb taquitos or jalapeño poppers), your choice...More
Food was excellent as it is at all Tacofino locations. Service was terrible. Never checked in to ask how our meal was, then took forever to clear our table. We were offered a dessert menu only after we requested one and then we waited 10...More
The food and drinks were delicious, as always. However, the interaction with the server left us feeling awkward and unwelcome. She made rude remarks, treated us as unwanted customers, and later could be seen gossiping about my differently-abled son. .... My young autistic son busied...More
Those are some very good tamales. We tried the fish taco, cauliflower taco, brusslesprout taco and a steak taco. All were quite good, but the cauliflower and fish tacos were probably the better of the four, but the pumpkin tamales were the best.
I have visited Tacofino on Hastings and have always been happy with the quality of food, drinks, and service. I love their cauliflowers taco, their fish taco, and their steak taco. their prices are reasonable and the ambiance is very informal and friendly.
Cultural appropriation is complicated, but I find this situation a discussion Vancouver needs to have. Why is it that a group of privileged white men who are investors that have a none Canadian, german chef ( could have brought someone from Mexico) run the biggest...More
We decided to do takeout and the menu is totally different from the sit down one. When you have tacos in this place don’t think Mexican...think creative. Interesting and ok but overpriced. We paid $25 for four tacos.Not going back.
I am frankly amazed at the love for this place. I honestly do not get it. Outrageously overpriced, which would be fine if the standard of the food merited it, but it doesn't even come close! I have had far better tacos than this in...More
We had a birthday dinner here and there was something for everyone. Delicious inventive food. The tater totters were delicious and the corn snapple was amazing. And that’s before the tacos. For me the standout was the tuna taco. Seared tuna, wakame, and just scrumptious....More
Vandaag per ongeluk belandt bij tacofino in hastingstreet. Delicious taco's. Good service, nice beers. Amazing keep up the good work. Thanks
My partner and I came for a last minute date night and had a fantastic experience start to finish! Our Server was warm, friendly and efficient. The Assistant General Manager, Jesselynn, really took a personal interest in all of the tables, taking the opportunity to...More
Had a wonderful evening here at a beer and tacos event. Really nicely paired flavours with the various beers (a real highlight was the tuna ceviche with a fruit-sour beer). Obviously with a full house the atmosphere was a bit boisterous but I think a...More
There are lineups outside this place. The food is good but the service is very rude. I think that the servers could use a basic course in customer relations. Firstly they are unaware of what ingredients they are serving. When I asked I was met...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3970953-Reviews-Tacofino_Commissary-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Taishoken Ramen,"Just finished my last day meeting at China Town Office , very beneficial , so happy I took all the office staff out for lunch , to my surprised , every one want "" Healthy Food "" No Chinese food , so we end up...More
This place is highly underrated in my opinion. I hear about all these other places and how wonderful they are and I go there and they’re very expensive, and they’re not any better and mostly they’re not as good as this wonderful little places. The...More
We really enjoyed this local ramen house. I have never eaten this style of food before. Our daughter picked the restaurant and I was unsure of what to order. We ordered the Pork Gyoza. My husband and I ordered the Yalisoba and my daughter ordered...More
This really hit the spot on a rainy and slightly chilly day, just a few blocks away from our Airbnb. I'm not a ramen expert, so I can't speak much to the quality, but I was personally happy with my bowl of pork ramen. It...More
Got take out here, the ramen was very good and gyoza was delicious. Definitely would recommend checking it out! The portions were decent too. Will be back if I'm back in the area.
Good place for tsukemen, tried them in Japan before and was excited to see them open in Vancouver. Over all quality was good, but the one’s in japan were better. They used to have heated stones in your dipping broth to keep it hot, but...More
We ordered the Tsukemen and Ramen, The noodles for the Tsukemen is okay but the Ramen is very bad, too soggy and no element, the soup or broth way too salty and had no deep, just plain salt. bad experience not like their grand parent...More
I am by no means a Ramen House conniseur, maybe I've had Ramen three times. If the Ramen community needed a place to convince first time Ramen tasters that this is a meal they would like to enjoy more of Taishoken should be their flagship....More
All kinds of Japanese noodles for dinner! We had tsukamen - original, spicy and garlic. Dip warm, chewy ramen noodles in a thickened sauce - comes with chiasiu and half a soft boiled egg. Tonkatsu and miso soup noodle with chiasiu, egg, sprouts, green onions....More
The ramen here is somewhat different from what we had expected. Instead of miso, the soup base was made with kimchi broth, which was tasty though not as thick as the miso broth. The sliced pork on top – your choice of lean, fat or...More
Perfect spot for a cold and rainy day. They do 6 ramen flavors only. Mine was just right - enough broth and spice to warm me up. Very tasty.
I ordered the original tsukemen with cold noodles. The noodles were perfectly cooked and the broth was tasty. It had a half a runny egg and a few slices of chashu pork inside. The broth was tasty but could have been a lot hotter. Otherwise...More
Craving Ramen we went to this restaurant and were pleasantly greeted and seated promptly. They have solo seating bars and a few tables one of which we luckily snagged as we had a toddler. The menu has a great selection of ramen (soup and the...More
During my one week stay in Vancouver I went to this restaurant three times!!! The ramen is super nice and super cheap (just around 10CAD). The staffs are all Japanese and they have very good service!
I eat here often, since I work nearby. The service is good, and quick. I don't order ramen so I wouldn't really know how that stacks up. Taishoken is about the tsukemen, and really that's what you want to order. It's the best in Vancouver,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7657955-Reviews-Taishoken_Ramen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Take Sushi,"Ended up here accidentally after misreading a friend's recommendation. Had a really nice basic sushi meal. Sashimi was good and the rice was well seasoned. Only weird thing was that their spicy tuna roll was just a tuna roll with gochujang on top. In my...More
The food is rlly good there me and my fam loved it omg. Everybody go there if u want sushi the server is rlly friendly! Thx 4 the amazing food ❤️
We love Take Sushi; we go here often and enjoy the food & friendly service. We always order our favourites and never have had a bad experience.
I was here one other time awhile back. This round I had the Hamachi kama and hamachi sashimi, red snapper, wild salmon sushi, uni sushi, tofu, pressed salmon roll and Prawn tempura. Good food and good value.
We've been going here and 2 or 3 other sushi places nearby. Take offers good value and interesting versions. Service has always been prompt and friendly. Good sushi at a good price. We love it!
Our family of five eats here once in a while and we have never been disappointed. We always come in ravished and within minutes our favourite dishes hit the table, and the food always disappears with oohs, yums, and uhms! The staff is professional and...More
I have been going here on and off for over 3-4 years. It offers pretty good sushi at a reasonable price. The restaurant is operated by chinese owner but I think it's not overly fusion-style like some of the other non-chinese sushi restaurant in the...More
Have been going to this hidden gem for years and I am always satisfied with the quality and freshness of the fish.
Went with my boss for lunch last week. It was not very busy - I think they do a fair bit of take out. I had one of the Bento boxes with Chicken teriyaki, salad, miso soup etc - it was really food. All in...More
I've been to quite a few sushi places on my recent trip to Canada and Take Sushi came out on top. I've known the place close to 10 years but i've been away for 8, only to return to have some of the best sushi...More
Ate here often while visiting my daughter. Fresh and tasty! Very clean inside and the service is quick.
I took my father-in- law for lunch at Take. He likes to go here at least once every two weeks. This was my first time. Sushi is as good as any sushi in Vancouver. It is run by a Chinese family; most sushi places in...More
We've been here for over 4-5 years, and the bento boxes are great value (can be ordered anytime) - the fish is always fresh, and never had a bad experience. The Chef/Owner - Jason, is always nice and welcoming - the place is a bit...More
I don't recommend this restaurant to anyone, it is not traditional Japanese restaurant. Their sushi not fresh and it still have ice on their sashimi. Hygiene even more worse!
Went again with the family. Friendly greeting at the door. Huge selection and helpful staff as always.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4046683-Reviews-Take_Sushi-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Takeya Sushi Japanese Restaurant,"This is our go-to place for sushi and other Japanese food. We like this place because they are efficient, and the quality and taste of food is always good. I know others feel the same way because it is almost always busy.
The best Bento box ever. Yes it is a bit pricey but at least it is good. This place had the best staff ever. Thanks for tempura cooked in fresh oil. I am sick of old oil in tempura cooking,
Have a business meeting in the neighbourhood with girlfriend#5 ,the office staff want to take us out for lunch at the Takeya Sushi Japanese restaurant local at Francis / No 1 road in a strip mall ,parking no problem , outside looks very clean ,inside...More
Consistent fresh sushi with great presentation and excellent service! Located in a strip mall in Richmond so not the best location or venue but we go on a regular basis for the food! Also great for takeout
This place has been serving excellent quality Japanese food for many years, and it is still full. There is no better proof of a good restaurant, that a place that has a devoted clientele, for a very long time.
Try to visit every time we are in Richmond and we were lucky to have found this little place. They are quite busy with lots of take out orders and only can seat about 40 or so? Always nice to be able to get the...More
Everything is good, Bentos are my favorite, Thank the chefs, they love that!! Just try something new every time and you will not be disappointed!
Friendly service for dine in and take out! Take out orders usually require 20-25 minutes on a busy evening. We prefer this restaurant because of their consistent and excellent quality of fish!
Went with my family, we have had almost everything on the menu. The bento boxes are great, especially enjoy the salad in them. Important to remember there are no reservations and it gets busy, with a list for the lineup. Also really popular as a...More
We went there on the advice that it is a authentic Japanese restaurant and that it had good food. I could say now that it is pretty good. The place is small and you won't get a quiet private dinner here. It looks like it...More
We always frequent this Japanese owned and operated restaurant prior to their peak hours so we don’t have to wait! Their service is very efficient and servers are very polite. We often have their bento boxes which are a good size and leave very satisfied....More
Great menu or assortment, delicious food, clean, helpful and mindful staff, busy lunchtime! I loved the negitoro rolls!
Love love their food. Lots of food choices. Friendly staff. Service is great. Would recommend this to anyone
Fortunately I hardly ever write bad reviews.... but... Here's one! It's actually hard to believe in a city like Richmond BC , with such great selection of Japanese Restaurants and strong competition as a result... that such mediocre... poorly packaged...overpriced Sushi could be offered ......More
I have had the great fortune to live in Japan for a number of years and during that time I had the opportunity to enjoy some very good restaurant and home-cooked Japanese meals all over the country. I live in Italy now in a small...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2707672-Reviews-Takeya_Sushi_Japanese_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Takis Taverna,"We had a lovely meal here, the service was amazing. Definitely will be back when we're back in town!
This restaurant is not Greek-owned anymore. I ordered the entree, then waited a very long time for it. Server has no communication skills. The meal was sub-standard, improperly cooked; satziki smelled like the inside of a dirty fridge. Server never returned to check on me....More
My friend and I were first time diners at the restaurant. Unfortunately the experience was far from positive. Asking the server if the Spanakopita was made with filo pastry, the server did not know. My friend's salad arrived before his soup and when I enquired...More
Traditional Greek restaurant. Really good and tasty fresh food. Reasonably busy on a Monday night. The lady was so helpful. A great menu
If you like great tasting Greek food at a reasonable price, this is the place to visit. Friendly and welcoming service. We had the moussaka and chicken souvlakia. Both were large portions with rice and potato, salad and vegetables. Both dishes were delicious but too...More
Ordered the calamari dinner and thought it was delicious, pickup went well, the server there was nice, and it was a good portion, fresh tasting and i would go back
Went here today for lunch . Walked in and because there were no customers I had to ask the waiter if they were open . He came from the back and seemed to be annoyed we were there. Grumbled that he needed our vaccine certificate....More
I am not one to write reviews as I'm pretty easy going with my food especially during covid when businesses are struggling but I had to share my experience...here it goes. It has been a couple years since we've been to this restaurant and it...More
Our tried and true Greek restaurant sadly closed during the pandemic. A special request from a family member for some Mediterranean cuisine. There seems to be a lack of consistency here with Greek restaurants. I read about a dozen reviews and narrowed the choices to...More
We have eaten here for years and there were some hits and misses. Last night everything was perfect- enough so that I asked what was different. There are new owners and everything was perfect! I highly recommend this lovely little spot.
I ordered a lamb shank to go. I love lamb meat so I often order it when I find it in a menu. I had to wait about 25 minutes although the restaurant was empty. I opened the box just about 10 minutes after I...More
We finally had a chance to get together as a family in Vancouver, and Takis Taverna was a great place for us the food , and the service was fantastic. We started with the keftedakia ""taki's fater's meatballs "" the only thing I can say...More
One of the most authentic Greek restaurants in town. Reminds me of my time in Greece. The grilled calamari are absolutely fantastic. Also, hardly any restaurants in Vancouver serve that, all have just the deep fried stuff.
My husband and I don't eat out that often due to Covid, or even order in. This past weekend we decided to have Greek food. We were very much looking forward to it. We ordered the platter for two. When we opened the containers we...More
We had 3 meals to share ,Greek salad ,eggplan puree and spinach cake.The spinash cake was fresh and good, very crispy.The salad they put grind feta on it ??? It does not sous fresh and you do not expect that?? Everywhere in world it comes...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d689889-Reviews-Takis_Taverna-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Takumi Japanese Restaurant,"I recently went to Takumi for a quiet dinner. Takumi is family owned and run serving high end traditional Japanese cuisine. I ordered assorted Sashimi, Ohitashi, Tempura and Sushi. The Ohitashi was very flavorful. The Sashimi tasted very fresh and was well presented. The Tempura...More
If you stay on UBC campus and feel like Japanese food, this is your place. This establishment brings the tastes of Japan to UBC. The food is very good and really reminded me of my visits to Japan. We tried two different miso soups, the...More
We were a group of 5, and we thoroughly enjoyed traditional Japanese food. We ordered the usual agadeshi tofu, spinach gomae, hamachi sashimi, uni and ikura sushi, and their special sushi roll with soft shell crabs. Even the pork gyoza was very delicious. All in...More
30 years ago, when I was a student in Vancouver, I used to patronised Takumi almost every week. I couldn’t find them when they moved but through the internet, I managed to find them again. Today, I brought my family to eat here again and...More
I have been dining at Takumi Japanese restaurant with friends for some time now. Each time they have impressed us tremendously. Had the opportunity to sit at the sushi bar on my own the other evening. Was able to fully concentrate on the food presented...More
最近のVancouverの日本食レストランは本当の味を無くしてしまっている。しかし此処は昔ながらの本格的な日本の味でクオリティが高い！是非行ってください！おススメ！ High quality restaurant!! Real Japanese food you can get!! If you like Japanese food you gotta go!!
We went to this restaurant recently for the very first time, inviting our friends with us. I had read rave reviews about this restaurant on Yelp so decided to give it a try. Unlike many Japanese or Chinese restaurants we had been to, this restaurant...More
I don't come here often as I live quite far away but every time I come, it's a memorable occasion. When Takumi was in Burnaby, I was in there just about every week. This time, I'm here with out of town visitors. We ordered sashimi...More
The Takumi menu is a standard Japanese Restaurant Food menu; the space is contemplative and well designed; the service is efficient and friendly. The quality of the food is discernibly good and well made. The cone sushi wrappers are crisp and the contents especially tasty;...More
This gem suffers from bad location. I am sure that if it were in a heavy travelled location it would be packed. But being on the edge of UBC on a street where even cannon balls get lonely at 9 PM, that is survives is...More
We went to this restaurant for dinner on the recommendation of a friend. We were not disappointed - the food was beautifully prepared and served. Service was very good and the decor and ambience was first class
There is no lack of Japanese restaurants in Vancouver and finding out the better ones is no easy task. We tried neighborhood restaurant Takumi on 10th West Avenue, which opened few years ago, and were not disappointed. On the contrary, we thought that cuisine was...More
I am so glad we found their new location. This is probably as close as I come to authentic sushi. It is delicious and beautifully arranged. I highly recommend it.
The recently opened Takumi Restaurant is a treat for those looking for authentic Japanese cuisine created by an authentic Japanese chef. After enjoying several lunch sets at Takumi we decided to explore their dinner menu and were impressed by the freshness of the food, the...More",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6585713-Reviews-Takumi_Japanese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Talay thai restaurant,"Excellent value for money; quick service made it an ideal ‘sit-down’ option while working in the area…. They were able to amend the described menu items to fit my vegetarian requirements.
Dishes were very salty like salt are free. Foods were very salty that I couldn’t finished them......
Good value, moderate price, attentive service. Decent selection of dishes. The real Thai deal. Try it!
I’m always on the lookout for Thai restaurants that I’ve never tried before so Talay Thai has been on my radar in case I ever found myself in the South Granville area. We showed up for lunch one weekday in early November and tried some...More
A green curry and a pad noodle. Both nice. The curry was a bit mild but they were both tasty and a good deal. Nothing flash or huge about the meal, but a reasonable lunch in pleasant surroundings.
Talay Thai Restaurant is located in the Marpole area of South Vancouver. We made reservations for 6:15 on this Sunday evening and the small restaurant was may be one-half full. The 6 of us ordered 5 appetizers, 2 salads and 4 main courses plus a...More
We are from Ontario and I was craving some Thai food. Spotted this restaurant on the way to the airport. I had red curry, hubby had pad Thai. Both were good! Topped it off with mango ice cream. Delish!
Delicious food, good value for money, excellent service. Decent portion sizes (not too small but also not huge). Would happily dine here again!
We took a very long time, before trying this place out for local nosh. Regrettable, that we hadn't done it sooner. Although not big, it doesn't feel constrained and there is a nice sense of peace, good for digestion! Meals were served pretty quickly, used...More
Though it may not be the fanciest place, it has authentic and wonderful service and some of the most delicious food in the city for Thai!
The restaurant is clean wth wood booths with cushions nice soothing colors of yellow and gold. The rest rooms were clean and nice. Friendly staff and fast service. The food was delicious. My husband enjoyed the green curry with chicken. He liked the heat level....More
Traditional Thai with a kick. The coconut sauce dishes are amazing. Friendly staff, fast service, and the price is right!
We headed to this area of town to grab a bite before going to the local theatre. It was a weird time (5ish) so nowhere was very busy. We peered into a few windows and this place caught our eye. What a great choice for...More
I work near here so have come frequently. The dishes are well very well prepared. The owner is Thai and cooks food in a traditional way.
We tried Pad Med Mamuang Himaphan and Kaeng Massaman curry - loved both. The wait staff who served us went out of their way to explain and recommend dishes that were unfamiliar to us. We don’t like a whole lot of spice in our Thai...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1836050-Reviews-Talay_thai_restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tamam Fine Palestinian Cuisine,"I love this restaurant! I've been twice and will look forward to the next time. The food is amazing, the service great, and the owners' attention to customers is so welcoming. In addition, the prices are very reasonable and the portions generous. The first time...More
We had the Chicken Shawarma for 2 and a Chicken Kebap with Potatoes (lots of potatoes :-)) The Shawarma came with lots of dips and no one should feel hungry afterwards. All tasted very spicy and authentic. Really enjoyed the evening - sometimes it’s good...More
We went to Tamam for a family celebration. I wasn’t expecting much… I was so wrong! It was an amazing experience. The humus was out of this world. The lamb was heaven! It melted in your mouth! They even managed to make lentil rice out...More
Loved this restaurant! The service was excellent and the food was absolutely delicious! The little bowl of hot sauce that came with the meal was fantastic and the the lamb was so good it almost made me cry....secret ingredient must be magic
I can’t imagine why anyone would give this restaurant a bad rating. We ordered way too much food and thus had a variety of dishes to sample. Everything was phenomenal and our server was fantastic. Highlights included the mujaddara, fattoush, fried cauliflower and the most...More
I am disgusted by this restaurant. Firstly the good: Tamam's food was exquisite – bursting with tantalising flavours. I cannot fault it. However, by the time we left, we were both seriously traumatised. The service was disorganised and poor. Both our servers' were courteous but...More
We had a lovely and very yummy dinner last night and decided to try out this restaurant from a friend’s recommendation. I know good quality food and this restaurant did not disappoint. My husband had the lamb, I had chicken kebabs, the couple we brought...More
Drove all the way to this weak restaurant, got seated, and waited 25 minutes for anyone to get my order or at least a glass of water. I leave the table and go to the waitress and she says give five minutes while there was...More
Sorry to hear about your bad experience. However, according to our cameras in the restaurant, you were in the restaurant for 9 minutes and 20 seconds. If you permit me I can post pictures showing the time when you came in, to the time when...More
you need to try this PLACE & FOOD FOR SURE ! its unbelievably tasty ! .never the same any where , taste of arabic home made food , with excellent flavour , huge amount , with really excellent affordable price . the whole experience is...More
Our family made an order that totalled $150 to be delivered by DoorDash (and we are in the area - maybe a 5-7 minutes drive). 45 minutes in, we were texted by the driver to say that the restaurant had made a mistake and the...More
It's a heck of a time to be a new kid on the block, but Tamam To Go at 1108 Commercial Drive is a welcome addition to the colourful cuisine of the area. The venue is a bit starkand unassuming, but the welcome is warm,...More
Such a relaxed place to enjoy food without a sense of rush. The dishes are always lovely and prepared with attention to detail.
The establishment lives up to its 'fine cuisine' name. The extensive selection of food, generous portions and attentive service ensured that our near-15 strong group never wanted for anything. Well done and keep it up Tamam!
Best Middle Eastern food in Vancouver. Palestinian food's close to Lebanese but subtly different. Extremely fresh salads. Love the lamb with fereeka. We've had many great meals there. Always reliable.
Was driving around and remembered this place to eat at and I’m never disappointed ☹️ cos after all I’m a Palestinian myself and I just get amused that we actually have our own food here in Canada 🇨🇦 yay 😃. Love it 🥰 love the...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2314927-Reviews-Tamam_Fine_Palestinian_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tamarind Hill Malaysian Cuisine,"We ordered 11 dishes. The Mee Goring and noodle dishes were good, but the Gada Gado was bland and disappointing, worst we've ever had. The curries were watery, more like soup and the Laksa was just OK. Unfortunately, they are the only Malaysian restaurant on...More
We ordered 11 dishes. The Mee Goring and noodle dishes were good, but the Gada Gado was bland and disappointing, worst we've ever had. The curries were watery, more like soup and the Laksa was just OK. Unfortunately, they are the only Malaysian restaurant on...More
This place is so amazing!! I have never had one even mediocre meal here. Despite having a driver call in sick, the owner got in her own car and came to deliver us her fabulous food. Unprecedented (and may not ever happen again, haha) but...More
This place is so amazing!! I have never had one even mediocre meal here. Despite having a driver call in sick, the owner got in her own car and came to deliver us her fabulous food. Unprecedented (and may not ever happen again, haha) but...More
Love this restaurant, very happy it's open for takeout during these bizarre times. Never disappointed! Last night we had the nasi goring, samba beef and asparagus, chicken curry, roti bread and the star of the night....fanny bay clams in a garlic ""street"" sauce! Yum! Looking...More
Love this restaurant, very happy it's open for takeout during these bizarre times. Never disappointed! Last night we had the nasi goring, samba beef and asparagus, chicken curry, roti bread and the star of the night....fanny bay clams in a garlic ""street"" sauce! Yum! Looking...More
Hit up this place after the gym at night to try some new dishes and some all time favourites and they did not disappoint. Always good, full of flavour and spice, and always glad to accommodate your dietary needs. Personally, this is my favourite Malaysian...More
Hit up this place after the gym at night to try some new dishes and some all time favourites and they did not disappoint. Always good, full of flavour and spice, and always glad to accommodate your dietary needs. Personally, this is my favourite Malaysian...More
This is a fantastic restaurant and will now be a go-to for us during the time of Covid and beyond. We ordered take out tonight and every dish was delicious. Chicken satay with peanut sauce and vegetarian spring rolls with a terrific spicy sauce were...More
This is a fantastic restaurant and will now be a go-to for us during the time of Covid and beyond. We ordered take out tonight and every dish was delicious. Chicken satay with peanut sauce and vegetarian spring rolls with a terrific spicy sauce were...More
Love our usual lunches here, but in the time of COVID-19 we got takeout. They were surprisingly - and happily - busy. Nasi Goreng was as fantastic as ever, and the Chicken Curry was delicious. Glad to see them doing well. Support local!
Love our usual lunches here, but in the time of COVID-19 we got takeout. They were surprisingly - and happily - busy. Nasi Goreng was as fantastic as ever, and the Chicken Curry was delicious. Glad to see them doing well. Support local!
We generally eat in a Tamarind Hill but due to the Covid we did take out. Same quality food, not disappointed!! Sambal beef, Nasi goreng, cailimari, curry, roti, everything very tasty!! Many thanks for the delivery!!
We generally eat in a Tamarind Hill but due to the Covid we did take out. Same quality food, not disappointed!! Sambal beef, Nasi goreng, cailimari, curry, roti, everything very tasty!! Many thanks for the delivery!!
Really authentic Malaysian food. Soft shell crab is highly recommended. The curry is not to spicy. I like their perfect balance between curry and coconut milk. Btw, their coconut rice is also good to try.
Really authentic Malaysian food. Soft shell crab is highly recommended. The curry is not to spicy. I like their perfect balance between curry and coconut milk. Btw, their coconut rice is also good to try.
Ordered a number of dishes for take out. Two dishes were double ordered. Had trouble placing the order as the manager was impatient. Got the order home only to find very small portions especially the dishes we ordered two of. Seemed that a only a...More
Ordered a number of dishes for take out. Two dishes were double ordered. Had trouble placing the order as the manager was impatient. Got the order home only to find very small portions especially the dishes we ordered two of. Seemed that a only a...More
If this was a movie I'd give em two thumbs up. Excellent Malaysian food here. We had pepper soft shell crab. Was sooooo tasty. Right on! Also had Hokien Mee noodle dish with shrimp, chicken and octopus. Quite good but it was good but slightly...More
If this was a movie I'd give em two thumbs up. Excellent Malaysian food here. We had pepper soft shell crab. Was sooooo tasty. Right on! Also had Hokien Mee noodle dish with shrimp, chicken and octopus. Quite good but it was good but slightly...More
Holy smokies. Went there last night for a later dinner to try something new and we were not disappointed. The food was so damb flavourful! The roti was 10/10 mouth feel and the sauce was so creamy! Mmmmmmmm soup was amazing too. I’m definitely going...More
Holy smokies. Went there last night for a later dinner to try something new and we were not disappointed. The food was so damb flavourful! The roti was 10/10 mouth feel and the sauce was so creamy! Mmmmmmmm soup was amazing too. I’m definitely going...More
Had been going to this restaurant on and off. This is the only Malaysian food joint in North Van after John 3.6 closed down. Food here is decent. Normally have the curry laksa, mee goreng, Hor fun or chicken rice. I like a squeeze of...More
Had been going to this restaurant on and off. This is the only Malaysian food joint in North Van after John 3.6 closed down. Food here is decent. Normally have the curry laksa, mee goreng, Hor fun or chicken rice. I like a squeeze of...More
Always enjoy dining here. Laksas are deliciously full of flavours, and the nasi goreng is just yummy. Friendly & cheerful staff.
Always enjoy dining here. Laksas are deliciously full of flavours, and the nasi goreng is just yummy. Friendly & cheerful staff.
It is a good Asian Restaurant. I love it.It has wonderful food and I have been going there for years.
It is a good Asian Restaurant. I love it.It has wonderful food and I have been going there for years.
Ordered a take out dinner meal. Although taste was good Beef rendang portion was so small you can count the number of small chunk of meat. It's not worth $16.95 for the dish. A small roti Canai with curry sauce is not worth $7.00. We...More
Ordered a take out dinner meal. Although taste was good Beef rendang portion was so small you can count the number of small chunk of meat. It's not worth $16.95 for the dish. A small roti Canai with curry sauce is not worth $7.00. We...More
food was very tasty and exotic,interior of restaurant is very well suited to the Malaysian theme of the restaurant., location is good across from the Royal City Mall on sixth st.
food was very tasty and exotic,interior of restaurant is very well suited to the Malaysian theme of the restaurant., location is good across from the Royal City Mall on sixth st.
We thought we’d give this restaurant some business after C19 rules were relaxed. The greeting by the owner was nonchalant! Restaurants live by their food, ambiance and experience. Well we ordered our lunch dishes but were very disappointed indeed. The char quey teo was too...More
We thought we’d give this restaurant some business after C19 rules were relaxed. The greeting by the owner was nonchalant! Restaurants live by their food, ambiance and experience. Well we ordered our lunch dishes but were very disappointed indeed. The char quey teo was too...More
Since the Covid 19 , almost every restaurant got hit financial , very sad to see that , Lucky I sold all my restaurants in 2018,( I have 7 restaurants from West .Coast to E. Coast ! so any chance I get , I all...More
Since the Covid 19 , almost every restaurant got hit financial , very sad to see that , Lucky I sold all my restaurants in 2018,( I have 7 restaurants from West .Coast to E. Coast ! so any chance I get , I all...More
7 of us showed up unexpectedly on a Sunday night. The restaurant was fairly full but we were seated quickly and orders taken. The decor is absolutely beautiful! Roti bread arrived shortly thereafter and then the remaining dishes. All of it was delicious and well...More
7 of us showed up unexpectedly on a Sunday night. The restaurant was fairly full but we were seated quickly and orders taken. The decor is absolutely beautiful! Roti bread arrived shortly thereafter and then the remaining dishes. All of it was delicious and well...More
As a long time frequent customer to both the New Westminster and North Vancouver locations, tonight’s experience was an utter disappointment, perhaps disaster. We know that we normally order and what it tastes like, so when my wife’s soft shell crab entree comes tasting off,...More
As a long time frequent customer to both the New Westminster and North Vancouver locations, tonight’s experience was an utter disappointment, perhaps disaster. We know that we normally order and what it tastes like, so when my wife’s soft shell crab entree comes tasting off,...More
Tamarind is a terrific little spot. Always busy (do they take reservations?) but the food range is wonderful. Roti and sauces leading to a range of mild to spicy Malaysian cuisine. I’ve gone to the restaurant monthly since it opened. Service is very good and...More
Tamarind is a terrific little spot. Always busy (do they take reservations?) but the food range is wonderful. Roti and sauces leading to a range of mild to spicy Malaysian cuisine. I’ve gone to the restaurant monthly since it opened. Service is very good and...More
This used to be one of my favourite Malaysian restaurants, coming originally from Malaysia, when I crave for Malaysian food, this is one of the go-to Malaysian restaurants for me. However the last visit was so disappointing, I suspect either the ownership changed or the...More
This used to be one of my favourite Malaysian restaurants, coming originally from Malaysia, when I crave for Malaysian food, this is one of the go-to Malaysian restaurants for me. However the last visit was so disappointing, I suspect either the ownership changed or the...More
I’ve eaten here the last two nights in a row. They have THE BEST FOOD! If you’ve never had Malaysian food I highly recommend you try it. Try the Roti Canai and and the chicken curry to start, you won’t be disappointed. The spice is...More
I’ve eaten here the last two nights in a row. They have THE BEST FOOD! If you’ve never had Malaysian food I highly recommend you try it. Try the Roti Canai and and the chicken curry to start, you won’t be disappointed. The spice is...More
This restaurant is one of my favourite for lunch. We have been going there for years. The owner Louis is a very attentive & awesome person. The lunch menu is extensive which has almost everything of a typical favourite Singapore & Malaysia dishes. They are...More
This restaurant is one of my favourite for lunch. We have been going there for years. The owner Louis is a very attentive & awesome person. The lunch menu is extensive which has almost everything of a typical favourite Singapore & Malaysia dishes. They are...More
We hadn't been in over a year and were pleased to see that the service is still warm and friendly and that the food is still outstanding. We shared 4 dishes and every one was delicious.
We hadn't been in over a year and were pleased to see that the service is still warm and friendly and that the food is still outstanding. We shared 4 dishes and every one was delicious.
My family has been coming here for many years. Unfortunately, it's not the same level of flavor anymore. The Roti Canai was the only dish that was ok. We ordered the chicken satay skewers - at 6pm, they had already run out of beef and...More
My family has been coming here for many years. Unfortunately, it's not the same level of flavor anymore. The Roti Canai was the only dish that was ok. We ordered the chicken satay skewers - at 6pm, they had already run out of beef and...More
I have been frequenting this restaurant for the last year and a half as I go to school in the area. Every time I go there I order the same dish, which is essentially vegetables and rice (nasi goreng without the meat and egg). Every...More
I have been frequenting this restaurant for the last year and a half as I go to school in the area. Every time I go there I order the same dish, which is essentially vegetables and rice (nasi goreng without the meat and egg). Every...More
I have been to this restaurant many time in the past and have noticed the portion sizes continually decreasing. This last time was the worst. The Malaysian Curry was 1/2 the size it used to be, and also the Pineapple Seafood Fried Rice was also...More
I have been to this restaurant many time in the past and have noticed the portion sizes continually decreasing. This last time was the worst. The Malaysian Curry was 1/2 the size it used to be, and also the Pineapple Seafood Fried Rice was also...More
Amazing food.Nice atmosphere.The restaurant is small so I recommend making a reservation because it's very popular.
Amazing food.Nice atmosphere.The restaurant is small so I recommend making a reservation because it's very popular.
We came on a cold, rainy Sunday. There were a few other tables eating. The servers were very gracious and helpful. The beef rendang was the best we've had. The hot and sour soup was delicious! The char hor fun noodles were perfect with the...More
We came on a cold, rainy Sunday. There were a few other tables eating. The servers were very gracious and helpful. The beef rendang was the best we've had. The hot and sour soup was delicious! The char hor fun noodles were perfect with the...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1536730-Reviews-Tamarind_Hill_Malaysian_Cuisine-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tandoori Fusion,"I have eaten a lot of greasy mediocre curry in Vancouver, probably tried most curry restaurants in Vancouver. Tandoori Fusion is the best of the best for traditional curry dishes. The portions are large and the flavours are distinct and delicious. If you are in...More
Delivery, take out or eat inside this special restaurant..the wide variety of Indian Fusion Cuisine is readily available in a wide variety of ways..the atmosphere is very friendly and warm as the staff are very present and helpful..the garlic naan, butter chicken and veggie pakora...More
I ordered mild butter chicken with basmati rice and I dined in the restaurant. The staff were really nice and friendly. The chicken was a bit dry but the sauce was really tasty and flavourful. The portion of the food was large. The restaurant itself...More
My wife and I have been ordering dishes from here for 5 years and just love it. The quality and flavor are always excellent and the portion sizes are generous for the prices.
This is our go-to place for Indian take-out. Nothing beats it for quality, quantity and value. Three dishes for three people and we have enough to left over for another meal! And its delicious!!
We ordered chicken Tikka and spinach cheese naan. The order was ready as arranged, nicely packaged with some raita and coriander sauce. The naan heated nicely in the oven as did the chicken. All of it was delicious , tasty and very substantial chunks of...More
My wife and I love this place. It is family run and run well. The food is amazing EVERY time. They almost always give you a free tester taste, something small but it is a very nice touch and lets you try something you might...More
We decided to try this cozy restaurant on Broadway and we order the house lamb curry especial and a vegetarian dish.The curry spice was just right and the lamb very tender. The waitress recommend the local Pilsner and we weren't disappointed is very crisp and...More
Right on Broadway, so very convenient with public transportation or walking. Small. Lots of takeout business. Reasonable lunch. We had dinner, and it was superb. Lots of selections. Your choice of spice. Reasonable. Friendly - seems to be family run. Check it out.
No confusion, here....... My favourite, go to, restaurant for Indian food, Hand’s down! Location in Point Grey, on West Broadway at MacDonald Street. Good quality food. prices are great! Excellent lunch special’s, includes rice and naan $ 10-11 dollars. My biggest pet peeve with Indian/...More
Went on a Saturday evening. Staff were so friendly. Food was delicious. The 6 of us split 2 starters, the chicken pakora and the fish pakora. For mains I got the prawn cauon curry which was spicy and mouthwatering. I got a side of basmati...More
Indian food is usually ""hit"" or ""miss"", mostly it tends to be a ""miss"" for various reasons (over spiced, tasteless, too much salt, etc). This restaurant was a definite ""hit"", truly deserving of 5 stars. The food was fresh and simply delicious with the right...More
This is one of my favorite Tandoori restaurants in the world! I hope to return here every time I visit Vancouver BC. Excellent food and service!
Lovely curries!! Being honest what more do you really need. Stopped in as was the nearest to where we were at the time and definitely not disappointed. Chili Chicken was great as was my partners Chicken Palak, more than enough for 2 with rice and...More
The taste of the food was great. The atmosphere fear could be better but the food makes that up. I had naan and some spinach with cheese and it was awesome.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4300819-Reviews-Tandoori_Fusion-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tandoori Kona,"Ordered the prawn masala and lamb biriani with garlic naan... Absolutely delicious! Fresh and hot! Will definitely be back for the goat!
Some great specials but very friendly staff and clean location make this place!! Highly recommend if you are looking for authentic Indian food.
Very tasty food, had shrimp masala and garlic naan . Everything was tasty . Was not planed visit just returning from vacation and stop by . We was very lucky though . Talk with server he told us they just open restaurant 2/3 months before,...More
Butter chicken was very good, but spice level was very low for ordering medium. Service was exceptionally poor. We had to flag server down anytime we wanted anything. When we asked for our bills he didn’t come back, we strongly considered walking out. We finally...More
Not sure how or why this place even has decent reviews. The food is super bland, butter chicken was obviously watered down, roti’s dry and undercooked, we would never recommend or eat from this restaurant again.
If you don’t mind not having an ambiance atmosphere,this is the place to go to for really excellent.
Nice place easy to park no need for booking. Good food at reasonable price good and quick service. Recommendable
Looking at other reviews, maybe they just had an off day when we visited but I found very little to compliment them on. From the reserved/cold reception and service to the room temperature Lassi, it all became about temperatures. Butter chicken was like warm, chicken...More
Very delicious Indian food, with a super good lunch special! Every day tyhey have a choice of Vegetarian or Butter Chicken specials, with 2 curries, rice, naan, yogurt and salad, for a VERY REASONABLE price! GREAT VALUE and GOOD FOOD here!
There are a few Indian restaurants in Bellingham, but to get really good Indian cuisine it is worth the trip to Canada to get really good food. Richmond has a diverse population of ethnic immigrants and it is reflected in their excellent restaurants!
Tandoori Kona is our go-to for Indian take out. They're fast and food is always cooked to perfection. Their online ordering system works well and is super convenient. I can't recommend highly enough!
Lunch special thali platter for under 10 bucks is the best deal. It changes daily, this time we had Butter Chicken, Chana Masala and Potato/Zucchini. The platter comes with Raita, Salad and a basket of Naan. I do believe they have changed owners though, didn't...More
Went here for dinner. Waiter came right away and gave me the menu, then he disappeared and came back fifteen minutes later. Funnily I was the only one in the restaurant at that time, so not like it was very busy. Was just about to...More
This turned out to be a pleasant surprise for lunch. We shopping nearby and have a craving for a nice curry. Saw this place and decided to give it a try. Really glad we did. Its clean, not huge by any means, but you don't...More
Lunch special has enough variety for a nice lunch. Recommend fish pakora and chai tea Excellent service and quality food",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2234842-Reviews-Tandoori_Kona-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Tandoori Palace,"Walk by decision to come here. Friendly service. We tried their tandoori palace thali and more than enough food for two people. Order, pay and then take a seat. Great value.
My son lives close to Tandoori...so if we order in, this place gets chosen more than not. The food is very good...their naan bread is off the charts awesome...the price is reasonable for the good portions you receive...its not fancy but that' not why you...More
I've walked by this place on Commercial many times and decided to give it a shot today. Damn..glad I did! I got the tandoori chicken..it was char roasted to perfection in the tandoor. So moist and flavorful. Its dark and light meat - the white...More
Visiting from out of town and our friends always go here. It was so good! Veggie biryani, channa, aloo gobi, butter chicken, naan and veggie pakora. We ordered and had take away. So yummy and great, friendly service.
The food here is really good. They make great naan bread and other meats in the tendoori oven the have in the kitchen. The place is unpretentious and very small with just a few tables, but the staff was friendly and helped us through our...More
Our favourite go-to for Indian food. I love their Baingan barta (Eggplant) and biryani. Their dal makhani is also quite delicious. Thanks to Vivek and Fareeda for the amazing food.
The place is small and very basic but the food is so great that it does not matter. The portions are big and it is great to share a couple of dishes with another person. You can always take home what you can not finish....More
Palatial, it is not, but tiny Tandoori Palace is huge when it comes to the food. Now, I rarely give an ""Excellent"" to even some rather fine restaurants, but this austere little place deserves it hands down. The featureless interior with its whitish marbled tiles,...More
it's looks. Not much more than a takeout counter with a few small tables. BUT the food was great, the service friendly and the prices reasonable. This is a basic but genuine northern Indian restaurant. Menu is online but in the restaurant itself in posted...More
A Biriyani to compare with the best as far as I'm concerned. Knew this one was gonna be good when saw Vancouver Police eating there.
We ordered take out from here and were blown away by the flavours. We have eaten at some high end Indian places and this is equal if not better.
Ok, don't judge a book by its cover. Does not look like much based on appearances. Just a blink-and-you-miss-it, small hole in the wall type of place on Commercial. Not the tidiest, cleanest, sparkliest palace of a place. But these joints can be like finding...More
If you are craving some Indian Tandoori (clay oven) fare like kabobs and naan, and don't have much time, much money or a date to enjoy your meal with...this may be the ideal place to go. I often swing by just to grab a seekh...More
The seekh kebab is very good indeed. Tender, perfectly spiced. Naan is soft and warm. Maybe a touch too pricey, but it is filling and I am being a bit picky here. Not much yoghurt is provided, but you'll get more if you ask. The...More
The naan is perfect it is good food but the menu has never changed as long as it has been open. I would like to see a few changes more choices of dishes.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4092984-Reviews-Tandoori_Palace-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tangent Cafe,"Expensive and not good employees overwhelmed and crabby. This cash cow of an eatery would not be missed. I pray that it gets replaced by a better place. Commercial drive deserves better
My son and i love coming to Tangents but find since the new owners took over they have taken lots of the old menu away and their new menu is extremely limited. They are also stopping the wednesday nite jazz nite which was a big...More
Well this is the 2nd time I came here... thought we would give it another go. Turns out the service is still bad! It was recommended by my server to maybe try a day that they are not so busy like a weekday so she...More
Overheard the drunk owner of this place, Nade, or Nate or something like that, making sexist, classist and demeaning jokes to other customers at the bar. I personally think that if you are going to be so rotten keep your mouth shut or go home...More
First come, first serve for tables so get there early to get a spot if to listen to their music performance lineup. The burgers are really good there.
We thought we'd check this place out as another place to catch some jazz tunes by local performers. Lots of pay street parking. Casual, relaxed atmosphere. Surprisingly good Malaysian food we had vs. Bar/grill food menu items also offered. Yam fries plus Mee goreng with...More
Despite spending my formative years around The Drive, I don’t really make it out here much anymore. During one early January morning, I found myself in the neighbourhood and decided to check out Tangent Cafe, which is located a bit further south down Commercial Dr....More
My son and I met for brunch there this past weekend. Awesome little spot, and the food was good. Not the BEST brunch I have had, but certainly holds its own. The service was impeccable and quick. Definitely recommend.
Very welcoming, great service and good food. We had a regular breakfast and an order of pancakes. The portions were good and the food cooked as asked. Open from 8 to 2 every day so I would go back for an early breakfast as you...More
Visited a few times on a recent trip to Vancouver and felt like I’d been coming for longer. Staff and patrons were really friendly. Great non fussy breakfast menu and popped my Cesar cherry - yum. Was a popular spot and fully recommend.
Some of the best roti I’ve ever had, crispy on the outside, slightly soft in the middle. Great atmosphere, laid back and casual. The curry was good. Nice to sit at the window and people watch while we ate.
I'm giving this 2 stars because I used to love everything about this place. I used to go here a lot and have great food with great service but I went last weekend with the family and the coffee was revolting like really, really disgusting,...More
Whilst on holidays in Vancouver we were brought here. It was early evening and we were seated immediately in a lovely corner area. Staff were amazing, friendly, efficient and very cooperative. If you like a bit of jazz well this is the place, perhaps a...More
We went for brunch today and had an excellent meal. Double Caesar’s on for $6.50. Everyone had eggs Benedict. We only had to wait about 15 min which was a pleasant surprise. Great service and great food!
We went on a sunny Friday at noon. They were busy, and warned us we might have to share a table with another couple, though this didn't come to pass. They have a broad beer selection, and eye offering both lunch and breakfast items. In...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3978312-Reviews-Tangent_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tap & Barrel,"Very good selection of beers, the staff were very friendly and attentive. We had pizza and chips for our meal which sits in the good category, but the overall experience raised it to very good. Very busy and obviously a very popular location
Thank you for dropping by and sharing the day with us, Paul! I am glad that you had a great time with us. Please join us again this summer. Cheers!
Great food! Great customer service from the reception to the hostess! We didn't plan going here but because the other restaurant made us wait for 40 minutes and didn't even give us the menu, we left and found this place. The moment we arrive, we...More
Hello and thank you for the very kind words for the experience you had with us, particularly with our hosts and for the food you had. I hope you get the chance to visit us again the enxt time you are in Coal Harbour. Enjoy...More
Our server was awesome, took great care of us. Our food was brought out quickly and everything was hot and delicious. Nice location right on the waterfront. Highly recommend this place
Thank you so much, Mark!! We are very happy that you dropped by and made us a part of your trip, your kind words are greatly appreciated. I hope you enjoyed the rest of your journey, wherever it took you. Cheers!
I sat in a little inside room with amazing views of the harbor. Food and beer was really good, service was fantastic! Wish I thought to get my server’s name, but he was taking care of the tables in the side room on July 8...More
Hi Michelle! Thank you for the very kind words and I am glad that you enjoyed your time in our very special Barrel Room. The views are spectacular from there! We appreciate the 5 star support and I hope that you get the chance to...More
The outdoor seating was very busy with 20-30 minute wait, so we opted for indoor seating in the section overlooking the sea. Food was good as well as serviceMore
Thank you for the kind review, Robert! We appreciate you making us a part of your visit to the West Coast and I hope you enjoy the rest of your travels. If you do get a chance to visit Vancouver again, please join us once...More
My buddy and I were in Vancouver on a business trip and had a day to wander around the city and we decided to check out the waterfront and do a bit of a pub crawl. One of the places that we hit was the...More
Thanks so much for the great review, WorldVoyager! We appreciate your support and the kind words for Molly. I hope you get a chance to return and join us once again under the red umbrella. Cheers!
It was a beautiful day and pretty busy, so we were happy we didn't have to wait long for a table. When they seated us they stated they have a 2 hour dining limit, which was fine. Our food was good (I'd say a little...More
Hi Vanessa. Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. I am very happy that you decided to visit us. I am sorry to see your 3 star score and would love to know more beyond the details you have already mentioned. If...More
Came here with family & received a nice table on the outside patio with a view of the harbour! Our server did a great job ensuring that we received our food & beverages in a timely manner! Enjoyed my tasty pizza & cold beverage.
Thank you very much, Sasha! I am so happy that you enjoyed your time with us and we appreciate the 5 star support. I hope you get the chance to visit Coal Harbour again soon. Cheers!
We stopped in here for drinks after a trip to Vancouver Island. It was really nice out in the open area and the service and drinks were first rate. Although we did not eat here, the food looked very good.
Thank you for the great review. We appreciate being a part of your trip. Cheers!
Spacious terrace overlooking Vancouver Harbour Marina and its adjacent mountain range. The food is reasonable pub grub, served in generous portions. Extensive range of craft beers and other beverages. Service is cheerful and swift.
Thank you so much for coming to visit! We appreciate the kind words and I hope that you join us again soon. Cheers!
It took 18 minutes for us to flag down an infrequent waiter/waitress to our area where we were seated. They felt bad and rushed to get our drink order. They took our food order and delivered it in short time fram only to disappear once...More
Hi Les, thank you for your feedback. I am sorry to see your 1 star score and I would love to contact you directly and make this right. If you are willing, please contact me at cditomaso@tapandbarrel.com. Thank you again.
5 star service, stellar food and great ambience. There were 4 adults and 4 children in our group that all gave a 2 thumbs up
Hey Chris! Thanks for the great review and such positive feedback. I'm glad all the kids had fun and I hope that the next time you and yours visit Coal Harbour that you can all drop by and enjoy the sun! Cheers.
I visited Tap and Barrel for dinner on a Tuesday night. I was seated right away and my server Aiden was excellent, checking on me often to ensure I was happy. The food was great!
Hi Freedom! Thank you for the great compliment for Aidan's service. He will read this tomorrow. We appreciate the time to drop by and visit and I hope that you get the chance to do it again in the near future. Cheers!
Not the best meal or experience I have had. Location is split up and we entered at the wrong door. Poorly marked and weirdly laid out. Food was less than appetizing and bathrooms smelled like urine. Couldn't wait to leave.
Hello, thank you for your feedback. I am sorry to see your 2 star rating and would love the chance to contact you directly. If you are willing, please email me at cditomaso@tapandbarrel.com. Thank you again.
About 40 of us went here for lunch, with a reservation of course. They put us in a private dining area. Food and drink orders came quick and was appropriately priced. Would eat here again.
Hi vacationaholic! I am very glad that you and your group enjoyed yourselves in the Barrel Room! Thank you for the kind words and I hope that you get the chance to visit Coal Harbour again soon. Cheers!
Went here during happy hour with family. Nella (spelling?) was our server and took care of us very well. We had a variety of dishes, some from the happy hour menu as well as the main menu. All the dishes were excellent! Enjoyed the ambience...More
Hi there, thank you for your review! We are so glad that you enjoyed your experience with us and that Nella gave you great service. We hope to see you again soon !
Having had an impromptu lunch here on my first day in North Vancouver, I went back on 2 other occasions for dinner. My final visit was on a Friday evening when the place was very busy, but I didn’t have too long a wait for...More
Thank you for the review! We are glad to hear you visited us on multiple occasions and hope to see you again next time you are in town !
Visiting my aunt and uncle in Burnaby , they told us they liked to come and eat here. They did not lie. It is a very nice authentic place , excellent food, we got the fish and chips with cod and halibut. And were helped...More
Thank you for the great feedback! We're so glad you had a great time with your family! We will share this with Fernando!
While various tables were not occupied, the staff asked us to join a line with waiting customers: ‘ it will only take a minute’. But nothing happened: the tables remained empty, the customers waited in line. And the staff? They were too busy to talk...More
Thank you for taking the time to give us your feedback. We apologize that you didn't have a positive experience with us and would like to hear more details regarding it. Please email us at shipyards@tapandbarrel.com. We hope to hear from you!
As usually very nice place , with delicious culinary, but the best is the service . This time, the service was offered in the front patio by Anna , very professional, courteous, diligent and customer service oriented. We had a great time and the cocktails...More
Thank you for the review! We are thrilled to hear you enjoyed your service by Anna and will be sure to pass this feedback along to her, to ensure she gets the recognition she deserves. We hope to see you in again soon for some...More
I usually really like this place but the food was so so salty tonight. I tried the new salmon from the fresh sheet and even without the parmesan, parts of the meal were inedible. The potatoes were greasy and salty - more like tater tots...More
Hi Jennifer, we are so sorry to hear that your experience was less than great. We have followed up with our back of house team in regards to this. If you are willing, we would love for you to contact us directly so that we...More
With 45 beers you have a choice to make. Food was good and menu not extensive. Busy restaurant but service was good. Nothing exceptional but a nice place to have a quick meal.
Thank you for the feedback! We hope you come by again soon!
The food is very good. Also, the service is very fast. the ambience is fantastic. The selection of beer is really excellent (maybe even too good😂).
Thank you for the review! We look forward to seeing you again!
Yano is a beauty, he is a great bartender, he helped me indulge in some refreshing libations and delectable food
Thank you for the great feedback! We will share your review with Yano! Hope we see you again soon.
Haven't eaten here in years after some disappointing experiences...and was pleasantly surprised! Haloumi Power bowl was delish , and burger/fries were tasty. Looks like they've stepped up their game, well done.
Thank you for the feedback! We're sorry to hear you've had past disappointing experiences but we are glad that your last visit has improved! We hope to see you again and hope you continue to have a positive time with us.
We often go there .The food is nice , not so expensive , the waiters are friendly and the prices affordable .A better option than Joey's .
Hi FabiolaOnAir480913, thank you for sharing your experience. We are so thrilled to hear you enjoyed our food and service experience. Looking forward to your next visit with us!
We ate outdoors as we had a pooch. The menu was just ok...what do you expect from a gastopub. Lots of deep fried choices. Fresh options were limited. The ciders and beers were local and appreciated. Our pooch was happy... tethered to the outside. Thankful...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave a review. We are happy to hear you enjoyed our patio with your dog and our local beers. We appreciate the feedback regarding our menu selection and will make sure to pass it along to our management...More
Having never stepped foot in Canada before we had about 12 usable hours in Vancouver on a layover between flights from USA back to home in Australia ...and we happily chose to spend at least three of them at Tap & Barrel enjoying the stunning...More
Thank you for the review! We're so happy to hear you had time to stop in and visit us. We hope you come back again whenever you come back to Vancouver!
Really good, simple pub style food. The location on the north shore is excellent and when busy the atmosphere here is great. Service was attentive and friendly
Thank you for the review David! Hope we see you again soon!
Just back from trip to Vancouver and found this great place right by the water.- staff fantastic and friendly especially - Lyle, David, Kenz, Dara Delayne Louise. Highly recommended and the best place in the sun to enjoy a few drinks and a wonderful view...More
Hi John, thank you for the great review! We are so happy you enjoyed the beautiful view and staff. Looking forward to your next visit with us!
Great place at LOLO. I just read a review of a guy who should not leave his house. He can buy a $9.00 bottle of wine and drink it at home. The price of the glass includes many things. You can also drink water. Our...More
Waitress was so much in a hurry we barely had time to order or say anything for that matter.Went there for happy hour and wanted to be seated near water side. Lots of tables but waitress said no, that area is closed till later. Ordered...More
Average menu . Nice location , good prices . Fish & Chips were not as good . Chowder was good and pudim was very good, sangria was not
We were there yesterday after watching a concert and I was with friends that I haven’t seen for a long time. Some were coming from the okanagan, and some in Prince George. We were a group of 9 people, and it seemed like the resto...More
I was at your restaurant yesterday and I have to mention how outstanding your staff is. Our server was friendly and attentive and another server noticed we needed some more tortilla chips and brought them before we could ask. This really impressed me and I wanted...More
Went here as a family. It was busy, on a weekend in spring break. They wrote our name down for a reservation. We waiting 45 min, walked back to the restaurant and our name wasn’t even on the list. Thankfully they were able to seat...More
We decided to have lunch at this location prior to attending an Arts Club play . Vancouver’s unusual extended summer weather made the experience all the more pleasurable. Our host named Calvin ushered us to the second floor by elevator & sat us in a...More
Hello Hroobie90, What a wonderful review to read! Thank you for taking the time to share your experience and the 5-star rating. We are so happy to hear that you had a wonderful experience from the front door to your amazing lunch. I will be...More
We went twice, and was pleasantly impressed both times. The restaurant has kind of a generic look to it, but all the food we ordered was fresh and top notch. The service was excellent as well. Would happily go for a third visit.More
Hello Glasbew, Thank you for taking the time to leave us your valued feedback and 5-star review! We are glad to hear that we were able to deliver on all aspects of your experience, from the service to your meals being thoroughly enjoyed. Thank you...More
We arrived for dinner on a Friday night. Ordered drinks and half rack of pork ribs. Drinks arrived, no problem, then the pork ribs. 5 of them with potato and corn salad and coleslaw. 5 ribs, really? We then ordered the squid which was very...More
Hello, Thank you for taking the time to leave us your valued feedback. Feedback allows us to provide top tier experiences for all of our guests. I will be sure to discuss the importance of value with my chef and culinary team. Great to hear...More
Oh what can we say. Great setting. Lots of people milling about, it was the weekend. The ""bar"" (what else do you call it) was extremely busy. Does no one cook at the weekend ? In the end we couldn't see it's appeal. Nothing actually...More
Hi Ali921, Thank you for taking the time to write a review regarding your experience with us. All feedback is appreciated as it allows us to ensure we are providing top tier experiences for all of our guests. I will be sure to pass along...More
Wonderful service from the staff. Incredible food. Great view of False Creek at night. Watched BC Place and the Science Building light up. Olympic Village was underwhelming, but this place made it all the better.
Stunning day to get on the patio for lunch (although the yellow umbrella wreaked havoc on photos). We had some of humboldt squid to start which was very well seasoned and crispy while juicy. Really enjoyed it! I was interested to try their pb&j burger…...More
They had 4 empty tables, 2 were sunny with view, but they sat us in the cold dark table at the back. When we asked to move, both waiters made no effort to accommodate. Waiter 1: I asked the manager, those other tables are reserved....More
Hi Tanya Im so sorry again to see about your experience with us last night. I would still love the opportunity to get in touch with you directly if you would be so kind as to send me an email at ngunn@tapandbarrel.com I would sincerely...More
The Tap & Barrel today rolled out its Dine Out Menus, available for a month from February 5 to March 7, also listed on its website. Its always enthusiastic & very friendly staff are excited by the various Dine Out menus, which range through Brunch,...More
Thanks so much for the incredible rating and the very thorough review! We sincerely appreciate the support and you taking the time to share us some love! Please reach out to me if you'd like a Dine-Out reservation and I'll ensure that you're added into...More
great location, trying hard in covid, good food and beer, friendly staff, outside heated well spread out, nice view,
Hi Joan, Thank you for taking the time to leave us such a great rating and review, hope to see you in again soon! Leya
After walking around False Creek and Granville Island, dinner on the patio at Tap and Barrel Bridges was a great way to round out the day. Our table right beside the marina was lovely. The service was friendly and quick, I was even offered a...More
My wife and I called in for a drink after exploring Granville Island. My wife has a hearing disability and relies on lip reading in order to have a conversation. After being seated our server approached, wearing a face mask. My wife politely asked our...More
Hi there, we are very sorry to hear about your experience and would like the opportunity to get in touch with you directly. Can you please send your contact information to feedback@tapandbarrel.com at your earliest convenience? Thank you in advance.
We stopped here for a late lunch following a whale watching excursion. Service was a little slow, but the food was delicious. Not being big into seafood, my spouse and I got burgers which we both agreed were better than what we've had elsewhere. The...More
If you want a beautiful location with horrible head pounding music on a patio (thumping bass and drums) go here. WE HATED IT. Inside the resto I get it, but on a gorgeous summer night, while the boats are returning, the seagulls are calling? There...More
Really excellent. Great view outside. Very friendly service. Good food and.big portions and great value. Thank you
Can’t miss this massive yellow building on Granville Island. The space is really big, inside and out, so you worry you might get forgotten but actually the service was really attentive. Big eats on offer and tasty. Bit of a premium paid for location maybe...More
We visited on May 31 2023. Great location to have lunch or dinner while you are at Granville Island. With the option to sit inside or out depending on the weather, you can't lose. The food and scenery are a great combination. The staff were...More
We needed something to eat after walking round the island and this place is an historic one . You get fantastic views of the bridge and the harbour whilst you relax and eat your food, Very good service and a good choice too
Stopped here for Brunch on a Sunday morning. I believe we got there shortly after they opened for the day, so we had no trouble getting a table. The place is HUGE. Two floors and a massive outdoor seating area. We sat outside by the...More
We visited here for drinks and dinner following a ver successful whale watching tour. We had not prebooked but did receive a very warm welcome and were shown to a table outside overlooking the harbour which was perfect. We had a few beers, Phillips, and...More
Delicious brunch. Double bacon benny and French toast with yuzu lemon curd were amazing! Service was great and the perfect way to start the day on Granville Island.
Yum! Stumbled upon this place and wow! Try the following: pbj burger, fried chicken Mac and cheese! Wait staff was friendly and engaging.
We have been coming to Bridges for years and really like the place. The food is decent, their drinks are excellent, and the patio and views across the bay are really great. On a recent Sunday, we had something to celebrate and wanted to go...More
Fabulous as always. It’s our go to for an appetizer and a glass of wine when visiting Vancouver. Fabulous service with Carson and Bethany looking after us. The tuna ceviche is fabulous. Ensure you secure a table outside. The view of the marina is second...More
Lousy over priced food. Long wait time for food and then fries were cold! I would not recommend this for anytime or any reason.",98,
Tartine Breads and Pies,"If you stop in for breakfast or a slice of pie, not only will you be spoilt for choice, but your tastebuds will thank you. However, the greatest treats on offer to my mind are the savoury pies. The chicken and mushroom was better than...More
Yummy pastry, friendly service, comfortable seating, free wi-fi, central location. Whatelse one can ask for...
We found this gem of a place the when we visited Vancouver last November, so naturally, after flying in again, it was our first stop after checking into our hotel. There's good reason the Turkey Delight is labeled as the #1 Best Seller, the flavour...More
I imagine this would be a popular place if you lived in the neighbourhood - we had butter tart and coffee and enjoyed both.
Really delicious and beautiful pies, all look very home made and the sandwiches are very good as well. Not a nice place to sit and rest.
Deservedly popular in the neighborhood, Tartine bills itself as a place for bread and pies, but it's more than that. Yes, the Raspberry Rhubarb Ginger Pie and Coconut Cream Pie are worth the calories, but you'll also find great sandwiches here, as well as other...More
We were staying less than a block away and opted to go here for breakfast one morning. I had the house made granola and banana and my wife had the breakfast sandwich with ham. Good caffeinated coffee, but decaf was weak. We also did a...More
Always fresh and the smell of the place when you walk in! You can buy pies and bread here that are very delicious. Also serves breakfast and lunch with limited amount of seating. Skip the Starbucks next door and go to Tartine for a good...More
We discovered this delightful bakery/ restaurant around the corner from our hotel in Vancouver and it became our preferred stop for breakfast for our 3 day stay. Three things made Tartine stand out for us: the welcoming and friendly staff and patrons, the freshly made...More
Our old go to pie shop was too far away and much more expensive, so we were glad to find this shop in the West End. They offer a large selection of pies by the slice to eat in or take away. They also offer...More
We walked in on a very rainy day to take shelter from the rain and to warm up. A very good selection if sweet and savoury foods, can recommend the avo toast.
A wonderful selection of pies and baking here. Clearly freshly baked with great skill. A lot of the baking looks as if Mom just made it! And tastes just as good. We popped in for a soup and sandwich just after 1 pm on a...More
Stopped in for lunch - great looking pies but we only had sandwiches, which were very good. beet vegetarian was given a thumbs up by my wife and i enjoyed the Turkey on wheat. Service was good but could have been better. I""m looking forward...More
I was doing a pick up of a sandwich and a soup. They were handing out these butter tarts for free for Canada Day. I asked the girl at the counter if I could get two instead since there is two of us. She was...More
We walked past and it was the smell of the pies that made me do a double take and have to come in. They smelt amazing! Grabbed a breakfast sandwich which was really tasty. Seems like a friendly busy place.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8838649-Reviews-Tartine_Breads_and_Pies-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Taste of Thai,"Great food and great service highly recommend if you are in the area ; a lovely hidden gem / with great home style cooking , super clean and reasonably priced
Had our dinner here. Amazing taste of food, just like real thai. Service is so friendly and they assist when ordering. You can avoid over ordering. Try their duck item, tom yum soup and iced milk tea.
We were 8 and had a great evening: all were very satisfied. Great specials, amazing BBQ fried chicken and red curry panaeng! Very affordable, and nice, warm service
We had a nice dinner with authentic thai food. We were asked about our preferences and had a friendly chat with the owner. Recommended!
Very cozy dining space, family owned restaurant. We tried different dishes and all of them were quite tasty.
This restaurant exudes friendliness and warmth. We come here ever few months, and the owner, Sam, knows our names and greets us warmly. We are made to feel like we are important to them in a way that few others do. The food here is...More
We have been to Taste of Thai numerous times ( before the days of my Yelping ), and finally am writing about this great little place!! Food is unquestionably one of the best Thai in Vancouver, and with the hospitality we receive every time from...More
We had another great meal and great service. Highly recommend this restaurant. The food comes piping hot and quickly.
What a great place for Thai food. This is a small restaurant where they can push tables together for a large group of 12. The service is always great and the food is to die for. You can have it as hot as you want...More
It’s a good thing we arrived early as the restaurant quickly filled up. We were there at 5 PM. Seated immediately. The young server who is a university student was just so wonderful. The male server was very accommodating. We tried the chicken with peanut...More
The food is always clean, well presented and delicious, but, last night they out did themselves! Simply Fabulous! I have eaten here a number of times and I have never been disappointed or let down. (The only issue I ever have, as with most Canadian...More
Have visited this restaurant several times for dinner. Very tasty food and great service. However the portions are too small for the price, and on top of that concern, the amount of meat included within each dish is scarce. We have stopped going here because...More
We have been meaning to check this place out, and I'm so glad that we did! This restaurant was very inviting, and the staff were friendly and attentive. We were there with our 15 month old. The staff went out of their way to make...More
We have been eating here for years now and it has improved with each passing year. And tonight it was outstanding! The special was Argentinian prawns and both the taste and the presentation were excellent. Every dish we had was prepared and presented with great...More
This establishment is close to our home so we visit quite often. Staff are extremely friendly, service is excellent and every dish we have ever had has been superb. Price is reasonable and if you have that special wine you like, corkage is only $15....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2687590-Reviews-Taste_of_Thai-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tasty Indian Bistro,"Great tasting food, staff very helpful explaining menu, good service and location in Yaletown, very popular, booking required.
We had a wonderful experience dining at this restaurant . I read the reviews and someone else suggested it we met chatting in Yaletown . We had an outside covered table with a nice candle dinner We ordered 1 order of Naan bread and rice...More
The food was great. and the portions were appropriate. I had the butter chicken and garlic naan bread. My friend had the saag paneer as well as vegetable samosas. Both of our meals were perfectly prepared and absolutely delicious. The restaurant atmosphere was lovely and...More
It's a shame that such as wonderful restaurant serves such terrible desserts that don't taste authentic. The masala chai is never consistent. It is different depending on who makes it and it is lacking in chai flavor and is very watery. I think the management...More
The meal started with a food stained napkin and silverware with food stuck to it put down at our table for my mother at the start of the meal. Some of the food was indeed tasty e.g. the tandoori prawns, the rest decent. The service...More
Made a reservation for the patio, which was cancelled 1 minute after time. A little disappointing considering there were tables available, and we were stuck in the line because of a slow host / hostess. Food was delicious, but service can improve. A bit expensive...More
This was a great find. The host was very welcoming and accommodating. The menu had all the classic Indian dishes, however they all seemed slightly elevated in presentation and taste. We had Veggie Samosas, Garlic Naan, Vegetable biryani, Coconut Shrimp curry and chili paneer. All...More
We loved the food. However the social evening was ruined because of very loud music. You couldn't even workout the type of music. It was just loud and chaotic. A soft indian music, like sitar, tabla or Bollywood songs would have been appreciated and allowed...More
Too 5 Best Indian restaurants that I have experienced. Will definitely return, I recommend that you make reservations. You cannot go wrong with anything that you order. Our Uber driver recommended it because his mother is from India, and she prefers this place over any...More
Trendy restaurant. Very loud music played and no Indian lagers on tap! If you are wanting to go somewhere different with a buzz then go here but if you want something to replicate your local Indian restaurant/takeaway then go elsewhere. Confused about ordering drinks
Wonderful waiter. Great concierges. We came late and ordered just plain saag, lamb korma and chicken tikka masala. Terrific. One in our party said they would just order the saag and a garlic naan and not share because it was so good! All the dishes...More
We went for my husband’s birthday and we are SO glad we did. The hostess, the servers, the entire staff were superb. Then, the food!! It was authentic Indian food served in a classy, fabulous fashion. The 4 of us were surprised in the best...More
I'm a regular customer at your restaurant and some of your lovely staff members know me. My business advisor who I normally come with loves your food. However, I have a serious issue with your desserts and masala chai. I don't mean to cause offence,...More
Very good food, excellent service- our waitress was very helpful and offered perfect recommendations! Will come again :) Only downside - huge TVs everywhere, unfortunately seems to be the standard for Canada and US
Just spend $500 for HBD and order hbd desert and they charged by full price for it , I get pandemic but when ppl spent that kind of coin , you should make good relations , I’m just saying , I’m Punjabi I would embarrassed...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15276897-Reviews-Tasty_Indian_Bistro-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tavola,"We were lucky to get a table on a busy Saturday evening. The service and food were fantastic. We would thoroughly recommend this lovely restaurant. It is in a lovely part of town too.
I used to like this place now I hate it. Food average at best and the man at the door was appalling. Stood and glared at us for a while then spit out, ""what do you want"". I said dinner and he stood for a...More
We could smell the beautiful food from our hotel and thought lets try it out. So glad we did as our food was top notch. Our waitress was awesome and really couldn’t do enough for us. I would recommend a choice of crostinis to start...More
The food and service and casual environment makes this place so welcoming each. We had the burrata, a salad, meat, pasta and dessert.
Small, quaint, luckily a local took us or we would never have noticed it. Easy atmosphere, laid back attitude from the staff, very relaxing climate all around. Decent wine menu, lots of cool drinks. Good dinner selection, really good appetizers, listen to what the staff...More
Fun, friendly, fantastic food! Asked to write a simple review, but have fill more to reach the minimum limit…eat here!!
For casual Italian dining this is really a fantastic place to go to share a meal with friends. Served family style they offer a really nice array of well done dishes crafted to delight your taste buds. Get their daily specials.
We were in Vancouver recently for a week's vacation, and our hotel was right next door to Tavola, so of course we had to try it. We were very happy we did, because it was terrific! The Chicken Liver Crostini with Port Onions was a...More
The food and service is great. We ordered a couple glasses of wine with the watermelon and feta salad, spaghetti pomodoro and their daily pasta special with morel mushrooms, pancetta, peas in a pesto sauce. Pannacotta was a lovely and tasty finish. Casual Italian family...More
Definitely order some of their daily specials and off the menu too. Great casual itialian food. The four of us ordered starters, salad, pasta and mains.
Overall, I've really come to love Tavola since moving to Vancouver 6 months ago. But it's an interesting mix of some truly outstanding dishes, and a few others that are just ok. The Burrata with prosciutto is to die for! Absolutely delicious prosciutto and well...More
Had a wonderful dinner at Tavola last week. The food is really delicious! We had the Paccheri Pulled Pork Ragu and the Cacio e Pepe spaghetti. Both were wonderful. In addition, we shared a large salad- also great. Sticky toffee pudding for dessert was fantastic...More
I had heard a lot of good things about the place but for the life of me I can't understand what all the fuss is about: Tavola is so so so average it should instead be named Taverage. Anyone that says otherwise must never have...More
Staff are lovely, professional and fun Other patrons are a good mix of the community Food is delicious and a good selection, Wine flowing if you wish! Always great evening to be had at Tavola. Don't forget to chat to those around you:)
High end price-wise, low end food-wise. Nice room with no atmosphere. I’d read so much about this restaurant and it’s next door to our highly recommended Times Square Suites hotel. I’ve never had such bad Italian food. Waiters were nice.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2707192-Reviews-Tavola-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Teahouse in Stanley Park,"We weren't quite sure what to expect from a ""teahouse"" in a public park, but it exceeded all our expectations. The food was excellent, the service outstanding, and the prices were very reasonable for the quality and quantity. We shared the stuffed mushroom appetizer and...More
We had the best experience at Teahouse! We were seated with a beautiful view of the water and the landscaping made for great ambiance. We were helped by Noura and Regan. Regan provided my husband and I with fantastic recommendations and we were both so...More
My wife and I had an excellent brunch on Sunday at the teahouse. Such a beautiful setting. Food was great. The service was great. The whole experience was really nice. Highly recommend.
I attended a wedding couple of weeks ago and I had one of the best meals. When my family visited me from out of town, we had dinner there. The whole experience was amazing; the food, the ambience, and the service. A big shout out...More
My sister and I came to the Teahouse to celebrate Eid. The food was delicious and the staff were very friendly. Special thanks for Noura and Escarlett for making our dining experience at the Teahouse very special!! They treated us for a dessert for our...More
First time visiting the Teahouse at Stanley park and I absolutely recommend it! The ambience is beautiful, the food is delicious, and their staff are very accommodating. Special thanks to Noura and Escarlett for making our experience one of a kind! They were both very...More
We arrived in Vancouver after a very long day travelling from the U.K. … We dashed to the restaurant as we were running slight late and what an wonderful reception we were given. The waiting staff and management especially John was attentive and the food...More
Location and food was great but our server john was exceptional. Fast attentive service while with great conversation. Excellent customer service john 👍
Having been there a few times, I chose to go again, was there for our son's Birthday and our meals were average, not to the standard we expected from previous experience. My wife had the Steelhead, it was fine but served with potato wedges with...More
Thank you for taking the time to provide us with your feedback. I apologize your experience fell short of your expectations and our standards. Our General Manager would greatly appreciate the opportunity to follow up with you. If convenient, please forward this full review along...More
Unbelievable service by every person encountered at the Teahouse. We had brunch with our one year old and all staff were extremely accommodating. Noura went above and beyond keeping our little one entertained with smiles and conversing with him every chance she had. He adored...More
Thanks to Noura and Damion for the amazing service. Friendly and smiling the whole time. The food was amazing and the drinks were great especially the table water. (That’s for Noura 😉)
Ordered the waffles they were delicious. Service was amazing Noura with Regan and Danion treated us very kindly and gave us an amazing experience.
Excellent service! Noura took care of us greatly the best service I've experienced in Vancouver. We ordered the lobster bisque it was very tasty
Beautiful setting and amazing food.! Tucked into Stanley Park, the Teahouse was recommended by family living in the area. We were so impressed with the menu and the staff. The food was amazing and locally sourced, and our server John F was a highlight and...More
I had not been to the restaurant for a long time x Pleasantly surprised at the quality. Service was good",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1596877-Reviews-Teahouse_in_Stanley_Park-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Temaki Sushi,"I went here because it was close to where I'm staying this trip. They were very busy....(The sushi bar in the same block was near empty)..I didn't understand why they were blowtorching all the fish I ordered..did'nt fully cook but a totally unnecessary step in...More
Had lunch here for the first time based on TA reviews. Seated quickly despite not having a reservation. Nice clean ambiance with separated tables. Everything we had was fabulous! Very artistically presented dishes, fresh ingredients. Attentive service. Would definitely recommend.
I can't believe I've never been here. Temaki Sushi has been serving the locals since 1993. We arrived without a reservation, but we're seated right away. The service was impeccable, the food was beautifully presented and delicious. My friend had the Gomae, Veggie Tempura and...More
Our party of 4 had a reservation and we were seated fairly quickly. The decor is beautiful! I enjoyed watching the brilliant chefs making our food fresh at the sushi bar. Quality and taste of food were just superb. Service was incredibly welcoming, friendly, and...More
Highly recommend reserving omakase! They always go above and beyond what's expected to make sure you have a great meal. With excellent service and amazing food, you can not go wrong! I always look forward to the next visit!
The restaurant was super clean and maintained. The tables are separated by plexi which was appreciated. Food was ok. Nothing stood out as fantastic. Not sure if we would return.
Excellent food, large portions and the price is quite reasonable. We really enjoyed the staff. Overall, I wonderful experience.
My husband and I have been coming to this restaurant for the past 16 years and it has always been really good. But last night, we experienced awesome. At my husband's suggestion, we decided to order the Omakaze which is the tasting menu in Japanese....More
Easily worth the price. The entire staff were incredibly kind, helpful, and welcoming. The sushi was thoughtfully prepared by our master chef, Hilary. I've eaten at Michelin starred sushi restaurants around the world and I must say Temaki is just as impressive! Looking forward to...More
Ive been a regular for years and have high regard for the normal quality and consistency. But tonight's takeout order was awful . Smelly Ikura ( salmon egg) nigiri, cold chicken teriyaki and veggies but warm tempura. They can do so much better . Tonite...More
We had a smorgasbord of food for take out. We shared gomae, veggie gyoza, sunshine roll, and Tamago. They were all tasty, delicious, and nicely prepared. My wife had chicken teriyaki and I had a sockeye don and negitoro maki roll. All were yummy and...More
Five of us came here for dinner. We ordered a variety of foods, but primarily cooked only because our dinner companions preferred cooked items. Everything was good.
The restaurant is quite spacious and the sashimi is fresh and yummy. Must try its shell fish big sashimi boat, 30 pieces and look very attractive.
A little more expensive than other places, but the quality more than makes up for the difference in cost. Always a go-to location for sushi
I was visiting Vancouver for a month and I didn't doubt in coming to this place 3 times. There ir hardly a better sushi place in town.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d797299-Reviews-Temaki_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Templeton Restaurant,"Came here for breakfast and had the vegan tofu scrambler, which was delivious and huge. The diner itself is very cool and definitely a vibe.
A nice variety of food, with good vegetarian and vegan options. I like the traditional interior with its roadside diner feel. Free refills on the coffee and pretty generous portion sizes as well. Not the most glamorous meal in the world, but it’s great value...More
We were hesitant with location but wow so glad we went. This place is small and very cool. Great service, great coffee, great food! Eggs B very good! Reasonable prices too... they aren't stingy on the food!
Hiked here from the harbor based in Trip Advisor recommendations. Tiny place but we were able to be seated in about 5 minutes. Great food and reasonable prices. I had eggs Benedict with a side of poutine. ( I am American where we have no...More
Amazing brunch and great vibe!!! The service was super friendly and fast! Prices great and location fabulous!
Great place to visit in Vancouver. Good menu and sized portions. Breakfast was nice and service was prompt. Well recommended place to visit.
Opened in 1934?! So awesome! Check out the Naugahyde-seat booths and jukebox atmosphere. You have to walk through the tiny kitchen to get to the single bathroom; so authentic and cool. Prices are good, food tastes great and the staff are friendly and genuine. We...More
After our order was taken it took an hour to get served. The cook appears to be making only one order at a time. So if you are unemployed, on vacation, or homeless this is the right place for you.
Went for breakfast on our last day in Vancouver. We had noticed people queuing the day before and so I researched and thought we had to try it. We got there at 8:20 so 10 minutes before they open and there was already a queue...More
Went for breakfast on our last morning in Vancouver, and we were not disappointed. Lovely little diner with a nice menu and lovely staff. I had toast with avocado and poached eggs and a side of bacon, my husband had the farmers breakfast…both were delicious....More
I had breakfast at a different restaurant every morning and The Templeton wins on all three flavour, service and pricing. There's a few great restaurants in Vancouver but this one takes first place for me. If you only get one breakfast in downtown Vancouver, make...More
Found this little gem while looking for some cheap eats in Vancouver. Menu offers typical diner fare with some unique offerings. Try the pancakes and pulled pork (trust me, it's great) or the whiskey expresso milkshake. Prices are great and cool diner atmosphere.
We queued outside to get in but it was worth the wait. Old school diner style and delicious breakfasts and milkshakes. Loved it!
We didn't know what to expect, and were looking for a larger place, but it is what it says it is - an American style diner. Excellent food, excellent ambiance and felt comfortable being there.
Atmosphere great...sixties style dinner. Food was excellent as was the service. Our attentive, friendly server, Yannic(k)? improved the experience with her warm smile and prompt attention.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710098-Reviews-Templeton_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tenen,"I had the cabbage roll dinner. The portion was very good and the flavours were nice. The ambiance of this restaurant is great. Old trinkets, pins and photos. Classic.
My second visit, few years apart, atmosphere and food still Very good! This time we went as a family. Very good and delicious. The meat platter was extravagant… we ate leftovers for lunch today. The roast lamb we tender and sauce was very tasty. Am...More
Not long ago, October 1, we were invited to dinner at your restaurant. Before that, we had the pleasure of visiting you at once and eating cevapi. In this time everything was very tasteless there. The chicken soup turned out to be insipid, not transparent,...More
We ordered take away and the food was on time. large portions. if you are not people with a huge appetite and in a group- you might opt to order less and share. we had lots of leftover. the food is good, we tried the...More
My husband and I tried Tenen for the first time via skip the dishes a couple of nights ago and had a fabulous meal. We ordered the Traditional Meze For Two, a Shopska salad, and the Tenen Meat Platter for one. There was a variety...More
It is one of the best restaurants. You feel very welcomed. Service and food absolutely perfect. Good for any occasion - Birthday party or business lunch.
Really delicious foods and very attentive service. We absolutely loved it. We will definitely go back and try different dishes.
We've coming for lunch and dinner at Ten, our neighborhood Balkan restaurant. Food is extremely well prepared and delicious. Huge portions. Enough for another meal, no joke. Excellent attentive service. Couldn't be happier. Sorry about pics. We were hungry (late lunch) and the food smelled...More
Have been here dozens of times and the food here is incredibly tasty, great bang for your buck, great service, and really nice owners.
Excellent service. Delicious food. Great prices. Huge portions. I will definitely be back to try the rest of their tasty creations!
Came here Sunday lunch with family , four of us. Constant flow of customers, got the meat platter for two, roast lamb and the log schnitzel stuff with cheese. Everything taste home made and good. Couldn’t finish it cause the serving are huge good for...More
We visited this restaurant on a mid week evening. We ordered and meat platter and a plate of cabbage rolls and a bowl of goulash. All three plates were delicious. The meat platter had a variety of meats and we enjoyed everyone especially chicken kebab....More
Cozy, family restaurant with interesting decor. The lights are fairly low though, so it is hard to see all the old items from Yugoslavia on the wall. The food is generously portioned, deliciously flavoured, and reasonably priced. Service is very friendly and helpful, albeit a...More
We live in the area and my son told us about this place last night. Wish he would have told us sooner. Man can't believe we've missed this. This will become our new place for comfort food. Love the atmosphere, the folks running the place...More
We enjoyed a fine dinner at this ex-Yugoslav restaurant. Portions are generous, quality is high, dishes are authentic, and service is also excellent and helpful. I strongly suggest you reserve, especially for larger group. Worth a detour/visit.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d8834742-Reviews-Tenen-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Terra Breads Granville Island Bakery,"Great selection of fresh, tasty breads and pastries with good, efficient service. I was a big hit at a dinner party for bringing the rosemary loaf, which they sliced for me before I left!
Very unprofessional, and rude staff! No one was smiling, they ask for payment right away! The girl slams the bread in the box!
When we arrive at Granville Island looking for baked goods to purchase while we enjoy sitting at our table location on the upper Landing to view False Creek activities, we always choose this bakery and today we selected a croissant, a scone and a muffin…top...More
I was very impressed by their pastry and cookies. Each bite made me appreciate the magic of a great baker more.
Carbs, carbs and more carbs, but I must say that the peach tart was to die for! I would come back again and again just for the tart. My DH loved it and wanted to try more items but we had to move along. :)
We stopped for a little snack in the middle of Granville Island’s bustling Public Market. The almond croissant is as good as I have had anywhere.
We came here and grabbed an assortment of baked goods for breakfast the next morning. We had the chocolate croissant, salted caramel bread pudding, cranberry and pumpkin scones. Everything was delectable. 10/10 would recommend.
cones are usually not my favorite kind of baked goods. The ones from Terra Breads are an exception. We walked by their place at Granville Island Public Market, and everything in their display looked great. Being that I already had my hands full with all...More
A quick lunch required so into Wild Terra Bakery for a sausage roll and an apple turnover. Both delicious and most enjoyable. Highly recommend.
Personal choices include interesting small buns for sandwiches, the croissants are also good but a bit more expensive than others.
It is best bread shop on Granville island. They make fresh peach and blueberry pies. I recommend peach pie. They are expensive probably due to location on Granville island. It’s worth a try.
Mini pizza was very bland but the chocolate croissant was delish! Would definitely return. Good prices too
This is a must visit in the market. We can recommend the parmesan and chive scones as they were superb and also the salted caramel focaccia. However everything looked delicious !
If you like granola to sprinkle on your yoghurt or cereal, this stuff is really good and not as sweet or sugary as some. Full of nuts and seeds and other healthy things, it is the best granola we have ever bought and we’ve tried...More
We happily tried several items. The Hot Cross Buns were delightful, the fig and anis bread is great with cheese or toasted and the cinnamon pecan caramel bun was excellent. The sweet pastries were not overly sugary so we could really enjoy the flavors. A...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12399505-Reviews-Terra_Breads_Granville_Island_Bakery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Thai Away Home,"When visiting Vancouver, you should check out this gorgeous location. Even though it was early in the year and lacked much colour, it was still quite beautiful to explore. In the summer, the rose gardens will be radiant. I explored the routes for an hour,...More
Ordered it through ubereats. No prawns, bean sprouts and cilantro in my order. Contacted the restaurant who said to deal with Uber eats, and Uber eats said they can’t do anything. Bad customer service by the restaurant. Can’t recommend.
The pad Thai was okay but the glass noodle salad was “off”, maybe from being next to the hot dishes? The menu said it had “prawns” in it, there was ONE. Had this meal delivered but wasn’t impressed, I’ve eaten in at the restaurant before...More
This is unequivocally the best and most authentic Thai food I’ve had in North America. As an Aussie who’s previously lived in Thailand, I’m extremely excited when I find a genuinely lovely Thai restaurant. The dishes are quintessential Thai favourites, made fresh and fast, and...More
I have been eating here three days in a row now. Food is great, service also. Tastes just like in Thailand.
We were hungry and overwhelmed with optionson Granville, and although in a slightly less desirable neighbourhood (sometimes) the cute small shop had two young men working and immediately smiled and welcomed us. Another group of four was dining in as well, and many many to...More
Stopped by for a quick lunch, prompt service, fresh food. Staff friendly and helpful. Lunch specials for $7.98, included appie, salad, rice and entree.
Small Thai restaurant in Vancouver. Food are good and I could say authentic Thai food, staff are friendly
We stayed at Sheraton Wall and wanted a place to eat that was not in the hotel. A short walk got us here. Food was quite tasty with fresh ingredients. If you need a very fancy spot where food is secondary, go elsewhere. Good service....More
It was good Thai food, nothing memorable but more than decent. I honestly tried better Thai places in Vancouver though. Servings could be more generous and the sweet and sour veggies were a little bit tasteless.
Stopped for lunch. Had the green papaya salad and fried calamari. The salad was light and fresh. Just the right amount of heat. The calamari were tender and the breading crispy. The menu had a decent selection. The place was full, but the food was...More
We were staying across the road and happened upon this restaurant. Since we had been on the road for some 2 weeks, we were craving spicy Asian food. This place served home style genuine Thai food at a very reasonable price. Very good value for...More
Got a takeway for four of us. Ready when we expected it to be the waitress/server carefully checked everything we ordered was in the bag. We cleaned it up pretty quickly
I went here last weekend with my boyfriend after walking through Stanley Park. We got a table no problem, and the staff were very friendly. He got Calamari Rings and Thai Coconut Soup, and I got the Pad Thai (without prawns but chicken instead). The...More
This is a small cafe style place with simple tables and a no frills decor but the food is really good. Som Tam and Laab, two of my favourite Thai dishes were fresh and spicy. Portions of noodle soup were enormous and delicious and there...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5103007-Reviews-Thai_Away_Home-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Thai Basil,"Small local authentic thai restaurant ( saw a lot of locals made take away ). with very tasty meals in not expensive price.
I used to love their dishes, quality ingredients tasty flavour, reasonable prices. I ordered a Tom Yum soup to go for lunch and I was shocked when I took the first sip. It was thin, salty, there was no depth of flavours in the broth......More
6 years ago I wrote about how good this place is, or as I now have to say ""was"". The curries have thinned out and become bland soup. The ""medium spiced"" entrees are bland, essentially without any spice. The restaurant itself is still staffed by...More
They advertise their meat as chicken, but there is no mistaking that it’s turkey meat. Makes it taste funky. Also their Pad Thai made with(ketcup not Tamrind) As Chef Jet Tila says, “Don’t don’t don’t use ketcup. They aren’t the same flavor profile, ones tart...More
This is a quick place to have Thai food. Very tasty, you can sit or take out. The red curry with pumpkin and chicken is my go to dish. But I did just try the pad se ew with tofu, which is now a very...More
This a small but very busy food joint near our hotel. People do come and go for the to go food orders. Not so stylish place but food are good and freshly cook & fast in their kitchen as you order them. We ordered their...More
Very delicious menu items, veggie options for most items Friendly service. Reasonable time to be served. Clean. My daughter has tried their other location on West Broadway and found it be very good as well.
I was looking for a cheap eat which would be filling - that is certainly delivered on. The food was quick to come by for a Saturday afternoon. I went with a tofu pineapple fried rice for $5.95. It was a bit too salty and...More
Absolutely fantastic Thai food at a very affordable price. Just delicious! Would thoroughly recommend
Great little hole-in-the-wall restaurant. Limited seating but the kitchen and turnaround is quick. The green curry was nice, not too spicy but some kick (I must admit, I do like it spicier but didn't know how spicy it came - next time I'll ask to...More
A disappointing evening, I ordered take out from here and called up as my starter was missing and everything was cold... highly unexpected. They didn’t believe that it actually was cold and seemed to be under the impression that I was lying. They suggested that...More
Always have a good lunch at Thai basil. Their lunch specials are affordable and delicious. Would recommend to anyone!
The food is really good there, we order very often with my bf and we really love it ! I tried some other thai in Vancouver and I was really disappointed but this one is very similar with the food in Thailand. It's really tasty...More
We have been frequenting this neighborhood eatery for a while and have recently noticed the dishes are smaller and have less of a more expensive ingredient. The last time we ordered the lychee curry there was only one lychee! Also the take out quantity has...More
We were looking for something new and saw this place. Very small - just a few tables, but quite busy with eat in and takeout orders. Quick to get our food and very tasty - nice flavours.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1553843-Reviews-Thai_Basil-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Thai Cafe,"We happened upon this place and we are so glad we did. Excellent food and service. The best part the was green curry. If you have a chance to visit this place, please do!
We have lived in the neighborhood for several years and this Thai food reminds us our time inThailand. It's super fresh ingredients and wonderful blending of Thai spices is thoroughly enjoyable. Our favorites are the Panang Curry, Pad Thai and Swimming Rama. The spring rolls...More
Pleasantly surprised by this non descript place. Was wanting next door place to eat but was closed. This looked very clean so decided to try. We ordered chicken green curry and jasmine rice to share. My son ordered a soup he had heard about. Was...More
1st time to try Thai Café, as our family was looking forward to some authentic Thai food for a special birthday celebration! Delivery was on time, and the food was kept warm in an insulated bag. Delivery person had good Covid practices - wore a...More
Great service and great food. Loved the yellow curry. Salad rolls are also a favorite. Will be back.
We come here very couple of months and are never disappointed. The staff always remember me and even remember that I am gluten free. It is a wonderful place within walking distance of where I live. I always have the pad Thai which is my...More
We have frequently visited Thai Café for the last few years decided we wanted to have thai and it was horrible. We gave it one star because the service was attentive and prompt. We ordered the pate with chicken and noodles were all soggy that...More
Unplanned visit with a very hungry crew met with fast, friendly service and fantastic food to boot! We will eat here again.
Second time here in a couple of weeks and is alright by me. Both times it was to go, first time was their pineapple rice with pork which was awfully yummy though I've never had it before so can't compare. But they forgot to add...More
I've been to this cafe before and the food was good so I thought I'd try something different and ordered the roasted duck curry. This was a mistake. There was very little duck in this dish and what there was was practically inedible. There were...More
Thai Cafe Restaurant is a place I have been wanting to go to for years. I ordered the Pad Thai with prawns (my favourite) and asked for super mild. It looked authentic enough to me. Clearly they used tamarind paste and palm sugar which was...More
I like Thai food and this is good. Not the same tastes as the one down the street, so easy to go to both frequently if you wanted.
Six of us came here for dinner based on a recommendation from a family member. A few of us have hearty appetites and found portions of all the dishes to be on the petite side. We ordered two appetizers - spring rolls (got 4 rolls)...More
Very tasty chicken pad Thai and fresh rolls. The food arrived promptly, it was hot and delicious! Highly recommend.
We ordered three dishes: Shrimp Pad Thai (it was tasty but had exactly three prawns on it, At $12 this is poor value) Mixed Vegetables (strong taste of unfriend garlic, cheapest vegetables possible cut unprofessionally like large pieces of onion and large pieces of cabbage...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4550853-Reviews-Thai_Cafe-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Thai House Restaurant,"The place did not look very clean and that should have been my first clue. Service was terrible. The Pad Thai was a lump of rice noodles stuck together with a bland sour sauce and shrimp on top. If I hadn’t been so hungry I...More
The place did not look very clean and that should have been my first clue. Service was terrible. The Pad Thai was a lump of rice noodles stuck together with a bland sour sauce and shrimp on top. If I hadn’t been so hungry I...More
We had ordered a few items from the Thai House North Vancouver for Valentine's day, including Pad Khing, butterfly prawns, and sweet and sour chicken. I am guessing the restaurant might have undergone new management (I'm not 100% sure) as the food did not taste...More
We had ordered a few items from the Thai House North Vancouver for Valentine's day, including Pad Khing, butterfly prawns, and sweet and sour chicken. I am guessing the restaurant might have undergone new management (I'm not 100% sure) as the food did not taste...More
I lived in Bangkok for 15 years. The dishes I've had here are really close. This was my first time eating in the restaurant, having only ordered in before. The inside is really nice. The service was very good, and the lunch deal sets are...More
I lived in Bangkok for 15 years. The dishes I've had here are really close. This was my first time eating in the restaurant, having only ordered in before. The inside is really nice. The service was very good, and the lunch deal sets are...More
The chicken satay here is great. However, the service requires improvement. Water was not provided, the wrong dish was given, the waiters are not friendly, they didn’t check up on us at all during our time there. I’d completely understand if it was busy but...More
The chicken satay here is great. However, the service requires improvement. Water was not provided, the wrong dish was given, the waiters are not friendly, they didn’t check up on us at all during our time there. I’d completely understand if it was busy but...More
Have not had Thai food for while ,after a nice long biking around North . Vancouver ,so we decide drop in to the Thai House for dinner ,( because I have a $100 gift card from X'mas ,) they open 11.30am to2 pm for lunch...More
Have not had Thai food for while ,after a nice long biking around North . Vancouver ,so we decide drop in to the Thai House for dinner ,( because I have a $100 gift card from X'mas ,) they open 11.30am to2 pm for lunch...More
I order a stir fry dish from them and they totally messed up my order. basically i just received rice noodle with tomato sauce and maybe 2 pieces of beef. I had to throw it out. when i called them, they rudely didnt accept their...More
I order a stir fry dish from them and they totally messed up my order. basically i just received rice noodle with tomato sauce and maybe 2 pieces of beef. I had to throw it out. when i called them, they rudely didnt accept their...More
Went there for dinner last night. Both dishes we ordered arrived at our table cold and had to be cooked again. Service not attentive at all, not sure how they have received so many awards as posted on their walls. Never again.
Went there for dinner last night. Both dishes we ordered arrived at our table cold and had to be cooked again. Service not attentive at all, not sure how they have received so many awards as posted on their walls. Never again.
This place is a very commercialized Thai house and pricey. It is like a Thai food with chinese or western touch to it. I am never going back. Portion is good though.
This place is a very commercialized Thai house and pricey. It is like a Thai food with chinese or western touch to it. I am never going back. Portion is good though.
I worked for this company at their first location on Robson when they first opened in 1986. It was amazing then but now even more so. Fresh flavours. Great service. Thank you!
I worked for this company at their first location on Robson when they first opened in 1986. It was amazing then but now even more so. Fresh flavours. Great service. Thank you!
At this restaurant I was pleasantly surprised that you can get good food at a very reasonable price. My wife and our friends were all pleased with the menu items we chose for our dinner selection. The prawn meal I selected had a very flavourable...More
At this restaurant I was pleasantly surprised that you can get good food at a very reasonable price. My wife and our friends were all pleased with the menu items we chose for our dinner selection. The prawn meal I selected had a very flavourable...More
Best place to come for gluten free & dairy free options. Enjoyed a Singha beer and a variety of amazing dishes! Brought us right back to Thailand. Allen was our server and was very attentive and knowledgeable, some of the best service I’ve had at...More
Best place to come for gluten free & dairy free options. Enjoyed a Singha beer and a variety of amazing dishes! Brought us right back to Thailand. Allen was our server and was very attentive and knowledgeable, some of the best service I’ve had at...More
My husband and I enjoyed a lunch special here for $9.95 includes salad, vegetable spring roll and entree. Service was excellent as was the food.
My husband and I enjoyed a lunch special here for $9.95 includes salad, vegetable spring roll and entree. Service was excellent as was the food.
We went to the Thai House for a late dinner. They were very busy but we were able to get a nice booth. Very attentive service a nice change. Food is best Thai I have had in a while. I would recommend this restaurant.
We went to the Thai House for a late dinner. They were very busy but we were able to get a nice booth. Very attentive service a nice change. Food is best Thai I have had in a while. I would recommend this restaurant.
After three amazing weeks in Canada went here for our last meal . Restaurant spacious & sat in booth seat . Staff very friendly & enjoyed speaking to the manager about our trip. The food was delicious we had the combo starter , green Thai...More
After three amazing weeks in Canada went here for our last meal . Restaurant spacious & sat in booth seat . Staff very friendly & enjoyed speaking to the manager about our trip. The food was delicious we had the combo starter , green Thai...More
Had a Thai salad roll and the red curry. Good level of spice. Really tasty. Friendly staff. Would go back
Had a Thai salad roll and the red curry. Good level of spice. Really tasty. Friendly staff. Would go back
We were pleasantly surprised by the quality and quantity of the food, at a very reasonable price. And the service was unmatched.
We were pleasantly surprised by the quality and quantity of the food, at a very reasonable price. And the service was unmatched.
Very good we loved the yellow curry chicken and rice and enjoyed our afternoon lunch ! I would recommend this place over any other Thai food restaurant on the north shore
Very good we loved the yellow curry chicken and rice and enjoyed our afternoon lunch ! I would recommend this place over any other Thai food restaurant on the north shore
Dropped by Thai House for dinner on a Monday night, it peaked our interest as many other restaurants were closed around the area. Atmosphere - a lot of decorations and interesting wood work inside the restaurant. They’ve a wall lined with booths as well as...More
Dropped by Thai House for dinner on a Monday night, it peaked our interest as many other restaurants were closed around the area. Atmosphere - a lot of decorations and interesting wood work inside the restaurant. They’ve a wall lined with booths as well as...More
The food was filling but not so good. Thai are masters of subtle flavours working together in beautiful harmonies. This was not.
The food was filling but not so good. Thai are masters of subtle flavours working together in beautiful harmonies. This was not.
Great service, good food and nice atmosphere. Consistent! WAlking distance to three Hotels and the Sea Bus sysytem to Vancouver. Good menu selections and ""specials"" See you next trip!
Great service, good food and nice atmosphere. Consistent! WAlking distance to three Hotels and the Sea Bus sysytem to Vancouver. Good menu selections and ""specials"" See you next trip!
We went here for a family lunch and were very disappointed. We ordered the soup and it was served luke warm. The chicken in the soup was very stale and there was a lot of added sugar. We also ordered the lunch special the Thai...More
We went here for a family lunch and were very disappointed. We ordered the soup and it was served luke warm. The chicken in the soup was very stale and there was a lot of added sugar. We also ordered the lunch special the Thai...More
I’m not a fan of spicy food, but you can choose your level of “heat” at this restaurant. We ordered four dishes, plus rice, for the three of us and there was plenty. Even brought home some leftovers. Shared a half litre of wine and...More
I’m not a fan of spicy food, but you can choose your level of “heat” at this restaurant. We ordered four dishes, plus rice, for the three of us and there was plenty. Even brought home some leftovers. Shared a half litre of wine and...More
I had a great meal that I ordered from Skip the Dishes in September. The food was awesome but I found a staple in my pad Thai. This could have been really dangerous if I had I ingested it but luckily I found it before....More
I had a great meal that I ordered from Skip the Dishes in September. The food was awesome but I found a staple in my pad Thai. This could have been really dangerous if I had I ingested it but luckily I found it before....More
I would highly recommend this Thai restaurant! My family and I really enjoyed the food and they have a good bar too. The portions are large and great for sharing. We got a little bit of everything and was not disappointed! One notable thing about...More
I would highly recommend this Thai restaurant! My family and I really enjoyed the food and they have a good bar too. The portions are large and great for sharing. We got a little bit of everything and was not disappointed! One notable thing about...More
I've been here several times and have always enjoyed the food and ambiance. The staff are very helpful too. In the back they have a private room for groups, and we have gone there with our tennis group [8 people]. The staff was very helpful...More
I've been here several times and have always enjoyed the food and ambiance. The staff are very helpful too. In the back they have a private room for groups, and we have gone there with our tennis group [8 people]. The staff was very helpful...More
Its a good Thai restaurant especially when you use the 2 for 1 Entertainment Book coupon. Are there better Thai Restaurants? Sure there are. But the Thai House is clean, modern and has great service.
Its a good Thai restaurant especially when you use the 2 for 1 Entertainment Book coupon. Are there better Thai Restaurants? Sure there are. But the Thai House is clean, modern and has great service.
The Pad Thai with seafood (shrimps) was not cooked as I know it from Thailand. The size of the portion was okay and even the amount of shrimps was good, but the red sauce seemed to be just ketchup. So here the evaluation is bad....More
The Pad Thai with seafood (shrimps) was not cooked as I know it from Thailand. The size of the portion was okay and even the amount of shrimps was good, but the red sauce seemed to be just ketchup. So here the evaluation is bad....More
Dated place but still provide fair deals on lunches. Good curries, but skip the pad thai, nothing like Thai padthai (tomato sauce). Service not organised (been asked 3 times our order by 3 different waiter) and no high chairs.
Dated place but still provide fair deals on lunches. Good curries, but skip the pad thai, nothing like Thai padthai (tomato sauce). Service not organised (been asked 3 times our order by 3 different waiter) and no high chairs.
Lunch time has good deal here. Service is good like many Thai restaurants. This place is not individual own so food taste is not so authentic like you get in Thailand but taste okay.
Lunch time has good deal here. Service is good like many Thai restaurants. This place is not individual own so food taste is not so authentic like you get in Thailand but taste okay.
I had traditional Pad Thai and a Mango Colada for lunch. A spring roll was served as an appetizer, with a dipping sauce and a side of lettuce topped with an almost clear dressing. I could not name the flavor of the dressing and it...More
I had traditional Pad Thai and a Mango Colada for lunch. A spring roll was served as an appetizer, with a dipping sauce and a side of lettuce topped with an almost clear dressing. I could not name the flavor of the dressing and it...More",60,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d709623-Reviews-Thai_House_Restaurant-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Thai Pudpong Restaurant,"Solid Thai food. Nothing extraordinary, but I've been here a few times and it has never disappointed. Service is fast, their red curry is decent. Not a place I'd go out of the way for, but a good option if you're in the neighbourhood and...More
Ordered take out on a whim. Delivered within 12 minutes. Hit the spot perfectly - we had veggie Phad Thai, chicken Phad Khing, and green curry with rice. Yum!
This place should be at least a 4.5/5. Very delicious food prepared with authentic ingredients by a thai chef. Highly recommend
We have eaten in and had “TAKE Away” for years and with Social Distancing we were ready for a Treat again tonight and as usual Thai Pudpong was Great!! We’ve had Vegetarian Spring Rolls (they snuck an extra one in); Red Curry Chicken, (spicy requested...More
enroute to the ferry after a doc appt. and a wonderful walk in ambleside. we had phoned before opening hours of 5:00 and were told of course you can order. walked along the street, very attractive, lots of fun shops. picked up our order and...More
We have eaten in and had “TAKE Away” for years and with this Social Distancing we were ready for a Treat last night and as usual Thai Pudpong was Great!! We had Vegetarian Spring Rolls (they snuck an extra one in); Red Curry Chicken, (which...More
My family decided to stop in based on the reviews, and especially with less folks dining out, wanted to support the local business. Service seated us immediately and was attentive. We ordered the spring rolls, panaeng curry and vegetable pad thai. The spring rolls came...More
Delicious food, friendly staff, reasonable prices. We get take out dinners from Thai pudpong regularly .
Food was very tasty until we saw a mouse run across the floor. Very disappointed, as my daughter and son-in-law were so looking forward to an evening out. Both are under the weather today with upset tummies.
This little gem is like a mini trip to Thailand. Food is authentic, your choice of hotness. Service is great and ambiance perfectly Thai! We'll be back! We brought friends who in Thailand for 3 years, they loved it too! We'll all be back!!!
Had hot and sour soup which was ok.. but the shrimp (they call them prawns) were not good.. were obviously frozen.. spring rolls had cream cheese in them and were terrible.. couldn't eat them. Chicken stir fry was not good at all.. the chicken looked...More
We had been here before, & wondered if this lovely little restaurant had maintained it's flavours. To our delight the flavours had wonderful depth. We had 'medium' heat, which was good, next time I'll try the 'hot'. The ginger seasonings were perfect. The stir fry...More
I live in the neighbourhood and have visited Pudpong several times over the years, mostly for lunch, and not for quite some time. My husband chose it for dinner recently. The service was fun and friendly, the food so-so. Everything tasted good and authentically Thai,...More
Pudpong is my favorite Thai restaurant. It is small, intimate and friendly. And the food is delicious!
We have been ordering food from Thai Pudpong for over 15 years...it used to be good. Unfortunately the quality of their food has been dropping over the years. Our last big order of 8 dishes (last night) was worse than ever...",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d973084-Reviews-Thai_Pudpong_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Thai's Saigon Bistro,"So many Vietnamese Restaurants to choose from but Thai Saigon Bistro has always satisfied our apetites! No reason to try any place else. Meals are always exceptional! Need we say more!
Knew nothing about the place. We were super hungry and just dropped in. It wasn't busy but food was excellent and service quick and friendly. Would go back next time we are in town.
Love their pho. Their soup noodle come to the table very hot....love it. Most of the time the soup is not even hot....just barely hot or lukewarm. However, do not like their spring roll. Don’t like the wrap. But they came out fresh. Will definitely...More
One of the better eating places in Burnaby, B.C. especially along the Hastings corridor. Very tasty pho dishes and Vietnamese rice dishes. It won't break your bank dining here. Excellent for a lunch or dinner stop. The restaurant decor is very upscaled, clean and fresh...More
Had the lemon grass chicken and wife had the beef pho . Lemon grass was nicely grilled. Pho was not too salty
This place serves very good broth for the pho. Very close to the taste of pho from Ho Chi Minh or Hanoi. The pho with beef slices and beef balls is fantastic. The rice rolls with shrimps are great too. Very reasonably priced. BTW, it's...More
foods ok again had better but love that I was able to frequent a local place in our area as we like to do that
Super clean, great tasting Pho! Excellent service, reasonably priced and family operated. ❤️their homemade Peanut and Chile sauces! Another great restaurant in Burnaby Heights!!!
Our family likes to go here as they have several different cuisines to order from. Fast services, good for families, good parking. Its in north Burnaby
The portion sizes are large compensating for the lack of quality food. Greasy, salty and lacking flavour. Chicken pieces were chewy with a lot of skin contributing to greasiness. More of food that you would receive at home than a restaurant.
The food was average. Nothing to should about here. It was quite busy, however I wasn't impressed. The service was average. Not somewhere I would revisit.
Best service I've had at a pho restaurant. The prices here are very competitive, with the large pho coming in around $8.50 (about a buck cheaper than other places). The salad rolls are average price, BUT they offer a shredded pork salad roll (!) The...More
I have driven by this place literly 1000s of times and my wife and i were out and felt like PHO and looked up trip advisor and found it. We were very pleasantly surprised. Nice atmosphere and great food. The young man services us was...More
Always great food........best viet food on Hastings. They make the best vietnamese coffee, just don't have it too late. Very strong. Awesome food all the time.
The best Pho I have tasted - the broth was delicious, with great flavour. The staff and owner was incredibly friendly and took the time to thoroughly explain the dishes we had questions about.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4214346-Reviews-Thai_s_Saigon_Bistro-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
The Acorn Restaurant,"Super cuisine, through all the courses. Great urban ambience. The courses were brought out briskly (almost too briskly, at times) but absolutely delicious from start to finish with interesting combinations of flavors and ingredients. This isn't a resto you can linger in. There is the...More
Not a great dining experience. Restaurant is very small and the tables are very close to one another almost claustrophobic. Restaurant caters to reservations only for the Chef's Menu at $79 a person and walk in guests are left to order a la carte if...More
Was excited to eat here as my wife is vegetarian and this restaurant supposedly has a Michelin mention Major disappointment! We had the tasting course with wine paring Wines were mediocre at best Food was average Service and execution dreadful We waited as much as...More
Had a really lovely evening. Food was absolutely gorgeous, service was great. Would highly recommend for a romantic evening
We did the chef’s tasting menu and my husband and I both agreed this was one of the best meals, if not the best, we have ever had. The variety of flavors and ingredients makes other restaurant menus look boring in comparison. Everything is incredibly...More
A phenomenal evening! We really were blown away - the tasting menu was generous, interesting, delicious and abundant. Topped off with a great vibe, excellent service and all reasonably priced. Will definitely return and if you’re looking for a delicious meal in Vancouver do consider...More
What a nice find! While we both eat meat, we really enjoyed trying a spot with a focus on veggies. We did the tasting menu, which at that time featured an amuse with apricots done multiple ways, daikon salad, a parsnip dish, a salsify focused...More
Terrible experience. Had the chef’s menu. Took my sister and mom for birthday brunch the weekend after they received Michelin recommendation. Slow service. Small portions. Couple next to us sat later and had faster service with larger portions. Mom found long hair in her food....More
My absolute favourite restaurant. Get the chef's menu and wine pairing--I've done so several times and am never disappointed. In very high demand (for good reason), so be sure to make a reservation. A chic, romantic vibe that's great for friends and anniversaries. Even your...More
It's taken me far too long to write this (I went in June!!). However, I knew I must as Acorn deserves high praise! Their first huge thumbs up goes to actually seating us!! I had mixed up the dates...and accidentally booked for the following week....More
We had an absolutely fantastic evening and enjoyed a fabulous tasting menu of vegetarian and vegan dishes. The quality of the dishes are equal to most Michelin star restaurants we have eaten in and if this restaurant was in Dublin it would definitely be on...More
Was visiting Vancouver for only a day but we had made reservations nearly a month in advance. We enjoyed every moment and every bite. The food was amazing, the service as exemplary....no complaints. I would go back often if I didn't live nearly 4000 miles...More
Had a very enjoyable Saturday brunch here. Loved the Sourdough bread, the zucchini omelet and the pancakes. We had a reservation, were in line before the restaurant opened and were the 3rd table to be seated. We had a busy day of sightseeing planned so...More
i normally never leave poor reviews, but when i went i tried to order the coffee cocktail with repasado tequila rather than the standard spirit. the bartender told my waiter who told me that she thought it would be “rancid” in front of the entire...More
Had the chef’s flight which was delicious (and not inexpensive) until dessert arrived. Pretty much a melted green smoothie with bitter chunks of rhubarb with some tiny strawberry slices and blueberries topped with some popcorn. Our server suggested we embrace it which was the warning...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3538423-Reviews-The_Acorn_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Arbor Restaurant,"We went with friends and we all ordered from the menu. My wife ordered the Artichoke sandwich and I ordered the Halloumi plate. We enjoyed the Artichoke sandwich more than the Halloumi. We had a table in the rear of the restaurant. Service was good,...More
So, let me tell you this, the food was very tasty, loved it. The service on the other hand not so much. The servers kept on ignoring us, we had to ask for our a ordered drinks multiple times at the end the server forgot...More
The veggie burger and the tomato jam were very salty and not all that tasty. The food was ok but meh...The patio was nice. The restaurant was nearly empty but it still took 40 minutes for my food to arrive. The side salad was horribly...More
I'm just going to say this from the very beginning, it was a very bizarre experience. They were conducting an interview at the front door when there was clearly enough space in the restaurant. Odd choice when walking in and just wanting to be sat....More
My friend and I went to The Arbor for brunch on a Friday afternoon. I loved the casual atmosphere and laid-back vibe. The menu is vegetarian comfort food and includes everything from salads to burgers and pasta. The drink menu features BC wines, along with...More
we had the jackfruit steamed buns, the artichoke sandwich, tacos and a small bowl of onion soup. the onion soup was the most disappointing but all was good and tasty. the onion soup did not have enough broth as it all soaked into the croutons....More
I have been wanting to visit this restaurant and finally succeeded. Our choices were amazing, especially the gnocchi and the roasted beets. They put a really lovely spin on these dishes, making them unique. Service was really good. Delicious vegetarian and vegan food
Took a taxi to Main Street specifically for this restaurant. Small place with such mellow vibes. The food excellent. Food was to die for. We both had the Southern Fried Artichoke sandwich and a side of onion rings. (So crispy!) Server asked if we wanted...More
Went to the Arbor only to find the Host guy at the door was so rude. A huge turn off to be received at the door by an ass! We walked.
Acorn's little brother, The Arbor is a much better experience. The service is a little slow (which doesn't make much sense. Both times I went there, the place was not busy), but the staff is very friendly! They accommodate everyone's need (from my vegan order...More
Good gluten free options, only tried 3 of them, but won't be back due to the horrible service and ambience. Asked for the sauce that was supposed to come with my meal but didn't, and the reply I received from the server ""yeah, I just...More
Two of us had lunch here on the intimate back terrace and had the best caramelized pan fried Brussels sprouts with a lovely sauce, GF vegan burger, with amazing homemade ketchup, spring still and sparkling water at will, and a supreme vegan chocolate mousse. Quality...More
Stopped in for early lunch with two small children and greeted warmly. Had a choice of the garden or the restaurant. Inside was breezy and cool on a rare hot Vancouver day, so quite enjoyable. Loved the veggie burger and the noodle entrée. Cauliflower popcorn...More
Interesting flavours, tasty food, great choice. Staff were generally helpful. The food was a little on the pricey side for the amount served depending on the menu item chosen, but the food was so tasty that it was still worth it.
popcorn oyster mushrooms - what else can you say; have those with a beer and you;ll be happy. everything on the menu is tasty",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12007985-Reviews-The_Arbor_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Basic,"A GREAT breakfast spot. Super friendly service and delicious food. We tried the omelette, “the mess”, breakfast sandwich and 2 egg breakfast during our two breakfasts here. All were excellent. No hesitation in coming back:)
Everything we got was very good. Our family of four had pancakes , the two egg plate, and the French toast. It was a good home cooked meal.
You could be forgiven for looking at the outside of this cafe and dismiss it but you'd be making a great mistake. It's an easy review for this cafe: (i) Friendly & great service (ii) Great food (iii) Good sized portions & (iv) Reasonably priced...More
I had chorizo eggs Bennie with the best hash browns I’ve ever had a restaurant. -crispy all around. Coffee service a little slow, but they were busy. Highly recommend.
We went in for breakfast and loved how clean it was, the great service and awesome vegetarian options to boot! Delicious!
This is the best breakfast we found in Vancouver. Love the veggie hash, eggs and toast and had a decent cup of tea too! Lovely staff.
Had a great breakfast it was very filling. Good welcome and staff were really happy and helpful. Had basic spect and a veggie. A very busy place
A local lady recommended this cafe and it didn’t disappoint. the mess was amazing , and great unlimited coffee. omelette was superb. sourdough toast really good. hash breakfast tasty server was very attentive
Great breakfast place! Quick and friendly service and good diner-style menu. We ate here both mornings of our vacation. Tasty coffee and quick top-ups.
We almost walked past this restaurant, having had it recommended to us, but really glad we found it! We had breakfast and drinks and really enjoyed the food. Service was great and reasonably priced! Definitely recommend you seek it out, you won't be disappointed!
Good range of cooked breakfasts with coffee refills and friendly service. Eggs Benedict and regular breakfast were both good.
We went to the Denmar st. Location. Food was absolutely amazing. The banana pancakes were very tasty. Veggie omelette with roasted potatoes and waffles. It was all fresh and yummy and tasted homemade, which was my favorite. I was hesitant at first to try a...More
A great place for breakfast. Not lot of vegan options. When I asked to have the beacon and the sausages removed from my dish the price was the same.
Good selection of breakfasts. Steve offers a nice and efficient service. Bennies are especially good offer.",14,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23045117-Reviews-The_Basic-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Bayside Lounge,"Great staff, good drinks. A tad pricy. The place is looking tired though. Could use an update. Seating is torn/worn, bathrooms are not stellar
After emailing both the manager of the hotel and the hotel itself and not hearing back, I am unfortunately resorting to online reviews. The fact that I’ve contacted the business itself twice about my complaint and had it disregarded is deeply upsetting. The email I...More
This is my favorite place in the Universe! There is something magical about the place and it's a little hard to find, maybe that's why? FOOD = EXCELLENT DRINKS = SPECTACULAR SERVICE = ENCHANTING Personally, I'd like to keep this place quiet so that I...More
We had a drink here, service great, had breakfast here in the am during our stay. Heidi Bridson catering manager so nice and sweet and served us a very nice quality breakfast. Nice to see a person smiling in the am! Windows open to street,...More
Great Experience the view was great but the food and service surpassed the view. The Buddha Bowl and Mango chicken burger were very tasty . You don’t want to miss the chance to visit.
Had a great time at the Bayside Lounge for dinner. The food was pretty good and the service was nice. The drinks were super good too, tons of cocktail options. Definitely would come back again!
Just have their steak or their burger and you will know what I am talking about. Thank me later. Love this place.
The location is above the traffic with an unobstructed view of English bay. The nuce selection of cocktails and very good service. There is a very nuce selection of food the charcuterie plate is just right with a cocktail or a glass of wine enjoy...More
I love this room! I was worried at how safe I would feel returning to my favourite haunt with the “new normal” protocols. The staff here have gone out of their way to ensure safety yet the feel of the room has not been that...More
The food for happy hour is excellent and very affordable. We always order the charcuterie for $13.00 such a good deal good portions. The clams are a huge favorite as well. Check it out I highly recommend it.
This was a great place to sit and enjoy a cold beer while watching the people walk by in English Bay. The display of Xmas lights next to the Laughing Men were very pretty to see as the night got darker.
This lounge shares a kitchen with the Park restaurant next door in the Best Western Sands hotel. Our friendly neighbors at a nearby table had nachos that were massive, and they pronounced them very good. They convince my companion to try the tuna tartare, and...More
Went for afternoon happy hour at 3 (3-6 PM). Not full but was by 4 PM. The second floor corner location has great views to English Bay. The lounge also offers a limited food service. provide by the adjoining hotel kitchen. We ordered beer and...More
The Bayside Lounge needs a CLEAN UP! Disgusting STANK when I came through entrance with dusty lounge chairs on left of me by greasy windows and all I could smell was old cigarette smoke. Yuck, come on Owners! You had a good thing going on...More
This place is very amateur and not worth the time or money simply because it seems to be run so poorly. I have been here before because I stayed in the hotel but from now on I will make a point to go to another...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d949942-Reviews-The_Bayside_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Beaver Taphouse,"jack and eddy are the most thoughtful, hospitable, kind, heartwarming, and very handsome as well- servers of life. we have felt (we being myself, my cousin, and my sister) so seen & taken care of that we didn’t wanna leave. we were having such a...More
Jack & Benny had such great customer service. Absolutely lovely men and very friendly! Definitely recommend the Taphouse!
they always include 15% of tips in the account without giving you the option to choose. The worst customer service, one of the waiters is very pushy. The manager couldn't even apologize afterwards.
Came in here during the COVID pandemic but before the current three-week lockdown in British Columbia. This place is getting TLC and I'm sure will come through this challenging time better than ever.
I stayed in the samesun hostel and the beaver was the perfect place to socialize and take a drink. Happy hour was awesome as all beers are 4$!!! Benny was our barman and he's awesome! Keep it up!
Really loved staying at the Samesun hostel. At the Beaver, Benny and TJ (especially Benny) we’re the best. Loved everyone second. Would recommend!
Benny, TJ and the entire team are the best!!! They rule, are crucial and generally rule!!!!! Would recommend
Really fun down to earth bar with cheap drinks an a good selection of food! The events during the week are also a great way to meet people. The staff are welcoming and our server TJ was super attempting, always checking if there was anything...More
Amazing bar! Great happy hour with EVERY tap (20) $4! Amazing servers! Also has one of the best trivias I have ever been to! will definitely come back!
Good selection of beers, not as much of spirits. Nice staff, nice atmosphere, fair prices. All good, nothing wrong. Haven't tried their food but looks like normal pub food, which is why I haven't tried it. The fifth star is for the sympathy. For best...More
Had the BBQ chicken flatbread pizza washed down with a few ciders on special and ended up winning the Thursday night quiz with 2 strangers. We won on a tie break which was decided by downing pints, thankfully we had a monster Aussie on our...More
Came here for music bingo initially and then came back for trivia a few weeks later. Now this is my go to spot downtown. Great beer selection and really good pub food. Prices are affordable and the service is fantastic. Benny, Jamie, Anth and Bel...More
This place is a bit of a hidden gem on Granville Street. You could walk past and not even know it’s there. They have a great selection of local craft beers (20 I believe). Our server Anthony was a really cool dude and he recommended...More
I came here with a group of friends on one night. I didnt expect the amazing variety of beer that they had to choose from. Many of the beers were from right here in BC which is great. Jamie, our server, was fantastic and answered...More
I believe this place has been rebranded recently to The Beaver Taphouse. They have 20 taps to choose from and the majority of beers are from BC which is great for tourists coming in from the hostel upstairs. I stayed in the hostel for 6...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13199384-Reviews-The_Beaver_Taphouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Black Frog Eatery,"This is a nice bar within the sight and sounds of the steam clock. The decor is good, lots of sports team scarves on the walls and ceiling. Big screen available for watching sports. The menu is good, and reasonably priced service was also good....More
Been across canada for 3weeks and the chilli chicken wings were out standing best we have had and im a chilli freak. The young lady (sorry forgot your name but from Newcastle) was great and the music was great 👍
A great place for a quick beer and snack while walking through Gastown. Loved their veggie quesadilla, local pale ale and the very friendly server.
It’s very casual but for 4 couples who had been walking all day, it felt like a good place to check out. Near the Steam clock which is a nice area. Food was nothing to get excited about. The Haddock with fries was good but...More
Met friends for lunch here after reading the reviews. The beef burgers looked better than the veggie burgers but the buns were cold and low quality The presentation looked very diner like. The service was friendly but we all felt a bit disappointed in the...More
Always a favourite of ours as its got a good atmosphere, a good beer range and reasonable food. Sitting in the conservatory with a view of the Gastown clock is a bonus.
A very good eatery. It was my first visit to Vancouver and I ended up in this place during a city tour. It is very close to the steam clock and can get its view from the restaurant’s patio. The food was really tasty. I...More
We wandering aimlessly in the rain today catch a glimpse of the King Tide and play tourist in my own town , we both love out door , surprised the whole area special in China Town , Gas Town not many people on the street...More
Hungry, thirsty, and tired, we were just looking for a place to rest a while. We got lucky. This was a nice spot. Ate our first poutine, and it was tasty (and vegetarian). Loved my hamburger. And our table boasted a tourist-friendly view of the...More
This was the second stop on our Gastown historic walking tour. Three different Styles of chicken wings accompanied by yam fries and curry mayonnaise. I wasn’t expecting to enjoy the yams but was definitely surprised when I tried them. Crispy, not salty and when dipped...More
Location and beer was good, service was not. It was a constant struggle to get our server’s attention. It looked like she intentionally avoided making eye contact with customers. We sat inside by the open window. It soon became very hot with one side of...More
Visited the Frog everyday we were in Vancouver. Good beer, food and a great view of the steam clock. When the suns out and the shutters are open, there’s nowhere better. Staff are very attentive and on their game.
If you’re missing the good old USA it’s definitely a place. Good food (I had a Moon Burger), fresh beer, nice staff and atmosphere. A music, a view, the old toys on the wall - all you need to have a break :)
Great food, good prices and great staff. The menu was short a few items the night we were there but made do with second choices that were good.
We stopped by to check out the “steam clock” and found this place. Pub Eatery Sports Bar, it exceeded our expectations. While we were there they wheeled out bleachers for a game.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2429988-Reviews-The_Black_Frog_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Blackbird Public House & Oyster Bar,"Another hospitality victim of the pandemic I suppose. This was a great place and used to enjoy the food and the odd game of pool when visiting Vancouver
The food at this place is really good and the atmosphere is relaxed, great pub ambiance and a perfect place to sip one with friends.
Went in whilst shopping nearby, Amazing service, great food, lovely atmosphere, will visit again when in Vancouver.
Brilliant eating/drinking spot, good drinks menu, great setting and amazing service. Top marks and would go again. Only annoyed discovered this place so late in my stay in Vancouver.
Good pub atmosphere but can be pretty noisy. Great selection of microbrews and wines. Lots of room and a choice of places to sit.
Really liked this pub, great atmosphere, food was pretty good and music was great will for sure go again!
Stopped in the Blackbird for some beer and appies, the beer was good the food was not. Lots of good beer on tap... The avocado toast was not toasted and was very bland, the coleslaw side was very good though. The chicken bits were tasty...More
Met up with friends who were celebrating. There is a long high top table that can accommodate 20 or so people. There is also the bar and tables and banquets along the back wall. The space is welcoming with several different options for seating and...More
We were craving fresh oysters for some reason and the front desk staff at MET recommended this place. The oysters were barely fresh and when we voiced out our opinion to the server, she said ""maybe you're just not used to raw food"". Because of...More
Thanks to the knowledgeable bartender, tastings of the draft options, and a menu to our tastes, we had a wonderful visit after many hours of flying. Good local ciders and ales, and the freshest local oysters. The mussels were a generous portion and beer steamed....More
I have been to Blackbird 2 1/2 times. The first was in January 2018 and I sat by the bar near the kitchen. My food came out of the kitchen and sat on the counter for long enough for it to get cold by the...More
Had a quick lunch in this pub/restaurant, which is located on the second floor -- you have to go through a barbershop to get up. OK food -- I had the steak and fries -- very plain but eatable. As I noted, OK -- the...More
First and foremost, the place is so loud, you cannot carry a single conversation. I am glad I was there by myself. Still, even ordering food required screaming at the server. Of course, if and only if the server decided to pay attention to me.,,...More
The food is GREAT! Beautiful place! The inside is all blue Rocky Mountain Beetle Kill wood. It is stunning!
The food was good but the service was average at best, and when the bill came the server did not disclose that there was gratuity added to the bill. My boyfriend paid and didn’t notice until later and was too nice to say anything. I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5039567-Reviews-The_Blackbird_Public_House_Oyster_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Blenheim,"Don't avoid the place, but I wouldn't make it a destination either. Great summer patio, food and drinks are average. Pricing isn't too good but not awful.
My sister picked this place because of the kid section and I’m glad she did. Kids had somewhere to play (old toys) while waiting for our order. We ordered off the happy hour menu? And got the schnitzel burger. I had salad. We also had...More
The decor inside is much improved from the previous restaurants in this space, but it exists because of the big patio ... definitely not about the food. The menu is limited. The selection is average. Staff were friendly. My friend suggested the place and he...More
Me and my boyfriend are regular guest at the blenheim. There is always a good atmosphere, friendly people and they serve good food (which is worth to wait for on busy days). Since Jessica from Germany recommended us the cheesecake and ice cream, I always...More
I order burger and my fried order ribs. Don't order Rib! The price is very hight for the amount your are getting. Burger was ok. I had better... But the Patio is great. So if you want to have a few drinks in the Patio...More
We had breakfast there on our last day in Vancouver and are sad that we didn't discover this place earlier. Nice atmosphere in a quiet neighborhood, great food (I recommend the Avocado toast) and a very friendly waitress, Jessica, who took care of us. Will...More
I came to the Blenheim over the weekend with a couple of friends who just moved to the area. It was a hot day so we decided to sit on the patio. As it was our first time here, I asked our friendly server Isabella...More
Came by to watch the world cup, our server Isabella was really friendly and helpful. Recommended the house burger, and it was excellent. Would come back, especially to watch more of the world cup
Ordered the Apple walnut salad and a BBQ chicken pizza with cilantro. The food was excellent and the waitress really knew her stuff. Outdoor table in very verdant Kitsilino area of Vancouver. Just a lovely evening.
We Visited the blenheim to watch the soccer games ...perfect place with a lots of TV ...they serve Erdinger Weizen ...and after germany lost against South korea only the smile of the german waitress Jessica could save the day!!
This was the perfect spot for watching soccer championship . German beer, easy delicious food and a real nice German speaking lady jessica working there . Thx for making us our stay real special :-)
Today I visited for lunch with my husband, daughter & granddaughter and let me say we were very disappointed indeed. In my previous visits to Vancouver I have been to your pub quite a few times. In April 2018 I was very impressed with the...More
kids can play in the play area ...great for parents to have a good time and eat and drink... sport is playing on the tv's but not with annoying sound...... so you can actually have a conversation.... the pizza is excellent.... spareribs perfect .... burger...More
This property has hosted several pubs over the years and most of them have suited the frugal university aged student looking for a beer. However, the new owners have decided to fix it up and transform the space into a nice neighbourhood family friendly pub...More
We live in the neighbourhood and have seen several restaurants in this location. In comparison with earlier ventures the Blenheim has higher quality but also higher variance - on a good day they do a fine job, but they have had some major glitches as...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13427027-Reviews-The_Blenheim-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Boathouse Restaurant,"Great seafood restaurant on the beach with nice views, excellent good and top-notch service. Highly recommend the halibut and the seafood mixed plate.
Bad service. Waitress argued with us multiple times. First, because I asked if they could take off the cheese from the burger for my son and add some lettuce. Second time, was because my husband's drink glass broke when he picked it up and it...More
Poor customer service, we waited for a long time for a waitress to come over to even give us the drink menu, crew just pass us by like we don't exist. We just walked aways and left the place after waiting for 40 minutes.
The beach concession stand is run by and attached to the Boathouse restaurant. We ordered our drinks and. hot dog and fries, for my grandson. We were given a number and waited and waited and waited… A got a hint of how long the wait...More
This restaurant is located on Kitsilano Beach and we had a wonderful view of the beach and the ocean. The fish and chips were delicious although the coleslaw could’ve been better. Service was slow but we were trying to catch up so it didn’t bother...More
Great food — calamari, lobster, salmon, and steak. And, the good entrees led to great desserts — lava cake and key lime. Very nice atmosphere and view in the “sun room,” but sun was somewhat in our eyes for a 6:00 pm meal. Maybe go...More
I expected much more than I got. The service staff was very attentive and helpful, providing a great level of service. However, the food was at best average and worse.
We booked this restaurant well in advance before our trip to Vancouver. We were a table of six and asked for a really good view and we were seated in the back. The wait staff very nice have no complaints. Other than they hardly came...More
Came across by chance / sat outside but inside looked good as well / busy & buzzing / food excellent / best fish & chips I’ve had for ages. Looked after well. Good standards.
Reserved for family dinner (a family member's birthday) and we all loved this place. Good food and excellent service! Nice view from our table was a bonus 😊
We have previously enjoyed dining here but our last visit was absolutely disappointing. We brought friends from out of town because of the spectacular view. At this point this is the only thing going for this restaurant. Our meal took extremely long to come out...More
4.5 for Pepsi with full glass of ice and 12 for cream brûlée that you need microscope to see . Every time we go portion are getting smaller and smaller but prices going up. The only restaurant that kept their standard is Sand bar on...More
The garbage smell at the entrance is awful and suggests to me management who don't know what the hospitality business is all about. Ongoing construction at the entrance suggests the same. Shabby in and out. A lacklustre place with a view. Parking situation is awkward.
We had a disappointing experience trying to organize a special gathering here. The manager booked our reservation and everything seemed to be fine. Another manager gave us a tour of the location and showed us where our guests would be seated. Then their salesperson advised...More
The atmosphere was very good. The food left a lot to be desired. My steak cam cold and their solution was to just re-fire it and not replaced as requested. It then took 10 to 15 minutes to get our dessert. Very disappointed as this...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710597-Reviews-The_Boathouse_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Boss Bakery & Restaurant,"This review is for the bakery section located towards the front of the business. We did not sit down and eat within the restaurant. We stopped at the Boss Bakery in Chinatown for some quick takeout ordered from the front counter. Some of the items...More
This is where we stopped to get some mooncakes during the lantern festival while we're visiting chinatown. The staff is super friendly and the mooncakes are amazing.
The atmosphere at The Boss is very simple. I have been there twice and the food is not impressive. Giving it 3 stars is generous. I have no interest in returning.
Lunch with my family on January 1, 2020 and was busy, as expected. We waited 20 minutes for a table. There is no waiting area, the bakery is the waiting area. There was only 1 chair which was already occupied. Couldn't find a seat for...More
I’ve been to the Boss a few times. Here and Metrotown and the food is always consistent and reliable. We had some of their daily specials which was their satay beef rice noodles and the daily breakfast special. Almost mistook the dish to the standard...More
Have been purchasing bakery products from this establishment for a while now. It's not a bad chinese bakery but the pastries are getting smaller as the years go by. If nothing else, it keeps your waistline down.
Had a nice breakfast at the boss bakery. Service was speedy and the specials were very tasty! Afterwards we pickes up some nice baked goods for desert at home.
Authentic Chinese cuisine, in large proportions, at a terrific price!....how can you go wrong? The food was absolutely delicious and the fresh baking is to die for! Highly recommend this place for great value!
The ""club mixed grill"": stupefying mound of chow featuring 5 different kinds of pork on a sizzling hot plate, with a large side of spaghetti and half a litre of gravy. And ahhh the egg tarts....
If you are familiar with HK style Cha Chaan Teng then your expectation will be such that you won't be disappointed. Typical breakfast included a bun with butter, choice of noodle soup (mine the classic ham with macaroni), an omelet (shredded chicken in this case)...More
Step off of the gritty sidewalk of Main, and into the peaceful and spotless interior of the Boss, your server will be at your table lightning quick, this restaurant is a good choice for Cruise ship passengers, as it is within walking distance of the...More
This is a great place for a quick lunch if you are around Chinatown. Generally it gets quite busy around lunch time for a sit-down lunch, and there may be a short wait, but there are lots of tables and good turnover. I've found the...More
The Boss Bakery is delicious. The prices are very reasonable and the location is just at the edge of Chinatown. Their apple turnover is fantastic and highly recommended!
Needed a last minute birthday cake and The Boss was very accommodating. Bought a 8"" fresh fruit cake. It was decorated beautifully and they added Happy Birthday for me. It was plenty big enough for 10 people. You will find their cakes light and delicious.
I often drop by here for the bakery out front which carries a good selection of Chinese buns and cakes. As close to Hong King style as I have found in Vancouver. Recently had breakfast in the restaurant in the back and it was fine....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3492641-Reviews-The_Boss_Bakery_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Burrow,"My favourite spot for great eats and drinks! This place is a solid staple in East Van. Amazing nachos, tasty brunch, and good vibes. The margaritas can't be beat.
Delicious lunch all round. Great vegetarian and vegan options. Here is what we like about The Burrow: Food is fresh and delicious Great selection of of Mexican food Family friendly environment Staff are hospitable and really nice Food came out pretty quickly and was piping...More
Joshua, Thank you for taking the time to leave this review! I am so glad you enjoyed your experience at The Burrow. My heart is warmed to read your response. You have mentioned all the things we are working so hard to achieve. Thank you,...More
Every time I’ve eaten at The Burrow, I’ve been so glad that I did. Brunch is my favourite meal at The Burrow.. I’ve been there a few times with my best friend. She always has their French toast and she raves about it. I go...More
We were there for lunch and dinner because it was so good. Great food, great flavors, home made, big servings, quality ingredients. I go there every time I visit Vancouver. I've been there with family and with friends and solo. Every chance I have, I...More
We love the Burrow! It’s cozy, friendly, and hip. All of the food is fresh and home made, but our favourite time to go is just before the brunch rush. Our go-to choices are the baked breakfast burrito (add guac) or a Benny (hint: one...More
I really love dining at this restaurant. The atmosphere feels warm and inviting and the food is delicious and healthy!
I love this place! I've been with friends, solo and on dates. It serves consistantly good food and has friendly staff, fast service and fantastic portions. The Burrow is my go to when eating out in Vancouver.
I love tacos! Even though I do eat meat, the Burrow's taco combos are the best, especially Wolf & Goat and Ronny Russell. And they make it easy to dine as a family as my kid is really into the Ryder's Bowl. Don't miss out...More
Friendly, cozy, inclusive and always delicious! I love the Burrow. I have been a fan since they opened and have celebrated birthdays and brought friends and family there for meals for years! The food is delightful. My current obsession is the Roasted Butternut Squash Enchiladas....More
What a great spot! We came for dinner and drinks and had a great time. Super boho, eclectic antique vibe, delicious and healthy vegetarian fare and fun drinks. We went another time and they had a pop-up with a local bannok maker and the bannok...More
The BEST brunch spot, and also delicious any time of day. Authentic and intentionally sourced food and great atmosphere. A must stop for Vancouver!
The food here is SO good - fresh, tasty, and the portions are generous. I love it for both brunch and dinner. I’m not a vegetarian but I never feel like I’m missing anything. So much choice. Good gluten- free options and non-dairy substitutions which...More
We were super happy with our meal at the Burrow. The food was fresh and delicious and plentiful. They really make feel-good food - and it was really reasonable. I can't eat gluten or dairy and it's a perfect place for me - so many...More
Yummy vegetarian happy-making food in a family-friendly environment. So good to have freshly-made food - especially love their Bennys and cornbread. And you have to try their mock-guac - just wow! Everyone was full and had a smile going out!
Best brunch in the city, I think. It's a vegetarian place, but truly everyone I've taken here loves it! Everything can be made vegan. The cornbread is to die for. The plates are bountiful, fresh, and satisfying. My dad loves it. And my vegan friends...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1807053-Reviews-The_Burrow-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Butcher & Bullock,"This place was so convenient, right next to our hotel. We enjoyed appetizers and drinks and eevn went back again later for another visit. Good service!
The place was nicely setup, service was excellent, the drinks were perfectly mixed, and the food was top end pub food. We really enjoyed our night out to the B&B. Highly recommend its.
Anyone who works downtown Vancouver knows it can be hard to find a good, decently priced lunch within a 1 hour time frame. This place delivers! Great food, good choices of beers and well priced. The service was exemplary and quick. In and out in...More
Popped in here in the afternoon and had a lovely IPA (4 Winds) and yes, the bar had multiple TVs on as well as an enormous screen. The latter was covered over when we went back later and, as it had a lot more people...More
Very nice bar with good food and a lot of drinks.You have possibolities to play billiard,bocia......
Thanks for the great review!
Try the turkey, fig, and bacon sandwich! And don't forget the dirty fries. Both super delicious. Yes, it's a bit loud, and yes you may have to wait a bit to get service, but it's definitely worth it if you come into town late in...More
Sports Bar showing, ice hockey, football, American football, Rugby and Baseball while we were there. Numerous screens all over the bar so you don't miss anything. Music and ambience were good. Pub food served. The Classic Burgers were awesome. Good beer with several options to...More
Thanks very much for taking the time to leave such a great review!
This place was just the right spot to ride the roller coaster of another European night at Anfield - cruising at 3v0 with a hint of menace from the Austrians was turned on its head with the plucky opposition bringing the game to 3v3. Mo...More
So first, if you’re a Liverpool FC fan (that’s soccer for the uninitiated!!), you will adopt this place as your own since it’s the “official” Liverpool fan pub of Vancouver 🙂. Aside from that, good food (excellent Classic Burger with superb flavour and charred edges,...More
Well said! Thanks for the great feedback!
Met a friend there for lunch. Not seeing anything on the menu that really stood out I ordered a burger with mushrooms. NEVER AGAIN. The burger was burnt, and the onions on the burger were the tough outer layers that you couldn't chew and had...More
Hi there, My name is Kirk Ashton I'm the General manager at Butcher & Bullock. I'm very disappointed to hear about your experience at our pub today. I would very much like the opportunity to have you back and show you all the great qualities...More
visited here on overnight in vancouver and loads of televisions, didn't eat but menu looked good, would visit again,
Thanks for the reply PaddyWack! Hope to see you again soon, when you do get to try our food, hopefully that wins us a 5 star review! Feel free to ask for me when you're in! Kirk Ashton
There were six of us and it was dinner time after walking and traveling. Everywhere seemed to have waits (30 minutes or more). We found Butcher and Bullock on Trip Advisor and it did not disappoint. Most of us had simple hamburgers or salads. All...More
Thanks for the kind words and joining us for dinner! Look forward to seeing you again soon!
We visited for lunch on a Saturday. The pub is huge, but presumably is busier in the ""after work hours."" We were one of only about 6 tables in the space, but the warm and friendly welcome from ""Connor"" our server made up for the...More
Restaurant is a sports bar, no one under 18 allowed to eat in the restaurant. Our family did take out and got delicious burgers! We ate here and had some of the best fish and chips we have ever had. Service was outstanding! Food was...More
Was situated next to hotel we were staying in,. Ventured downstairs to perhaps have a meal, but found it very noisy with lots of young people having a great time.was very much like a nightclub. Fantastic for the young people.",21,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709051-Reviews-The_Butcher_Bullock-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Canadian Brewhouse & Grill,"I was rejected today april 24th 2023 at approx 12am-1215am by a female manager/server named alex because she said she didnt feel comfortable serving me because I was with my close friend whose black and said she felt threatened by me....2 weeks ago but i...More
Hi Harp, we both know that your experience had nothing to do with racism. I'm sorry you feel this way and if you'd like to talk about it more, please email me at theo@thecanadianbrewhouse.com.
Fun place to watch the game, their happy hr is amazingly priced and feels like it’s an error! Highballs after 9pm are only $3.99 and is reminiscent of pricing 10 years ago.
The food and service were very good, but the place was incredibly noisy, even for a sports bar. It is also a bit difficult to find if you aren't familiar with the area. The GPS took us to the outside of the complex, and after...More
Took a Lyft from our hotel to eat at the brew house. It was really busy as everyone was watching the basketball game. We had to wait for over an hour to get a seat. Service was slow, but really good. Our waitress paid attention...More
We went for lunch during weekday, exactly what we like, not so busy. The venue was great, the staff was polite, and we ordered burgers! Good quality food! Plenty of parking outside the mall. Will keep repeating the visits...
rip off. ""prime rib dinner""was a disgusting joke and $26.00. I had 2 ($7each)beers during my time and was charged for 3... Thanks! I am careful with paying but they have a sneaky billing system that can catch the unsuspecting. They put slips of your...More
Hi Rham, I'm sorry to hear about your experience. I'd really like to follow up with you to get to the bottom of your experience. The system is in place to help you know what's getting put on your bill so to hear it didn't...More
Always love it here, great time for weekends in Richmond which usually can be quite dull. They bring in a dj it's awesome :p
We visited the brew house while on an overnight for a flight. The team was superb!! We felt welcomed and important from the moment we walked in. Note worthily was Nick- he was so charismatic and friendly. He also recommended dish that was sooooo good....More
Food's amazing at this place, but my main reason to come here is because the service is so nice. Our waitress Lindsay (hope I spelled it right) took great care of us and gave us great trips for our stay! Thank you!
Good atmosphere but went downhill from there. Wife ordered a tall rum and coke and a beer for me. Rum and coke came in a small glass filled to brim with ice so was quite strong. My beer was completely flat. Ordered a different type...More
Hi Bobo5578, Thanks for taking the time to leave a review. I'm so sorry we let you down with your last visit. I would love to touch base with you to learn more about it so we can learn from where we went wrong. If...More
Food arrived quickly, was hot and tasted good. despite having an error in the order the staff quickly rectified that. Great customer service 👏 thank you Nyssa and team
Thanks so much for the kind review! We look forward to seeing you again soon!
Had high hopes for a nice family meal but should have known better as first impressions are key. When we arrived a young lady walked by us and said just sit anywhere. When I asked if there was space upstairs on the patio she said...More
Hi VacationingfromCDN, I'm really sorry to hear about your experience with us, I believe you visited a different location than Richmond as we don't have an upstairs at all or a Milestones nearby. I would still love to follow up with you to find out...More
I had fond memories when they open their first location in Edmonton in 2002 , not far from my house ! those were the good old days ! they now have so many franchise from B.C to Alberta , also in Saskatchewan , it is...More
Thank you for the kind words! We hope to see you again soon!
We come here all the time as they are located across the street from our house .We were a bit disappointed with how they handled the seating and reservations -many mixed messages. I tried to reserve a table ahead of time but I when I...More
Hi lsavoie6, I sorry we let you down regarding the lineup/reservations. We had a ton of interest in the Euro cup final and had to cut off reservations fairly quickly, although we did take some for sure. Staffing since the releasing of the restrictions from...More
Went to Brew on a Saturday, the bartender Brant (I think his name was) really went above and beyond to make sure my visit was great
I'm so happy to hear you had a great time with Brandt! I'll make sure to pass along the kind words!",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d12371015-Reviews-The_Canadian_Brewhouse_Grill-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
The Captain's Boil,"Incredible seafood, well-priced - not fancy (boiled in a bag with seasonings) but so delicious! Definitely would go again!
Wow! Delicious! My family and I are see food lovers and we were not disappointed! Large portions, great flavour & extremely fresh. Fast service. Be prepared to eat with your fingers. We will definitely go again. Highly recommend
I like very much the whole concept, plastic bags, dump it on the table, gloves, aprons, great. The food is unbelievably good, if you love seafood- can hardly get better than this. We had an extended couse, with crab, tiger prawns, mussels, scallops, even chicken...More
it is my girlfriend last day in Vancouver , after a long day shopping in Richmond , she do not feel to eat any thing , ( Because she little sad to leave me ! ) so I surprised her dropped in The Captain's boil...More
Hi Tony, glad to learn your experience was a positive one. Hope you have an amazing day!
Don't love the premise of this restaurant so I am somewhat biased. Came here on a weeknight, pretty empty. Got the mussels and snow crab legs. The mussels are new zealand mussels which are large and pretty meaty. the crab legs were okay but maybe...More
Not a big menu for a solo business traveler. Boils are served in a bag with no plate and one plastic spoon. Not good for a business person. Nothing but a wet nap to clean up. You need more…
They have only three location in midland , this is my first time in Richmond location ,lot of parking ,decor vert spacious, casual , and very strange feeling ,the whole place is empty ,may be a week day , I am not much of Seafood...More
Hi Tony, thank you for your feedback! We are sorry that we did not live up to your expectations. Please reach out to us at support@thecaptainsboil.com so we may assist you.
We decided to pop in and give it a try. We absolutely loved it. It was delicious and fun. The lemon pepper flavour was our favourite by far. Kids loved it as they got to make a mess. We thoroughly enjoyed it and would go...More
A bit pricey but its worth it. The staff are very friendly and helpful. Good place to eat with your family and friends.
Hello Sandro, Thank you for your rating. We are happy to have served you a delicious meal.
Been here twice and our experienced was very good. The place is not that busy so we were seated right away. The place is very spacious and staff are very friendly. This branch is very consistent with their quality of sauce as it’s very tasty...More
Hello Donnel, Thank you for your rating. We are happy to have served you a delicious meal.
Fresh seafood Nice setting & ambience Big lobsters & crabs Love the cajun sauce Clean restaurant Will be back for more Super yummy 😋😋
Hello, Thank you for your feedback, we are very happy that you chose us for your seafood boil experience. We would be delighted to serve you again.
If you prefer to eat in a plate and spoon and fork, don't come here! They brought their seafood in a plastic bag, and gives you plastic glove, then go to town. The food was amazing!! It was full of flavours. I would definitely go...More
Hello Amalia, Thank you for joining us for your seafood boil experience. We hope you had as much fun as we did!
WOW, after a long day of touristing in Lower Mainland and Howe Sound, we needed something primitive, simple, and delicious. Wasnt expecting food-in-a-bag--- not the boil I am used to--- but so what--- it was all delicious--- Sapporo on sale, with free sunglasses. w00t! With...More
Hello Jeff, Thank you for your review. We are happy to have served you a Captain's feast!
The Captain's Boil is a fusion style seafood restaurant, it does has the components of a Louisiana Seafood Boil flavour, but it has evolved into being a more bland style of seafood boil, except if you ask for extra spicy! So if you are into...More
Hello, Thank you for your rating. We are happy to have served you a delicious meal.
We had a great meal there, ate 2 lb of Dungeness crab, 1 lb of snow crab legs, 1 lb of king prawns, 1 lb of okra and a dish of seafood fried rice. The seafood was nicely cooked in the Captain sauce & Garlic...More
Hello Queenie, Thank you for your feedback, we are very happy that you chose us for your seafood boil experience. We would be delighted to serve you again.",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d10955679-Reviews-The_Captain_s_Boil-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
The Carvery Sandwich Shop,"Curbed that hangover with a great sandy, tried the bbq beef brisket and it was awesome !!! Will be back for more great eats!!
This was my first time ordering from the Carvery Sandwich Shop. After hearing many positive reviews I thought we'd give ti a try. Ordered the Rueben and the Hog Heaven, both were delicious. You could tell quality ingredients were used. Will definitely be going back...More
Hello, I found this place about 4 years ago while looking for a Sammich Shop in the Vancouver Area. My First experience should have told me everything. Heres what I mean. The Owner is very arrogant and rude, says if you dont like his sammiches...More
Great sandwich shop with great owners and staff. Excellent customer service and you can taste everything is made with love. On this visit i had the cubano and the pezole. Sandwich had a ample amount of filling with the roasted mojo pork shoulder, sliced smoked...More
Hi I have bin going here for well over 15 years. Its changed hands a few times over the years. They use to be the best. I not sure what’s going on now but it’s gone way down hill. I have given the them many...More
I have been here many times and have never been disappointed with anything. The service is always good.
I tried this sandwich place out because I saw amazing photos on Instagram. The only complaint I have is that it took over 40 minutes to get our food, I understand it was busy and it’s all fresh product but a warning would have been...More
Each day these folks prepare several high quality soups. Their sandwiches are unique and inspired. Everything our small group of friends tried was absolutely delicious. Service is friendly and prompt. Highly recommended. Note that they’re open 11am to 4 pm only, seven days a week.
Been wanting to go here for so long and I wish I had a long time ago. I had the Philly with Chicken chowder soup...so good! I had to come back the next day and I got the Beef dip and Buffalo chicken chowder soup....More
This was a find! Incredible sandwiches. We messaged them on Facebook before the visit with a special request for soup. They did it! The meal was fabulous. Would definitely be back.
The Pros: - Incredible sandwiches, soups and everything else - high quality ingredients - Cool atmosphere - kind of a diner setting - Friendly staff - Unique menu of sandwiches and soups - not the standard restaurant types The Cons: - A bit pricey for...More
I am a repeat visitor, and wish I could live closer to eat here more often! It really is amazing food.
Well. If the title doesn't give you a hint here you go: What a great little gem. It's a place you'd see in a little ski town or mtn biking heaven. It's super quaint, charming little place. Nice characters as staffs - ie dudes, dudettes,...More
Been itching to try this since we first moved to ocean park. Stephen obviously loved his Beef Dip...my west coast club on toasted sourdough was outstanding. Not cheap but clean fresh quality goodness is worth it. What will I try next?
We checked out this restaurant and it was order goodrhe soup and sandwich was very tasty. I had the Broccoli and cheese soup and the chicken Panini. You order at the till and they bring it out to you. It didn’t take too long to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183462-d12551647-Reviews-The_Carvery_Sandwich_Shop-Surrey_British_Columbia.html
The Cascade Room,"This is a fantastic venue. We came in January and couldn’t resist coming again. The staff, food and drink to choose from, plus the atmosphere are brilliant! If we’re in Vancouver we’ll be coming again!
Went here for an Easter roast with friends. Got given the most measly sized roast for $23. No gravy or anything. Forgot to give one of our friends carrots at all so the plate looked half empty, which we had to mention to them. Charged...More
Great drinks here, had a great time. Staff was super nice and the food was pretty good too. Definitely would come back again!
My wife had roast beef aus jus and fries that was tasty and good. I had the Skipper Otto's Lingcod Fish n' Chips that was good but the batter was a bit too much. The chips were very good. All in all a good takeout...More
Service was prompt and safe. Sanitizer all around and seating was spaced well. Patio open and lots of fresh air on the inside too. Fish and chips was really good. Hubby liked his poutine, and son liked the lamb pot pie. The sticky toffee pudding...More
We attended with a group from work, we were able to reserve a table for eight. It was happy hour until 6:00 on this Friday night. They had specials on good local brewery beverages and starters. We had three varieties of chicken wings and they...More
I enjoyed the drinks and the food with my girlfriend, but we could barely hear each other. I’m pretty sure I spat in the servers ear (accidentally!) trying to yell my order in her ear. Even with my mouth as close to her eardrum as...More
A great place to go for a pre-dinner or late-night drink. Makes a great meeting spot if you're on a date or just want to stop in and sit at the bar for a quick night cap. Romantic. Hip. Great cocktails!
I haven’t experienced such a course in Vancouver. This is traditional Sunday roast! Back to my London days, it had been a routine for me. I’m happy to discover or re-connect with the tradition in North America. It is delicious and I won’t be critic...More
I really liked the feel of the place; exposed brick walls and dim lighting with a cute patio. The tables were a little close together for my liking. We went for happy hour which was until 7pm on a Sunday and the food was great....More
Joined freinds for preconcert drinks and appies. The avocado artichoke kale dip with naan bread was delicious. My hubby quite enjoyed the sassy molassy burger as well. Lots of interesting cocktails and craft beers to choose from. We liked the atmosphere and the big booth...More
We came for the Happy Hour and were not disappointed. There was a good selection of of daily feature cocktails for $7, House wine for $5 and daily selection of Main Street Beer for $3 or $5 depending on the size. We shared the chickpea...More
The birthday girl chose the destination. Three sisters-in-law in tow. We arrived not knowing what to expect. What we experienced was nothing short of magnificent. The service, unreal. When the GM (unbeknownst to us) heard we were a birthday party of 4 - we were...More
Stopped in before dinner and I was pleasantly surprised on their extensive and creative cocktail menu. We also had the Scotch Egg and warm olives... delicious! They also have a great happy hour and late night menu.
This restaurant is located in the heart of Mt. Pleasant, close to many of Vancouver's hipster hotspots, murals and craft breweries. It is a good place to stop in for a drink or casual snack when you are exploring the area. It is a nice...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d786583-Reviews-The_Cascade_Room-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Charlatan,"Caesars and coffee were excellent. Eggs benny on biscuits were a nice change from the usual, and the side potatoes were tasty but not greasy. Cheery service.
You could be forgiven for expecting pub grub. But the menu here is excellent. Foodie-focused updates to old fashioned comfort foods. This pub is a great place to come for a proper meal. The heated sheltered patio makes for great people watching. Good service too....More
Perhaps it was they were busy, but the service was seriously lacking. The servers were cordial and friendly, they were their masks however, we were forgotten. We asked for outdoor seating and they have two kinds. Benches along the side of the building with plexiglass...More
Had the best time sitting at Ali's bar. Great drinks, And awesome vibes. Thanks for the great experience.
I’ve been to the charlatan many times now as I live close by. It’s one of my go to restaurants/bars when meeting friends. The little outside area is a great place to sit during the summer, however the seats aren’t overly comfortable, but that doesn’t...More
Great pub offering a good choice of local craft ales and excellent food at affordable. Always a good atmosphere and great service.
Popped in here on a rainy Friday night and it was hopping. We were given a table but decided to just sit at the bar as we only wanted a drink. It is loud and noisy. Staff were friendly and our order was taken Quickly....More
The Drive is full of restaurants and The Charlatan is one of them that you’ll find easy to enjoy with any type of crew in tow. Beers are local and I hope this trend never ends. The menu is cool and contemporary, including cauliflower wings,...More
I walked into this place alone one night looking for a meal and a few drinks. The Bar man , Andy, was great. He recommended a couple of craft beers and I had the wild boar tacos to eat. Both beer and food were great...More
We were a large group looking for late lunch on a bank holiday afternoon and this was the first place that had enough space to take us. Service was friendly enough, possibly not enough staff on at the time, but the main issue was the...More
Ran in to this place by accident. The service was great, the food was tasty, and the drinks where excellent. I will come back for sure the next time I’m in town.
On a weekend, this place was packed- seemed our waitress was the only one serving food and drinks to the lower half. Our food was overdone and drinks went dry. Good atmosphere and the manager did come to apologize and comp one of our meals-...More
Really loved our meal here during a recent visit to Vancouver! The server was outstanding, really informative and helpful and she let us taste the various beer and ale selections before ordering. They have a fine lineup including some great local brews, really worth exploring....More
2nd time here - friendly staff, upbeat energy and ambiance and not your same old menu. It is casual flair but presented creatively and priced at great value. A nice go-to on the drive!
Garden variety local bar/pub with decent selection of beers and a recently revamped menu. Pulled pork poutine is really great, and there are a number of other delicious things on the new menu. Service is pretty consistent. The large, partially shaded patio is open late...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d924308-Reviews-The_Charlatan-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Chinese Tea Shop,"My family visited the Chinese Tea Shop on May 4, 2023 as part of a Chinatown Cultural and Food tour (Viator, A Wok Around Town, BTW is an excellent tour). My two adult children, my wife, and I thoroughly enjoyed our visit to the store...More
We appreciate your recommendation to make an effort to visit our tea shop when in Vancouver. We believe that experiencing different cultures through their traditional practices, such as tea ceremonies, adds a unique and enriching dimension to any journey. We hope to have the opportunity...More
If you are looking to learn more about Chinese tea and have access to excellent quality tea, this is the place. Daniel has many varieties of tea and specializes in Pu Erh. As an experienced tea drinker, you will have the chance to exchange knowledge...More
This was our last stop on our Wok Around Chinatown tour. A beautiful little shop. Daniel is very knowledgeable about the teas and where they come from as well as how to properly make tea. An extensive selection of teas and tea pots. Furthermore, you...More
Thank you for sharing your feedback about our tea shop. We're delighted to hear that it was the last stop on your tour and left a lasting impression on you.
Daniel's shop is special. It offers best quality teas and utensils. It could be considered as a Chinese tea museum. All staff is very knowledgeable .and friendly. Don't miss great tea testing, to learn about different Chinese tea ceremonies. Highly recommended to visitors and locals...More
Daniel's tea shop was the last stop on our Wok around Chinatown tour, nothing like saving the best for last. Daniel explained the real art of making tea and demonstrated (and we followed) how to properly drink tea. It was a great experience. His tea...More
He truly exemplified one of great skill in the tea ceremony. Not only did he know it, he explained it well. It was a truly enjoyable experience and no pressure at all to purchase anything...just an exchange of knowledge. However, his store is also wonderful.
This was the first time I had seen a tea demonstration and it was so interesting! Daniel is super friendly and extremely knowledgeable on tea. This is a must do for any tea drinker!
As part of a wonderful walking tour we made a visit to this lovely tea shop. The tea tasting and presentation was fabulous. We learned so much about the tea culture in China Would recommend this shop to all those who love tea and for...More
To start off with words can't even begin to describe the customer service that my family received when we came to this adorable tea shop. Daniel was so friendly and knowledgeable and helpful and answered all of our questions we had about our tea we...More
I have always thought that the tiny Chinese teapots were beautiful, but I must admit I never thought about how they could serve tea to a number of people. Daniel walked us through the process and history of tea service. And his tea selection is...More
My wife loves tea, I'd be fine in a world without tea. We (she) stopped in on a whim and I burned up time looking at some expensive aged teas and various items in the store while my wife shopped. She picked out a few...More
Very rarely do you encounter a business that is truly special. I had the pleasure of trying some incredibly good white tea at The Chinese Tea Shop. Daniel, the owner, knows his tea. He will teach you the correct way to brew it and the...More
If you like your tea this store is a must visit. Daniel the owner is very knowledgeable and friendly. He let me sample a good number of fine teas, puerhs and oolongs. Great place to learn more about tea or if you are a tea...More
I am a tea lover. While visiting Vancouver from the States, I happened upon this store. My husband tagged along and reluctantly came in. We met Daniel, the owner. He was inviting and knowledgeable. I finally know why my tea sometimes tasted bitter. Daniel taught...More
If you like tea and the Chinese tea ceremony, go to this shop while in Vancouver. At the periphery of Chinatown, it is a neat store. Read about it in National Geographic Traveller and since I love tea especially tea from China and India, my...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2065655-Reviews-The_Chinese_Tea_Shop-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Corner Stone Bistro,"Very local vibe! Loved coming here in the morning and grab a cup of tea. They just introduced a fun new menu with delicious brunch and tacos!
Had a great time with live music at the bistro. They have a schedule of local and visiting musicians who play on certain nights. The bistro is normally a breakfast / lunch spot. Nice covered patio for summer. The food is what I would describe...More
This is a great local spot round the corner. The breakfast was good. The eggs were cooked well and the hashbrowns are those good cubes ones that are well seasoned. A good standard breakfast. : ) Probably my favorite part though was that they were...More
My friend discovered this place earlier. Off the beaten path. I ordered a roast beef sandwich which was good but would've been better if I opted to get it grilled. Next time. My friend ordered a quiche she loved and an apple pastry. Wasn't made...More
Warm and family place! Excellent Costumer Service by the owner and the staff!. Delicious Menu and Convenient location in a family neighbourhood.
I dined here for dinner for the first time with 8 friends from the Pemberton Heights neighbourhood. They all eat here regularly and were able to tell me about their favourite menu items. I was told more than once that the steak frit with peppercorn...More
Nice casual neighbourhood spot. The service was a little slow, but the place was busy and they only have two waiters/servers. The menu is small with a few mains and some more pub style food (burger, fish and cauliflower tacos). I understand the menu changes...More
We were renting a holiday home just up the road so stumbled upon this place by accident on a walk around our neighbourhood. Glad we did as we used it daily while we were there! Great selection of food although we didn’t stay for dinner...More
Full disclosure... we live in Pemberton Heights and have been coming to here for years. But this place has been steadily improving its menu each time we go! It was a quiet hot summer Thursday night when we decided to beat the heat, skip the...More
Love the neighbourhood location, lovely gardens/patio, funky interior, and mix of deli food for purchase plus menu items. But we've eaten here a couple of times and the service is very disorganized/slow. Number one rule of brunch service is to get some liquids to the...More
DELICIOUS DELIGHTFUL UNFORGETTABLE experience in this back to the 50's corner store turned bistro. They are now serving LUNCH and my first time there with a friend proved to be memorable and tasty experience topped w a lovely glass of vino. The silent partner popped...More
This is a quaint spot off the beaten track in Pemberton Heights. It has a small grocery and candy section and does coffee, tea and food. The prices are very reasonable and the food is good. Service can be slow if there is a rush...More
We are relatively new residents to North Van and my husband found this restaurant online while looking for something else. Just a few minutes away and lured by the reviews on Corner Stone, we had brunch with friends today and enjoyed this casual neighbourhood eatery....More
Tucked in a residential neighbourhood. Really friendly service, sunny patio, yummy benny with quality eggs and obviously homemade hollandaise. Solid brunch, now curious to return and try dinner.
We went out of our way to check out the Corner Stone Bistro for lunch. Walked in thinking what a nice place! Staff completely ignored us and then we slowly left. Oh well, maybe it should be renamed Corner Stoned Again Bistro!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d4307961-Reviews-The_Corner_Stone_Bistro-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Deck Kitchen + Bar,"Unexpected stopover in Vancouver and found this restaurant at our hotel. Superb location, outlook and food. Service second to none. Thank you Brenda. Greg and Beth
Loved the meal we had there while staying at the Pacific Gateway. Very accessible to the hotel. Service was good.
Brenda was an excellent server and the food was excellent. Convenient location to the pacific gateway hotel. Would definitely recommend.
We had a very pleasant lunch last week. The food was delicious and the service was excellent. The view was amazing.
Most hotel restaurants are awful. The Deck isn’t exactly part of the hotel, it's a destination for the young richmond crowd as well as travellers. The place with indoor and outdoor seating. Interesting menu, good cross section of good, not just bar grub. The wine...More
This used to be called something else, and recently was redone and rebranded. We enjoyed our visit - it is well decorated, the food was delicious, and the server (Gabriela) was fantastic!
Air Canada left me stranded in Vancouver tonight, and comped my bill here - I had a lovely time sitting at the bar enjoying the atmosphere and live music, the bartender had some great recommendations for local beers, and I tried the bread with pea...More
I am almost lost in words on how amazing my experience was at The Deck Kitchen + Bar. What a warm welcome coming into the restaurant, the door magically opened as we walking in. We got sat right away on a huge warm and cozy...More
Thank you Kristen and thanks to the manager Daniel and the Chef who made us early Dine Out Vancouver dinner! Love the food and the special arrangements.
Food was excellent...service was excellent...a bit expensive for lunch but worth it! I would visit here again when in Vancouver.
Great service, great for and Janine was super nice, she pampered us a lot :)) she had us made the dishes we fancied and was sooooo nice If you visit ask for her The menu ain’t that big but is VERY good
The food was great as was the service. Janine & Sean were both excellent. I had the Cashew Chicken & it was to die for! The only thing we weren't pleased with was the wine list. They only have wine by the glass at 5...More
We shared a flatbread, fried rice and the cauliflower~ everything was amazing! Janine was fantastic and sitting on a (covered and heated) deck on the river in January is the BEST!
This was a fun restaurant nice bar to sit at if your dining alone. It was a very wet night so it was nice not having to go out of the hotel for dinner.
We were looking for a restaurant to serve a classic Christmas dinner and this place did just that! We enjoyed our family Christmas dinner and dessert.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d15132166-Reviews-The_Deck_Kitchen_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
The Diamond,"Max, Connor and Kam made our experience at the bar fantastic! Food and cocktails were great! I'll definitely be going back next time I'm in Vancouver.
It’s a really great atmosphere with great service. The drinks were not cheap but very strong which is nice. Really hot inside though
Very bad organization, disappointed! We expected a lot more then we experienced! Only good was bartender at that place!
Our friends recommended the diamond to us for great relaxed atmosphere vibe and cocktails. It’s was a unique spot with good food, variety of drinks. I did not have the cocktails but my friends did and liked them. Service can be slow but, it was...More
Great drinks, mediocre food, but worst service of any bar in all of Vancouver. I came here with friends and we were all charged regular prices for drinks during happy hour, and the server refused to adjust them as she insisted they were entered 1...More
I went with a couple of friends, we'd never been in Vancouver but had been told The Diamond was fun. I confess we went on the early side before it got heaving with people, and I suspect it is a real late-night fun spot, but...More
I came in late on a saturday night with my girlfriend. It was busy and we were seated quickly. What was about to follow was the most unprofessional, rude, and horrendous service I have ever experienced. I started off with a double hendrix and soda....More
Stopped off for great cocktails,an unusual selection made by knowledgeable staff and served by chatty staff
Iv been there a couple of times. The drinks are great and i love their charcuterie board, i always order that! it is amazing.
Two rooms, each with a little bar, on the top floor. At night, the indoor lighting creates an intimate atmosphere. Music, mercifully, is not too loud. The main attraction is the selection of whiskey, bourbon, gin-based cocktails, some of them designed in the early 1900ies....More
Brian served us up two absolutely fantastic cocktails in this first floor bar/restaurant overlooking the square. Hubby had the cool & refreshing Buck Buck mule and I had a deliciously delicate Jade Statue. Excellent.
My daughter took me here for drinks on a Friday after work. Couldn't have found a better place to start our weekend together! The drinks menu is extensive and the friendly service helped me to find something that suited me just perfectly. The atmosphere felt...More
Bar-hopping in the Gastown district is easy to do, so we decided to try out this spot referred to us by the locals. We are very glad we went. Hip vibe, fantastic music offered to us by the house DJ, good strong drinks served elegantly...More
This experience was a lovely addition to my weekend. My husband and I popped in here for a pre-dinner cocktail. When I asked the server what kind of gins they had, a manager promptly arrived at my table to describe the vast selection. Leticia was...More
We arrived at around 11:30am on a week day. So not exactly rush hour. No reservation, no wait. The waitress was very knowledgeable and helpful. Even offering something that was no longer on the menu because she thought I'd enjoy it. I did. I was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2069959-Reviews-The_Diamond-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Dirty Apron,"Visiting Vancouver for the 1st time and wanting a delicious breakfast, we stumbled upon this hidden gem after seeing the lineup to another restaurant that we had googled. Pleasantly surprised at the simplicity of the menu and the extraordinarily delicious breakfast choices!
After dining at the two Dirty Apron outposts in YVR, and being quite disappointed with the food (see my reviews on this site), I just had to come here – to the original – and see what all the fuss was about. I mean, when...More
This restaurant was yummy and convenient. I had a cheesy melt sandwich and a garden salad, both were good. Liked that it was an option in the hotel.
Stumbled across this place by chance. Had spotted a place close by a few days earlier but when I went to go there people were queuing half way down the street. Must be very good there too or else they’re handing out free food. Didn’t...More
Great jazzy atmosphere extremely good food and verry nice staff 😊 Happy we've been here. Gladly again.
It is difficult sometimes, said our Chef instructor, to be appreciative when others cook for us, especially when we have suggestions that we know would make the meal being presented even better. “Obviously you haven’t been to our house around dinner time!” shouted my wife...More
Went to their cooking class is well worth the price. You learn tons plus get a great meal some decent wine or beer which is included in price. Also the chef/ teacher is very knowledgeable and entertaining. This was our second class here and will...More
We came to the city a day early before Valentine's Day 2020 so I wanted to use my gift certificate for the Gourmet Picnic Basket and take it to our room. Wow What a big basket for two. Great idea. We are going to order...More
I've eaten in this cozy little cafe adjacent to a cooking school four times and enjoyed all four meals. Heads up, the ""Huevos Rancheros"" on the breakfast menu is actually just Shakshuka with chorizo, which I wish was more clearly described. The chicken baguette is...More
Originally had walked passed here to visit the Jam Cafe. Saw the queue and walked back to this deli. Not only is it reasonably priced, there is no service charge (tip at till if you wish), the staff are friendly and food delicious! If we...More
Great Food, no waiting like in many other breakfast places in Vancouver. Fun staff, great quality products and really good vfm. Thx guys!
We originally lined up for Jam Cafe. The line was so long we felt it wasn’t worth it and a waste of time. Dirty Apron happened to be next door. So glad we skipped Jam. Dirty Apron was great. We had the Huevos Rancheros. It...More
Really enjoyed all the sandwiches our family ordered (we each got something different and shared bites all around). The baguettes in particular were delicious! Cute atmosphere but I am sure it gets really tight during those peak eating times.
This was a fun evening where an entertaining chef guided us and about 14 others through preparation and eating a five course Italian meal. Each course was demonstrated and the we were sent to our cooking stations to replicate, then we returned to the dining...More
Got the salmon and sausage biscuits to go. They are like pastry sandwiches! Egg and meat all in 1. Very filling and good to go with coffee. Try it!
Good afternoon, Thank you so much for leaving such a great review! We are happy to hear that you enjoyed our beloved salmon biscuit and hope to seeing you again soon! All the best, Your Dirty Apron Team",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2477802-Reviews-The_Dirty_Apron-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Distillery Bar + Kitchen,"Had brunch here during a whistle stop stay in Vancouver. Lovely Salmon Benny in a nice spot and a lovely building. Coffee needs work but overall very enjoyable.
Booked for a Saturday evening, and got a nice table on the terrace. Food was amazing! Try the bocconcini garlic bread. Good service. Good food. Good drinks. Definitely going back!
We couldn't find a table anywhere. They accommodated us. They are friendly and welcoming. I had a chicken/ mushroom bolognese. It was yummy. My husband had rigatoni bolognese and he like his. I would highly suggest you try it.
Pasta Sunday's is a must experience where all of the pasta dishes are $16.00. We sat inside which I would highly recommend, as the bar has beautiful green leather seating, and woodwork, and a gorgeous chandelier adorns a classy bar. Our table enjoyed the spaghetti...More
The Distillery We dropped by for a drink but the nice environment and beautiful design made us stay for their Sunday special which was great as well as the excellent service. Definitely worthwhile visiting!
It all starts at the door and if you can't get that right then I don't know what to tell you. I must say that the manager try to make it right and the wait staff was amazing.
Went there for brunch. The patio is nice, and so was the cocktail. The food was ok, but no substitution was accommodated. I just wanted to have some greens instead of fried potatoes. Anyway the food was a bit too greasy for my taste. I’d...More
Went there for brunch and sat at the patio as indoor seating was banned. The patio waz so nice! Order scrambled eggs and bloody mary, they have their own jalapeño vodka which added to the spicy taste of the cocktail. Both the presentation and taste...More
Without any recommendations previously, we came for lunch today. .wow wow wow..Highly reccomend. 5 stars from start to finish. Great food, great service. Will be back for sure. A hidden gem of sorts!
Located in the busy entertainment district, this place is busy and noisey. It attracts young urban Yappies. Popular among singles too. Great place to make new friends. Typically pricy too.
Weary travellers, we wanted a little bar or café and stumbled upon the Distillery. In late fall it was lovely sitting in their sheltered terrace. Gorgeous wine served, and it was Happy Hour, and delicious rolling snacks. I can only imagine how nice a full...More
We enjoyed the Spaghetti Clams and Fettucine Gorgonzola, plus the Tiramisu. A funky little place that we highly recommend
We booked here after reading the other reviews and were not disappointed. The food was good as was the beer, and both were reasonably priced, but the thing that stood out for us at this establishment was the service. The young blonde lady that served...More
I ate here on a Thursday night. I ordered Orecchiette with italian sausage. The pasta was cooked perfectly (al dente) and the sauce was beautiful. It's in a great location in Yaletown, with nice outside seating, and the service was friendly and attentive. One of...More
Was very relaxing on the patio and we happened to visit during happy hour so it was good to try the local beer and tasty snacks. Yam fries were great as was the bruschetta toasts. Continental style décor, very pleasant5 staff.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4496385-Reviews-The_Distillery_Bar_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Eatery,"We loved everything about this restaurant! The food was delicious, the music was amazing and the decor was something else to see! Our kids enjoyed especially loved playing I spy!
I think this restaurant needs to up their game with their service. After we had been seated, our server served us warm water that was basically over flowing. Not one server dropped us down a menu we had to find them and get them ourselves....More
Finally went to the Eatery after years of my friend telling me to go. Maybe things have changed since covid, but it was very underwhelming. To start, we were wedged into a walled booth that was lit only by a dim red bulb, which they...More
Honestly if they didn’t have such a wide variety of amazing sushi I would of walked out. We were sat, and warm water was slammed on to the table filled to the top so it spilled all over our table. No menus, a server came...More
the food is amazing and the music even more. Jalapeno poper was my favorite plate. they had tons of different sushi to choose from the menu. great restaurant for family and friends
We have been here before and while the ambience is goofy and different the food is fine enough so we decided to get take out for a change. They forgot to pack part of our order so when we got home and called our options...More
My niece and her boy friend invite me out for early Xmas diner ,it is not your usual sushi restaurant ,there is so many Japanese restaurants in the area ! ( Why this one ??????? ) the safety guidelines well follow , they only operating...More
15/10. Had a couple rolls, shared the japayama fries and a couple mojitos and I am set. Been here heaps before. Thanks again.
Not a good experience. 2 of us ordered a mild curry and one a medium. The mild curries were 3x hotter than the medium.Mouths on fire and stomach turning. When we said it to the server we were given a reply “well you know it...More
I went with a group of friends and the atmosphere is unusual for a sushi restaurant: it is a bit dark and it seems like a pub but it is strongly recommended! The fish is really good quality and super fresh and they make really...More
Have been here a few times and I love it. Its a fun atmosphere, filled with music, art, music and all around good stuff. If you want something quiet and intimate, this is not the place. Fun start to a night out or simply some...More
Huge menu of basically Japanese and asian food. Some very unique sushi rolls. Very good sashimi. Good beer selection. The place is super trendy, very busy and ridiculously loud with thumping DJ music. Being so busy, the servers were desperately trying to keep everyone happy...they...More
This restaurant is amazing. You can listen music while you eat a very good food. There are a big variety of sushi, you loved ""tataki ataki"" and ""I go coconut"". The prawn gyoza and Toro sashimi are delicious. Have fun and eat excellent Japanese food!
This is an eclectically decorated and moderately noisy sushi place on W Broadway. The sashimi was fresh and amazing. We were there on a Wednesday and a lot of the rolls were on special. Tuna Turno and Broadway rolls were yummy!
The food here is divine! the menu has alot of variety but definitely try the sushi! For someone who loves Sashimi - you will be in heaven!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d779073-Reviews-The_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Edge Social Grille & Lounge,"We stayed at the best Western and walked into the restaurant for breakfast. The restaurant was bright and spacious. The waiter was friendly and helpful. My friend and I each ordered the Canadian omelet with breakfast potatoes and toast. Everything was delicious and well prepared....More
Ask for Mel, he's the best server on Granville. I own a club half a block away from the Edge, we've been coming in to have our staff meets for years. Staff is always friendly, food is excellent, mind you the menu needs to be...More
Our group of 6 enjoyed a great breakfast together. The price is right and the service was excellent. We will be back
The food was awesome. The service was terrible. My husband wrote a letter to the management. They apologized and comped the meal.More
Dear Janice, Thank you for your feedback in regard to your experience at our restaurant. We apologize that we could not meet all your expectations during your experience with us. Your feedback is very important to us as it helps us to see where we...More
Ive eaten here twice, 2 years apart, and both times I've had the pleasure of being served by Melvin. (sp?) He is always so calm and patient and has great recommendations if you are drawing a blank on what to get. The Salmon burger is...More
Dear Guest, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. We are pleased to hear that you found Melvin’s service to be helpful and friendly. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food...More
Had two evening meals and breakfast here, as our hotel didnt have a restaurant. Really great staff, very friendly and food was really good. Good, varied menu as well.More
Dear Customer, Thank you for your positive feedback in regard to the Edge Social Grille & Lounge, we will pass on your feedback to the chef and his team. We are delighted that you enjoyed all your dinning experiences with us. We appreciate you taking...More
We had dinner and breakfast at the Edge. The menu is not very extensive but the quality of the food is good. They have a small kids menu as well, but don’t expect to much. Service was very good on both occasions.More
Dear Guest, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. We are pleased to hear that you found the service to be friendly. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food quality, we...More
We walked in and were seated almost immediately. Good booth. Service was great, meals were very good. One tiny thing though, table was a bit sticky when we sat down. Just take a bit more time when cleaning tables.More
Dear Harold, We are happy that you enjoyed your experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food and service. We are delighted to hear your positive feedback about your meals with us. Guest...More
We've eaten at this restaurant many times; its central to where we usually stay. In the heart of Vancouver, its reasonable. We've had breakfast, lunch and/or dinner at The Edge and would go back again.More
I had supper and breakfast at this restaurant located inside the Chateau Granville. Portions were large and good and prices are reasonable. Service was friendly and good.More
Dear Guest, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. We are pleased to hear that you found the service to be fast and friendly. Thank you for your praise in regard to our menu,...More
Had eggs benny. It’s in the best western building. There was two pieces of cut orange for garnish that looked like they had been cut the day before. I wouldn’t have eaten them anyway but they didn’t look good. Service was fine. If this was...More
Dear Glen, Thank you for your feedback in regard to your experience at our restaurant. We apologize that we could not meet all your expectations during your dining experience with us. Your feedback is very important to us as it helps us to see where...More
We had breakfast on several occasions because we were staying in the Best Western Plus Chateau Granville in which this restaurant is located. The breakfast menu is quite extensive and has some varied choices from Belgian waffles to three-egg omelets to a Jogger's Breakfast of...More
Dear RiderGlen, We are happy that you enjoyed your breakfast experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food and service. We are delighted to hear your positive feedback in regard to your dishes....More
The food choices were varied and servers willing to make adjustment so you were able to get what you wanted.More
Dear Guest, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. We are pleased to hear that you appreciated the menu options and our friendly service. We will inform our chef and his team of your...More
We were staying at the hotel that is associated with this restaurant and went here both mornings for breakfast. I was pleasantly surprised with how good the food was! Service was good and waiters were friendly. The eggs benedict was great as was the steel-cut...More
Dear Kelly, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food and service. We are delighted to hear your positive feedback in regard to your dishes,...More
We were kind of late to walk for breakfast far from the hotel thus decided to give it a try. A real good surprise. The omelette was full of flavor same for the pancakes which larger than expected came with a bunch of fruits. Service...More
Dear Guest, We are happy that you enjoyed your dining experience at our restaurant, The Edge Social Grille & Lounge. We are pleased to hear that you found the service to be fast and courteous. Thank you for your praise in regard to our food,...More",26,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1898879-Reviews-The_Edge_Social_Grille_Lounge-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Famous Warehouse,"Had a great lunch! Great music, great drinks and great cheap eats! Server was super friendly and knowledgeable.
Our flight got in late on a Sunday and after taking the train and checking into our downtown hotel, we weren't sure what would be open. We happened by this great bar with food and couldn't be happier. We ordered several of the appetizers and...More
My husband and I loved this place. It’s not the fanciest or the diviest but it’s got good, loud music, attentive bar staff and cheap eats. They have a live DJ playing videos along with the tracks and a good crowd which gives this place...More
We have eaten here 3 times now and never been disappointed. The burgers are great, chicken wings spectacular, and pasta perfect. The drinks prices are also like happy hour all the time Fine dining it isn't, but the atmosphere is really cool, the staff great...More
This is a place for cheap but delicious food and unpretentious drinks. Usually, they have a V-Jay playing music videos which is super fun.
This is a cool spot. The reviews are correct, in that, the music is loud (sit on the patio, or as close to it as you can if you want to have a conversation). I asked the waitress what she liked the best and she...More
Great prices for food, between 4 and 6 C$ for a full meal. Nice Service and great tasting meals. Enjoyed it two times in three days.
We spent one night in Vancouver and ended up coming here at night and again for lunch we loved it so much. It is kind of a dive-y hole in the wall with a lot of charm, loud music and colourful characters working there. The...More
We try not to eat at any chain restaurants when we are travelling & always ask the locals for guidance. Guess our tour guide didn’t care that we would be taking teens to a bar. Super loud good mucus but couldn’t have a conversation. Food...More
Prices are really cheap, girls working there are really hot but the music is always loud if you dont like it, suggest you to seat outside... I also suggest you to go with friend and very excited because if you are not, you are not...More
Easily the best place for a sit-down cheap eat in Downtown Vancouver, with quick service for the most part, and a great vibe. The staff seem to enjoy being there, working together, which makes a big difference. Normally have nice tunes playing too - 90s,...More
We went to the El Furniture Warehouse tonight to have a drink and a burger. Me and my boyfriend ordered 2 burgers one with an upgrate to a yam fries instead of regular ones / one special drink priced $5 - our bill all together...More
Good price for a quick lunch. Good, hot and tasty. Decent price for beer as well. Another place for beer 🍻🍺
A delicious meal, at a give away price , served by friendly and attentive wait person. Visited another in Calgary and just had to try this one in Vancouver. Just as wonderful. Being a Sunday it was really bopping but we were in and out...More
Arrived at the restaurant and there was a line, were told we could go straight in if we sat at the bar. We took them up on the offer as we were still able to order and eat food from the bar. Great atmosphere with...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4022653-Reviews-The_Famous_Warehouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Farmer's Apprentice,"The food was pretty decent, although it may not be worth the price. Their cocktails are hand crafted and delicious! We ordered multiple items, but left not so full and we paid a very large bill. The atmosphere is quite nice, but is a very...More
We have known about this place for years; we live a 10 min walk away but never stopped in. We did this past Saturday and were pleasantly surprised. Some of the food (mon kfish bacon on potato salad??) was just amazing and so creative. We...More
Spectacular on steroids! Tastebud dance party that one must experience. Without question one of the best restaurants I have had the pleasure of experiencing. Gather your friends and family, book tables, order family style and let the fabulous team take care of the rest. Very...More
Innovative and delicious food served in a relaxed and friendly small restaurant. We ordered the wonderful house bread, smoked olives, shishito peppers, a roasted tomato salad, and slow cooked beef served with baba ganoush, torpedo onions and grilled peaches followed by raspberry sorbet and pineapple...More
I’ve no doubt said this in a review of some other exceptional restaurants but places like this require a sixth star as I’ve doled out some 5 stars to places that while superb weren’t at the incredibly good level of Farmer’s Apprentice. The food was...More
Portions are small and perfectly crafted. Every dish is interesting and creative. Great place to share so you can try lots of different things. A wonderfully small and special place.
I love love love the concept of a tasting menu and wish my hometown of Portland had a larger variety of modestly priced options. The Farmer's Apprentice has fantastic service, innovative you delightful dishes, and a price tag most folks can splurge on. My review...More
The Farmer's Apprentice had a wonderful atmosphere, with an elegant and clean look, combined with familiar home touches. The restaurant is intimate, with the addition of a 70's style receiver and record set, playing records throughout the evening adding a personal touch. With a record...More
The meals are served as a series of courses, including vegan, meat, fish and vegetarian. We shared a 6 course pescatarian and a 5 course vegan offering. Every bite was totally delicious.
Delicious, perfectly cooked food and gotta’ love the tasting menu concept! Each dish is a fun surprise and completely amazing. I ordered the vegetarian menu, which I loved even though I’m not actually a veg., and my dining companions had the menu that included some...More
Just loved our dinner. We got to try one of everything and it was all delic. Really had a great time. Service was perfect warm and friendly and knowledgeable. As Bay Area foodies we know good creative food and theses guys have it.
This is a great spot the locals know about. The food is sourced locally in B.C. the space is small and comfortable. They have a great selection of records they play some excellent music from. The dishes we had were all fantastic. The smoked salmon...More
I've been here twice now, and both times I was very impressed. It's a great menu, and a well paced evening (expect to dine for 2 - 2.5 hours) with all 7 courses. The service was amazing both visits... very knowledgable with the wine list...More
In a very casual and"" faux negligé"" but re-invented atmosphere, the restaurant tries to be part of a trend that is actually...obsolete. Very expensive for the originality and the chef's efforts...
The omnivore tasting menu with wine pairings was a tasty and interesting meal, served at a leisurely (but not slow!) pace over maybe 1.5 hours. The food was all well prepared and presented elegantly. The outside space is a small casual deck with 4-5 table,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4745057-Reviews-The_Farmer_s_Apprentice-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Firewood Cafe,"We were visiting from out of town and the pizza we find in restaurants at home are terrible. I really wanted to try a pizza done in a brick oven and the pizzas from Firewood did not disappoint. Homemade sauce crispy thin crust, and the...More
Ordered 2 small pizzas for my wife and I and it was plenty of food. The pizzas were very well made and tasty. Was nice to be able to watch them make and flip the pizzas in the air. Seems like a nice family business....More
We now regularly go to this restaurant as the pizza and the pasta are absolutely amazing! Would highly recommend to pizza and pasta lovers! Our favourite is the Chicago pizza.
The first pizza we had was outstanding. One of the best we can remember having. They gave a great recommendation for breakfast the next day and so the next evening we returned for Meat Lasagna and a small pizza. To be honest, the second night’s...More
Friends ordered from The Firewood while I was visiting this weekend. It was their normal go-to for pizza. It was excellent, from the crust to the toppings I have nothing but wonderful things to say. We had the hawaiian, a veggie and one with feta...More
We shared pizza, pasta and salad at this local eatery. The pizza was crust was charred and thin-ish and loaded with veggies. the pasta was over saucy but tasty. on the other hand the caesar salad was just way over dressed. Service was good and...More
Delicious non greasy thin crust pizza with speedy friendly service. We stopped in here on the way to Yuk Yuks for a quick bite. No liquor license but the pizza was delivered to the table so quickly we didnt have time to really notice! Just...More
When we arrived we tried to order one order of garlic cheese bread & wanted to order a small pizza with half & half toppings. We were told you can only do half & half on a large pizza, very strange to us but we...More
We ate in the restaurant. Small, just a few tables, but warm and nice atmosphere. Fantastic pizza! Probably the best one in Vancouver. Service was so friendly and nice. We will go there again for sure!
As soon as I see the firewood, I go there with my eyes closed, as I know that it's going to be great. We usually order as there not many tables in the restaurant, but it's worth the wait to get a cozy wooden table,...More
My husband and I ordered three large pizzas (chef's special, Chicago and a vegetarian one) and all 3 pizzas very extremely dry because they were burned. We could barely taste the toppings again because the pizzas were completely burned. Not coming back, we even were...More
Our host recommended this place and we weren't disappointed. Lovely crisp base and great toppings. The tomato base also had a really interesting flavour that mixed well with the stone baked base. We ate at the shop rather than takeaway. It's not really setup as...More
Ordered Firewood Cafe pizza to go. Great Italian pizza, greek salad and garlic bread. Showed up quickly. Price was reasonable with a nice quality meal. Thank you.
We order 20 gourmet pizzas for our student recruitment night. The pizzas were awesome with so many excellent kinds. The boxes also came with some slices of lemon so you could squeeze them on your chicken pizza, etc. Tasty, hot, and delicious. The pizza price...More
It's nice when you have a great surprise when you choose a restaurant. We were looking for tasty pizza cooked in a wood fire oven. We got what we were looking for and more. Judging from the patrons lined up for take out I now...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971699-Reviews-The_Firewood_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Flying Pig Olympic Village,"Ambience was good, we were sat very quickly on arrival howler service very slow (but pleasant). The food was good, we had the burger and then shared the beet salad, meatballs and pulled pork poutine (which was cold).
First time here. Came with colleagues. I had steelhead and they had mussels and fries. My fish was cooked to near perfection - not dry, seasoning was spot on. I did find the accompaniments on the cool side. Otherwise, very nice spot. Would come again!
I had the blackened steelhead trout and couscous salad. Well, it was supposed to be a couscous salad but was actually one big green salad The steelhead trout was good but a very puny portion. We had to wait 45 minute for our food due...More
I heard a lot about this restaurant, so we had a family dinner there. The atmosphere super nice, the service really good but the food not great. Our food rating was 6/10, no value for that price. Our whole party ordered a different meal, and...More
Anniversary dinner for two, chosen from a list of places that have moules frites. Nice walk from Skytrain, although driving would have been easy (A Saturday, can't speak for weekdays). Arrived 5:45, pleasantly surprised to see Happy Hour as an option. Also pleasantly surprised with...More
My wife and I had 2 take home Turkey Dinners and most of the fixings. Turkey, stuffing, vegetables and it was tasty and delicious. What was missing was cranberry salad. The service and preparation was very good. Staff were attentive to my food limitations and...More
I invited my two sons , two spouses and five grandchildren for lunch on a Saturday . The location at Olympic Village was perfect for us as we were attending from three different directions . The meal options was quite acceptable , meeting the needs...More
Visited on a very busy Thursday evening and as we had not booked (advisable!) we sat at the bar and had an enjoyable time. Watching the skill of the barman was theatre itself. Service was great and food very good but the different dishes varied...More
Thank you Barbara for taking the time to leave your feedback, we look forward to seeing you again soon!
Food was really tasty and well presented. Music was excessively loud that you had to struggle to hear the waitress. Nice selection of happy hour appies although the portion sizes were on the very small side. Especially the charcuterie plate, 3 small slices of paper...More
Hi Mario, Thank you for taking the time to leave a review, we appreciate the opportunity to learn from the feedback. We will be looking into the portions on our meat plates as yours clearly was not up to our standards. We look forward to...More
Went with three other friends/colleagues while in town for business. Service was excellent, food was good (we shared a bunch of appies) and overall a great experience. Complimentary bread and butter when we arrived, which is becoming less common these days but much appreciated! The...More
Hi Tugboatgirl (love the handle) Thanks for the kind works and honest feedback. We're so happy that you enjoyed the food and service and hope we can see you again soon. We understand your notes on the noise level and even though its typical for...More
Our party of three found the food to be good, not exceptional. But the service was terrific. Our server was attentive and personable, making for a great dining experience.More
Good day jksyoug - thanks for the feedback on your recent visit. We are very glad that the overall dining experience and service were so enjoyable. We hear your comment about the food being your lower ranking and we will make sure the Chef is...More
Great service and good food. The wine list has a number of Okanagan wines and a few others (French, Chile etc). The cocktail list is decent and the place is a good one if you need to have a conversation at the table (not too...More
Thank you so much for your feedback! We look forward to having you in again. Cheers
We were a group of 4 adults and two teenagers. I can’t speak highly enough of the service we received. The meals were delicious, well prepared and very tasty. We will return.
Thank you so much for your great feedback! Can't wait to have you back!
While the brunch menu seems a bit limited; all of the items were excellent and portions are large. Street parking was easy to find on a Sunday morning.
Thank you so much for your feedback. We are glad that you enjoyed the food!
We had a small year-end work function of 11 people at 4 p.m. which is during their happy hour. When I arrived, they told me that they prohibit ""large"" parties from accessing the happy hour menu which they did not mention when I booked over...More
We are very sorry to hear about your experience and the level of service you received from the moment you walked in. I will be following up with my management about what you were told in the beginning as it is not one of our...More",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7369614-Reviews-The_Flying_Pig_Olympic_Village-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Flying Pig Yaletown,"The hostess is NOT friendly. Wow! I wanted to ask a question and you would have thought that I slapped her. Not impressed.
We had group of 10 and we ordered platters of recommendations from our server who hit it spot on. the food was delicious and the service was very strong and they were very clear on the autograt which was very nice
Friendly staff, classy atmosphere, great food. Love the vibe here. Great place for a date or for the happy hour with your friends.
The Flying Pig could be called a gastropub since they are offering both food and drinks from a bar. Atmosphere is like in a busy and noisy bar but the food is surprisingly good. We had mussels and cod and both were very good. It...More
We went for happy hour our first night in Vancouver. Food (Mussels & meatballs) and beer (Red Truck Ale) were excellent value and absolutely scrumptious. We also ordered the Wild Mushroom Papardelle off the main menu. Fabulous! Our waitress Claudia was extremely attentive, friendly and...More
This was the best meal and service we experienced in Vancouver. Jeremy, our server was so professional and friendly. Their Sunday special of honey glazed ham with Mac & cheese was amazing. Excellent cocktails and wine.
As a young couple visiting Vancouver for the weekend the flying pig grabbed our attention for the positive reviews it had. As we entered the restaurant we seemed to be looked down upon for being younger. The waiter we had was rude my partner asked...More
The main dish, dessert, drinks, service, & ambience were fantastic! I’d be there at least once a week if I lived in Vancouver. Great happy hour, too. I don’t eat carbs so they graciously subbed a delicious salad to go with my salmon and fresh...More
Our mains of braised ribs and sliced veal were very well received. The maple sugar pie was exquisite.
Drew was amazing! Their happy hour is from 3-6 and the bites menu is very extensive. I highly recommend the Bison Carpaccio!
We dined at The Flying Pig pre-Covid and were very happy to see it survived the shutdowns. We started off with drinks and appetizers, The Fig and the Bear cocktail, a TFP Lager, the Bison Carpaccio, Three Pea Soup, and the Salt & Pepper Squid....More
We stopped into the Flying Pig on a chilly Friday afternoon for a brief respite. The space is pleasant, but maintains the Yaletown well-scrubbed theme, without breaking any boundaries. Yaletown reminds me of the Pearl District in Portland, upscale, cute, and innocuous, but sometimes familiarity...More
The food was amazing. My whole experience, on my many visits during my stay in Vancouver, was enhanced and made even better by all of the staff. Everyone was so friendly and welcoming.
I was on my last night of a four day tour of Vancouver. I discovered the Flying Pig as I walked back to my hotel and it looked a cool place to eat. I returned later for dinner and it was buzzing, I hadn’t booked...More
Really enjoyed our meal here. Great service and vibe. The beef roast dinner and chicken and chips were both really delicious!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2331816-Reviews-The_Flying_Pig_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Fountainhead Pub,"Simply amazing service. Dream was our server. We walked in to a dirty table she cleaned and had drinks within two minutes at high time on canada day. Amazing great value and service thank you Dream!!
Thoroughly enjoyed our dinner this first evening of our four day mini Vancouver vacation. Service was excellent and the meal exactly what we needed after an afternoon of wandering.
We’ve been coming to this pub for years and have always had the very best service. The food has never been great and not consistent. The fries and onion rings are good but recently they were terrible. Hopefully the chefs improve in the future.
This used to be my absolute favorite place to go eat. I just LOOOOVE the Regular J Burger and the fries have always been amazing. Now, it is most unfortunately, a sports bar. The fries are not salted (they weren't before ) and soggy (they...More
We frequented the Fountainhead a few times while we were there. It has a good vibe and great food. Most of the staff were friendly and respectful, but a couple had attitude. The best nights were when we had Mike DJ serve us and make...More
Really good food and cold beer. Wish I could have eaten here again. Wait staff friendly and good service too. Not overly pricey either.
OMG. Can the food be any worse, anywhere? Greasy, stale, and cold. Entire kitchen staff should be gone! Where is the manager? Asleep in the office? Nice staff, great location, ok decor. Don’t eat there but have a beverage.......
We went here as it is very conveniently located in downtown Vancouver and was close to our Hotel. It was very busy and the music was very loud. We couldn't find any seats. We tried to get a server to take our drink order and...More
Three or four of my friends and I go to this place almost every Friday night. It can be a little difficult to get a table. But with some patience, one generally comes up in ten to twenty minutes. Since they changed their menu and,...More
Hubby and I found this place near to our hotel when staying in Vancouver and loved it so much we went back twice! The atmosphere is very chilled, the bar/waiting staff were extremely attentive and the food and drink were second to none. Well worth...More
Great place to eat right on the street in a heated patio awesome service our waitress couldn’t do enough for us and the food wow the club sandwich was great and the onion rings where so fresh
I like this place because all are welcome. There is a Bartender by the name of Harlan who is really pleasant and friendly. He makes you feel like a good friend serving you a drink in his own place. Management is always visible and so...More
Nice atmosphere when sitting outside. Great burgers (veggie burger recommended!). Friendly staff and great prices (42$ for 2 burgers w/ fries and 2 drinks)
Great food, great service, friendly staff. Large selection of beers. Will go back here again many times.
Went with a group of friends, asked for a drink, he said it wasnt nice so asked for recommendation to which he replied im not going to make your decision for you make up your own mind. Then proceeded to take a tip from my...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709813-Reviews-The_Fountainhead_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The French Table,"Our friends reserved a table on a Saturday night for the 4 of us. Got a weird attitude right at check in - snippy, curt, unfriendly verging on rude. Carried right through with every interaction. It was like we were transported into a faulty towers...More
My first time to this restaurant, and my last. Our server, apparently the owner, had an attitude from the start. Ordinary interactions between customer and server were non-existent. Did he ask how the food was after I chose a dish he recommended? No. Did he...More
The food is superb. We had garlic prawns, bouillabaise and sauteed liver, as well as chocolate mousse. All were wonderful!
I had booked a table at the French Table for my sister and myself on her birthday. Reservation was for 6:30 pm and we were told upon arrival that we would have to finish by 8:00 pm for the next reservation. We had a wonderful...More
Good vibe and very friendly staff, and the food was delicious. We had outside seating and that was a good choice! Highly recommended.
We had a wonderful lunch/brunch today with Tim providing the most attentive, well-timed service and the kitchen creating, as alway, delicious food. The lobster bisque had such depth and flavour. Such a treat.
It was my birthday yesterday so.we went to the french table to celebrate as its always a lovely experience, but last night not so much. Now dont get me wrong the owner is a lovely lovely man very social and should be very proud of...More
The owner Herve Martin apparently has been in the business for decades. And apparently he doesn't care about the customers experience. We had dinner ON Valentines Day, where, the ""experience"" is possibly the most important part of the dinner. And when we received our Halibut,...More
Exquisite atmosphere and service. Brilliant family produced Pinot Noir from the Bourgogne. The foods from the baguette to dessert were outstanding. The French Table in Vancouver has outshined our restaurant experiences of French Burgundy of this fall season of 2021❣️
Booked this place over a month in advance for anniversary dinner. Was very excited to try on the basis of recommendation, and seemed a pleasant place on arrival, but appearances are deceiving. The worst service I’ve ever had in my life, let alone Vancouver. Rude...More
I wanted to give my boyfriend the French experience of the raclette, which we booked to have. Got there and they served us a bowl of melted cheese on plain potatoes. When I asked about it, the waiter condescendingly told me that they haven’t served...More
Waiter immediately had an awful attitude when we asked for a raclette (which we had specifically requested when booking). They served us a bowl with melted cheese on plain potatoes and claimed that they don’t do the full raclette experience. Nothing on the website mentioned...More
We came here for the first time and we were impressed. I felt like I was dining at a Parisian restaurant with delicious traditional French dishes. Everyone was impressed with the food. For starters, we had French onion soup & seared scallops. A couple of...More
Beautiful French restaurant, food and wine were excellent and the attention was superb. A must on your list if you are in Vancouver!
Our first visit to this nice restaurant. The food was good, but not amazing for a high end restaurant. The owner is very friendly, but we felt a bit crowded by him in these COVID days. He needs to be more respectful of social distancing.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2371140-Reviews-The_French_Table-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Galley Patio & Grill,"We came here after a long day of paddling and the atmosphere was perfect. Recommend the vegie burger and any beer they have on tap
This spot is in the Jericho Sailing Club, kind of off the beaten track and usually not very crowded. Very casual - you come for the view, and it is outstanding. Right on the water. Only reason not a 5* rating is that now you...More
It is not a big restaurant but the food is good and the view is fantastic! And it may inspire you to take some sailing lessons! We come here for lunch several times in the summer and though you may have to wait for a...More
The galley patio and grill is an ideal spot for a light or not so light lunch overlooking the sea and cityscape beyond. Offers a small but varied menu, with dishes clearly marked as being vegetarian, gluten free or vegan. We opted for the steelhead...More
Thisd restaurant is located right above Locarno beach. Water there is crystal clear, with sand like at the tropics. The view is amazing with the boat center just below, Burrard inlet with ships and planes and montains on the other side. The restaurant itself has...More
This upstairs café is self serve. It has a long balcony overlooking the water which helps. The food is deep fried but the café is well attended by jocks and people willing to overlook the food for the water.
Fabulous spot to enjoy great food at reasonable prices and amazing views from the terrace. Casual dining and friendly service.
The patio of The Galley features fantastic views of the city. Before choosing a table outside, however, you place an order inside for self service dining. A limited menu offers meals to tempt everyone's palate. And the food tastes great. Beverages include local craft beers...More
I've always enjoyed having beer & a quick meal in this fabulous location, until last night. My burger had the texture of a doormat, the fries were like eating kindling and the beer was flat. I was hungry but left most of my so-called food...More
A hidden gem in Vancouver at the Jericho Sailing Centre - awesome patio with marvelous views across English Bay - excellent food choices at a reasonable price for the location. Friendly, helpful staff! Take a walk on the beach - stop here for a cold...More
My Daughter took me there as a belated birthday get together, we went for a ride on our bikes out to Jericho Beach and decided to go to the Jericho Sailing Club, I had never been before and I must say the location is spectacular...More
Each year the prices seem to increase. You have to order at the cash, get a vibrating tablet & then go pick it up yourself. Why do we keep coming back? For the view. The food is just - meh. My salmon salad was a...More
There are some hidden gems in the city. This is one of them. The food is pretty good, the view is stunning. Locals ride their bike here or paddle board here. I drive. We're a bit further away but it's incredible. You just can't get...More
I've been coming here for years, the food is decent but their philosophy in their hours of operation are ridiculous. Their physical signs say they're open till 10, but I just got turned away at 9:15 pm because, ""The sun goes down earlier now."" Huh??!!!...More
After a morning bike ride from East False Creek to Spannish Banks, we stopped on the return trip for lunch at the Galley - Burgers, Fries & on tap Ciders. One Cheddar and one The Works burgers, both with fries which come regardless or you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709821-Reviews-The_Galley_Patio_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Greedy Pig - Gastown,"Nice that they serve beer in smaller measures rather than forcing you to drink pints all the time. Beer was good and service friendly. Called last orders at 22.15 on a Monday night - assuming because it was quiet.
Sweet classic Gastown bar just down the road from my place. Great homemade food. Friendly staff and regulars. Wicked early and late happy hours! You can get a nice cocktail or microbrew or a plain old can of beer. Live music, DJs or the best...More
Great happy hour with nice, cheap drinks. The main dishes are the sandwiches, which are delicious. Perfect for a weekday afternoon!
Beer is cold and food is exceptional. Great atmosphere, friendly servers and bartenders which is unusual these days in Vancouver.
Came to listen to a friends band at one end of the bar. What a fun night with great beer choice and excellent bar food. Had the truffled beef sandwich, jalapeño popper and the Czech soup which was garlicky and delicious. Great selection of beers....More
Stopped in for a couple of beverages just as it was opening. Staff was busy prepping for opening but chatted with us a bit - Apparently the owners are from Saskatchewan. Aroma from kitchen was enticing but since we had eaten recently didn't have the...More
This is a local indie watering hole with some bar food. They play rock music. The beers are ice cold, the vibe is casual, service is friendly. I like it for being simply those things. Definitely not a generic tourist place.
I've been coming to the Greedy Pig for a few years now. I don't live downtown so it's not as frequently as I'd like. It is such a great little place. Always the service is good and the food is tasty with reasonable sized portions....More
Met a friend for lunch here this week and have to say it was very disappointing. Tried the arugula salad for $12. It was listed as including: arugula, goat cheese, eggplant, zucchini, roasted red peppers & honey balsamic vinaigrette. It came on a small plate...More
I had just gotten to my hotel and asked the clerk about finding a ""hole in the wall"" to eat at when another guest eagerly interrupted to put a plug in for The Greedy Pig. I found my way here the next day and was...More
Server totally off base with her poor attitude and worse manners! Too bad, as food and ambience were ok.
Got a comp fairly awful desert... Server was poor. Food would have been ok but must have been left on the pass as was dry. Not good for salmon or pork chops Front of house looked to be having a bad day
Stopped off at this interesting little restaurant whilst meandering through Gastown and was taken by the Parisian like charm and alfresco dining on the street edge. Enjoyed a very lovely lunch and was entranced by the passing parade of citizens and tourists. Unfortunately equally subjected...More
recommend but maybe a reservation is good at busy times. good for all ages and appetites. great beer menu
It had that good feeling when we walked in. It is not a fluffy place by any means, as the front door would stay ajar everytime it was opened and the broken table in the corner, and funky flooring but whatever, it don't hurt the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1047957-Reviews-The_Greedy_Pig_Gastown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Greek By Anatoli,"Went there spontanous, became a nice table outside the food is so delicous, mice drinks as well, friendly staff We had some dips, grilled halloumi, moussaka, fried cauliflower
Everything was very good. From appetizers to dessert and even coffee. Nice atmosphere. Staff was very nice. Big portions.
The Greek By Anatoli offers all one seeks when one goes out for a dinner — good and friendly welcome, attentive and engaged service, a wide selection of dishes, and a a well- crafted wine list. The Greek on Mainland in Yaletown provides all of...More
We arrived with customers amid rave reviews. The experience was embarrassing!!! The Bartendar, a woman with many tattoos I fired us the entire time despite our attempts for drinks and food. She continued to pour shots and deliver food to her friend. We left after...More
Food was ok , service was good but was timed all wrong (not the servers fault). The tzatziki appetizer was quite good but it was served with my wife’s main course. My main didn’t. One until about 10 minutes after my wife got hers. She...More
Terrible loud music, headache inducing, no way to have a conversation, overly refreshed leftovers from happy hour shouting profanities, seated by open bathroom door, slow service, plainly understaffed. Food was OK but a big comedown from the comfortable & friendly Anatoli’s on the North Shore....More
We were looking for something easy for dinner so we tried the Greek. We have been going to the main restaurant in North Vancouver for years. The Greek is more modern with good seating ambience. They had a good selection of wine with a special....More
Right from the get go the service was very friendly and helpful. The lamb shank portions were good for 2. The price I guess justifies the portions even though the look steep when you first see the menu. Our server was friendly to a point....More
The ""Greek "" is one of the top Greek restaurants in midland ,I like these location better the another two , for the services and food , it is my friends Birthday due to the Covid 19 , she by her self in Vancouver ,...More
If you want to experience the worst of your life and spend several days of your life with a bed-ridden diarrhea and have the darkest week of your life, this is what I recommend. I recommend a ""Greek restaurant"", which doesn't have nothing with the...More
Got the calamari to start and souvlaki platter to share as a meal, the food was ok. Nothing to brag about. Especially for the prices, I think it should have been better. Some of the skewers were a burnt on one side and they tried...More
good, fresh Greek food. they have wonderful service and a cozy atmosphere. I met friends from Labrador here one night and was not dissappointed. I'm not one to go for Greek food while in Vancouver, but it was fun to share the many plates!
Loved this place! It’s like a hidden gem and such a surprise to me that it was no too busy and there was no waiting time! I highly recommend the “country lamb” which was amazing. Very well cooked lamb and yummy veggies. The portion size...More
Decent Mediterranean cuisine, but certainly nothing to write home about on a comparative landscape. With that said, the well priced dishes were accompanied by excellent servicing.
This was the first time we had an extremely negative dine-in experience at Anatoli-Yaletown, which is such a shame because their food is good. The two of us went for an early, week-night dinner; within 10 min of being seated in a fairly empty restaurant,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7784765-Reviews-The_Greek_By_Anatoli-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Greek Gastown,"We wanted something other than deep fried food with fries. So decided on Greek. The food was very yummy an authentic. The gent who was serving us was very attentive and friendly, offering advice on specials etc. we have been to Greece on holiday numerous...More
Throughly enjoyed dinning at The Greek in Gastown, the owner and his team went above and beyond to make sure we were well taken care of and we certainly were. I will be returning when I’m next in Vancouver! Love from the UK!
Three of us had booked to eat here on a Friday night, so I appreciate the place was busy (there was a huge party next to us), but there seemed to be plenty of waiting staff. We ordered a starter and a main each. My...More
Didn't know it was dine out Vancouver so we ended up ordering off that menu. Ordered from menu the taramasalata with pita. Bread was piping hot. Dip was not too fishy tasty which was a disappointment. Nice but not enough fish roe flavour. My spanakopita...More
Ordered takeout to deliver to our place. Great food, good value! We highly recommend the souvlaki platter, grilled octopus, and calamari. The potatoes that came with the platter are amazing!!
Very cute place, friendly people. Ordered the moussaka and the lemon octopus… Both were outstanding! The smoked octopus combined with the capers potatoes peppers… Really great.
Incredibly gracious hosts that great you as though you’re old friends rather than customers. We had a seating mix-up that they managed with aplomb and a laugh. Incredibly friendly group with a solid offering of food and beverages. Get these guys on your to do...More
Came for dinner on a weeknight. Nice vibe, nice decor, nice music. Octopus was delicious, tender, and a perfect portion (not too big or small). Service was polite and i have no complaints. Would come again, thought food was just as good as the yaletown...More
It’s really such a shame that the delicious food and great service is completely overshadowed by the lack of social distancing by the owner (Iani) and his friends. The rules for Phase III are in place for a reason and if behaviour like this continues...More
Ordered online what was said to be a 40% discount for Souvlaki. Had heard good things about this restaurant as one of their locations is near us in Yaletown. However, The rice was flavorless, lemon potatoes just OK, no pita bread was offered and a...More
Not only is the food delicious but the atmosphere is fun and lively with beautiful decor. My favourite dishes were Iani's Prawns and the Saganaki! The drinks are also so good. I'd definitely recommend this restaurant!
I eat out four to five times a week and this is probably the best Greek Restaurant in Vancouver I have eaten at this year. Great food and exceptional service. The General manager goes above and beyond to look after his customers. Will definitely be...More
Stopped for an icy cold happy hour beer & appetizer. Nice outdoor spot in Gastown. Wanted an afternoon bite to keep us going. Waitress gave us a taste of the different beers. Very tasty delicious calamari. $3 beer and $5 calamari from 2 to 6...More
Happy hour lunch …absolutely exceptional food & drink. Superb service and the place is spotless, do not pass without trying.
Really nice experience. We had the calamari and souvlaki platter for two and it was great. For dessert we had baklava and ekmek. Service was quick, attentive, and friendly. Cost was reasonable.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d16751924-Reviews-The_Greek_Gastown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Hastings Warehouse,"I went there for lunch and ordered a burger with poutine it showed up cold the graying was cold as were the fries and the burger was horrible, ill never go back the service was super slow concerning the 1st table where leaving and that...More
Love the fish tacos. Bigger portions than you would expect for $6. Fast service. Mac N Cheese also very tasty.
The food was fantastic here. Really enjoyed the pasta dishes. All other snacks was very good. Totally recommend this place if your looking for cheap food. You will not be disappointed.
I used to go there all the time when i was in school and had a tight budget. It is incredible cheap. And the food is pretty good! sometimes really busy. Great place to hang out with friends.
The food is good but the waitress misunderstood my order. As my wife had gone to washroom so I ordered her a veggie burger with salad. The waitress came over when my wife was back and asked her what she wanted. She said veggie burger...More
Great feed of wings! Pleasant friendly staff. We had fun! The DJ was grand. Washrooms were dirty and quite smelly...
Was wandering around Gastown and popped in for a drink and a snack. It wasn’t busy when I went in first but got really busy later. Ordered a glass of red wine which was really delicious and potato skins starter. Skins were gluten free and...More
Came across this place by accident on Saturday dinner time wander around the area. It's on the ""100 block"" of East Hastings Street. This used to be part of an overall very ""sketchy"" area. However, this block, is in the vanguard of the ""gentrification"" of...More
Came here yesterday ... sat out the front went in twice to get a server.. no one came, so I at this point still happy went to the bar to ask for menus and was told to sit and wait for my server (darker girl...More
Never had a problem here before until tonite when I got up and left. Lovely front of house staff as always. I have a tomato allergy so I had to take out the fresh tomato, the macho sauce and the roasted corn salsa from my...More
All Entrees $5.95. Any add-ons or changes are extra. Very busy place. Across-the-board sampling of pub food.
My wife and I were in Vancouver and have frequently dined at their other locations in Whistler, Victoria and Ottawa and have enjoyed all of them for the food and value. Wish I could say the same for the Vancouver Hastings location but we were...More
It would be hard finding a better deal anywhere in Vancouver than this place. All food is $5.95, it's good quality and a good-sized portion as well. The beef dip was delicious and the mini donuts for dessert were excellent.
All food items are under five dollars...I have to be honest, I was sceptical at first however, we were pleasantly surprised! The quality and flavours were excellent. Our server was Collette and she was terrific. She recommended the pierogies and they did not disappoint. The...More
First time we went, we were at the bar 25 mins without a menu. The bartender was chatting, cleaning in front of us, but didn’t answer us once when we said excuse me. We left wondering what the problem was... we decided to try a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4849079-Reviews-The_Hastings_Warehouse-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Irish Heather,"As a stray Irishman in Vancouver this place is a sanctuary. I used to avoid Irish bars like the plague but this place changed mind. Great snugs, amazing pint, great service and good food. Also really good for kids earlier in the day.
We love the service, the food and the the selection of lovely whiskeys. Fresh imported draft Guinness is always on tap as well as a tempting selection of local brews. The Irish Heather may seem a bit out of place in Chinatown but this comfortable...More
The Irish Heather has always been quality. There is nothing better than sitting there in the amazing atmosphere while drinking a perfect Guinness and eating their double fried fries and a tomatoe curry. All the while looking at your new date smiling away and enjoying...More
This is a nice place with some nice beer and quick bites.Capicola meat and cheese board was lovely. Nice Quessadillas. Will go back in a heart beat.
Preordered Christmas dinner (with delivery) from The Irish Heather. Staff really knocked it out of the park - every contact with them about setting up delivery, etc, was delightful and they were very helpful and sweet. The food arrived packed beautifully with clear instructions. The...More
The Irish Heather is amazing spot for drinks! The whiskey selection here is so extensive. The staff here are amazing, highly recommend coming by for drinks and food!
I stopped in on a Thursday night. There was live Irish music in the middle of the bar. There is seating at the bar and along the wall of the bar. Most bartenders I encountered were from the UK. Great friendly service. Given they make...More
Nice corner pub for a quick drink. That's what we did. Though my mates indulged in some whisky trails too ! Good friendly service
My husband and I popped into here after a long walk in drizzly weather around Vancouver. It was a welcome respite. We tried a never before heard of Irish Gin, which was delightful, as were the bartender and staff generally. They picked up a solid...More
What a darling pub with amazing service and great Guinness! Surprisingly good charcuterie boards that you can build yourself with authentic and house made meats and cheeses. Will definitely return.
Stopped in for pre-dinner beer; excited to see Hop House 13 on tap!!! Environment was cool, staff was friendly and gave us other local food and drinks recommendations. Great Wall of vintage Guinness advertising.
Been here many times. Always friendly, fast and I always leave wishing I had just arrived. The bar just feels right. Good food, great beer and genuine Irish charm. And, did I mention the dozens and dozens of Whiskies available? Do go.
Food delicious. Very good menu choice compared to the other pubs in Gastown. Service fantastic, Sit in the bar area by the music. Wonderful overall experience. Reason enough to return to Vancouver.
Cannot recommend John and his team enough! Made us feel at home and accommodated everything we needed. John was so friendly and felt like family!
We searched for this place in Gastown and we were so happy to find it. What a great place. An authentic Irish pub with a great selection of Irish Whiskey as well as whiskey from all over the world. We had two bowls of delicious...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709872-Reviews-The_Irish_Heather-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Italians - Davie Village,"After we were unable to get reservations for a reasonable time at the good Italians restaurants, The Italians on Bute and Davie was recommended to us by someone at Marquis wines. The food was great: real and authentic home-made Italian classics. We started with shrimps...More
This spot is great for a delicious Italian meal with friendly, excellent service. We over-ordered appetizers yet they were wonderful: the Prosciutto and cheese plate and the plate of prawns. Spaghetti alla Carbonara was delicious and creamy; the Tagliatelli al tartufo was very tasty -...More
My son and I stopped here on our last night in Vancouver. The service was great and the food very enjoyable. We enjoyed bruschetta to start which was good. My son had the gnocchi and I had a pesto pasta which were both excellent.
I found the food very average. The bruschetta was merely cold sliced cherry tomatoes atop slices of toast. No flavour at all - and cold! The pasta dishes were average - and only one special which didn't appeal to me. Wine list very scanty and...More
Whilst staying in Vancouver for a few days and wanting an Italian meal, we followed the reviews on Trip Advisor and headed on foot from English Bay to The Italians Restaurant. We were not disappointed. Chris, who was in charge, greeted us warmly, and a...More
I have been going to the Italians for over 4 years now. It’s amazing. Always excellent food and friendly staff. The owners are wonderful people (and from Italy - so is the chef). It has a great atmosphere and I highly recommend it.
The Italians located 1220 Bute St, Vancouver, BC V6E 1Z8, Davie Village Everything about this restaurant was amazing. Very warm and cozy atmosphere. Our waiter was awesome .The food is fresh and authentic. Pasta is made daily. I ordered the Pappardelle alla Bolognese, seriously just...More
We had an absolutely amazing meal here at the Italians. Our server Christopher was amazing and the food was so delicious. The carbonara and the gnocchi was so good and the raspberry panna cotta was amazing. This is such a neat little spot, I can't...More
Had a lovely meal in this restaurant but the vibe and ambience is what makes it rather than the food necessarily. Really feels like Italy. Good selection of wines and just a lovely place to be.
Took my partner/spouse to The Italians a week ago and it was so gratifying as the meal was superb! The pasta ""Rigatoni"" was perfect and the tomato based sauce had just the right amount of spice to give it great flavour. We also had the...More
My husband and I had a lovely evening dining at The Italians during COVID. Given current restrictions, the amiable host and owner, Danilo, can only operate three tables and we were lucky to secure a reservation. Although we've lived in Vancouver for 20+ years, we...More
This restaurant has an amazing ability of allowing me to travel when travel is not possible. Authentic meals, warm welcome and pleasant atmosphere that can be created only in smaller restaurants, makes me believe that for a second I left Vancouver and I am dining...More
I’ve eaten here many times on my visits to Vancouver. If you want Authentic italian food this is the place you’ll want to eat a great plate of pasta. To the previous review that mentioned that the pasta tasted like it was out of a...More
Went for dinner with my mom and thought we would check out a local Italian spot in the westend instead of heading downtown. Awesome location and decor. Waiter was very friendly and professional. The food was unfortunately... just bad in all ways (sorry to say):...More
First time here, and had a wonderful, romantic dinner date. Wanted to impress a special someone on her birthday (she loves pasta), and this place was perfect. They aced everything: fresh, delicious pasta; efficient, professional service; cozy, romantic ambience that is classy yet laid-back and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14173553-Reviews-The_Italians_Davie_Village-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keefer Bar,"Was excited to try this place while in Vancouver, since it's on the list of Canada's Best Bars. We weren't able to get a reservation near the time we wanted, so we just took our chances on walking in. On arrival the host mentioned that...More
Every cocktail uniquely made with a beautiful presentation. I love the Medical Centre vibe. This place is a must to venture on o=your night out.
Thank you for the 5 stars and the kind words! See you again soon! Cheers!
The place is nicely designed and food was phenomenal 👌 however, the service was terrible and we were told we had to leave after two hours even though there were tables available and no line up outside.
Amazing Bar with great atmosphere. My wife and i stopped in here on a day visit to Vancouver. The drinks were fantastic and the food was great. Service and knowledge of the drinks was also top notch. We got the fantasy island, uzu-snaki naruto, and...More
I've been here a few times when I visit Vancouver and I'm never disappointed. Creative cocktails executed with precision. Amazing service and decor that is unlike anything anywhere. They truly do there own thing and it shows at every turn. No wonder they make the...More
The drinks here are absolutely incredible. The staff are amazing and the location is great. Can't wait to come back for more drinks in the future!
I really enjoyed this bar Had a live DJ one night, a live guitarist the next Not the cheapest cocktails ever but it’s Vancouver Loved the decorations, loved the bar snacks
These guys definitely look after you - amazing menu of delicious bite-size tacos, spring rolls, dumplings, bao, sliders etc. Creative cocktails and a really friendly and funky atmosphere make it a great casual dining and drinking experience. Will definitely be back.
Came on a Thursday night because my friend likes the drink specials on Thursday, and will only order the drink special because all the regular price drinks are 'too expensive.' I will admit, despite being whiskey based, the Jack Daniels drink special on Thursday is...More
This place had a bad vibe from the start. First was the 10 minute wait at the door when there were seats at the bar, a sign that said ""be patient, wait to be seated"" but nobody to seat us. Next was the 20 min...More
nice place, great patio and relax interior design, amazing drinks and friendly bartenders, price medium
The Keefer Bar was recommended by a number of friends who recently spent time in Vancouver. We were not disappointed one bit. The staff were awesome and attended to our every need. Their knowledge of the entire drink menu made it easy to get the...More
We came here around 830pm on a Saturday night and had a little bit if a wait for a tables. Outdoor seating with one large table heated you could sit there to wait until your table is ready. Restaurant kind of long and skinny in...More
Original and extensive cocktail list, great service, with a heated outside patio in the front. I especially loved the attention to details with the decor! Definitely a favorite in VanCity!
We popped into the Keefer Bar and were so glad we did. We sat at the bar, had their Sunday special-pineapple daiquiri. It was delicious! Sunday nights are dj’d by female djs and it was a great vibe. The bar has an old apothecary feel...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2431966-Reviews-The_Keefer_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Alberni,"Very good restaurant in beautiful atmosphere in downtown Vancouver. The food could not have been better and service was also very good
The restaurant has an impressive entrance and it was very nice inside although we needed to use a phone torch to read the menus due to the very low lighting. Our food and wine was enjoyable and service was efficient.
We celebrated my brother-in-law's birthday and got righteously loud and soused. Fortunately, we had been seated in a nook that was pretty much all our own. My prime rib was excellent. Our waitress Claire brought us excellent red wines as well. For the dessert, I...More
We visited that restaurant during our stay in Vancouver and had very high expectation, but these expectations were exceeded by far . We had a very nice and cozy table outside with an extremely friendly and attentive service. There was a little mistake in preparing...More
After a 27 day cruise from Australia we had 5 days looking around Vancouver and came across the Keg Steakhouse and Bar near our hotel. We couldn’t fault the ambience, service or food quality. I had the steak and lobster and my partner the blackened...More
Well it’s the third time in a row my steak has been tough. The first time I mentioned it to the server at the end of the evening and I said I didn’t expect any compensation. My wife and I have enjoyed this particular Keg...More
Hi Gary, we appreciate you sharing your feedback about your recent experience. We encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with a copy of your review and location of your visit, and we’ll be sure to be in touch.
Busy place. Poor service. Calamari was good, garlic shrimp was greasy, Mushrooms were good. Nut mu 8 Oz steak I asked rare was a disaster. It has no flavor and dry. Was under the heat lamp for long I think. For the price I pay...More
Hi Andres, thanks for sharing your feedback of your last visit. We’d certainly like to follow up if a member of our team hasn’t already, and encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with the details and location of your visit, and we’ll be sure...More
A really nice venue with lots of space between tables. We visited for the first time for drinks and dessert, both were excellent. What really stood out was our waiter Erfan, one of the most personable waiters I’ve had in a long time and an...More
The prime rib was perfect: medium rare as ordered, not overly seasoned, melt in your mouth tender. (We're from the U.S. where the beef is leaner and therefore the prime rib isn't tender any more,) My wife liked her filet. Good service, upscale steakhouse prices....More
We went here as it was right across from our accommodation and seemed to get reasonable reviews. We received a friendly welcome and was seated immediately. We were served by a very friendly & attentive waitress. We had cheesy garlic bread and calamari for starters....More
Delicious sliders, friendly service. We were only here for a short while the experience was good and I would recommend based on the delicious and tender food we ate.
We had initially booked the nearby ‘Black & Blue’ but changed our mind when we assessed the price difference for this established steak house. The welcome was good. Whilst there is a good outside area we decided to ask for a table inside and we’re...More
Best dining experience so far in Vancouver! Dinner was very good, service was excellent, and atmosphere on the patio completed the wonderful dining experience. On the pricey side, but worth the treat!
Great visit to the Keg Alberni once again. Able to eat out on the patio (but they are now using the covered patio between the two sides of the restaurant now) with comfortable seating there, just no open view to the sky). Great service from...More
Went last night for our anniversary and it was one of the best The Keg experiences I've had. Ambiance was cool. Our server Noah was very nice. The steak and lobster was cooked to perfection. We also had baked garlic shrimp and Billy Miner pie...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7255986-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Alberni-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Burnaby,"I just want to say. My feedback and complaint. Is NOT personal. But just observations My server last night. Failed. Badly. In my opinion. Ill start off with this: The previous time I came to the keg (1 month ago from last night) this server...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to leave your review. We appreciate your feedback and we’d like to ensure our team follows up with you directly. Please kindly email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with a copy of your review and the location of your...More
Celebrated a post Valentine's dinner here. Absolutely wonderful with the best steak ever, yes, the bacon wrapped fillet with the one and only superb sauce : bernaise sauce. We started with the iceberg lettuce and the mushrooms Neptune. The lettuce is perfectly crisp and delicious...More
I was invited by my friend here for my birthday dinner and was told this is one of the best places to go for prime rib. Well, it was exactly the medium rare I liked and to finish off the evening with a Billy Miner...More
I called to book for 13 people for a family birthday. Can't do it. Too many people! Suggestion: Come here and line up. What a stupid thing to say. A group of 13 people with 4 small children must line up. If we don't get...More
We've been coming to this location for a while now. Service is always friendly and good. Bar drinks are great. Fairly good selection of single glass wines to choose from. Usually, I get Sirloin Keg classic but decided to get Filet Mignon with a seafood...More
The Keg still well established traditional chain Steak restaurants in midland since the 1971 , it is awhile since my last visit , it is my first dinner out in 2022 , also is my son's birthday , he choose the Keg in Burnaby for...More
We came 6 persons at 7.30 PM without reservation The person who welcome us told us it is full you have to wait 1 hour 30 mns We stayed 10 mns seated in the lobby and finally decided to moove In the car the restaurant...More
Have been going to the Keg for years. They work to make it right if anything is off. The staff are great and it’s an enjoyable evening. You must provide proof of double vaccination & ID. We had a great dinner.
This is a busy restaurant so make a reservation to avoid a long wait. The Food met our Keg expectations. Tasty appetizers and steaks. Very warm and friendly service.
I ordered takeout for the first time. It was ready for pickup exactly at the time they told me it would be. Staff were COVID-19 compliant and pickup was contactless.
The takeout food service was excellent. Covid 19 social distancing procedures were followed and pickup was contactless. Oh yeah, the food was delicious.
The food and service at this location are always top notch. The sirloin steak dinner is delicious. Steak was a perfect medium rare.
We haven't been at the Keg for a few years. Everything was perfect and our server was Matt , we got excellent service and the food was the best meal we had in a long time, we will definitely be returning soon
The Keg is such a well established steakhouse and for good reason. I’ve been to every Keg in the lower mainland through the years and never had a bad meal. The food quality is the same throughout all their locations. I always order their bone...More
Went on Dec 24th for Christmas Eve early dinner with family. Able to reserve table online without issue. Our server was Michael he was amazing! Great customer service skill and incredible personality !! Food was amazing we ordered Kansas City NY, Prime rib, Tenderloin with...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d709885-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Burnaby-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Dunsmuir,"Nice ambience and setting. Friendly service, nice steak served up without a long wait and the glass of wine was tasty. I will be back to try something else on the menu soon.
This downtown restaurant offers upscale dining, with top-notch food and service. I enjoyed my steak and the lemon tart for dessert.
We went for a steak at lunch time. We weren’t disappointed. The food was excellent and plentiful. The staff were very kind and attentive. We’d definitely visit again!
Great restaurant with super food and well looked after by the lovely team that work there. Very enjoyable experience. Would go back in a minute!
We just had the best meal ever. Service frome Dallas was outstanding. We had drinks, wine, bacon wrapped scallops appetizer. We both had the Keg package with Ceasar Salad. OMG! I had a Perfectly cooked Prime Rib (med. rare), Wife had a Filet with Oscar...More
We had a great dining experience at The Keg. Premises are classy. The menu accommodates most tastes of meat lovers and non-carnivores have a choice as well. The wine list is impressive with good options for all ranges of prices. Deserts are excellent. We had...More
As always our steak was delicious.Tasty food, lovely vibrant ambience.Would highly recommend.The restaurant also has an elevator if you have walking issues.
Excellent food, efficient and friendly staff, and an overall great experience. The Dine Out menu was great, with the bacon-rapped filet minion a standout with an assortment of vegetables and garlic mashed potatoes. For desert, the Billy Miner portions were very generous and it was...More
What a welcome we enjoyed. It was a cold January evening last night. We were greeted by a young gentleman to offer us a drink while we awaited our table. We ended up at a lovely table for 2 in the warm lounge area. Our...More
The atmosphere was a little too dark, making it difficult to read the menu. The service was decent but since the entrance was right on Dunsmuir there was literally no safe place to drop off my elderly friend who has difficulty walking. Then I drove...More
The wine list is very good and the prices reasonable. The food especially the steak, of course, was excellent, although the dressing for the baked potato was a bit minimalist. The service was excellent.
If you like meat, steaks and so on, do not miss this place. Excellent quality of the food along with super service.
We ate here recently on a short break to Vancouver from Calgary (where we were staying with family). I'd eaten at a Keg once before on a previous trip to Canada, but this was much nicer than I'd remembered. I had the summer special lobster...More
Our server was Dallas. He was absolutely amazing! he took wonderful care of us, he was personable, funny and anticipated every need before we even asked! Bonus: My husband asked him for some live music recommendations in the area and he gave us the best...More
usual keg brand, great service, perfectly cooked steaks and a wonderful ambience. Restaurant is a 5 minute walk from the cruise pier.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4108385-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Dunsmuir-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Granville Island,"Two couples visiting Vancover we discovered The Keg were greeted quickly, shown to a booth in the dining room, Bryanna took over from there, with menu suggestions all of which were excellent, and delivered quickly. Bryanna was friendly and professional which made our experience memorable....More
What I. Liked was the attention given by the staff. Friendly, chatty and helpful. Menu not wildly exciting, but tasted good.
I was there for my husband 's birthday lunch yesterday. Although my husband enjoyed his fillet mignon, my fried chicken sandwich was by far a huge disappointment. I had to open it up and see if there was actually any chicken in it as all...More
Hi there, we appreciate you sharing your feedback about your recent experience. We encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with a copy of your review and location of your visit, and we’ll be in touch.
The food was amazing. I do recommend ordering one of their meat products as they are known for their steaks. I ordered the smallest prime rib and it was amazing. My wife ordered their salmon and it was great. My only hesitation about going back...More
Keg is a must stop for steak eaters! Years ago in Toronto we had one of the best steaks we’ve ever had. Luckily, Keg still do the best steaks going. The baseball top sirloin is still the king of cuts, cooked to absolute perfection: medium...More
I’m disappointed to write that the Keg has gone downhill over the years and it is time for them to step things up, or risk closing altogether (I know they have closed many locations so perhaps the writing is on the wall?). The menu is...More
Put them on the spot by showing up with a party of 8 people for drinks. No problem to them, we were quickly led to a table. Service was very good, friendly and efficient. I tried the local IPA which I found a little bland...More
We visited without a reservation on a busy Saturday lunchtime. Our booth gave us plenty of room with a lot of privacy. Fish and chips at $24 and prime rib sandwich with fries at $22.50 were both excellent. Our large glasses of Chardoney house wine...More
I was there last night with a friend for a lobster dinner. We had a small problem but I feel compelled to write how well it was handled by the wonderful manager, AUSTIN; together with our great waitress, Marie. On top of that, I got...More
We were here for one night and a friend recommended The Keg. We were there for our anniversary and they seated us at a nice quiet booth for two. We ordered a wedge salad and a Caesar salad, both were a good size and well...More
We had the Keg burger , pork sandwich , sliders and baked potato. Very tasty! Service was top notch! Lime margaritas were half price so several in our group had those too! It was a very pleasant evening!
Disappointed with the Keg. My husband and I went for a late afternoon dinner after taking in the British car show and exploring Granville. Service was slow, food took forever coming out as was barely warm. I had the prime rib, it was sinewy and...More
Hi there, thanks for sharing your feedback of your last visit. We’d certainly like to follow up if a member of our team hasn’t already, and encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with the details and location of your visit, and we’ll be sure...More
I wasn’t in the restaurant, but my life long friend was there last night for his 64th birthday with his daughter. I called the restaurant from my home in Oakville Ontario and asked if I could buy by buddy a beer and have it delivered...More
I’ve been searching far and wide for the worlds best steak, and I’ve finally found it. The server was very nice, and she got my order perfectly right. My steak was cooked to perfection, and delicately seasoned and spiced (my fries were also tasty). I...More
A big shoutout to Liz Margoreeth for providing us with the best customer service dissatisfied customers could ever ask for. After experiencing a not so welcoming visit at this location by a terrible server, we contacted the Management team to express our dissatisfaction. Liz went...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d705543-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Granville_Island-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Park Royal,"Very nice table in a quiet area. Started with shrimp cocktail which was excellent. Steak and lobster excellent. Fantastic service, very friendly and professional. Wine prices reasonable for good quality.
Wonderful meal as part of “Dine-Out Vancouver” We had surf and turf cooked which was served hot. Wine price reasonable. Service excellent and very professional.
Wanted to do a nice meal together the night before a scheduled knee replacement which ended up being canceled the next morning We live in a small town where there is no Keg. When we come to the city and we can afford it the...More
Went for a birthday and enjoyed shrimp cocktail (escargot not that great) and both had steak and lobster which were excellent and cooked perfectly. Shared a bottle of Shiraz. Service attentive, friendly, and professional.
We were at the West Vancouver Keg for (in total) just over an hour, and they only managed to serve us the one drink we ordered while waiting at their bar. We arrived early for our table reservation on Saturday, September 3rd, 2022. They suggested...More
Besides the person constantly pontificating to his friends at the next table, our visit was perfection. The mixed greens salad was perfectly seasoned. The steaks were perfectly cooked. The vegetables were good. The baked potato was perfectly seasoned. There were tasty mushrooms. We were so...More
My friend really wanted to try their burger one time and mentioned as we just drove passed. Let's go I say. I had a beer and wr both had the burger and gotta say pretty darn good.
Great server (Sophie), awesome dining experience with delish food (steak, lobster, prime rib) beautiful ambiance with great energy. Looking forward to even mire fun energy and great times post pandemic!
Have dined at this location a handful of times and every time we are greeted with nice atmosphere, non pretentious service and quick and friendly experience. Our favourite is the Kansas City steak the feature once in a while. If its a feature. TRY IT!...More
The Keg is absolutely great for steak without blowing the budget. I’ve been to all their locations multiple times. Decided to go in for dinner after some more holiday shopping. We didn’t make a reservation and got a table quite quickly. They have a greeter...More
We ordered caesar salad and calamari to share as appetizers. The salad was great and they thoughtfully split up the salad and serve it to us individually, The calamari was quite disappointing - the batter was dark brown - most likely due to the frying...More
Hi there, thank you for taking the time to share your experience with us. We would like to ensure we follow up with you directly, and encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with the details and location of your visit, and a member of...More
We have dimes here in the past and have always enjoyed our meals. Last night we were seated on the patio as requested and it was very pleasant with few tables occupied. The server promptly took our drink order and returned often to check on...More
Hi there, thank you for sharing your feedback. We would certainly like to follow up with you regarding your experience. We encourage you to email us at kegcommunity@kegrestaurants.com with the details and location of your visit, and a member of our team will be sure...More
Newer and luxe version of The Keg, on the second floor above Kate Spade (entrance near Marine). Upscale decor and sizeable covered patio. Good selection of drinks and appies. The Tuna Tartare was a pile of nice tuna on a pile of nice avocado, accompanied...More
We have been to this Keg location many many times. All our visits have been very good except the last one where one of the dishes we ordered was way too salty. We brought this to the attention of server and was then visited by...More
No, this isn't Gotham or Black and Blue, but its a local favourite and has been around for decades. This is a fairly new location and one that is on the second floor of one of the buildings fronting Marine Drive. Its nicely decorated and...More",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d12373587-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Park_Royal-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Keg Steakhouse + Bar - Yaletown,"Excellent meat quality, very good service, prestigious location. I highly recommend for meat fans. Certainly will come back
Very good performance of dishes and nice quality of the meat. Prices are normal and environment is friendly. Also there is a nice bar if you like to enjoy your 🍷 drinks.
I rarely review or recommend restaurant chains. However, I had an excellent experience recently here with a friend. Ordered a Ribeye Chicago-style, and a couple of side dishes, and it was a wonderful meal. Great service too
We had some of the best steaks we’ve ever had here. Absolutely fantastic meal, no issues providing gluten free options. Great service, great food, really highly recommended.
Until 6pm to grab an early bite or drinks. We had their deep fried cauliflower, sliders and burger and French fries. Patio on the rooftop is awesome. Great food and service.
There was no room on the roof deck. Outside seating on the street was a bit noisy with cars and ambulances. Unfortunately there were some omissions from the menu, but what we settled for was fine. Steaks were cooked right and were very tender. Service...More
I enjoyed my meal in this upscale steakhouse. My steak was delicious and the service was good. I will be back on my next visit to Vancouver.
Low key beautiful food and service the cauliflower was amazing plus rids and chicken and crab filled mushrooms. Go there excellent
The Keg seems to always be a hit or miss wherever we go. The steaks were enjoyed and the drinks, especially the Bellini. The chicken was ok. However, the pork ribs were dry and unseasoned. A true disappointment. The menu mainly consisted of high priced...More
We’d just flown in from the uk and were a bit tired but the beer refreshed us somewhat and we enjoyed the sliders, wings and tuna bar snacks on the roof terrace. Very pleasant before heading off to the next venue determined to keep awake.
Early evening so was quiet. Were warmly greeted at the door and offered a table right away. Were served by Cooper who was great. Had a very nice Teriyaki sirloin steak and fries with roasted vegetables. Also the house Red was very drinkable. Would go...More
We had a wonderful meal and overall excellent experience at The Keg in Banff and expected the same in Vancouver. Unfortunately our quiet evening was ruined by a table of 8 noisy juveniles who should have been back in the playground rather than the restaurant.!...More
Was seated right way on a Friday night... Our services was good.... But I must say it was the thinnest cut of prime rib that I had ever seen and for the $45 price tag ...you think you would leave a steak joint full... Thank...More
We had gone to Vancouver to celebrate my birthday and as such wanted to have a more intimate meal to celebrate. Our hotel offered to make reservations for us and we were provided prompt service upon arrival. This particular location we really enjoyed because it...More
I was here with a group of co-workers for dinner. I've been to other Keg locations like Alberni and Granville Island but this location blew me away. Didn't expect it to be so huge, modern and upscale. Like something you'd expect from a resort. It...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2035267-Reviews-The_Keg_Steakhouse_Bar_Yaletown-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Kitchen Dada,"Our friends recommended this restaurant. Parking is a little more challenging so you may need to circle. We tried several very good items: caterpillar roll, chawamhshi, gomae, mixed tempura, 5 kinds of sashimi, and a few different nigiri. The service was very good too.
I have been coming to Kitchen Dada since they opened. . The minute you walk in, look to your right and see the art work of the chef whose art masterfully reflects his understanding of the da-da movement. The cooks blend their culinary practices (including...More
We stopped here as we found it on OpenTable and it looked to have a good menu. We made a Saturday lunch reservation, and arrived on time, but they were really really busy. We probably had to wait 10-15 minutes before a table was freed...More
We had a fantastic omakase experience in this lovely restaurant. All nine courses were delicious and beautifully presented. Sashimi was fresh and cut perfectly. I was especially impressed by the transparent paper-thin wraps for duck. It was hard to believe that the wraps were hand-crafted...More
My wife, daughter and I have been coming here since Dada Kitchen opened literally 5 days after the city announced retail Covid restrictions and closures in April 2020. Back then the 3 chef owner partners had to hunker down and deal w such a new...More
We had a great time here ordering some sushi! The food is very good and the service was great, definitely recommend checking this spot out! We will be back!
This is by far the best Vancouver Japanese restaurant I have been to in years--and I have been to many. Great presentation, top quality ingredients, ample portions and fair prices. All this in a really nice environment. These folk really care about what they are...More
The Kitchen Dada Restaurant is celebrating its one year anniversary and the exceptional quality of the menu items we ordered and the very warm and focused answers to our questions on menu items by the staff displayed in our phone order and pickup made The...More",8,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23217096-Reviews-The_Kitchen_Dada-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Lamplighter Public House,"We came here for the Tuesday night trivia and had a great time. Everyone was really friendly and it was a great night. We had dinner here as well; there was only one vegan option, which was far too spicy for me.
Called in for a drink when we were having a wander around Gas Town. Staff were very helpful and chatty. Couldn't get a seat on the patio so sat inside. It is quite a big bar area and the place soon filled up. I tried...More
Popped in while it was raining. Very nice bar, good bar man and nice beer. Would have liked more time to try a few beers and some food but next time in vancouver I will make a better visit.
Hi. We would love you have you down to check out the new Lamplighter public house.
Went for a drink and spend all night there. Nice atmosphere, friendly and helpful bartenders, many choices of beer.
I’ve been to the lamplighter many times before and have been quite disappointed with the service, and finally, even though we were a large group, had amazing service from Madison. All night she was so accommodating and nothing was ever too much trouble. The food...More
We were a large group (18) that were at the pub for lunch. The waitress was friendly and able to manage the large variety of beverage and food orders. And she provided individual bills which was appreciated. The pub has a large variety of local...More
It is a cool place to hang out with friends but nothing special, the food is good but not memorable.
We came to Vancouver for a few days in September and stumbled along this place on the way to our restaurant in Gas Town. This really is a gem. Perfect friendly atmosphere, (not too busy but tables and bar mostly full) and the staff are...More
Hi Liam, thanks for the review! Always happy to hear positive feedback on our staff and atmosphere. All the best!
Came here for a drink with friends after a long day at work. Had the most amazing service from Zoe! She was one of the kindest, friendliest people I have met in a long time! As it was all of our first times here, she...More
Hi Carly, Thank you so much for the positive feedback! I agree, Zoe is a rockstar! All the best
A very big pub with loads of TV's . Good menu to select from. Plenty of craft beers to sample. Helpful staff .
Hi Mike, glad you enjoyed our draught and great staff! Thanks for the review, all the best. Cheers!
This place is huge! It is difficult to notice the size of that place before you get inside. So even if you are with a group it is worth to ask if they can seat you. So we had a table on the ground floor...More
Thanks for the great review! Glad you enjoyed our draught selection and portion sizes. All the best!
Stopped for a quick bite to eat on a Sunday afternoon. The place had a lot of seating and an impressive amount of TV's. One of the servers asked if we wanted any of the TV stations changed to a Game we wanted to watch...More
Hi Donna, thanks for the review! We pride ourselves in being a pub with an eye for detail like being diligent with out tv programming and elevating our pub grub. Hope to see you again some day! Cheers
Stopped by the lamp lighter for a drink and a meal, although this advertised itself as a public house not sure if I would feel comfortable just asking for a drink. Husband and I were sat downstairs with a not to pleasant view of the...More
Hi there, thank you for the review! Apologies for the table sat nearby-sounds like they were having a bit too much fun. Nonetheless, we appreciate the feedback both positive and negative. Take care,
Me and my husband stopped by here while exploring gas town on our recent visit to Vancouver. The restaurant is big, bright and full of history. We ordered the shrimp and pesto pizza as well as the chicken salad (both were fantastic!) Our server suggested...More
Hi Sarita! I’m so happy to hear you and your husband had such a great experience at Lamp. Wednesday’s are my favourite night-always a great atmosphere and I’m glad the service, food and little details were on point. All the best and thanks for the...More
This place has a lot of history, so we popped in for a cold beer (it was hot outside). What a great sports bar. Huge beer menu, so ask for recommendations if you can only have a few. Great place to chill out.
Hi Stephen! Thanks for the review, glad we were able to help you “hydrate” on a hot day! All the best",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2589599-Reviews-The_Lamplighter_Public_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Lobby Lounge and RawBar,"My colleague and I were at your establishment and very disappointed. Terrible service. Slow service and the waitress dropped the wine all over the chair and table. There are too many better classier establishments; will not return to this poorly run lounge.
Nice hotel and friendly staff. But this is not a top notch sushi eating place. Frozen sashimi cut right in front of us into wedges so thick I had to cut them up several times again. Sorry but no taste , poor presentation and overrated....More
The Pacific Rim Fairmont is a luxurious hotel with some great bars. You pay for the pleasure, but it’s worth it. The Lobby Bar is huge, taking up most of the gigantic first floor lobby of the hotel. It can be intimidating, but screw it....More
Great bar for hanging out, great vibes, beautiful hotel lobby. The drinks and food are a bit pricy side but the atmosphere is super lively. Definitely worth checking out and hanging out!
To start we got two attractive refreshing sweet Yuzu cocktails :”Easy money “ and the “Pacific punch.” The yuzu citrus is in vogue and appreciated by many bartender around the world to blend with bar liquid and created vibrant taste and perfume cocktails. we start...More
This was the best sushi I've ever had! I'm a sushi novice so I started out asking for a California roll. The waitress was quick to make a recommendation that I happily accepted. I wanted to try something new & was hungry from my flight....More
Had a chance to go for some wind down drinks at the Lobby Lounge at the Pacific Rim hotel after a Canucks game. Great room, very visible, great music, and very fun vibe, will definitely go back!
High style sushi bar with craft cocktails and chic crowd with great music. High prices and Asian theme. Geisha is a great drink lots of scotches and cognac. Valet parking and an excellent part of town for a walk.
We were at the Fan Expo at the Convention Centre and the food at the event wasn’t very appealing. The Lobby and Rawbar is located just across the street in the Fairmont Pacific Rim and it looked like a nice menu so we tried it....More
We were here for snacks and drinks before dinner. The server was okay, but she was also very busy. It was great ambience, and a great place to hang out.
The ambience is always fun! The sushi is FANTASTIC but the prices are sky high. We paid $50 for two monte cristo coffees......$50! Our kids wanted hot chocolate but that would have been a $100 bill so we took them to Tim Hortons nearby for...More
The Lobby Bar at the Fairmont Pacific Rim is always hopping! It is always busy, with live music on certain nights, full of people hanging out having drinks and snacks. Today was no different. It was a rainy, cloudy day in Vancouver, so I think...More
We visited the lobby lounge the evening of August 2nd to celebrate our friend's new on-air anchor role at a regional news station. Let me include that everyone at our table has previously worked in hospitality. I was reluctant to write this review after the...More
The Lobby restaurant is located inside the Pinnacle Hotel in N. Vancouver by the waterfront , my dear old friend had a great Dine out Vancouver few weeks ago , she want me to try this place out ,yet ,it is awhile since my last...More
We had lunch at the lobby lounge and the experience was definitely mixed. The food wad excellent but our main server was a total dud. She was never around when we needed her and seemed to be totally uninterested in her job. Too bad because...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2324151-Reviews-The_Lobby_Lounge_and_RawBar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Lobby Restaurant and Lounge,"Do yourself a favor and visit the amazing Lobby Restaurant at the Pinnacle in North Vancouver. The service is unmatched. The staff truly cares about your experience and caters to any specific requirements. The food is absolutely amazing – we were a group of 9...More
Made a reservation for 14 family members to enjoy New Years Brunch and was told that there would be automatic 18% Gratuity, and that the entire table would have to be on one bill with one payment. After a call with the manager we were...More
We had appetizers during Happy Hour our first night and they were delicious. Breakfast is the BEST! Hands down.
We were served cold coffee, and when we told her, she came back with “a freshly brewed” which was even colder. My eggs I wanted over easy and they were over hard, my son’s bacon almost raw, and cutlery with stuck on food .
Seriously some of the best fish (cod) and chips I've had. The cod was so good. The better stayed crisp all the way to the last bite. Hubby had prime rib hash with poached eggs and hollandaise. He really liked it a lot and said...More
We ordered the Christmas Dinner to go. . $350 for 6 people. Requested that the turkey be carved. Pick up was easy and efficient. On the plus side: food was plentiful, full size cheesecake (10 slices), mashed potatoes were delicious, gravy was good but very...More
Dear TennismomVancouver, Thank you for ordering Christmas dinner to go. We appreciate your feedback and I apologize that the turkey was not carved and was over cooked. I am pleased to hear that you found the Christmas dinner to be plentiful and and enjoyed the...More
This is the second time that iv been to THE LOBBY,The 1st was with my wife and family,The service was Excellent .The food we had was out of this world,It was my wifes birthday,From the food,service and decor,made it very special for us all,Today i...More
Dear 309brianpendrey, We appreciate your visits to The Lobby, thank you for sharing your wonderful experiences! I will thank Kimmy for her friendly service. Our team will be delighted to read that you enjoyed the service and food. We will look forward to your next...More
We have dined here a few times. It’s really is a gem in the neighbourhood. Excellent food and fantastic service from Gabriela!
Dear Ricky T, Thank you for your visits to the Lobby and thank you for your nice words! I am delighted that you enjoyed the food and service. We will look forward to seeing you again soon. Warm regards, Edward Sweetman Director of Operations
I sat down on the patio and was completely ignored for 20 minutes and left. No greeting, no menu, no water. Weird. I won’t be back soon.More
Dear Jeff P, Thank you for your visit to The Lobby and my apologies that you were ignored on the patio. Please contact me at esweetman@pinnaclehotelatthepier.com when you are ready to return. Our team would love to show you the warm hospitality and service that...More
We stayed at the pinnacle this past weekend and decided to have breakfast in the lobby- so glad we did! Quick to get a table and the Reuben hash is to die for!! Perfectly cooked eggs and strips of Montreal smoked meat with creamy hollandaise...More
Dear Guests, Thank you for sharing your review and it was wonderful to hear that you enjoyed the food in the Lobby restaurant. We will share your kind comments to our team as they will be happy to receive them. We hope to see you...More
Great location in North Van. Hurry to buy a Groupon deal or Dine-out-Vancouver. Setup felt safe for the Covid protocols.
Dear Guest, Thank you for your review and your feedback for our Groupon or Dine-out Vancouver deals. Best regards, Haymond Ng
My wife and I stayed at the hotel last weekend and the Lobby Restaurant completely made our stay! The staff were incredible, thank you to our amazing waitresses, the food runner, and to the bartender for making us feel so welcome. Customer service here was...More
Dear Guests, Thank you for sharing your wonderful review and celebrated your special day with us at the Pinnacle Hotel. We are pleased to hear that you enjoyed your stay and the genuine care from our restaurant team. We will share your kind comments to...More
My wife and I haven't been here for a while. We decided to try their brunch. I must say, it's delicious. Not your typical hotel style brunch. My wife mentioned the dishes give Jam Cafe a run for it's money. We look forward to coming...More
Dear Guests, Thank you for your review. We are glad to hear that your dining experience was enjoyable. Thank you for your business and we hope to see you soon. Best regards, Haymond Ng
We've had breakfast, lunch and dinner here and they have served us well each time. For a hotel restaurant we are very pleased with the quality, price and the service of the staff at the restaurant. Given that Lonsdale quay is right out the door...More
Dear Guests, Thank you for your review and your repeat business. We truly appreciate it. Rest assured that we will share your kind comments to our team, as they will be happy to receive them. Warm regards, Haymond Ng
Ate breakfast here and I can safely say that Vancouver has way better breakfast restaurants than this one. For starters, the latte could be better given the standard of the restaurant. The staff was not interested in sticking around or checking up on us. So...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your review. Your feedback is very important to us as we constantly strive to improve overall guests' experience. Thank you for your business and we hope you will feel the improvement next time you visit. Best regards, Haymond Ng",25,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1973613-Reviews-The_Lobby_Restaurant_and_Lounge-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Lobster Man,"Had to try this place when visiting Granville Island Market having seen online reviews. The lobster roll was delicious - even the bread roll it came in was great - light with crusty glaze. Just a bit on the expensive side for a take away...More
I always wanted to try a lobster roll but I'm no crayfish (lobster) expert. Given that you could get some good lobster in Vancouver, I thought I would try the Lobster Man on Granville Island which had some good reviews. You can find it pretty...More
Hubby is a lobster maniac, so of course, we made sure to visit The Lobster Man on Granville Island during our Vancouver vacation. Gotta say.... we were both very underwhelmed. The lobster was, frankly, kinda tasteless. I got the Signature, and Hubs got the Connecticut,...More
The lobster rolls were amazing. Freshly caught with crisps and salad. Great to sit outside and watch the world go by.
Very tasty lobster roll with crunchy toasted roll. We shared one for the experience but we’ve had better. The lobster meat was plentiful but the miso mayo missed the mark. Chips were soggy but they’re not why you’re there.
Visiting Granville Island in Vancouver, BC and heard about this place from some youtubers. The food especially the ""lobster roll"" lives up to the expectation. But there are not many seats to sit down. That makes it a little difficult to spend some time to...More
We each got a lobster roll - one w mayo and one with butter. Both rolls were good and came with good fries. But, there are not enough seats. Some people come in and sit down and stay while the rest of us have to...More
The lobster roll was high quality and the crab roll was good, too. I was surprised to see how small the soup was. Being in Granville Island, this is a decent place for lunch despite of high prices.
Went inside at 5:28 pm, it took 2 minutes for the staff to even acknowledge me. When I asked ""excuse me"" for the 3rd time and asked if I could have a lobster roll, they said it was too late. By the way, their sign...More
If you’re looking for a delicious, fresh and traditional lobster roll, don’t miss stopping by The Lobster Man on Granville Island. The staff were friendly and helpful, my sandwich was made freshly upon order, the brioche roll was soft and delicious, the lobster meat was...More
My wife and grandson stopped in for a lobster roll and to see all the live crab, lobster and other seafood. The lobster roll was pretty good.
Came here purposely to try their lobster roll. They have different varieties of lobster rolls. Had tried the Signature one and a Connecticut one both are good. A small sitting area outside the shop.
We’ve been going to Granville Island for years and this is the first time we’ve ever eaten at The Lobster Man. Their signature lobster roll is the best I’ve ever had. You get a lot of lobster for the price. So worth it. Definitely will...More
Great food, great price had the lobster roll, very tasty good portion size for what you pay. Seating area was great for solo person bar stool area as well as sitting, friendly staff quick service for eat in.
Crab, lobster, clams and oyster are fresh and in the tank to select. We bought a 2 1/4 pound dungeness crab and had them steam it. Very fresh and delicious! Will return for shellfish another time.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10037013-Reviews-The_Lobster_Man-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Locus Cafe,"The menu, online or otherwise, doesn’t tell you all the vegan options they have; for example, nachos are listed as vegetarian but they can veganize it (with some awesome soft cheese). Having said that, I had the best nachos ever - soft and crispy, super...More
Another insanely good meal. Halloumi pasta and I added shrimp and smoked bacon (I know, bacon - but it was my birthday) We shared the scallop spinach salad for an appetizer.
Delicious vegetarian lasagna! And also blueberry sangrias too. Totally gonna visit again. Thank you guys😻😻😻😻😻😻😻😻😻😻
Nachos were a bit on the small side but the wild boar add on was divine! Excellent selection of cheap beers and very well spaced out inside. Service was excellent.
I have been dining at Locus with family and friends almost since it first opened.. It is our go to resto for special occasions or just because. The genial owner and host, Fred, partners with excellent chefs and staff, each of whom maintains high standards...More
Very friendly people even when the place is stacked with busy customers. Very hard to find pleasant smart servers and owners when stressed with so many guests. All the people we encountered had a great attitude and work ethic. Food is fantastic and original. We...More
The Main Street eggs are a classic and well prepared. The bennys are delicious as if the fresh bread! The coffe is outstanding. Great service, awesome food!
Fantastic food. Breakfast, lunch, and dinner. You can’t go wrong with Locus. The staff are great, the service excellent. Great variety and some interesting dishes. Don’t miss out on this place!
Love this place! It’s quaint, old styler with cosy corners, a great cocktail list, candlelights- and as it turns out great innovative food. I’d dropped in for a drink after a long day of seeing the sights and sat in the window & enjoyed a...More
I think this is the last place to eat out not only on Main Str but in Vancouver for me. Reading the reviews, I went there with the idea of finding something good. Oh My God... What was that... Immediately after having seated, I noticed...More
Liked the space and servers but food mediocre and beers are small Brussel sprouts pretty good but xo wings watery
My family and I visited Locus for Breakfast and were blow away! Very unique offerings, great quality and great service. We had eggs Benedict with smoked Salmon, blueberry pancakes, slow cooked wild boar. All were wonderful !
Went here for dinner with my wife. Out of towners looking for a nice dinner out. Interesting cozy little place. Not bad atmosphere. Ordered gnocchi and seafood spaetzle. Worst gnocchi we had ever tasted and we have tasted a few. Spaetzle was better but certainly...More
First time here they have a very cool environtment, quality food and tasty, its worth it! friendly staff.. definitely i would reccomend and goin back soon.
We have been to this restaurant many times, usually a Friday night after a long week of work. The food is CONSISTENTLY excellent. The menu changes with different specials, also interesting drink specials. The service is great, with friendly and attentive staff. The decor is...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709902-Reviews-The_Locus_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Mackenzie Room,"we absolutely loved everything about the place - from cool decor to attentive service to funny entree names to the food! Too bad we were not hungry and did not choose 'I want it all' menu which includes everything on the menu for $85 -...More
Our waiter said that our party of 4 was the ideal size for the « I want it all » proposition. So we wanted it all: first courses of greens and sea urchins, vegetable dishes, fish, meats and finally deserts; all to be shared, often thinking « I...More
Superb food. Excellent service. From the time we arrived till the time we left felt like we were the only ones in the restaurant. Mckenzie room rocks:)
We have been to The Mackenzie Room many times since it first opened a few years ago. Yesterday was a last minute decision. We sat at the bar, always a nice choice for two and ordered the menu for two - two starters, two mains,...More
Visiting Vancouver we headed to the MacKenzie room which we had read a glowing review of. The food, for the most part, lived up to the review, especially the absolutely perfectly and divinely prepared sablefish. But the experience, as a whole, was just a bit...More
Amazing food with fantastic service. The variety on the menu was incredible. Highly recommend the tasting menus and the chicken of the sea was delicious.
Very creative and excellently cooked food. We had (see chalkboard picture): 1. Wesley Snips: 8/10 2. Hello Clarice: 9.5/10 (even my mum liked lamb tartare!) 3. Sir Salman Rushdie: 9/10 4. Surf'n'Surf: 9/10 The service was very slow. My orders for wine and cocktails arrived...More
Last time here was precovid-19. They daily fresh menus in the board. You can enjoy the ""I want it all menu"" if you are at least a party of four. There was a multi course meal for two but my eating companion didn't want one...More
We opted for the five course meal with wine pairing; it was truly enjoyable. Visually pleasing and delicious!
We made a reservation on the recommendation of a colleague, who told us to go despite the neighborhood. We were not disappointed! We kept it simple and had the set menu for the two of us - five absolutely wonderful courses, two appetizers, and two...More
Hidden in plain side along an unsuspecting road is The MacKenzie Room. This absolute gem is well worth the short journey out of the city centre. Our waiter was a legend - friendly, helpful and showed such passion for his craft. We began with the...More
Amazing tasting menu, very cool setting, great service and fab drinks menu, loved this place. You have to try the ‘chicken of the sea’ dish, my fave of the night
We had the best time yesterday celebrating mother's day and my daughters 30th birthday. Carolina and Brandon were absolutely amazing, and were so attentive. Every dish was amazing, we decided to enjoy the ""We Want it All"" option, we particularly enjoyed the Chicken of the...More
Arrived for a late evening meal. We selected the ""I want it all"" meal for 7 of us. I highly recommend this restaurant. It was creative- the squid ink urchen paté was spectacular, the celeriac was beautiful, the tuna amazing. Well, I could go on...More
We did a dine out with friends and opted for the set ($69) menu. Service was outstanding with our server ""Brando"" taking great pains to describe euch of the dishes we were about to receive. Portion size good for a set piece..actually perhaps a bit...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8420181-Reviews-The_Mackenzie_Room-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Market Grill at Granville Island,"We came early and had breakfast here before we did the rest of the Public Market and Granville Island. Lots of good choices of breakfast sandwiches, eggs and more. A very mellow place at this hour (8:30-ish) and a great start to our day
I wasn’t expecting much. But this was below my very low expectations. The sandwich was under cooked. The food was expensive. And the service was very poor. Definitely avoid at all cost as there are other cheaper and better options.
Granville Market is not a bastion of fine dining, and to be fair we had breakfast at the Grill, not one of their signature burgers. But the fare was definitely pedestrian, not aided by being served tepid, rather than piping hot. All that said, you...More
Excellent burgers and the fries, which are potato wedges are delicious. The setting is amazing and they had a good selection of beers. Would highly recommend.
Wow, what a great way to spent an afternoon. A very divers food market with edible goods from all over the world. Make sure you come hungry ;-)
I have been working on Granville Island for 9 years. This is the best brekfest place on Granville Island. I was crushed when they shut down for nearly 2 years because of Covid but my BELT is back baby! Never leave me again! Been here...More
I use to work at GI and would head over to the market Grill for breakfast or lunch. After 25 years I still go there for a treat. The burgers are very tasty and full on goodies; and as a kiwi a loaded burger is...More
So many choices and prices were reasonable. Ask for a table by the window so you can people watch too. Service was great too.
I am from near Montreal and my daughter lives in Vancouver. And each visiting trip (like every 18 months) would not be complete without the salmon burger. It is beyond good! Sooooo good!
great restaurant great food!! We went whale watching and went here after so tasty.. quick great service we will definitely go back
We had been riding bikes on a chilly day and the idea of soup was just the thing. However, the salmon chowder was 90% potatoes, 5% cabbage, and 5% salmon. Also, it was so scalding hot that it took 20 minutes to cool off, which...More
Went because of the posted reviews. Because it was a holiday, Granville felt like the weekend rather than a weekday. However, there were only a couple of people ahead of us in the order queue. We ordered a black and blue and a market special,...More
Fantastic selection of burgers with something for everyone. I will be back for more, well worth the wait, it does get busy.
Finding seating on a Saturday was the only issue we had with this restaurant. Wow, the hamburger was fantastic...best I have had in many many years. My wife had the salmon “burger” and reported it was a excellent. The fries were also delicious. Quick, courteous...More
I had the bacon, lettuce, egg, and tomatto sandwich for breakfast. It was excellent. As this is located in the public markst and you have a great view of False Creek. The market is pretty quiet at this hour so you can enjoy this great...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1857320-Reviews-The_Market_Grill_at_Granville_Island-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Marquis,"We chose this establishment to dine in before a show at the Stanley theatre just up the block. To say we were disappointed would be an understatement. My partner ordered the Brussels and Bacon and the Shrimp Gyoza (limited choices due to a dairy allergy)...More
So disappointed. Had frequented this establishment a few times prior to Covid and always been happy with food and service. Went last night (prior to taking in a show at The Stanley) and it was awful. How can you go wrong with fries and salad?...More
We were looking for a spot to have dinner before a show at the Stanley. Since the Marquis is listed as a pub we were happily suprised by the menu and quality of the food. Prices were reasonable and service attentive. Bonus is a 15%...More
We loved this place which was our last stop on the South Granville food tour where we had a gorgeous rum drink and cheesecake. I loved the atmosphere of this long and thin restaurant/bar and its booths and seating area. Really lovely staff too -...More
I am an average joe and find that hipster places can make me feel a bit uncomfortable, like you need a retinal scan to be allowed in. This place is definitely hipster but i didn't find it uncomfortable and the food was good. This is...More
This place tries to do the gastropub thing, and kind of makes it work, but a few tweaks to the menu would make it even better. Pan seared salmon with house-made gnocchi had a cream sauce, but why? Salmon is already a relatively oily fish....More
Selected the place to eat before our show. I ordered the Beef Bourguignon. Very rich and oh so good. White house wine was good too. Service excellent. The prices very reasonable. We got our meals hot and fast so we had no problem being on...More
We only just discovered this place, and we all totally loved the visit. We had theatre tickets, and our server, Jeremy, made sure we were seated, served, and paid up in great time. The menu is varied, with lots of choices. We all loved our...More
Great late night spot for cocktails and food! Nice ambience friendly service and great drinks! Only drawback was the lights were too bright both times I went in!! Would love it to be slightly dimmer especially after midnight! Will definitely return.
Landed in vancouver very late, and was looking for a quick meal around 11pm. Stumbled upon The Marquis. Food, service, and ambiance were wonderful, we even went back 2 nights later (which we never do on vacation!). Spinach dip is a MUST, beef bourgignon very...More
We had a nice evenin of dinner and drinks here. The menu is varied and inventive, if sometimes bland.
Friendly staff,lovely neighbourhood feel! I come quite a bit and can't get beyond the yummy perogies,but other have had a variety of dishes and enjoyed them.It can be hectic before curtain time so give yourself time to pay your bill.
... then maybe this place would feature into one of their books. Maybe it's just the wood panelling and narrow space that reminds me of John's Grill in San Francisco, but there's something cool about it. A good cocktail list, though my first order -...More
Going to the theatre and stopped in for a chicken burger and pasta. Food arrived hot and quickly. Very good.
We found out about The Marquis when we purchased our tickets for a performance at the Stanley Theatre and decided to give it a try. Half a block from the theatre made it convenient, and at the time there was a 15% discount for theatre...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4853999-Reviews-The_Marquis-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Mexican,"The restaurant was recommended by the Concierge at our hotel when we asked for great Mexican food. The restaurant was small but lively and welcoming and the servers were also lovely. We had the guacamole with chips to start, fresh with plenty of chips. My...More
Our discovery of this gem really thrilled us. We didn't expect much once we saw the decor, but were very impressed. Our service was great, the drinks were enjoyable, and our meal was first rate! I can hardly wait to get back to Vancouver so...More
My friends and I ordered chilaquiles and enfrijoladas. Everything was delicious and felt like home. Good portions (one plate is more than enough food for one) and you can even share.
Busy little spot. Had to wait about 15 minutes for a table which was fine as there were 8 of us. Food was delicious as was the beer. Staff were friendly and efficient. It’s not located in the best area so care should be taken...More
Excellent food and service. The food was the best I have tasted outside of mexico and very reasonably priced. The staff were brilliant.
My wife and I were in Vancouver for a few days and were craving some Mexican food. We tracked down this restaurant and had lunch there. My wife had chimichanga and I had 3 soft tacos. My wife didn't enjoy her dish as much as...More
Great little spot for some casual dining. Great atmosphere and the food was on point. If you’re looking for some authentic Mexican food, this is the place to be.
For good casual Mexican I usually come here. There are a few tables outside on their patio or you can sit inside. Friendly service.
Huge mistake made either by person taking order, kitchen or both. Out of three people, two orders wrong. Left other order on table. Finished before other people received their food. Would have been much better if my food taken back and all brought out together!...More
Stopped in for lunch and we were really happy with our food. The food came out quickly. I was very happy with their COVID measures - collecting phone #s, sanittizer, and tables spaced apart. All patrons were wearing masks and it was a great atmosphere.
Was craving for some tacos, beans, guacamole and margaritas. We wandered here. Nice little canteen. The surroundings was weird. People were smoking just outside. Small plates. The food was OK. They were luke warm and a bit bland to my taste. The service was friendly....More
This place has fantastic margaritas and the refried beans are to die for. I wasn't happy with their change of menu as they removed the mushrooms carnitas which we had every time we went. So we just had chips and guac with margaritas which were...More
After reading all the great reviews we thought we had to try The Mexican out. The service was fast and the food came quickly. The tacos were fabulous but the rest of the food was just ok. Certainly not the best Mexican we have ever...More
This place is our go to for Mexican cuisine in Vancouver. Great beef huraches, tacos al pastor and enchiladas, as well as good Mexican beer and margaritas. All served with great service for a very reasonable price.
Great news! The Mexican has just reopened ,for take out only. Had to close because of the Covid 19 closure of all resturants. This is still my favorite,and only Mexican restaurant. Can usually park right in front ,if you drive there, so no contact with...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3332748-Reviews-The_Mexican-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Moose Vancouver,"Great service and prices. Had the salad once and pizza garlic bread and salad the other time Great music playing. Nearly walked past as in downtown surrounded by fast food outlets. But once inside was perfect
fun little spot, in the middle of lots of choices for eating. Food is good for bar food, but the fun atmosphere is what drew us in. The jukebox was playing great music and fair prices. Spend your evening here
It didn’t look like much from the street but we had a great meal and lovely hospitality. We were worried when their menu was halved due to their fryer not working but ordered the ribs and burgers . Burgers were great , ribs were bloody...More
Good food, good drinks, good vibes, good service. They have a jukebox even. I recommend the potato skins or bacon cheese burger
We really enjoyed our evening here. The food was very good and also inexpensive. The burger was crisp and juicy. The fries were crispy. The pulled pork was maybe a little too Smokey for my taste but that’s just my taste. The beer was great...More
Worst service I’ve ever had. The lady was so rude that I’m shocked she’s employed. The worst attitude I’ve ever come across.
Stumbled onto this awesome bar downtown last weekend, what a great place! No other place like it downtown Vancouver..Great music and the atmosphere is a blast. Had two great hot dogs and fries for 6.50. Not a fancy place, but it is a lot of...More
Only my last night before flying home I fancied a couple drinks somewhere in Vancouver. I came straight onto Tripadvisor and found The Moose top of the list. With a name like that I felt it was the right place to end my trip and...More
The music in the place is good old school R'n'R. The atmosphere is fun and interesting. Drink prices are reasonable. Our waitress seemed preoccupied or perhaps bored but still offered good service. Drop in here for a beverage or two. Cheers!
The food was very good, I like the pub atmosphere, very affordable prices. The only thing I didn’t like was the waitress started off really nice and then was really rude!!
I freaking love this place! The music is from my generation (yes, I'm 40 something), the decor is on point, and the drinks are ... did I mention I'm a bit tipsy? They're freaking outstanding! Try the Mooseballs 2.0 and the Mooseburger. Just excellent!!
Was an beutiful vacation,i visiting Vancouver and Victoria,two national park's,Lake Louise,Buchard gardens
Loved it! Had an authentic vibe with really good food for cheap prices. Friendly staff. Would recommend to anyone.
The food, the atmosphere were both fantastic. The food was big servings and the price was cheaper than most places we ate at during our visit and by far better tasting. Would definitely eat there again.
Had some great food and great spirits and very human prices! If you in to metal or rock this is the place for you. Or Hey of you are on a budget as a student or ..not! Go here and tell Ashi the owner I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6619093-Reviews-The_Moose_Vancouver-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Morrissey Pub,"Called in the Guinness and dinner. Nice pub, dark atmospheric, comfy big lounge chairs in you want. Had the spaghetti and a side of yam chips, both really good pub food. Unfortunately the Guinness was warm, unsure if that’s how it’s served here, or just...More
Staff is rude and very unwelcoming. Takes ages just to get a drink even though there are only 5 people in the whole place. Looks like staff really hate their jobs. Flat beer, just spend your money someplace else.
Not very clean and food terrible.Also went for food on the first night took one look at everyone and turned round and went straight out. No food that evening
First trip to Vancouver and made this a nightly stop. Thursday night had a man playing blues/folk guitar. He was great. Our server could not be nicer and more attentive. Vanilla/pear old fashion was so unique. Carmalized sugar on a slice or pear really added...More
One of the original hotels I considered for my trip to Vancouver was the Ramada on Granville. Suggestions and info from locals on Trip Advisor and elsewhere soon had me drop it from my shortlist for several reasons. However one part of my research into...More
There not one bad thing I can say about this pub it was sooo cool to sit in so many things to look at the food was amazing I had mozzarella sticks and fried pickles and was stuffed there was so much food. And the...More
This is a stop on every trip we take to Vancouver. They always have a great selection of beers and the bartenders are always friendly. I hate a overly lit bar with TVs, and if you do to. This is the place. The art borders...More
i love this pub ,is really fantastic place to enjoy your time and drinking with your love one or friends ,atmosphere is really warm with professional server ,i recommended this pub ,because of the art and type of the furniture they use there is look...More
I travel to Vancouver often for work. As I work nearby and like going out for a pint, I've come to discover the Morrissey. It's old, rustic and quirky and I like it. The on-tap selection isn't expansive but they usually have two hoppy IPAs...More
Food was fine though not very original. Bar staff really nice chap, and helpful. Quiz Night boring to most.
The food is pretty good, and the drinks are great. I particularly love the Molotov Margarita -- it's so spicy and delicious! The only downside when we were there was that the music playlist was playing rockblocks all night -- two Bush songs in a...More
They describe themselves as Irish but there are so many better pubs here. Food is iffy. Music is loud. The decor is just plain weird. If you are a fan of Anne Rice books you may want to visit as I am sure that Lestat...More
Served by an amazing server (Tania) - overheard other customers say she looks like Jennifer Anniston but no comparison since she is much prettier & MUCH better server! Fantastic grilled cheese, happy hour drink specials & snacks. Decor is rustic but fun. I could see...More
When I walked into this place I thought I had strayed into the Adams Family home by mistake! I get shabby chic but this was taking it to extremes with the invasion of chandeliers and deliberately tatty wallpaper. Perhaps I’m getting too old. Anyway the...More
Really nice location and staff. Great beer and you have to take the three dip plate!! I really can recommend this place",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2350525-Reviews-The_Morrissey_Pub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Northern Cafe & Grill,"This place is a hidden gem restaurant inside a Lumberyard and up some stairs.This restaurant is owned and operated by a very nice family with awesome service and wonderful food.This restaurant gets very very busy on weekends with up to 2 hours of waiting and...More
We just arrived to Vancouver from Toronto with the family. We were all exhausted and hungry! We googled a great restaurant nearby and found this gem!! Our server accommodated us right away understanding that we had small children. We had the best wonton soup ever...More
We love this place! The food was amazing. Richard, our server, was so kind and explained how it’s a family owned business. I could eat 100 of his mom’s pot stickers. It was worth the wait and the hype! For ambiance, it’s a classic diner...More
This is not an area you expect to find a decent meal but it was. You have to park outside the lumberyard, on the street. Rickety stairs and sloping floors. It is a throw back to a 50’s diner, music decor and all. Continuous coffee,...More
They readily admit this isn't fine dining. It felt like we were entering a time warp...a Twilight Zone vibe from a different era. The ceiling is very low and the floor is slanted to the north. I felt as though I was on a boat....More
Not sure why this is a ""hidden gem"". Hidden, yes for sure somewhere in the industrial area so if you happen to be there and are starving, why not. If you long for friendly converstation and hear some history, yes. The owner and his family...More
Wow — thanks to Mike McArdle who reviewed the Northern Cafe last week or we would have never known about this fantastic out-of-the-way diner. We have lived in the Lower Mainland over 40 years and had never heard of this place but we are sure...More
5 stars because it is run by a father and son, they have traditional Canadian and wonton noodle soup and they were genuinely kind. It’s not a traditional “hotel 5-star” restaurant but in my books, deserves a 5 star for what it is. Homemade wonton...More
I’ve been known to frequent hole-in-the-wall joints. In fact, some of my favourite places to visit are down-to-earth eateries where the owners love what they do and are unpretentious about it. Well, I’m happy to say that I’ve found a new place that meets these...More
Hidden place, but great dinner style food. Fries are hand cut, philly steak sandwich was excellent! Definitely worth it for a good saturday brunch if you are craving home cooked meal.
Came into the restaurant and was immediately greeted by Raymond. He explained the menu and that everything was made from scratch on site. From hand made won tons to grinding their own meat. Had the Won Ton soup with prawns which was delicious and a...More
Went in to visit my friend that owned the restaurant as I have not seen or hung with him for long time. Decided to take my wife with me to have some breakfast grubs as we were starving. We were greeted by his friendly father...More
Hidden away in a lumberyard and up a flight of stairs gets you to Northern Cafe. Another of those locations where you would likely not take a business client you were trying to impress. Basic diner food although a bit on the pricey side compared...More
I was here with a friend in the neighbourhood checking on some properties around March this year , I hear and do read some good reviews about this place ,I honestly do not see any special about this coffee shop , it is my personal...More
This diner is hidden in a lumberyard in more of an industrial section of the city. I only learned of it from a friend who had been; they don't advertise, so they aren't well known. However, what a surprise it was! Very popular with the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7247062-Reviews-The_Northern_Cafe_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Observatory,"What a shame I got an extra live ant running over my desert at The Observatory @grousemountain. I was told it would have come with the flower on my plate from their garden. Why wasn’t the flower and plate checked before it went out? Poor...More
4 of us had steak, prawns and scallops, steak was very tuff and only method to cook it was to boil in broth, it was very hard to eat and almost all was left at table, scallops were very strong fishy smell so it ruined...More
Had the fondue dining experience last evening. The fondue more than exceeded our culinary expectations, the staff from start to finish were first class outstanding and the weather cooperated with a dynamite sunset and a sparkling night Vancouver skyline peeping through the snow capped trees....More
I would vote 0 stars if it was possible. WASTE OF MONEY! If it is a fine dining, then you better serve fine food. If you only have a fondue in your menu, then you better be good at it! Food was the worst thing...More
It is such a great pity that The Observatory, with its spectacular location on Grouse Mountain, and with its spectacular view of Vancouver below, is still closed because of Covid concerns. And this especially so at this festive time, when a visit in the cable...More
Good new is that the Observatory is now open three days a week and bookings can be done through Open table. Hope to see you soon.
Arrived at 8 seated at 8:15, waitress came right away and brought water then we sat there for 20 min until she took our drink order. Finally got our first drink 35 min after arriving. Completely unacceptable for the price you pay and for a...More
Thank you M1630FFdavidv for taking the time to review us. We didn’t deliver the experience you expected and we would like the opportunity to discuss your visit with us. Please feel free to email us at guestservices@grousemountain.com. Thank you again, Jacki
It was my birthday, and came here with 3 other friends. The atmosphere was nice and quiet in the beginning, but once the food started coming out, we were rushed to eat, since there were barely any room on the small table for our plates...More
Hi Jry - I'm really sorry to hear that this was such a poor experience for you. I'd like to get some more information from you (date and time of your visit) so I can find out what happened on our end, and of course...More
Restaurant is good and food great but definitively not kids friendly. One of the waitress kept a high level of anxiety within our wives due to the way she treated our children. Like they were not supposed to be in the restaurant. Worthwhile noting that...More
Hi Campoofer - thank you for your feedback. I'm sorry to learn that our team wasn't welcoming for your kids. We strive to include all guests in our restaurants. If you could be please let me know the date and time of your reservation so...More
Four of us had the tasting menu with wine pairing. The waiter was unfriendly, un-attentive, and forgot to ask about our meat doneness preference - we had to try five times to get his attention. The kitchen burnt the desert, so they substituted the desert...More
Very FINE gourmet dinner - however, the limited number of entrees. As you see the photo below, it is self-explanatory why we enjoyed there.
We wanted to experience Canadian Fine dining with a view of Vancouver below. We were celebrating our wedding anniversary and were allocated a really good table by a corner window. The staff were also very accommodating and allowed us to move our reservation forward as...More
Thanks for the review, Richard. We're glad you enjoyed your meal. Happy Anniversary!
We had the best time at the observatory ...it was a clear night and we should see forever. The food and the service were perfect. We had the fasting menu and it was grand
Thank you so much for leaving this glowing review! We love that you had a wonderful time with us!
We went in summer and on a rainy day, so had low expectations of service, etc. Boy, were we wrong. The burger was made to order and my wife's salad was fresh and delicious. We were very happy with the service, as well. Good stop...More
Thanks, Rick. We're glad we surprised you! We hope you'll stop by again!
Our group of 10 men returning from a fishing trip dined at The Observatory our last night in Vancouver and enjoyed an incredible meal overlooking Vancouver. We had booked this dinner ahead of time and had group dining menu which included a great variety of...More
Thank you for taking the time to review us! We're glad you had a wonderful dining experience with us!
Fantastic food, great service, even better view! The food here was Michelin-worthy, there was not a single course (we were a group of 10) that was not full of complex flavours.
Thank you so much for this glowing review! We're so glad that you had a superb dining experience with us! And we hope you'll visit us again!",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d709942-Reviews-The_Observatory-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Old Spaghetti Factory,"The food was fine, but the service was horrendous. We waited 40 minutes for 3 entrees. (And we arrived after lunch) Our server said it was because chicken parmesean takes longer to prepare. Really? But the bus-girl said it was due to a large party...More
The fact that there was a queue outside at 6.45pm when we arrived made us realise how good this restaurant is - and we weren’t disappointed! It’s full of character and atmosphere (there’s even a vintage tram car inside) and our waitress (Cliomatha) made us...More
We stayed two nights in Vancouver and eat twice here because it was so good, not only delicious food but affordable prices and exceptional service. First choice if looking for value and great food. The atmosphere is amazing as they cater for all groups, plenty...More
Hi Tony W. Thank you very much for the business and for the positive comments!
Meal was exactly what we ordered and reasonably priced. Service was very friendly and efficient. Had a seasonal beer which was excellent. Happy hour was from 2pm till 5pm
Thank you very much for visiting us Bill G. We certainly hope to have you as our guest again in the future.
Found it by just passing by, went straight in, and what can I say, this was the best spaghetti we have ever tasted, spicy bolognaise, baby back ribs were out of this world
Hi Margaret H. Thank you for the outstanding review! We are glad you enjoyed your meal and we value your business. Please consider joining us again soon.
Good food and good service. Good range of food to choose from and interesting place to eat in. Overall, a good experience that I would be happy to recommend to others.
Thank you very much for visiting us Kelvin. We certainly hope to have you as our guest again in the future.
Back to the past experience and that’s exactly what I was looking for. Used to go to the factory 40 years ago when I lived in North Vancouver and was nostalgic about Gastown , the food is good ,the portions pretty big we asked for...More
Hi Claire H. Thanks for joining us and for sharing your positive comments. We are happy to hear that you had an enjoyable visit.
I was greatly dissapointed. I was really let down it was bland and tasteless, I wouldnt call it gross but I spent a lot of money where I could have gotten better from the eastside pakistani store for 5$ . Soooo uncool I will not...More
Hello Escape29615431045. We are disappointed that your food was not up to our usual standards. We would appreciate the opportunity to get additional information and to help resolve the situation to your satisfaction. Please be so kind as to let us know how we can...More
We were at this place a few years back,just killing time before a cruise..still a good spot ,food still good..out on the patio this time,our waiter was a young man,with red hair and beard,he was a great kibitzer,his name is EANNA. so we guessed he...More
Thanks for joining us wash400. Your positive comments will be shared with the staff.
Had supper (5 of us) and the staff were friendly and efficient. The location is gorgeous and the food was perfect. Our only complaint is that there is very little parking in the area. We did get lucky and nabbed a spot, but the parking...More
Hi Louise S. Thanks for joining us and for sharing your positive comments. We are happy to hear that you had an enjoyable visit.
Food is what you would expect from old spaghetti factory. Food is fresh and good portions for the price. Service was very slow. Waitress was over worked and had too many tables to serve.
Thank you very much for joining us and for submitting your review. Your feedback with respect to slow service will be reviewed with the management team in our ongoing efforts to improve operations. Kind regards.
An excellent lunch and excellent service Thank you Carlos If you go to Vancouver you are going to visit the famous steam clock in Gastown are you not? Carry on down the hill a couple of hundred metres and you will find this excellent restaurant...More
Thanks for joining us Keith C. Your positive comments will be shared with the staff.
Exploring Gas Town before our cruise we went into the Spaghetti factory on spec. for dinner. Food was ok and tasty, and very good value. The portions are massive - I think this is a North American thing - too much for us Europeans. We...More
Hi ToffeeMike. Thank you very much for visiting with us and for taking the time to share your feedback.
Waljef in as a party of 8 without reservation on Sunday night. We were seated promptly.l and the service was exceptional as well as the food
Hi Chris K. Thank you very much for the business and for the positive comments!
we went there last evening, at first it seems a quite good restaurant but then unfortunately when we set down came out the truth: we were the only table with plastic glasses, we had paper napkins and the waiter was unprepared, nobody asks us how...More
Thanks for taking the time to contribute your review. We are apologetic for not providing our usual great Old Spaghetti Factory experience. Please allow us to follow up in greater detail by providing your contact information. fdbck.me/i/5757089. Kind regards.",28,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d709954-Reviews-The_Old_Spaghetti_Factory-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The One Restaurant,"It has been around 5-6yrs since I have been here unfortunately since I moved out of Vancouver and it is still just as amazing as I remember it. I got my favourite dishes, deep-fried squid tentacles, chicken nugget fried rice and two slushes, one mango...More
I came here 2 years ago and returned recently. The service and food quality was just average this time. Good selection of fried rice and noodles. We had their specialty deep fried chicken nuggets in fried rice which we found meh. Avoid anything seafood as...More
Before the Covid -- 19 ,I did stop by free time for lunch , for their Taiwanese Beef tendon soup noodle , excellent flavour , they are one of the top Taiwanese and Chinese ,Bubble tea Drinks around midland , their signature dish is *...More
First time here for a birthday celebration with 5 of us. We had a few items to share so we could try a little bit of everything. Our friends ordered the XO fried rice, chicken nugget fried rice, soup dumplings, spicy wontons, fried Taiwanese chicken...More
Went here for lunch with a friend. The dishes are so large we split one meal between the two of us and barely finished it. Good staff and great food at a great price !
The food here is supposed to be authentic Taiwanese, and so it seemed a good place to try. The smoothies seemed very tempting, and beautifully created. I skipped that, and went for the hot pot soup. It was warm and nourishing. The service was quite...More
One of the authentic Taiwanese restaurant with a great menu, dessert (shaved ice) , bubble tea, & their sky high slushes. Another bonus- it opens late. A wide variety of hotpot, fried rice, fried noodles, main dish with side dishes & sides dishes. Warning- the...More
With a huge menu, your choice will be hard. But no matter what you choose, you'll love it. And leave a.space for the slurries! Unbelievable!!!
Food are so delicious, server is great for she double check on us two times how was our food prepared coz my little one has anaphylaxis to peanuts snd they really make sure that our food is not getting any food contamination.. for me that...More
We often visit this Taiwanese Restaurant close to Kingsway. The potion of the food is large enough for two ppl. A lots of young people hanging out there at night. They have a big selection of slush and milk teas.
Been into this restaurant twice already. Their fried rice is great. I love the chicken skin and squid tentacles. Service and the place is good. I like the interior. Price is okay. Next time I will try their shabu-shabu.
Love it so much and I would eat there everyday if I could. Definitely recommend the chicken nugget fried rice and deep fried tofu. Very tasty!
There were 10 of us grabbing a late dinner. We shared a bunch of dishes : beef pancake roll - tasty, boiled pork and cabbage dumplings, deep fried chicken knees - crispy and crunchy, deep fried squid - also crispy and crunchy, spicy braised beef,...More
Came here 2 nights ago for dinner after a few years away. The portion size is still huge as before. But the taste has changed. The chicken nuggets are bland and greasy. The satay lamb fried noodle could use more satay sauce. With plenty of...More
Delicious wonton soup at this Burnaby eatery. Quite a diverse menu, will have to return to try other items.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4880315-Reviews-The_One_Restaurant-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
The Park at English Bay,"Staying at the Best Western Sands, we had our first Vancouver breakfast at the Park Pub. Sitting by the open windows, we had a partial view of the English Bay. We took the avocado toast and the healthy hash that were served rather quickly. Both...More
Heidi and all the staff at the Park put on a great Oscar Party ! Quiz sheets, gift basket draws and fun ! This was a charity event for Ronald McDonald children's charities . Well done all of you !
All the above can be found at the Park. Good choice of beers from the tap, wine or soft drinks. Extensive menu-card for breakfast, lunch and dinner.
We were early but Heidi took us to a table. She was a nice caring, cordial, smiling lady. We loved her strawberries she made for me on waffls. Great priced breakfast. Heidi Bridson thank you for your service and so nice even in the am....More
Stopped by for some drinks and nibblies. Staff was fast and friendly. Small deck out front if you want to enjoy and beer and watch the sun go down.
Good selection of breakfast items, and staff was able to work with my picky-breakfast-eater mother when they were out of some items to mix and match something healthy for her that she really enjoyed.
Food was average, service was above average! We stopped in for a bite after checking in at the Best Western Sands (restaurant is in the hotel). Typical pub food. I had the crispy chicken sandwich, was tasty and chicken was tender but ceasar side salad...More
Extremely dissatisfied with the food and service at the park hotel. The ribs were extremely dry with very little flavour. The breakfast sandwich definitely had out of date ingredients as they tasted extremely strange and we were left with sick stomachs. Also no dairy and...More
If want a simply delicious breakfast with huge portions, this is your place! You may consider ordering one breakfast and sharing it between two people. The service is excellent too. Enjoy!
We had stayed at the best western sands and had our first breakfast at the red umbrella café, second day we ate at the Park pub. We were so impressed. For a breakfast it was very good. No point in going anywhere else. Highly recommend...More
While staying at the Best Western Sands, I visited this place also known as the Park Pub 3 times. It is actually attached to the hotel. If I could, I would have given it 4.5 stars. The pub had a modern sports bar/pub vibe, but...More
I recently re-visited this place after at least a year. I was very happy to see 25 kinds of beers on tap, super friendly staff, and reasonably priced everything on the menu! They have a great happy hour menu and daily specials. It has a...More
Best breakfast in the west end! Amazing value for the money and great service. Paid the same here for 4 entree’s as we did for 3 entree’s elsewhere and had twice as much food of a much better quality. Lovely to sit by the open...More
This place came recommended for breakfast and wasn’t disappointed at all had the benny special service was great and quick and the food was delicious the atmosphere was awesome watched a few early hockey games and was a great Saturday morning.
We stayed at the hotel which is attached to the Park. Admittedly, we first came for breakfast out of ‘it’s easy and just here’ and weren’t expecting much. What a surprise! A comfortable setting, cosy atmosphere and incredible value for money! The breakfast is great...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3200839-Reviews-The_Park_at_English_Bay-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Parlour,"Really amazing flavors and great service. Tried the brocco which exceeded expectations. The mini meatball sliders were also amazing. The chicken pizza also had unique flavors that when dipped in their dragon sauce left lingering spices even after finishing. The server was friendly and personal.
I would not recommend to go here. Unfortunately had a terrible experience at The Parlour on Fri 25th Nov. We were seated near the kitchen and just after we ordered we noticed a mouse on the floor beside the kitchen, where servers entered the kitchen....More
Really great pizza’s - and (probably) the best gluten free pizza in Vancouver. The place in Yaletown is busy - but with a vibrant atmosphere. Great place - highly recommended.
Really nice restaurant. We sat on the patio under a heater. We only had a pizzette and it was delicious. Great service from Tori. We would definitely return. Four out of five because there was a couple washrooms that had no soap and there was...More
We had an unreal gluten free pizza here. The gluten free pizza here is next level. You couldn't even tell it was gluten free, it was so good. I definitely recommend checking this place out if you're looking for amazing pizza! The drinks are amazing...More
MY HONEST ANALYSIS OF THE PARLOUR JOIN LOCATED IN THE MIDDLE OF HAMILTON STREET, VANCOUVER, BC. If you want to be in an unsanitary setting and meet a Manager who goes by the name of Mike, who dresses 7 days a week, 365 days a...More
Absolutely disgusting. Undercooked crust and the toppings were mush and gross. I couldnt tell what was on it.
The happy hour menu is pretty good, but I’d recommend coming for the pizza, not drinks. I’d also say that the Parlour has a good, trendy atmosphere as well as good service as far as I could tell.
Not as good as it used to be. Ordered 2 pizzas through Uber eats. 1st pizza had barely any topping, a few pieces of cheese, lots of arugula just to make it look plentiful and a burned crust. The 2nd pizza flavourless, no seasoning, and...More
We went there at 5:30pm today and had a 45 min wait list and asked if we could get a reservation for 7:30pm but NO come back later said the hotels. Went back 6:30pm to put our names on the wait list and she said...More
Their pizzas were much better than may places we tried earlied. pork belly, short ribs, meat balls, their standard pizza all were good. Cocktails were pricy though. I think its standard yaletown prices. Covid protocols were well kept. Will be back
The staff at The Parlour are taking safety seriously. Tables (every second one being used), booths, and chairs are sprayed and left for a measured period before being wiped down. Traffic is one way through the restaurant, and staff are wearing masks. All of which...More
Ordered delivery. Food came in cardboard boxes completely messy and greasy. Any restaurant still using cardboard to package food should go. Invest in higher quality to go containers that keeps food looking fresh.
A few of us got together for some drinks and we also ordered food. We sat outdoors and really had a nice time. We got some olives and a standard pizzette. Food was great and so was the service. I would definitely return.
disorganized, waited 25 minutes after scheduled picked time - 10 of it while my pizza was sitting there going cold",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4553729-Reviews-The_Parlour-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Pawn Shop YVR,"Saw a few people on the patio. Dropped in for dinner and a beer. Tacos were as good as any I have had south of the border. You cannot go wrong here. It’s character is a bonus
Thank you for the 5* review!!
Stop by the Pawn again. Great DJ and the food was amazing. Glad to see new staff and a change in atmosphere. Front door staff and servers were great.
Thank you for coming in!!
I'm so glad nigel is here from the dime. I only go to the bars he works at. Always loved the pawnshop but now it's way cooler.
Thanks for coming in!
Visited Pawn Shop with friends. Really enjoyed the tacos and drinks. Atmosphere is fun and inviting. Special thanks to Tess for the great service.
Thank you for coming in!
The Pawn Shop is always a great time. Great drinks and friendly staff and close to everywhere you wanna go. Tacos Tuesday's are legit. Tess, one of the servers, is too legit to quit.
One of my favourite taco places. 10/10 atmosphere and staff is awesome! Our server, Kassandra, was so great - she was super funny and had us feeling super comfortable. Love it!!
Thank you!
Best spot for happy hour with some of the best staff ever!! Especially Tess! Always a good start or end to any day!!
Thank your coming in!
Taco Tuesday is the best and even more fun with our waitress Tess, good vibes and great food, always fun
Really enjoyed my experience here, nice place and nice people, especially Tess! Would recommend!!!!!
My friends and I are happy hour regulars at The Pawn Shop and have had the privilege of having the lovely Tess as our server most times. She is attentive, knowledgeable and has become a friend over our many visits. Go see her for bomb...More
Amazing eats and beats. Tess gave us the best service. She is such a doll and so sweet. 100% recommend to everyone. Tacos are the bomb.com
Came here for happy hour tacos and it was great ($2.50 each). Loved the Cauliflower and Carnitas tacos. The Mezclada was okay - not amazing.
While walking across this section of Vancouver, we stopped here to sample a couple of their happy hour specials. For $4.95, you could get Pawn Shop Lager on tap, a tequila shot or a spiked slush. I had the lager which was perfectly drinkable. My...More
Thanks for coming in! hope to see you soon
I love this place! The vibe in the room is awesome and the food served off the very eclectic menu is so good!
Thank you so much for coming in!
We visited the Pawn Shop on a Sunday evening. Every Sunday is All Day Happy Hour. The place was full and rocking. Fresh Mexican Food with $2.50 tacos that we amazingly fresh and tasty. Isaac our bartender was a great guy and took the time...More
Thank you for coming in! We are glad you enjoyed everything! We hope to see you soon",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d11956854-Reviews-The_Pawn_Shop_YVR-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Pemberton Station Pub,"Had the pleasure of dinner at the 'Pemby' recently and loved it! Bonus was live music. Beer was cold, Fish was hot, and the ambiance lively. Recommended, and we'll be back!
We really enjoyed our lunch on the patio. The restaurant is following all COVD safety protocols. Two of us had fish and chips and it was great - good crispy fries, fluffy inside and the fish batter was also crispy. One person had the beef...More
Cosy pub and sports bar. Good food. Good drinks. Friendly neighborhood environment. Definitely coming back to it.
The pub opens early on Football Sundays and offers a full breakfast. If you want to hang out where the fans do, the Pemby is for you. There is always a beer special and lot's of atmosphere.
Best place to watch football on the North Shore. Large pub with many TV’s so you can see the game from any seat.
My husband and I frequently drop by for a hamburger or ribs and a pint or two! Really good food and a comfortable atmosphere.
Thanks Rose. We are happy to have you both!
I love eating here! The place isn't posh, or a great looking place..it's a PUB! The food is great and the best thing and I mean THE BEST...is the Pemby Pizza with double cheese (extra for double cheese, but I'm a cheese lover!) I tell...More
The food here is great, and Cam, the manager, as a caring person, who wants everyone to have a good experience.
I found myself in the area and tried four eateries over 3 days and this was a pleasant surprise. Staff friendly and efficient. Menu is not just regular pub fair. I had the December special dinner with a tasty bunch of roasted vegetables and a...More
This place rocks. Lots of TVs everywhere. Menu is awesome, plenty to choose from. Beer selection is on point. But the heart and soul of this place is the staff. They were all smiling and seemed to be having a good time and all the...More
We had heard good things about this pub... but the food was not good, the ribs were so over cooked we could hardly chew the meat .... very disappointing
We are so sorry to hear that we did not meet or exceed your expectations. Please email us at pembertonstationoub@shawcable.com so we can try to make your next experience better. Cameron Pemberton Station Pub
Best sports bar in BC. Very friendly and great food. One of the best places to watch any hockey game, NFL or NCAA game even when not on regular TV. They also show all UFC with no cover. If your a sports lover, this is...More
Thanks hartattacked. We live and breathe sports. Our saying is Your team plays at the Pemby
Great place, fun atmosphere. The staff are always friendly, the service is spot on, and the food tasty, plentiful and great menu. If you want the best Pizza, get the Pemberton Pub Pizza.
Thanks Linda. Always happy to have you
I've been coming to this place for 20 years now. The food has always been excellent the people are great, atmosphere is fun there's more TVs then you can shake a stick at. every possible sport you want to watch you can find on one...More
This pub is a little off the beaten path but worth the effort to find it. My wife felt like going to a pub for dinner while we were on holidays in Vancouver and the Pemberton is what I came up with. We had a...More
Thanks for the review Rick. We are glad you got to experience some Pemby fun. We are blessed with great guests and were happy to have you join us. See you next time!",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d2643180-Reviews-The_Pemberton_Station_Pub-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Pint Public House,"They're listed as open on delivery apps, confirm the order and then don't make it they dont respond to email or phone calls. this is not the first time it has happened screw this place
when my phone was clearly I needed to get home. They stole my iPhone yet when I looked on to find my iPhone it wasn't available -shana.
I own a bar communication is important, six nations on TV I called from Alberta re six nations England vs Wales told entry was $10 great one six nations game cancelled so sounds fair, travelling with 12 sevens fans , at door first 6 charged...More
We enjoyed the busy, ""local"" feeling in this pub. Place was packed before the Canucks game and again afterwards. Food was half decent - fairly inexpensive.
I have visit sooo many bars around the most important tourist areas in the world and ""The🇨🇦Pint"" in Vancouver Canada gave me and a pretty awesome with the service my waitress was fantastic, she was so fast and very helpful explaining all the food in...More
The ratings were not so hot, but we liked this place a lot, as do others because it was very busy for a Wednesday night. I like the open air atmosphere, where we had a nice cool breeze coming in during our meal. I had...More
I went there a few times with friends. It is a fun place with a cool environment. Nice dance floor downstairs on weekends. Really good place to watch sports too.
We had a work function here and were met with good service and good food. If you’re looking for a pint and some pub grub this is a good option. There are pub options in the Gastown area which I feel are better (Black Frog,...More
Go ask for Bubba he's the best! Great food and drink specials and right by the stadium if you want to catch a game!
Got some wings on Wednesday during the happy hour! It is cheap and good, you can eat a nice amount of wings for a fair price, beers are pretty great and there are many kinds to choose if like it! Be careful choosing your sauce...More
Tuesday special was $10 ribs, I chose curry pineapple flavour, they were delicious. Portion size was good, plenty of meat, not a lot of fat, I just wished there was a bit more sauce on them.
With a free pound of wings with the purchase of a beer, it's hard to go wrong! The wings come with the choice of 40 different rubs, sauces or dips also! The other food looks good and also very well priced. The beer is relatively...More
I came here with my partner before the Juno awards. Great high ball offers ($4) – and service. Recommended for the happy hour deals, or during a weekend or event. Otherwise the bar is pretty quiet.
The noise, the ambience, the smell, all these lend to the place being a regular pub. The bartenders are friendly and the beer and alcohol choices are wide and varied. The place has daily specials: burgers on Mondays, ribs on Tuesdays, wings on Wednesdays, and...More
Popped in to check this out. Portia was awesome. People looking at their glass must drive her crazy. Anyway the ribs were off the hook awesome. 40 sauce choices. Mind blowing really. Ribs were awesome and so were the wings. So tasty.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2579519-Reviews-The_Pint_Public_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Poke Guy,"roy had great poke. i got a lunch plate that came in a bowl...i thought that was weird. it had corn and pineapple in it which should not be in a kalua pork plate. then the musubi tasted like it was made this morning and...More
3.5 out of 5. This place was pretty good. I was on vacation from California and started to crave Hawaiian BBQ. Found this place and even though the taste was good I feel there was a lot to improve on. For example you only get...More
Super fast and a giant portion! Ordered through Skip the Dishes- came right to the room in no time. Delicious and fresh..
Tasty and healthy. Sockeye salmon for my half brown rice and salad little guy bowl was just the right fix for my food craving. Plus a matcha cookie!
Great place to eat if you don't want to spend $30 for lunch. It's fresh and delicious. Staff is lovely, too.
It's been while since I was here last. I did takeout and very much enjoyed it. I ordered the half rice and salad plus scoops of tuna and sockeye salmon usually.
We stopped by on our first night in Vancouver as we fancied something quick and fresh like a poke bowl ! Now, we usually make Poke bowls at home as they can be quite expensive for what they are sometimes (plus you get to control...More
Poke place that NEVER disappoints! I went here on July 13th to get some Poke. I ordered Mini Aloha Bowl ($10) with some Atlantic salmon ($2.50) for lunch. Mini Aloha Bowl doesn't come with much toppings, but it still has some greens and veggies. It...More
I have not been here for a long time. I was craving something good yet healthy. They now have 3 poke dish sizes. With a base of half and half brown rice and salad, I decided to add cucumber, seaweed salad, imitation crab meat, edamame...More
My favourite downtown poke still. Never disappoints each time I come. Fresh ingredients made to order to my liking.
This my go to restaurant downtown for Poke. Great location, near Waterfront station. At lunch time there is a bit of a line up to be expected but goes pretty fast. I'm in and out in about 10 minutes. The food tastes fresh and smiling...More
Well priced, fresh ingredients is used. Big or small size dish you can order depending on your hunger level made to your customization with rice and/or salad base. I had the ahi tuna with seaweed, edamame beans, cucumber, masago, and imitation crab as my 5...More
Quick dinner before heading to a trade show. We each got a small poke bowl. The base is 8.75 and each scoop of fish is $2.50 each. Cost is about $14 per bowl. The base is A scoop of rice, some greens and 5 toppings...More
My friend and I stopped in while on a trip. Really small place, I don't think I would have found it had we not wanted poke and saw this place was close to where we were in town. Really cute shop with excellent music playing....More
I really loved this place. The poke are tasty and bigger than the ones you find elsewhere . The fish is fresh (I tried tuna) and all the ingredients are really good!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10800568-Reviews-The_Poke_Guy-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Ramen Butcher,"I had the Classic Ramen and the flavour was excellent. The pork was extraordinary. If you want you can add an additional ball of the noodles for a couple extra dollars. I had a side of sticky rice and was very satisfied. The pricing was...More
The meal was a small portion, there were no extra sauces on the table. My chicken was dry and there was barely any sauce on the main.
My husband and I stopped in for a small bite and had the original gyoza and the chicken karaage. Delicious! The origami cranes are a nice touch.
I haven’t travelled much lately so haven’t really been on Tripadvisor but my meal at The Ramen Butcher needs to be highlighted. Vancouver is full of noodle places and they are more or less the same. This place has the rarity of having chicken karaage...More
Wow ! for sure this Ramen house is best keep secret in Chinatown , not a big place but very mordant bright and airy estaminet , not packed at all special after 2pm feel very comfortable , they specialize in Hakata Style Ramen , Ramen...More
I stopped here for lunch with my wife. Not a big place, but it was packed. We were seated at the last table, and we used our phones to scan the QR code to review the menu. We tried two dishes: - Yokohama Iekei Ramen...More
Try this place! Delicious and interesting types of Ramen I haven’t seen in other places. Our family tried 3 types and they all were very good. I also liked the cucumber salad and my kids liked the coffee jelly.
The food was soo yummy!! I had the Red Spicy which was delicious. My friends had the coconut curry ramen. Personally I liked the curry one the best but the Spicy Red was also so so good! Service was great and it’s a great atmosphere!
Excellent food. Great menu, great food, great cocktails and even better staff. You must try the dunking ramen into the broth. Definitely a must try while you're in chinatown.
Straight forward but very nice Ramen shop in Chinatown. 5-6 choices plus a few sidedishes, thats it. Very croweded, the ramen was up with the best we had, delicious. Efficient service. Sitting at tables, counter or outside.
We ate at The Ramen Butcher on recommendation from my daughter's friend, who is from Vancouver and we absolutely loved it. I had a black garlic ramen and was blown away by the freshness of the ingredients and combination of tastes. It was my first...More
A friend who lives in Vancouver took me (a tourist) for dinner and I'm so grateful! Absolutely delicious! Will definitely be back.
Some of the best Ramen I've ever eaten. The food was great. The service was friendly and we didn't have to wait long for a table. We will come back for sure.
This place is great. The patio and interior decor are interesting and comfortable. The Ramen was a hit with everyone in the family (mom, dad and 3 kids). Staff were friendly and polite. I would love to come again and recommend to anyone looking for...More
I'm glad to see that this area is once again getting good eateries. The Ramen Butcher has a bit of a Western twist when it comes to the interior design, which looks great. I'm a simple man – I see Tonkotsu black garlic ramen, and I...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7716640-Reviews-The_Ramen_Butcher-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Red Wagon,"The coffee was incredible. Perfectly roasted. I like it on the darker side. The pulled pork and jalapeno cornbread Benedict was also excellent.
Only 4th time at new location. Service is friendly and good. Only like dark roast so don't order the coffee. The server remembered and brought me some of new coffee they have now. Happy, got my dark roast! Will go back more often. Prices for...More
I came here after hearing all my friend rave about the jack Daniel’s pulled pork pancakes and boy were they ever right. Wish I had come here sooner but now that I have will definitely be coming back for more on my next trip. Lot...More
A very nice older comfort food café with friendly manager and cheerful staff. The Reuben seemed to be expensive at $16.30 but it was far far too greasy for my taste. It also lacked much sauerkraut taste. The fries were way overcooked. I’m sure they...More
The restaurant is not in a good part of town and it doesn't look like much. But the food was nice, good portions, and the staff was friendly.
Finally this restaurant have a new home ,, only a few blocks from the old dingy place , love the new location lot spacious and treaty , little overate , during the late 60's and 70's , it is one and few breakfast around ,...More
Unfortunately I had judged this book by it's cover. Not much to look at inside. Sunday at noon had a little line up outside, but it moved quite quickly for a small seating area. The menu was interesting. The eggs benedict was delicious! I don't...More
Great food and friendly service in a well worn restaurant. Trendy, busy and old place. Everybody appeared happy and having a good time. Service was timely and food was tasty and well presented. Often a line up outside, so come early.
This is an amazing local restaurant that is famous for its breakfast. It's not much to look at, and it is a little rough around the edges, but the food here is incredible. If you're looking for super tasty food at a fair price, this...More
Why is this place nearly empty in the evening? Mornings there is a lineup for brunch, but evenings there is always plenty or room, despite the excellent budget prices and friendly service. My friend who is a burger fan gives burgers here a top rating,...More
First time visit and impressed with both the service and the menu, went for the blueberry pancakes with sausage.. coffee on tap, will be back !
The Red Wagon is a diner extraordinare. They have an excellent selection of breakfast and lunch menu items. Service is seamless and the food is delicious. There is usually a small lineup but do not be put off by this. Things move quickly. My wife...More
Morning after a delayed 9 hour flight, a big Canadian breakfast was needed by us. This was the place, Truckers Breakfast with constant coffee top ups and an Eggs Benedict with tea. The Red Wagon was very busy .... buzzing in fact. Not a place...More
For me, it was a walk of 5kms on a Sunday morning, supposed to be two birds with one stone. Doing my daily 10K step and treating myself with some delicious food. The eaely morning line-up gave me the idea that I’m on the right...More
This restaurant was one of the first places I visited when I loved to Vancouver, and 5 years later I keep going back! Their Trucker Breakfast is the stuff of dreams.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2222031-Reviews-The_Red_Wagon-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Refinery Event Space,"If you’re looking to host a small event, look no further! The venue is nice and open, and you can bring a DJ to hook up to their sound system. The service is amazing and food is decent.
Thank you for an amazing and memorable experience for my husband's birthday!! We had a cocktail style party with gourmet appetizers and drinks, it was perfect, very classy! Staff was outstanding and went above and beyond, the food was delicious and the service impeccable!!
We hosted a poker event at The Refinery for our colleagues and everyone raved about our event. Ray was a pleasure to work with start to finish. He was communicative the entire time, and he was very knowledgeable about how much food to order for...More
We had a private party here on a friends recommendation and we found exactly what we were looking for. Good vibes, intimate conversations & great drinks. Ray the owner seriously went out of his way to make sure he sorted us out. He listened to...More
I made a reservation for 15 people. We were greeted by friendly staff and welcomed in. Ray one of the owners of the restaurant was regularly present and asking if he could contribute in any way. We ordered food family style and had steak and...More
Was at the refinery last night for a birthday party. Got the steak for dinner and it was just lovely. We were all very impressed with our food. Want to go back asap.
thank you for coming in! hope to see you soon
Awesome place with a delicious tapas and variety of drinks, friendly staff. Great place to drink while chatting with friends.
Thanks for coming in!
We stumbled upon this gem of a restaurant one evening, and immediately knew we were in the right place. We were greeted by our friendly and professional server Jessica, and she made our visit very memorable by recommending more spots for our bar-hopping adventure that...More
Thanks for coming in
We were in 2 minds having read the other reviews, especially as the entrance is very off putting. However we 4 friends, after a week of good food on a cruise ship, were blown away by the flavours and tastes served up. We had 3...More
Thank you for coming in!
Stopped in here for a bite to eat before a show. It was Loko Ono - a kitchen swap for Hawaiian fare and cocktails. While we didn't try the cocktails, we did try the $9.95 dishes. He had the Kahlua pork poutine, I had the...More
The restaurant accommodated our last minute reservation for 6 and provided amazing service despite a large party also going on. They were very attentive. The drinks are tasty with house made bitters. The food wasn't amazing but not bad pricing anyway.
The Refinery provides some excellent spirits to help you as you walk around the other areas of Vancouver.
We came here for a birthday party and the restaurant was pretty packed. The menu is definitely quite limited in what they offer but the food itself was very good. They were very accommodating about letting us mingle in the back room. Overall a good...More
We picked this place for my bachelorette dinner with friends and family on a busy Saturday night. When I called to reserve, and then called again to add more people they were very accommodating. When we arrived we had a special table reserved in a...More
The exterior of The Refinery is a bit off-putting and looks almost like an abandoned building (the one next door is). It's a bit difficult to find, but it's 3 doors down from the corner (clothing store). Even the stairs up to the second-floor restaurant...More
Thank you for coming in! See you soon!",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1309257-Reviews-The_Refinery_Event_Space-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Regal Beagle Bar and Grill,"We watched a Leafs game in this quaint bar and enjoyed a delicious meal. My Beef Dip on Sour Dough bread (of which I'm not fond of but was cut thinly and was delicious) along with the house salad was amazing. My company had the...More
We stopped by for a pint and a late supper and were very happy with our choice. There are great craft beers on tap and a surprisingly diverse and affordable menu. Our waiter Jason was very helpful and service was fast. Stop in here if...More
Friendly joyful atmosphere if you thinking of Office Party or Friendly get together. Food is deliciously great and affordable Staff and Management are fantastic. Cooks are more High Caliber Chefs in view. I always had great tasting food from Soups, Pizza, Wings, Pasta etc. Drinks...More
Wonderful staff food and patrons. Great spot to watch nfl philadelphia Eagles and Toronto maple leafs! Go birds! Go leafs!
Nice venue, good service, lots of choice on the menu, the food arrived quickly and was delicious and was reasonably priced, oh and the beer was lovely and cold
This Bar and Grill are on the north side of Broadway and I walk on the other side almost every day but have only once visited it a few years ago. Today was sunny in the north side and while walking I came to see...More
Went here at the tail-end of a gathering. The wait staff were great with the people around and were very awesome when I came in and until I left-- super friendly and accommodating. Chicken fingers were top notch and the 1516 draught was solid.
Cheap drinks, good vibes, and excellent staff Always get laid when im there. The choices of local selection are well worth the taste. Atmosphere is consistently upbeat
We always have a fun time when we go the Beagle. Good food and great selection of beers. The staff are always friendly and helpful.
Great atmosphere, mediocre food, and terrible service. There are so many other places to go in the neighborhood. Very disappointed.
You have to try the best tasty light and wonderful Pork Katsu udon at Vancouver Regal Beagle Pub and Grill. Serve is friendly and fantastic. Chef is Original and Authentic. I been to many Udon and Noodle places. The taste of this dish is unique...More
We dropped by late and the kitchen had not closed. The beer was good. The service was good. The burger was good.
The beer was great and I loved talking to the locals. The food was a complete miss. Overpriced, small portions, everything tasted the same (fried). I’ll come back for the beer and conversation, but definitely will skip the food.
This bar is friendly and in the heart of the Kitsilano district. It's great if you want to get to know the locals. This is not a touristy place but if you want to catch a game or enjoy the Olympics, there are several TVs...More
Went with a big group of friends. Booked a table which was ready and waiting. Service was excellent and the nachos were huge. The way nachos were destined to be. Nice place.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4509851-Reviews-The_Regal_Beagle_Bar_and_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Rise Global Fusion Eatery,"I stumbled across this bar/restaurant in the middle of February on my way elsewhere at around 7pm. The neon open sign caught my attention. I am no food critic! so pay no attention to me, I only had two of the smaller dishes, but these...More
Thank you for your recent visit and your honest opinion. We're sorry to hear that the dishes you tried did not live up to your expectations and are truly surprised that you described the Chicken Seoul Good as chewy because most diners tell us the...More
Went for Dine out 2021 and the fixed menu was very very good. The service from the time we entered to till time we left was simply mind blowing. so accommodating and going over and above the norm. overall very satisfied.
Headed out for lunch at 1pm. I had the chicken ramen - very tasty and very filling. My friend had the squid ink pasta with fish roe. Also very good. The place not busy but very trendy.
Thank you for your review! We're pleased to hear you enjoyed lunch. If you like ramen, we also have a brunch version served with in-house cured and smoked beef bacon. Hope to see you again.
I had the vegetarian ""bacon"" sandwich and it was delicious! Really professional staff and the restaurant is very clean and nicely laid out. I'll be back!
Thank you so much for your review! We also have the tofu ""bacon"" on our weekend brunch menu. Hope to see you back soon.
I have visited The Rise Eatery in the south Granville ‘hood on several occasions and it never fails to disappoint. From my first visit to my most recent meal, the food is excellent and the service is attentive. I dream of the quinoa and rice...More
I am usually not a fan of fusion restaurants since I want the authentic taste of cuisines from each country. My friends mentioned this interesting eatery and we decided to try it. The store front was not easy to find since it was at the...More
Thank you for your review! We're pleased to hear we lived up to your expectations. Hope to see you back...maybe for weekend brunch next time!
We had brunch, 6 people. Great food. My friends were happy. Do not order coffee. The restaurant should have a proper coffee machine, since they serve breakfast, brunch and lunch.More
Thank you for your review and feedback. Glad to hear you enjoyed our brunch offerings but sorry to hear that you were not happy with our coffee. Unsure whether you had a trip coffee or one of the espresso-based beverages. We do use a commercial...More
My family and I were celebrating a birthday and wanted to go to a new place. After looking at great reviews online, we decided to try it out. The reviews were definitely correct! The establishment was nice and very clean. I was very impressed with...More
Thank you for your recent visit and for taking the time to write a review. We can't wait to have you back...may be to try our weekend brunch service next time!
We enjoyed two of their set dinners, each selecting something different so we could enjoy a wide range of offerings...and it was awesome! You can see from the photos that each small plate was beautifully presented and then each tasted wonderful. Fresh ingredients, delicate and...More
Thank you for your recent visit and review. We're so pleased to hear that you have embraced our dining concept! Look forward to seeing you again. Maybe try our weekend brunch next time.
My husband, his family and I recently had dinner at The Rise Eatery during a recent trip to Vancouver. The restaurant itself is nice and nicely appointed. I found the service to be very attentive. The cocktails were quite lovely and inventive. I had the...More
Great food, great service, great drinks. I am not a huge fusion fan, but they do a really fantastic job of it here. The atmosphere is nice too, relaxed and casual. I love bringing my family and my friends here. It's kid friendly as well....More
I'm giving such a low review score because the location, atmosphere, and existing reviews suggest that the food should be great. Instead, my meal was horribly overcooked and underseasoned. The starter was also bad. I had some tapioca, cheese fritter thing which had an odd...More
Stopped in here for a quick breakfast when I was heading downtown, although the food took a while it was totally worth it! I’ll definitely be back.More
Thank you for your last visit and your review. We apologize for the wait as it does get quite busy during brunch peak times. We were able to fill some of our kitchen team vacancies a few weeks ago and believe the situation has improved....More
Great place to have brunch. Great mix of Asian/West Coast fusion food. Plenty of different dishes to choose from. The selection includes vegetarian dishes too. Great service and the atmosphere is nice. Make sure you go early as the place fills quickly. Finding parking can...More
I say somewhat because it's a little off the beaten path for most. But I've been coming here for almost a year, and every time the quality of service, food, drinks and overall vibe has been high - and, notably, it's been *consistent*. The other...More",23,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12562179-Reviews-The_Rise_Global_Fusion_Eatery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Salmon House,"After visiting my mum's old friend at the Lion Gaye Hospital for her hips replacement and we dropped in to Salmon House for dinner to avoid the mad mad rush hour , they been in Business since the 76's , very cozy upscale restaurant and...More
We went for a lovely dinner, and were pleasantly surprised since the last time we were at this restaurant a few years ago, it was terrible. We had the seafood starter, which was great and sockeye, salmon and halibut. The service was very good.
We organized a surprise party for my husband and son, who happen to share the same birthday. The venue was perfect; especially with the evening so clear, and all the lights of the city sparkling as they were. The food was impeccable and the service...More
Had dinner with out of town guests, views and food were great, was busy so initial service was only OK but was awesome as rush died down.
We heard rave reviews of this place but honestly, I was disappointed. There are some great views from the skyline, but the food was overpriced. The food was okay, and the service was good. I know this restaurant has been there a long time, but...More
Great atmosphere, nice harbour view, good service, nice wine & delicious food. I have a very delicious steak and yummy dessert for the dinner, surely will be back again
Special anniversary and requested a window seat with view, booked well in advance and early time to ensure we would get a window seat. Followed up and phoned a week ahead to ensure everything was fine but when we arrived no reservation. Sat us away...More
The Salmon House has been a (West) Vancouver mainstay for 45 years, which is a lifetime by today’s restaurant standards. In that time, they’ve accumulated numerous accolades, including positive word from the likes of the Vancouver Sun, VanFoodies.com, Lonely Planet and North Shore News, to...More
Great salmon, good service. $72 for a bottle of Blue Mountain Pinot blanc retailing for LES than $28. The meal deserved a much better wine with a reasonable markup.
This is a destination restaurant for special occasions. Dinner for two with a glass of wine is $150+. Make sure you reserve - a table with a view is well worth your experience. Start your meal just before dusk, soak in the beauty of Vancouver....More
We've been going here for dinner every once in a while for pretty much as long as the place has been open. Consistently good food and service in a relaxed atmosphere - good view of Vancouver for out-of-town guests - with not cheap, but not...More
Lovely spot on the hill with amazing views of the Vancouber skyline and inlet. Go early to view the amazing sunset. Food is very nice especially if you enjoy fish. Staff is super firendly and you are not rushed at all. Definately a must come...More
In times of COVID it's hard to find a place that still values great service, and great food - Salmon House does all that and more, with excellence.
We were welcomed and treated like a family. Food however, has gone down a little bit. Its not the same as it used to be. Risotto was unseasoned and no cheese at all. Fish were a tiny bit over cooked. Vegetables weren't crunchy, it was...More
Salmon House has been consistently good for us. Food is delicious, good portion size.... and certainly quite pricey. But service is excellent and there's a stellar sunset and Lion's Gate view.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d710047-Reviews-The_Salmon_House-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Sandbar Seafood Restaurant,"White tablecloth restaurant with delicious food, friendly service and great views of the harbor. A bit pricey, but a fun treat.
Great room in a fantastic location. Used to be a reliable place for great seafood. This time was served dry, overcooked sockeye salmon. They promptly and apologetically replaced it by a fantastic, moist and tender one.
Sandbar Seafood Restaurant at Granville Island offers a busy and casual atmosphere with a fun and woody decor that adds to the bright ambiance. The service was friendly and efficient, particularly thanks to the very personable and professional Heather. The wok fried squid was a...More
Great restaurant - delicious food and service!! We really enjoyed the ambience and the atmosphere. The food was absolutely delicious and our server was wonderful.
3 of us went out for dinner on a Sunday while visiting Vancouver. This was a great experience, we split the cold seafood tower and the Crab boil. This was the perfect amount of fresh seafood for the 3 of us.
First time there. Friend recommended it and was not disappointed. Food was very good and service to match. Go after 6pm and get free parking. Would go back. Good ambiance
The Sandbar was beyond exceptional. My wife, myself and our two friends are visiting Vancouver and came across the Sandbar while just walking through Granville island. Our server, Natasja with a J, greeted us with a kind smile and was ready to answer all of...More
I went to Sandbar with my husband and 8-year old son two nights in a row during our summer trip in Vancouver. Both times our experience was superb! Their service was 5-star, food was 10/10 especially fresh oysters! I would definitely go again!
We spent our last evening here after doing a two week roadtrip round Western Canada. It certainly finished off our brilliant trip in style. The restaurant is lovely inside & has waterfront views. The food was faultless. We had sushi to start which was so...More
We flew into Vancouver yesterday in order to have a few free days prior to beginning a train trip in Canada. Last night we had dinner at the Sandbar on Granville Island. It was so delicious that we canceled our dinner plans for the second...More
Never going there again, we had the seafood broil, and the dish cost 99 plus tax. The entire dish was horrible!! It was mostly potatoes with no seasoning at all. Even after having the dish, I could still feel the taste, and it made me...More
Really liked the look of this restaurant- which looked relaxed but sophisticated. It was lunch time so we opted for Fish and Chips. The fish batter was so little and the fish so fresh and delicious. Highly recommended, we hope to come back again very...More
Very nice restaurant that offers live music and top notch food. Service is very good; Entrees came out hot and cooked perfectly. Good beer, wine and whiskey selection.
So glad we made a reservation to eat at this restaurant. First, we took the ferry which was so fun and really helped us appreciate the restaurant’s location. The ferry drops you at the base of the restaurant. We had a four-top overlooking the water....More
This is a nice restaurant for lunch on Granville Island that is a bit away from the crowd upstairs with a great view of the water and bridge. The salmon burger was actually not a ground burger but a beautiful piece of wild salmon with...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710048-Reviews-The_Sandbar_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Secret Garden Tea Company,"A wonderful spot for tea with friends or a lunch date. I advise to either go early or reserve a table because this lovely little spot is very popular. Food is tasty, staff are very service orientated and friendly. Only thing is the scones are...More
This spot had been recommended to us on several occasions and we finally had an opportunity to be there ourselves. The Secret Garden is a great little spot. The 3 tiered tea service had a delicious mix of sandwiches, scones, clotted cram and jam and...More
My niece and I went for Spring High Tea and shared the Masala Chai and the Secret Garden's Secret blend (creamy and fruity). We thoroughly enjoyed both. The food was as good as it looks in the photos (very tasty) and the service was prompt...More
My friend and I enjoyed a lovely Valentine’s Day tea. The tea house was bustling but everything went well. Lovely presentation, delicious tea, fantastic and beautiful food. And people watching was a lot of fun too! Highly recommend!
This was a highlight of our trip to Vancouver! We were so pleased by the service and the quality of the food and tea from the Secret Garden. The staff made this an experience that the whole family enjoyed. They easily accommodated our large party...More
An amazing spot to do High Tea! We had a great time here on the weekend, the staff were incredible and the food was all so delicious. Definitely worth checking out here.
I have to back track to before the special afternoon. When I called in I spoke with Jody to explain our situation and ask if they might be able to accommodate us. My dear friend has inoperable cancer in her brain, and she has lost...More
I love this place because of every single thing of it! The tea and food is amazing, The staff are super friendly, like a friend, And the decoration is eye catching!
A Vancouverite friend of mine told me this place has the best scones in Vancouver. I 100% confirm that! The atmosphere is a very lovely victorian era style with marvellous details in decoration. And staff? They are soooooo friendly. I told them that I came...More
My sister and I frequent this afternoon tea salon with our mom as it never disappoints. If you are able to reserve a spot at least a day before, they are able to customize the menu based on your dietary specifications (vegan, low sugar etc)....More
I love sipping on tea and eating mini sweet and savoury things. I can do it for hours without any regret for the time I’ve spent or how much I have eaten. Feels quite posh, if I may say so... The cups with their matching...More
We are a family of five and had five sets of high tea here. The ambience is really nice, cute decoration, cozy seats, nice service. It is a perfect place for relaxing afternoon tea. You get a choice of a variety of tea in individual...More
Secret Garden know how to do tea. Each bite size goody was very tasty. You are served enough food and it's all lovely. The server offered us lots of hot water and our server was attentive and pleasant. Make sure you make reservations.
The high tea at the Secret Tea Garden is a delightful treat that would be enjoyed by anyone of discriminating taste. The entire presentation is wonderful reminder of the finer things in life.
First visited The Secret Garden 20-ish years ago and have gone many times with my family over the years, usually to kick off the Christmas season or for birthday celebrations. The last couple of times however we have been disappointed and after this last visit,...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d947766-Reviews-The_Secret_Garden_Tea_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Shoestring Cafe,"The Shoestring Cafe, at first thought, one would think it serves simple cafe style dish. Saw some pictures and read some views, it was not so simple at all. When I arrived, it was a small place, so reservation should be a must. The decor...More
WOW. That's the only way I can describe this place. The name is totally misleading. You would think it is a café amidst all the businesses in the area. Wendy the server was so friendly and explained every option available. The best part is all...More
Chef Ed and Wendy along with their team just finished catering my wife's 50th birthday party for 80 guests in our backyard. He definitely creates dishes that are delicious and unique. They were professional, efficient and extremely organized. The Shoestring Cafe took our event to...More
I have just finished my Christmas Eve dinner with my family and I have very poor experience with the cook or the waitress tonight despite the fact I have patronized this café several time. We have a group of 5 people starting at 6 pm,...More
Came for the Dine Out Menu. There were 3 of us and each of our meals were excellent, will be back to try the regular menu.
A family friend more or less insisted we drive all the way to No. 6 Road from Burnaby in rush hour traffic to try this little restaurant in a somewhat industrial area. It was worth the drive... It is a little higher priced maybe than...More
Post CNY dinner. This $35 menu included lobster tail or quail or chowder for the appie; steak, duck or Alaskan cod for the main; and chocolate mousse or orange flan or blueberry panacotta. We tried everything except the flan. All tasty but we enjoyed the...More
We came here for the Dine Out Vancouver 2020 menu tonight. First time dining here and looked forward to a good dinner. Driving here it's a bit out of the way in a light industrial area. We were quickly seated as we had reservations and...More
First day for Dineout Vancouver! We read some reviews and this seemed to be a great start... and having lobster as an appie piqued my interest. We started with that and it was delicious. Very well cooked and exactly how you want lobster, succulent and...More
We have booked our family reunion of 20 in June 2019 at the Shoestring. We had visited the Cafe so many times now that we feel our family members coming in from Windsor, Ontario; San Francisco; Edmonton, Alberta; Victoria, BC must eat with us at...More
To describe this small restaurant anything other than French Fusion with an Asian Flair would be an injustice as confusing as it sounds, on the other hand your taste buds will be tantalized continuously and you will be amazed with what's coming out of the...More
Went for a 5 course Christmas Staff Dinner, approx 20 guests, Food was unbelievable, absolutely everything was fantastic, A must for food lovers, chef is well known and brilliant, price is right and service good. Will return often, My New No # 1 Restaurant
A relative took us to this great restraunt in Richmond. It is quite small and reservations are necessary. I had the ribeye steak, which was seasoned well and very juicy. The steak was cooked to a perfect medium rare. To top it off, the chocolate...More
From the street (and location) you’d have no idea of the scrumptious dinners waiting for you in this hidden gem! Amazing special on three course meal was an unexpected bonus. Only forty seats and can get a bit loud but the service was excellent as...More
Recommended by a friend of mine, we tried this restaurant located at No. 6 Road just opposite to Green Acre. Not big the set up but food is of good quality. Delicious food at reasonable price from appetizer to dessert. Good service. They have set...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d11615120-Reviews-The_Shoestring_Cafe-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
The Stock Market,"Had the most POORLY made, tasteless, soup I ever had in my life!! The so called “lobster bisque” was BROWN and had no lobster flavor at all! Not even a shred of lobster meat to be found! The folks behind the counter seemed VERY surprised...More
Worst soup we have ever eaten. We returned the brown lobster bisque, it was unrecognizable as a lobster bisque. Brown and very spicey. We then got the cream of cauliflower. It was broken and nothing special. Our guide said it used to be good. Not...More
I was shopping with my daughter at Granville Island and stopped at the Stock Market to look at their soups to take home. I’ve had their soups before a long time ago and seem to remember they were good. After looking at our options my...More
We were looking for clam chowder but their soup varies everyday. We were able to try salmon soup and a vegetable soup with mushroom. Both are good.
Amazing soups! This place is a main reason we're coming back to Granville Island again and again! Fresh, super tasty and hot! They always have a choice for every taste- meat, fish or vegan soups with fresh bread! Two small soups with bread ~11cad
This store sells soups and were a great remedy for the wet and cold Vancouver winterery weather. We were able to sample each of the 3 soups that were on offer and eventually went with a red lentil soup, which was filling, wholesome, tasty and...More
Stopped here for a quick lunch while exploring Granville Island. Their soups were very nourishing and they don't skimp on the ingredients. Two sizes of bowls and a portion of focaccia bread included.
Upon the tips of an article, we decided to try the soup here. They have a listing of many different kinds of soup but we found out that they only serve 3 types of HOT soup daily and the main listings are frozen soup to...More
It's true that the soups had become much less good, thick, super spicy in everything. With an unimaginable number of vegetables in their soup. For the past 15 days I have been returning to their old soups, including the delicious red lentil and root vegetable...More
For a place that basically only makes soup, I figured it would be amazing. You know, when you specialize in something, it creates high expectations. In the end, though, it was just a decent bowl of soup. Nothing special. It could be the variety I...More
I've walked past this delicious smelling stall a hundred times, always at the wrong time, but got to try it. Ordered one of their small pea soups and boy was I glad I did. Thick and rich, seasoned perfectly, and overflowing with flavour. Had the...More
I wish I had one of these in my area (Southern California). They sell a wide variety of different broths and sauces that the casual cook can turn into a first-rate dish. I enjoyed a cup of their salmon chowder, which was pretty tasty.
Freshly made soups, salads and other additives like pestos and dips. Friendly staff. Set up for take out or to eat in the food court area.
I love to stop here and pick up the delicious home made soups they make. Great variety, excellent taste. If you prefer to make your own and just want a variety of broths, these are available as well. In addition to items to purchase and...More
Great spot to stop for soup. Like the variety to take home. Perfect for the fall season. Some soups can be a salty.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1201377-Reviews-The_Stock_Market-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Story Cafe - Eatery & Bar,"On a layover to fly to Europe tomorrow and staying in a nearby hotel. Walked over after checking in and glad we did. I had the grilled asparagus starter and the seafood linguini. Both were above expectation and met my needs well. My husband is...More
Place was not so big, but very well decorated and cozy atmosphere. Our server was polite and agile. Price was reasonable. Food portion was big, and with nice presentation. Worth a try, this quaint place 😊
The brunch at the Story Cafe in Richmond was an absolute delight. The menu offered a variety of delicious options, from fluffy pancakes to savory eggs Benedict, all bursting with flavor. The attentive and friendly staff provided exceptional service, making us feel like valued guests....More
1st visit,obscure local; eclectic decor; but a pleasant surprise;excellently prepared food & drinks. Must Reserve!
Family dinner celebrating my son's birthday. Excellent meal and service. I highly recommend visiting this restaurant.
Great food, great service! Walked over from the nearby River Rock, for an early (6.30) dinner. Busy, but there were free tables. Had tuna tatake starter which was well presented, very tasty sesame oil, and wonderfully presented. Main was the lobster & crab ravioli which...More
Really loved this small dive in a small industrial area. It was just a few blocks behind our hotel. I not only loved the atmosphere, but the food was great! I recommend you get the bacon jam and the onion rings.
The Story Cafe is a hidden jewel. Don't be put off by its location. Not too far from a number hotels in Richmond VA, but your efforts getting there will be rewarded! Food is delicious, and a very good menu choice. Staff Friendly and helpful....More
Hidden away but close to the Holiday Inn Express is this absolute gem of a restaurant. I was in a group of four, on the last night of our holiday, and we found this place. Well, the food was so very good and and it...More
My wife and I are visiting Vancouver on our way to an Alaska cruise. We stayed at the Hampton Inn Vancouver Airport, Richmond BC. We asked the local residents recommendations on where to have a good dinner - the said gotta go to The Story...More
We went in to celebrate our 39th anniversary and this restaurant was the best choice we made. We got seated outside in the Patio good casual ambience but a bit noisy with the planes landing in the Vancouver airport nearby! The menu is very nice...More
Wonderful Breakfast. This was second time we have visited the restaurant and the food was very good both times. Benny’s were delicious and came with potatoes and a fruit cup. Coffee was also good. Lots of parking across the street ( free and paid). Would...More
Very glad I found the great reviews for this place on TA. Story Cafe was on our route to the train into the city for the day so popped in for a couple of pastries on our way and they were delicious. Staff were friendly...More
We have eaten here several times for both dinner and brunch, Each time the food and service has been excellent. They have a great choice of menu items which is perfect for even the pickiest of eaters! Our only complaint is that you can’t make...More
The Story Cafe was an unexpected delight. We were overnighting in Vancouver and the restaurant was down the street. We made reservations through open table, at the eatery’s suggestion. After arriving we were spellbound by the vintage items filling the space, delighted by the excellent...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d20326696-Reviews-The_Story_Cafe_Eatery_Bar-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
The Three Brits,"We were walking back from a bike ride and wanted a cold beer. We usually don’t go to the Brits, don’t know why.. just other favourites near by. Went in and had some nice cold beers and a massive mound of tasty skinny fries. The...More
Went in for a beer after a swim. Luckily happy houers. Got seated at a open window table overlooking the bay and people passing by. Not too crowded. The service was quick, friendly and attentive. We got two draught beer, a pilsner and a East...More
Great spot to hangout with your friends or solo looking over the beautiful ocean on a sunny summer day. The food menu is better than you expect from a pub menu. Nice surprise.
A lovely pint of Guinness and a great view too! Server was polite and very friendly, would definitely reccomend this nice pub 👌🏼
We were excited to try what appears to be a new menu item at this restaurant, a short rib beef dip sandwich. When the sandwiches arrived, they were small, not enough meat to fill the sandwiches, but worst of all not sure what the watery...More
Best guiness in Vancouver .staff great .especially Cyprus ..good bang on ..location bang on .well worth the visit !!
Came here with my wife and two friends late in August before we took a cruise to Alaska. We are both Brits and one of the friends is a Brit too and so the pub name caught our attention. However, what really caught my attention...More
Thank you so much for the kind words! I'll be sure to pass on the feedback to Connor and Sarah, hope to see you again one day!
If you are looking for a pub with a great atmosphere and even better staff, then make sure you make it a point to take in a drink here. Hands down the best pub Great selection of beers and unexpectedly I was made a fantastic...More
Thanks for the kind words Mark! Hopefully see you again soon!
What a great spot! Great view, service, vibe and food! We started our evening with a couple of yummy cocktails, followed by the chicken sandwich with rosemary fries, and the salmon quinoa bowl. Would very highly recommend!
Thanks for the great review! Hopefully see you around one day!
Service was friendly. Food not very tasty or fresh. We ordered and breakfast and a pasta dish neither was good. The turn off was the disgusting washrooms, so filthy I got sick. This place needs a major cleaning. Might be ok to stop in for...More
Sorry to hear about your experience, the bathrooms have since been at the front of our attention since this post, hopefully see you back one day!
Great location in English Bay. We popped in for a late dinner one night and had their fish and chips. Delicious. Great service. The ambiance was lively. Popular spot. Recommend.
Thanks so much for the kind words! Hope to see you again soon.
Great services and good beer but food was mediocre at best. Burger were out of a box. Homemade burger would have made this a great experience
Thanks for the feedback! Our burgers are sourced from Two Rivers Meats in North Vancouver a very credible source for excellent Farm to Table options, we would love for you to come back and give it another shot one day!
With the strict Vaccination-Passes, masks, and other protocols in place we returned to visit Vancouver a few weeks before the date on this review. We were eager to return to one of our favourite pubs with a view : The Three Brits. At that time...More
Thanks for swinging back Craig! Hard to have a bad day at work with that view, thanks for the kind words, see you next time!
Every time we visit Vancouver we have stopped here for lunch. It's got a great view of English Bay and is close to the seawall and Stanley Park. They change up their menu every six months and the food is very good. It's certainly not...More
Thanks for the kind words! Hope to see you again soon. Cheers!
The Three Brits Public House was less than a 5 min walk from my hotel so I decided to have supper there. The pub was bright and airy, lots of windows overlooking English Bay. I was hoping being a British pub, they may have had...More
Hi there. Thanks for the kind words! We hope to see you again one day!",24,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3965973-Reviews-The_Three_Brits-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Two Parrots Bar and Grill,"The most ugly food I ever had, the food was very very very very very very poor. The service sucks!! The place is running because of good location only. Crowd is good because they all saw the good location and came by to eat. Ugliest...More
One of my favourite dive bars in Vancouver is this one. Good drink selections and decent wings. They are great at providing client service. I can't rave enough about Priscila and Jake, our servers! Regards, gentlemen!
It was actually kind of shocking how rude the bartender was. She asked to see my bank account after I paid the bill to verify that I actually paid. She wanted to see proof from my bank. Jesus is this how you treat your customers???...More
bad customer service. if you want a nice night I recommend not to go to this place. I went with some friends and they took a long time to receive us. not clean.
So.... I got a gross yellow hair in my steak.... instead to get an apologize... I was ignored and insulted and treat it poorly... if I could put a -1 review I would do it I asked to talk with the manager and she didn’t...More
Had drinks while visiting the city. Was drawn to its name, the grungy look. Old school. The last of a dying breed of bars. Dark interior, strangest Caribbean themed decor I’ve ever seen- strangely enough it works. Basic furniture. Only had drinks but the menu...More
Great little bar if you want to sit and people watch. The bar is situated right on a corner with windows on every street facing wall. Wings were perfectly cooked and delicious. The serving staff were very nice and friendly.
49c wings, good beers, and great atmosphere. The place was packed when we arrived and almost thought of giving it a miss but asked for a table for 2 which they got together straight away. We had a movie booked that started in 30 minutes...More
Been here early morning for steak and eggs breakfast. Service was good as well as the coffee. What more can you ask. Guess I caught it right the first couple times when the steak and eggs were cheaper - a special of some kind. Once...More
What a surprise , great price and I was wondering if the food is any safe, lol And not only was safe it was good.
Can’t beat this price for a classic burger, fries or salad and 16oz Lucky Lager. NFL is on the tv on Sundays so if you are into that, this is your place. Specials (food & drinks) throughout the week... 12pm - 2am.
Was looking for a drink close to our hotel after getting off a flight. Ended up here after not being served at a place across the road. Reasonable priced drinks and beers by the jug if you like. The atmosphere was fun, loud and busty...More
Ate here several years ago during our last trip & it was memorable enough to stop in again this time. It did not disappoint! Atmosphere was friendly, server was attentive, food was delicious & burgers were BIG. Only drawback is that the bathrooms were filthy.
Very nice , of course too much TV which no one is watching and music no one will remember But the beer selection was good, and staff helpful.
We really enjoyed our breakfast here. The staff was so friendly and provided suggestions on where to visit. The food was yummy and the service was quick. We considered going back the second day for breakfast, but decided to have donuts instead.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d981403-Reviews-The_Two_Parrots_Bar_and_Grill-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Union,"Stopped in during a bike ride as this spot is right on the bike trail. Great food, great beer, great service, wings night on Wednesday and places to secure your bike. Not the safest neighborhood so make sure to lock your bikes and keep an...More
Absolutely excellent food. The wait staff was super friendly and very quick. We had kimchi fries (an awesome alternative to poutine), a tofu bahn-mi and the tteokbokki which were both unreal good. Especially if you like a little hit of spice. Looking forward to going...More
We had a great brunch at this trendy Asian Fusion restaurant in Chinatown. My wife had the Shanghai Scramble and I had the Bombay Benny. The benny was totally different and tasty and delicious with a side of Tofu Bacon. My wife and I shared...More
On offer a variety of sandwiches and upper-scale pub fare. An appy probably won't be enough if you're really hungry. Affordable OK wine, nice seating, friendly staff.
We celebrated Mother's Day with ordering take out and supporting one of our favorite restaurants...and man they did great under the crazy circumstances. We picked up our order with cocktails to go and sat in a park and enjoyed the great view of the North...More
Because of the TripAdvisor guidelines, I couldn't have two reviews too close together, so I just combined it into a single one. First visit: We arrived for a 5pm reservation and were immediately seated. We ordered a number of dishes, and I tried the following:...More
Came here Friday evening (August 24, 2019) with some friends for some cocktails and food and was extremely disappointed. We arrived just after 10:00PM and were handed menus, our server Sam ""forgot"" to mention it was happy hour when she took our orders, and we...More
Was recommended this restaurant by a bar person on a night out in Vancouver. The restaurant is modern and lively and the staff very friendly and helpful, the food was tasty and hot and not too overpriced !!
Amazing food! Came here from Chicago and we were so happy with the food, especially the kimchi fries. Also the rabbit shooters are amazing - the chase is so refreshing. Great ambiance overall and awesome service by Corey!
This very cool restaurant/bar has it nailed down. An amazing menu of Asian influenced kind of healthy awesome comfort food selections. Now the good stuff. They make amazing cocktails!!!!! Lots of different infused flavours and twists on old favourites. Thai Cesar. To good. Regular happy...More
If you can't decide what type of Asian cuisine to eat, this is the place to be. It was also highly recommended by one of my favorite music artists. We went on a Tuesday night, which happened to be their build a bao night. I...More
We particularly enjoy the dumplings, Bain mi, Hawker Thai chicken wings and Massaman curry. Good selection of beers including non-alcoholic imports.
Atmosphere here is great and so are the cocktails! It's usually pretty easy to get a spot to sit at one of the communal tables or by the bar. Staff are friendly and I really want to like this spot! However, the food is below...More
I want there around 9 pm. I didn't book in advance but I could sit soon. We were escorted at the corner of window side which was good but actually the table and chairs were pretty much high, so little bit antsy I was because...More
Had great friendly service late on a Friday night. Quick drinks and delicious fried tofu! At 11:30 pm there are no issues with seating but staff don’t make you feel rushed either.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2707025-Reviews-The_Union-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Vancouver Fish Company,"When the staff know I am ordering a happy hour menu, she seemed trigged. She leave my table immediately even though I am not finish my order yet. The next time she come to my table is 20mins after with my drink. I was disappointed...More
Excellent food and service, lovely outlook over the harbour. The tempura prawn starter and fish & chips were both absolutely delicious. Casual but all well presented. Highly recommended
On the water. Inside and outside tables. Friendly service personnel. Excellent large fish and chips. Caters to large tour groups as well as booths for couples and foursomes.
My husband wanted a lobster roll and we were in Granville Market and we decided to give this a try. Lobster roll according to hubby was only ok. I had a mediocre salad with chickpeas (well only two chickpeas). The salad was overpriced , the...More
We ordered the seafood chowder, which had almost no seafood, and was more like a potato soup. It also was not particularly tasty. I would avoid this restaurant at all cost.
The setting is lovely, outside overlooking the marina. The service was great. However, the food could be better. The chowder did not appeal to me, although others may love it. Too many potatoes and a little too thick. The fish and chips were made with...More
Vancouver Fish Company is located on Granville Island. We were in Vancouver for a few days and visiting Granville Island Public Market. It was about 3 o'clock and we were hungry. A local business on Granville suggested this restaurant. It was so nice. We sat...More
Great service with speedy staff, excellent food, nice seaview from Granville Island and comfortable ambiance! Weekdays are calm and easy to park at Granville Public Market!
No issues with the quality of service, or the menu options available. Although a wider beer selection would be good to see. Prices are high. But I’m guessing this is in response to Covid recovery and general inflation. We’d definitely go back there if time...More
Excellent service and great food. Try the wild salmon or the Halibut. Also wild halibut. Unique sauces that compliment
My husband and I ate here for dine out vancouver with friends of ours, and it was the worst meal either of us have had in a long time. The fried sturgeoun tasted like overly battered fried chicken, KFC tasted better. The bison tartar had...More
Delicious but portions were a big let down as bill was $300+ And left hungry so won’t be going back there unfortunately
My partner and I enjoyed an amazing dinner here on a Wednesday, which happened to be 1/2 bottles of wine (winning!) We started with the maple walnut prawns - oh yes! My only complaint - I want an even number of prawns when I am...More
The restaurant is spiffy, and we were seated outside on the covered patio beside the marina, so we had a lovely setting. The prices felt a little high, but if I factor in the setting and the quality of the meal, I can reconcile that....More
We visited on a busy Monday lunchtime. The restaurant is located right next to the water. My wife and I were seated on the patio, and enjoyed spotting the seals, as we waited for our meals. My wife has Tomato Bisque and Crab & Shrimp...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7101575-Reviews-The_Vancouver_Fish_Company-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Victor,"Great service from the servers. We were promptly seated on arrival. Server was friendly and provided a good description of food items on the seasonal menu. My salmon steak arrived raw, other than a crispy exterior, that was seared. Server took it back to the...More
Good food, service bad. Sat at bar but totally ignored by bartender that was nowhere to be found. Came back at end with receipt , no pen and then finally asked me if I wanted anything else. There were only 5 other people at bar,...More
We celebrated my wife birthday and we booked March 5th for our family and friends to have dinner. We paid 1800ish but my wife stomach was hurting and one of her friends, went to the hospital because of the lobster.
Absolutely wonderful food and server (Richard) was amazing! Richard provided good suggestions and helped me navigate some sale options. A plus service.
VICTORS Vancouver..... celebration of our Dads 95th birthday...2.5 hrs for food to arrive....our rez was from 6pm to 830pm....food arrived 8 pm plus....some steaks cold.....pre ordered birthday desert platter a no show....we are in discussion with restaurant for some type of consideration and recompense.
This steak house was very unorganized. Service was very poor , we saw our waiter twice all night. He seemed uninterested and didn’t come check in with us at all. We were left waiting and waiting. The food and drinks were extremely slow. The food...More
Debated on dining here based upon lukewarm TripAdvisor reviews. Went for our anniversary dinner and so happy we did. Location and ambience are incredible. Indoor/outdoor seating on rooftop overlooking city, bay, and Rogers arena. Drinks were fabulous and brought to us quickly. Service was top...More
First the room was not full but we were seated right next to the restrooms with traffic to and from the restrooms. The dining room is large and nicely spaced out. A table more central would be preferable. Sushi for appetizer was delicious and plentiful....More
We absolutely LOVED sitting on the patio at The Victor for Happy Hour. What a great setting, with the water pond and BC place in the background. The service was impeccable and friendly. We felt like VIPs. The sushi, oysters and cocktails were amazing! I...More
Good food but service so incredibly slow. Not sure if they’re understaffed or just really busy; it surely wasn’t full on a Tuesday night. My drink took 15-min to arrive, and we kept having to ask other servers to find our server. He forgot our...More
Great bar and dining location on the 6th floor of the Parq hotel. Drinks at the bar as we were early for our reservation. Smokey negroni and tiki kamikaze were unique, they also have a good selection of local craft beers on tap. Nice wine...More
We were staying at the JW Marriott Parq in Vancouver before boarding an Alaska cruise. We had dinner at The Victor in the hotel. When we first entered the restaurant it was very noisy. The waiter assured us that the noisy would soon subside because...More
We went here on a whim after seeing their Suppler Club menu. We made reservations for an early weekday dinner, arrived on time, and were seated immediately. First off, the space is very nice, as would would be expected, as the Parq complex is relatively...More
Great visit to Victor, tried several drinks from the bar. Bridget was our server and did a fantastic job making us feel right at home, and her timely service was spot on. Tried the tomahawk to share and it was delicious. Would recommend this place!
Server Craig recognized we were celebrating a special birthday. His recommendations for wine and dinner were spot on! Service was perfect and I was blown away when he brought a special dessert for us. So kind and thoughtful too. A pleasure for sure!",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13385076-Reviews-The_Victor-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Viet Noodle Guy,"Heard about the restaurant on Instagram and decided to check it out next time we were in the area. This is definitely one of the best Vietnamese restaurants I have been to. Even the regular portions are huge (and they offer a large portion for...More
First visit (Dec): We ordered take out since to respect the space and time. It was #P1 Viet. Noodle and #B1 Special Vermicelli with one Iced Viet. style coffee. We were surprised by how well the portions, food quality, and the arranging the package was...More
First time eating at Viet Noodle Guy. The place is very modern and clean. The food is pretty good and portions are quite large. The pho was standard, meat tasty but broth not as rich. Meatball banh mi was dry so not my favourite. The...More
We've been going here once a week since they opened. They are just downstairs from where we live which is dangerous. There was a week when I went there 4 times (my husband doesn't know lol) - there's a lot of variety so we just...More
My uncle and cousins were the first who brought me there, it seemed they kept going back because they liked it so much. Now they've got me and my mom hooked. Their food is tasty, their portions are large, they're quick to serve. We've so...More
In the top 2-3 Banh mi I’ve had in Vancouver or around. Fast service and friendly staff with your BM made before your eyes. Some say that the ventilation isn’t great, but the bonus is that you will smell like you are wearing eau de...More
This place is an absolute gem. I work around the corner and have seen it many times. Glad I decided to try it last week. Called in a to go order and walked over a few minutes later. Order was ready to go and fnsy...More
Been meaning to try this place for awhile. Saw it when I went to Brown's. The brightness and the modern interior caught my eye. Finally got a chance to try it out and it did not disappoint. It's definitely a contender in the pho scene...More
Everyone has their own favourite spot for pho. In the past, this usually meant some hole-in-the-wall noodle joint that’s seen better days. The Viet Noodle Guy kicks that trend and seems to be doing quite well at it. The interior of this Vietnamese restaurant is...More
Located one block west of Willingdon Ave beside Brown's Social House in the ever vibrant Brentwood area of Burnaby, this new restaurant to the neighbourhood is packed at lunch and dinner time... The quality and quantity of ingredients brings me back down memory lane when...More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d15937750-Reviews-The_Viet_Noodle_Guy-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
The Village Taphouse,"I have been going to this restaurant for many years. The food is consistently very good and service great also. I sure do miss the farmhouse chicken burger that has recently been removed from the menu :( It was one of the best around. My...More
This is a very nice restaurant and the food is good. I came here with friends for lunch. I usually like a glass of dry red wine with lunch and always ask for a glass of the house red. When ordering house win I usually...More
Hi stewartsM6086DK, Thank you for leaving us a review. We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed the good food. We'll be sure to pass along your feedback with the team. We hope to have the opportunity to provide you with a 5 star experience...More
Nice place and good service . the ladies at the check in did their best to give a good table and said if we would come bd j in 20 minutes she would have reserved a good table . exactly after 20 minutes we had...More
Tacos are one of the best in West Vancouver Good selection of the Beer Amazing Cesar drink Good service Nice atmosphere Outside patio or dining inside
Hi Roxijones, Thank you for the 5 star review! We're so happy to hear that you enjoy our Baja Fish Tacos and beer selection. We'll be sure to share your comments with the team and we hope you'll join us again soon! Cheers, Village Taphouse
By far the worst Chicken sandwich I had in the recent times. This place used to be awesome but looks like they started skimping on quality recently. There was hardly any chicken in the chicken sandwich, it seemed that they cut one single chicken breast...More
Hi axp8982, Thank you for leaving us a review. We are sorry to hear how this menu item fell below our standards and we made sure to share this feedback with our culinary team. We're glad to learn that you were able to connect with...More
Nice patio, large menu options, vegetarian friendly and courteous service. The food taste was wonderful. The truffle fries tasted awesome. Will be back soon
Hi Ankurrm, Thank you for taking the time to leave us a review! We're so happy to hear it was a 5 star experience. We look forward to seeing you again soon! Cheers, Village Taphouse
After searching for hours for a great patio we finally found one! The hosts were attentive and got us a table less than the quoted time (and let us switch to a more sunny table) and our server Kristien was very kind and was great...More
Hi Kathryn, We are so happy to hear you about the attentive service you received from our team as well as your great patio experience. Thanks for joining us and we hope to see you on the patio again soon! Cheers, Village Taphouse
Dropped in for lunch our server was very pleasant and frendly would Recommend it to anyone who would like a good lunch with premier service Thankyou for a great end to a very miserable day
Thank you for leaving us a great review! We're happy that your lunch experience was able to turn your day around. We hope you'll join us again soon! Cheers, Village Taphouse
Rude staff and horrible service . The management team are bunch of young and rude people. The food quality is okay but the service is the worse in vancouver .
Hello, Thank you for making us aware of your experience with us. Please feel welcome to email us at guestexperience@villagetaphouse.com and a member of our team will be in touch.
Enjoyed our visit here. They're quite thorough on COVID-19 precautions, which we all need; menu accessed via cellphone. Lots of craft beers on offer, and our server was super helpful in guiding our choices. Burger was excellent, with tasty fries. Forager pizza was more crusty...More
Good Evening, So glad to hear that you had such a great experience and you enjoyed the burger and pizza. Hope to see you in again soon to try the rest of the menu :) Kind Regards - Sarah. B - Manager
My wife was invited to a graduation dinner at the Village Taphouse for her grandson at 4:30 June 25. She ordered turkey clubhouse. When the waitress brought the food there was no clubhouse. They informed waitress and she returned with a chicken burger. We sent...More
Good Evening, I am very sorry to hear about your experience with us the other day. We would absolutely love the opportunity to have you back in again, if you are up for it. If you would be able to email me at sarah.b@villagetaphouse.com that...More
I love this place but they seem to keep getting rid of my favorite items! What happened to the churro French toast? Replaced by Belgian waffles that you can get it any IHOP? I was sad when they got rid of the chop chop salad...More
Hey! We are sorry to hear you were heartbroken by the removal of the french toast, but we can guarantee you the waffles are just as good! We have also added a couple more items to the menu as well, a hot chicken sandwich and...More
After grinding away breakfast lunches and dinner for the family, day in and day out for 4 weeks straight we thought we give ourselves a treat and bring food in from one of our local favourites - the Taphouse. They have a really good Pizza...More
While the wife was in a shopping frenzy we decided to pop into the Taphouse for a beer. It was around 6 ish on a Friday so things were busy. There was a wait at reception for tables, but we managed to snag a couple...More
We enjoyed the view, the youthful ambiance and the delicious food at this restaurant for lunch. The staff was friendly and helpful
Good Evening, So happy to hear you had such a great experience with us and enjoyed your lunch, Hope to see you back in again soon. Sarah. B - Manager",26,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d2055286-Reviews-The_Village_Taphouse-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Wine Bar at Hydra,"My favourite restaurant in Vancouver. Service excellent, friendly and welcoming. Serves fabulous greek food. We managed to walk in early one evening around 5 pm but book to be certain. Will definitely visit again if we are over in Vancouver anytime.
Jan, Thank you very much for the fabulous review! We look forward to hosting you again very soon. Claire
Our Server, Roman was amazing. Service was excellent Food was delicious. Will definitely come back again.
The food was delicious and our server Roman was great. I highly recommend the whole fish. The atmosphere is fantastic.
Roman was our server, he was a very friendly server who was very helpful to our needs! Great food and atmosphere as well!
We had such a great summer dinner at this place! It was our second time here, but this time was even better because our server Roman, he was so kind and helpful with our table! I totally recommend the place!
Hydra was a great spot for a great taste of Greece. If you’re lucky you will be served by the wonderful Paula. She made my partner and my happy hour extra special. Everything she recommended was excellent
We loved Roman, we would come back just for him! Our group had a great time during our visit!!!!! :)
Went for happy hour for my friends birthday. Such a great vibe & tunes. The fig cocktail was also very nice
Awesome drinks! Great service and music! Paula was so sweet, loved talking to her. Definitely coming back! My glass was never empty.
I visited hydra for happy hour. Menu selection was amazing and service was impeccable. Roman was very attentive and had great service.
Roman is the best and we had the best experience. We were so looked after and loved the atmosphere and ambience.
This was an excellent dining experience! There was 6 of us my parents and my aunt and uncle visiting from out of town! We wanted to take them to a restaurant that wasn’t a chain and we had never been to before! We chose Hydra!...More
I have been to the Hydra a few times, even during the quiet times of Covid. I booked for a 6.15 pm reservation on Sunday evening, for my birthday dinner with some friends. On seating, we were all told in no uncertain terms, we had...More
To be fair, this is our first visit, so perhaps the second visit will be better. Hydra is the cafe/bar of the EXchange Hotel on Pender, and we are not entirely sure of the layout. We went downstairs, which is a bar area, but was...More
I spent a few nights at the EXchange for work, and made my way to the Hydra three times, as the atmosphere was perfect for a yummy latte or glass of wine (depending on time of day) and a quick work meeting or catching up...More
Thank you very much for the lovely review!",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17556053-Reviews-The_Wine_Bar_at_Hydra-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Wolf and Hound,"When I was a student at UBC we went here at least once a week. Went back for some nostalgia! Well the decor hasn’t changed! The tables were the same and even the toilet door was still hung incorrectly! Looks tired and the food wasn’t...More
Popped into The Wolf and Hound with a few friends for food and drinks. A very friendly waitress from Sligo looked after us for the evening. She was so accommodating and catered for all the group's needs, she constantly checked to see if we had...More
The house band that play on Saturdays are what make this place, ideal for a few guinesses and a good ol' jig. You can't go wrong, possibly the best pub in Vancouver when the band are playing.
Went here for lunch got the fish and chips. The fish was well made but the fries aren't anything special. The service is great. The one thing that needs to change is the underwhelming draft selection. I had the Trash Panda which is amazing but...More
My bookclub group met here for drinks and food and I ordered the deep fried brussel sprouts which were over the top delicious and highly recommended. The pub is spacious and busy, with a congenial ambience that makes it a great place to congregate with...More
Brynne, was an excellent server with our group of around 12 to 15 people. The food was pretty good. The beer and drinks were flowing and abundant.
We often come here to hear the live band. This night was particularly enjoyable as the band was one we had enjoyed in the past and the music was terrific. We occasionally do come here to eat but not this evening. The food is typical...More
Ah, bëëëës. It was a sunny summer day when I entered the wolf and hound IRISH pub. The air outside was sweet, salty, savoury, all the flavours I KNEW, just KNEW would be tasted when i entered the wolf and hound. But, you may ask...More
stopped in for late night appetizers which were ok. service was fairly quick and friendly, decent selection of both beers and food
2 rules i have, avoid Irish Pubs when abroad and never drink Guinness abroad. Broke both rules last night and i was happy i did. Nice pub, friendly barman and a good pint of Guinness, nice are with sofas, like being in a living room,...More
Friday night at The Wolf and Hound means a local band will be playing a set for 2-3 hours! This bar offers a variety of seating options from booths and tables to couches and outdoor patio seating. The alcohol variety is great and the types...More
The first visit war such a good experience of friendly and warmhearted persons, good food and such good beer... the evening was overwhelming. The second stay with life music let us learn how easy it is to get in the community of such a marvellous...More
Great Irish Pub atmosphere. Young and old. Really comfortable furniture. I enjoyed the Cajun chicken and the burgers are gourmet. There was dancing to Live acoustic music.
Our server was there when we needed him and gone when we didn't, letting our visit flow freely. The food we ordered was pub fare but was done very well, special nod to the fish and chips, the batter had flavour and was not overwhelming...More
I went to the Wolf and Hound restaurant a month ago for a paint night. I also had dinner there. It’s a very cozy place, warm and friendly. The food was very good. I live here in Vancouver.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3692404-Reviews-The_Wolf_and_Hound-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
The Workshop Vegetarian Cafe,"This is THE only go to place for tasty ramen noodles on the North Shore. You can’t go wrong eating yummy organic ramen at reasonable prices. I always have the spicy tan tan ramen. It’s served either cold or ho in their signature creamy organic...More
Great news for vegetarians and vegans. The food here is outstanding and artfully crafted. A welcome break from the blandness of corporate and franchise eateries.
Went here for the first time as it had some great reviews. Service was okay, no complaints but I wasn't happy with the choice they recommend. The cashier advised to get the acai bowl. Well first thing, i wouldn't call it an acai bowl, more...More
As a vegetarian, it's refreshing to go to a restaurant where you can select from everything on the menu. Their specialization fills a unique niche in the market and their focus has created delicious meals that are made with love. I tried two different types...More
We went for lunch and had some delicious food. There are many vegan options as well as vegetarian. The store for lovely the coffee was great... we will be back
The food here was delicious, especially the avocado toast and the noodles too. The desserts and vegan croissants were very tasty as well! The staff were so helpful and friendly.
Vegan, organic, gluten free options. Delicious mushroom ramen and other unique specialties of Japanese influence. Friendly service, easy parking and outside tables, weather permitting. Free wi-fii and wheelchair accessible
Tiny place with lots of regulars. Small menu. Delicious vegan ramen with rich mushroom-based broth, and perfectly cooked noodles. One of my regular stops when i visit Vancouver.
I love this place! They have the best avocado toast I’ve ever had. They also make amazing vegan ramen. Everything looks awesome and they also practice zero-waste Just absolutely amazing
Found this café by accident, and it’s a bit out-of-the-way, but I plan to make the trip on a regular basis. The menu is varied and everything I’ve seen is fresh looking and beautifully prepared. I have a thing for noodles, so I’ve had two...More
A friend told me about this place, and so glad they did. I had the tam tam ramen. To die for. Partner had the mushroom ramen. These were the best vegetarian ramen bowls I’ve ever had. Salivating at the thought of it again. They have...More
We stumbled across this delightful surprise by accident. We found a good breakfast with great coffee in a clean restaurant and smiling staff.
I'm not vegan or vegetarian, just wanted a cappuccino but didn't see one on the menu, so settled on a mocha. Wasn't sure how it would be, but it was excellent! Nice presentation in large mugs, and a terrific balance of chocolate and coffee, not...More
I recently enjoyed lunch with friends here and we all loved the food 10/10 for everything. This is one of our favourite restaurants in all of Vancouver the ramen and noodles are amazing and so flavorful. Definitely worth going the distance if your visiting vanvouver...More
Great fresh food. We stumbled upon this vegetarian cafe by accident and so glad we did. Great place for brunch. My partner and myself both had the Ramen. She the Shoyu and myself the Tantan. Both were excellent. No we know it’s there, we will...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d11549166-Reviews-The_Workshop_Vegetarian_Cafe-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tin Tin Seafood Harbour,"The signs says they close at 4 pm on Sundays. They refused to seat us at 2:45, saying the kitchen closed at 2, yet the place was packed with locals. I suppose it helps to be local.
The food was great, polite staff and crowded for lunch time on weekdays! Always make reservation to dine at the restaurant! Plenty of parking space. Recommended!
One of the more consistent dim sum and dinner places in Richmond. Sweet and sour pork and roast duck are some of the best in the market. Highly recommended
If you are around the Richmond area and you are hungry and seafood is an option for you, then I suggest to visit this place at least once. The food variety was great, the price is a little bit high but it definitely worth for...More
Most times there is ample off street parking. Tin Tin is a popular restaurant for dim sum so understandably it is always busy during the mornings on the weekends. The gar gow are especially nice. If you're no squeamish be adventurous and try the chicken...More
Tin Tin Seafood Harbour is a popular dim sum restaurant that we’ve been meaning to try for a long time (but the large early morning crowds have always detracted us in the past). We finally managed to pay them a visit in late June. The...More
was there 2pm on a sunday for dim sum. as usual the parking lot was packed for dim sum/lunch. and as usual when we finished about 3;30pm parking lot was 75% empty. we had dim sum. very good. i would return.
We had a business meeting here last night for 10 of us they cooked up the biggest Alaskan king crab I've ever seen in my life. When a great taste many other dishes to go with it the food was good the service was excellent...More
Tin Tin is one of the few Chinese Restaurants that open at 9:00 AM for dim sum. The parking lot is adequate but not large. If one pays their bill by 11:30 AM there is a 20% discount. The seafood congee contains an abundance of...More
This is a very good seafood restaurant, serving authentic Cantonese cuisine. The head chef is excellent, one of the best if not the best in Vancouver. He can make everything tasty. The dim sum at lunch could be improved. So until that happens, I'll go...More
Not a bad place but could do with a bit of a clean up, make-over after all these years....not exactly clean but the food is good quality, very reasonably priced...be prepared to line up at peak times.
If you want to have dim sum at a restaurant that opens up at 9 AM, go to the Tin Tin Seafood Harbor located about five minutes away from the Vancouver Airport. I was here in October and had looked up Richmond Dim Sum Restaurants...More
This restaurant is one of the Chinese restaurants what offer dim sum that opens early. It's always preferable to arrive when the doors open so that you will find parking and also be seated at a table that is not beside a highway (a main...More
Our hotel front desk (we were staying near the airport) suggested we go to one of the more famous Chinese restaurants in Richmond when we asked for a good place for dim sum. We didn't want to go to an overpriced restaurant (we went to...More
This is a restaurant which has its own building and parking in Richmond opposite the Yohan shopping mall(the only disadvantage is when you head out from the restaurant, you have to turn right!) We phoned for reservation on a Saturday for eleven o'clock am, only...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4760209-Reviews-Tin_Tin_Seafood_Harbour-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Tipper Restaurant,"Delicious clam chowder not too salty or flour creamy just perfect cooked. Main courses made with love and passion. Strongly encourage people to check out this restaurant. Super friendly staff .
This was my first full day in Vancouver and a friend offered to show me around the city; but first he needed a good cup of coffee to start his heart up! We stopped at a nearby The Tipper Restaurant and Review Room before hopping...More
The food was delicious, however, a bit on the pricey side for the amount of food I got. On a plus note, the vegetarian gravy was super tasty and you get a good portion of it!
I am pretty sure if you haven't been here, you are missing out. Cool atmosphere, very comfortable. Amazing food. Service was great. If I am ever in the area again, I would not hesitate to stop again.
My friend and I visited for my birthday food was great and so was employees Nice place for lunch Will go again
I enjoyed fantastic, friendly service on my visit there. The beef dip with fries was wonderful!! It had a smokiness to it that I couldn’t quite put my finger on. Their cook told me that they get their roast from “Famous Foods” down the street,...More
Recently went for ""happy hour"" drinks and supper prior to attending an event up the street. Although the staff were friendly, the kitchen service is extremely slow. Although the restaurant was clearly not busy, waited for a very long time for a basic order. Not...More
Great food Great service cool and different biker atmosphere. Really social and laid back. Cheapish drinks Well priced food - really good.
Fantastic friendly service. Great food the mushroom and cheddar omelette, the Benny’s and even just their regular eggs and bacon all delicious!
The omlet with mushrooms and Cheddar cheese is very light and tasty. I always have this for breakfast when come in the morning. Other items for lunch are good such as the bison and cayjen chicken burgers.
I've been going to this place since it first opened, before it became a hipster hot spot. The owner Colin is such a nice guy and I love supporting this local business. He is the type of owner that will make it a point to...More
Amazed by the service and food . I ordered a rare steak and that’s exactly what I got !! The food quality and portion was very good . The service was excellent left you that feel good feeling I would recommend eating here or just...More
Older style pub with grub.........Perfect Across the street from the Days Inn.............Perfect Super friendly staff.............Perfect Customer talked me into trying the Moosehead beer........Perfect What this small establishment does to give back to the community is ..........Perfect. I tried the chowder and it was ??????????? Perfect...More
My wife and I visited this place twice on our trip to Vancouver. Very good food and the staff are attentive and seem to really care about providing good service and food.
We just stopped in for a drink, and were glad we did. Friendly staff, good selection of local brews, good music. The draft cider and Driftwood IPA were excellent, and reasonably priced. Will certainly go back when we're next in the area.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1906614-Reviews-Tipper_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Toby's Social Pub,"No communication rearding menu. If something is discontinued can you let us know rather than leaving us in limbo thinking our dish is coming?????
My spouse and I, plus two other couples, have been regulars since Tobys opened at this location. Together, and separately we have eaten here a dozen times in the last few months. The menu is very limited, not a lot for celiacs, and actually we...More
Cosy pub and grill. Good food and good drinks. Love the old school feel and friendly staff. Definitely coming back
Just went to Toby Pub and Grill for lunch. While waiting for my car to get repaired at Matt automotive repair. Cheyenne was my waitress, she was excellent. Did everything a waitress should do. The food, I had dry ribs to start. They were the...More
Went to Toby's for breakfast last Sunday and lunch on Wednesday. Both times we had Sarah M. as our server. Did a great job both times. Sunday's breakfast was early and we took our time which was nice. The French toast was outstanding. On Wednesday...More
We have been to this Toby’s dozens of times since it opened and until yesterday, never ordered their freshly baked brick oven pizza. They only offer two varieties. The vegetarian was pesto,goat cheese,mozzarella ,artichokes and red pepper, and the Carnivore, pepperoni,ham,chorizo,tomato sauce and mozzarella -...More
Stopped in here for dinner tonight. Burger and Kilkenny were both awesome and the waitress was on the mark.
Caught a quiet night so I just sat up at the bar. Laurie the bar tender had a great personality. Great customer service. Food was great and the food came out nice and hot Had a spicy chicken swiss burger with a Caesar salad.
We have been here twice and both times have quite enjoyed the food. It’s very reasonably priced and good value for money. Particularly great food for a chain restaurant. Service has been very good both times with us being looked after but not feeling like...More
Have not been here for a while and met a friend for lunch. The place was busy but got a table. Service was great and attentive (Thanks Kathy) and the food very good.
Can't really rate the food at Toby's because, although it was listed online as open until much later, when we walked in at 9:30 p.m. after attending a friend's graduation, expecting to have dinner, we were told, ""Sorry folks, the kitchen closes at 9"". So,...More
Met some friends here at their ""local"" while visiting the area. We really enjoyed the atmosphere here on a Saturday early evening - plenty of room for a group and the service is very friendly. My spouse enjoyed the draft Guinness with a brown ale...More
We visited this pub on a Sunday lunch. There's not enough of choices in the food menu. Come on Chef : you can be more innovative. And dude : more generous with your portions. I ordered the $15 chicken club. It works great as a...More
We enjoyed our dinner here. Nothing special but good food, priced fairly. Quick service, satisfying food.
We like to come here as it is the only place we know of that uses a separate deep fryer for gluten free fries, no cross contamination here from battered food. They also have gluten free bread and will do a BLT or a chicken...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d5857770-Reviews-Toby_s_Social_Pub-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tojo's Restaurant,"Sakura Omakse’s quality and presentation was very disappointing. Indeed Tojo’s omakase had been declining over the years but tonight’s omakase was really mediocre and unremarkable. We used to look forward to Tojo’s amazing omakase. We will not be returning to Tojo’s again. We can get...More
This is fine dining with exorbitant prices so we have high expectation but felt let down. There was five of us, three seasonal Omakase, two Shiawase Omakase and order Waygu beef as an addition. The food is decent but not spectacular, which was our expectation...More
I wanted to treat my wife to a special birthday dinner, and since we had both heard such good things about Master Tojo and his sublime skill, we reserved a booth a month ahead of the big day. We arrived 10 minutes early and the...More
As a sushi lover, I like to try the best sushi's places all over the world and I've been told this place was the best in Vancouver. The sushi were great, I mean the fish was good. But nothing outstanding, it's a great sushi but...More
I felt like I was at an overpriced kids’ party with waiters screaming some version of happy birthday to guests while we waited for our dinner. In fairness, the food is good. But EXPENSiVE for tiny portions. The waiters were not attentive, except for the...More
execllent food - super service - dining area and location a little bland. would definitely fo for the food!
We dined at Tojo's on a visit to Vancouver. My husband loves sushi so this was a special treat for his birthday. He ordered the Yokozuna Omakase and said the food was good but REALLY not worth $330. I on the other hand am not...More
We ordered food that didn’t come with our takeaway. The rolls had barely any food in them and there was nothing interesting or unique about the taste. A complete waste of time and money. No idea how this is highly rated.
We tried the Omakase menu at Tojo and were extremely pleased. The menu included excellent local spot prawns, house smoked wild salmon and fish brought in from the Tokyo sushi market. Skillfully prepared, beautifully presented. The restaurant also offers an interesting group of cocktails with...More
Tojo at Tojo’s is on it for both the new lunar Chinese Year of the Tiger & Valentines’ Day, offering dishes for both occasions. Tojo has been right on it since he opened his doors decades ago, along then with other legends chef/owners like John...More
Looks-up to its reputation. Awesome Japanese restaurant. We got there earlier for our reservation so we started at the bar having a couple of drinks and aperitives. Then we went to the main salon for our dinner meal. The sushi was so so fresh. It...More
December is the month when restaurants climb up & reach out to provide guests with exciting new menus for the festive season. Legendary owner/chef, Tojo, of Tojo’s high-end Japanese restaurant is fast out the blocks with his new Omakase menu, available from December 1. An...More
What is there to say about Tojo’s that hasn’t already been said? Chef Hidekazu Tojo is celebrated around the world for his influence and innovation in contemporary Japanese cuisine. In fact, when Chef Tojo opened his restaurant in 1988, he set out to change Vancouver’s...More
Our group of three enjoyed a wonderful meal at Tojo’s restaurant. Two of us ordered the Chef’s choice omakase tasting menu, while the other ordered the spinach gomae and the sable fish. The tasting menu included six exquisite courses, and a lovely dessert. Each course...More
We visited for our daughter birthday and ordered one wagyu Omakase set and three chef experience set and one a la carte of tempura plus rolls. The Omakase set were beautifully set out and taste nice. We admire the presentation, arrangement of food and the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710196-Reviews-Tojo_s_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tokyo Joe's Sushi Factory,"Food served up super fast, hot miso soup gets free refill. Friendly service. Food tasted good and with lot of difference varieties to choose from .
The most amazing staff and great tasting sushi!! We had to come back during the week, they are great!!!!! Well be back🤗🤗🤗
This place is the proverbial little hole in the wall. Looking inside, there's a few cheap tables for dining in with little to no decor in the single room. The window is plastered with hand written notes or ads of various sorts (one of which:...More
Definitely need to come back here again. Had really good sushi to go and have not stopped thinking about it. We will be back soon!
Decent Sushi, friendly service, quick and convenient, good selection, so overall good experience, but they ruined it when they added 15% tip I asked them to remove it and their attitude changed and no more friendly service... I left the tip that I wanted and...More
Great sushi to go If you are in a hurry or want to eat in your hotel room his is the place great service smily people and excellent sushi really delicious. They can also help you choose what is the best for you.
Can you say fresh and fast! Order spicy tuna and spicy salmon and it came out fast and fresh! The miso soup was good as well! Small and nice spot and service was friendly!
15% Tip added without your permission even when dining alone. Owner/Manager too happy and very loud. Food average.. Avoid - there are more choices in Richmond
I love this place! Everyone is so friendly and the servers yell the orders. The food came out immediately. We were pleasantly surprised with the complimentary miso soup. We had the spicy salmon roll, dynamite roll, kappa maki, and an assortment of nigiri.
They add/impose 15% gratitude (tips) to your bill without your permission. Gratitude/tips is optional and its % is determined by the customer, not imposed by the restaurant. We were only 2. My son and i. You might end up paying the bill (including the 15%...More
Small Authentic Japanes restaurant. Servers call back orders in Japanese. Very relaxed atmosphere. May have to wait because very popular and busy. Service and food are both Great!!
We thoroughly enjoyed our visit. Best meal we’ve had so far in Canada and the US. The restaurant is very basic, but clean. Soft drinks only. Service very fast and friendly, and sushi and sashimi was excellent.
This place serves very good sushi and at a low price, the service is good and the food is served within minutes from time of order. Will 100 % recoment this place.
The sushi is excellent, as fresh as it gets. The location itself is simple, nothing luxurious but impeccably clean. The atmosphere is very joyful, the very best service. At this price, incredible value.
The raw sashimi salmon was disgusting tasted like salmon got captured and cut off it made me threw up bad pricing",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d5078769-Reviews-Tokyo_Joe_s_Sushi_Factory-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Tom Sushi,"Delicious food, and super quick and friendly service. I will definitely come here again! Very modern interior. We got there at 5:10 PM on a Saturday and got the last table, very busy place.
Chose this restaurant as it was conveniently located near my hotel. Lots of great options on the menu and good cleanliness standards. Would have appreciated more customer service and larger portions given the higher prices.
We saw a long line up while walking Davie Street. On our way back from Sunset Beach, near their closure, we have 5 minutes to appreciate excellent sushi and sashimi.
My friend and I had a very nice meal here. It was not that busy so we did not feel rushed to leave. We ordered a lot of food for two people and enjoyed everything. The fish was very fresh. We just walked in.
We just love this place. Elegant, tasty and affordable sushi & japanese cuisine, this is absolutely a great address.
This was our 4th visit to Toms. They have renovated the restaurant since our last visit and it is beautiful. Very well done. All the food was wonderful. The service was very attentive. We will be back next year on our next trip. The sushi...More
The best sushi in Vancuver! Very fast service, also very kind stuff! Miso soup is one of the best I have ever tried. Location of restaurant is very good and its extraordinary clean.
On a four day trip to Vancouver we had to go to Tom Sushi twice. I picked Tom Sushi from Trip Advisor and a number of others sites. On our first visit my son who did the ordering and loves sushi declared “this has ruined...More
I had read an article where Tom Sushi Was rated the top sushi in VANCOUVER and whilst I have only eaten at a handful of sushi places in Vancouver, I have to say that Tom Sushi was amazing. We ordered the soft shell crab which...More
One of the worst sushi experiences I (and my party) have had. Food is over-priced, came in low quantity, and taste and quality are subpar.
Researching where to eat in Vancouver, I came across Tom's Sushi which is rated as the second best sushi restaurant in Canada. If there isn't somewhere better, I can't imagine how. We ate there for lunch and dinner on our overnight stay before boarding a...More
Took my dear friend for her birthday dinner , she love this place , the area is a Sushi Paradise from Jervis Street to How's street , there is so many Japanese restaurants around , I find Tom sushi is one of the best above...More
We came here on a Saturday night around 7:30 PM. They don't take reservations, and only do first come first serve. They were able to take us right away. The prices are very decent, the food is fresh, and the service was great. We will...More
We got take out due to covid and waited around 15 minutes as everything is made to order and so fresh. The tuna and salmon were melt-in-your-mouth gorgeous and the prawn, salmon and crab rolls absolutely superb. A fantastic sushi place!
The food is so good, and the prices are very decent. Due to covid take out only so we couldn’t dine in. Definitely recommend this place.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d18933975-Reviews-Tom_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tomahawk Barbeque,"interesting decoration but terrible food. I hate to write bad reviews but my partner did get sick eating there - took 3 days to recover: meat and mashed potatoes. His dish did not look very appetizing, but it also had an odd taste. I had...More
Our son had been here 10 years ago and loved it so we went as a family. There was plenty of free parking and we had a table outside. The service was excellent - friendly and efficient. The menu was filled with wonderful options -...More
absolutely loved our breakfast, it was big and nicely priced, the staff was friendly and attentive, the owner was kind enough to gift our baby girl a little duck…keep up tbt good work
One of My go-to breakfast places When in North Vancouver. Generous portions, trademark Yukon bacon, and a great cup of coffee. There's a reason there's a lineup on weekends, and always a safe bet. Fair price to the market, but the value is in the...More
Over the years I’ve been here to enjoy many meals . As usual the food was excellent I had Yukon breakfast large meal. For dessert I had apple pie
Dinner at the Tomahawk last night, hadn’t been since just before the pandemic hit. My burger was sooooo good, words fail me! Had my old favourite the Chief Simon Baker burger and it was hit, juicy, full of mushrooms, bacon…yummm, still thinking about it this...More
One of the best breakfasts I’ve ever had. Can’t believe I waited so long to try this place. They have this incredible local hot sauce on every table too. Not a steal but was worth it.
Excellent breakfast basics. We arrived around 10 on a lovely Saturday morning. Seated outside immediately outside. Food was delicious, big portions and reasonable prices.
This diner has been in operation for nearly 80 years and they have the memorabilia to prove it! One of my earliest memories is of throwing a quarter in the little waterpond, it was so big then. The menu is classic diner with Huge breakfasts...More
We go here on a regular basis. Great food , service, and awesome home made pies !! The roast beef with yorkshire pudding is spectacular. The steak dinner is excellent as well.
I live in South Vancouver but I try to get to the Tomahawk BBQ & Cafe in North Vancouver several times a year. Their Yukon Bacon is a must and their menu has a great selection of favourites. Big portions, great coffee and friendly service...More
This restaurant has been serving excellent comfort food daily for near on 100yrs. Due to COVID restrictions for family get togethers I was very pleased to discover the Tomahawk Barbeque was preparing Turkey Dinner with all the trimmings including pie for dessert! As advised, I...More
Don't know why this excellent little place has only got 4 stars. The decor is lovely very First Nations Canadian. We were greeted very nicely. Our server was charming and kept us well topped up with coffee and water (The water, it's a Canadian thing!)...More
I am always on the lookout for Diners, Drive-Ins and Dives while on my travels. I happened to know that Guy Fieri had visited the Tomahawk. The restaurant is a well known fixture, even my Uber driver knew of it and had even eaten there....More
I've been hearing about the Skookum Chief burger for 35 years so I finally made it to BC and sought it out. It was everything I'd been told and more! All of our meals were massive and delicious. Wonderful service in a clean and friendly...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d710211-Reviews-Tomahawk_Barbeque-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tommy's Cafe & Catering,"Finally we have a chance to try out this place. We have been talking about it since last weekend. This is a small local cafe but not jammed. We love it! We had the Crab Cake Benny and The Club. They were both excellent…great taste...More
Every time my wife and I are in North Vancouver, we make sure we go to Tommy’s for breakfast. It never disappoints us. Excellent breakfast, excellent service, good prices. We shall be back.
Good place to take a brunch ! Visit Tommy’s yesterday, personnel are nice, food are so good! And, his a atypical place ! I recommend to breakfast
My favourite place for breakfast in Lynn Valley. The Big Lebowski is my favourite. Very good quality coffee. Small intimate interior and good service.
2 Dubliners, a Tommy Hawk and West Cost Benny. Good start to the day. Loved the retro vibe and all you can drink self-serve coffee selections!
Great place to stop for a bite, couldn't find it at first but realized i just passed right in front of it ! The food was great as was the service ! Love the coffee station !
Stopped in early on a Sunday morning for a great breakfast! Fast, friendly service and the food was fresh and well presented. Little pricy but normal for the area. Great little place.,
Finally writing a review on this gem! Delicious food, great service and wonderful character with antique gold art and mirrors set against grey painted concrete. We had the Cypress (poached eggs, avocado, and tomato on whole wheat bagel with a delicious salad), and great Americano....More
Awful customer service. I got a ""Bohunky"" meal, which was OK. However, my pork sausage was definitely underdone. It didn't have a slight pink hue to it, which would have been fine. I've cooked pork sausages myself, and have worked in the food industry. It...More
Can't believe this was our first time here given that we've lived close by for seven years. Tommy's is somewhere you could easily miss when walking by because it's in a basement and only has tiny windows set high in the wall. On the inside,...More
GREAT service, GREAT food and GREAT prices. Super friendly servers. Delicious breakfast! Definitely a return to spot on my next trip to the North Vancouver area
This big secret in a little space at the corner of Ross Road and Mountain Hwy has been around for over 20 years. Always consistent, the people behind the grill have been there for over 15 years and they are not the owner's! That speaks...More
It is a small servicable venue - the food was, hot freshly cooked and tasty. Coffee is drip coffee. We had an eggs benny and a spicy scamble - both were nice. Its an unassuming place no real vibe but homestyle tasty food.
been having breakfast at Tommy's for years. Always good. this is a casual place but it's good food, good price. Sit outside on nice day. then go for a hike on the north shore.
We are always on the lookout for good brunch spots and a friend recommended Tommy's. I think we lucked out on our timing because it apparently gets quite lined up (as it is pretty small inside) but we managed to sneak in and get a...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d710221-Reviews-Tommy_s_Cafe_Catering-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tony's Fish & Oyster Cafe,"Excellent halibut but we asked for Caesar salad as a substitute for chips. Also excellent canned apple cider, not too dry and not too sweet. Great service, excellent food, small clean unpretentious place. We even wanted to return the following day but Granville Island was...More
We stopped in for the first time, and enjoyed our meal. We ordered the Seafood Platter for 2 - it was great! Loved all the different seafood. It was lots for 2 of us.
Fried oysters not like they used to be or should be Tony’s has been our go-to place for oysters for many years, but no longer. Something has changed. I like small oysters, but there was barely any oyster in the six that I had, just...More
Second visit to Tonys for lunch, this time just for a bowl of their great clam chowder. If you are a chowder fan, this is some of the best around.
We stopped here for a bit of lunch while on Grandville island. We had the lunch special which was clam chowder and fish and chips. The fish was crispy and delicious and the chowder was very tasty.
Great tiger prawns and calamari ! Perfectly done and very tasty. Can’t wait to try other specialities. We will come back.
I wanted to register that I was very disappointed with your conduct. Mistakes happen to all of us, but the way I was treated today, it looks like I was to blame. I went to give a feedback that on the last weekday on the...More
Great service with great food! Fish n Chips and clam chowder lunch special was amazing. Local beer offered. The entire family of 6 enjoyed!
We went for a quick lunch while visiting Granville island. We both had the lunch special: cod and French fries and clam chowder. The service was very fast and friendly and the food was great. A perfect spot for a quick lunch.
My grandson and his dad stopped in for some oysters and shoveled down 6 of them. They were reported to be tasty and good but required to be chewed as they were quite big.
Occasionally we have dined here. The last 3 visits were questionable. One takeout involved food that wasn’t warm. Second dine in occasion, ABM disallowed applying Custom tip three times. Server took back machine to ‘correct dysfunctional’ ABM and then clicked Custom tip which meaning I...More
Go next door to Fish Co when you can come here...prices are much easier on pocket and my fish and chips was lovely. His oysters were amazing. Not a fancy place but well worth a visit
Ordered halibut meal which came with fries and coleslaw. The fish was great and lightly battered, however the fries and coleslaw were equally bland. It was disappointing as I was really expecting more with the lineup and reviews. We ordered take out so we could...More
We went for my husband’s bday. We found a long strand of hair in his food and when I went to talk to the server she was denying it and showed very poor customer service. I will definitely not go back. I advise them to...More
Wow, don’t need to say more. The fish burger was absolutely delicious. The batter was so light and cooked perfectly.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2037555-Reviews-Tony_s_Fish_Oyster_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Top of Vancouver Revolving Restaurant,"We had a great meal at the restaurant. Very frineldy service and staff and, of course, great views of the city, harbour and mountains. The blueberry cheesecake being a particular favourite. Would definitley recommend.
Horrible food and service. The waitress was only a figure to attract people but didnt know nothing and missed even giving spoons with cup of cofee that i not experienced in my 67 years in travel and restaurent. Very dissapointing and bread is the first...More
What a view! We booked for dinner on a Friday evening and we were not disappointed. The food was delicious, the service was attentive and the view is incredible. We were pleasantly surprised when the bill arrived, considering where we were sitting, right in the...More
This was a really lovely place to spend a family birthday celebration , the food was really , really good and the views from the tower were spectacular . A little bit pricey but expected and worth it - everyone needs to go here once...More
Usually restaurants with a very good view have not so good food. This one is the exception to the rule. It is difficult to determine which is best, the view or the food. We choose a spaghetti with salmon, minding the prices. This restaurant has...More
Do not go to eat at this place. The food is horrible and very overpriced. If you would Like to see the views go to the observation deck do not waste your time and money in this restaurant there are so many other places to...More
Very average meal. I ordered fish and chips, looked and tasted like frozen fish. We should have just visited the viewing platform instead.
I have been to restaurants in many parts of the world and in Canada but never go in search good service and food. The waitress finished finished the evening by serving us coffee without spoons and never has this happened in my 25 years working...More
Great views of the city and a very nice meal for our first here. There are specials most night with some bottles of wines reduced by 50% on the night we were there. Good service and a good variety to choose from.
This is a “must do” at least once. The views are breathtaking. 360 degrees of Vancouver. Menu is limited but it was delicious. Worth the price.
We went for happy hour and the menu did not have lots of options but that was expected. It would be great to go just for drinks, the food was nothing special and so expensive even with the happy hour prices. Overal, it was a...More
Views were fantastic as expected. Had to wait to be seated by the window, which everyone seemed to have to do. The staff were mostly very friendly and welcoming. The disappointing thing was the price of the food (outrageous) and the fact that it was...More
We visited as a couple on a Saturday evening evening. We booked months in advance appreciating a Saturday may be busy and specifically scheduled this so our dinner would tie in with sunset. We requested a window seat and although they state it cannot be...More
Been to a few of these in various cities, always loved the view. The food selection was good so was the wine. Service was excellent. Pricing is what you would expect for this type of restaurant, your paying for the view, and what a view...More
A wonderful way to spend a special evening. We had a meal early at 5pm when it was very quiet. The elevator trip was great. The table we had was by the window which was great. The waiter was superb with a great sense of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d783999-Reviews-Top_of_Vancouver_Revolving_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Torafuku,"Last minute decision but a pleasant surprise. First time visit so did not know what to expect. Four for a late lunch and we each had a Kickass rice bowl. A great mix of flavours, we enjoyed them very much. Looking forward to more visits...More
Our family was visiting Vancouver and we picked Torafuku by chance for dinner one night. What a great find! The place is quite small but welcoming. The staff there are delightful and seem to really enjoy what they do. The food - well, the food...More
Torafuku, the Pan-Asian restaurant, on Vancouver’s Main Street, in the culinary joint neighborhood of Main Street & Chinatown, is offering a very exciting Valentine’s Day menu, available from February 11. It includes four appetizers to share, an entree with a “starch” to share and dessert....More
We had an amazing dining experience here. The food was so good and the service was great. We did the set menu and it was absolutely amazing. Definitely would recommend checking this place out.
Torafuku started out as a food truck if I remember correctly. I like their play on Japanese flavours. I always get their karaage lunch rice bowl. It's affordable take out and fills you up. Another good option is the half pork belly and half chicken...More
First time not cooking at home for five weeks so I did it right with take-out from Torafuku and, damn, was that the right move! Fried chicken, pork fried rice and beef noodle bowl. Not one single missed mark with each one delivering on levels...More
This lil gem of Asian Fusion food was a long awaited experience! Three of us shared plates of salad w/calamari, noodles w/mushrooms, and my FAV......scallops on risotto👌
We arrived to 5:45pm and though the place was not busy we agreed to leave by 6:45pm. The restaurant ambiance is quiet open and contemporary. The waiter and waitress were very attentive and fantastic with following up with the food taste and quality. We ordered:...More
We went out with friends for dinner at Torafuku and it was well worth the short walk to Main Street. The room was light and bright and there was a choice of booths or a long table. We went around 6pm and we were glad...More
Dropped in for a quick lunch and was surprised of the great fresh hot food. Dumplings , fried chicken and rice and the pork bun me we’re all great. Recommend
We arrived hungry and ordered the 10-course Omakase and were very happy. We had plenty of time and took our time with each plate, totaling 3 hours! I would have appreciated a written explanation of what we were eating, the details were lost in the...More
Great and very interesting menu, full of choices. Serviced at the cash, then you sit and wait. Prices are very reasonable. While the interior is plain, the food is anything but...WOW. Awesome dishes, full of flavour. Super surprised, considering the neighborhood, it was terrific !!
Went early mid week. Sat at one of 4 tables for two across from the open kitchen. Most of the seating is festival, no seat backs or useable coat storage (closet in the back available). Started with a glass of wine. $2 off for happy...More
Overall I would say our group had a nice dining experience, but if you are a vegetarian, don’t bother coming here. Six of us came for dine out and the vegetarian options looked incredible, but were terribly disappointing. No exaggeration, one dish was half a...More
We have had fabulous dinners at Torafuku, so decided to try a dine-out lunch. It was so disappointing. The starters were bland and uninspired. Main course rice bowls were awful ... undercooked pork belly (like raw bacon), and undercooked chicken (pink inside). The rice was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d8615166-Reviews-Torafuku-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Toshi Sushi,"The last two takeout experiences with the ""Chirashi Donburi"" from Toshi were disappointing. The sashami was fresh but awfully small and thin, while the rice portion has doubled.
My good friend who lives in Vancouver said we had to try this restaurant. Although it was not open for dining, we ordered to go and went to a local park to eat it. The prices were great- we had a variety of sushi- it...More
We waited over an hour for a table for 2, but the wait was worth it! The sushi was fresh, our server Alton was awesome and the food was amazing. We had the experience and so would probably order to go in the future, but...More
Jesus this place has not maintained First time back in years Not worth the wait Mediocre Go to anywhere else and No wait akasaka rules
- been here many times /always a wait - Small friendly Japanese with about 10 small tables and counter - feels homey - This time we had ordered Nigiri combo - chef selection of 10 pcs - Unakyu sushi - the eel sushi - the...More
Met up with a friend who lives in Vancouver and she suggested this spot and it did not disappoint. Highly recommend for amazing sushi, even if you have to wait a bit to get a seat. Also reasonably priced.
Bluefin tuna was bomb, grilled eggplant was a great surprise. Came here with a group of friends and left very satisfied and full :)
After eating here for a long time I was surprised at the new version of this restaurant. Do they have new owners? It is not the same caliber of food as last year. Still a good sushi bar, but like many other sushi restaurants. They...More
As before I found the food very good though a bit pricey. It is a crowded place and hard to relax while eating. There is pressure to order right away, to eat, to finish, pay and make room for the next customers. I needed a...More
Small restaurant - always busy!! Often do take-out from this restaurant - the sushi never disappoints.
Line starts a bit before open, but the food was probably the best sushi I’ve personally had. Spicy agedashi might be better than Sushi Village in Whistler. 👏Service was friendly and fast. A well oiled machine.
We had to wait for 30 minutes until we got seated but it was definitely worth it! The sashimi was really fresh and it was not too expensive at all! One of the best sushi I’ve had so far.
We've been going here for years and honestly there are only a few restaurants we'd be willing to lineup in Vancouver, and this is one of them. Opens at 5pm so if you get in at 430p you'll be guaranteed in the first seating...after that...More
Because they only have a few tables, there will always be a line outside. Don't let it deter you! The line moves pretty quickly. Lots of great sushi options, very affordable.
I’ve passed by this place for years and always noticed a lineup. Curiosity got the best of me so I finally took my family there for dinner. It was OK but not worth lining up for based on what we had. We arrived around 6:15pm...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d780760-Reviews-Toshi_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tour de Feast Cafe,"Fabulous food!! The braised beef was so tender and tasty. The gravy should be bottled and sold.. it is phenomenal! Lovely staff. Definitely will be back.
The restaurant ambiance is something you would have to look past in order to fully appreciate the experience. The cafeteria facade is deceptive, as the food is easily one of the most exquisite vancouver has to offer. (The plates and cutlery were mismatched and weird,...More
My companion had the cod and we shared mussels as starter and my friend said his cod was very good. I ordered the lamb shank and was very disappointed with my dish. The lamb was extremely over cooked and tough and I did remark this...More
Hi Miss Fox You dined with us on July 7 party of 2. While you were having your dinner we had asked how everything was you didn't express your disappointment at that very moment. After finishing your dinner you sat there for quite some time...More
A quaint and spartan little restaurant in a hard to find location. Google sent us about 100 meters past the restaurant which we did notice while driving by. Parking is a bit problematic but there is some in the back, but no signage. On to...More
We were going here for a nice dinner and took an Uber from our hotel , unfortunately even though it said open it was not! A lot of trouble for nothing!!!
Hi Marsha Thanks for your 1-star review without dining at our establishment. You should check our hours on our website, not on TripAdvisor. Finally, we only take reservations for dinner.
I hadn’t been here for a couple of years. We came here for lunch and found the food to be the same - simply tasty and fresh! We both ordered the avocado and focaccia. The bread was crispy topped with 2 sunny side eggs. You...More
Tiny place off the beaten path that lacks any bells and whistles for decor. Simply tables and cutlery. But the food, which is why we went there, was superb! Couldn't be happier with the service and taste and quality. Friendly service and delicious food. Gotta...More
I mistakenly found this little gem of a restaurant while in North Vancouver. While the decor was very basic, the food was wonderful! The restaurant is run by a lovely and very friendly family and you immediately feel like your being welcomed into their home....More
The food is good, but the customer service is just not up to the standards. They don't even have a basic reservation system and on top of that badly treat their customers. Not worth the ride!
In this modest roadside setting I had one of the finest restaurants meals in a long time. The limited menu only forced us all to focus and no one was disappointed. I have the full order salmon flat bread and the sauce was delectable. Service...More
It is nice when an establishment is consistent in delivering quality. These guys are amazing and their food is amazing. The service is friendly and welcoming. Please keep it up.
Four of us ordered one appetizer to share, each one drink and ordered four different meals so that we could share. Everything was very good but when we went to order our second drink, they pretty much talked us out of it. They said we...More
Never disappointed with this French inspired menu. Tried the brunch today and all 8 of our party thoroughly enjoyed their brunch. From the Full French breakfast to the vegan eggplant brioche this place hit the spot. Not sure what the coffee brand is but certainly...More
Surprising little cafe. Went with the in-laws for brunch on a Sunday. The cafe is in an industrial area and unless you are looking for it, you would miss it. There have a sparse interior with a few picture and very modest furniture. It’s one...More
Great chef with excellent background. Worked for the famous Daniel Boulud. Family run but service is good . Limited seating",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d3611721-Reviews-Tour_de_Feast_Cafe-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Trattoria Burnaby,"We love going to Trattoria especially on Tuesday, but we were disappointed when they removed our favourite pasta ShortRib Papardelle on their menu. We would appreciate it if they will put it back on their menu.
FOOD & SERVICE WERE NOT AN ISSUE - WE ENJOYED BOTH! We were seated at the bar - facing the front door and near the pizza oven. There was a lady (also server??) who was wearing dark rubber gloves while crouched cleaning UNDER THE COUNTER...More
They have 1 item on the menu for kids. A cheese pizza. For an Italian restaurant, it would be so easy for them to introduce a reasonable kids menu. There wasn’t anything they could do to help us get a smaller portion for the kids....More
The space is nice. Service ok. The food is nothing spectacular compared to other cities like Toronto. The portions are small.
The food was good, right portion, good price and the service was good. We went a little before 5pm, didnt have to wait and no reservations. By the time we left, the place was packed. Would go there again.
Went in early on a Friday evening when neither kitchen or wait staff appeared to be overly busy. We ordered drinks and the Signature Pasta Platter to share. Service was prompt and congenial, drinks served quickly. Of the four pastas served on the platter though,...More
Food was delicious as always, Short Rib Pappardelle is the best!!! Our server Steve was amazing!! Highly recommend this restaurant.
Was looking forward to coming here for a celebratory lunch after a long time away. Just our luck there was a large noisy birthday party in progress. Food was ok, not as good as I remembered, though. Suspect it might be due to the staffing...More
Four of us for dinner, appetizer took an hour to get to our table - there were only two tables in the upper section where they sat us. We knew we were going to be in trouble when they started setting up the table next...More
Reservations made online, easy and simple. Parking underground (for pay) very convenient. Arrived towards the end of happy hour so enjoyed some appies, calamari and bruschetta both delicious along with some of the house wine and cocktails. We both had pasta dishes, spaghetti and meatballs...More
My uncle came here for his birthday and the food was very expensive but we were celebrating his birthday! Calamari was expensive and yummy compared to local cuisine. It was hard to hear him talk because of the echoing music.
Service was excellent and they were able to create a special meal due to my extreme dietary restrictions. The food was pretty good and there was lots of it, but it was not excellent. My only serious complaint was that it was so noisy it...More
worst time I've ever been a restaurant, I'm so disappointed by our server's actions and attitude. We are definitely not coming back:(
We were seated in the room to the left and were pleasantly impressed with the nice quiet atmosphere. Service was excellent. The meals were perfect. We like this place.
I've been here several times and it never disappoints. The food was delicious and service prompt and attentive. Will definitely return.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d7736374-Reviews-Trattoria_Burnaby-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Trattoria Park Royal,"A wonderful dinner experience. Excellent food and friendly staff - highly recommended. We had prosciutto, carpaccio, ahi tuna, halibut and an awesome tiramisu like we had in Italy.
We went for lunch and I had the chef's special seafood risotto and my husband had the Caprese salad with prawns on the side+ a glass of wine. The food was excellent and so was the service, especially the manager Phil - who went out...More
Trattoria is more than just a restaurant, when you go there to eat not only are you receiving fantastic food created with heart, you are sharing an experience with everybody around you, not just yourself but your server and other guests because when you're at...More
Excellent food and service .. my sister and I went for lunch today..our server, Brittany Dawn was exceptional . She truly made our experience extra special with her warm, friendly greeting and throughout our time there. . We shared a caprese salad and prosciutto/arugula pizza...More
I recently hosted a 50th birthday party for a friend here at Trattoria. It was a HUGE hit! We were up in the upper level, covered patio complete with heat lamps. Everyone complimented me on my choice of restaurant. The staff was warm, helpful, accommodating...More
Went back there for my birthday dinner with my husband. We were put on the second floor which was intimate. It serves as an outdoor patio during the summer. My husband had the meat ball pasta dish. He said that it was the best meat...More
""Dining at this Italian restaurant was a delightful experience, made even better by the exceptional service provided by our server assistant, Dylan. From the moment we walked in, Dylan made us feel welcomed and went above and beyond to ensure our meal was perfect. The...More
Stumble on to this lovely cozy Italian restaurant by Park Royal south , very bright mordant , hostess very friendly , dinning room almost half full , little noisy , it is under the Glowbal restaurant group , the name you can trust ,
We enjoyed the restaurant with nice decoration, easy parking in the Park Royal Mall at West Vancouver, polite staff and delicious dishes! see the photos. We went for lunch during weekday and it is recommended!
Had a wonderful meal. Share and anti pasti platter and margarita pizza to start. All spectacular. Then the pasta platter... wow amazing. Our server Cory was great, pleasant and accommodating but never intrusive. The owner and managers both stopped by to check on us. We...More
This was such an outstanding recommendation from our B&B host, Crystal. The food and service were both outstanding. The pricing I thought was very affordable and fair. It was so good we came back the next night. And it was just as good. Easy to...More
Excellent food and friendly service. Kids enjoyed their pizzas while we shared a Caesar salad and paella. For dessert Tiramisu and Lemoncello. Wonderful! Thanks Elizabeth.
We ordered the beef carpaccio as a starter and was informed later that the ingredients changed. It was awful and our server lack such a professional edicate. She was too busy talking to her peers about vulgur subjects. We had to wait 10 minutes before...More
Trattoria at Park Royal is fantastic! I have never had anything but tremendous food and first rate service. The food is fresh, beautifully presented, and served by attentive and very pleasant staff. ""Michel"" oversees the entire restaurant with an experienced and professional eye and ensures...More
My friends and I came here to celebrate a retirement. I've passed by this place many times but was waiting for an occasion so this was it. We were all craving Italian food and were just in time for Happy Hour which was a bonus....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d10351245-Reviews-Trattoria_Park_Royal-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Troll's Restaurant,"Was catching a ferry and decided to eat here first. I had some very Tasty fish and chips at a very reasonable prices. We also had a breakfast. Service was excellent , they are extremely busy at times but have enough staff to make it...More
We hadn't been here for a couple of years and remembered the fish and chips were okay. Today tried Joe's soup and the clam chowder both were awful, tasting like colored emulsifier (one a weird pink the other a lumpy white) with shrimp and fish...More
The food was incredible!! The curried chicken was so tasty and authentic and the chicken caesar salad was huge and so tender. Our waitress Meryl went above and beyond to make our ferry waiting and dining experience delightful!! Wonderful experience and the place was hopping!!
Our family had not gathered at Trolls for over a decade. We were celebrating my son’s daughter’s sixteenth birthday. We were seated promptly (had a reservation), and our orders taken. Some appetizers made their appearance within minutes, and were simply scrumptious! Crab cakes, soft cod...More
My gf and I came here for lunch n came here years ago and the food has not changed , was very good , will come again
We have been Enjoying Troll's for 50 Years at Horseshoe Bay. It was Always a Treat Best Location, Tasty Food, Good Atmosphere. Often Stopped In to just Grab Food to Go as Well. We Always made it a Regular Stop while in Vancouver. My Last...More
We have only ordered take out from Trolls a couple of times. Once about a year ago, it was decent, but they forgot to give us one of two bags so we had to make two trips at pick up time resulting in a cold,...More
We went to Troll's for lunch. Never again the food was disgusting and the service was atrocious. We were over charged for a terrible experience. I get better hamburgers at McDonald's
Visited with high expectations, left highly disappointed. Haddock was over cooked, bland and mushy. Batter crispy but tasteless. Chips were chips. I had to ask for vinegar, which came in sachets. Daughters chicken fingers where like hard rubber, she did well eating two of them....More
I went there for lunch and was told i had to wait until the system allowed lunch orders- fine. The order I got was NOT the one I asked for and I told the staff who brought me a corrected plate. Trouble is it WASN""T....More
Troll's is a Horseshoe Bay institution, a family-run fish & chips and burger diner across the street from the waterfront next to the ferry terminal. It's always busy. It's the kind of place where local high school kids are working their first jobs. Families with...More
Sad to see Trolls decline, Used to enjoy the drive to Horseshoe Bay and a hearty serving of fish and chips. But my most recent trip was a huge disappointment. Service was slow, the almost inarticulate server did not know the menu options or the...More
Great friendly spot for lunch serving traditional but tasty food. My wife had the veggie burger and I had their delicious, but rich, fish pie. I love these family run unpretentious places that really care about their customers. The staff were delightful and the food...More
Perfect for writing for a Nanaimo or Langdale Ferry at Horseshoe Bay. Buy your ticket, park your car in line, walk over to Trolls and wait for the ferry. The selection of light foods is great.
If you are looking for a simple restaurant that does good wholesome food this is the place. We had great fish and chips and the burgers looked amazing Would recommend this place highly",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d981402-Reviews-Troll_s_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Troller Ale House,"Had a pretty good lunch here. But they need to stop with the shredded iceberg lettuce (soggy, no taste or nutrition), and come up with a dressing that makes sense for the tuna salad (which was otherwise tasty).
After 30 years, two Scottish high school friends met up here. Great beers, great food and fantastic views and service. We were made to feel very welcome and spent a few hours happily catching up on their deck looking out into the sound.
Mediocre food and service. The soup of the day was okay, but the chicken wings were not even remotely crispy. The bahn Mi tacos were tasty but overpriced for a small portion. Our server misunderstood our order and the food runner brought us food we...More
West Vancouver’s Troller Ale House, located steps away from the Horseshoe Bay ferry terminal, is a good place to get a bite to eat, also offering a good selection of beers and two good desserts. I came into the terminal after 8 weeks on Vancouver...More
Great spot for the soup and sandwich special. Fantastic bread, good amount of toppings and tasty soup that tasted homemade. Really appreciate the reasonable price as well. They have some great craft beers on tap too.
Right next to the Horseshoe Bay ferry, stopped in while waiting to board, great menu, food was fresh and tasty! We will definitely return!
Stopped by to wait form the ferry to Langdale. Wasn't expecting much. Was blown away by the taste and preparation. And the service!
We felt like a drink and some snacks so we decided on this place. We had onion rings and Brussel sprouts. The dip for the onion rings was good but the Brussel sprouts were very good(we are going to steal this recipe). The drinks were...More
It’s Pub food. Nothing special. On the other hand I have nothing bad to say. The view is outstanding, service was good. It’s a busy place so it must appeal to the average person. I was just looking for higher quality food.
It's January, its pouring out and my girlfriend takes me to Horseshoe Bay. She brings me to this bar. It was was warm, inviting, in the afternoon many Boomer age people inside, playing classic rock for music. Service was reasonsbly swift with drinks, I ordered...More
Such a great cozy pub!! It was our first time, but not the last. We seated at the bar, and Barman was very courteous and attentive . We had a delicious bottle of California Chardonnay and two mushrooms delicious soups and chicken wings . It...More
We stopped in on our way up to Whistler and were very pleasantly surprised! The food was great (Burger, French Dip type sandwich and a salad) and the service even better. Horseshoe Bay is a cool little village and the Trolls have good food! Thanks!
The pub looks a little tired.Service was good.The menu was filthy.The food was marginal,, theburger was overdone, dry and the sauce was the size of a quarter.The fries were ok and large portion.The seafood chowder was bland.The craft beer was very good as well as...More
A nice lunch. My husband enjoyed his Reuben Sandwich. I had the fish tacos. I had to turn 4 tacos into 2 tacos because there was hardly any fish at all in them. They were, however tasty. The clam chowder was very good as well....More
We had a ball watching the ferries leave the port and also the mountain views.The service was great and the food tasty and hot.The prices were fair.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d3387083-Reviews-Troller_Ale_House-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tropika,"Drove passed-by this place pretty often, finally one day decided to stop -by and try. Well, not too bad.. Wide variety in Menu list. But taste was less original (compared to other Malaysian restaurant). The Satay were a little bit oily and the Nasi Goreng...More
The restaurant been around for long time , during the good old days , lot of location , but now they all permanently closed , only Cambie location remain open my last visit less few years back , it is a while since my brother...More
Tropika has been around for a long time if i remember correctly. They used to have many locations, but I think they closed some of them over the years. Tropika has been one of my favourites, their dishes are flavourful and good place for families....More
Have been coming to this restaurant once a week for years. They have said that they are only taking cash for takeout. During the pandemic most people are not carrying cash. They have lost a costumer due to their lack of flexibility. Did not seem...More
It has literally been years since the last time we dined at Tropika. Many years ago, this was one of the first Malaysian restaurants that we tried and we fell in love with the spices associated with SE Asian cooking such as Malaysian and Thai...More
We used to go often to this place, and we thought that we would go there once more to somewhat celebrate memories for somone visiting Vancouver. I have to admit that this was the worst service experience that we had in years.... on Tuesday Feb...More
Food was good overall. Enjoyed the satay and Singapore-style rice vermicelli. Service was lackluster. Waiters wandered slowly around the restaurant. Had some trouble catching their attention.
The food is authentic and tasty, with perfect portion. I love the Hainan Chicken and Curry Beef the best!
Second visit proved to be just as great as the first. Very friendly and courteous service. Many more items in the menu to try. I wish I lived close to this restaurant or they had a branch in the Tri-Cities.
Friendly staff.... mediocre food (I spent almost 10 years of my life in Malaysia) Great roti canai Ok sotong belacan Disappointing beef rendang
Very tasty food. Beef and chicken come with fat and bone. It’s a busy restaurant visited by local Asian clientele. So it’s very tasty. Will defiantly revisit and order sea food and chicken.
We’ve just walked back from there to the B&B where we’re staying around the corner. What a find! Don’t know if it means anything that on a busy Friday night we were the only Caucasians there, but the food was authentic. I had a wonderful...More
This restaurant was very busy but staff were very attentive and friendly. Our food was okay but nothing to rave about. Would probably go there again and try a different dish.
Came here for lunch with some friends. Had been here a few times before and it's still just as good or as okay as before. Don't expect the taste to be the same as it would be in Singapore or Malaysia. If you really crave...More
A group of us went and it was my first time there. There are varieties of food to choose from. Good taste in general but I think the price is too high comparing to other restaurants.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710344-Reviews-Tropika-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tsuki Sushi Bar,"We were in the neighbouhood and took a chance on this small joint within walking distance of Chinatown. They don't have a large seating capacity but the menu is quite extensive and offers a range of sushi and sashimi. Easily one of the best sushi...More
I totally recommend this restaurant. I normally get full when eating sushi’s but here everything is so tasteful and light with all kinds of fine tastes and flavors. They also serve the best Miso soup. The taste is just perfect.
We randomly walked in, the place does not look very inviting but we were in the neighbourhood craving sushi. The fish was very fresh, great selection of crab as well! One of the best sushi we’ve ever had. Definitely go for the BC roll with...More
Very good delivery food. Colorful and tasty. Salmon tartar was excellent. Nice order good taste. Order was fresh and good
We had a late lunch. Prompt seating, immediate tea service and menu delivery. I was on my second tea before I finished reading the menu. Best seaweed salad I’ve had, great Oshi. Very fresh sushimi. Definitely worth the trip.
Visited in the early afternoon on a weekend. The place was maybe half full, with plenty of empty tables. The server guided me to the sushi bar, but I asked her if I could sit at one of the small tables instead. After an awkward...More
Sashimi was fresh, rolls were tasty and we really liked the complimentary tea. Service was fast and efficient. Great food at a reasonable price.
Our office ""sushi club"" ate here, so I got to see quite a few of the different offerings. They all looked good, and everyone seemed very pleased (some people were already regulars). I had the ""vegetarian roll combo"", while was three different kinds of maki...More
Okay, I saw that the overall reviews were in the 4 range... that almost kept me from visiting. IMHO, they are totally wrong! This place is a 5-star for me all the way! I was there with a good friend and both of us kept...More
We headed to Tusuki Sushi prior to a hockey game. Conveniently located and pleasantly surprised with great service and wonderful sushi! Staff were pleasant and we had our meals served up quickly. Delicious Salmon Oshi, a house special a real treat! I would return.
Great spot for sushi. We were out for a birthday and this was the perfect place. Good vibe , service was a little slow but thats due to the preparation of the food. Overall service was good and reasonably priced. Altogether a fun evening with...More
Initially we were planning on going to another place, which turned out to be not open yet, so we decided to try Tsuki, since it was almost across the street. Staff was nice and attentive, food was served pretty quickly. Food itself was very tasty,...More
So the wait staff were certainly nice enough, but they delivered food to tables in a truly bizarre order. Our order took forever, but the table opposite us had people bringing food constantly. I don't know if they get really focused on bigger groups (like...More
We ordered over $60 worth of sushi rolls and Nigiri to have only 3 measly soy sauce packets delivered with our order. Unacceptable!!! What’s sushi without Soy sauce? Ruined sushi. I spoke to the manager who got my name down and said next time I...More
I called ahead of time to place my order for take out. Their website was easy to navigate on my phone and I found their take out menu. My order was ready when I arrived and was able to pay promptly. The guy that answered...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4760188-Reviews-Tsuki_Sushi_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Tutto Restaurant & Bar,"The entire dining experience, from appetizer to desert was outstanding.My compliments to the Chef, our Server ,and management . It takes a great deal of attention to detail to maintain excellent quality in food and service. Tutto exceeds all expectations . I give it my...More
Very impressive menu with a mix of classic style with local and fresh ingredients. Wine list is extensive with excellent choices from many regions
Loud, crowded and slightly above average. Service excellent, food above average and far too noisy. Great wine selections!
Not suitable for group events. We booked our staff Christmas party back in September for the upcoming December. Spent weeks going back-and-forth on the menu. In November they Just sent an email saying our reservation is canceled. We called and got no reasonable response. This...More
Wine plays a central role in our enjoyment of dining out. To find a great wine list - with great prices and great food - is a dining trifecta. We had the meatball appetizer along with the Mozzarella di Bufala salad. Fab. For mains we...More
This is our new found favourite Italian restaurant Lovely old building with handicap access as well. Tastefully decorated and has a nice ambience. Food was excellent and so was the server who is also a sommelier and really knows his stuff. Their lunch specials are...More
We were three. Seated promptly. Artic char and halibut were both overcooked. . the asparagus was tough, the gnudi delicious, the broccolini a bit too charred. The prosciutto pizza was a good choice. Open table reservation asks if there is a special occasion. . there...More
Been several times about a year ago and enjoyed it immensely, both dinner and lunch. So let's say this was an off night. To start, what prompts a maitre 'd to seat people at the worst table even when there are others available. My guess,...More
From the decor to the staff to the food, this restaurante is 100% authentic Italian. Amazing staff, food and ambiance.
Our server was super attentive and made us feel like we were regular guests at his home ( our first time here) . The food was delicious ! we highly recommend this restaurant and will be back as soon as we visit Vancouver again.
It's my third time to be at this restaurant all my experience was EXCELLENT. Food is always delicious and decadent. Service wow phenomenal specially Mr. V thank you for taking care for us and Brooklyn too such a sweetheart. Happy costumer.
We tried to eat on a Friday night in Vancouver without a reservation. Tutto was so accommodating. From the host, to the waiter there was nothing but the utmost attention to making our impromptu visit perfect. The bottle of wine we ordered wasn’t just put...More
Found this fantastic restaurant in downtown Vancouver. it was so good we ate there twice. Had a fantastic server Veronique. Great food great service.
A place to bring your friends to enjoy some good Italian food and drinks. Modern atmosphere. Nice good sized bar area. Business casual. We enjoyed the meatball spaghetti, seafood squid ink spaghettini, arctic char and burrata and prosuitto to start.
It was overall a disappointing evening. When you enter you have to ascend 7 steps to reach the dining room. I didn’t notice if there was a ramp but if you have someone with mobility issues you might want to check this with the restaurant...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d21269891-Reviews-Tutto_Restaurant_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Twb - The Wine Bar,"Stopped in around 3 after a bike ride and enjoyed Happy Hour. Good calamari and meatballs. The wine selection was nice. Great views outside
We only had vino at The Wine Bar and while we did not eat, the menu looked quite impressive and I would definitely like to give it a go. Lovely al fresco seating, super kind service, tasty wine selections. And, at a very affordable price....More
This little sister restaurant to Province Marinaside next door is a gem. Romantic, delicious tapas oriented menu, great wine selection, and the view of False Creek is lovely. We enjoyed the salade Niçoise, the spaghettini vongole, and shared a lovely bottle of hard cider from...More
Went for the first time in 6 months yesterday and both the wine and service were as good as always. ""Tappy hour"" is from 3PM - 5PM and a glass of wine ranges from $6, $8 and $10.00 from their 1 page Tappy Hour list....More
We popped in here on a Tuesday evening after reading good reviews and stayed for a few hours. Excellent ‘tappy hour’ menu with offers on glasses of wine or beer, and huge selection of wines on offer which was main selling point - I think...More
For a wine lover, this place is the real deal. Great selection of local wine by the glass. Extremely knowledgeable somm, and the food will kick your tongue out. I could not have wished for a better wine bar. If you like wine this place...More
Such a great value at the restaurant! I never made it past the happy hour menu, because there was so much to explore and try in terms of food and wine. You can easily make a whole dinner out of the happy hour bites (and...More
Went for happy hour. Service was quite slow even at 3:45 when they weren't very busy. Food was mediocre. Wine for happy hour did not match what was on line. Then another wine I wanted was out of stock. Just an overall meh experience with...More
Looking for a place to meet your friends in Yaletown? The Wine Bar is the ideal spot. Get a table on their outdoor patio. A great spot for people watching, the wines are reasonably priced as are their appies. If you are going for Happy...More
We stopped in here for happy hour and had a great time. The wine is very reasonably priced, and they have quite a good selection (15-20) available during happy hour. The snacks we got were also quite tasty. If you go at another time other...More
My favorite bar for a drink and snack. superb food and drink with good prices. The setting is very nice as well.
Yummy bites, great wine list, nice little patio overlooking the marina. One of my favourite summer evening spots in Vancouver, and also a cozy place to spend a rainy winter night.
We're so happy to hear that you enjoyed a nice summer evening at TWB! Our patio remains open all winter long, too. We hope to see you again soon!
We had a lovely early dinner smoking twb's Tapas menu and happy hour Chardonnay. As far as happy hours go - our experience was definitely excellent. The outside patio is a quaint setting overlooking the marina along the broad walkways. The wine was a hit...More
Thanks for visiting us for Tappy Hour! Remember: Tappy Tuesday means Tappy Hour lasts all night long! Would love to see you again soon.
We sat on the terras and felt quickly at home. The food was good. The atmosphere was a bit more uptight but ok. Good for a chique diner I guess
Awesome location and service. Decided to go for the mussels and the goat cheese salad. Paired with an Italian white wine. All very well served and good portions you can share. Excellent service!",17,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6838590-Reviews-Twb_The_Wine_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Twisted Fork,"Had brunch at this restaurant. One of the best brunches anywhere. French pressed coffee to start. Had the scrambled egg plate. Huge portion of eggs served with stewed tomatoes, spinach, potato, and great sourdough toast with fresh jam. We couldn’t finish but had a great...More
A great find in GasTown. Good choice of menu with ample sized portions. The food was very tasty, I had a wonderful fruit salad with fresh yoghurt, scones and toppings, delicious. Husband had a more traditional cooked breakfast including bacon and eggs
The benny ""toast"" was very dry, and only a spoonful of hollandaise sauce. It was barely edible but paying $24 I ate it. There was no fresh fruit on either plate at brunch, maybe they ran out. The single french press of coffee was $10,...More
Great food, decor, and staff. Not for those on a limited budget but brunch was quality food and good sized portions. Outdoor seating on a gorgeous spring day makes the visit perfect. Definitely recommend.
We couldn’t decide where to go for brunch and happened across Twisted Fork by accident. Quite busy but we were made very welcome and a table made ready straightaway. Quite a short menu but all the food coming out looked amazing, and what we had...More
Not the greatest of beautiful Vancouver neighbourhood. It had a bit of stink. Was looking forward for a great brunch as we were meeting up with friends. Should have opted for something closer to our hotel, My salmon benny egg was almost half boiled and...More
The food at The Twisted Fork is absolutely delicious and abundant and the menu and decor very creative. The location, too, is great as it sits just on the edge of the safe part of Gas Town.
My husband and I dined at the Twisted Fork late last night. The food was incomparable, the atmosphere couldn’t have been more cool and intimate. We had the most wonderful server who talked with us for at least 20 minutes. This was one of the...More
Great food and great service. I had a salmon Benny. It was brilliant. My wife had a different dish, which looked delicious.
Our first brunch in Vancouver and ot was absolutely delicious and the staff were super friendly. We ordered a raseberry ginger fizz which was good a drink consisting of raseberry coulis lemon juice and ginger beer. It was a yummy mocktail which I had tasted...More
We had baked eggs and scrambled eggs for brunch - fabulous food, so full of flavour! Couple of drinks rounded it off nicely
Oh yes you have to come here. Marvellous menu and wonderful service. Brilliant atmosphere. And ask for a raspberry sangria. We came three nights for that drink during happy hour 3-6pm.
We were in Vancouver before getting on a cruise. We had a delicious dinner of Roast Lamb. The cole slaw was amazing. Service was wonderful and the restaurant is decorated beautifully. It was like eating at a friend’s house.
The Twisted Fork is a great choice for breakfast / brunch. The brunch items are interesting and tasty. I had the baked eggs which are served with baked beans, potatoes, tomatoes, bacon and sourdough toast. My wife had an interesting scrambled bowl with goat or...More
This is a nice place for brunch. Located on the Granville st in the heart of downtown. Not one of the streets I want to stroll. The crowd longside granville st looks wierd, smells wied. We were hungry and this place looked interesting and we...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d971829-Reviews-Twisted_Fork-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Ukrainian Village,"We visited this for dinner while between cruises out of Vancouver. We had seen excellent reviews but found the food to be inconsistent. Some dishes were very good but others were not so. Maybe due to taste preferences.
This is the place to go if you’re in search of authentic Ukrainian cuisine while in Vancouver. The service was quick and prices were good for portion size. We had cabbage rolls, schnitzel, vegetarian borscht, and potatoes.
Excellent! We started with the artfully presented, delicious pickled herring that came with onion, pickle, bread, and very fresh sour cream. Ukrainian dinner: 2 cabbage rolls, 6 perogies (2 potato, 2 yam, and my favorite 2 sauerkraut), Ukraine Sausage with some killer sweet/hot mustard, and...More
Was ignored. I walked into the place after 8pm so the place was empty except for 1 table of 3. Walked towards the waitress who was behind the counter and was on the phone . Waited for two minutes and during that time she looked...More
We had an early dinner here. Tried several different things between four people, all were delicious. Service was good, but they got busy quickly, so recommend going early! Highly recommend.
We ordered dinner through Uber Eats as we were staying at a hotel and didnt have a vehicle. I specified that we needed utensil with our order. We didnt get any utensils and the packaging leaked and it was a mess. I called the restaurant...More
Have gotten take out here a few times now and it has been great every time. The perogies are amazing and the chicken is delicious. Definitely recommend giving this place a try if you want to try Ukrainian food!
We are a part-Ukrainian family, and 2 of us have travelled in Russia and Ukraine. The food here was so good - Eastern European comfort food. Some of the best bites included the borsch, sauerkraut pierogi, the sausage, and the cabbage rolls. The mustard for...More
My family booked this restaurant and on reading the reviews below I was very worried to visit it. Well, my worries were unfounded as we had a wonderful meal and evening. Everyone was very happy with their meals and the service. Don’t hesitate to give...More
Won`t be back. Rude service, the portions of food were cold. When I asked to change, request was ignored. The place is so dirty and has dust inside. No social distance at all, the server was not wearing the mask. Please avoid this place people...More
Have been this soviet union restaurant with my kids and my wife. Rude service, expensive food and quality is so bad. Borsh was cold and when we asked ro replace the waitress said it's not possible this time. We found the hair inside cabage rolls....More
They had cocroach in perogies. No more comments. Close that place! Please! People stay away! Never will be back!
Went with family there and will never go back. We saw mouse in the dining room and they have cockroaches. Kids got scaried. So bad place. They never do renovations and have these pets there. Health department should check them out
Doesn't really feel like a Ukrainian restaurant. More of a Soviet style place. The waiter spoke Russian (when addressed in Ukrainian) and was rude. The place looked dirty. Food seems to have been reheated and not fresh.
Avoid at all costs! This was one of the worst experiences I have ever had at a restaurant. I ordered an iced tea along with my perogies and when it came it had a red tinge to it. It tasted a bit fruity and so...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d800876-Reviews-Ukrainian_Village-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Unchai Thai Restaurant,"This restaurant which is a small hole in the wall does not disappoint at all. we ordered 4 dishes so we would have extra. we started with the Roti in curry sauce. Very good and unusual preparation. We also ordered Tom Zabb Kai, Gang Kua...More
Small and probably qualifies as hidden gem. But excellent cooking...all your favourite Thai dishes but prepared as they would be in Bangkok...no shortcuts. Tiny interior but a couple of tables outside when the weather is decent. And expensive...most dishes around $20 and up which is...More
My host suggested that we have Thai dinner on Saturday and he ordered take out over the phone He picked up Roti with curry with Pad si ew for himself and I chose Gang Kua (chicken). Very tasty and enjoyable. He saved my leftover sauce...More
This takeout Thai is the best. The few of us who know about it are worried too many folks will catch on. Phone orders ready in 15 minutes. Never disappointed in the last ten times. As they are only takeout non of the restaurant dining...More
I was reviewing the Vancouver Magazine 2020 Restaurant Awards winners, and noticed this place won Gold for best Thai. I had never heard of this place before in social or traditional media, so I thought I had to give it a try. Due to COVID,...More
This small 8 table Thai food restaurant is really very good. The food is very good, tasty, excellently prepared and presented. We arrived at 7.20 pm and there was a one table available. My wife had Pad Thai with shrimp on the side and I...More
This little gem is quite authentic when it comes to Thai food. Had the boat noodle today which was quite good. Their Thai ice tea is good too. Will be bringing the whole family next time.
This Thai haven is tiny and delicious so a line quickly forms outside. I thought of keeping it a secret but such deliciousness should be shared. We'll be frequenting this place more on the off hours because their pork pad see ewe (sp?) is absolutely...More
Move over Bob likes Thai, we have a new King of Thai food in town. This tiny hole in the wall is cooking up the most authentic and delicious food in Vancouver.
My son told me about a new Thai restaurant that he had been wanting to try so we walked to Unchai Food. This is a small ""hole-in-the-wall"" restaurant with limited seating that has recently opened for business. A limited item menu but the two dishes...More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d17602141-Reviews-Unchai_Thai_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Urban Fare,"Stopped here for a quick bite. Not a tonne of choices but they have all the usual suspects. There’s a grocery store attached
Combination restaurant grocery store. Great food and service. Breakfast was excellent the two time we visited. However, the selection was not great. They were out of quite a few items. We went on a Friday evening for the Fish & Chip dinner. They were out...More
A great place to grab your shopping / fresh produce, it all looked super fresh, we grabbed a few bits and pieces to enjoy while on the go and sat in the restaurant section for eggs Benedict which was very tasty (although rather small). All...More
The girl who served our food was not wearing a mask but she kept talking the whole time.we all know spit can come out of you mouth while talking That we may not see.but it can happen. I was very uncomfortable and asked her why...More
thx to a recommendation we enjoyed both breakfast and lunch during our stay. helpful staff too. nice variety of foods in display cases!
The Christmas feel in this upmarket grocery / coffee stop is beautiful. it has everything you need and an amazing selection that I wuss travel to just to shop here. Staff were very friendly. A wide range of fresh/ hot cold and baked goods available.
Located right across from Carmana Plaza, this ""grocery store"" serves a lot of fresh foods, including ready to eat meals and traditional groceries as well. Opted for just the baked goods, the cinnamon rolls were amazing (would definitely return for more of these), The sugar...More
This restaurant is a pleasant short walk to and from the cruise terminal. You will see skyscrapers, new and old, including the art deco Marine Building. It also offers a variety of food on the menu. The food is tasty. It is part buffet, part...More
Great food for great price Everything for everyone Not expensive at all and fresh ,good service too.
We were looking for a drugstore to buy cold medicine, and were directed here. It was a great find! There was a terrific array of food products, as well as deli items available.We sat at the window bar for about an hour and a half,...More
Popped in to buy a few groceries, and found that they serve food here too. The supermarket has a great range and I found the prices reasonable. The food they served was very good with a chnaging menu. The food is well priced and tasty
We came here on a food tour and tried a few of the food items the store carries. This is a market, like Whole Foods but pricier. Many unique items to choose from, and if you can't afford to purchase much it's always fun to...More
Leticia at Urban Fare Starbucks was awesome! She didn’t let one person leave without a smile. She herself has an Outstanding smile and contagious energy. She Made every person in line giggle and I am 100% sure she added some sparkle to every person’s day...More
It was a huge grocery with healthy fast food choices ready to be reheated up! It’s okay... for a quick healthy snack. But they need to perfect the right temperature before serving reheated food.
You are not going to get big box prices, but I wish I had a place like this in my neighbourhood. Service was excellent. It had a hot buffet as well as regular groceries and speciality items. Inexpensive place to eat downtown.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2272347-Reviews-Urban_Fare-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Urban Sushi,"Foods were so yummy. Ordered a variety of sushi and it was really good. Ive ordered sashimi for myself and honestly it was freshly made and well served. Good customer service!
used to be fabulous - now it is more expensive and the bento box was cold, the beef teriyaki was a small amount of shredded beef and mostly onion , the tempura was super greasy and dripping grease and the whole meal gyoza and everything...More
Their foods are not expensive. Very delicious overall. Been there for 3 times. The only thing not good enough is the shrimp on Sashimi bowl, it’s cooked and pretty dry.
Hopped in here one night and did not regret it! As mentioned by others, there are several options to „Upgrade“ your dish. For example for a few $ more you will get wine/beer included, etc. Prices are moderate and the location is right in the...More
We are quite picky about our sushi, but this place was great. Ate lunch there, and then dinner, and were completely happy with both. At lunch, the ""bento""-style trays are great. For dinner, we tried a bunch of things, including a great salad, some very...More
My son took me out for lunch to Urban Sushi while in was visiting from Ontario. What a treat! He had a poke salad with crab, tuna and salmon and thoroughly enjoyed it. I had a teriyaki set that included tempera shrimp and veggies, a...More
Delicious food, prompt service, very professional and attentive servers. Passed through here on a vacation but would make it my favourite daily location for food if I could!
If anyone is craving for japanese food. This definitely is a must stop. The price is so handy in the pocket and the there menu has so much that you would be like eyeing everything. I ordered tuna avocado roll, california roll and the ice...More
I was on a walk and wandered into this place. Looked really cool. I had the beef and onions and an order of pork gyoza. They were not very tasty so I was disappointed. They service was good though but I won't go back.
This Japanese bistro is conveniently located in downtown Vancouver for a quick bite. The food was good, the portions were satisfying, the staff was attentive. It is also very busy if you dine in. It accepts pick up, delivery and catering!
Visited with a couple of friends for a late lunch. Chose the Bento box and it was a good choice. All f us enjoyed the food and service. Recommend to all and will visit again whenever I am in Vancouver again
After an exhausting day, I came in and asked if I could order out; thankfully, yes. The server was so nice, brought the menu to me, allowed me time to order, and after I did and paid, offered me a seat to relax and even...More
Great food and excellent service... :) :) casual food and very nice atmosphere... convenient located on downtown.
Good value, great location, good food. Excellent for a quick bite, but I would not have a date here. Try the salad, with an additional two dollars you get six california rolls or three other options. Veggie options are not that great.
We were in a hurry as we wanted to pack two more sight seeing trips in before the end of the day . We called into Urban Sushi and were seated immediately, drinks taken care of whilst we choose food. I choose the teriyaki special...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1015143-Reviews-Urban_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Uva Wine & Cocktail Bar,"Great cocktails and staff: Serene and Lup were the finest of mixologists as they came up with any drink we felt like putting together, whether on the menu or not. We made it our business to stop in their quite a few times for cocktails...More
This gem at Smithe and Seymour is our go-to spot in the Yaletown area for drinks and Italian. The decor and music are cool, the cocktails are made with attention to detail and nicely presented, and the food is excellent. Our server last night was...More
My wife and I visited this bar after an evening concert of the Vancouver Symphony, at the Orpheum Theatre. We were warmly received and quickly seated, even though the bar was very busy. The waitress service was warm and efficient. We enjoyed the experience and...More
This place knows how to mix a drink.... hands down the best bourbon cocktail I enjoyed in all of Vancouver. The staff's hustle is unbelievable. We walked in just as the pre-theater crowd was rolling in and I've never seen bartenders move so fast yet...More
Having previously enjoyed the great Umbria coffee at UVA, I invited visiting Italian friends to meet me there on Monday morning. A very disappointing visit. We were served terrible bitter coffee and 2 day old pastry. It seems Uva no longer serve great Caffe Umbria...More
The server was friendly and helpful. The latte was very good, at least according to my husband who drank it.
Came here for a few drinks, the staff are so nice and the cocktails were amazing. Definitely recommend stopping by for a quick drink! They have a small patio right off the street.
Came here as a group of 4 on a Friday night, the cocktail menu is incredible - plenty of options to choose from. The music selection is great, and the overall atmosphere is warm and inviting. My only complaint is the service was terribly slow...More
Hello, Thank you for the review and feedback. Look forward to welcoming you back soon. Regards, Kelly Jordan -Hamilton Sales and Marketing Manager
Not sure if its a COVID change or not but this place isn't what it used to be. Cocktails aren't at the same level. No happy hour anymore??? Service is slllooooww. Ive given it 2 extra tries to be sure. Won't be back again for...More
Dear Guest, Thank you for your review and feedback, as this is how we improve. You will be happy to know happy hour is back with a bang, and we have updated our cocktail menu. We do hope you will give us another try. Best...More
The selection of whiskies is great, you can chose from England, US and Canada. Rums from all over the world. Really good cocktails and wines. The vibe is really good. Small and cozy place. The meat and cheese tables are pretty good.
Dear Guest, Thank you for your review. We hope to see you again soon. Thank you, Best regards, Kelly JH
It was really busy and a bit hard to have service, but I had a really good time and the clock ticked too quick!
Hello, Thank you for your review. I am delighted to hear you had a good time and I have past your feedback onto our management. Hope to see you again soon!
I’ve lived in Vancouver for 3 years and have frequented UVA cocktail bar since I first arrived here. It was once a wonderful and reliable late night place for high quality imbibing at late hours. I haven’t been for a month or two. Wow! What...More
Thank you for taking the time to leave this review, customer feedback is how we improve. First and foremost we’re sorry your experience didn’t match your expectation. We really appreciate your loyalty over the years. Please feel free reach out to kellyjh@viaggiohospitality.com with any further...More
We stopped into UVA for a happy hour drink and ended up staying for a while. The bartenders were friendly and it was a good mix of people. Prices were good and the pours were generous. I would definitely go back.
Nice atmosphere, we only had a drink but there is a limited menu. Nice comfortable space with good service. A bit pricey for the area tho.
Happy hour 5oz wine pour for $6 from 2 -6 PM. Can't go wrong with that. Staff friendly and very efficient",20,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1069333-Reviews-Uva_Wine_Cocktail_Bar-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
V-Nam,"I am on a mission to try as many Pho places in Vancouver as possible. So far I am up to about 15. They are all good, but V-Nam in North Vancouver is #1, hands down,
We are regular customers of V-Nam on 3rd Street in North Van and are always satisfied with its authenticity and taste. During our lockdown during the COVID crisis, we opted to have pho and some cho gia delivered via Skipthedishes. It arrived on schedule and...More
Ordered takeaway and it was so humongous and tasty!! The spring rolls were so crispy and delicious, and the stir fry chicken chow mein was probably the best I’ve ever had. My boyfriend and I couldn’t even finish it all, so good for the price.
Came on a Tuesday night and it was BUSY, as most good eateries are on LLonsdale now... only one server on, but she managed very well. The pho and other soups are always good, fill you up for a great price. And get a banh...More
I've been meaning to come here for a while after I read the reviews. Compared to this built-up anticipation, the actual experience was a bit of a let-down. Service is GREAT ! Ambiance is so-so but that's not what one goes to a Vietnamese restaurant...More
Great place for lunch. Soup is awesome and they combos are great too! If you get bored of those the sandwiches are great too
V nam serves authentic VIetnamese cuisine. I ordered the Seafood Soup and the fresh Spring roll. I wasn't diappointed as the soup came in a big bowl and the Spring Roll is always a good choice. I was even able to take home part of...More
Possibly the best Vietnamese food in the whole city (Van included). Maybe even better than what we had in Hanoi.... crazy good, the prices are very good, service was fast. Now that we live in the area, we will be going again and again!
Visited at 6pm Sunday. Restaurant was run down feeling and needed a little extra attention to cleaning. With only 20 tables or so there were dirty dishes not cleared and the floor needed a sweep. Bathroom was... In need of more than a little cleaning....More
Great food in a modest restaurant. You get much more than you pay for and it's delicious. I often go for lunch or dinner and usually with the kids. My daughter loves the kids pho that comes with juice and ice cream.
I was in town on business and felt like Vietnamese. I had the chicken salad rolls and although they were quite large, they were dry and lacked flavour. I also ordered the vermicelli with chicken and the waitress brought me pork. I would have brought...More
about 5 blocks from lonsdale quay. first time visitors. wife had beef satay pho and i had #99 combo with spring and salad roll, pork skewer and shrimp skewer. all was most excellent. $28 was our total. our server who was probably the owner was...More
Was once a frequent customer. But, I have to say it is not very good anymore. My vermicelli bowl was just absurdly bad today. Gross, fatty and inedible meat. The spring rolls were egregiously bad. Soggy and greasy. Last time I had the pho. The...More
It's hard to find good pho in North Vancouver or any Vietnamese food for that matter. This place is always here for a fast and tasty meal. Parking is always available at the back and it's fun to drop in to the one million bookstore...More
Really tasty soup, massive summer rolls, the girl called Anna who took my order was very patient and helpful.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d1233222-Reviews-V_Nam-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
VanLove Sushi & More,"We had their special salmon roll and tuna tartare. There were fresh tuna chunks on top of avocado chunks with a light sesame sauce. Delicious. The Salman roll had a delicious sweet and sour topping and included thin cucumber slices. The serving dishes were sleek...More
Delightful surprise. Went for lunch and had the tuna tartare and the salmon roll. Both were artistically presented with unique flavors. This is a fusion type of sushi. Truly amazing and not expensive. A must try when in Vancouver. The staff was charming. Will return.
So happy we stumbled across this little gem. There are millions of restaurants in the west end and it’s nearly impossible to try them all but you will be glad you tried this one. Wonderful friendly service that is only exceeded by the sun menu...More
My buddy and I decided to give this place a try as we’d seen the news articles and we both have connections to Ukraine. The Miso soup is very tasty and really great value. We tried a few of the sushi rolls on offer and...More
I read the Vancouver is Awesome online review of this place and told myself that I have to go! Part owner Sergei greeted me as I entered the cafe and he walked me through the menu. Loved their speciality drinks ( try the mojitos) and...More
Highly recommended! They actually have sushi and much more. Sushi are the best, mango mojito is absolutely unbelievable. Will come back for sure to try everything on their menu!
Loved the story of the owners and their genuine efforts. The taste is just not as great as authentic sushi to be honest. I am used to much better sushi in Vancouver. They do not have sockeye salmon or unagi either. Won't return. I'd rather...More
We ordered big set of sushi, salad and sashimi. The waitress was kind and pleasant. We waited approximately 15 minutes. All dishes was tasty. Prices are reasonable. Generally I can strongly recommend this place.
I recommend VanLove Sushi & More - this atmospheric and cool place, with insanely delicious sushi! The combination of design and flavor creates a truly unique and enjoyable experience for those eating sushi) And who wants to get acquainted with Japanese cuisine for the first...More
Loved their food and the inspiring story of the owners. Tasteful design and tableware. Look forward to our next visit!
Visited this sushi restaurant recently and it exceeded all my expectations! The decor is modern and the staff are extremely helpful. The food here is simply delicious, with a highlight being the California Roll - it was incredibly tasty. And don’t forget their Jasmine Tea,...More
Very nice new sushi place. Went there with friends and we all were very happy to discover VanLove. Amazing sushi and atmosphere. Definitely will be back!
Just discovered this awesome new spot in downtown Vancouver! Loved their Philadelphia and the cozy atmosphere inside. I totally recommend checking it out
If you are looking for a sushi restaurant in Vancouver, you should definitely check out VanLove. They have a great selection of sushi rolls, sashimi, bowls. I ordered the VanLove roll, the salmon sashimi/ I highly recommend it to anyone who loves sushi
Wow! Thank you for your review! Your opinion is very important for us. Hope to see you again.
I'm a fan of sushi. And this one place for sure deserves to be visited. Phila was just perfect. The staff is friendly and the environment is nice. Recommend it for sure.",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d25789309-Reviews-VanLove_Sushi_More-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Vancouver Alpen Club,"We where disappointed by our meal here. It was not bad but just not exceptional. We ordered the plater, lots of food but have had better and expected more
We wanted to make German Cousine familiär to Koreans: full success. Very delicious and repräsentative German Ford. Very crispy ""Schweinshaxen"", astonishing and surprising. Is a ""must have"" The Service was great, hat time for little conversation, perfectly fulfilling the Orders. In one word: a great...More
This place is terrible, food sucked, place was gross and smelly. Food was expensive, and taste like supermarket quality. Staff was useless and management was braindead. AVOID THIS PLACE AT ALL COSTS!!!
Our first time eating here as we wanted to try the fried pork hock for so long. We ordered 2 pork hocks which came with delicious sauerkraut and very tasty pan friend potatoes along with a little gravy on the side. Our waitress was excellent...More
Five for dinner on a Friday night with reservations at 7:00 pm. Restaurant was not crowded so we had a great table with tasty German Beers. Our waitresses were attentive and friendly and quickly took our orders. Most of us chose the Schnitzel “Vienna” served...More
I'm a noob when it comes to German cuisine and my pal Lydia brought me here for dinner. I booked reso via Yelp for both of us, but it didn't seem necessary when there were plenty of tables around 6PM. I ordered Schnitzel Munchen ($21.95)...More
I have been a fan of the Alpen Club for past 4 years. Impeccable service. My choice always the “Feast for two” with the delicious and crispy pork hock. Dark beer krombacher a must too. Great value for money money too. Will return and recommend.
Five for Dinner had the best Schnitzels that were full of flavor with Spaetzle & Pan fries that brought me back to Germany. Our waitress was the best and the Stiegle Beer that was on tap was cold and crisp with authentic taste that complimented...More
Musty smell on entry set the tone. Shown to the farthest corner, but the initial service was OK, and the beer good. We split a spinach salad, and enjoyed it, hoping that our first impression was wrong. I ordered Jaegerschnitzel, and my wife the Haxen...More
Despite not having a reservation on a busy Saturday night right at dinner time, the staff quickly accommodated our party of three and before long we were enjoying our delicious Bavarian beers and wonderful schnitzel. The meal was outstanding, the service was very good and...More
This is a social club so I don't mind the pokey atmosphere but I would like the place to be cleaner. There was dust all of the room dividers that was up against our table. The food was overcooked. We went for the Haxen Special....More
Looking for a comfortable, welcoming dining experience with solid German food, then this is the place for you. I had a craving for pork knuckle, and this is the place in Vancouver to scratch that itch. It's basically a ham hock with a crackling layer,...More
We love German food so were excited to try the food here. Unfortunately we were disappointed. We reserved ahead for our party of 5, but there was confusion as to which table they wanted us at. Eventually they figured it out. The food was good...More
Went to this place expecting good German food and service after going there a few years ago. My wife and I were standing patiently to be seated for a few minutes and many of the staff just passed by us without any greeting or direction....More
We had reservations on this Friday evening and the restaurant was busy but not full. Our party of 4 shared the “Feast for Four” for $88.00. The platter included the following: • 1 full sized roasted pork hock (2 pieces) – juicy and tender •...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d967218-Reviews-Vancouver_Alpen_Club-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Vancouver Lookout,"Like most towers, this is a great overlook of the city. We were pleasantly surprised at the lack of visitors in the tower. We came on a weekday just after opening, and I don't believe there were more than 20 people in the place. There...More
Nice view around the city - bad luck when it rains. It‘s not that high and 12 CAD for an elevator ride is a bit too much.
This was a good visit. The views came with information plaques regarding what you were looking at around the area. You can see the mountains, the ocean, the city sights and much more. Worth a visit if you’re in the area.
We went to the Vancouver Lookout to get the “big” overview of the city before deciding where to walk. We had a wonderful conversation with a staff member Engert, who explained his name means dragon slayer. Engert answered all of our questions, pointed out where...More
The first thing we did in Vancouver today was the Vancouver Lookout. You ride up in a glass elevator to the top of the tower. It is a 360° view as you can walk all the way around the enclosed viewing platform. There are placards...More
A beautiful view of the city at a high price. If you want to check all the principal attractions on your list, go ahead. But I think it would be better to go to the restaurant on the upper floor than only to the lookout.
The lift situated on the outside of the building gives good views as you rise swiftly to the top. 360 degree panoramic views of the city and waterfront are what you would expect of this facility. We enjoyed it during daylight however recommendations are that...More
We spent an hour or so in the lookout viewing platform. There is plenty to see. Staff are friendly and there are markers to indicate places of interest. We thought it was good value. Recommended!
We only visited the lookout & the views are breathtaking. & what is good is once you buy you ticket you can go back as many times as you like in 1 day so we did the morning & then went back for sunset
Amazing views while you dine. Have been here on a few occasions for lunch and dinner. Entrees seem to be hit or miss, appys & kids meals have been excellent. Have always had great service. Washrooms are unacceptable for an establishment such as this.
During a layover in Vancouver between a cruise and the Rocky Mountaineer we decided to treat ourselves to a meal with a view. The restaurant was quiet, probably to do with being an off season Sunday early evening. Service was great and food excellent. The...More
This is one of the very few unobstructed lookout views that Vancouver has to offer on a building. It has a 360 degrees views from all sides of the city, but of course the best news are to the north and west. It is a...More
It was the collective view of 4 people that the night views were lovely but the food was very ordinary and very expensive for what you got. Appetisers were generally oily. The pasta main coursr seems to be been under the heating lamps so was...More
I visited this restaurant and the service was appalling! Ordered lobster soup after a cocktail and sat for half an hour waiting for plate to be taken away! staff walking about totally oblivious! Was then told we would have to move to eat desert to...More
The view from the lookout were amazing. You could see incredibly far and great place for pictures. There was no line and for the cost to go up multiple times of day is a great value. My biggest concern is that they don't label things...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10348153-Reviews-Vancouver_Lookout-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Vancouver Urban Winery,"An interesting area- but worth the walk! We were welcomed by a knowledgeable young lady who looked after our every need. Our wine flight show cased several wines which surprised us and was an enjoyable introduction to some regional wines! The Smokey rose and Riesling...More
Tried walking from downtown to the winery, but it is in one of the worst and most unsafest areas of Canada - East Vancouver. It is such a beautiful city with a veneer of looking wealthy and perfect then baabaam - East Van. Needles, people...More
Super cool winery, cool to see an urban winery in downtown Vancouver. Their version of the lambrusco , the vanbrusco is so delicious. Definitely worth checking it out, and their restaurant the Belgard Kitchen is absolutely delicious.
I returned to the urban winery again during a trip to Vancouver. Just as good as the first time (went in the afternoon) and got to try the tomato soup which was amazing! There was a good amount of space between tables, staff were friendly...More
Every time I go to Vancouver Urban Winery, I get stellar everything: atmosphere, food, drinks, service. Everything is always reliably perfect!
I went to Vancouver Urban Winery the other day and had another very nice experience. We went at 1pm when the lunch crowd had gone. It was peaceful, a beautiful setting, cool decor, and wonderful food. Our server was slow in returning to our table...More
Really cool building, though not in the nicest part of town. So definitely go in a group, and in broad daylight. The sights we saw walking back to out condo were eye opening. But the winery is neat. They do generous pours for their beer...More
We visited for a drink and a snack, it’s only a 5-10 minute walk from Gastown. Good wines and food, but biggest plus is how awesome the space is. Big warehouse lots of natural light. Great.
The people who run this joint are not the type of people you want to support. There are many great businesses run by enjoyable people in Vancouver this isn't one of them.
Excellent find for me and my wife. Sat at the bar area of well presented restaurant and bar. Food selection was good and tasty. The wine was excellent.
We called in while waiting for a table at Ask for Luigi around the corner and luckily got a table right away. The food menu looked pretty good so we'll try it some day. The wine flights and craft beer were decent and service was...More
The food and atmosphere were great. It seemed like a place visited by locals rather than tourists so it was a welcome refuge. It is a functioning winery and brewery and good value as well as service.
Actually on holiday to Vancouver, went for an evening out there. We were pleasantly surprised, we got two flights of wine, the sausage board platter and a pizzette. Everything was good, our favourite was the pâté from the platter, delicious. The service was on point,...More
We had to wait 1 hour for a table but had great beer and wine and gathering area that it didn’t bother us. Once seated the food was amazing and drinks selection was local wines and beers, amazing Prices were reasonable and service was perfection
An excellent spot! Great atmosphere, good food and a decent selection of drinks. A really unusual venue that works really well.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d6485823-Reviews-Vancouver_Urban_Winery-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Via Tevere Pizzeria,"they won't seat you until everyone arrives; why should anyone wait bc others are late? i could understand not taking food orders until everyone arrives, but restos make most of their profit from drinks, which seated patrons, waiting for others to arrive, will order; obviously...More
When an Italian is abroad, very often after some time... withdrawal symptoms 😁 What makes you feel at home the most is pizza! Well, if you are Italian and even if you are not, but want to eat a truly excellent pizza napoletana in Vancouver...More
Went to pick up just a pizza to go. It was great to be back. The food is so good. But I kept myself to just one pizza Napoletana from the take out window. Quick Service. Got it home and crisped it up in the...More
The pizza is, of course, perfect — there’s really nothing else to say because it’s simply the best Neapolitan pizza you will find in Vancouver (amongst many choices). The most important thing, however, is that you try the frittura (as an appetizer) — or enough...More
Stopped at the food truck on Burrard near Canada Place and had the Caprese Sandwich. Absolutely delicious!’n great location; affordable; yummy.
We (party of 2) arrived on a Thursday night without reservations and had to wait for 30 minutes but it was well worth it! Our Caprese salad was decent but nothing to rave about since the tomatoes were tasteless (out of season). Otherwise, the meal...More
If you ever had fantastic Neapolitan pizza in Italy, this is the place. I introduced my girlfriend to Via Tevere and she thought she was in heaven! We ordered my favourites- the Prosciutto e Funghi and Prosciutto e Rucola (fresh arugula). The size was more...More
Everything about this restaurant is fantastic. Great pizzas, great Lasagna, great house wine, amazing service, etc. If you are in the area don't miss the opportunity to go there - You can't go wrong.
I come from south of Italy, and since I am here I didn’t find a very good pizzeria. When I heard about this pizzeria, I wanted to go to see, and when I ate the pizza I was sure for a couple seconds that I...More
Stopped here for dinner after a day at the PNE. I’ve know about this place for a long time, so I’m glad I got a chance to try it. It was a nice day so we decided to eat outside since it felt safer. We...More
I called to order food and they rudely said “Go to the website and order and not to call the restaurant again, then just hung up on me.
We decided to get take our pizza for Mother’s Day dinner. We heard that Via Tevere makes pizza like what you’d get in Italy. The pizza was light and tasty.
We have ordered numerous times and are always happy with the food from via tevere pizzeria highly recommend the meatballs!
We order delivery and we weren't disappointed by the pizza, salad, and side appies. I'm not a big pizza fan, but the crust was just how I like it and the toppings were over the top. I highly recommend this restaurant.
It is located in the middle of a pretty cozy neighborhood, where there are not many shops or tourists, so you pretty much have to know about the place to end up eating there as it is definitely not close to the tourist attractions. The...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3488975-Reviews-Via_Tevere_Pizzeria-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Victoria Chinese Restaurant,"It was recommended to us about 2 years ago. We tried their dinner delivery because we were not dare to dine in due to the pandemic. Yesterday we dined in for the dim sum. The restaurant is spacious…lots of room between tables. The food was...More
We ate here last Sunday and found the menu to be nothing special however each dish arrived hot and freshly cooked. The waiters were friendly and the price was acceptable.
Lovely food- great vegetarian menu (although had to ask for it). Large portions and helpful service. Nice spacious restaurant.
On a recent business trip I was staying at the Hyatt, so this restaurant was very close (same complex). Went there on a busy Saturday at lunch. Once seated I had to wait awhile for someone to come by and take my order. However, the...More
Food was cold. Beef under cooked. Sweet & sour chicken was fried batter. Cutlery stained with crusted food. Staff service appalling.
We had terrific service right from the beginning of our visit. Food was very good and arrived hot. Close to the Fairmont Hotel so it was a good location.
recommended by asian hotel-staff i was expecting something authentic. started with shrimp dim sum (har gow). came w/o sauce. waiter said comes with out sauce always. that is total nonsense. spring rolls where okay, sauce with it disgusting. beijing duck was just okay. the cutting...More
Came here for dim sum lunch and whilst it was decent,it did not have the wow factor. Hubby and I had better dim sum lunches elsewhere. We ordered traditional small plates along with a claypot rice. It was alright. Not sure I'd rush back though.
This restaurant was recommended to us by our friend. First we tried their dinner. It was a combo for 2 with lobsters & stir fried rice noodles with beef. They were excellent!! A week or so later, we tried their dim sum. Another winner!! If...More
On the last night of our Vancouver visit we were telling some friends that we wished we had of had time for Dim Sum. They quickly brought us to this restaurant which serves steamed Dim Sum at night. We ordered a large bowl of Hot...More
I have make a promise to myself that I shall never order food from that restaurant again. the food is bad quality and over priced
I’ve eaten better Chinese food, but Victoria Chinese Restaurant, which my friend recommended, turned out to be pretty good. We shared four different kinds of dim sum, all of them tasty. The atmosphere is agreeable; the prices are reasonable.
We stayed at Hyatt Regency over last week of December. We knew many of the recommended restaurants are located in Richmond, especially Number 3 road. But the journey by metro to Richmond is about 30 minutes each way. So we decided to give the Victoria...More
Went for dim sum at lunch time. The dim sum food was okay, but I have had better at other places in the lower mainland. I think we are paying more for the location than food quality. Service was good for an expecially busy day.
Vancouver has great Chinese food? Apparently the best restaurants move out of Chinatown Vancouver to Richmond but I was told by our Chinese cab driver that Victoria Chinese restaurant was the place to go for dim sum in Vancouver. Located in the financial district of...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710495-Reviews-Victoria_Chinese_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Viet House,"We ordered takeout and picked it up. We shared 3 dishes. The Viet House Steamed Bao, Vermicelli with Lemongrass and the Beef Stew Red Wine Pho. The Pho was the weakest of the three as there was simply not enough beef and flavor. The chicken...More
We come here often. My partner for the Pho and I for the Lemongrass Tofu dishes. The staff are friendly and authentic and the food is generously portioned and delicious.
This great little restaurant is reopening for take out and delivery from 11-9 on weekdays and 11-11 on weekends
This a great little gem.Its right on busy Cambie street .But inside is a lovely well decorated clean bright establishment.The staff are very friendly and professional.And the food is fantastic .The shrimp and neat spring rolls are my standard and these are crispy and delicious....More
My family have come to this restaurant several times. The food is very delicious and the service is very good, too. Also, the place is clean and parking is easy. We think it’s excellent ! Highly recommend !!!
I struggle to find words to describe our last experience at this restaurant. My partner and I have eaten here on a few occasions but this all ended when we went for Lunch a few weeks ago. We sat at a table, like we always...More
I live nearby and end up eating there 2 or 3 times a week. The house special is what I usually have. But everything else I've tried has also been great.
The pho is great and fair priced (would recommend the house special), and the restaurant is very clean. The service is friendly and it's not cash only! They accept credit cards with no problem. What more can you ask for?
Very good food, good service and a very clean restaurant. The curry and noodle dishes were especially good. Will be back.
We came for a late lunch of Pho soup. My husband was hungry and ordered some shrimp and pork spring rolls. They were good but the protein was mashed and we weren't able to taste it. Still they were hot, crispy and good. The broth...More
My partner and I stumbled into this restaurant one night as we were arriving into town quite late and looking for a late night meal at 10:00pm. We discovered the restaurant driving by and will certainly be going back. The restaurant is the cleanest I've...More
Enjoyed some fish curry on a wet winter Vancouver day. Really hit the spot. Service was also quite fast which made this restaurant perfect for our needs.
I have been several times to the Viet House. Each time I have tried one of the duck dishes. I have been wowed several times. The curry duck is out of this world. Modern techniques for a classic. Truly one of the best hidden gems...More
We love having this restaurant in the neighborhood. Would recommend the house pho (only if you like tendon/tripe etc.). Veggie pho is pretty good, but not out of this world. Veggie curry on the other hand is tasty, and has good vegetables. The duck bao...More
I've been in this place a couple of times and I was always satisfied. It has a good selection of vietnamese dishes, including some very good vegan options, such as the tofu in coconut curry. Service is superfriendly and fast, the atmosphere is also friendly...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14762372-Reviews-Viet_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Viet Sub,"We stopped in while walking over to Stanley Park and needed a snack. We had Excellent Bahn Mi sandwich and Takoyaki lunch here.
Best Bahn mi sub I’ve had in Canada and a great price and service!!! Fried chicken sub was nice and hot, beautiful chicken and fresh salad
Always friendly, welcoming service, really nice people and great menu. The quality is always top notch and most important to me is that it's always consistent in high quality. The best Vietnamese cuisine I've found in the West end.
Service and food was SO GOOD. The man at the front counter was super friendly and kind. Our food was even better than expected. I have heard Viet Sub is great but I didn’t expect it to be so so good. Will definitely be returning....More
Behold! My new favorite sandwich shop. I've tried the pork & grilled chicken and both were superb in quality. I really love the shredded, pickled veggies they add. For $8 and change, not only do you get a great deal and your moneys worth, but...More
Got the lemongrass chicken and rice as a takeaway. It was delicious, one of the best Vietnamese takeaways I’ve had! Not very expensive and the staff were lovely. Would definitely recommend!
Fresh delicious sandwich. Had B1 chicken lemongrass. It was delicious. Nice light supper or lunch place. Did takeout but there are outside tables and a small inside sitting area. Highly recommended.
Extremely bad service. Fortunately there are many pho restaurants in the area to choose from that are much better than this one.
The restaurant did not put up plexiglass barrier between tables and the workers did not always wear masks. Even the ones who does wear masks did so without cover their noses and removed their masks from time to time during my lease than 20 visit...More
Small dining area so prepare to take out. Many bahn-mi options; all with fresh baguettes and pickled vegetables. I had B3 Vietnamese Ham Sub and C1 Rare Beef Pho (see photo of menu). Sub was great, the soup they separate noodles from broth for take...More
Looking for Pho, stumbled into this place. Reasonably priced considering competition and area. Bahn mi was excellent. Pho broth and noodles were also excellent. Beef in the pho was tough. Would get sans meat next time.
We love Pho soup and have enjoyed it on several continents. This soup was one of the best examples we have experienced (best was in Sydney, worst was Iceland). It is ot only an ample serving, but all the fixins are included. If you love...More
What a great place for a little snack or lunch. It’s inexpensive, service was friendly and nice and the banh mi was yummy!
The lady running the store was so nice! Not to mention our banh mi sandwiches were very tasty. Great French bread. Try the spicy sauce on the table.
We make it a point to come here when we are in Vancouver. This time, we stopped for lunch and each of us had a sub, sharing a green papaya salad. Delicious. We also came here for this salad as a take away and it...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2302751-Reviews-Viet_Sub-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Vij's Restaurant,"This place is amazing! Every dish was perfect and the service was incredible I will definitely try to eat here again Vij was around and he is really something ! Thanks a lot!
The place is not very cozy, very dark and noisy. The food is OK, but not super. The service could be better too. The waiter gave us the bill before we asked for it and was in hurry to clear our table. Def. Not ok....More
Several people had recommended ViJ's to us and this was our first visit. We booked the rooftop terrace and were quickly seated. It was a very attractive area with low volume excellent live guitar music. The staff were charming - cheerful, attentive and knowledgeable. Vij...More
This place was recommended by our hotel's concierge and we were looking forward to nice Indian and gladly we weren't disappointed. We were seated immediately and the server came over and explained the menu to us and I discussed my diary allergy with her. The...More
WOW. We loved it so much we went again the next day. Yes two days in a row. We had 10 different restaurants researched and only 4 nights available to go out. Can you believe we used two of those days just for this restaurant?...More
Hmmmm what to say… we have been going to Vij’s and Rangoli (when it existed ) for many many years …like 20 years. There was a time when I would have said and do believe it was the number 1 restaurant in Vancouver. The flavours...More
My partner and I visited Vij’s after postponing a trip to Vancouver for 3 years and it did NOT disappoint. The meal was fresh and delicious and the service was excellent. Would definitely recommend visiting but book as it seems to get very busy.
This was probably some of the best Indian cuisine I've ever had! I'm not sure I would call it traditional Indian, its more of a fusion. But the food was soooooo good! It started with the house made chai we were offered as we got...More
We were visiting after many years and were extremely disappointed. It is missing the magic from a decade back. The restaurant is no longer fine dining; extreme loud like a sports bar, menu limited and lastly, in the name of fusion, the entree’s lacked the...More
Such an amazing fine dining experience while staying in Vancouver for a few nights! We had their own wine which was great and the dishes were exceptionally spiced and flavorful. I’m sorry I’m not someone that always takes pictures of their dishes and meals is...More
I was surprised when I saw Vij's got a Bib Gourmand restaurant as I had always thought of it as a upscale restaurant. But we were able to have a drink, appetizer, main and dessert all for $60 per person. I haven't been to the...More
I have many friends who love this restaurant from years past. Clearly something has gone way downhill because it is definitely the worst Indian food I have ever had. Bland. Undercooked or overcooked. Cold. Absurdly expensive for what it is. Staff is great. Decor is...More
An memorable experience! We let Vikram order for us and it wasn’t a disappointment. Every dish was succulent and he was an incredible host! Thank you Vikram and team! Just amazing
I wish I could give this a better review but I just can't. A few days ago, we were a party of 8 that went for dinner. The meal was really good apart from the lamb popsicle that had hardly any meat on it. We...More
The service and ambiance were good. Some room for improvement in the food quality, given their price tags. I give the lingcod a ""D"", and the goat in a curry a ""B-"". I'll try again next year.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10216579-Reviews-Vij_s_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Vino Volo,"i had a Cobb salad and it was atrocious. $23 ... boring and thrown together. the person next to me complained about the rock-hard bread on her brie and mushroom sandwich, the brie was minuscule, and another person had flat beer and had to make...More
Great quick service. Pizza was okay but not outstanding. Good local beer selection. Will try again another time for sure.
I love the pizza is so good . the service is awesome. I come with my family but I think is better to come only adults. Was missing a orange juice.
i loved the food and place. Delicious pizza. The servers are kind and gentle. it is a beautiful place. Cool place to have a meal.
Great spot for some drinks and snacks before our flight. Fast service and pretty good prices too. Glad to have finally stopped in for a drink, will definitely be back in future flights out of YVR.
As a wine lover this seemed like the perfect place to stop in between flights. I sat myself at the bar. After sitting for a couple minutes I said hi to the bartender to get his attention. This felt unnecessary as there was only one...More
I often frequent this wine bar while waiting for my flight home. I don’t know why, but the servers (male) at this place are the most unfriendly I’ve ever met. They don’t smile, they barely say hello if at all, and have an edge to...More
I had a bit of time to kill before my flight home to Dallas and discovered a Vino Volo just a short walk from the gate. What a great find. There are so many unique and savory wines to explore. The Pinot Gris was exceptional....More
When I see a Vino Volo at an airport I smile straightaway. The wine flights are always interesting the food is good and it’s a perfect way to start or end a trip. That said, this particular Vino Volo has a GREAT selection of Canadian...More
Great wine selection, we did the wine flights and added a pizza with our order. Hit the spot before going on a long flight. A little pricey but too bad
Pretty nice wine selection from different region and the charcuterie/ cheese board was quite good. Appealing music playing in background. Plenty of room to move around. This is in the Vancouver airport, so the prices are quite high. But a nice place to wait for...More
Every time we are in YVR flying internationally, we go to a full restaurant, but this time they all had lineups so we tried Vini Volo. We easily found seats, each enjoyed a flight of wine (although they also have a selection of beers), and...More
These good folks have a decent wine selection. The prices are what you would expect for an international airport, but the quality of the selection of especially BC wines is good. The staff are excellent as they are all very attentive. It is great, by...More
Awesome to have a break after making it through screening and customs. Decent wine list and food options. And though the food was really tasty, we were rather disappointed with the portion size and the value.
What a great idea to have in an airport. Good wine and some good food in a quaint and bright bar. How convenient it was located next to my departure exit. I met the DM Sally and GM Valerio while enjoying a glass of wine...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d9856604-Reviews-Vino_Volo-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Viva Sue Pizza,"Another great pizza, love this friendly independent pizza joint. Been buying pizza here for over 30 years. Still love it
Very hard working, family operate, always smiling business! They have operated here for many years apparently...we just heard about them recently when our favourite family operated Romanas Pizza on Hastings retired. keep up the great work, Thank you!!!
This was a recommendation from a friend. Decided to order pick up some Back Bacon/ Pineapple and the Ham/Mushroom. Both were loaded with toppings, the cheese is very light which i like. Crust is soft so you can basically eat the whole slice. Very well...More
I don't do a lot of takeout but when the occasion arises, Viva Sue is my go to place for homestyle pizza. It is a family run hole-in-the wall noy really suited for dining in, although I believe the friendly owners would make some space...More
Always good tasting. Love the quality of cheese and they don't skimp on toppings. We ordered several pizzas and all very good.
I have been eating from here for decades. Simply the best all around pizza: crust, toppings, cheese, sauce. I moved 50 km away, but still pop back in whenever I'm around to get their fabulous pizza.
On occasion when time constraints leave our family of five short on dinner plans, we have turned to Viva Sue for quality pizza that doesn't have that chain restaurant factory food feel. This is the place for almost home-made food!
Viva Sue is the best Pizza place in Burnaby and possibly of Greater Vancouver. Small friendly, family run business that is a stand alone business has delicious pizzas. Their ingredients are fresh and their many pizzas on the menu are fantastic. Lots to chose from...More
Great family run business! They are fantastic people who make great pizza and have always gone over and above. Thank you Sue!
By far the best pizza. Lots of toppings, made with care and attention. Family business and really great! Take out only waiting area that you could eat in, but I take out. Want good pizza in Burnaby, just off Hwy one at Canada Way give...More
Good as always. Not burnt like the last time. Good quality ingredients. Great taste. Love the Hawaiian pizza.
We ordered a few pizzas. It's always been very good with the exception of this time where 2 pizzas had the crust burnt on the underside. Love the Hawaiian.
I love this place! Viva Sue is a family owned and operated pizza shop. There are a few tables to eat in and a limited number of parking spots in the small strip mall. If my office was still nearby, I'd be ordering more often....More
Have tried several different types and all are so good. Great crisp to crust. Very nice cheese used. Great place.
We love the Super Sue, my teenage boys order it themselves and walk over to pick it up. They are so friendly and we love that they are right in our neighbourhood.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d8769993-Reviews-Viva_Sue_Pizza-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Vomero Coffee House,"Fantastic coffee, friendly vibe, seems very authentic. Was delighted to see Affogato offered as an option as it’s one of my favourite simple desserts!
Excellent coffees, pastries, and lunch items. Very friendly and knowledgeable staff. My favorite when in Vancouver! Will be back!
This really is a gem in the heart of North Vancouver. When I say real Italian, it means that I can come in and speak Italian with Gianni, the kind host/owner, Lidia, Federica...knowing everybody by name makes a difference - they are not just serving...More
There is no place like Vomero. Very lovely people are holding this business. Everything is done with love and care. The best cappuccino, coffee and Italian sweets. I recommend to come this June for Napoletan svogliatelle with ricotta. Very yammi and typical Italian. Very delicious...More
Such great coffee. Good location. Friendly service. And lots of great eats. Good place for a quiet conversation or a read of the news paper
The best lattes on the Northshore. Great staff and food is great too. Fresh assortment of paninis and some lovely baked goods. Lots of tables inside, window counters as well as outside tables.
Alex made the best first impression! He also made pair of perfect espressos. The cafe was so cozy and clean that we decided to sit and sip our drinks rather than take them on the go, as usual. And to top it off - the...More
Excellent coffee and delicious Italian bakery, sandwiches, lasagna and daily soups. Friendly service, easy access, free parking and wi-fii. The background music is not too loud. Outside seating sun or shade.
I was in the area as I needed to buy ski gloves on my trip to Whistler - I forgot at home. This cafe is next to Capilano Mall. This was my first time at this little cafe as I live across the water. The...More
Lovely hidden gem, just across the parking lot from Save-on and Cap Mall. Wish they'd do a little more self-promotion, as it's difficult to find any information online. They have free wifi, outdoor seating, gelato, baked goods, and paninis (only $7.50, served with mixed greens)....More",10,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d15271067-Reviews-Vomero_Coffee_House-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Water St. Cafe,"After a morning of shopping we stopped in here for lunch. My wife and I decided to share a Cioppino and we each ordered dessert and a drink as well. The food was outstanding and they had no problem with our asking that the one...More
We were served a bottle of red wine, which was unacceptable warm. With the food alteady served, we ended up with returning the food to the kitchen and the wine in a cooler. How can they serve the wine when they know the wine is...More
Hello there, we'd appreciate the opportunity to speak with you directly about your experience. Kindly email us at info@waterstreetcafe.ca. Thank you!
Amazing food and wine. Staff were excellent. Situated opposite the famous Steam clock which added a little bit to the meal.
Thank you! We hope to host you again.
The shrimp in the shrimp cocktail were mushy and not firm and pink; almost as if they were undercooked or re-frozen. Cioppino was good - the shrimp were cooked. The scallops were very small and almost lost in the sauce. Wine reasonably priced. Very noisy....More
We hope to host you again and offer an experience that will ""wow"" you!
We ate here as a lady on our bus recommended it. We dined at lunch time and chose various tapas plates. Very nice food, great service and a fantastic view of the steam clock.
Thank you, we look forward to hosting you again one day.
We stopped here for dinner using a FirstTable reservation. Although the Water St. Cafe has existed for a long time in Vancouver, it's the first time I've tried it. It's conveniently located across from the Steam Clock, so as a local, I found it entertaining...More
We appreciate you joining us and hope to one day host you again!
Water st. Cafe is a trendy restaurant in the trendy Gastown area of Vancouver. It's located next to the famous steam clock and you can watch it which whistling every quarter of an hour. The place is nicely decorated and personnel is helpful and friendly....More
Thank you! We hope to one day host you again.
The restaurant annually supports the food bank and encourages its patron to bring a donation in exchange for a discount on their pasta. Win win situation. They have lots of variety in their menu.
We love to support our community, and we appreciate the support from our guests as well. We hope to host you again.
We had a rather late dinner but staff were amazing and the food was superb. Great lication right across the famed Steam Clock.
Brilliant spot, loved everything. Highly Recommend this spot. Food, drinks, staff happy hour. Everything was 5 stars, If I could give them 10 stars I would.
Thank you! We hope to host you again!
I took my daughter on January 7th for her birthday lunch. She chose Water St. Cafe as she had been years ago and is a seafood lover, as am I. First the server was ""stunned"". We had pre arranged to bring our own bottle of...More
We would very much like to speak with you about your experience as it does not reflect the caliber of hospitality we offer our guests. Please email us at info@watersteetcafe.ca. Thank you.
Brunch menu is very limited. Service was poor. Omelette was mediocre. Small omelette with a few potatoes, way overpriced! Eggs were cold when served. Coffee with cream requested but given milk instead of cream and had to ask a second time for actual cream. Music...More
We have quite recently launched a new Brunch menu that may interest you. We hope to host you one day in the future and provide the caliber of experience we strive for with every visit. Thank you.
Great place for drinks and wonderful Italian dishes plus some unique items. Seat by the window is great for people watching if going solo. Enjoyed the brunch in the past as well. Also divine desserts. Will be back!
Thank you! We look forward to hosting you again.
Christmas Day lunch, 2022. We booked some way in advance. We were offered a corner, window table for two and had to request a more spacious table for two to avoid plates and glasses clunking together - this was sorted. The primary waiter had one...More
We would very much like to speak with you about your experience, if you'd like to discuss your experience further please email us at info@watersteetcafe.ca. Thank you.
Was walking around Gastown and wanted to stop for lunch. Happened to see Water St. Cafe and ventured inside. Had a great seat by the window. The staff was really good. The menu was a bit limited for lunch, as they were offering brunch so...More",27,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710592-Reviews-Water_St_Cafe-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
West Oak,"Dear West Oak, I am giving you this non-positive review for the way one of your arrogant and judgemental stuff treated us. It was a girl at a front entrance who intakes and “welcomes” people and she refused to give us her name. Without going...More
Really liked the vibe of this restaurant. Our server was friendly. Cocktails were good (really enjoyed the Tiffany Blue). We had the Burger and the Salmon. Both were tasty, and they have the most delicious truffle fries I've ever had. Yummmm. I would return when...More
My family and I had an excellent meal out at West Oak and our server Jason was great! We shared Buffalo Cauliflower to start, which hit the spot. For mains we had mussels and fries, roasted salmon and braised lamb shank. All three were very...More
delicious food and something different. different in a good way. friendly staff. nice location in yaletown. prices average but worth it. salmon was delicious and calamari was good a little overdone for my liking.
The service was good but the food was pretty underwhelming. The other diners seemed to be very loud groups of “look at me” 20 somethings. Couldn’t wait to get out of there.
Amazing special place. Went here for a celebration of life for my mother’s 75th bday who just passed away shortly before her bday and the staff made the evening so special. They brought us 3 delicious desserts on the house! I’ve never seen such kindness...More
This place is amazing!! Great, friendly staff. Food is delicious! Amazing atmosphere and ambiance!! We got the calamari, the shrimp, hummus, lamb and it all tasted spectacular! Great drinks too
Sit at the bar it’s fabulous!!! Amazing happy hour!!! The bartenders Jiri and Teagen were so fantastic. Their bromance made for great chit chat. Highly recommend!!!!
From the moment we arrived, we were treated with respect and friendly/excellent service. Being a resident of a certain age, I'm used to the whole ""you're not cool enough to eat here"" experience at certain places - I didn't get this at all here. The...More
Used to be a very classy sophisticated restaurant! Now it caters to 20-25 year olds that love derogatory music. Cops in the restaurant checking IDs did not boost confidence. Food still good, waitress not interested in her job!
Every dish we ordered was creative and delicious. I’m looking forward to my next visits(s) so I can work my way up and down the rest of the menu.
I came here for my birthday brunch with my moms and the hostess was very cold and unwelcoming. The food was not up to par. I asked for medium eggs for my eggs Benny I got one completely hard and one semi medium... would not...More
I came to West Oak on Jan 16th with my bestfriend and had a really bad experience. I have been to West Oak many times and have never been so disappointed. Upon meeting our server, he was very rude and standoff-ish. He gave our menus...More
OMG I couldnt say a bad thing about this place! from the service, to the wine, all the way to our FRESH meals! I want to shout out to our server (sorry i really forgot your name) the lovely girl that was in finance :)...More
I went there with my partner on NYE and when we got there the hostess seemed like she hated her job. Didn't even greet us till they were finished looking at some chart.. I was very surpised given that this is COVID times and the...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4453208-Reviews-West_Oak-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Western Lake Chinese Seafood Restaurant,"Western lake We had a large family dinner & chose to do some takeout. We ordered 3 items - crab claws, gai lan with 3 seafood & egg tofu w/dried scallops & enoki mushrooms. All the dishes were good & tasty. My beef with takeout...More
Considered by some to offer the best Dim Sum in British Colombia Western Lake Chinese Seafood Restaurant could easily operate by reservations only, but fortunately for those willing to wait the thirteen year old establishment on Victoria Drive takes a limited number of walk-ins daily....More
King crab dinner was delicious! The fried rice with Portuguese curry was impressive. Excellent food overall. Street parking.
We have been for dim sum several times and it is exceptional. Decided to try for dinner on Chinese NY day...I was steeling myself thinking it would be crowded and noisy. But no. (lots and lots of takeout). We had made a reservation and were...More
We came here for New Years dimsum this morning. We arrived right at 9:20 while reservation time was 9:30, but Danny opened the door to let us in early. Food was great. We had Century Egg with Pork Congee, Squid tentacles, Shao Mai, Chicken Feet,...More
You want to make reservations for this one folks! You wont be dissapointed! Expect a small delay even with a reservation and a very long one if you don't!
Food was average for the price, but forced me to tip more than what i want to tip, is annoying. I will never go back.
I had a early meting with a friend for Dim sum , he choose this restaurant ,I have not been here for a long time due to very small place noisy and line up all the time ,parking is awful , but there Dim Sum...More
The dim sum at Western Lake was phenomenal. The portions were massive especially the dumplings. The service was friendly and menu extensive. We look forward to returning soon. Thank you
A very popular get together location for dim sum, family meals and banquets in Vancouver! I was invited out with family to the Western Lake Chinese Seafood Restaurant while I was visiting Vancouver recently! We did not have a reservation, but the hostess found our...More
Very good dim sum! Large portions for the price. Very clean and friendly restaurant. The staff here are great.
I’ve come here for dim sum and it was a fantastic experience so I thought I’d try their dinner. We had the King Crab special dinner for 6 and we decided to add more dishes... big mistake! Or great leftovers?!? The first course was their...More
We made reservations for 10:30am on a Saturday during a long weekend. I knew even making reservations we would need to wait. It was extremely busy with people waiting with reservations and walk-ins. Walk-ins were told the wait was 3 hrs. We waited and were...More
Went on my annual Thanksgiving trip to Whistler. After a passage of two years, I decided that I had to stop for lunch at Western Lake. Arrived at 1:30 on Tuesday and found a parking spot in the residential area just north of the restaurant....More
Food is ok. But they charged me 1.20$ for a tspoon of chili sauce!! Hate when petty restaurants screw over customers to make an extra dollar. Really makes one lose respect for what could have been a decent restaurant. Cmon owners... is it really worth...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2199407-Reviews-Western_Lake_Chinese_Seafood_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot,"We ate here for a late lunch/early dinner after we arrived in Vancouver from a cruise. We were staying at the Sheraton Vancouver airport hotel and it is an easy walk from there to the Ackroyd location - just a few blocks in a sea...More
This was probably the most expensive breakfast we have had for years! $20 for one order which was way too much to eat - plus 4.29 for coffee! Pancakes were terrible - doughy. We won’t be back for breakfast. $50:for 2 of us - seniors...More
The servers here enjoy making fun of people with mental health. Wish I could take my tip back as we did not expect to pay for disrespect. Food is Terrible.
Spent birthday there and was disappointed. Drinks were good, pale ale wasnt. Had the rib dinner. Fries were luke warm and soggy , had to get a replacement. Ribs were tender but salty and the sauce was not good. Disappointed. Chicken salad was good but...More
We have eaten here multiple times for both breakfast and dinner. There is a nice choice of food on the menu and all at reasonable prices. The wait staff were all excellent. Certainly a place that I would recommend for good food at inexpensive prices.
Breakfast in don ríen , perfect posición ! Early . From Costa Rica, we tourins , first time in canada. Nice place. Good food,
Tripadvisor lists this restaurant as open and even provides the hours. I've attempted to notify them that this location is permanently closed -- it was torn down in August 2021 -- yet they deemed my submission did not meet their guidelines.
Always enjoy a good white spot burger. Something has changed. Could be the bun. Not as light and fluffy. Did it change? It wasn’t as good as usual. Will return because I love Triple O sauce. I know it’s just mayo and red relish. But...More
White Spot is great for good plain fare. I had the baby back ribs and they were good, very tender. Burgers are good, in fact everything I have had there has been good - not outstanding, but tasty and worth the money. Staff are pleasant...More
Went there with a couple of friends ' short staffed - disinterested in serving customers -slow with water and menus- not welcoming and just unprofessional- food was good and cooked well just bad service' my friends and I will not return- hopefully they dont close...More
We returned to this White Spot during our holiday visit to Vancouver. It’s funny I think I could have written the same review as we experienced at breakfast last year. This year for dinner the staff are completely overrun and if the CEO could see...More
I love white spot!! Always choose for white spot when I feel I deserve it or I know my order is going to be correct. The one in Burnaby was my favourite because I lived there for 2 years and the service was great as...More
I'm not sure if Canada have local food that truly originated from Canada. But this place is so called serving local food (i.e. fish, burger, pasta, etc). I tried fish & chips, and it was nice. It's a good place to hang out with friends...More
I grew up with White Spot but have seldom tried the restaurant in the last 30 years. Have eaten there twice in last few weeks. It has become a restaurant of choice for us. Try the lasagna for dinner or the fish n chips. Excellent...More
We tried White Spot’s breakfast after our tour guide said it’s good. The oatmeal quinoa was served hot with brown sugar and milk on the side and with a bowl of fresh sweet tasting mixture of apples, red seedless grapes, oranges and strawberries. Their hot...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710646-Reviews-White_Spot-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot (Best Western),"We stayed at the Best Western Plus and ate here b/c it was open early. Enjoyed breakfast, Charred Tomato and Spinach Benedict (I had the hollandaise on the side) was yummy and very filling. Smashbrown potatoes were good, I’d probably prefer the shredded hashbrowns next...More
Service was good. The food & pricing was fair. Facility needs a good deep clean....carpets are pathetic & place just looks a bit run down.
We ordered the large burger that came with coleslaw and French fries. A side Caesar salad was shared. The burgers were delicious and the fries were great. The salad was good.
Having the food establishment attached to the Hotel meant we didn't have to leave. There was a discount from the Best Western Plus also included
This White Spot is connected to a Best Western, we went to the restaurant at 6:00 fully knowing they were short staffed and it was a busy time. We were asked to wait 15 minutes and they would be back, after 30 minutes the gentleman...More
Conviniently located in the best western hotel, this restaurant is terrible. Only 2 waitress for more than 40 tables. Waitress are rude, food takes ages to arrive to your table and on top of that they ask for a great tip.
Excellent service. The staff went out of their way to provide us what we wanted. Food was great - the best we’ve had in Vancouver. My husband and I had the chicken caesar, my daughters had hummus and quesadilla all of which were very tasty....More
Food was really good and had unique dishes. Service was great. Ask for Taranveer. All employees were very helpful and attentive to our needs.
We came here for dinner because out of town friends had just booked into the hotel and it was a convenient place to eat. Big mistake. The food was good but the server kept making mistakes with the orders. My friend wanted just a plain...More
My Sisters & I have visited the Broadway location many time in the last few months.... the service there is always great. Unfortunately, we have noticed that the fries were not the same. In the last few time we have ordered fries with our meal,...More
The food is always consistent @ white spot, and it was again for our visit. So the 5 out of 5 is based solely on service. Klarisa was our server (hopefully this is the kits restaurant) and she was nothing short of spectacular. Friendly, informative,...More
During our stop-over, we had dinner and breakfast here. Great burgers, onion rings, and more fries on my plate than I could eat. Very good beer on tap - Spot GI Pale Ale. Breakfast was also a plate full and very good. Coffee good too...More
The restaurant is located in a hotel so it is convenient if you are staying at the hotel. My family and I had breakfast and lunch here. Breakfast was delicious but they could improve service. During lunch, I had requested to have mushrooms excluded from...More
We just flew in from Toronto and were very hungry. Discovered this place and had some breakfast. This is a typical breakfast spot with decent coffee. We ordered eggs Benedict and omlettes. Everything was very good and the portions generous. The price was reasonable and...More
Just got to hotel at dinner so was perfect locationService was great so fast We told server we don't do white spot in Nanaimo because it's the opposite My friend had huge tasty burger she couldn't finish as portions large /she said was solo good...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5107796-Reviews-White_Spot_Best_Western-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Dunsmuir,"We were sad to learn that the White Spot in West Georgia Street near Stanley Park had been demolished. The 2 other options downtown was this Dunsmuir one and the Drake/Granville one in Yaletown. The latter was a bit too far so we tried the...More
I and my nieces went there on Sunday for breakfast and what I ordered was just eggs bacon and hashbrowns what a waste of money the hashbrowns were nothing like what they should be and the eggs were overdone ,ill never go back least to...More
Whenever one thinks of White Spot, their Legendary burgers and Triple O sauce immediately comes to mind. That’s understandable; after all, their burgers routinely make various “best of” lists in this Province. And it’s not all just hype – the burgers actually are very good....More
I go in by myself and ask if I can sit at the bar, but I'm told they aren't sitting people at the bar right now and I need to wait 15 minutes for a table. That's fine, but as time goes by I see...More
It was great to find that White Spots had opened again for dine-in service after relaxation of the covid restrictions as they are universally good quality and reasonably priced. We had not been to the Dunsmuir restaurant before. It is in a good position near...More
Wow White Spot Legendary Burger with fries and coleslaw so juicy. I ordered it tonight and picked it up. I will recommend these to everyone. I will order this again for sure..❤️
We ordered to go (obviously, COVID) and ate in the park next to the restaurant. It was hands down the best burger I've ever had from white spot, and white spot is my FAV. All our burgers were hot, the zoo sticks and fries were...More
Really? Here? With SO many great choices of places to eat in Vancouver??? IF budget is the concern, there are so many other places for the same money where the food is just so superior! The past was store-bought sauce, the salad dressing had to...More
We always enjoy the good service and legendary burgers at this location. The serving staff are attentive and helpful with advice about local events and attractions. The burgers were fresh and the new salted caramel brownie is a close second to the signature chocolate cake...More
We went for a traditional Thanksgiving meal at White Spot and were very happy with what was served. The restaurant has lovely decor and as locals it was a great way to celebrate the Holiday without going too far. The service was good and altogether...More
Came in here with a group of about 11 people after flying in from the UK. We were tired and wanted a quick meal. Fortunately we were soon seated and orders taken. The place is part of a chain and serves pub food. We both...More
Our hotel made recommendation while we waited for our room to be ready. Clean, fast, friendly service, great food. Shout out to our waitress Brittney! You made our 1st time experience at this restaurant chain most enjoyable, we will try others in our travels hoping...More
We’re British tourists, so White Spot was completely new to us. We loved it – we visited here twice and their location near Stanley Park too. In this restaurant we found the staff super honest – they told me their chips might be cooked in...More
Visited at 10pm on a Thursday evening so it was pretty quiet. The waiter was friendly, kind, the right amount of attentive, the food was swift & tasted great. They helped call us a cab. Thanks to the guys.
We stayed in Vancouver on the night before our cruise. our hotel staff recommended this restaurant. We enjoyed a great meal and stellar service. Our waitress, Brittany, was the perfect server, with recommendations from the menu and also drink suggestions. The food was delicious.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7223007-Reviews-White_Spot_Dunsmuir-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Gilmore,"Family and I decided to visit White Spot Gilmore as part of our global food reviews in early April. 1) Server forgot our drinks & had to be reminded. 2) Food was served without cutlery. Had to remind the server for cutlery. Her response was...More
Haven't been to this White Spot in a long long time, but based on my experience at other restaurants in this chain, knew what to expect. We were not disappointed. Even though the place was full for lunch (parking lot almost full, too) we were...More
This, my friends, is the definition of “rip off”. Usually, White Spot is about 3/5. Maybe a bit more. It’s nothing special but you can count on the breakfast to be better than Denny’s but still within the “pre-made” envelope that won’t break any taste...More
it's our last day meeting at the mall , I had a good lunch yesterday , but I decided to try the White Spot R+D Kitchen with my partner for later lunch or early dinner , it is a new concept from White Spot ,...More
Excellent restaurant , located at 4567 Laugheed Hwy Inside Brentwood Mall and it is a R+ D ( Research + Development of menu) it is brand new and the decor is so trendy . Service by Sara was outstandingly professional and courteous. She is fluent...More
I went to this white spot twice in last few weeks as the pandemic rules are getting better to be dinning inside with fully Vaxxed passport. took wife for breakfast one day and took my freind for breakfast another day. service was good, waitress was...More
It was packed and the server was slammed with how many tables she had to work. She did a GREAT job. Food was also very good. I can't remember her name, but she deserves a shout out for her awesome work.
These Burnaby location is one of the best of the best White spot in midland , , for quality of food and service , due to the new Covid 19 guideline , they still open for out door dinning and their legendary Car hope services...More
Once again a great happy hour afternoon at White Spot. As usually Collen offered a remarkable service with professionalism . The beer and appetizers are always the best.... we had 5 of them for a party of two. We will go back again and again....More
Excellent courteous and fast service offered by Collen. It was our first happy hour at White Spot and it will not be the last . Good portions, great variety and affordable food and drinks . We had a great time, nice ambience and delicious food...More
Today September 13, 2020 another great HAPPY HOUR TIME at White Spot. This time Jacquie offered to us a great and professional service . We enjoy a lot the sacó shrimps again, clamp chowder , chicken wings and Putin. The Jackson Triggs wine Sauvignon Blanc...More
Had the halibut and chips, batter a little soggy and not crisp. Chips tasted like they weren’t freshly made, sitting around for a while. Quite disappointed with the meal.
It was a wonderful HAPPY HOUR TIME. Lauren gave us a courteous and profesional service. We enjoyed a great deal and they are taking very serious the COVID-19 restrictions. Highly recommend this place. We would like to go back again!!!!
We decided to order from White spot for dinner. to support the local restaurants. Food cam quick. It was all good. I have the fish and chips. Fries as usual were very good.
I was getting together with my cousin. this white spot is at mid point between our houses. we both ordered the Nats hearty breakfast. I asked for a mix of bacon and sausages, and substitute fried tomatoes for the hashbrowns. all tasted good as usual....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d794990-Reviews-White_Spot_Gilmore-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Granville & Drake,"This restaurant is attached to the Granville suites. Our first meal was dinner. I ordered the signature burger with cheese. It was nothing special. The cheese was not melted. The following morning, we had breakfast. It was okay but the incident with a drug addict...More
I ordered a hamburger for delivery by Uber. I requested that the order be delivered at 5:00pm (an option the app allowed). White Spot rang the order up at 4:02 but it did not get delivered until 5:00. Needless to say the whole order was...More
I returned to try White Spot after many years away from Vancouver. The Triple O burger was very close to the tasty one I remembered. I was even able to substitute the veggie patty, and have breaded zucchini sticks on the side. My family all...More
The White Spot on Lonsdale in North Vancouver was a regular hang out of mine when I was a teenager. It was one of the places to go either after school or if one was cutting class. Of course, that was a long long time...More
We asked to sit on the patio- beware on a VERY busy street and is VERY, VERY small. The food was ok, nothing memorable. The hostess, waitress, bartender were great!
What have you changed with the burger? The meat and the bun seem different. Maybe it is only this location but the pattie was not the same and the bun was denser. When I return from being away getting a White Spot burger is one...More
Located on the corner of Drake and Granville. We had breakfast here, service was good and food came out fast. Food was what you would expect not fantastic but not great either. Did notice some used needles outside on the sidewalk.
I often take my son there to have lunch. Staff are friendly and super family friendly place but services are slow. I wouldn't go there if I wanted to eat something quickly but it is a perfect place for me and my son to relax,...More
We ordered pick up from the restaurant of course during this pandemic time. The pick up was for 5:00pm and was on time. We ordered two different types of burgers and fries. We got two of the same burger and the fries we got were...More
I tried several restaurants while visiting Vancouver but White Spot at the corner of Drake and Granville is the best!! They have the best tasting food (high quality) and service!! Like most restaurants they also have a happy hour menu (food and drinks). I've had...More
Must be over 25 years ago since I ate in a White Spot. Surprisingly pleasant and menu is up to date. Foods is good for what you are paying for and service is also reasonably good. Nothing fancy but decent enough.
A very good breakfast egg bacon and pancakes was very good and the waiter and waitress was very friendly and take care of you, ask Mahesh the best waiter in morning!!!! Good job everyone thx for all
We were at White Spot for a family meal, on a budjet and we were very satisfied. Lots of original good salads, healthy burgers, and more.
I travel to Vancouver for work and often have breakfast at the White Spot on Drake, as I work nearby. On this occasion, I couldn’t have been more disappointed. I was joined for breakfast by my business partner and a mutual friend. Things started off...More
We ate here twice during our visit since it was close to our hotel. We both enjoyed our food both days. We had better service the 2nd day in the bar and watched the Seahawks game for a bit. The bacon, broccoli, and cheese was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d3357018-Reviews-White_Spot_Granville_Drake-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Kingsway,"Why is everything so much better here? other WS should come here for training. I think everyone has worked there for 40 years. Cooks do it like I remember from my youth, not like most white spots now, chinsing down on everything, overcooking, inedible fries,...More
Wanted a quiet place for a late supper. Choose this place because of past WS experiences. Ordered the Chicken Pot Pie. Quite impressed with the size of the pie. Hot and very tasty. Added the Apple Pie for dessert - just ordinary - nothing spectacular.
My Wife wanted to go out for dinner and get a White spot burger. She ordered a Chicken burger i ordered a Monte burger. SErvice was quick adn efficient. the wait was not that long. only issue was my burger was under cooked. the waiter...More
Wife wanted a white spot burger. So we went to white spot. We picked this one because it was Sunday evening it a little bigger and we figured we would get in faster and with shorted wait time. we waited about 20 min. food was...More
I always stay in Vancouver for the last few days of my yearly vacation to BC and ALWAYS make it a point to visit the White Spot on Kingsway for breakfast. Always great service (thanks Theresa) and great food!
Stopped in for a quick lunch. Everything we had was decent : hamburgers, fries and salad. Service was good - no complaints !
We decided to go for dinner to White Spot. My wife was craving a burger. We chose this white spot to try a different location.I haven't been to this one in years. The entry was little strange. It is very small. there were a couple...More
I figured from their ""endless browned potatoes"" that it may be a real find, but unfortunately, not so much. The home fries were cooked very well (nicely browned) but they’re very bland. The cooking oil that they use doesn’t seem to impart any flavour, nor...More
When I visit BC, I also like to visit White Spot a few times. The food has always been good and fresh. The portions are always enough for a good price. I visited this location a few times on this trip for breakfast and dinner....More
This White Spot has never disappointed! we have been here many times on our Vancouver visits. Staff are friendly and attentive, food is great, several gluten free options. Menu is interesting and varied enough to keep most people happy. Recommended!
I came in twice during my stay in Vancouver. On my first day our waitress greeted us and recommended various tourist attractions, but also generated interest in Ontario. On my last day I stopped in for dinner, and the same waitress was working. She remembered...More
I stopped by with my mother for a quick breakfast break. I had the Southwest Chorizo Hash which was just OK. My mother had some toast which was good (pretty hard to mess up toast!). Service was good as well. Overall it was an average...More
We've always had great service at this location. I showed up over an hour early to collect a takeout order (my own mistake). They rushed my order through for me so that I wouldn't have to leave and come back, without complaint, and on a...More
I love the food at White Spot, it’s always delicious and last night was no exception but since they closed the Cambie and 12th location I’ve been forced to go to this Kingsway and Knight location and the service is always slow and disorganized. We...More
we went here for dinner. we ordered appetizers and they were amazing. the calamari was battered lightly and so fresh. the blueberry pie for dessert was great. i only got a couple of bites because everyone else ate it! the main courses are always good....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4873937-Reviews-White_Spot_Kingsway-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Kitsilano,"Went for lunch. It was very busy so we took seats at the bar. They were obviously understaffed. Different people were serving us. A bit over priced for burgers, salads and milkshakes. They do have a happy hour, which we were not there for. Free...More
The fries were delicious and you got free 'refills', but 1 was enough for me! The burger was lovely as was the wrap. I liked that we were given packs of wet cloths as the food did get messy.
A very nice place and family friendly. The staff were super friendly. I have heard a lot about White Spot as a good BC thing. Generally, it was a good place with a reasonably priced menu. The burger was good, but not one of the...More
I ordered a legend burger for takeout and they gave me a burned patty with literally nothing else on it. $17.
We have eaten at many White Spots across British Columbia. They have always been very good with excellent service. This was the most disappointing. We were seated in the patio which was fine. It took quite a long time before a waitress arrived to take...More
On Sunday last we went for breakfast and it was so delicious. We were served by Heather who was beyond friendly, we hope management appreciate that they have great staff. Today we were served by Cara who was also second to none, so friendly, we...More
Coming to the White Spot we had no expectations but it was genuinely one of the most pleasant experiences we’ve had in any restaurant in Vancouver. A special mention for our server Alexis! She was really pleasant and a genuine worker. (Most places the service...More
They asked me if I want a cup or a bowl? I said a bowl ..Looks like I ve got a half “bowl” of clam chowder 😅 for 7$ 👏🏻 wow ..
I am a regular customer of White Spot but this was my first visit to the one in Kits. Our server was very unprofessional. First, she brought us three glasses of water and just left them at the edge of our table. Then when she...More
An oldie but goodie. Have been around for many years and still have the original menu items but have also moved with the times and added other items. This location also has a drive-in area if you want to eat old style in your car.
I used to live in the neighborhood so it follows that I'll drop in for a coffee whenever I'm handy. Today was close to lunch time so I ordered a bowl of clam chowder and a hamburger platter. Of course nothing tastes as good as...More
I went for an early dinner on a Thursday and had the Legendary Burger Platter which came with their ¼ lb beef burger with cole slaw and unlimited Kennebec fries. Burger was very good with their signature Triple O sauce and slice of pickle on...More
White Spot isn't trendy but does not claim to be. It's simply a good place to get a really great hamburg and milkshake or fish and chips.....lots of other choices.....good food reasonably priced.
My goodness there truly are some amazing people in the world. This morning my son and I went for breakfast at the White Spot Restaurant, Kitsilano. Although I wear headscarves, it is obvious I have lost my hair due to cancer treatments. At the end...More
White Spot is an awesome casual, sit-down experience if you're just hungry to grab a quick bite. Service is nice and not too over-the-top friendly (good thing), and you get good value on free refills and signature endless fries. Burgers are great and they happily...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1106695-Reviews-White_Spot_Kitsilano-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Lonsdale,"This is my go to place to eat when I am starving and know the food is reliable. I had their usual fish burger with salad. If you have an aversion to gluten or bread, ask to have the burger wrapped in lettuce. A bit...More
We stopped by to pick up a meal for the entire team. There was just enough room to turn into the parking lot, pick up and leave. Our meals were incredibly good. Service was friendly and efficient. Would certainly stop again.
Stopped in for lunch. Burgers were good, and hubby really liked the fish and chips. Good Caesar salad, and I love the free drink refills.
We were in North Van for a week-end, and went to the White Spot for breakfast. The sign said 'open at 9am' so since we were a bit early we just stood outside and waited. A server came out and changed the sign to say...More
Heading to airport and thought a burger fix would work....water came quick as did the two drinks...food! ...forty -five minutes later. Each time we inquired it was ‘It will be right out...’ you would think I would learn...food was good, and we made it to...More
The hostess warned us about our table being wet because it had just been cleaned. As we sat down we could see she wasn't kidding. It wasn't merely a little wet. It was dripping wet. That is gross. You know the cloths they clean the...More
Every time we go to this particular location they get my order messed up and something is missing. Dine in and take out. They just cant get it right. They always get slammed because of Centennial Theatre across the street but they get overwhelmed. Just...More
Love my White Spot favourites! The vanilla milkshakes are by far the best I’ve ever had, anywhere, hands down. The Monte mushroom burger is the perfect size and sooooo delicious (try substituting the meat patty with a veggie burger). The toasted shrimp sandwich is always...More
IMHO this white spot is the best on the north shore. service is always great.staff know their menu. always consistent.
My husband had fish & chips, my son had a hamburger with endless fries, and I had a chicken pot pie. All were good. In fact, my pot pie was probably the best I've ever had at a restaurant. The crust was so huge, it...More
BAD MANNERS We had just come down off Grouse Mountain it was late 840 pm Sunday on labour day long week-end. When we got to this White Spot 1/2 the Restaurant was empty as I guess they had already cleaned it. they made us wait...More
I've been eating at White Spot over the years since the 60's. Used to love Triple O sauce etc. and the burgers were OK. The last few years we've been taking a little open car there and getting car service at least once a year....More
You just can't beat their burgers and fries. Every time we return from an out of town trip we make sure we visit. The service is consistently prompt and friendly. If there's any issue with the food, eg once I thought my fries weren't hot...More
The White Spot used to be a rather ordinary family restaurant with good food but nothing that special. Now it has a great new menu, very helpful servers and a quiet environment. It is a great place to meet with family, friends and business colleagues....More
Pleasant service, great food, and the right amount of portions. Enjoyed the White Spot blueberry pie/legendary/salad deal and this location provided the same size of the pie as I had had in previous years (not like in another location I recently tried). No problem switching...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d787054-Reviews-White_Spot_Lonsdale-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Metrotown,"We wanted a restaurant for a family gathering of 11 to 13 people for a Sunday lunch. The staff were so accommodating with great service and our favorite White Spot meals. My first time here with a large group. Will definitely return and recommend this...More
I went here with a friend on July 26th Monday. A friend wanted to have dinner so we agreed going here. We ordered Beef Dip ($17.79) and the Legendary Burger ($14.99) they were good. Friend enjoyed the Legendary Burger and I liked my Beef Dip....More
My host recommended this place. Originally, I was not happy with his choice, as my last few trips to White Spot (not this location) have been somewhat blah. And, it often seems to rake FOREVER to get the bill and pay it. Forever! Not this...More
We enjoyed the take-out 'heat and serve' turkey dinner yesterday for Easter dinner. The food was ready for pick-up as promised. The interior of the restaurant is well organized and signed to ensure physical distancing. The meal was excellent. Thanks to all the White Spot...More
Love White Spot food is always reliable always know What I’m going to get including bottomless fries and free refills..Service always good and friendly great for families or friends..Vancouvers old school restaurants Sometimes it’s better to stick to the same and White Spot has done...More
I was in Vancouver for Business and visited this restaurant for the first time.Was to lazy to look in the menu, and waiter recommended me to have the pasta and meatballs. This was simply delicious and seemed like homemade cooking. Meatballs were tender and tasty....More
Ridiculous excuse for a restaurant. Ordered online for a family of 5. Told to pick up order at 6:26. Food wasn't ready until 7pm. Because it is impossible to unpack the order at the restaurant, I waited until I got home to check the order....More
This place has a variety of breakfast meals, not common if compared with other breakfast eating places. So yummy!
We all had a craving for a Triple O burger. They were as good as we remembered. Fries are tasty. Glad they gave stuck with their original recipe. Excellent service.
After traveling all day hunger was changing our priorities. The nearby Asian restaurant didn't meet our tastes. We heard about ""White Spot"" to which we could walk. They had just the the right comfort food to fill our needs.
Went for a late lunch. The food was excellent and there was a lot of it. Pamela was our server and she was friendly and attentive. A very good experience.
Always a pleasure to eat lunch here. Prices are reasonable, you can choose a table or a booth. Servings are just right and the food is yummy. I have never been disappointed with my order. It's good to know when I ordered the salmon burger,...More
Went for a family dinner. Location has lots of seating and good sized bar area. Very clean. Service was pleasant but not exceptional. For meals we ordered chicken fettucini, burger, chicken salad and a salmon beet spinach salad. All meals were good and tasty. One...More
Worst burger in BC ... frozen and definitely not 6 oz burg ... more like a 4 oz burnt offering !! The clam chowder is made with a tomato base ?? ... very stinky fishy flavour and full of potato filler !! All in all...More
I went out for lunch with some ex-coworkers around the holiday season. This White Spot restaurant is located on Kingsway between Imperial and Royal Oak Avenue in Burnaby. Around noon time the restaurant was busy but not really full even though the parking lot was...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d4475472-Reviews-White_Spot_Metrotown-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
White Spot Richmond Centre,"The manager is a super star! Cool guy and even with a minor complaint, handles like a champ! Well done
Super slow service and not good service. Found a tiny hair on garlic bread, looked like facial hair. Then halfway through my garlic prawn spaghetti I bit into small piece of foil, the type you pull off from jar of mayo or ketchup. An the...More
Very lack luster food, lacking flavour. Average service Do not order cheesy bacan perogies, nasty. Skip this place!
Had the chicken & spaghetti very good also very good service. Came here with friends. Been here many times over the years. That is why I keep coming back.
A BC institution since 1928, White Spot has come a long way since Nat Bailey sold hotdogs and burgers off the back of his Model T. Now, in the 21st century, White Spot has evolved into an internationally recognized brand with a modern and evolving...More
Richmond Centre BC location is really bad service wise. The waitresses are all in a clique! One of the waitresses Jackie! She gives such a stuck up attitude and even puts a tip on your bill before you even pay without you knowing!!! She doesn't...More
Big shout out to the Mgr at White Spot Richmond Centre location... I had placed a take out order, went and picked it up, came back only to realize - there was an error it was not what I ordered. I called the restaurant explained...More
Good food, hot, great service. Happy hour every day. Good menu selection. Our go to place for a quick dinner. In the mall so very convenient. Recommended for kids too.
We were visiting Vancouvet and noticed several of these restaurants throughout the city. Similar to a Perkins or Smitty's from Manitoba. This was easy to locate as it was a mall location. We were greeted and seated quickly. We decided to share a breakfast. Just...More
My wife and I dined there and she wanted me to try something different besides a burger lettuce wrapped etc. They have “Chargrilled Salmon & Seafood Trio” I asked the server for Caesar salad (instead of rice) I asked also for the sauce on the...More
White Spot was the first restaurant I can remember my parents taking me to. The drive-in with the trays that stretched across the width of the car were fascinating to me as a kid. Or could it have been that the kids meal was served...More
After eating at hotel “fine dining” and other recommended restaurants in the Richmond area , we decided to try White Spot Reataurant and we are thrilled we did. Only wish we had discovered it the first day and we probably would have eaten there all...More
We arrived late and were welcomed in an extremely friendly manner, and served good food and nice drinks. No complaints at all.
One of my stops each time I am in the Vancouver BC area. Chicken Strips are great, Poutine is excellent. Had to have them change the coke, it was very watery (unfortunate that they delivered it to me and it looked like light brown water,...More
Unless you plan to attend the White Spot after 6:00 PM it will be near impossible to find a parking stall. In the early mornings the Asian population uses the mall for practicing their daily exercises which results in the North parking lot being fully...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d4880034-Reviews-White_Spot_Richmond_Centre-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Whole Foods Market,"The to go sandwiches at this particular location (Robson near Denman) are consistently not using enough ingredients in the sandwiches leading to dry sandwiches that leave you hungry after 20 minutes. -Tuna and chicken salad sandwich...paltry thin smear of tuna/chicken with a 3/4-1 inch of...More
We got the turkey meatballs and spaghetti marinara and a salad; we will be dining in our hotel room and this was all microwavable (except for the salad, of course). Little did we know that the meatballs were done with a barbeque sauce which sort...More
This store is over priced but one good thing I like about this place is the quality of flowers and mostly the wrapping of the flowers Ms. Tina and Ms Fern do it for me each time. I am very happy with their kindness. Also,...More
Stressed looking employees , bad lightning, long line ups. Not good feeling about company ethics or values. Would much rather shop Canadian and promote Canadian values
This location is my first favourite if them all. The chefs prepare pretty good food here, always fresh, wholesome and lots of variety. I like to pick up fresh organic fruits and veggies, then head over to the food bar to create my own dinner....More
The usual Whole foods market. Busy and right in the middle of downtown so handy for food to take to your nearby hotel.
I bought three roasted chicken from their deli at the Cambie location and came home and pressure cooked them for pulled chicken. I got terrible diarrhea from them for two weeks. This is the second time someone in my family got sick from their chicken,...More
Very good Grocery with good products, with organic vegetables and fruits but not all (American non-organic products, a little too many since Amazon became owner... apples, pears, carrots, cauliflowers etc from US !!! and not from BC in season .... The soups made at VANCOUVER...More
Had a cappuccino and cheese scone for breakfast. Really nice tasting and friendly staff. Nice out door area to sit out side and watch what happens go by on Robson Street.
Never ever before have I written a review about a supermarket. This review is about the one on Robson street in Vancouver. But it could be about all their stores! They do not have the regular food and are very expensive. A bowl of chicken...More
Super friendly staff, and they have a parking lot right next to it which made it very convenient for those who deed to drive here or who are not able to get here by other means. Small Whole foods, but the usual excellent quality one...More
Forget the bad or overpriced Noodle Shops on this street. Visit Whole Foods and grab a wrap or fresh sandwich and drink and eat outside at one of the bistro tables. Your feet will appreciate the rest after all the walking.
Whole foods never dissapoints. Always great and fresh food, amazing coffee, good prices and everything fresh.Great for a snack while you are walking on Robson street
I go here fairly regularly for organic foods and fresh foods as we eat mostly vegetarian and vegan. Excellent veggie burgers, samosas, pakoras, spring rolls, edemame dumplings etc.
Huge deli with many healthy choices. plus grocery store. A breakfast burrito, veggie sammy and two drinks for $20...pretty good. Heated covered patio, great for people watching.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7038803-Reviews-Whole_Foods_Market-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Wild Thyme Restaurant,"Definitely great food. Been there many times and the quality of food was always outstanding besides that the portions are filling.
Recently celebrated my son's 29th birthday at this restaurant. It was such a great experience from beginning to end. The staff were friendly and welcoming and went over and above to make my son feel special. Even with how busy the place was, the staff...More
Friends introduced us to this cute little family run restaurant years ago. The food is fantastic, the servers are extremely polite and helpful, the atmosphere of this cozy little place is quaint and romantic. Very reasonably priced. We highly recommend this place to anyone.
This is not a fancy place but the food is well-prepared and delicious. The staff go out of their way to ensure that customers have a good experience. Prices are quite reasonable.
It was my first time trying Lebanese food and what a great surprise! The staff truly cares about your experience. The food is delicious and the price is good. Highly recommend!
Amazing food. Enjoyed every bite. We had ordered a lamb platter for two and chicken tawok. Our expectations for tawok was different but what they served was also really good. Just a small request to have a little quick service. Otherwise it was a great...More
First time having Lebanese food, our waiter Ali picked the appetizer and dinner meal. This was ""family"" style and shared with four people. The French wine was perfect ... enough food for all of us and leftovers to go. This is a must stop if...More
This is a family favourite restaurant. We wanted to support the restaurant during the take out only restrictions. I was totally impressed with the owners efforts to maintain a safe clean environment. He sanitized the take out table, PIN pad and changed his gloves after...More
Flavours of complimentary tea, and food was amazing. Servings are generous and can usually feed two people. A nice variety of beer choices. The front windows open up on warm days. It was, apparently, not busy when we went due to Covid 19; though normally...More
A friend and I decided to try something new. We arrived right at opening (5pm) and had the restaurant to ourselves, but within minutes the place filled right up! The food was excellent. My friend and I shared a full entree which was way more...More
This place is so delicious! It’s a smaller place and they don’t accept reservations as far as I know, but the wait is worth it! (Or go early to get a spot with no wait). I recommend the cheese flatbread and the meals come with...More
Small family run business serving amazing house-made super flavourful food in a unique, cozy, and friendly restaurant that made you feel like you were being served in their own kitchen. My taste buds say Thank You! I was stuffed but wanted more. We arrived at...More
There is no reservation, first come, first serve. Best time is at 5PM or 6:30pm to be seated. Otherwise you have to wait for a table. The salad is fresh and tasty.
This family run restaurant gets top marks for food quality. There’s always enough to take some home and enjoy it again! I love that they have expanded their seating. Very busy at times but worth the wait!
Meal was great, service is good and in the summer the huge front windows all open up to give an indoor/outdoor feeling.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154936-d10477813-Reviews-Wild_Thyme_Restaurant-New_Westminster_British_Columbia.html
Won More Szechuan Cuisine,"If you are looking for a great Szechuan restaurant, then look no further. Won More is located on the second floor just around the corner of Davie St & Denman. The servers are excellent and you receive prompt service. The first thing they will bring...More
What a great find. Used by the locals, this place is really good. The food is in huge portion sizes so don't over order. Cooked to perfection, very tasty and reasonably priced.
Best chinese food I've had in a long time! So glad we found this place! Staff was very friendly. Would definitely recommend.
Visiting Vancouver, staying in the West End, we found dozens of asian-themed restaurants but nothing like what we're used to in NYC. Then we read positive reviews for Won More online and decided to pay them a visit. This is what we've been looking for;...More
Looking at other reviews I see not everyone has been impressed but I have never been dissatisfied in the dozen or more times I have eaten here, The food is tasty, the vegetables are fresh and the price is very reasonable.
Mom and pop place we were referred to by our hotel glad they did! Super Authentic made from scratch Chinese food! Super nice people.
We are a well travelled family with high standards for food . We can only report genuine, tasty, generous food . All served hot , fresh and with great happy service. On point pricing. 😁😁
We ordered dishes for take out and within an hour of consuming them became sick. I would not recommend eating here unless you would like to lose your appetite for 3 days. Manager lacked empathy when we called and explained that the food had made...More
Loved reading some of the reviews as we went here not because of any recommendation or because we are Asian, but because we fancied a Chinese meal and were very surprised at the quality of the food which was served. Yes, it probably wasn't authentic...More
This Szechuan restaurant is worth every effort to find. Local friends took us here, little difficult to find, but well worth it. This is not a fancy pants place, just authentic awesome dishes you probably have never tried. Every visit has left us amazed, what...More
As a Asian, I would regard the cooking Terrible. It is neither Szechuan nor it is Cantonese. Not even close to what it supposed to be. Staffs are reasonably friendly, but dining area sort of dirty. Doesn’t feel good. Overall, if you must eat Asian...More
I went here with a Resident Vancouver Millionaire on a recommendation from a 2 star Michelin Chef Owner. The washrooms that also shared the the neighbouring restaurant are dirty, urine soaked and scary, A quick peak in the kitchen and the same grime, sweat and...More
Hot and sour soup good. Singapore noodle good. Prawns with mixed vegetables terrible. Over cooked and only 6 prawns the size of a quarter.
Stumbled upon this fantastic Chinese Restaurant. The restaurant is tucked away upstairs off the street. The family owned small business is big on service and big on taste. The szcehuan spicy chicken was beyond belief. The best I have ever tasted in my life. If...More
Love this spot. Nice and clean .Lovely service always friendly. The cook is in the front window he is the first thing you see. Food is a delectable and very fresh.If you in the English Bay area do yourself a favourine and drop in you...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1837159-Reviews-Won_More_Szechuan_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
X-cite Grill and Bistro,"Very excellent customer service, food, staff and clean restaurant. Highly recommended this restaurant.
This place is great Very reasonable prices large potions prepared well Lunch and dinner specials are probably the best value in Vancouver With most restaurants charging outrageous prices after Covid It’s a relief to find a restaurant with hard working honest people who aren’t trying...More
Happy to picked up my back order Chandelier from Norburn Light , I read and hear so much about this place , so what a better time to check it out , the restaurant just across the street , outside is not most well come...More
Such an amazing place! We go here often because the value you get is amazing! Portions are huge and it is always always consistent! Never had a bad visit yet! The staff is super great as well!
this restaurant can be busy at times. the service is always good and staff friendly. food is basic fare but done well.
Xcite is a great bistro to have a superb lunch at a really affordable price. Love the chicken souvlaki lunch with a glass of house white wine. The waitresses are always very friendly and most of the time we always seem to get our favourite...More
Prompt and friendly service, playoff hockey on 3 screens, cheap beer AND food specials daily and clean and safe environment in our neighbourhood. What else do you want?? Oh and free parking on sideroad surface lots too :) Love it and WILL be back!
Big plates, and delicious hamburgers, free parking outside, easy in bus too, if you are in the area.
This place serves up big portions of good food at very low prices, nothing on the menu is over $11.95, service was good as well.
This is the first place I go when I'm in town. Great food, huge portions, ridiculously low prices? Nice family run atmosphere. Just Amazing all the way around!!
Love this place. Family run, well oiled machine. Really you can't beat the price and value with the quality, service and options. I have been going regularly for months while T was at work for a warm home cooked meal usually as a late lunch....More
We stop in here often on our way to events in Vancouver because parking is easy, service is fast and friendly and the food doesn't disappoint. Lunch and dinner specials are super cheap (5.95 and 6.95) with daily drink specials such as $3.00 hi-balls on...More
Cheap food and cheap drink specials. Quality of bread is beliw par but for price you pay you cannot complain. Had shrimp and avocado sandwich. Long island ice tea special so had 2. Friend had calamari which I tried. Good. They shared nachos but not...More
This neighbourhood grill has cheap food, GREAT specials, and is family run which is great. It`s often busy at lunch and dinner due to the specials. It`s nothing too fancy but the food is good and the price is right. I`d recommend if you`re into...More
Roving the street looking for a place to eat and we settled here. Not much on the furnishings and very dark interior. A popular place to hang out and drink by the look of it but quite noisy with the loud music (?) playing and...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181793-d3470717-Reviews-X_cite_Grill_and_Bistro-Burnaby_British_Columbia.html
Yagger's,"Excellent service.maple bbq wings were awesome. Great atmosphere,felt right at home.highly reccomend while in Vancouver
Came to get a beer and watch a soccer game. Service was good and fast, and the atmosphere was nice out on Broadway. It seemed empty for a Saturday afternoon, but I’m sure it gets busier as the evening goes on! Many choices of chicken...More
A restaurant that has been in Vancouver for years. Some movie scenes have been made inside the restaurant. Food was not very good for what we ordered. Staff was semi friendly. Price was decent. If your looking for a quick bite this might suite you....More
My boyfriend and I stopped in just to watch the hockey game during the Stanley cup playoffs and we stayed for hours! The bartender (I forgot her name but she has brown hair and a nose piercing) was so friendly, fun and gave great recommendations...More
Stopped in to rest our feet and have a beverage after a day of seeing the sites. They have a full bar to choose from and a decent menu. There is a happy hour every day with both food and beverages. Great service- very friendly....More
We stayed at the Ramada next door and rather than trek to Gastown, decided to eat here. The beer specials were really good. Happy hour was still going. My choice was the crunchified bison burger, with cheddar cheese...nice. Wife had Asian salmon noodle salad, no...More
The place is nice, servers wonderful and helpful, the food is very good for a sports bar. The only thing is that if you are seated at a table towards the back, the bathroom lineup is completely blocking your view of the TVs, my advice,...More
Wanted to watch a world junior hockey game and grab a bite to eat. Had the special -tortilla soup and fish sandwich (maybe as a wrap next time). Both were very tasty. Very friendly staff. Had lots of television screens to choose from. A quiet...More
This place is a little different. You enter at street level. It has a few seats. Then steps up to the main levels. It calls itself a sports bar but it really only has a few smallish tvs. What it does have are friendly staff...More
Stopped in for a quick lunch, we ordered the poutine and the Yorkshire puddings. presentation was ok. The poutine gravy was way to salty which dropped the rating of the overall experience, the beef in the Yorkshire pudding was nice but a bit tough. Good...More
What you see is what you get. Good drinks, good food, lots of TVs showing sports and friendly staff. Try the Beef and Chorizo chilli - amazing.
I absolutely love Mexican food but Vancouver doesn't have that many restaurants.so after searching for some online..I I googled "" Where can I get Fajitas in Vancouver"" and SURPRISINGLY this place showed up. Clearly a bar NOT a Mexican restaurant in any way... But just...More
Stopped in while on vacation in town, while the outside may not stand out don't be fooled. Great attentive service, drinks were good and promptly re-filled and the chicken souvlaki was superb! Highly recommended :)
We ordered from here from foodora. We had never eaten there before but the menu sounded good. It was delicous!! Nice people and good food.
Used to be a huge strip bar. But they turned the old entry i to a great little pub. Good drink prices. Pinball. Video golf. Big buck hunter. Excellent location.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d1986794-Reviews-Yagger_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yaletown Brewing Co,"We decided to head down to Yaletown for dinner. Ended up at Yaletown Brewing Co. We were a bit unsure based on other reviews. Our server, Kayla, was outstanding. She brought water to get us started without even asking. Our beers came in warp speed...More
Came for a drink & snack before going to concert. The margarita’s were good , fish tacos ok but don’t order cauliflower bites. It’s my go-to order & was very disappointed! Possibly 1/4 of a cauliflower cut into pieces steamed/boiled with sauce poured over and...More
The first thing that struck us was the pure cleanliness of the place. Tables were clean and the floor spotless. It’s well-organised with an excellent menu. Beers were flavoursome and the food pretty good. Service was excellently served by the friendly staff, and it was...More
Had to check out some local breweries on our short visit to Vancouver. This place is in a really nice neighbourhood which we went back to a couple of times. The beer was good, particularly the Yaletown IPA - quite a light pale ale with...More
Great atmosphere and service. Happy hour specials very good. Nice selection of craft beers. Conveniently located in Yaletown.
Yes, I am a visitor but have tried several beers across Canada and many others had better quality beer including other local breweries, I'm afraid.
Hands down, the best wings I have ever had. Tons of brews on tap, and huge spacious interior with all the tv's to watch your sport on. Go for the wings, stay for the beer.
This place was large, inviting , and I really wanted it to be enjoyable. But, because it was a brewery, and I was there to enjoy a delicious glass of their beer, I was super disappointed when I drank some. And, I tried 3 different...More
Located in the Yaletown area of Vancouver, the brewery was located in one of the old brick buildings in the area. We put our name in for a seat when we got there. Because of some strange ( to us) rules, they said we could...More
Pretty expensive for what you get but food was decent nonetheless. The patio seating is great, and they were accommodating of our large party. The hosts, Karen, Karen, Izzy and Stella were all so friendly and welcoming on a busy Friday night, we can’t wait...More
This brewery is located in a section of Vancouver that has lots of bars and restaurants. This brewery has many seating options - main dining, bar area, couches and chairs, and outside patio seating. It was raining lightly so we sat inside in the bar....More
We ordered through a delivery service and the food was excellent. You could tell it was all made fresh.
We booked with reservations and were seated at a table immediately beside the door to the patio. The strong cold wind blowing in us from the patio was great for mitigating COVID but not all that enjoyable for a dining experience. When four other tables...More
Great place for happy hour. They have indoors and outdoors sitting. The outdoors sittings are enclosed to protect from rain and cold. Grrat selection of beers and food.
I've been here 3 times within 3 weeks. Ask to have those chicken wings deepfried with salt and pepper. The sauces on the side. YUMMY!! The local beer for me is the best! What truly, however, tastes everything better, is the amazing service by Meghan....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710749-Reviews-Yaletown_Brewing_Co-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yamato Sushi,"Excellent Food🙏Excellent Service ❤️‍🔥I have never been disappointed regarding quality, timing of pickup orders or staff service. I highly recommend this take out Restaurant.
Horrible first impression. I recently ordered from this location through Uber Eats for myself and a friend who is celiac. We called ahead to verify what was gluten-free and went ahead with our order, also making notes on the order describing the allergy. Upon arrival,...More
Both take out and eat in are great options. Inexpensive and great quality. Best sushi in downtown Vancouver!
Beware of peak time - place is very small with high take away traffic and they can easily miss your order and forgot about you.
This place is tiny and seems to cater to the young, urban crowd. A significant percentage of the clientele appear to order by phone for take-out. We didn't; instead we walked over from our hotel and sat inside. The ambience is funky, eclectic, hole-in-the-wall. The...More
The restaurant is small, but I had good service. I had one of the sushi specials and it was delicious. It came with a bowl of miso soup and a side salad with ginger dressing. The prices are ok. When I was there they only...More
I’ve had sushi at lots of places but by far this one beats it all . Located in downtown Vancouver it’s a small shop with hardly place to sit , but is this place busy , the queue doesn’t break so takeout is the best...More
We received a recommendation for this place from a local worker at Granville Island so we decided to check it out. Good thing we did! Ordered the mixed sashimi (9/10), the sockeye salmon salmon sashimi (9/10), the salmon belly aburi, salmon roll, and aburi scallop...More
I am a long time fan of Yamato, there are plenty of very good Javanese restaurants here, but this is an underrated experience, in my opinion. The quality of the food and fish is fantastic, everything arrives to the table warmly, and the waiters are...More
I ordered one of the Box sets with teriyaki chicken. Everything seemed alright until I had a mouthful of the rice under the teriyaki chicken. It was as if I filled my mouth with chemicals and it actually started burning hw inside of my mouth....More
Good service, small place, the rolls were ok in taste but for me to big in size, every roll was a great effort to chew without choking, so because of that i couldn't enjoy the flavour.
Small place wirh smiless staff.Food ok but not oh-oh! Good for grabbin your take away meal . Then go!
omg! i lived in YALETOWN for a while and i loooved YAMATO! the place is just small, but the rolls are amazing ! the bento BOX is the best , you get the best of both world <3
Once and twice wasn’t enough, I had to head back here three times in my 10 day stay in downtown Vancouver. Tasting a wide selection of sushi off the menu, all of it was exceptionally good value. It’s a small space and it can get...More
The title says it all. Portions are large, plan to carry back for next meal or better still order to share with friends and family. Had the Bento Box and Sushi Plater- cant wait to go back",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d2229488-Reviews-Yamato_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yanaki Sushi,"We ordered takeout from our go to local sushi restaurant. My wife had her regular dishes Beef Yakisoba, chicken karage with Miso. I ordered a Sashimi bento box which I have not ordered. It was quite tasty, yummy and delicious.
Local sushi place doesn't disappoint. We ordered some different food items Ebi Gyoza for my wife, she enjoyed. Vegetable Ramen with Noodles for me, very tasty, delicious and yummy. My wife also ordered the Beef short ribs with a side of California roll, sushi rice...More
We did take out on a rainy Saturday night. My wife ordered her go to Chicken Karage which she enjoys. But she changed it up and ordered the Beef Yaki Udon which she did not enjoy as much. Not very flavorful. I ordered 3 different...More
We ordered alot of takeout food to have leftovers. My wife had chicken karage, beef yakisoba. Both very good. We split gomae, okonomiyaki, veggie sunomono and yam tempura. Nicely prepared and fresh. I ordered the Sunny Roll and spicy salmon both excellent.
We had our typical order. My wife had Yakisoba Beef l and Chicken Karage. She likes them both and they were very good. I had Salmon and TUNA don with rice, gomae, and sweet potato roll. All were tasty, fresh and prepared well.
We ordered takeout from our local Sushi restaurant. My wife had Chicken Karage, Beef Yakisoba and Veggie Tempura Roll. All tasty and delicious. I had Veggie Ramen, Aloha roll, Veggie Salmon roll, Sunny roll and Spinach Gomae. My dishes were nicely prepared and were yummy...More
We have been going into Yanaki since we moved into the area. it never disappoints. Friendly service. My wife continues to order the same. I mixed it up a bit. I had the Spicy Yanaki roll for the first time. otherwise the salmon and tuna...More
We had a great order of take out sushi from our local neighborhood joint. My wife jad chicken karage and beef yakisoba. Both were very good and tasty. I had gomae, yam tempura roll and spicy tuna and salmon rolls. Very good and fresh and...More
We went in after our 35 day road trip to our local sushi restaurant so we wouldn't have to start making dinner at home. We shared agedashi tofu, brocoli gomae which were both tasty and good. My wife had chicken teriyaki with brown rice and...More
i love everything on the menu, super fresh, quick service, pleasant staff it is now our local favorite
We had takeout from our local sushi joint. We ordered Chicken Karage, Yam Tempura, a few sushi rolls and agedashi tofu spicy and regular. All the food was good and the take out service was quick and efficient.
Stopped here on Canada day to escape the crowds on Granville Island. Had wanted to go to the Chinese Restaurant in this strip mall, but it was closed. Took a gamble on this place, and found it to be a very acceptable alternative. Authentic Japanese,...More
We had take out from this local sushi joint. My wife had Bento box c and I had the Fish Bento and we shared a Salmon spicy roll and a Popeye roll. Good food.
We choosed this place because was close to our B&B but we were lucky. Very good sushi, few rice and more fish than expected. Free tea and free refill. Absolutely to recommend to everyone!
nice looking place, good atmosphere, friendly staff, good food, reasonable prices. I ordered the lunch special bento box B, and was treated to a complementary spring roll appetiser.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d940334-Reviews-Yanaki_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yasma,"The full experience of the mediterranean . Authentic , modern, chic from the moment i entered i was greeted warmly in the foyer by the lovely hostess . The design aesthetic upon entry was breathtaking. Adorned with a colour palette one would expect when visiting...More
I have never had Lebanese food before and am now an absolute fan. The servers were warm and welcoming. The food however stole the show. I thoroughly enjoyed every bite of everything I had. The Babba Ganouch was the best I have ever had, I...More
Yasma is one of the few places where you go and instantly feel like you are far away... in a place where every moment is shared between friends and family gathered around an a delicious dinner. Food looks like art at Yasma, and most of...More
If you have been lucky enough to have discovered Mediterranean food, then you’re probably healthier than the person sitting next to you. Yasma brings Lebanese food to Vancouver with style and great taste. Arab nations have eaten well and simply through many centuries, and Lebanon...More
The food is the star of the show at Yasma. We arrived without a reservation just before the dinner rush, and the staff was accommodating and found us a table. The service was slow, but once the food and drinks arrived, the. there are no...More
Disappointing experience at Yasma. Me and my husband chose to book a table at this restaurant due to its location and our love for Lebanese food. However it is very overpriced and the service we received was very bad. We waited 20 minutes to be...More
My friend Raegan and I ate at Yasma on June 14. Raegan said it was the best food she had ever tasted. Our server Rosa helped us select a wine, giving us tasters before we selected a bottle (we went with the Lebanese white -...More
Anyone who visits Vancouver and wants some really good food has to stop by at Yasma. All 4 of us loved it and went back again in 2 days. It was really that good. Mariam , thank you for being such a wonderful sport and...More
Decided to try Yama tonight. It’s been open about four months. I have to say if they continue to have people waiting ages just to get a drink, there time here in business will be short lived!, We got a table for two, got seated...More
Delicious food, wonderful knowledgeable helpful staff, gorgeous view, generous poured drinks…need I say more? Best Authentic Mediterranean food on this side of the planet!
Last night my husband and I had one of the best meals in Vancouver we've had for as long as I can remember! We didn't have a reservation and they were booked up, so we happily sat at the bar and Dora (I think this...More
The food is superb. Lots of choices for hot and cold mezze (appetizers) as well as entrees. The mezze will generally serve two people and have the complex flavours found only in the best of these types of restaurants. Dora is the kind of bartender...More",12,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23989551-Reviews-Yasma-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yohachi Sushi,"An impromptu visit to this restaurant that we went to years ago when we traveled here. Everyone enjoyed their meals. Good value. Great, attentive service. Would eat here again when in the area.
Very poor service and food quality has gone down the drain since the new management. Do not recommend.
This was one of my favourite, authentic Japanese restaurants on the North Shore (the other being Sansho). I went tonight to find that all the staff and the menu has changed. The menu now looks like what you’d find at almost any other non-authentic “Japanese”...More
Friendly and good service, great selection and excellent food... Salmon Poke and vegetarian bento box... Great prices. Highly recommended.
A little bit of Japanese heaven in North Van. Atmosphere, design and service are just perfect and then, of course there is the food. Wonderful dishes , fresh and fantastic value for money. Free parking at ICBC afte 6:00 a.m.
Japanese curry is a heavenly lunch with miso soup,,salad and tea for under $10. The service is sublime and one really feels a calming,smoothing atmosphere so reminiscient of Japan . It is still the best in Greater Vancoyver, free parking after 6 in ICBC parkade.
So good!!! So friendly!! We miss living nearby to this sushi restaurant- but whenever In the neighbourhood we often stop by for Suki Yaki!
This impromptu visit did not disappoint! From the authentic greeting; to the traditional service we were made welcome and more. The hits just cam coming! Tempura; Sushi; Karaage and curry... it was extraordinary.
The food is to die for. The decor is exquisite and authentic and the service is simply five star. One of my party had severe dietary restrictions and the servers checked that heat dye wanted could be suitable adapted. Japanese curry was superb as was...More
This is the best Japanese restaurant in the Lower Mainland hands down: atmosphere, service, food and price. Wide ranging menu to satisfy all tastes. Everything here is totally authentic and is to be savoy red and enjoyed. The tonkaksu for lunch is absolutely wonderful as...More
Came in at 1 pm for a quick tofu vegetable teriyaki - chose brown rice - it came with simple miso soup and good Japanese green tea. Left satisfied, food tasted good, felt well nourished. Calm, jazzy music was not too loud, very pleasant. Will...More
Walked by and we decided to try it. From the moment we got it we were greeted the Japanese way .... and indeed this was the prelude of a fantastic culinary adventure. We tried a variety of dishes and they were al delicious. Service was...More
After arriving later in the evening we were hungry and ready for sushi. This little restaurant has an inviting decor and menu to match. Everything is fresh and rich in flavor. Many house made specials such as the herring and spicy tuna both were outstanding....More
The scope of my review here is fairly limited. We ordered takeout, a mix of nigiri, rolls, and the pork tonkatsu. On first impression, I was actually a bit disappointed we weren't eating there. The restaurant is tastefully decorated, and the staff was very welcoming....More
Since I was on the North Shore, I wanted to try Yohachi Sushi. The decor eas very inviting. I sat at the sushi bar, as I usually do. Chef and owner Takumi Iwaki was an excellent host. I ordered Deluxe Assorted Sashimi and an oyster...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181717-d785762-Reviews-Yohachi_Sushi-North_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yolks,"In Vancity for medical appointments and staying at the Holiday Inn on the 700 block of West Broadway. An easy 2 block stroll west and across the street we found Yolks. Steady stream of customers in and out. Good service, good coffee and very good...More
In Vancity for medical appointments and staying at the Holiday Inn on the 700 block of West Broadway. An easy 2 block stroll west and across the street we found Yolks. Steady stream of customers in and out. Good service, good coffee and very good...More
It was a wait for brunch so do recommend booking - delicious food! We especially enjoyed the pancakes and orange juice. A nice, enjoyable atmosphere too.
It was a wait for brunch so do recommend booking - delicious food! We especially enjoyed the pancakes and orange juice. A nice, enjoyable atmosphere too.
Really good selection of breakfast, it took us awhile to choose! I didn't catch the server's name but she was so nice and suggested a few things in the menu that we all loved. We have a few more days left in vancouver and we...More
Really good selection of breakfast, it took us awhile to choose! I didn't catch the server's name but she was so nice and suggested a few things in the menu that we all loved. We have a few more days left in vancouver and we...More
Lisa went above and beyond to make us feel welcome and comfortable throughout our visit, without being intrusive. We observed regular cleaning of surfaces and other COVID-safe measures, which was reassuring. (This included requiring our proof of vaccination before we could sit at the outdoor,...More
Lisa went above and beyond to make us feel welcome and comfortable throughout our visit, without being intrusive. We observed regular cleaning of surfaces and other COVID-safe measures, which was reassuring. (This included requiring our proof of vaccination before we could sit at the outdoor,...More
I'm an Egg Benny junkie. I have been lucky to try eggs benny's everywhere during my travels. I've eaten at Mama's in San Fran to Cinnamons in Kailua Hawaii with Kalua Pork to Sarabeth's in Central Park . We were here at Yolks on Broadway...More
I'm an Egg Benny junkie. I have been lucky to try eggs benny's everywhere during my travels. I've eaten at Mama's in San Fran to Cinnamons in Kailua Hawaii with Kalua Pork to Sarabeth's in Central Park . We were here at Yolks on Broadway...More
We ordered the ham bennie and the brie and asparagus bennie. Eggs were nicely poached and the side potatoes were not starchy at all. The cheese bechamel sauce was subtle and delicious. The hollandaise sauce had a kick of grainy mustard that really added to...More
We ordered the ham bennie and the brie and asparagus bennie. Eggs were nicely poached and the side potatoes were not starchy at all. The cheese bechamel sauce was subtle and delicious. The hollandaise sauce had a kick of grainy mustard that really added to...More
Yolks proved to be an awesome surprise. I came here for brunch with my grandparents prior to my grandfather’s appointment at a nearby medical facility. They’d been here a couple of months prior and raved about it. Admittedly, I was a bit skeptical because –...More
Yolks proved to be an awesome surprise. I came here for brunch with my grandparents prior to my grandfather’s appointment at a nearby medical facility. They’d been here a couple of months prior and raved about it. Admittedly, I was a bit skeptical because –...More
Best Eggs Benedict with perfectly cooked eggs. Weekends are very busy but worth the wait. Staff gave great service even though they were busy.
Best Eggs Benedict with perfectly cooked eggs. Weekends are very busy but worth the wait. Staff gave great service even though they were busy.
I went to this location to meet a friend for breakfast recently. I arrived about 5 minutes before my friend and went inside to get a table. It was still early in the morning so the restaurant was primarily vacant, with far more open tables...More
I went to this location to meet a friend for breakfast recently. I arrived about 5 minutes before my friend and went inside to get a table. It was still early in the morning so the restaurant was primarily vacant, with far more open tables...More
So good. Just don’t go on the weekend unless prepared for a long wait. Everything on the menu is good. Lots of bennies. Staff happy and you can tell proud of what they are serving you.
So good. Just don’t go on the weekend unless prepared for a long wait. Everything on the menu is good. Lots of bennies. Staff happy and you can tell proud of what they are serving you.
It was busy on a Sunday morning but to reduce the wait I was able to get on the wait list while on our way. The few minutes wait outside, because the entry is small, for the meal, great services, and warm atmosphere to follow...More
It was busy on a Sunday morning but to reduce the wait I was able to get on the wait list while on our way. The few minutes wait outside, because the entry is small, for the meal, great services, and warm atmosphere to follow...More
Glad you enjoyed your Yolks experience FunkyWanderer! And also great to hear you took advantage of our Waitlist App to mitigate your wait time!
Glad you enjoyed your Yolks experience FunkyWanderer! And also great to hear you took advantage of our Waitlist App to mitigate your wait time!
We found this highly rated breakfast place near our hotel so we thought we'd try it. It was very good except I prefer that my eggs be cooked a little more (be less runny). Overall, very good. Looks like a place where a lot of...More
We found this highly rated breakfast place near our hotel so we thought we'd try it. It was very good except I prefer that my eggs be cooked a little more (be less runny). Overall, very good. Looks like a place where a lot of...More
This place is so good that even my partner who's allergic to EGG loved it! Food is phenomenal. Be prepared to queue, but it's worth it!
This place is so good that even my partner who's allergic to EGG loved it! Food is phenomenal. Be prepared to queue, but it's worth it!
We went there with my family. It was great. Very good options for kids. Excellent service. Very nice people. Food excellent. Fast service. We had to wait for 30 minutes for seating as it was full but it was totally worth the wait.
We went there with my family. It was great. Very good options for kids. Excellent service. Very nice people. Food excellent. Fast service. We had to wait for 30 minutes for seating as it was full but it was totally worth the wait.
The atmosphere was pretty loud, and the food was slow to come. The plating was pretty decent, but the hollandaise had a bit of a weird texture once it cooled down. That didn't take long because the food didn't come very hot.
The atmosphere was pretty loud, and the food was slow to come. The plating was pretty decent, but the hollandaise had a bit of a weird texture once it cooled down. That didn't take long because the food didn't come very hot.
I ordered smoke ham eggs Benedict . When the meal arrived it was cold . They immediately brought me a new meal. They never asked if I wanted a refill of my coffee . Also very expensive for the poor quality ! I will not...More
I ordered smoke ham eggs Benedict . When the meal arrived it was cold . They immediately brought me a new meal. They never asked if I wanted a refill of my coffee . Also very expensive for the poor quality ! I will not...More
Best breakfast food is very special with awesome creative best ingredients simplify but gourmet in every detail spinach soft yolk meat cooked and seasoned to perfection always freshly squeezed orange juice on frozen glasses the bernaies sauce is perfect, great coffee quality haven’t tried espresso...More
Best breakfast food is very special with awesome creative best ingredients simplify but gourmet in every detail spinach soft yolk meat cooked and seasoned to perfection always freshly squeezed orange juice on frozen glasses the bernaies sauce is perfect, great coffee quality haven’t tried espresso...More
Fresh breakfast, cooked to order. Amazing Eggs Benedict with creative ingredients. Good size portions, eggs poached to perfection. Waffles are light and fluffy. Great spot for the whole family.
Fresh breakfast, cooked to order. Amazing Eggs Benedict with creative ingredients. Good size portions, eggs poached to perfection. Waffles are light and fluffy. Great spot for the whole family.
Yolks is a very popular breakfast place in Vancouver. A friend and I ordered the jerk chicken and eggs benedict and both of us experienced stomach problem afterwards, which means jerk chicken and hollandaise sauce do not go well together.
Yolks is a very popular breakfast place in Vancouver. A friend and I ordered the jerk chicken and eggs benedict and both of us experienced stomach problem afterwards, which means jerk chicken and hollandaise sauce do not go well together.
The hostess is not very smart. We don't think she knows how to seat people. We have a group of 4 people. We could have gotten our table much earlier if she asked if we would be willing to sit side by side or split...More
The hostess is not very smart. We don't think she knows how to seat people. We have a group of 4 people. We could have gotten our table much earlier if she asked if we would be willing to sit side by side or split...More
A 2.5 place Yolks has potential but really misses on customer service which is basically deliver menus - take orders and give bill is a slow lackadaisical inattentive manner. As I am (sadly) becoming the Ahab of crispy bacon I was again disappointed to get...More
A 2.5 place Yolks has potential but really misses on customer service which is basically deliver menus - take orders and give bill is a slow lackadaisical inattentive manner. As I am (sadly) becoming the Ahab of crispy bacon I was again disappointed to get...More
Jakey my son and I went for a cruise to his fave skate shop ‘“Landyachtz” on the way back we were hungry . Naturally I search on trip advisor and found yolks. Although the hours said until 4:00. When we arrived it was 2:54 and...More
Jakey my son and I went for a cruise to his fave skate shop ‘“Landyachtz” on the way back we were hungry . Naturally I search on trip advisor and found yolks. Although the hours said until 4:00. When we arrived it was 2:54 and...More
I went in for their famous eggs benny. I am one of those strange people that like their eggs scrambled which they refused to substitute. They said the way the chef plates the meal they can't use scrambled. Now I may not be a red...More
I went in for their famous eggs benny. I am one of those strange people that like their eggs scrambled which they refused to substitute. They said the way the chef plates the meal they can't use scrambled. Now I may not be a red...More
Today my mother and I went in for breakfast. We got seated by the waitress. After 15 minutes nobody came over to give us the menu, ask for coffee or even water. We politely waited during this time and hoped the waitress would come over...More
Today my mother and I went in for breakfast. We got seated by the waitress. After 15 minutes nobody came over to give us the menu, ask for coffee or even water. We politely waited during this time and hoped the waitress would come over...More
Thought it would be a nice lunch treat for my daughter and I to eat out for a change. Firstly, they don’t brew decaf drip, strange as they are a breakfast brunch restaurant. Forced to order an decaf Americano which can not be topped up....More
Thought it would be a nice lunch treat for my daughter and I to eat out for a change. Firstly, they don’t brew decaf drip, strange as they are a breakfast brunch restaurant. Forced to order an decaf Americano which can not be topped up....More
A favourite stop on trips to Vancouver. If going on a weekend, recommend getting there by 9AM - you’ll be seated by 9:30 latest. Otherwise, it’s worth the wait if you arrive and there’s a line Lemon Truffle hash browns are sooo good - eggs...More
A favourite stop on trips to Vancouver. If going on a weekend, recommend getting there by 9AM - you’ll be seated by 9:30 latest. Otherwise, it’s worth the wait if you arrive and there’s a line Lemon Truffle hash browns are sooo good - eggs...More
Thanks so much for the great review Melanie_423! We're so happy you enjoyed the Yolks experience. FYI we've addressed the line ups with a waiting list app. Simply Google your desired location (yolks broadway or yolks hastings) and click on JOIN WAITING LIST. You and...More
Thanks so much for the great review Melanie_423! We're so happy you enjoyed the Yolks experience. FYI we've addressed the line ups with a waiting list app. Simply Google your desired location (yolks broadway or yolks hastings) and click on JOIN WAITING LIST. You and...More
We went for breakfast and and menu provided many mouth watering options which were also delicious to actually eat. Decor in the restaurant was lovely too. Our server did a good job with the basics or taking our order, getting it in correctly, delivering us...More
We went for breakfast and and menu provided many mouth watering options which were also delicious to actually eat. Decor in the restaurant was lovely too. Our server did a good job with the basics or taking our order, getting it in correctly, delivering us...More
Although I can’t say there is a signature dish that made the experience... This is a place where you can have food with all the high quality, fresh ingredients which makes it unique and worths an average of 45mins in the line. Have I ever...More
Although I can’t say there is a signature dish that made the experience... This is a place where you can have food with all the high quality, fresh ingredients which makes it unique and worths an average of 45mins in the line. Have I ever...More
Breakfast/brunch was to die for. When the first, second and third bite have you closing your eyes, you know you have been to Foody heaven and back. The orange juice is a must have, absolute sunshine. The pancakes melt in your mouth, the Benedict's were...More
Breakfast/brunch was to die for. When the first, second and third bite have you closing your eyes, you know you have been to Foody heaven and back. The orange juice is a must have, absolute sunshine. The pancakes melt in your mouth, the Benedict's were...More
I wanted to take my husband out for a nice 40th birthday brunch with the family. It turned out to be a disappointing experience. We decided on Yolks since we've had great experiences in the past at the Broadway location. We picked the Hastings location...More
I wanted to take my husband out for a nice 40th birthday brunch with the family. It turned out to be a disappointing experience. We decided on Yolks since we've had great experiences in the past at the Broadway location. We picked the Hastings location...More",64,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d10700709-Reviews-Yolks-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yu Shang Hot Pot,"We had such a great time here, never having had the hot pot experience before. I tried all kinds of new things and it was just such great fun. Lovely drinks too - the mango frozen cocktail was just wonderful. A great night out!
Surprised my business partner invited us for dinner at the Yu Shang Hot Pot , the place very modern and creative concept love the entrance door , they been in business since 2018 , beautiful ambiance , lot of good reviews from TripAdvisor , you...More
I really loved this place and its not even a vegan restaurant. I would definitely come back here if I ever returned to Vancouver. A beautiful restaurant. with great vegan choices which you cook yourself in boiling water then garnish with an amazing range of...More
Excellent service began from being greeted at the door with our reservations, (you need reservations here!) to sitting down and polite servers and quick service to take empty plates away while eating....so hard to have a place where there are actually a lot of servers...More
My new favorite hotpot place in Vancouver! Was so excited to try this place after seeing pictures posted from others. I loved everything about it so here are my thoughts: food: - great selection of veggies, meats and sides - AAA and wagyu available! -...More
This place is the best hot pot that I have had in Vancouver. The individual hot pots were a good step for persons who have food restrictions. As suggested by a previous reviewer, we had the buns and condensed milk. We ordered the whole range...More
Seven of us work colleagues decided to come here based on a recommendation. We were so full and did not finish. You have your own hot pot and best to share the dishes to sample a variety. Small charge to create your sauce base-big selection,...More
YuShang Hotpot is a relatively new hotpot place that opened up on West Broadway (near Oak) in Vancouver. The interior is fairly clean and spacious and has a generous condiment station set up near the front of the restaurant. YuShang is setup for individual hotpots...More",8,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d15272348-Reviews-Yu_Shang_Hot_Pot-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yu Xiang Yuan Restaurant,"This is the one of the best and inexpensive Northern hand make noodle in Vancouver ,,if you looking fancy five stars noodle house it is not for you ,place not very big ,but cozy , safety plan so so ,but it's clean , family run...More
Large family gathering for dinner. Food was excellent. Big portions at a very reasonable price. You can watch them make homemade noodles. Huge menu. Makes it hard to decide what to have. But something for everyone. Busy at night. So probably need reservations.
We enjoyed our noodle soup with lamb & vegetables and picked stewed noodles from 5 noodle choices.  The noodles were cooked just right.  We also had the chicken in special hot sauce along with pork and chive dumplings.  It was just enough food to fill...More
This is a step up from the usual hole in the wall Chinese comfort food - mainly because the noodles are hand made and oh so fresh since they are made right before your eyes. I make my own pasta at home, the Italian way,...More
Very disappointed with my four dishes from this “authentic Chinese restaurant “ bland and sweet. No spice and look absolutely nothing like the pictures on the website.
- Chinese northern food of Sichuan with specialty of different types of handmade noodles - Place has 2 long tables and 8-9 small tables - As with most restaurants in Vancouver, menu has both English and Chinese and this one, pictures of different types noodles...More
This place feels quite authentic. The noodles are fantastic. All of the dumplings I have tried are also delicious.
We have eaten at this noodle house 4 times now. Great freshly made noodles. Regular dishes for us, such as the diced chicken and peanuts, are consistently good. Pan Fried dumplings are a must! Great prices. Staff can be a bit inattentive but nothing too...More
Several friends had commented about the fabulous hand made noodles at the Yu Xiang Yuan Restaurants so we finally made the effort to make the trek to Fraser Street. We ordered the seafood noodles and the won ton, both were delicious. The best part was...More
A friend brought us over. He had only done takeaway before. Food was amazing. Very tasty and spiced just right. You have got to try the beef roll. We also had spicy squid, eggplant, lamb with cumin, and pan fried pork dumplings. All were excellent....More
Fresh is the key word here. Chef that absolutely knows what he's doing, along with preparing everything from scratch in a glass cooking station makes a winning combination of great tasting food. We tried two new entrees and a serving of noodles that were as...More
Been coming here for a few years, about once a month. I typically order the Lamb Stew Noodle, probably the best of its kind in Vancouver. The beef roll and dumplings are also good. For me their other noodle dishes just don't compare with the...More
I go to Yu Xiang Yuan Restaurant once a while for only one reason, the noodle - fresh, hand-crafted noodle, great taste compare with the dry noodle and bagged noodle purchased from retail stores. If you want to get true ""food"", true noodle, this is...More
When a Chinese restaurant is full of Chinese people, it's a good sign! This place is quite popular, & most likely due to the variety of handmade noddles - which you can watch being crafted through the kitchen window. The menu is extensive, & the...More
This humble little family run restaurant, nestled in south east Vancouver, serves amazingly delicious northern Chinese dishes. The specialty is noodles, handmade fresh from the back kitchen, served in a multiple of dishes. Part of the experience is to watch the noodle maker in action...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4783840-Reviews-Yu_Xiang_Yuan_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yue Restaurant,"With the current pandemic , lot of Chinese restaurants either closed for good or struggling to stay afloat ,but Yue on Alexandra road the management and owner done a great job by providing quality of the food and services , safe guidelines for Covid 19...More
Jan. 7, 2021 My friend and I finally got together and went for dimsum at the famous YUE Restaurant. This place is well known to the people who lives in the States. Most of the positive comments were written by people who made sure to...More
We stopped in for a light dinner the evening before an early flight. The dishes were expertly prepared and presented and so different from anything we have tried before. We will dine there again and heartily recommend it to friends.
We had a great dim sum lunch here — service was prompt, menu was enticing, and the food was fantastic. I have had dim sum all over the world (including many times in China) and this ranks with the best.
Large tables and “lazy Susan” for family style meals. No dim sum at dinner which was a bummer as that’s what we were looking to eat. The meals we ordered were very good though and the waiter helped a bunch. The kids were offered silverware...More
We were a group of 24 people all for dimsum and were happy with the service and the seafood items. All the seafood items and vegetables were excellent. The only reason i dont rate 5 was because the shrimp noodle rolls and the were all...More
The ""General Cross Bridge Pork Rib"" is a must try, very tasty and has a WOW factor in presentation, limited supply every night, must go early if wanted. Other items on the menu also very good, not cheap. Attentive service, should try
Everything on the menu is excellent. Very good service. It is a bit loud as it is always full of customers. I strongly recommend you visit.
Yue restaurant had been open their doors for a while in Richmond ,and relocated in 2017 to this location , this restaurant become one of the top Dim Sum restaurant in Richmond ! I am lucky got invite to one of my best friends retirement...More
We were very fortunate to get a table for 6 of us during a mid-week lunch without booking ahead. The food was just incredible, and the service was very fast efficient and helpful too at explains the menu and the process for ordering. I'll certainly...More
Had no trouble booking reservation although had to wait 15mins when arrived due to busyness. English menu given and marked on Chinese menu by number. Servers all very polite and friendly and attentive. Special shout out for Aaron who went out of his way to...More
Weekends are made for dim sum (guess it’s the Chinese equivalent of brunch). We decided to check out Yue Restaurant in mid-August. This well-appointed restaurant is located in a little mini mall in Richmond and has a couple of private rooms in the back. Prices...More
The restaurant is located just opposite my hotel the food is amazing Marco Yuen and his team are real hosts I ask for sparkling mineral water and they send someone to get it it is a must in Vancouver
We ordered a pork sparerib dish named 'General crossing bridge rib' and it is very tasty and the presentation is a WOW, not cheap at $78.95 per order, it is a good portion for 4 or more
By far this is one of the best Chinese restaurants in Richmond. Opened a little over a year ago, my family have been patronizing this restaurants and have invited friends to join us a few times. We go there mostly for dim sum and time...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d12917985-Reviews-Yue_Restaurant-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
Yugo Restaurant,"The restaurant is highly rated. I can’t really rate the food as my party of 4 showed up for our 2 reservation and were told that the kitchen closes at 2:00. Made a reservation on Open Table for a friend’s birthday party which was included...More
We were here for a birthday celebration. We make a reservation but we’re late. They kept our reservation. Nice ambience and great service. We had beef ribs, Uni sashimi, house bento, foie gras Don, chirashi, pork neck, black cod. All were wonderful. Top mark for...More
We had kind, attentive service, and truly delicious food. We would go back in a heartbeat. Highlights were the tuna tataki and the beef pasta. Thank you for a great evening!
We had an amazing time here at Restaurant Yugo. The food is absolutely delicious and the service was unreal. We wanted to try so many things but could only eat so much. We definitely will be back again! The salmon sashimi, wagyu aburi and salmon...More
Loved this place. Food was great. Had carpaccio, Shabu shabu salad, and something with square rice cubes and salmon on top. Also Saki and Black sesame ice cream. All tasty, beautifully presented and timely - we didn’t have to wait too long.
Yugo has a nice atmosphere inside. They have comfy booths that are great for date nights or dinner with friends. All the dishes were nicely presented. Personally I think the most outstanding dish was the oyster mushroom tempura. Other dishes were also very solid. Portions...More
Monday night with a group of 6 - excellent, friendly service. First time there & food was great! Will go again.
We discovered Yugo during last year’s Dineout and we’ve been coming come here since then. Happy they participated again to taste more of their beautiful dishes. We started off with their beef tarta. Beautiful seasoned and the taro chips offered a satisfying crunch. The other...More
Friday night Dine Out Vancouver 2020 dinner! Reservations required it was a full house. The restaurant is beautiful: contemporary and clean. The staff was super attentive considering it was a busy evening. We ordered: Appetizer: - beef tar tar with taro chips: this is by...More
This place offers fusion Japanese food - risotto, pasta, box sushi... Everything taste good. Price was reasonable. Worth to give it a try.
We found this restaurant listed as one of the top 10 Japanese restaurants in Vancouver Canada. We arrived and was quickly greeted and seated. Recommended us the Hamachi and King Salmon sashimi was very fresh. Portions are huge! Started with sashimi, hot seafood miso soup...More
Outstanding service, quality of food, friendly staff and delicious drinks. Love this place! Sit at the bar and meet the chef’s!
We went here to celebrate a birthday and really enjoyed it. Simple but interesting interior. Smaller place with good service. The food was very well presented and very tasty with innovative flavours. It is culinary so portions are not big but the flavours are very...More
The sashimi was excellent, fresh and high quality with great presentation as was the gomae. Very courteous and helpful staff. Closed after lunch but did not rush me out and even topped up my tea again!
Great abi. Uni pasta is excellent; fresh, tasty. Toro with garlic. It’s slightly expensive by Vancouver standard but I think it’s ok. All fresh ! Service is good.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d14109739-Reviews-Yugo_Restaurant-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yuji's Japanese Tapas,"Enjoyed all three dishes immensely. The eggplant with mozzarella was a favourite but everything was delicious. Washed down with asahi beer. Perfect for our first night in Vancouver.
We had several courses here the other night....salmon, albacore, scallops, blue fin, duck...each was delicious, fresh and served with expertise. The flavours are subtle and work together. Small plates. Great with a bit of saki and dri dark Ahi beer. Came away feeling satisfied and...More
Although the restaurant is small, it is mighty. I recommend reservations as the seating is limited. I ate at the counter and loved watching the chefs at work.
We stopped by one evening looking for a last minute sushi dinner. We enjoyed every bite from Yuji's. The staff genuinely care about their food and the customer experience. Everything we had was delicious and fresh (mix of rolls and sashimi). The kobachi platter was...More
Yuji’s is easily one of the best sushi restaurants in Vancouver. It’s always a joy to be taken care of by the fantastic staff while Yuji is always smiling and creating incredible sushi.
I have been a satisfied customer since Yuji had his place on 4th Ave and have never been disappointed with anything. Superb food and wonderful service!
This is my 3 times in the last 3 years. It is a very small Restaurant and one of my sister-in-law (from Vancouver) favorites. Everything is fresh and extremely good. From the Kalamari salad (refreshing) to the Seafood tempura. I would definitively recommend!
We had a watercress salad, truly the size of a mouthful. Toro sashimi and red eye tuna sashimi---each portion was 5 thin pieces of 11/2"" long on shaved daikon, tiny dab of wasabi made from the powder kind. Server suggested an avocado, fake crab meat...More
I love Yuji's! I've been three times and the food is always consistently fresh and delicious, the staff are also very nice. The restaurant is small and very popular so I always make a reservation and go early. FYI if you are local they do...More
Very authentic and expertly prepared Japanese cuisine. All the sashimi was superb and the hit dishes were outstanding. Service is very attentive and friendly. Will definitely return.
We have been here several times. Although the food is expensive, the quality is clearly there. Excellent creative dishes. The tofu is excellent.
This was some of the best sushi I've had. It was all very fresh and carefully made. The atmosphere is very non-assuming and the service very attentive. My friend I dined with is vegetarian and she found many things on the menu and said it...More
I came in to town and offered to take my Canadian family and friends out for dinner. They were so excited to take me to Yuji's. The restaurant is petite and in Japenese tradition sparse. We had the $50 per person multi course dinner. So...More
There were many Japanese guests here the night we were in, and it's a testament to the authenticity of the food here. Distinctly more ""Japanese"" than your typical sushi restaurant, which all seem to have the same westernized sushi (California roll, BC roll, for instance)....More
This was our third attempt to dine at Yuji's. They were booked up the previous two times. Lucky to sit at the sushi bar. We both went with the Omakase Course and agreed it was the closest we had experienced to kaiseki in Kyoto. Five...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d710789-Reviews-Yuji_s_Japanese_Tapas-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Yuwa Japanese Cuisine,"I have no complaints about the service, the ambience and the menu. My complaint is particularly about one dish, the sablefish. The description on the menu, for $27, is the following: ""grilled BC sablefish, 24-hour marinated in yuzu citrus soy sauce, sweet soy simmered kabocha...More
We did take out sushi and it was authentic and delicious. In particular, the kanpachi (amberjack) was good. They had gluten free soy sauce. They have outside seating too.
Amazing patio, amazing service, amazing food. Can’t wait to go back! Chill vibe with so much yummy food. My kid loved the fiddleheads tempura.
This Restaurant has all the elements that are necessary and required for a fabulous evening out to a very quality experience.. each item that we ordered was exceptional, very delicious and of the height quality…upon entering the restaurant one knows that from the server to...More
We decided to go her for a special occasion dinner. We haven't had a lot of fine dining experiences in the last 18 months, so this dinner felt that much more special. We had made reservations online a few days earlier. We arrived right at...More
This Restaurant’s focus on traditional Japanese style of dining and on featuring local and seasonal ingredients met and exceeded our expectations..we really appreciated the authentic welcoming from the servers and the attention the kitchen staff demonstrated in each dish that we ordered..It is a pure...More
During the COVID epidemic, most restaurants have a fairly limited take-out menu. So happy that our absolute favorite Vancouver restaurant, Yuwa, has a big variety. The food is of course made to order and tonight was as wonderful and fresh as we have always had...More
Did you ever go for dinner somewhere and receive a completely different experience on separate occasions? That’s how I felt about Yuwa Japanese Cuisine. This place had been on my wish list for a long time but because they only open for dinner service and...More
Went with friends to this sushi restaurant. Service was good but food was somewhat tasteless. Only good dish was tofu. The sushi was fair.
What a great team at Yuwa. My friend has very specific dietary requirements and the staff were meticulous in their follow up to ensure she was safe. Very attentive staff. Outstanding in fact. The choices are amazing - so many things to choose from -...More
Amazing food at yuwa. We had the Chef's sashimi selection, chicken meatballs, stewed daikon with hamachi, goma ae and the Lobster roll. All looked and tasted amazing. Worth the price. We also had the Saki tasting flights which were cool and gave a sampling of...More
From the sushi to the wagyu beef, this place has the food and service down to a science. Reservations are for two hours only, so make sure you have an idea of what you want to order. With white table cloths and excellent options of...More
We had a great business dinner at this Japanese restaurant. The sashimi was some of the best I have ever had. And all of the rolls we had were top notch. The best thing is that it was a relatively reasonably priced meal. This restaurant...More
Dining at Yuwa for the first time was both an enjoyable and memorable culinary experience accompanied by first-rate servicing. The establishment serves up brilliantly creative and outstanding Japanese cuisine in a fine dining environment albeit in small portions with a costly price tag. With that...More
As always the food and presentation at Yuwa are outstanding and the knowledgeable and friendly staff make the meal special. The freshest sashimi and sushi are the norm here. The specials and small plates reflect an authentic Japanese experience. We had the zucchini blossoms stuffed...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d13319729-Reviews-Yuwa_Japanese_Cuisine-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Zakkushi Charcoal Grill Diner Denman,"I always wanted to eat here and I finally got my chance recently. I went on my own this past week. It was busy, but I got my own small table in no time on a Wednesday. Tons of friendly staff so I thought service...More
If you like Yakitori then must try this place. Small little place much like in Japan. Very basic but nice decor. There's lots to choose from the menu. We tried almost everything from chicken gizzard, beef tongue to Wagu and Lamb. All was very tasty....More
Stopped n for some skewers on rice and was delighted with their offerings. Served hot off the grill - beef, chicken, lamb or seafood. Delicious and fast. This place may be small but the food value is impressive and tasty.
I visited this restaurant during my vacation to Vancouver with my Canadian friend. As he recommended, the yakitori -Japanese grilled skewers- were amazing! I was so impressed with the variety and the taste of yakitori. Their service was also nice and smiley. I love them!...More
Delicious delicious meat skewers! Also their Oden, the Dealken Raddish cooked in fish broth is heavenly delicious. Their beer and sake selection is also good
We order pretty much all the skewers on the menu. Portion was small for what they are charged for, and the seasoning was completely off (either too salty or bland), not to mention some of them were already semi-cold when they arrived. The food came...More
We go to Vancouver at least once a year and whenever possible , we make a point of experiencing Zakkushis. Love to try the unique and different menu items, so fresh, so succulent. Add a little saki and the evening is made.
Where I live, we don't have much of this type of informal Japanese yakitori eatery, so I was very happy to find a branch of Zakkushi near my hotel. It was the perfect place to dine out solo. The place was very crowded on a...More
Excellent food, but with prices to reflect that. Otherwise top rating for sure. $122+ before tips for pictured in the photos. Left feeling only a bit full. Leaves room for dessert I guess.
After reading the reviews, my wife and I checked it out in July, and it did not disappoint. The service, atmosphere and food were all very good, and I would not hesitate to return. The atmosphere feels authentic, and it’s a fun place to grab...More
Good service. The premium set was well prepared and I thought it tasted like quality cuts. Lightly seasoned, so I would have liked a dipping sauce but it was good without it. Karaage came out hot and crispy. I would have liked a side of...More
Excellent izakaya restaurant specializing in grilled skewers of meat. Excellent service. Takes reservations.
Make reservations before going because the capacity is pretty small and the volume of patrons are large. Order a lot of different skewers that they fresh grill on the spot, and also Izakaya type dishes. All the dishes are well prepared and you can tell...More
Their food used to be good and fresh. However, the last couple times I went there, food tends to be over-salted. They used to have a risotto that I like a lot, which is no longer on the menu However, other foods are still in...More
This is a small Japanese restaurant with very limited seating and almost no ambience. However, the food is amazing, if you pick the right dishes. We ordered 36 skewers (nine different types and ended up ordering more. It is not because of the small size...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d809427-Reviews-Zakkushi_Charcoal_Grill_Diner_Denman-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Zakkushi Dining on Main,"enjoyed most of our meal here on our visit. stylish light filled space. very attentive service but a bit lacking in knowledge when asked about items. menu full of japanese style tapas and yakitori-grilled meat or vegetables on skewers. it was our plan to choose...More
Full marks for the atmosphere, charcoal grill chefs, service, and quality of food. The only problem is parking. We usually arrive at a very early time. However, if parking is not available when we arrive late, we park across the street at the meters. There...More
Everything is absolutely delicious. Wonderful service. Feels like you're in Japan. The decor is so welcoming, comfortable, and intimate. I'm going to make this place our date place.
I really hope Zakkushi will work on providing better service because I love the food here. I used to eat here very often but due to the service recently friends have been recommending other places. Last week I celebrated my birthday here with a big...More
I’ve been to the other Zakkushi in Downtown vancouver and this one is by far the worst. The service was slow, rude, and deceptive. The first round was a bit slow and the food was at best warm, not hot. We did not order much...More
We visit here every time we come to Vancouver. We saw that they had taken away the walls to make the Great food selection and the service was great, especially if you like charcoal grilled skewers. They did not have ASAHI super dry which surprised...More
We have been going to all locations of Zakkushi for years. Starting at the original (now closed) on West 4th, moving on to Denman St, but now go to the one on Main Street. Funky, cool, beautiful, it could use a little more cleaning and...More
After returning from our trip to Japan, I was starting to wonder if I would find an izakaya in Vancouver that I really enjoyed (not a big fan of Hapa Izakaya). I decided it was about time we visited Zakkushi as I had heard some...More
Quite an informal environment with a large variety of traditional Japanese cuisine. It is easy to order something which you may not really want because items include liver, heart, regular meat, sushimi and more. This time we noticed that some of our food was actually...More
Went on a Saturday night to celebrate my birthday. Have seen Samurai Gourmet on Netflix and got interested in Oden, and this was the only place in Vancouver that offered it. Zakkushi's Oden was soon good. Doesn't seem like it was cooked in broth for...More
4 of us came and we had to queue to get a seat so looks like this is a popular place. The ambience and environment is traditional Japanese. This place is crowded but clean. I recommend to try spicy noodles and prawn skewer. We also...More
This is our go-to Izakaya in Vancouver. Very cozy, very intimate setting. I would rate their hot foods over the cold: the sashimi selection is rather limited, but good quality nevertheless. Their strength seems to be their hot kitchen: skewered meats and deep fried chicken/prawns...More
Food is solid, service is solid, and atmosphere is a little quieter, without being un-festive, than the West End location. Pretty much the same menu, with its own rotating suite of specials. Zakkushi has never disappointed. I'd recommend ordering a ton of a la carte...More
I always liked this place. If you are looking for authentic izakaya food (cooked food) especially tsukune yakitori skewers, come here. I love their mochi skewers as well. All the flavours down to the dressings for their salads have been impressive and very similar to...More
Been here a few times. the food is good. I love Yakitori and this offers a decent variety of grilled meats that are very good but not great. However as there is a lack of competition in Vancouver then this a go to place. It...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d5288965-Reviews-Zakkushi_Dining_on_Main-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Zarak By Afghan Kitchen,"My husband and I had dinner here last night and it was absolutely fantastic! We made reservations well in advance to our trip. We do not have Afghan food where we are from and were looking forward to trying it (me for the first time)....More
If you're reading this, make your reservation immediately. Do not hesitate. Do not show up without a reservation. Book it now. Probably top 10 of my dining experiences I have ever had in all of my travel. This place is beautiful, the service is perfect...More
We had a great time dining here at Zarak. The food here is absolutely amazing. The spicy chicken, the pakawra, the arezo, the palaw was all amazing. I can't recommend this place enough. Our server Sanmeet was so nice and so helpful. Definitely would come...More
I had only heard great reviews about Zarak so I was a bit disappointed. Maybe it was because I have sampled traditional Afghan food back in India and this was nowhere close to that. Maybe the chef had to adapt to make it more acceptable to the...More
Our host was Maya, and she made the evening great. We ordered too much food, but what can I say? We wanted to try everything, and everything we tried was fantastic. The concept is ""sharing portions"", but we warned, it doesn't mean ""small"". Pakawra is...More
Great meal. From interesting unique alcoholic and non - alcoholic drinks, we had a very unique and tasty meal. Main courses and appetizers were very good. Great service too. Highly recommend zarak by Afghan kitchen.
A group of nine of us went to Zarak for dinner. The dinner menu was extensive so it was hard to choose. We asked the waiter to pick the dishes for the table. The food was fantastic and our service was excellent. We were pleasantly...More
Came for brunch and it was amazing. I believe brunch is only available weekends. It was crazy busy so we did have to wait for a table but oh it was so worth it. I had the eggplant eggs benny. Delicious. It was served on...More
Best Afghan restaurant in Vancouver with great choice of drinks and foods. Welcoming, friendly and delicious food. If you droll for afghani food with proper balance of all elements Zarak is a place to visit.
I went to Zarak for dinner during the Dine-Out promotion. Prior to going, I had heard mix reviews about Zarak ranging from average to excellent, so I wasn’t sure what to expect. I arrived for a 5pm reservation on a weeknight, and it was packed....More
Having been to brunch, we decided to have an early dinner. We ordered a chickpea soup dish and this was good but unfortunately I cannot remember the name of the dish. We also ordered a chilled eggplant dish for starter but opted for vegetable crudités...More
Lovely and different place for brunch. The coffee was fantastic, and the Caesar flight was all delish. Really enjoyed the pakawra/eggplant bennie which was accompanied by interesting and hearty salad (get potatoes as a side for $5!). The chicken/pear french toast was really popular at...More
Afghani brunch with a twist and I loved it. Let's cut to the chase and tell you what we ordered.... Full Afghan, Shami Kebab, Eggs, Lubya, Mushroom, Bolani. This was yum fried eggs with 3 shami kebabs and the stuffed potato paratha was delicious. A...More
We finally were able to make reservations at Zaria and the food was incredible and the service was super friendly. Our server recommended everything and the amount of food was perfect for our our group of 6. - Beef and Spinach Dumplings - Cauliflower -...More
We had tried several times to get a reservation at Zarak but always left it too late. Finally decided to go mid week and early and got in on a hot Wednesday evening. The ambience is very pleasant although the noise level inside is high....More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23928639-Reviews-Zarak_By_Afghan_Kitchen-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Zefferelli's,"This is a real Italian experience! Food is amazing and I was very happy with my choice. The restaurant feels pretty Italian and reminded me some restaurants in Sardinia with real Italian food. 100% recomendable For Kids only ask for half Pasta portions and they...More
Generous servings of classic Italian food. City centre. Good value. Highly recommend. Gets busy so worth booking.
An all time favorite restaurant of mine for over 20 years. Delicious food, great staff, lively atmosphere. Our highlight tonight, bringing our kids back to my old pasta ""spot"" and they proactively saying ""best place for spaghetti in the whole wide world"" - (6 yrs...More
We were looking for a place to have a good pasta dinner and ended up to Zefferelli's spaghetti joint. It's located in the first floor and not easy to spot from the street level. A narrow staircase leads to the restaurant, which is most charming...More
We were looking for a place to have a diner at an Italian restaurant in the neighborood…fill with a lot of Asian restaurant… Our hotel direct us to this restaurant. I had tortellini in a creamy sauce with blue cheese. Tasty but salty. My wife...More
Me and my partner's first restaurant date was here 4 years ago and we go for dinner here to celebrate every year. Wine selection awesome, ravioli specials, but most importantly the Osso bucco. I look forward to many more years
Honestly an “ Italian Restaurant” just a joke. My friend took a pasta plate with mushrooms/tomato/truffle/bacon 33$ a JOKE nothing fresh, big portion for no taste. I know Vancouver is expensive but I expected for this price something better than just that but it’s not...More
We were recently strolling Robson St in downtown Vancouver looking for someplace to have dinner. My friend spotted this sign as she was curious as to many restaurants were located on upper level and commercial stores on street level. Don't let the name ""spaghetti joint""...More
This place was super busy so we had to wait for a table since we didn't have a reservation, but I am glad we did! Food was amazing, great specials listed. Good recommendations of wine pairings too. Not an accessible restaurant since you have to...More
Wow! What a find, tucked away upstairs above a vacant first floor lies this little taste of Italy. I had gorgeous Spaghetti Carbonara - simply divine.. Would highly recommend this spot!
I went to there at lunch time, and we ordered pizza and pasta. Both were really delicious. Customer service was also nice. They were kind for us. I recommend you go this restaurant!!!
4 of us ordered different meals and all were great. Servers were courteous and efficient. Meal came out quickly. We will be back.
Mounted the flight of stairs from the street, and found a comforting dining room with Swiss style chairs and a n unassuming floor to ceiling wine wall. My table overlooked busy Robson street. I appreciated the open windows that looked into the summer tree tops....More
We stumbled on this wonderful place by chance - it looks nothing from the outside but go up the stairs to experience really great Italian food in a great atmosphere. Two pieces of advice - book before you go as we were really lucky they...More
Decent Italian restaurant hidden away upstairs on Robson Street, although actually quite a big dining room . Reasonable prices for Downtown and generous portions. Menu is primarily pasta with some meat and fish dishes. Not much in the way of pizza. Enjoyable meal.",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d973325-Reviews-Zefferelli_s-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
Zen Japanese Restaurant,"We were having a casual family birthday party ( 10 adults and 8 children aged 1-11…..) and given the ages of the kids wanted to get take-out …… Jim advised me what to order and we got 3 large platters of various rolls , beautifully...More
Returned to Zen after more than a year and found it to be as great as ever. Service friendly, attentive, and professional. We sat outside on the very nice patio. Enjoyed a nice bottle of white wine reasonably priced. Also had the shrimp wantons, caterpillar...More
We went for dinner on Saturday evening and have only great things to say about the service and the food. The presentation was fabulous as well.
This restaurant turns sushi into delicious artwork. I love the sablefish, the ebi dumplings, the lobster roll, the gyoza, chirashi sushi .. and sometimes simply the sashimi.. its so fresh. This is one of my favorite places to go after a long work week. I...More
Great service by Christine. Average food for the price. One of the chefs did not stop feeding himself with his hands and continued preparation of food without washing his hands. Will never go back!
Delicious dumpling soup and creative rolls. Seating on the outdoor deck was very comfortable. Check before you place order, so that you will know whether the fish is raw or seared.
Great atmosphere, friendly staff, very delicious food, great dish presentation, very fast service.))
Fits a party of 8 just perfectly. We enjoyed many nicely prepared dishes such as ebi flower, beef in rice wrap, seafood buckwheat soba, yam tempura, raw spot prawns, toro and sockeye sashimi, tuna takaki salad, seaweed salad, miso soup, caterpillar roll, chopped scallop and...More
I took a friend here because of the TripAdvisor ratings..... and ended up covering my head in shame when she insisted on paying..... for average food at outrageously high prices! An Unagi Don (bland & tasteless) in a PLASTIC box for $26 ? Are you...More
This restaurant is second to none in service and food. When you enter, you are greeted by friendly chefs and a super hostess. The menu is great. Ebi dumplings are to die for. I never had anything like these. The sauce is superb Everything is...More
Food is fine. Accidentally ordered from here and spent TWICE what others in the neighbourhood charge for the same food. Try Kin or Dakishi sushi (within a block) for the same quality at half price.
I was lucky enough to be introduced to Zen by a local friend who was quite familiar with the place. Our group of 3 started with their amazing lemon ginger martinis (and then had another!) before moving into the food. We ordered all the dishes...More
I like this restaurant because it has something for everyone. Simple sushi for some, more adventurous choices for others and lots of non-raw options for the more picky of eaters. I enjoy the outdoor seating and the friendly service.
What an incredible meal! We had good service and the sushi was awesome. Small interior so booking would be recommended. Great views out onto the ocean.
This was an unexpected gem, food wise. Interesting menu items executed extremely well. Certainly a cut above even a very good sushi joint. The decor, service, and prices are a little too West Van for my liking but the fish was fresh, the staff very...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g183731-d710822-Reviews-Zen_Japanese_Restaurant-West_Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
iDen & Quan Ju De Beijing Duck House,"这家环境和服务(full service)一流，是按欧美方式经营的fine dining. 食材精良，做工精细，赏心悦目爽口。 For what you are getting， the price is actually reasonable.
Bad service. Waiter asked us to hand over unused wine glasses and also when we finished our beer. He actually used his hand and waved at wanting the glasses. Not a Michelin restaurant to us.
I am not a review writer but I felt compelled to write a review in hopes that this place will do better and focus less on pomp and more on quality and attention to detail. Frankly, I'm not sure on the Michelin star grading scale...More
We had seen a YouTube video featuring this restaurant whilst planning our trip. Caught a transit however it's a quick and inexpensive taxi ride from where we were staying in Downtown. Our meal from start to finish was exquisite, we ordered Peking Duck and knew...More
Retirement celebration dinner in a private room organized by friends and colleagues. The décor and ambience were stunning. The overhead lighting was somewhat darkened but there was sufficient lighting under the perimeter of the table for reading the menu and wine list etc. Dinner was...More
Sparkling evening. From the greeting at the door to collecting our coats. After a lifetime of world travel this was my first experience of a Michelin star. Have they ever earned it. William shepherded us through the menu without pretense. We were their for the...More
Dining at Quan Ju De was a truly excellent experience - one of the very top in our extensive dining adventures. Both the duck and the starters were world class. Other reviewers stress that it's expensive - and it certainly can be if you go...More
IDen & Quan Ju De, is a established brand out of Beijing, in 1864. Their main purpose of the fine dining restaurant is the famous Beijing Duck. Firstly, the starters were very delicious and savory. I love the Shanghai Style Croaker Fish, where there are...More
I picked the restaurant because of the Michelin star they got awarded recently - but honestly, I don‘t understand why they got it. You arrive in a nicely designed reception hall, but the rest of the restaurant is huge and has the charm of a...More
The recent recipient of a Michelin star Quan Ju De is an established brand out of Beijing, the original Restaurant established in 1864 famous for not only its signature Peking Duck but an opulent setting and excellent customer service. Located downtown at 12th and Cambie,...More
Service and food was average at best. I have had much better Peking duck and I don't see how they deserve a Michelin star. Really not worth the price.
I was lucky enough to be invited, as part of a group, to iDEN. The food was excellent. The service was elegant, and the setting was very inviting. It was an excellent culinary experience. All the staff were very professional. Our table was handled by...More
That was an amazing dinner 8 of us had. We devoured 15 dishes thanks to our generous host to celebrate a special occasion. The presentation, quality and taste of their food is top notch. Service is excellent. We had: 15 dishes Lobster jelly, Vegetarian Wonton...More
For a restaurant that I had a great experience at a year ago, imagine my shock at the way I was recently treated at this high-end place. Weeks ago, I made a reservation at the Internationally renowned iDen & Quan Ju De Beijing Duck House....More
It n is one of the top fine dinning for Asian cuisine in Vancouver , also well know for their Peaking Duck ! not for any one on budget , supper pricy , again you pay for you get , my business partner is member...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d23243886-Reviews-IDen_Quan_Ju_De_Beijing_Duck_House-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
sushi California,"really nice sushi and appetizer big menu, difficult to decide We had gyozas, croquettes and Avocado/Yam Roll friendly staff & busy place good value for money
Service was quick and lovely! Sushi was fresh and sashimi was delicious! The reason it’s four stars is cause they accidentally gave us a double order of tempura. Would come back for sure
Pretty good food for take away, was fast , cannot tell about the service at the table. Waiter was OK. Had some place to seat while waiting.
Called an hour before closing and they had no problem accommodating 7 of us Service was quick and attentive. Food was fresh and delicious.
I decided to order for take out although location and overall venue was nice. Portion are generous and fish was very fresh
We arrived here late evening after exploring Stanley park. This was one of the few places open and with seating available. We had to sit at the bar but we were starving so we would've taken any away Available lol. Sushi was just alright. Nothing...More
Solid sushi California. Good portion and good value. High volume of customers which keeps their ingredients turn over fast and fresh. They are always busy and have a long wait before covid, I often do take out or just go right when they open to...More
I like the salmon sashimi, very thick slice and yummy. Besides, the dragonfly roll with eel is wonderful. I like the fresh oysters, 4 pieces at CAD 7.25, good price.
Went for a work lunch and will not be! Service was shocking. Food came out to the table at completely different times with some waiting 40 minutes. During this time orders came out in correct with one dish completely missing the chicken. When the final...More
Found this restaurant walking the Vancouver streets. Great authentic Japanese service and meal. Not expensive at all for a family of four visiting Vancouver. Loved it!
This place is full during dinner time! They serve various sushi with huge portion. Price and taste are good. The best food here is salmon nigiri, which comes in cubic cuts and marinated in salad dressing.
I subway'd here, was a 3 minute walk from the subway station. Price was really good, considering in Toronto it is more expensive. Also seleciton was alot better then toronto, aswell as the taste! Come try some some sushi here if your from out of...More
Good service. We went as a group of 8 at a busy time, and the servers were accommodating and put together 3 tables, despite the troubles it would have caused regarding seating and maneuvering. The sushi was not bad for the price.
Went there with my family and we had to wait for 40 minutes to be seated. The service is nice and the sushi was ok. Nothing really special though... had some better sushi for the same price.
This place is busy and you guessed it, the food is great. The menu is extensive but the rolls are fantastic! Enjoy",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d4354236-Reviews-Sushi_California-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
tetsu Sushi,"A fabulous place for true sushi lovers. Excellent quality of raw fish. The service is very courteous. Go a la carte or try their omakase though more expensive is worth the price.
The three of us highly enjoyed our dinner here. A very small restaurant so be sure to book a reservation well in advance. The fish is from Japan and is so fresh. Great service too.
Food is amazing and service is great. We had the best sea urchin in a while. Chaman mushi is great with crab meat. Spot pawn is fresh and sweet. Everything goes well together and balanced with each other.
Although small, this place is reminiscent of the tiny restaurants in Osaka, Japan, widely known as the cradle of real Japanese cuisine. Every dish is a picture, prepared painstakingly with fresh, interesting ingredients and served with flair. A must for any connaisseur of Japanese food.
Absolutely the best sushi we had in Vancouver. The quality of food was exceptional and the service as well. Tetsu is a small place that focuses on authentic sushi preparation, the sushi was presented by the chef with soy sauce and wasabi on it with...More
Sat at the sushi bar and ordered the chef sushi special!!! Great assortment of super fresh sushi which was accompanied by a lovely affordable bottle of cold sake. Service was knowledgeable, friendly and unpretentious! Not to be missed!
First time at Tetsu and had the Omakase with friends at the sushi bar. $80 for appetizer, selection of sushi, udon, and dessert. The place is small but they serve the freshest seafood and sushi in Vancouver. Service is great as well. Highly recommend.
A small but cute Japanese restaurant. We sat at the small counter (3 seats) and had about 10 sushi made by the sushi chef, fish all fresh and tasty. We also ordered a few specials from ‘the board’ and they were all good. A very...More
We came here inviting another pair of friends who can appreciate high quality Japanese food. We ordered off the menu and their daily board asking for their recommendations. We very much enjoyed umaki, squid, Toro taku, real crab roll, yamaimo salad, various fresh sashimi, udon,...More
The four of us decided a la carte this time. Ordered various fresh sashimi from Japan, nigiri, a few of the basic rolls which is not made of from odds and ends, eel wrapped in egg, salad, 2 squid ordered, cooked in two ways and...More
Compared to the disastrous device at The Sandbar, the generosity of time and attentiveness at this gem of a restaurant was humbling. High quality sushi - in the Tokyo quality world of sushi - and some of the best service I have experienced in a...More
You must book weeks in advance to get in. This is a very small restaurant that serves very good Japanese food. The four of us did the omakase menu with premium fish. Nice presentation, very good quality fish used. The udon could be had cold...More
Outstanding sushi and sashimi: enough said. Why does trip advisor require 100 characters when less is more?
I have no idea why there are so few comments for Tetsu Sushi on trip advisor because it’s always full and people really seem to be happy to go there! We went on a Saturday evening at 9:30pm (had to book in advance as there...More
Word has gotten out - be sure to reserve. I first reviewed Tetsu Sushi shortly after it opened. I called it a hidden gem. Unfortunately for my wife and me, it is no longer a hidden gem. Word has gotten out that it is one...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d12611837-Reviews-Tetsu_Sushi-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
the apron,"Very tasty food, however, VERY expensive. Menu was not extensive but had something for most. Not a great location- in a very busy/industrial area. great wine selection
We had a layover at the Weston Wall so we had our dinner at The Apron and wow, was it good. The food would be on par with most restaurants and the menu was very extensive. Service was quick and friendly as well.
Enjoyed a quiet late breakfast with family on a quick day trip to Richmond. Good service, enjoyable eggs benny and an overall pleasant experience
We arrived late and very hungry. This restaurant located in the Westin hotel did not disappoint! Service was friendly and prompt. Dishes were expertly prepared both in taste and in appearance.
Friendly staff great food and great service . Not to expensive , a nice place and unlike most hotels actually has some atmosphere
Amanda our server was outstanding, pleasant ,courteous and very knowledgeable. Did not hesitate to recommend food or the appropriate wine . A real pleasure to deal with. The food was served on time and was well presented and delicious.
Wow, where to begin? The meal my family and I ate tonight at The Apron, courtesy of chef Marcus Ducayen, is one of the best I’ve ever had. By special arrangement, we had a four course set menu featuring samples from the regular menu. It...More
After a long day of interacting with people I generally just want to be able to enjoy my dinner in peace. On a budget so I didn't want to incur the additional delivery charge for in-room dining and the forced gratuity (I prefer to make...More
We had traveled for a while and decided to not venture out for dinner so chose the apron in the Westin Wall Centre lobby. The menu featured some unique items but the taste and presentation were average. We assumed that in a well-appointed hotel the...More
We had a family reunion of 12 for brunch (coming from Kelowna, Ottawa, Victoria, Calgary, Vancouver and Tsawwassen). Everyone was impressed with quality of the food and the outstanding service, with each person being attended to very well by Scott. All in the group were...More
Ate at this restaurant late in the evening so it was quiet and relaxing. Server was friendly. Serving size was good and the food was delicious. I highly recommend the pancetta and carmelized onion pizza.
Hidden in the Westin Wall Centre Hotel is the small cafe and bar called The Apron. With excellent entrees and just the right balance between healthy options and traditional North American favorites, it’s a great place to grab a meal or a light snack with...More
Early supper before our flight after checking out. Marc was patient with us all and helpful in explaining menu items to great grandma. Enjoyed the soup and the quiet atmosphere.
...I has the prawn & scallop linguine, which states Prawns & Scallops (plural) when all that came were 5 small prawns and 1 scallop! This was my first disappointment, there should have been at minimum 4 of each meat or 6 prawns 3 scallops..I also...More
Working out of town I always look for a great dining experience. Found the right one here, great food, great friendly service can usually find a time it’s not too busy and loud. Seafood always fresh and very tasty. Appetizers were a great way to...More",15,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g181716-d2002263-Reviews-The_apron-Richmond_British_Columbia.html
the change,"Amaizing place. Beautiful view, good food, great service. Nice, modest and clean rooms. Highly recommended.
Such a beautiful location! Several reasturants have tried to make a go of it here but seldom last beyond 2 yrs. Pity as it is such a great location. The food at the Change was ok but honestly I did not find it had a...More
My wife and I are big Fans of oriental food so when we happened across The Change while strolling along the waterfront we dived in for a much needed snack. The staff were incredibly friendly and genuinely keen to please. The menu is presented on...More
we had lunch here ... gorgeous location... good food... reasonable prices and the most obliging staff.... we had the special of the day... tasty and not expensive...I would recommend this place for a quick, easy, tasty option... and the staff were the very best in...More
Excellent food, lovely location and very amiable service. Highly recommend the stone bowl chicken with tree mushrooms and the asparagus with cashews.
We came here on Christmas night based on TA reviews, The reviews were accurate. The food was good but they just do not get Asian fusion. Wait staff was friendly but they are not trained well. Sometimes we had a waitress and sometimes we had...More
Hi qwerty613, Thank you very much for your feedback. It's extremely valuable to us. We will continue to improve our service and training of the staffs. Sincerely, The Change Dining
We visited this restaurant for my daughters birthday, following previous visits. As with our prior visits we had s fabulous dinner. We ordered a variety of items which we all shared. The service was excellent and the staff were very knowledgable and their recommendations were...More
Requiring gluten-free dining we heard about 'the change' which advertises GF Chinese dining. The location is good, immediately beside The Westin Bayshore and beside Coal Harbour Marina. We arrived to dinner to find the restaurant all but empty. The hostess was welcoming, and as it...More
Had decided a change of route at the last minute, exiting Stanley Park and are glad we did, since we stumbled upon this place. Great food and friendly, attentive service. For two people, two appetizers, an entree and a rice/noodle dish are more than enough...More
Friendly welcome, lovely location, ginger beef to die for, the Peking duck two ways was relish. Good value and recommened
Excellent chinese restuarant on the marina near coal harbour. Not really asian fusion but very good food nevertheless. Very friendly staff.
The day was sunny and very warm and we were looking for somewhere to have a relaxing lunch and a rest since we had been doing a fair bit of walking. We were passing this place and thought we would take a chance. Glad we...More
I was starting my round trip of Stanley Park by bike but had missed lunch. So I was hoping to find something Asian on the way... oh boy I did find it!!! The location is excellent. It overlooks the Marina. It is very relaxing, but...More
We tried The Change because it had good reviews, and it was the only restaurant on Coal Harbour I could find that had several vegan dishes. It was also convenient because my partner, myself and a friend were attending a performance of Oliver at Malkin...More
Real Chinese food with cooperative service which takes a lot of time to explain although you can see the dishes on an iPad. Trust them and get their recommendations. Setting is charming and prices are very good for the excellent food. Do not miss it...More",16,https://www.tripadvisor.com/Restaurant_Review-g154943-d7236847-Reviews-The_change-Vancouver_British_Columbia.html
